Not only blood, but these centers need water bottles and snacks as well for the large influx of people donating blood. If you can't donate blood, think about donating food and drinks. 
Thank you for this. My sister is a critical care nurse at ormc and she lives only a few miles from Pulse. The day they worked today was long and the days to come will be too. My sister just wants everyone to know that ormc is a level one trauma center for a reason, and they were prepared for handling tragedy like this, and she is glad for it. Hearing from her about surgeries in hallways gave me chills. I'm glad I'm not the only one thinking of them. Also tijuana flats gave them all dinner so they've got that going for them, which is nice. 
That must have been incredibly tragic. I hope you're doing well. 
I'm so sorry please let us know when you hear something 
Correct, I believe he will speak at 1:30 eastern time. 
Yes! Not only blood, but these centers need water bottles and snacks as well for the large influx of people donating blood. Random acts of pizza is an amazing thing to do right now if you can't donate blood. 
Donation centers are at capacity for the day, but they're asking everyone to donate as the week goes on. 
It's so weird how one little decision can mean life or death 
I live right down the street from the club myself, absolutely crazy, I'm glad your friend is safe. 
I live in Tampa and my girlfriend and I recently went to Pride. It terrifies me that these places we have deemed safe, to escape from the homophobia and intolerance, have been targeted in such a specific way as to scare us from some of the only places we found acceptance in. What if it were here, an hour away? What if my gf and I had gone out last night, and ended up in the same situation? All because of who we love. I know everyone says to stay strong and don't have fear or change your ways of living, but maybe I'm not that strong. Maybe this shit shakes me to the core. A calculated, homophobic, hateful attack on innocent people who just want to be accepted for who they are. 
An off-duty officer was working in the club, exchanged gunfire with the suspect when he began shooting on the main floor at approx 2 AM. Two additional officers responded, initiating the hostage-taking and subsequent standoff. 
As an American who is appalled by this type of violence, thank you. I am terrible sorry for your lose and about what happened in Paris. 
If he is actually a member of ISIS, then the bastard gets what he wants. The greater the divide between ordinary Muslims and the West, the better for ISIS. If he is just some moronic idiot who hated gays, then yes he is just some incompetent evil idiot. 
Pride month has always been a bleak reminder (Stonewall), but I do agree, so many years later to have this time punctuated by this event is heartbreaking. 
Probably is. How many times has he had to make the same speech during his presidency? Gotta get disheartening 
While your statement is correct, this is the deadliest mass shooting in the U.S., ever. 
Facebook has a cool safety check feature that can tell you if your friends have marked themselves "safe". It might be worth checking out if you have people you haven't heard from. 
That is a *great* recommendation that I never would have thought of. 
Also thank you to the amazing transfusion service laboratory technologists! 
Something similar happened when the nightclub fire in Brazil happened in 2013. This is probably even more straining for any helpers. 
Also the same thing described by firefighters at the KISS nightclub fire in Santa Maria, Brazil, where about 240 people died. 
18th time he will have done this during his presidency. Shame. 
Cookies come to mind. And if you're in the area, you can make those! My thoughts go out to everyone impacted by this. 
Target donated liked 500 cases of water, and the publix in South Downtown did the same. 
I live in Orlando, have AB positive, regularly donate plasma at the same center and I called in asking if they wanted me to come in. They set an appointment with me for tomorrow. Don't go down to one today as they are overwhelmed at the moment. Call and set an appointment for later in the week. 
I'm glad you're safe. Something like this, happening in my own neighborhood... I couldn't even imagine. 
Hey neighbor. You're lucky you weren't here. It was terrifying 
People will say "you can't blame them." But I am totally blaming them. 
Him and the other 20 people densely packed in that alley, had the shooter found them they would have had no chance. It was an awful, awful thing but nobody knows what they would really do in a situation like that. 
I'm so going to hear about this at school tomorrow. Like Paris all over again. 
Thank you for that. Feels sometimes like everyone hates all of us, even though we're also horrified at these acts. 
For some reason, that I can't even explain, when I heard that the Orlando Mayor declared a State of Emergency it really sunk in. It's terrible, but you have to give all of the rescue works/police extreme credit. From the things I read the shooter had no plans on letting anyone in the club live. It's something that just makes you feel numb and sad. Thoughts are with all the people affected by this tragedy. 
Awesome work from the off duty officer, even though he didn't get him, I'm assuming some people were able to escape during their firefight. Just hope he doesn't feel at fault for not being able to stop him. 
Officers rescued at least 30 individuals in the club. 
To be fair hindsight is 20-20 and the police might not have had all the info on what was happening on the inside, I'm sure it was very chaotic and they didn't want to charge in and make a mistake 
I've lived in Orlando off and on my whole life, five years solid I've lived here now, this is by far the most tragic thing I've ever witnessed. Maybe because I'm older now and I can relate better, but the more the reports are finalized and the numbers sure up it's just horrifying to imagine these poor people. He didn't strike until 2 am and bars close at 3 so all of these people are trapped and likely totally inebriated by then. The DJ posted on FB that there was a gunman in the bar for everyone to run and get out of Pulse. I can't imagine the confusion as 300 people try to flee. 
Thanks for your kindness. we need to stick together. 
You know what it's still unreal to me sometimes. You forget it happened. And some morning it hits you and you're in hell. So so strange. Thanks for the kinds words. 
Angry about two guys kissing in Miami? You may as well get angry about the sun shining in Miami. What a fucking stupid crazy evil sonofabitch. 
His own parents said they believe the motivation was anti-gay. 
Too many colors and shapes. I can't tell what's supposed to be what. 
If r/news isn't going to do its job, it's up to the most popular subreddits (like this one) to pick it up so the most people possible will be aware. Thanks for doing the right thing. 
My girlfriends parents (Seniors) heard about this before I saw it on Reddit. 
Before he got into the pressroom they said this was the 15th time he has had to make a statement about a mass shooting. 
Thank you, anything helps! I think a lot of blood centers have reached capacity and recommends making an appointment for later this week. But they could definitely use the food and water. 
It's visible how much he has aged mentally and physically throughout his presidency. 
We could always order stuff from Amazon Prime Now for them. Get them what they need. 
It was pretty amazing, we got offered so many bottles of water and umbrellas while we waited! 
I dunno how their badass hats are gonna help but the thought is appreciated. 
I've heard gunshots before and I've gotten used to the routine. Close your curtain, turn off your lights, and stay away from the windows. But I remember the first time it happened, I was like 6 or 7 and it's absolutely terrifying. I can't imagine what it would be like to live your whole life only relatively peacefully only for a massacre to happen around the corner 
I'm not even trying to be insensitive. As a gay man, this is terrifying to me. It's going to make me think twice about being open about my orientation to anyone who isn't a very close friend. 
According to the edit, the alleyway was already filled with people piling on top of each other to get out a hole in the fence. I'm choosing to believe that guy barricaded the door to save the lives of the people he was witnessing, clamoring to get out of a fence. 
I don't know about you but I'm blaming the guy with a gun 
I mean, most victims of Islamic extremism are Muslims. That's a fact that frequently gets overlooked or ignored. 
A mass terrorist shooting in Orlando is a nightmare scenario, since it has so many theme parks. 
Tragedy strengthens our bond, and through that bond we find strength. 
It depends. If it's an active shooter, they charge in ASAP. If it's a hostage situation, they try to negotiate. It seems like this was one masquerading as the other. They followed protocols for hostage-situation when the shooter had no intention to keep survivors. 
It's damned if you do and damned if you don't. If the police had charged in immediately and the guy had, for example, blown himself up and killed another 50 people... they'd be blamed for going in too fast. 
As another Frenchman here. Stay strong. We stand with you. I can barely imagine the dread and anger you must be feeling. I have only sadness and compassion for you guys. 
FBI seems to be indicating there were ties to terrorism as well, so it may have been a planned attack 
I work closely with a bunch of Muslims in the military. I'm lucky that I live in a very international town that is friendly to everyone because I imagine they'd have a bad time in most of the country. Stay safe. 
"Hey man, I know this looks bad but you'll be fine. You just gotta keep your head up." 
But the second Price died they were all up on it. This is one of the deadliest terrorist attack on U.S. soil and what the fuck? 
I worked in the mortgage division of a bank at the time and about 3 or so of our applicants died on 9/11. Normal protocol is to send a letter for withdrawal due to inactivity but I couldn't do it. Their spouses and family members didn't need to see another reminder of lives cut short. I made a copy of the letter for their files and tossed the originals. RIP 
I hadn't thought of the impact those noises would have on the surviving firefighters. They absolutely would have known what that noise was and would have done anything to help them. 
So I'll go ahead and say it. What was he doing for 3 hours? In 3 hours an incredible amount of fire can be put down, way more than what is needed for 103 dead and wounded. Do we know if he was out of ammo? 3 hours is just such a long time in a firefight 
Our thoughts and hopes are with you, friend. Reading your comment gave me a different perspective. Previously this was a tragedy that happened hundreds of miles and an ocean away from me so there was a natural separation for me. Seeing the fear and hope in your words has truly brought this closer to me. I'm not properly explaining myself, but I hope you are ok and I hope your friend is safe. 
Can you imagine him being woken up at 4 o'clock this morning and what must have been going through his head. I mean when I get woken up in the middle of the night and it's bad news there's a limited amount of things that I think it might be. But as president of the United States oh my God could be anything. 
Amazon should engineer a disaster relief button on their app where organizations like Red Cross and Blood Donation centers can create a wish list for anyone to buy and send to them. 
The turban is worn to show that the person wearing it is a Sikh. So that everyone who see can see that said person is a Skih. 
I'm not sure it was the shooter's intent, but that's literally the definition of terrorism. 
Thanks for the clarification...That sounds a lot better than one guy closing and barricading the door behind him....Sucks to hear either way for sure...God what a terrible tragedy. My thoughts are very much with all the victims and families for sure...Today my heart aches. 
I can see they're actively removing threads for it... 
The gas was a good idea but the execution of the whole event was awful. They didn't have enough medication to treat everyone affected by the gas and they let people choke to death unconscious. 
I strongly suspect this is an ISIS-fan terrorism attack. He probably had no actual ties to ISIS, just wanted to do "his part" to ... uhh what is it they want to do? Well killing gay people probably looked like a good way to help the global effort to this guy. 
Just...just keep your br- keep your brain in your head, man...it'll be alright...dude. 
Well we wouldn't want to offend anyone by criticizing Islam would we? Better to censor all discussion about the ~~greatest~~ largest mass shooting in U.S. history. edit - a word because some people don't know that great doesn't always imply good 
There were a lot of things I did not want to ask. This was definitely on that list. It was hard enough having to know what was happening, I didn't want to know the details. I didn't want to know what people were having to do with their loved ones' posessions. I didn't want to know a goddamn thing about how hard the human tragedy was hitting everyone around me, because I was 19 and was not prepared in any way to deal with something like that. 
I'm sure you have to become somewhat desensitized. You see a lot of shit in 8 years as Prez, at this point it's probably a sigh and an audible "fuck" 
That is actually a genius idea. You should submit it to them. No joke. The only thing about amazon is that it takes a while for delivery. But I'm sure something could be worked out for situations like this. 
Unfortunately, a lot of people think the turban is a Muslim thing. 
It probably was his intent to some degree. He obviously wanted to scare/hurt the gay community, and force them out of the public eye. Screw that though. We as a nation and world need to make sure not to give creepy crazy people like this too much power. It is fully within their rights to think being gay is evil, and it is fully in their rights to express that verbally. Just as it is within my rights to think they are idiots. But when someone on any side crosses the line into violence people from every side need to band together to defend and protect the victims. 
who was the shooter? What was so significant about him? 
Throwing out the baby with the bathwater. Gays, guns, Muslims, terror, we have pretty much everything contentious topic in this country in one event, of course it's going to be a shit storm. 
I remember watching a fascinating documentary about it. They had one of the Spetsnaz soldiers talking about why it went so badly - the emergency personnel just left the unconscious people on their backs on the pavement once the raid had been carried out. The Spetsnaz guys were dashing like madmen trying to put people on their sides in recovery positions and were furious the people they had just saved were dying needlessly. 
They don't need direct contact in fact they prefer not to risk it. They just put out tons of information about who, what, where and how to carry out attacks and recently told people to step up attacks for Ramadan. 
He honestly seems really upset every time there is an attack like this. It's something I really admire about him. Especially when he spoke about Sandy Hook, I felt like he was speaking as a father, not just as a president. 
"Honestly, if I were two-faced, would I be showing you this one?" - Abraham Lincoln in response to an accusation by Stephen Douglas 
Yea I can agree with that, the most striking issues though are his hairline being insane and the forehead creases. 
I think i will. Prime Now can deliver in 2 hours. Even if some sort of disaster extends that delivery window to much longer, it can still be pretty valuable. Amazon has massive wearhouses full of emergency essentials. This can also help to thwart misuse of funds a little if we are sending the necessary items directly. 
I didn't yet but i will now. What email address did you send to? Or did you just use the contact us link? 
Probably because they'll be either Sikhs or Gurkhas. Both ideal company in faecal-impact-related turbine failures. 
Yeah, I was talking about this with a friend earlier. One of the victims in Norway died a few days after the attack. It's definitely a possibility here, though hopefully they all pull through. 
And someone higher up stated it was Hispanic night at the club.. So you can add another contentious aspect to your list. 
I don't understand. Why are the mods censoring? Like, what are they gaining from it? Thanks 
I think it's because he feels so powerless. This is one of those things that despite being the most powerful politician in the country no matter how much he wants change to happen and how hard he tries it simply won't happen. He has to make a speech anytime something like this happens and talk about how awful it is, all while knowing it will happen again and again. He knows why it's happening and how to stop it but he can't. 
People think that our current presidential candidates say childish things to each other during debates. When Lincoln and Douglas were debating everything was free game including the families of them both. 
Hairline looks the same in both to me, just the first he has a comb-over masking that forehead puff. 
I'm sure Amazon could kick in the accelerated delivery charge if people are buying disaster relief goods from their site... this is a really good idea 
They even have power transmission towers shaped like Mickey Mouse. 
My guess is that they delete any comment mentioning Islam. Only a guess, though. Can't imagine any other reason they'd delete so many comments. 
To have to face the public knowing that nothing you can say will bring back those 49 innocent civilians (death toll is 50 but includes the shooter), that's rough. I struggle to find the words to write in a sympathy card when someone I know loses a family member. I can't imagine being in a position of power where I could *potentially* stop things like this from happening and where the general public expects me to prevent things like this from happening, but knowing damn well these things will keep on happening no matter what I say or do. Then there are the critics who will swoop in after his speech to say he was too emotional or not emotional enough or this or that. Like, what do you even say? What can you even do when something so terrible just happened with no warning and the country is looking at you for answers? I do not want to be president. Ever. 
Dude, shitting on people's families is *nothing.* In 1856 Rep. Preston Brooks got pissed off about Senator Charles Sumner's abolitionist speeches and tried to **beat him to death** right on the Senate floor while Rep. Laurence Keitt held off intervening Senators with a pistol. Sumner didn't recover from the mental trauma for over two years, and Massachusetts re-elected him in this time so his empty chair would be a symbol of inspiration and defiance. Sumner's beating and the dramatically different response to it on the two axes of the country was a *huge* factor in building up the inevitable Civil War. Then in 1858 Keitt started a brawl during open session of the House, with some 50 Congressmen joining the fight. Etc. Etc. Congress and the current presidential debates are pretty freaking mellow compared federal government in the 1800s. 
I don't even think it's a matter of "could" as much as I bet they "would". I can't describe how much I love this idea. 
How do you claim your ISIS mega-reward when you're dead? 
They were deleting comments of people telling others to donate blood in the area as well. 
Usually they designate a family member or something like that. It's just like what Sadam did for Palestinian suicide bombers in the 90s. They go boom, he paI'd the family 
The Encyclopaedia Galactica exists in both Foundation and Hitchhikers. 
Jesus, Christ- that's brilliant. Some kind of literacy push. I'll wait until the discussion rounds out some more, see what kind of things people are fiending for, and then if try and take a step forward with it. 
As much as it pains me to say it, I don't think that's such a far stretch. *Mr. Grey flashed me the whip handle from the belt of his uniform and grinned. "Won't you join me in the gaming room, Ms. Steele?* *The nerve! "Heavens, no. That would be terribly improprietous, Mr. Grey, and I intend to maintain my ladyhood."* *"Very well, my lady. I shall call on you again, when you are feeling less proprietous and more inclined to adventure," Mr Grey smirked, sending a flush through my cheeks!* *I would feel no such thing! Why must Mr. Grey infuriate and excite me so?* 
"To whom it may concern: It is springtime. It is late afternoon." [DIES] 
My pleasure- your suggestion rocks. It made me think of another: Salman Rushdie writes the Twilight Series. 
As the twelfth toll of the dilapidated clock on the wall outside his cell marked the first hour of his eleventh year, young Harold Potter sat upright in his nightclothes. Eyes wide and soaked through with sweat he tried to burn the gibbering pnakotic half-things that haunted his dreams of late away by lighting the only candle his captors allowed. His labored breathing slowed as the flickering light danced on the wall of the space beneath the stairs at 4 privet drive. The solace of the dancing shadows would prove to be fleeting however, as it was only mere hours before the winged harbinger of magicks beyond description arrived, screeching and flapping, and marking the end of youthful innocence and the dark shapes and mutterings of a child's ignorant nightmares. After this day, the visions that haunted Potter's sleep would coalesce into a singular, tangible horror that ubeknownst to him, had on one occasion already almost taken his life... 
Until: *At which point Mercutio exclaimed "thou a poperin pear!", a phrase which here means...* 
I'd read anything Terry did a "cover" of....which actually is pretty much what half his Discworld books are really, just covers of famous stories 
A lot of weird sex shit is going to be going down on that boat. 
I'm having this problem where I've either yet to read a work by the author, or I've yet to read the novel mentioned in each author-novel pair in just about every single comment, and I'm feeling irrationally pissed off 
Oh man, the body horror possibilities of Greek mythology! 
how about Mark Z. Danielewski taking on Calvin and Hobbes 
Yes I just re-listened to his dark materials my god it's a breathtaking and intricate series. To piggy back, I would want Phillip Pullman to write a series on dumbledors life from grindlevold to Harry. Dumbledor had that rich deepeness that I think Pullman could capture. 
Saruman's point of view is featured in a couple of chapters and you actually kind of agree with him. 
Book 1: The Pernicious Praetorians Book 2: The Baseless Barbarians Book 3: The Conniving Christians Book 4: The Embarrassing Emperors Book 5: The Scrambled Split Book 6: The Grave Goths Book 7: The Petrifying Plagues Book 8: The Blighted Byzantines Book 9: The Vicious Vandals Book 10: The Contemptible Crusades Book 11: The Troubled Territories Book 12: The Objectionable Ottomans Book 13: The End 
I didn't realize how badly I need Margaret Atwood's version of the story of Lot until now. 
He'd take as long to write the book as Odysseus takes to get home. 
I actually kind of want to read Neil Gaiman's Hitchhiker's Guide. 
"It was a lone tree burning on the desert. A heraldic tree that the passing storm had left afire. The solitary pilgrim drawn up before it had traveled far to be here and he knelt in the hot sand and held his numbed hands out while all about in that circle attended companies of lesser auxiliaries routed forth into the inordinate day, small owls that crouched silently and stood from foot to foot and tarantulas and solpugas and vinegarroons and the vicious mygale spiders and beaded lizards with mouths black as a chowdog's, deadly to man, and the little desert basilisks that jet blood from their eyes and the small sandvipers like seemly gods, silent and the same, in Jeda, in Babylon. A constellation of ignited eyes that edged the ring of light all bound in a precarious truce before this torch whose brightness had set back the stars in their sockets." **Blood Meridian** 
*Toy Story 2* is more of a Tolkien tale. In the first one they'd barely leave the Shire. 
Can you write a whole book in 140 character chunks? 
That sort of exists. It's called *The Crystal Star*, was written by an author who'd done a lot of Star Trek novels before attempting a Star Wars one, and easily ranks up there as one of the absolute wierdest Star Wars stories. 
Please don't contact George R. R. Martin, please. 
This the what I expected when I clicked this thread. 
Yeah, it would probably be the same story until the end where she has no sympathy for the tree. It died because it could not defend itself, that's it's own fault. It should not have given before it made sure it had enough. 
Sorry this is invalid, you need 5 more instances of the word "Euclidean" in that paragraph for it to be proper Lovecraft 
He wouldn't get to the animal sex, he'd get stuck writing about food. 
I've been dreaming about an open-world Redwall rpg ever since I was 12 years old. It'll happen, one day. 
He's written several extremely unsettling short stories. They're awesome and full of great ideas and some of those ideas ended up in his childrens books. Just a fun fact for you. 
Sure. But then it wouldn't have made a billion dollars with teenage girls and bored wistful mothers. I think you mean that's what you'd like the story to have been. Should is kind of a weird word in the context. 
Pratchett taking a go at Le Carre' or Flemming would be interesting. 
I've always thought of *Equal Rites* as a kind of gender flipped Harry Potter. The books are more dissimilar than they are similar but the similarities are still there. 
I would not like it in my mouth I would not like it further down south. I would not like it in my box I would not like it with more cocks. 
I'm sure there'd also be entire chapters of the Steele girls sitting around gossiping/bitching about various suitors as well. 
"If I were a younger man, I would write a history of human stupidity; and I would climb to the top of the Wall and lie down on my back with my history for a pillow; and I would wait for the Others who make wights out of men; and I would make a wight of myself, lying on my back, grinning horribly, and thumbing my nose at The Old Gods" 
I think I'm imagining a really rich ensemble cast of supernatural beings in India whose complex species politics (the vampires' internal strife amongst various covens, their united war against the werewolves, their shaky on-again-off-again alliance with ghosts, etc.) are a larger allegory for the difficult transition from colonial oppression to postcolonial self-fulfillment. Is that about what you're imagining? 
Tobias: "I'm saying I'm a falcon who dreamt he was a man and loved it. But now the dream is over and the falcon is awake." i know that's not kafka but it fits 
That's because she only wrote every fifth book or something like that. All the others are ghost written 
As a non-native speaker of the English language who's reading Lovecraft for the first time, in English, I must say that this here reads exactly like his work. I must confess that many times my brain hurts when I'm reading his tales because of how he uses some words and phrasings that are not very used nowadays. 
The Queer Case Of The Notes Pertaining To The Investigation Of The Case Of The Diary Of One Harold Potter 
This would actually be a fantastic way to read Shakespeare. They'd beat you over the head with the jokes until you understood them. 
Have you seen the Netflix series? It sticks pretty much *exactly* to the books, but adds even more VFD conspiracy and is even more depressing. 
Words cannot explain how much I adore this. And it actually scans too! 
We are the all-singing, all-dancing crap of the universe. Prepare to die. 
My favorite Pratchett books are his Macbeth cover and his religion medley. 
Instead of being from England, Harry and co. will be foul mouth kids from Maine. 
The opening scene would have Bilbo Chinaski plastered to high hell in his derelict tree house while he starts *The Hobbit.* Frodo, not giving a Balrog's ass that Gandalf was coming to town, would be banging Rosie in the Green Dragon while Sam was out cutting the verge. I think, with no uncertainty, that Gimli would be the only character that wouldn't have to be rewritten. 
You mean like Trump 'covering' a book like *Great Expectations* (*Yuge ~~Expectations~~ Hopes*)? 
They would probably wander the desert forever, but also be immortal. 
man i would be so down for an entire series from saruman's pov, as written by grrm 
That said Tolkien did take a long long time to write the books. It's just that they were all published in short succession since he actually wrote it as one book that was then split into three. 
Considering Sean Bean is Borromir, he might as well keep that scene but make his mad dash for power a desperate plea for saving his people of Gondor. *Mordor is Coming* 
Margaret Atwood wrote a parallel perspective kind of work to Homer's Odyssey called the Peneloppiad, and it's fascinating. Would highly recommend. Also just cause I've never found anywhere else to put this on reddit, she came to my university to give a talk a couple years ago, and she was fucking hysterical the entire time. People left with their chests hurting from laughing so hard, it was amazing. That woman deserves so much respect. 
He did write that one episode of Doctor Who, so I can actually kinda see this. 
Is there a link to all the nominees and winners of that? I love original questions like this, instead of the unpopular opinion/irrational hatred/greatest movie of all time/ sexiest sex you ever sexed questions I see all the time. 
That's after tomorrow's "which covered novel would you be *least* excited to read" thread, right? 
What's that? You want me to write a book that's not Winds of Winter? Sure, I've got plenty of time for that! 
Given how much I remember Strawberry Cordial and candied chestnuts about as much as I remember actual plot lines... I shudder to think about how many ~~pages~~ chapters George would cover with table spreads. 
His short stories are not for children. Do not let your grade schooler read those. Speaking from experience here. 
Holden Caulfield is just evidence that every new generation of teenager in the history of mankind has been shitty in the same basic way. 
~~Straker~~ Barlow is such a stone cold badass in that book. When the priest tries to get at him with his holy symbol and he's just like...nah, bruh, you ain't hard. and the light just dies down and withers away and the priest gets eaten 
The Spy Who Came in from Ankh Morpork/ DiscWorld is Not Enough, if you will. 
I recall Terry telling a story from a signing. Someone brought a book to him and said "look. I've worked it out. Ponder Stibbons, glasses, awkward boy who goes to a magical school. This is based on Harry Potter isn't it?" Terry turned to the front of the book and pointed out the 1992 publishing date. Equal Rites was also written a decade before Potter. 
I do not like it in that way I do not like this, Mr. Grey 
this is far and away the coolest clip of writing i've come across on reddit in a long while, probably ever. the marriage of the tones works so well for the topic you chose. To contrast my own ineloquent self, Fucking A dude. 
nobody does morbid better than Faulkner. see also: A Rose for Emily 
tobias got stuck as a hawk; jake morphed a falcon, JEEZE 
She wrote the first 25/26 and only the outlines of the rest until the last two, which she personally wrote. 
I'm a native English speaker and his stuff makes my head hurt too. Pretty sure there's some dark magics involved 
It is neither and it isn't a summoning spell, either. Cthulhu's worshipers in The Call of Cthulhu story chant "Ph'nglui mglw'nafh Cthulhu R'lyeh wgah'nagl fhtagn" ("In his house at R'lyeh, dead Cthulhu waits dreaming.") It's not a summoning spell so much as it's a statement of fact. Like a Catholic saying, "Jesus loves you," or something like that. 
It's not that hard to understand. Just take all the jokes you don't understand and assume they're sexual innuendo. You'll probably be right. 
It reads so much better because it reads like Adams, not like Hitchhiker's Guide. It reminds me of a Dirk Gently novel. 
Universal did everything possible to fuck up the American distribution. They spent ages trying to edit in a *happy ending* - after all the critics had seen the director's cut at festivals and private showings. People starting asking if an unreleased film could win an Oscar. 
The second rule is to never go in against a Sicilian when death is on the line 
Wait which one's the Scottish Play? Lords and Ladies? 
Funny but Eddie never knew his father either and he did pretty well 
And it's the same "ancient quote" "modern rock lyric" pairing that he does all the time. 
Some people are calling them the Greatest Expectations in history 
Nah. They'd be forced to wander the desert to search for something they can't find, and once they find it, they can go home to the promised land. Only to find that what they were searching for is a mystic form of death itself. In doing so, making them quasi immortal because it takes so long to find it and they can't die until they do. 
The first third is like that but it gets easier to read further in. 
I mean, they take God out of the box (allusions to Pandora's box, with hope being left inside). So you're both kinda right. The kids accidentally kill God, and God likes it. Called the Authority in the book. Source: Wrote my MA thesis on it. 
Just like all these modern renditions of fairy tales? 
Either that, or "What do you mean the manuscript is due tomorrow? Of course I've written it. I'll send it to you tomorrow." And the conversation goes on for a few years 
We're really good at the alcoholism thing though, don't forget that. 
Pleased to hear I wasn't the only one transfixed by the banquets predominantly 
Roald Dahl regularly had articles published in Playboy. Few people know because the magazine is better known for its photo journalism. 
Stick to the stuff he actually wrote. After a while he got famous enough that he began "collaborating" with other authors. They write the books, using his characters and world building, and Clancy puts his name in big letters on the front of the book. The quality suffered immensely. Try Red Storm Rising to start. It's a stand alone work about war between NATO and the USSR set mostly in the north Atlantic and Europe. 
He actually doesn't get eaten. He goes on to appear in a number of other Stephen King books 
*The Last Continent*! I really love the plotline with the Wizards and Mrs. Whitlow. 
"Then speak the safety word," he'd say, "And I shall put the cane away." But I don't want the cane to stop I want the whip, I need the strop Wide belts leave welts and bruises and tears He chooses abuses with malice and care The next strike could land any time, anywhere I have sweat on my brow and have sweat in my hair The ropes tie me up and I hang in the air He won't let me go My pussy juice runs But he isn't finished And won't let me cum So nut in my butt and tell me we're done! 
Jake and Cassie know thier child is a yurk and have to exploit him for information. Tobais is a drug addict who, in a high, gets locked as a falcon. His insanity thereafter has to be kept in check. Marco struggles to pay his bills while fighting an alien invasion. Reachal sacrifices her marriage to the fight. Her lose is less then Jakes? She struggles with that conflict. And Ax? Well, hes hiding in walmart stores for relative savages despite being a former prince. Why even save them? 
it's been more than a decade please forgive me lmao 
She also stepped in for #32, the infamous starfish cover. 
Don't read it aloud or you may summon something by accident. 
Lovecraft himself also actually had a cat named Niggerman. 
The Niggerman in that story was actually named after his own cat. 
Or assume they're high comedy with no sexual undertones at all, and youd also be right! (Shakespear was a master at appealing to both the low classes and the nobility, often within the same jokes, as the nobility often wouldn't understand the slang used by the lower classes, so itd mean something entirely different to both groups) 
I believe the "Love Conquers All" edition was the work of Sid Sheinberg, who also tried to change *Back To The Future* to *Space Man From Pluto*. 
Wyrd Sisters is Macbeth from the witches point of view. 
Folks, believe me folks. I have the Greatest Expectations. People are saying my Expectations are unlike anything they've ever seen. Folks, you're never gonna get tired of it, believe me. 
Honestly, if this was actually a story in the Simirillian, I wouldn't be surprised 
I found the opposite actually. First bits were interesting, then they got super difficult to read. 
i ALSO wrote my MA Thesis on HDM! :D HIGH FIVE BEST FRIEND 
You know what all of those have in common, as do fairy tales? They are out of copyright. We'd see this happen much more frequently if copyright was limited to its original term instead of practically permanent, as it is today. 
I think it would more be that how everything is written and presented would change. The flavor of the text would change, even if the plot didn't. How an author chose to present the events might change as well, even if the events didn't. "It was a dark and stormy night" evokes something different than "Rain fell. Thunder clapped. Twelve times the bell rung in the dark." or simply "It was night time and there was a storm." It all carries a different flavor to it even if all of it describes the same events. 
 dont forget to add about 5 different synonyms for ethereal and perhaps add some 'unknowable strangeness' or some such. 
I have never found anything that makes a mostly vegetarian diet sounds as good as the redwall series did. 
I'm not making fun out of him - the food porn is one of the main reasons to read redwall. 
The old "I read it for the articles" quip is actually not that hard to believe. Some of the articles that I have read in playboy have been top notch. 
Seconded for Red Storm Rising. It's his second book after Hunt for Red October. I don't think he'd really planned on making Jack Ryan a franchise at the time. I think he was just writing books. Anyway, Red Storm Rising is a fantastic look at what modern day WWIII would look like using conventional Cold War weapons. I read this when I was in the Navy. No spoilers, but IIRC, the ship I was on was in the book at one point. 
~~Jack wants your liiiiife~~ Jack hunts his wiiiiife 
No turning back No backing down No where to run No silent ground No place to hide No one to trust No one to help you When you're lost There's only us It's all in your hands Hold on, Hold back the darkness Gotta' take a stand It's all in your hands 
The one where Rachel beats someone to death using her own severed arm. People usually forget that part. 
I'm ashamed to say I haven't read much Shakespeare except for what they forced on me in high school, but that sounds *hella* interesting, any chance you can think of an example for me? 
today i finally learned.... also i had never seen the wintergreen lifesaver thing after knowing about it for like 15 years 
Fiunary (n): The safe place you put something and then forget where it was. 
Brutally heartbreaking and bittersweet beauty is what Tolkien was a master at second to his mastery of language. He was a genius. 
Eh, most fans think we'll eventually get TWOW. A Dream of Spring on the other hand. . . 
I always did, but I'm only 35. By the time I got a Playboy sub in college, free porn online was everywhere. No need to pay for it. I paid for the articles and the interviews. 
I don't remember this one at all. I thought I read up to 39, too. 
Watch his ears. Squish anything that comes out of them. 
The Andalite Chronicles was AMAZING. The whole ending with the guy seeing the life he could have had and sacrificing it to save his people was legitimately touching for an Animorphs book 
Wow, what's it like finding out he's gay just now? 
Love this movie! It was incredibly moving. I watched it the other day and was curious about the experiences of others and if they were able to relate. I probably should have worded the question differently... 
Ahh, that takes me back to the golden afternoons of my youth, where, as a just-blossoming maiden, I was enchanted by the smell of dicks floating intoxicatingly on summer breezes. 
Quite a few apparently, I've seen several posts purporting to be from blind people. Using text to speech and brail keyboards is the most common method 
I'm pretty sure it's a cultural trope that most people (men and women, gay and straight) prefer to close their eyes while kissing and turn the lights down (or even off) during sex. We might think we're all about visuals, but actually when it comes down to it, there's a lot more going on that we often don't think about. 
It's question i never knew i needed an answer too, and it has an answer that seems so obvious now 
I mean... It's kind of the same as asking how blind people could be attracted to women. Because they can't see doesn't mean they don't have a sex drive. 
If your a straight blind man, how do you know if your a tits or ass man? 
I love this movie! I watched it the other day and was very curious about the experiences of others and if they related to the movie. It was very moving. 
I also remember seeing an AskReddit about how blind people know they're done wiping. My favorite answer was, "when it stops feeling greasy". I can never not think that now. 
That's what happens when Gay is used as an umbrella term for both gays and lesbians. 
Did he ever find a fulfilling relationship? How does a blind person gauge the attractiveness of people? 
How does a blind person go about reading something online? 
As a non-blind gay guy, I can actually relate to his anecdote a lot. Beyond just appearances, there's something about men that just feels different from women. 
Take your upvote and get outta here, ya hooligan. 
You really should watch it. It's great. To answer your question, iirc he starts falling for Gabriel before any face-fondling happens. 
I'm sure many youthful men were as enchanted by the smell of your desirable muffin wafting on that same summer breeze. 
Up close, sure, it's delicious. But if you can smell it "from afar", there's something wrong with it. 
I mean, I get how they post stuff, but imagine having to start reading a post, not knowing at that point if it's going to be a shitpost. I mean, you can see them easily, but I'd feel betrayed every time I started reading braille or starting the "text to voice" and it turned out to be the marine copypasta again 
Could you imagine just staring each other in the eyes the whole time. That would be a nightmare. 
It does seem a reasonable and logical response doesn't it? 
I'm a little concerned at how familiar you are with what a sweaty ferret would feel like. Also concerned about the dicks you've jerked off if they feel like a sweaty ferret. 
*squeeze* Nope, don't like that. *squeeze* OOH. I like that. 
Just cause you see him there doesn't mean he sees you there. 
But my question is the same, we understand dick in meat feels good but how do you know what gender of meat you prefer? 
There's a blind sub on reddit. There are lots of ways blind people use computers 
Oh my goodness! Fresh Sprog! I feel part of the club now! :) 
Well, when I ~~see~~ interact with some men I want to fuck them. So far I've never ~~seen~~ interacted with a woman who I wanted to fuck. 
I did think it probably inspired this question but I was very surprised none of the other answers mentioned it 
Reddit's the 4th most visited site in the US and in the top 10 in the world. I think there's more than 5 blind gay people here. 
Kudos to you for caring about accessibility. So few do. 
But, if you stand absolutely still, they won't be able to detect you. 
They have gadgets. Refreshable braille, which is hardware that have retractable pins. They also can get screen readers that translates screen contents to synthetic speech. Source: obsessed with Christopher Gorham who played a blind guy in Covert Affairs 
I usually see them coming, especially if the narration is especially stylistic and "narrative-esque", you know? But this was written with that "ramble" cadence that comes with amateur storytelling. Fucking got me. 
Yeah he has that kind of intensity in his face even though the coach is blind, I can see what his blind brother saw in him. 
He's probably a really good athlete. Might even go pro some day. 
He never did. I think he said that a lot of attractiveness is in voice for him. 
At least it's not completely full of fake stories answering the ridiculously specific and ultra rare situational question. *"Oh, finally I get to answer a question..."* You know, like: "People who have slept with Brad Pitt on Fathers Day 1996 on a waterbed with a German Shepard in the room and Motley Crew on the radio, how was the chicken dinner?" *- 40,000 Replies.* 
Assisted reading devices/programs. Basically software that reads a page out loud for you. 
As another gay guy, can concur. I can look at women and say she's pretty out gorgeous and even consider if I would bang and occasionally I would bang. But I simply don't feel I could connect and love a woman on the same emotional level as I could with another man. For me women are more strange and complicated than they are to straight men. I was and still am a masculine guy, my friends are all men and straight, with a handful of women most of which are butch lesbians or brohoes. I just don't connect with or understand women very well at all. I feel more comfortable with men. There's just something about holding another man intimately that is just so far and away different to doing the same with a woman. It's indescribable. 
I think Reddit fuzzes subscribers and online sub's in a similar fashion to the way in which the fuzz votes. I once created a completely random sub, and within one second (literally immediately after creating it) there were like 13 subs and 70-odd online. Obviously that was complete BS. So my guess is *fuzzing*. I could be completely wrong though. 
Very popular in the sexually repressed southeast US. 
Huh, that's super interesting. Must be the pheromones. 
Blind people lose their ability to see in exchange for the ability to mentally blow each other. 
Many blind people, including myself, are able to listen to our TTS software multiple times faster than a sighted person can read. So at most, it takes maybe 3 seconds for us to realize it's a shitpost :p. 
Not really. Reddit is an example of a site with good accessibility. Source, blind guy. 
When are you going to tell him that you're just using him for sex, and you'll never be a couple? 
You should be more concerned about what I am doing with sweaty ferrets 
Its actually built into every windows PC. You can turn it on, and anything the mouse hovers over is read. I'm sure there are better programs, but you can access it quickly through the fast user screen in the lower left corner. It looks like a wheel of fortune. 
That's really depressing. I'm going to make a point to share his story with the "being gay is a choice " crowd. This guy's case is yet another example of where "choosing" to be gay has literally no benefits and leads to a sadder life. No way he "chose" to be gay. Thanks for the response. 
Which still works a lot fucking better than speech to text programs. Especially if you exclude Dragonspeak. Damn. 
Yeah that doesn't mean I automatically know how they're doing it. 
You're under arrest! It's a crime you can't see how hawt I am. 
Same, my vision is worse than 20/200 without correction, but since it can be corrected to near perfect with glasses I'd never call myself blind. It's more just a fun fact when people ask how bad my vision is. 
It's funny, but I basically had this issue with a friend of mine. I knew he way gay quite before he came to terms with it himself. When I he told me "I have something to tell you and I'm not sure if you'll be ok with it" He seemed rather surprised when I told him "dude, if you're telling me you're gay, I've known for a long time" 
My response will get buried, but I absolutely love hearing about significant others, gay or straight. I'm a straight male, but love to gossip and chat like a beauty shop girl. Weird, gross, interesting, or personal, I'm 100% game. That's why I prefer having female friends and working with women, they seem to be way more open than guys are. Or maybe I'm just nosy and/or a creep. 
Reading your comment was an intense experience. Thank you 
Well that can't be right. I've seen walls of text that turned out to be shitposts near the end. And I mean screen filling. Having to listen to all of that could never be faster, that's not how sound works. 
In theory there should be an aria-label attribute on the save button for comments. 
Good friend of mine is a faaaaaar right, borderline alt-right, party line republican. Hates mainstream gay culture with a passion. Is full-bore gay himself. 
I can see perfectly well and I needed this translation, thank you. 
No it's not, it's engineering you stupid.... Oh. 
i used myself for sex. it was horrible and i think i need counseling. 
And who's sweat is on them since ferrets can't sweat. 
Well, blind people wouldn't know he looks like a troll, he could have firsts with the blind ones... 
And some straight people like dick-shaped objects in their ass too! 
I work with a few seminary students in my office. Their new reasoning is that being gay is a mental illness and should not be catered to. 
your story is almost identical to mine. I attracted to this one guy's voice and liked the sound of his laugh. turns out he wasn't bad looking either, but i don't think i would have talked to him nearly as much and gotten to know him if i didn't like how he sounded and just wanted to get him to talk more. we just celebrated out third anniversary last fall 
The conspiracy theory is Stevie wonder has been playing us for all these years. 
I knew my brother was gay long before he came out to the family. He asked me to get something from his room once, but forgot that he left all his gay porn mags on his bed. Later he tried to claim that it was for a college class in Human Sexuality, but that was a total lie - they don't make you buy 30+ gay porn mags; if available at all, they'd be viewable in the reading room at no charge. Anyway, it was a shocker to walk in on that, but it certainly explained a lot of things about my brother to teenage me, like why he never had a girlfriend but had plenty of 'guy' friends. 
I am a straight male but I get along WAY better with women and gay guys. My two best friends are gay guys (both of whom I've known since childhood.) Why? It seems like most of the straight guys I know are always trying to make fun of each other or out-wit each other, crack jokes, or talk about sports.--I don't like small talk, and I'm not into sports very much. I like deeper, conversation-type questions and...conversations. I hope that makes sense. So, unfortunately, it's really, really hard for me to make new friends. 
It's honestly the same stuff as what happens in straight relationships but with different pronouns, I've noticed. It's harder to deal with my poly friends, if only because trying to keep all their love interests straight gets a bit confusing after a while. 
Tell me if this has ever happened to you (because it's happened to me more than once)... The two of you are out somewhere... dinner, a party, whatever... She leaves your side for a minute... off to the restroom, mingling, whatever... While she's gone someone catches the corner of your eye. Not that you're eyeing other women, just that subconscious moment when someone catches your attention and your mind fires off "whoa, that's an attractive woman"... and then your conscious catches up as your turn your head to look and you realize... "Yeah, that's my wife coming back into the room". That's one of my favorite feelings/moments in my entire life. I wish it upon *EVERYONE*. :) 
Did the blind gay person even know about Undertaker throwing Makind from Hell in a Cell in the first place? 
True, but I suppose, if it aint broke, don't fix it, haha. My screen reader reads the button perfectly fine at least. 
There's something about a blind person getting stoned that I just can't picture 
I thought it was a guy sucking a dick. I mean it was what the thread was about, so we were already there. 
I would enthusiastically suck a dick for $2500 too. Spend $100 on liquor and roofies afterwards then you just wake up with $2400 in your pocket and no idea how it got there. 
My search history now contains the question "can ferrets sweat". 
Alot of straight guys like a finger in the ass as they get a BJ. 
I think you missed your target with that quoted word. 
Interesting. My wife and I have both said we would be very unsurprised if our current 6 year old were to come out as gay. 
My straight-guy friendships go through stages. Surface interactions around sports/jokes/events/girls, into deeper chats about politics, etc., and then into insights into their relationships, their feelings and goals and fears, etc. At each stage you lose a lot, until at the end I have just a few core friends that I'm so open with, and they're open in return. But it's worth it, and it definitely happens with men. If you want it to. 
Being poly just seems so exhausting, on top of the jealousy it would surely cause in me. I only have time for one woman. I have video games to play! 
Has happened to me. I was in the OR my doctor came in and I was like wow he's hot. Then I realized he was my husband! I was like damn I did good. :) 
Easy there friend! Gentle unto that sweet butthole, you only get issued the one. 
I've been duped by Vargas a number of times. Never disappoints. 
I have no interest in clicking, but I'm curious about the logistics. I assuming these guy are tucking their dicks under and between their legs to insert into their butthole. Impressive lengths aside, surely this can't be done when the dick is hard? But if it's soft, how could they possibly get it in? So many questions, so little desire to be scarred for life! 
Depends on if you're normally a dick like that though. I know I am so I could easily do it, but if you never joke? 
You're not being torn dawg. You just get to enjoy the best of both worlds 
Yeah. There are certainly some cases where it will be a shitpost that you don't realize it's a shitpost until the end, the 3.50 sea monster for example. Overall though, I find shitposts funny, so it doesn't bother me personally. 
Yeah because even with the small sample size he's technically gay unless he plays with some more dicks. 
Now, because of the logistics, I think I will have an interesting shower filled with science, self discovery, and disgust. 
That's not all you have to uphold, eh eh? (I'm talking about balls) 
I'm in a successful straight relationship of 6 years. She was the first person I really opened up to about it. The bonus is, I guess you could say the relationship is "open" and I get to explore who "me" is. I think if I was expected to be either gay or straight and didn't have an understanding partner, I'd go nuts. 
What the fuck did you just fucking say about me, you little bitch? I'll have you know... 
It's said the welsh invented the condom, thousands of years ago, from the intestines of a sheep. Later, an Englishman realized you could remove them from the sheep first! 
Well, he's enjoyed 72.72% (repeating oc) of the genetalia he's played with. 12.5% of those he enjoyed were dicks. 
Needs to really cradle the shaft if he wants a *raise*. 
I never understood why there are people who get upset if their partner is bi. It's not like they're going to cheat on you BECAUSE they're bi, and if it's before or after you, why does it matter? Love and let love. 
... Gives a whole new meaning to "ribbed for her pleasure" 
Like half melted marshmallow. Some of the clingy ones, but due to the Sheer numbers (don't know if sheer counts as a slight pun... I'll take it) they know what's going on. They get around just as much as we do. This is also applicable for the 3rd question. 
If you're gonna twist the numbers I can do that too. 100% of the genitalia he did not enjoy were female. Also, we don't have enough information to prove your numbers are correct. You're just guessing. 
Good old basic steamed rice. The only thing added will be the food that you give. 
So I saw this and thought I'd sub in for our awesome friend here, since I just happened to haven some leftover rice for dinner. Blue Moon beer - 9/10 Blue Moon over rice - 6/10 Taste isn't even that bad, but I made a serious miscalculation over the fact that the rice would warm up the beer. 
Considering he's 14 he's probably just annihilating his parents kitchen right now. 
I always loved eating rice so I wanted to know what would make it horrible! 
Hot dog: 8/10 Hot dog with rice in the bun: 8/10 This is pretty good, would reccomend for anyone wanting to try something different. 
For sure. Probably gonna go to the gym later and do a whole pushup then come eat more. 
I let my friend borrow my webcam for a while, but I might do a similar thread where I eat more foods over something else. 
Who cares if I get sick, I'm making people happy! Strawberry jam: 9/10 Strawberry jam with rice: 8/10 It makes like a sweet layer on top of the rice it's actually pretty good. 
I don't need gold, just seeing others giving me an excuse to eat food is good enough (: 
I read this earlier and tried it out, I got to say it sweetened the rice and made it not too bad (: 
Hopefully you'll be able to catch the next time I do something like this! 
Are all these ratings theoretical? Or are you trying each response yourself? 
i didn't realize everybody was teleporting the food to you. 
That's because you didn't pair it with your finest milk steak. 
Are you claiming to actually be eating these combinations? I don't see how that's possible since most of your comments are only a minute or two apart. 
wat. Rice is 10/10 but pumpkin pie is only 9?! I call BS. 
I sometimes eat instant noodle or noodle in general with rice. Most vegetables go well with rice, as well as meat, fish, and potato. And yes I'm an asian. 
I've been on Reddit since I was 13 (5 years ago), and to date - you are my favorite OP yet. 10/10 A+++++ would upvote again -IGN 
I've laughed harder at all your responses than ever before on any thread. Thanks OP. 
It was in 50's. Gelatin in everything - tuna mayo Jello banana loaf, anyone? 
I could imagine sticky rice wrapped around a hot dog and lightly fried until the rice is crispy would be quite tasty 
Implying that there is a right cereal to be rice-d. 
You should make a site doing nothing but this. I know I'd go to it. 
That actually sounds pretty close to kheer. Find a kheer recipe and cook some up. Yum. 
My favorite machine at the gym is the snack machine 
You could burn the rice considerably. That would make it pretty bad. 
I am weird, I used to eat the powdered drinks unmixed. It was a more of a love for the citric acid than anything else. I once got chemical burns on my tongue from eating pure citric acid. 
Ugh, did you chew and swallow all that gum and rice? You might have a rough time tomorrow. 
I like this one. Definitely the most begrudging "thank you." In your whole post. 
No, fuck you. You're getting gold and you're going to fucking like it. 
I try a bit of all of the suggestions I am able to do. 
he is going to the magic house that you can trade munny for food 
I'm making and eating all of these over a time span, and then posting about them at the same time. 
Jesus. I rarely comment these days. This one makes me really hungry. 
Every week I could have a main ingredient and have people tip to see what they want eaten with it. This would be awesome. 
My favorite machine at the gym is the machine that turns the machines off. A plug. 
Joke's on you. Burning is a chemical reaction, thus resulting in a completely different substance. Rice plus burnt rice. The unwavering tastiness of rice prevails against doubters such as thee. 
Can confirm. Straight citric acid locks my jaw and makes me drool. 
Lava isn't the hottest thing known to man, but are you going near lava? Didn't think so. 
It's kind of a sad and angry way of saying thanks for your useless crap. 
Okay, doing it as fast as possible, give me 4 years. 
Normal 14 year olds online: 0/10 Normal 14 year olds online with rice: 10/10 Thank you for your suggestion 
You remind me of my buddy from work. He does shit like that. Just dead stares you in the eye while he does weird shit. I fucking love that kid. 
I actually may do that, but noodles are a bit more expensive, so I'm not as sure. 
If I had one of those suits volcanologists wear, then hell yeah I would. 
"Our *favorite/best* accident." As my mother would say. 
If meaningless stories entertain me, i don't care if they're true or not. 
I deliver pancakes to fat people for money on tuesdays. 
In a weird way, I miss the days when "I don't have a digital camera" and "I don't have a webcam" were excuses that anyone would buy. It made the internet more mysterious. 
I think you could convince reddit to crowd fund the expenses in exchange for pictures of each dish along with your rating(s). It'd be like the new Epic Meal Time. 
Start with small bullets in order to build up immunity for larger bullets. 
Which one? I have the 4 and can't find it. But you did lead me to discover a bunch of ballin' options so thanks! 
Carrot cake isn't exactly the first cake i think off either 
With your username, did someone in this thread somewhere suggest spaghetti? 
I'm not even mad that an OP 11 years my junior is more entertaining than I ever have been or will be on reddit. Aight I'm a little mad. 
Are they always fat, or do you make them that way? 
I even pooped a little. Granted I am in the bathroom. 
I'm trying to make sure that almost everyone gets a reply. And dear lordie I have way too many replies to even count. 
Thanks! It's good to know that I made your day happy :) 
You live at hunter2? That's not even a valid address! 
I had a 75 year old neighbor that I grew really close to. She called me asking if I could help set her new tv up, then we tallked about music and movies, then she set up a weekly movie/music night and the neighborhood would get together to watch movies. One day she came out sluggish and told me she had a cold and wanted to cancel movie night, then that night she fell and just like that couldn't walk anymore. Ended up being parkinsons, and I had to watch her slowly lose any ability to speak or move while being completely conscious. The last movie I watched with her was Ferris Bueller's Day Off. That was a year ago and for some reason she has really been on my mind lately. Simply mowing the lawn for your neighbor probably makes her day. Its company. 
I'm not dying, that I know of, and only have had one health issue that's popped up a few times (spontaneous pneumothorax). What you said is spot on though. People go through life like their jobs, possessions, and money are everything. It's what it gets you that matters. Financial security is important, but beyond that, I don't care about my job. Living your life is what matters, however you want to do it. 
I've got to say that this may not seem like much to you, but this offer is legitimately amazing. I have a serious, long-term health condition that requires outpatient infusions every few weeks and if there's one thing that gets me through those days it's a good array of snacks. Don't get me wrong, quality reading material, some laptop or mobile games, and, when available, good company, all go a long way; but the snacks are critical to getting through the day. Especially when nausea starts to kick in or when the nausea goes away and it feels like I haven't eaten in years. So, good on you for making this offer! It could be just what someone needs to get through what may otherwise feel like yet another shitty day. 
My sister has this. She's doing a lot better than when she was first diagnosed but it was rough the first couple of years. That is very nice of you to offer your support for those struggling with similar diseases. 
Take him anyway, even if the kid is in a carrier. Let your Dad talk to him and tell him about fishing and show him things. Record it with your phone and save a copy to your computer and keep it for when the kid gets older. Learning those things from a Grandfather is just absolutely awesome, even if it is years after that time it actually happens. Also, watching your Dad talk to your kid will be something special for you as well. 
It's good to accept it, with some things that's all you can do. My mother also has severe cirrhosis of the liver and probably has a year or two left. 
This is a great idea! I'll look into the the 501(c)(3) requirements to create one. Anyone know what the best way to be visibility on this is? 
I've cried so much reading all these but yours has been my favorite comment cause it's real. Humans are a fucked up bunch for sure. I feel so guilty sometimes being an introverted single mom and letting my children play their video games and watch their YouTube videos while I read stuff on Reddit that makes me cry or photoshop my cats head onto my body. We are all healthy and should be camping and playing laser tag, but in the end that's where we'd all rather be in those moments. Then, I see something dumb like little brother opening the jelly jar for big man and my heart swells with love for them and life itself, just before we all part ways and do our own thing again. Life is so weird. 
Let me chat with you a bit, yeah? I can actually help with this. PM me. Not kidding, man. I can get this done for you. 
That's why you should always dress nicely. You never know when you'll die unexpectedly and be stuck with that as your ghost outfit forever. 
Tattoos are hard work, that's very generous of you. 
Do you think he'd like another tshirt? I live in Yorkshire, in the UK. I could send him a interesting one. I'm trying to find a reason to live at the moment. So anything I can do to help anyone. Please let me know. 
It depends. If it's old school chemo yeah it can be ugly. But there a lot better treatments now. They can analyze the cancer mutations and find the best chemo. If your cancer has a known mutation then targeted chemo can knock it out, or at least buy you a lot more time with possibly fewer side effects. More and more cancers are being treated this way everyday. So at the very least, ask. Even get the biopsy/genetics done. Then the doc can tell you more. 
People will comb through comment history for sure, and if it's a throwaway (with an outrageous request) I'll probably be more cynical about it. 
I need something from you. I need you to continue to be a good person. I need you to be kindness in a world that drowns out all the good and hope with the thunderous sound of artillery fire. I need you to be a beacon of solidarity, and to give something back to the world. We all know the planet is fucked as it is, but I need you to make it a better place. We all need to make it a better place. I sincerely hope that you get out of this rough spot you mentioned. If there's anything I can do for you, even if it's just a quick chat, I'm only a PM away. Let me know. ITT: me getting emotional 
Don't think that's needed mate, from the comments here I can safely say Reddit isn't that bad. 
I'm hoping they are all busy doing what they want to be doing! 
The Christmas tree is making me cry. Thank you for taking such loving care of your elder kitty. 
Thanks. I've been journalling the past months for each of them and just basically rambling and telling stories. I've thought about the birthday cards idea as well, but haven't done it yet. Great thoughts about the video hike! I'll definitely add that things to do for them! 
Last time she called me she just wanted to talk to someone I think. She gets out of breath just talking now. Pretty sad stuff. 
I have been fortunate enough to know 8 of my grandparents and great grandparents. Some have passed and I know how much little things like not having the yard mowed can get to someone. Also it's one less thing that the family had to do. Hopefully they spend an extra hour with their grandma. 
Totally unrelated to this thread, but I love your username! I'm a huge fan of Dashboard Confessional! Also, that's really sweet of you. My dad passed recently, and he was Coast Guard for years. We want to scatter his ashes from a Coast Guard boat, if that's possible. We think he would have loved that. Thank you for being awesome! 
You're a real bro for writing that. So if he loses, he can just say he was trolling. 
Dear u/KEM10 , I think "skip the Irish bar" is good advice, regardless of where in the world you are. Sincerely, Ireland 
Wow, great to see someone from Manchester reaching out considering what you guys have just been through. Props to you my friend! 
If you drive through Arizona, I'm in Tucson and would also be happy to host. I have one cat. 
That winky face makes me want to hit you up when I go to DC! 
My mom died of cancer when I was little and I so wish she had done this. I hear stories about it a lot and it always makes me sad that my mom didn't leave me anything to remember her by, like a letter or even just pictures. Please consider this! Best of luck to you and your family! 
Your awsome.. hope others tell you from time to time. 
this a million times! My dad passed away 2 weeks ago from pancreatic cancer and the night before he passed away I took his hand in mine and told him everything that was in my heart. That I forgive him, I apologized if I ever was too harsh on him at times and that one day we'll be riding rollercoasters together again be it in this life or the next. He was a pilot in his younger days and loved anything that had to do with adrenaline. He passed away the next morning and as painful as it was, I was happy I talked to him. Sending you internet hugs 
Nobody ever sat up on their death-bed and said "Damn! I wish I'd spent more time at work!". I sometimes wonder how people felt about spending so much of our short lives working before the industrial revolution. I get the feeling that back then, even the lowliest of workers could go home at the end of the day knowing they'd actually accomplished something. And at the end of my life, seeing that I'd accomplished something, however humble, would be a comforting thought. I fear that now, every person who's life isn't a failure but isn't what they hoped it would be, will see their live in the 'service industries' as a waste of 50 years. 
Call her, my mom passed away recently. And I would give everything and anything to see her, even hear her voice or cough again. You never really know how much you truly need that person till they are gone. 
You are an awesome person. Thank you. I already bought that expansion for him as a Father's Day gift, but thank you for the suggestion! 
No, please keep it! He won't be able to keep it for long, so it's better kept by you. THANK YOU for the offer, though 
I think I understand your comment and if it's what I think it is, than thank you so much. What an awesome gesture!!! 
LOL thats no big deal. snacks cant tell the difference. lol 
I'm glad to hear your sister is doing much better! The first years are the hardest and a series of trial and error till you find what routine works for your body. I hope she keeps kicking butt! 
Totally agree...i missed an opportunity for my son to meet his great grandmother before she died. Even if he never remembers it, having a picture or video of that fishing trip would be priceless. 
I was in 3d animation and design for a long time. Wanna do a video together? I'll handle the visual aspect. 
Are you allowed to go on the bone marrow registry? Where I live they don't want my blood because I grew up in the UK but I have registered to donate bone marrow. 
As sure as sunlight shines each day, There comes the darkness of the night. And so too do our lives decay, Fraught with pain and loss and fright. Some will tell you all is well, As darkness draws in from all sides, Eternal sleep straight from the knell; A final trip that each man rides. I don't have answers, only hope, That when that time grows near, Each of us will learn to cope, Through honest grief -- not lies and fear. 
My mom had hep c for most of her life and was getting bad cirrhosis. She got approved after trying for a long time to get Harvoni, she went through it and is since completely clear of hep c and her liver is going back to normal. If you can get your insurance to approve it, it really does work. 
I've got a chest freezer and questionable morals would be a good writing prompt 
Depending on the country, that may or may not be true. 
My Uncle died of the same cancer as well. My mother was in denial so my wife and I pushed her hard to go out there as much as possible. He lived five months from diagnosis and she ended up being there when he passed. All things considered that was a good last five months where they focused on being together as a family. 
My dad is on this treatment - it is called Optune. The results have been great. If you can get used to carrying the pack around and wearing the arrays at all times. He hates it and is super self-conscious about wearing it out - so while it is really good for him, it is starting to effect his quality of life. Totally recommend it though. 
I know where to get a 2,000 lbs crate of dry macaroni. (Seriously, they're huge) 
Thank you, I appreciate it! I'm more scared for my kids if anything, you know? I don't want them to be scared or worried. They are all under 6, so I obviously haven't told them. I left work for the pregnancy, and now this. Times are tough. If you don't mind me asking, what did you have done to get rid of it? 
That's absolutely badass and I sincerely hope he takes you up on that offer. 
Before applying to the IRS for tax-exempt status, your new nonprofit needs to incorporate. Becoming a corporation typically involves choosing a legal business name, filing necessary documents with your state's corporate filing office and creating bylaws to dictate how your organization will be run. Pick a redditor in the state with the lowest filing fees (Delaware), incorporate. Then apply to the IRS. It probably takes 6 months total. Once you're a 501c3 there's all kinds of organizations who will give free stuff to help you technically, like salesforce (for CRM), bluepay for credit card processing, and veritical touch for mailings. 
Thanks for the compliment, but I'm certainly no angel and have been a selfish, petty ass for the majority of my life. I hope I can provide a better direction for my nephew though, and if that's all I accomplish in this life, it's enough for me. 
I'd rather die in sweat pants and an old T-shirt, and be a comfy ghost for all eternity. 
I've never been so early to a sprog comment. But, fuck man, that was beautiful. You're seriously talented. 
I am actually surprised this thread turned out as well as it has so far without being labeled serious. Bravo, Reddit. 
And take (or have someone else take) videos of yourself *with* your kids. They will want to look back and see their relationship with you, and the love you had for them. 
Order some postcards online and get some stamps. Write to her when you've got something to say. It only takes a minute or two. Send her some postcards and stamps in case she wants to write back. Dementia grandmas don't check email, but postcards matter to them. 
Note: if she ever invites you in for a snack or water after mowing DO IT, even if you're not hungry or have other things to do. When she feels up for that kind of visit, it can have *serious* ripple effects on the rest of her function that day. She might not get out of her chair and walk around or put on her glasses to see detail at all some days... unless she has a good reason. If she seems like she's having a good day, ask her to "come see how you did"-- the elderly and infirm often don't go outdoors for days at a time, even when they're not terminal, but the sunshine and fresh air do wonders for things like appetites and overall mood. (Source; worked end of life and assisted living care.) 
Thanks! Sorry to hear about your father. Even though he isn't here, I still appreciate his service. In regards to scatter his ashes from a Coast Guard boat, it's totally doable. We've done at least 2 or 3 memorials and scattered ashes since I got down here in 2014. Just reach out to your local Coast Guard unit and see what they have to say. No promises though. 
Once you have it send me a pm as well. Also if they have any particular interests. 
You can still have a headstone if you get cremated. Everyone on my Dads side who has died has headstones next to eachother but they all got cremated. Saves on space too! 
You forgot to pay the tax of one picture of your cat. 
That's very sweet, but don't shed a tear on my behalf. Ive spent a lot of time and money on vapid, selfish arrogance and complete disregard for the feelings of others. Im just trying to put a dent in my innumerable sins. 
 That's what I'm hoping. This is so doable, as another redditor pointed out! 
I don't remember where I first heard/saw this, but I never saw a gravestone that read "John Smith, A beloved, hard working employee"... 
I'm an FFXIV player too. I'd be willing to get him a little something for in-game. Do you know his character's name and server? 
Not too be morbid...but maybe your dad could just look after it for a while and you could mail it back to u/tsukihi3 once your dad doesn't need it anymore? 
Yup! I have some hope that CRISPR may eventually help cure genetic diseases like this, but I rather doubt we'll see it in her lifetime, or mine for that matter. At the very least, even if it does come out and becomes widespread, I think there will already be too much permanent damage, but at least we could seriously help future generations. 
My paternal grandfather was dying in the same hospital I was born in, and my mom told me when I was younger, that my dad grabbed teeny-brand-new me, ignored all the nurses, and brought me to see his father for one visit before he passed on. My dad's a whacko, but I'm glad he did that. 
I know what you're feeling and it's super normal. My mother died when my wife was pregnant with our second child (currently pregnant with number 3) and it still kills me that my two youngest won't get to know their grandmother. My father ended up remarrying, and she's taken on the role of Grandma, and she's amazing. I feel shitty for saying this, because she's a amazing grandma to my kids, but I definitely wish my mother was around for my kids. Life happens in this way, and the best thing you can do at that time is surround yourself with love and constantly (like i do) share stories of your dad (in this case, my mother). 
I finished a 3 month course of Harvoni recently, my stepfather is Egyptian and managed to source it for me from Egypt. It was $600 total. It breaks my heart and saddens me that such an amazing cure is so inaccessible here when it's so cheap everywhere else. 
In Canada and the US it is. Unless the person co signed, the debt dies with the debtor. The only chance for collection is from the estate of the deceased, but unlikely there would be any assets to distribute to debtors in any case. 
This is what I am terrified of. There is no happily ever after with this tumor. The outcome scares me to death and I don't want to think of a life without him, but know that is reality. I am so sorry for everyone's losses. Cancer sucks, but Glioblastoma is a horrific asshole that never goes away (sort of like my ex-husband). 
My wife and I work in a hospital, I wish more people understood this simple logic. Don't prolong someone's life for your own selfish desires. 
...Where is this pasta heaven and do they have take out 
Hang in there. Just had cancer, not telling my very young kids (also all under 6) was the roughest part. I felt like I was lying to them. But if it didn't spread you get them worried for nothing, right? It's crazy... like Schrodinger's Cancer. You either have a life threatening horrible illness, or a tumor that just needs to come out and you're all better. It's crazy oscillating between the two thoughts. A close family member had cervical cancer, it spread and they had to pretty much take everything... but she didn't even need chemo and she's 8 years out now. There are sooo many "happy" endings to these things. No reason to assume you won't have one. Hopefully in 10 years you and I will be telling our kids that the time they sort of remember that mommy and daddy had stomach surgery it was actually for cancer and their jaws will drop. I wish I had a trick for not making yourself crazy, but I have my 6 month scans coming up and I'm already making myself nuts. 
Are you near a library? I found the first one available for borrowing at my local library website! 
Thanks for the info. You have some knowledge in this area? Right now I am brainstorming ways how the non-profit would work generally (ex. funding, making sure the story is true, logistics of making a wish happen, visibility, how to build a sustainable foundation, etc) 
I'm basing this solely off the resistance to painkillers and other medicines, but do you have any of the markers for Ehlers Danlos Syndrome? I know it can cause resistance to anesthesia and other drugs, so it might be worth at least a quick Google search if you've never been tested for it. 
"I meant," said Ipslore bitterly, "what is there in this world that truly makes living worth while?" Death thought about it, "cats" he said eventually, "cats are nice." 
I'd like to send one too please. Also, you're a good friend. 
Now I'm just imagining like, the IRS of cat pictures, stalking Redditors for what they owe ;D 
A man can build a thousand bridges in his lifetime, but if he fucks just one goat he is known as a goat-fucker rather than a bridge-builder. 
Same checking in here. Well I was thin at the time. After it happened I put on 25 pounds of muscle to try and prevent it happening again. One can hope 
"Myself and the rest of the shareholders will be eternally grateful for his tireless efforts to increase our quarterly dividends, and he will be sadly missed. He worked his fingers to the bone and my accountant says it was entirely worth it." 
I'll ask him. It's SouthernRogue, I'm pretty sure, but I will double check! 
My mom went into labor with me and a couple of hours in my grandfather died. Labor stopped. Mom says I stayed a while to meet him and get to know him a bit. I am an atheist, but I still like that story. 
There's nothing shitty about wishing your mother was still around. Your stepmom would agree. 
Just so you know, as a psychotherapist we love to see clients with specific phobias because they are so easily treatable. If you do seek treatment though, make sure it's a clinical psychologist. 
Oh yeah? If you think THAT'S impressive, next time I go, I'm going to give them 16 gallons! 
Some parts are still useable for others. Additionally being a donor also gives permission to use your organs for research, so their organs could help others who have the desease in the future. 
My brother-in-law was able to buy it for $1000 from somewhere overseas. Maybe India? He's working on getting another course for my sister. If anyone wants any more info PM me and I'll ask him for specifics. 
I'm very sorry for what you're going through. Regardless if you have three months or 30 years left with him you both can still have many positive memories. Focus on each other and fuck cancer. 
I work in a hospital. One thing I often want to say to family members is, please don't let your loved one die here. Take them home. As long as they're here, we'll poke and prod them until they or you say "stop." Most people don't realize that being in a hospital is the least comfortable you can be if you're dying or ready to stop treatment. It breaks my heart to have to stick a needle into a 95 year old for a blood test that is irrelevant at this point, but he's here and we have to show that we're doing something. It also really makes me angry at the system. 
I'm sorry about that :( there is always adoption, or other options, if you decide having a child is right for you and your future :) How was the process and recovery of them cutting it out? 
Yup - I have tons of knowledge in this area. :) If you want you can PM me and we can talk about it. I probably don't have time to handle the day to day but I can definitely help with paperwork, process, and technology side :) Almost like a board member :-P 
I'm so sorry to hear this. I'm 26 and dealing with a shoulder injury which might have ended my ability to rock climb. I already have shin and knee issues that prevent me from doing any sports involving running. Without my constant climbing (2 to 3x a week) I've already begun to gain weight and I've been really upset about it. That being said - the injury doesn't prevent me from doing day-to-day things or interfere with my work. Really puts things in perspective. I wish you the best, and congrats on the marriage! 
I think it's crazy that opiates/oxy has no effect, on him. Like, if you upped the dosage enough, it'll numb it all but possibly get you so high you wouldn't like it. If those don't work, would weed really be strong enough? 
I'm in Santa Clara and a neighbor has 4 VW buses in his driveway, should I go show him this thread? Not too sure what that'll accomplish but ya never know, people know people and it really is a small world sometimes.. 
I always love to see older gentlemen/woman enjoying Video games! I'll login tonight and see about sending him something. 
You guys are amazing, this should be higher up. And as for you, someeyes, stay blessed fam! 
Developing countries are exempt from pharmaceutical patents, so Egyptian companies can sell it for much cheaper. 
As someone who also works in a hospital, I can't upvote this enough. My father died two years ago and his last days were spent in our living room, surrounded by his family. No had to leave to get some sleep or take a shower. We laughed, we cried, we watched old home movies, we held his hand and when he finally passed on, we were already home, not in a sterile hospital. I know it sounds scary, you may be afraid that it will make you feel weird about your house, you may be afraid you can't keep them comfortable, etc but please know that, if it's possible, it's the best way to go through this incredibly hard experience. Hospice nurses are truly angels that walk among us and they'll help you through every last detail. 
And also it's sometimes hard to even see it like that. People say, "How am I being selfish, I'm helping you live longer," without taking the time to really talk about it. Euthanasia is an extremely difficult subject for us to talk about without seeing it as giving up but after 70, 80, 90 years of life and only seeing pain and suffering at the end of the tunnel, it's a conversation we must have and actually WITH the person in question, and not FOR them. 
SUPER easy. I mean, it's not the most pleasant when it's occurring, but I was walking the next day like nothing had happened. You have to wear pads though, and no tampons or anything for a while. :) Overall I'd say it's one of the easiest (but grossest because of the whole pad thing) medical procedures available. 
Count me in as well. I don't know how I can help, but I have a lot of spare time that I can donate to this if it can take off. PM me or whatever if you need help with logistics or visibility I guess. I can also help with funding a little. 
Opiates don't affect my mom, but weed does. It doesn't fully get rid of the pain, but it takes it from 'it hurts so much it's hard to move' to 'there's a bit of an annoyance but it can be overlooked'. It's different for every person, but there's enough varieties of weed that there might be a strain out there that can help. 
yeah they're amazing. I'm a 21 year old dude and most of the people I play with on playstation are in their 50's and 60's. Their so funny and chill. I mean if they die their just like "ah well let's try again" whereas the friends that are my age will scream and ragequit. There's a group of women who play destiny and the youngest is 77 which is just awesome 
Thanks for the support! You guys gave your Father the best, most loving send off! And I agree, it doesn't make it seem weird in the home when someone passes there in a loving environment. It seems quite natural, actually. 
very topical for me as my 13 year old cat will be put down today. as i write this i am spending my last few hours with him. He is struggling to breathe from a pyothorax from coyote/cougar bite. So the choice was to operate (50/50 odds with an unclear recovery window) to clear his lungs, or let him go. I am choosing the route of compassion, though i really didnt want to give up on him. He has had an awesome life, and i dont know if he would put up with 4 months of prolonged recovery. Very very hard decision, made hard because it wasnt just being terminal, there was a road of possible recovery, but he could have gotten sicker at any point. I just dont think he would want that, not living like a cat 
That makes me feel a lot better. So they kept you awake through it? I'm a wuss when it comes to pain and procedures. 
Oh you can't miss it lol, I got multiple emails, texts, letters, and phone calls, even other members of my family got phone calls asking to get in touch with me. If they manage to match you they'll make sure they find you one way or another. 
To be fair, watching a loved one die is weird, but it's definitely more comfortable at home. My biggest concern was a bit selfish, in that I was afraid it would change the way I feel about my home, to know that he died there, but the whole experience was so full of love that I'm just reminded of how we were all together when I think about him being there. 
Yeah - I stayed awake, but honestly, I would recommend going under. I did it because I just wanted it over with, but if I had it to do over again I would definitely do twilight anesthesia or something if your insurance covers it. :) 
That's terrifying, but reassuring. *If they want your marrow, they'll find you. Don't worry.* 
There are already a bunch of articles about this exact topic. From what I gather from a few of them, pollsters were thrown off by the voters who didn't want to admit they supported Trump (being called "Shy Trump" voters), and by the rural white folks who tend not to respond to pollsters' calls but turned out in huge numbers in this election. I'm sure that this election will bring about a change in the pollster profession. Most of them got schooled yesterday. 
'Well there was this cartoon frog on the Internet...' 
I don't see anything changing after the GOP was rewarded for 6~ years of obstructionism... :/ Even if the Dems swing back into power in 2018 (highly unlikely), gridlock will be the new norm now that it's been proven to work. Politics above country. 
I'm surprised no one else really commented on this. He was really struggling at the end. I got the impression he really needed to go to the toilet too. 
If this really were the series finale of America, everyone would be pissed how unbelievable it is. 
If you told someone this would happen back in 2012, they would have thought you're insane. 
The fuck is this NowThis or Young Turks it's hard to tell. 
Back to the Future almost had it right. Cubs, off by 1 year. Looks like Biff did in fact get elected president! 
Given he's flipped flopped on TONS of social and political topics in the last few years, it's entirely possible. 
"I'm sorry, but you need ten years experience for this job starting out at minimum pay." Fuck you, Trump is president despite never holding office in any other sense of the word. I can sit at this computer for eight hours just fine. 
I've never seen a more resounding "We don't like you". 
Half of the comments in this thread read like youtube comments.. I'm so irritated. 
It's not shocking at all to me. As a bartender, there have been many a group discussion on politics while CNN played on the TVs. Everyone would murmur how "both candidates suck" and how we're screwed. However, once the crowds cleared and there was nothing left but one-on-one conversation with the guests and I, their pro-Trump colors would show. 
The "Western Spring". Hopefully doesn't go the same way the Arab spring went... 
You need a wife? I'm Spanish/Mexican and I can make some bomb tacos! 
It's actually funnier now for the rest of the world. 
And both will be covered by Huffington Post in their entertainment section. They said it themselves last year. 
i feel like a lot of trump support wasn't vocal about it because of being taboo in a lot of sense. but when it came to the poll they were free to vote how they really wanted 
That's the scary part to me too. Even if something were to happen and Trump were to step down, we would have *Pence,* who supports gay conversion therapy, very not pro choice, pro religion in government, etc. Trump is dangerous, but he seems to mostly want the title and the power to me, while Pence knows what he wants to do. 
I keep thinking Trump was selected as an easy candidate to be beaten by Clinton. Some people's plan got fucked hard. 
"My name is Barack Obama, and I'm the Presidentiest man alive." 
plus they can serve as makeshift blankets, which will come in handy 
I think it has less to do with him simply being a Republican and the the fact that he's a severely under qualified reality TV personality. McCain for example, maybe you would greatly disagree with his views but at least he's a qualified, and overall decent person that can hold the position of President. 
And the best part is that it's 9/11 for most of the world. 
Honestly, he alone does not scare me. I don't think he even knows what he believes, he is incredibly wishy washy and rolls around in simplified rhetoric. However, the SCOTUS, the house and the senate are all aligned with a party I do not agree with on to many matters; And they may have more sway of the new president in matters than you would want in a leader. 
David Bowie's death unraveled the logic of the universe. 
Most of them have got schooled this entire year. They have routinely failed to predict anything, confirmation bias is a bitch. To be fair though the prevalence of cell phones makes polling difficult and the closet trump supporter is impossible to quantify. They had the same problems with Nixon. 
We joke, but the Internet had a huge impact on this campaign. It gave Trump a platform by which he turned from a laughing stock to a legitimate contender. "Discuss the influence of Internet memes in the politics of 2016" could definitely be a history question in a few decades. 
And he gets to break the tie in the supreme court in his favor. There are effectively zero checks on his power at this point. 
I don't think I heard anything Trump said. It was just hilarious watching his head bob up and down and him snap back awake lol 
Yeah I realized that as well but it was still funny to see lol. He did well because we all know at his age he was also bored to death. 
Trump said he was going to end all federal green energy initiatives. What kind of example is that? America just fucked the world. 
We don't even need to go that far back. If you had said this one year ago, I would've said you were insane. 
The Simpsons called it, but I guess that's obvious at this point 
They wrote themswlves into a corner. They ended last season with garrison leaving cause they didnt rhink hed still be here. This season ignored last seasons end. They were setting up for a clinton win on the show. No clue wtf they are gonna do 
Yup he even use to be democrat and Clinton's friend 
Only in Indiana can you see the signs "Trump 2016" and "Fire Pence" in the same yard... 
Thats what should be taken away from this. This was the democrats election to lose, all they had to do was put up fucking anyone else. Just some bland everyman or woman. But nope. They wanted a Clinton. 
Kerry became Secretary of State after his loss. Not bad. 
Because people don't want to be made fun of for supporting something 
I'm taking applications, in other words let's see about those tacos! 
She was not just annihilated, she took the entire Democratic Party and progressive movement with her. This is a monumental defeat. Evan Bayh fucking lost in Indiana for Christ's sake. 
I like how Florida voted for trump and weed it's like they know they are gonna need some serious help relaxing in the coming years 
Mutually Assured Destruction. Trump is a genius because if someone gets rid of him, the country gets destroyed by Pence. Always gotta have a Nuclear (Pence) deterrent. 
This episode of Black Mirror is a little too weird for me. 
Exactly, I didn't vote for him either, but his tone and the content of his message make me hopeful. He mentioned he wanted to bring all Americans together and hopefully he will actually work toward that and not disappoint us. 
sad tbh, Im pretty sure bernie would have won if he got the chance 
Don't let your memes be dreams. If you think this election inspired a lot of memes, I can't wait for 2020 
I think we need to start memeing Kanye into the White House asap 
Please analyze the rise of populism within american and British societies, be sure to include the rise of the internet as an alternative to the 20th century vision-tubes and the impact the transition had. 
The Dems can filibuster everything for four years. That's really their only gambit. The alternative is to let them run the country undivided and see what happens. The downside for them is that 2018, which would ordinarily be a great year for them, does not have a favorable electoral map since they have to defend a lot of purple seats Obama won in 2012. 
Hahaha, I was looking at this the whole time too! Feel really bad for Baron and Melania, being a political family took them by surprise. There was one point where he scrunched his whole face up because he was holding in a yawn! 
It won't dawn on him for many years, probably, how insane that moment actually was for him. 
Also got self-assisted suicide in CO, don't forget about that. 
Except for Alec Baldwin, who's probably got the best job security in the world right now, probably better than Trump's 
Well that and the show they had pronounced it "bear-ensteen" 
I really can't believe it. Felt so powerless watching the elections as a canadian last night. 
Bowie dead, Cubs win World Series, Donald Trump is honest to god president. This is a satire's idea of the future. 
I don't think anyone *Wanted* her, she just refused to let anyone else take her potential presidency. 
Maybe Hillary Clinton can try her hand at Secreta -- oh wait. 
My local news were also discussing this (in Australia). I think the only kind of Trump supporters you hear about are the red necks and the 'brash' ones who don't care about speaking their mind. However, there were obviously more than everyone thought. I think I heard a news reporter say that one of Clinton's biggest mistakes was calling Trump supporters 'deplorables' - since that would resonate with many who don't identify as such. They also said that he had so many supporters because he had promised change and they had seen that there needed to be changed. It's a lot more complex than just stating "trump is a misogynist". 
If we're going by stereotypes, I can also clean the hell out of a house so there's that. 
Florida, Arkansas, and North Dakota are all red states that voted for marijuana decriminaliztion but only for medical reasons. Only blue states voted for recreational marijuana. 
I can understand this in other countries where voting is mandatory, and people who don't want to vote are forced to. But actually going out of your way to go out, line up on a Tuesday evening and vote for a dead gorilla is some next level shitposting. 
When he brought up Hillary, I was expecting bashing. Was pleasantly surprised and I sincerely hope he keeps that kind of tone in his presidency.. 
I mean, ultimately, that is what we all want. A good president. I voted against Trump because I believed he'd be a terrible, terrible president, and I think in his campaign he painted himself as a terrible human being with only his own interests in mind. But if somehow I'm wrong, and he turns out to be a good president, of even just a mediocre one rather than a complete disaster, well... great. As much as there's a cynical, bitter part of me that's imagining the Trump supporters realizing how stupid they were after Trump becomes exactly what I thought he would be and enjoying the image of him getting destroyed in 2020, I'd rather have 4 years of a decent president than a complete disaster that we have to desperately try to recover from next year. Ultimately, not much to do now but wait and see what happens, and hope it's not the doomsday scenario many predicted. 
Except the Senate can change their rules and end the filibuster. 
To be honest I think it took most of america by surprise. I'm really curious how the rest of the world that is on reddit will react to this. 
On the other side, House of Cards and South Park are fucked. 
Sometime last year we seem to have switched into a parallel universe 
If only she would have refused a little harder and maybe, idk, campaign in places like Wisconsin. 
If Hillary had refused the job and stayed in the Senate, she would probably be president right now. 
Hell six months ago some were saying the party was finished or would need to redefine itself. 
Medical reasons to include: "Oh my God the President is such a dick, I need some weed." 
Eh it's a vote of no confidence. I feel like it's saying I don't like anybody or I am not informed enough to vote so here's my vote anyway that I support the process but I don't believe I'm being represented here. 
I need a source on this please! My buddy was a huge Matt Hardy fan but doesn't watch anymore. He would love to see this. 
Agreed, by all measures, that was a decent speech and a good starting tone hoping he can drop the 'crazy' act and act like a business mogul that is now fucking president of the U.S 
I work at a liquor store in Australia. Sales were up. 
Are you kidding ? South Park will have a great time criticising his every move. The only good part of it. House of Cards, I reckon they predicted Trump's last resort after 6 months of falling popularity and getting nothing done....start a war. 
I live in Wisconsin and I know multiple people that flipped from Hillary to Bernie because her lack of campaigning. Bernie had 3 rallies at my campus and Hillary had one private speech. They also did not end up voting for her today either 
They likely voted for real on all the other choices. This wasn't the only thing to vote for. That's why it's common. Folk who don't agree at all with the options on that one but still care about the other votes speak out this way. 
He's actually having a bit of a career resurgence at the minute, too. 
It's up to Americans to hold him to his good promises (term limits, dropping TPP, finance regulation etc) and make him drop his bad ones (wall, Muslim ban, immigrant roundup, global warming denial etc). 
I can't help but feel like if Sanders had actually been given a fair shake he would be the president elect right now. The DNC really fucked up. 
Maybe that's why Trump won. He connected with the American people a lot. He went on talk shows like every morning, he had a rally like every night. I don't like him, but I hope a higher level of communication between the President and the people would be great. 
Global warming denial is probably his worst 'promise', especially as he considers it a Chinese Hoax. 
And his whole policy on making wind farms non-existent because they are killing all of the eagles...... 
this joke almost made my husband hang up on me 8/10 
How can you spot a blind man at a nude beach? It isn't hard. 
What do you call a smug prisoner walking down stairs? A condescending con descending. 
What do you call a midget prisoner escaping by climbing down the outside prison wall? A little condescending. 
He then tragically lost his footing and fell over the cliff from which he was kicking it. 
This one works better as one of those really really long jokes that you can add a ton of personal flare to to get people bought in. Jonny asks his dream girl to prom. She says yes. He waits in line for flowers, tux, limo, tickets, everything is perfect and she wants punch.... 
one of my favorites. I heard it slightly differently and delivered verbally. Person1: Ask me what's the most important thing in comedy. Person2: What the most--- Person1: Timing 
Why do communists only drink herbal tea? Because proper tea is theft 
Where does the king keep his armies? In his sleevies. 
Me brother Seamus says that one out of every five people in the world is Chinese. (ponders) Well, there's five in our family... I know it's not me, it's not me mum, and it's not me dad. That leaves me two brothers: Seamus, and Xiaoping. (lowers voice) I think it's Seamus. 
I want to see a 'who's on first' comedy scene with this joke, a la': *"What rhymes with orange?" 'No it doesn't' "What do you mean, does nothing rhyme with orange?" 'No... that doesn't rhyme either.' "Well, I know 'that' doesn't rhyme, I'm asking, what rhymes with orange?" 'No! It doesn't!'* And so on and so forth... 
This is a Marx brothers joke! :D Very glad to see this here - 
What happened when the pirate attempted to recite the alphabet? He got lost at 'c' 
What's the difference between a T-bone steak and a meteorite? One is meaty, the other is a little meteor. 
My wife told me I need to quit playing Wonderwall on guitar. I said maybe... 
I was having a bad time once and my friend felt the need to comfort me. They told me "Cheer up, ByrdInfluenza, it could be worse. You could be stuck at the bottom of a deep hole filled with water." I know they meant well. 
What do we want? Time travel! When do we want it? It's irrelevant! 
Does Sean Connery like herbs? Yes, but only partially. 
Forever regretting the e I put on the end of my name. 
This reminds me of the joke about the zoo that's so broke it only has one animal: a dog. It's a shih tzu. 
reminds me of a bit by Dara O'brien: "Oh Avatar... Avatar... it picks up where Titanic left off! In as much as, half the cast are blue." 
How many Freudian psychoanalysts does it take to change a lightbulb? Two. One to change the lightbulb and one to hold the penis. I mean father. I mean ladder! 
People say I'm addicted to brake fluid but I can stop any time I want. 
Did you hear about the invention of the wheel? They say it started a revolution. 
The chief of a cannibal tribe is talking to his prisoner as he warms up his cooking pot. He asks the prisoner about his occupation, and the prisoner informs him he was an editor for a newspaper. "In that case, I have good news," the chief says. "You are soon to be editor-in-chief!" 
Steward Francis slightly adjusted it to: "I misspelled "Armageddon". Wasn't the end of the world". 
instructions followed clearly, am in cornwall. Ran out of land. 
And I replied, "Die, heretic scum!" and pushed him off the bridge! 
What's loud and sounds like an apple? AN APPLE. 
To the guy who stole my Ms Office, I will find you. You have my word. 
*On the phone* "Grandma, be careful driving home, I heard there's someone driving the wrong way on the highway." "SomeONE? There all driving the wrong way! 
I'd save a lot of money if this actually worked... 
If feel like you are wasting your life doing a meaningless job day after day after day, just think: Someone is installing BMW turn signals right now. 
Did you hear about the two guys that stole a calendar? They both got six months. 
Knock knock Who's there? Who Who who? Oh an owl. 
I really like this one but I do question why your drug dealer is your go to guy for shoes 
My dad tried to tell me this joke and I ruined it. He asked me and I said "Um...a pilot?" And he just stared at me, deflated. Sorry Dad. 
Which sexual position produces the ugliest children? Ask your parents. 
How many hipsters does it take to change a lightbulb? It's a pretty obscure number, you probably never heard of it. 
Similarly, did you know that Jesus drove a Honda but just didn't talk about it? John 12:49 - *For I did not speak of my own accord.* 
My Girlfriend is strange. She starts every sentence with "Are you even listening"? 
This reminds me of my favourite line from the end of Disney's Robin Hood, where King Richard states: "Friar Tuck, it appears that I now have an outlaw for an in-law!" 
I'm an idiot. I don't get it. [Edit] I get it now 
knock knock, Who's there? I eat mop. I eat mop who? 
What's the difference between a bear that loves grapes, and a dead bee? One's a seedy beast, the other's a bee deceased. 
Grasshopper walks into a bar and asks for a beer. The bartender pours it and says "You know, I'm really envious of you.. having a drink named after you and all.." The grasshopper replies "What? Eric?" 
The monk gets his hot dog and pays with a $20 note, but he doesn't get any money back. So he says: "Hey, where's my change?" And the vendor says: "Change must come from within." 
What do you call a deer with no eyes or legs? Still no eye deer! 
A husband and wife head out for dinner. The husband orders steak tartare. The waiter asks "but sir what about the mad cow?" "Ah, she'll just have the salad" 
Where do you find a dog with no legs? Right where you left him. 
I went on a date a couple of months ago and the girl who picked me up had a machete in their car for protection. 
I'll always remember my grandfather's last words: "Quit shaking the ladder you little shit!" 
Dis pirate's favorite letter be P. Cause without it I'm irate 
If they're a fortune teller, then that would make them a small medium at large. 
Those never work for me. It always ends up like Me: Ask me what's the most important thing in comedy. Person: Why? Me: Because it's a joke. Person: Nah. Sounds stupid Me: You're stupid. Timing. 
How does Hitler tie his shoesies? With little Nazis 
_''I know 'it' doesn't, I'm asking what does!''_ _''Does what?''_ _''Rhyme with orange!''_ _''I don't know how.''_ _''What's Hao got to do with this?''_ _''What? It doesn't. 'How' doesn't rhyme.''_ _'' 'Doesn't rhyme' how?''_ _''You mean 'doesn't Hao rhyme'. ''_ _''But how doesn't rhyme.''_ 
Outside of a dog, a book is man's best friend. Inside of a dog it's too dark to read. ***************** Time flies like an arrow... Fruit flies like a banana. 
Somebody once told me to stop playing Smash Mouth. I said hey now... 
When do we want it? Yesterday! What do we want? Faster than light travel! 
'Knock knock' 'Who's there?' 'Dishes' 'Dishes who?' 'Dishes Sean Connery' 
But, brass is non-sparking. Should have went with the model with balls of steel. 
after listening to a bunch of bad jokes from the bot in fallout 4, that one really got me :P 
Until you throw an exception by running out of shampoo. 
How many psychologists does it take to change a light bulb? Only one, but the light bulb really has to *want* to change. 
I used to be addicted to the Hokey Pokey but I turned myself around. 
But it was the invention of the broom that really swept the nation. 
I knew I shoulda taken that left turn at Llanfairpwllgwyngyllgogerychwyrndrobwllllantysiliogogogoch. 
Hmm, if you have a bar, you'll need lemons, and if you have melons, you'll need a bra. 
I think this works better. OP's version hints towards an inanimate object, whereas this one initially seems more like a philosophical question. 
Dad: Hey! What do you call a black man flying a plane? You: A pilot? Dad: : ...........You're adopted. 
If a tree falls in the woods and no one is around to hear it, does a hipster buy its album? 
My wife thinks I'm too nosey. At least, that's what she scribbles in her diary. 
Now I'll have the whistling tune stuck in my head all day, and I'm not mad. When I put that movie on for my nephew, 30 years after I apparently watched it all the time, I still knew every line, lyric, everything. 
"Don't mention the elephant in the room" is a common saying when referring to an awkward situation 
Whats the difference between a blind sniper and a constipated owl? One shoots but doesn't hit, the other hoots but doesn't shit. 
The monk then pulls a gun from his robe, points it at the vendor, and demands his change back. The vendor says, "A gun? But what about inner peace?" The monk says, "This is my inner piece." 
What do you call a bleeding deer with no eyes and no legs? Still no bloody eye deer! 
Username implies mermaid, not a pirate. Must be a trap. 
I like to make a bunch of dumb pirate R jokes and then switch it up on em. "What's a pirate's favorite genre of music!" "Uhh, ARRRRRRRR & B?" "What? No, sea shanties obviously" 
Only except they don't remember, so you have to remind them, then you just end up dissecting and killing the joke in the end. At least, thats my experience. 
This is why i hate telling jokes too, i'm socially retarded and even if they go along with it i'm very likely to punch up the fuck line. 
I got in the car the other day and put it in reverse. I thought to myself, this takes me back. 
I thought my wife was kidding when she said i needed to stop singing Smash Mouth.. But then i saw her face 
There once was a lady named Bright/who could travel much faster than light/ She left, one day, in a relative way/ and arrived the previous night. 
Sean Connery was reaching for a book on the top shelf when it slipped out of his hand and hit his head. He then mutters to himself, "I have no one to blame but my shelf" 
this is why you use a brass drill bit on a gas tank, for example. This kills the joke. 
It's clearly an alt account, but still impressive. 
It's a runtime exception, too, so we just sit there soaking, waiting for someone to re-compile the right code. 
How many altos does it take to change a lightbulb? Doesn't matter, it's too high. 
I used to be addicted to dressing like a nun, but I got out of the habit 
That said, it was the shovel that was truly groundbreaking. 
I'm honestly unsure if this is a real Welsh place or if you just mashed your keyboard. I love the Welsh language! 
I thought thesaurus was some kind of prehistoric animal lmao, english not my native language either 
If you have melons, no bra, and are at a bar, you get free drinks 
Where does one drown a hipster? In the main stream. 
Honestly if you wanted to farm some of that sweet karma just watch his stand ups and post every single joke one here. 
Never heard that particular wording, iv only heard "the elephant in the room" portion. 
So the vendor calls the police, but the monk is still there. He says, "I called the cops, aren't you going to flee?" The monk says, "Namaste." 
What do you call a deer with no eyes, no legs, and no dick? Still no fucking eye deer! 
Nah. I just repeat the joke and punchline after getting the confused look. It works! 
I wish I had friends that let me punch up their fuck lines. 
My wife asked that I stop quoting Lincoln Park songs. I tried but in the end it doesn't even matter. 
What did Sean Connery call the lobster that ate all the food? Shellfish 
But what if he hasn't defined an out of funds exception? DOES HE KEEP GOING UNTIL THE WORLD'S THREAD OVERFLOWS?!!? 
How many sopranos does it take to screw in a lightbulb? One. She just stands underneath it and the world revolves around her. 
Nope I really don't get why it ends with saurus either. "Saurus" actually means lizard. At least, it usually does... 
Environmentalist hipsters like fossil fuels when they're still underground. 
Just keep helping the settlements. After a few more, it will unlock the Synth storyline and a cool new set of power armor with flamethrowers! 
No, he keeps going until the store runs out of milk, then he throws a segfault and dies. 
How many surrealist painters does it take to screw in a lightbulb? Two. One fills the bathtub with mayonnaise and sprinkles while the other paints the purple spots on the giraffe. 
And people wonder why I'd rather be on my phone than talk to anyone in-person. People just don't understand that they're nothing compared to the hive mind. 
How many conservative economists does it take to screw in a lightbulb? A1: None. The invisible hand will do it. A2: None. If it really needed changing, market forces would have caused it to happen. A3: None. If the government would just leave it alone, it would screw itself in. 
A couple are driving through Wales and they pass through Llanfairpwllgwyngyllgogerychwyrndrobwllllantysiliogogogoch. They begin to argue over how to pronounce it and so they decide to ask a local. They pull off the road and go into a shop where they ask the person behind the counter; "We're arguing over what this place is called. Can you pronounce it for us, slowly?" The person behind the counter looks at them for a second, confused, then says; "Burr... Gurr... Kiiiiing." 
I once farted in a room full of hipsters and I watched them fight each other over who heard it first. 
"Somethin' somethin'. Somethin' somthin'. Somethin' somethin' phony king of Eeeeeeeengland!" I fucking love that movie. 
How many software engineers does it take to change a lightbulb? None, that's a hardware problem. 
Pfft. You guys think you're so funny. Jokes' on you, I've heard all these before. 
How many cops does it take to change a lightbulb? None. They just shoot the room for being black. 
"Hydrostatistic Circlejerk" was my band in the mid nineties. Our chief rival was the band "Do You Mean Hydrostatic?" that always got the good gigs. 
Do they have a counterweight? Make sure you ask this question in a way that doesn't look like you're implying they're fat otherwise you're done...godspeed 
Yeah, that's the post that OP is ripping off. It was funny then. 
HELP ME FELLOW HUMAN BEING, THE TITLE OF THIS THREAD ~~DOES NOT COMPUTE~~ CONFUSES ME. I DO NOT UNDERSTAND HOW HUMAN BEINGS OF THE FEMALE SEX SEPARATED FROM HUMAN BEINGS OF THE MALE SEX IS RELATED TO FLUID MECHANICS. 
I think about that literally always. Still have no idea what it is though. 
Unfortunately, he has a bit of a love triangle going on. He gets turned on by both guys and girls, which I guess you could call binomial expansion. 
I'm fairly certain women are not an incompressible fluid. 
I think it's just science homework phrased as a social question. 
Is that why you keep that bottle next to your bed? 
How many pastels would a Pascal own if a Pascal owned pastels? 
I don't understand the grabbing the hand thing. Maybe I'm picturing it wrong? 
I agree - however of course Locke also pointed out that one cannot summon belief at will. I can no more choose to believe in God than I can choose to believe the sun revolves around the Earth. 
Not enough times. No one can ever watch it enough. 
It's the fluidic version of the lever. And no work is done while things remain static. So even though you can lift a car with a person (it's called a hydraulic jack, by the way!), you still exert the same total amount of energy doing so, whether you use a small amount of effort over a long period of time vs a huge amount of effort over a short period of time. 
I work nights and I was on break goddamnit! I mean, I'm supposed to be working now but I've got 10 mins left and nothing to do *shrugs* 
True but for those of us that weren't here for **that** shitpost, this one is pretty spicy. 
Well, you see dear old boy, a male human must penetrate the female human in a pre-designated location to provide fluid stimulation. This fluid stimulation results in a build of pressure and temperature in the system which affects the viscosity of the general area making it entirely a fluid mechanics problem. 
My organic final is in two days and I *barely* understand E1 and E2. I'm so fucked it's not even funny. 
I suspect vagina juice is at least mostly incompressible 
Not when you specify one gender. Then it's going to be sexual. 
Then ill treat her like my last lab! give half assed participation, not listen to the problems, complain to my partner and act surprised when i see a TA stamped a D on her. 
Get a load of Mr. High Viscosity Liquid over here, lording his laminar flow relationship over us. It's not easy for the rest of us practical water systems, buddy. 
Chick-fil-a lady thought I said Pastel earlier today. So uh, that many. 
I was just hoping you might give me some insight into the evolution of the market economy in the southern colonies. My contention is that prior to the Revolutionary War, the economic modalities, especially in the southern colonies, could be most aptly described as agrarian pre-capitalist. 
You should probably give a trigger warning before bringing up such a traumatic incident that affected tens of people. 
Okay, so this is very incomplete but you're in an emergency situation. E1 is going to happen when you have sulfuric acid catalyzed elimination and E2 is going to happen when you have base catalyzed elimination. If you have any questions feel free to PM, I tutor organic chemistry all the time. 
So I want to check if that is true. I need a degent sample size, so if there's any girls out there willing to contribute that would be great. 
Sometimes science is more art than science, Morty. A lot of people don't get that. 
A bullet or other item fired from a rocket or cannon is a "projectile." These are projected from the gun. The question was what would **launch** a 90kg projectile. The answer is, of course and always, a trebuchet. 
Of course that's your contention. You're a first-year grad student; you just got finished reading some Marxian historian, Pete Garrison probably. You're gonna be convinced of that 'till next month when you get to James Lemon. Then you're going to be talking about how the economies of Virginia and Pennsylvania were entrepreneurial and capitalist way back in 1740. That's gonna last until next year; you're gonna be in here regurgitating Gordon Wood, talkin' about, you know, the pre-revolutionary utopia and the capital-forming effects of military mobilization. 
Funny how much power one Home Depot worker in Alabama has on another countries economy. 
Correct you are. SOME precursor path as to what had...*Lain* ahead. 
It's like, I get *why* the nucleophiles and leaving groups and all that affect the reaction in the way that they do. I currently have an A in the class (I think, didn't do too hot on the last test). It's just that I'm awful at memorization so once we started learning 200 reactions a day I started getting overwhelmed and started slipping : if you have tips for memorizing all the different reactions please let me know 
It's mostly water, water is incompressible. Therefore vag juice is mostly incompressible. 
Yes, even without friction, the pristine baby cannon still applies force via constriction, which you can feel as pressure on your knobby bits. 
Hey, that's 3 of us! Let's get to manning a trebuchet! 
Well, as a matter of fact, I won't, because Wood drastically underestimates the impact of social... 
Not much more than a 2 month old 1k account. It's just enough to make it look real. 
I don't know how they use it. My guess would be that they use it to post content about their product that tries to seem "organic" but I actually have no idea. 
It's a lot easier said than done. I don't know anything about it except that it can be done. 
Don't memorize the reactions, I mean, you'll have to memorize a few weird ones like ozonolysis, but for the most part you're just following electrons around when you're learning mechanisms. There are a few key trends you're going to have to recognize, but once you've got those trends down all the reactions will fall into different patterns. Trying to remember every single reaction is how you fail organic chemistry, as it's borderline impossible, and the professor can always just twist the example in some weird way that makes the memorization almost useless. Learn the rules and apply them. Main rules are being able to recognize a stable cation or anion, identifying whether or not a hydrogen will be acidic or not, identifying the electrophillic and nucleophilic sites, etc. 
Not proud of this but O chem was the only class I've "cheated" in. Like an hour into the test it was a "draw the mechanism" question and I could not remember it. I glanced over at my neighbor for a millisecond and it was enough to get started on it. Guess that class brought out the worst in me, passed though 
So is mayonnaise. I learned this for a rocket project. Don't ask. 
I'm not sure this works I can't get my head around it, I think it's breaking a couple of fundamental laws of physics. 
Speak for yourself. There are at least as many people in me as fluids. 
If everybody's a shitposter, nobody's a shitposter. 
Met Lauri at a trade fair a few weeks back, he doesn't really use the press that much, he mostly work on the lathe or in the office. He did reveal he would get a new 1000 ton press soon. 
I love that they wrote this fucking script and sold it *and* themselves. 
Matt Damon played a genius janitor. You're just a janitor. 
Not that I'm a sexist or anything, but I hope you do too. 
I'd be a dick if I said I appreciate your company, but I'm sorry, I really do. 
Oh, what the hell. I've never understood why reddit accounts would be bought by ad companies until this comment. 
But then they'd have to find another site to relax. It all goes to shit when someone brings up Newton trying to obliterate any memory of Robert Hook for calling him a little bitch. 
How could I not ask? Seems like mayo would make a decent fuel if you had enough oxidizer along with it. 
Did his wife laugh maniacally in the background when he revealed that? 
"So I'm this like wicked smaht janitor, and Ben...well he's Ben. His bro Casey said he'll play the part of one of our friends...for free! He kinda looks like Ben, but not really, so it'll be cool.....oh yeah and Robin Williams: get him or we don't sign shit." 
I disagree with online bullying, but you have a point. 
I can't believe I made it this far down in the comments 
Yea, maybe. But at least i won't be unoriginal. But if there's a problem we could just step outside and figure it out. 
And me and Ben, we're gonna live here the rest of our fuckin' lives. We'll be neighbors, have little kids, take 'em to Little League up at Foley Field. 
I hate to be _that_ guy by pointing this out, but you're right. 
Why am I reading this conversation? I'm an art major and don't understand anything being said. Damn internet. 
"Reddit users admitting to using reddit rather than studying for his finals, desperately begs reddit for help." 
good will hunting... then jay and silent bob strike back.. 
Gentlemen, if you wish to engage in fisticuffs, you will do 50 yards from the premises. I'll not have blood near my freshly-painted pub. 
I'm doing the same thing. I feel like I'm learning something though. 
"Finds super nice *organic chemistry tutor* who has a few nuggets of sage wisdom in the process" You could have instead spent that time memorizing 200 whatevers pointlessly. 
I feel like if it were in my power in *any* way, that kid would have led his parents right through the damned thing. 
*Technically*, if you jump out of the window you do escape the room! 
New idea; hiring interviews in an escape-the-room puzzle. See how people function when challenged, under pressure, and not knowing explicitly what to do. 
This exact thing happened to our group in an escape room a few months ago. I guess some of the people weren't listening in the beginning and missed that the box by the door was for our coats, purses, etc... So about 5 minutes into the escape room, someone in our group drags out a purse, dumps it on the floor, and proceeds to go though the wallet. At one point, he says loudly "hey, this wallet has a lot of money in it" and we all turned and saw what he was doing, including the owner of the purse. She was horrified. 
I did one with hubby, both brother in laws and their partners. First time we had met one girlfriend but thought it was a good way to break the ice. There was one prop which had clear plastic tubes with different directional arrows behind them. Eventually balls popped out of a tube in the ceiling and we realised these balls went into the tubes and the top directions were entered into a directional lock thing. So we entered this code 10+ times didn't work we were looking at this for a good 5 minutes until BILs girlfriend asked if 'we needed these' and pulled out 6 balls she had in her pocket?????. We still managed to escape so we haven't held this against her. 
That is amazing. Something similar happened in my last escape room experience. It was a space themed one, and at one point, you open this uplink and get into a crawl space. In it, there are numbers spelled out in Russian, and you're supposed to solve another puzzle to get a computer screen to show you the words and their meaning. I was in the main room trying to figure out how to solve the final puzzle when I hear my friend shout "Wait, is that Russian? Yeyande, get in here!" we proceeded to skip a few steps in the room because I speak Russian. When we finished, the game master was so confused and had never thought that something like that would ever happen. 
Take off clothes, get kicked out, room escaped. Winner! 
"You have to agree to marry me so we can escape the room." 
I mean, that's understandable. Sucks for your friend though! 
Nobody had ever tried which option? Because I probably wouldn't think to look across the street. Also wow, that's early for a bible study, but I guess there's a lot of material to go over. 
Oh man. Imagine breaking up in a room you can't get out of, then having to work together to solve puzzles to get away from each other. Was it fun to watch? This will be the plot of a rom-com in 6 months 
When I played, our train of logic pointed to taking apart a hanging light. The people knocked on the door loudly and told us not to dismantle live electronics. 
"And next time, it won't just be the furniture we rearrange." (Cannot find the relevant Far Side comic - but that is what this reminded me of) 
More of these places should have people fixing their own destructiveness afterwards (when they're breaking rules given to them prior) 
That is so hilarious, like what good could it do to drink it when you can just pour it out. 
Wow and I thought the world was running out of heroes. 
Hey guys its me, Laronge again. Need anything? Moist towlette? Ok I'll be back to check on you in 30 sec. 
Not really for free if the company's selection process sucks that way. 
Can't even tell those guys to get a room, they're already in one. 
Um. Was he an employee or not? Cause I'm thinking it wasn't 
"I shot the escape room operators and kicked the door open, i'm so cool" 
I always imagine that the people observing are continuously make bets on what the people do. 
Yeah that's always a bummer - It'll be two people, just the couple. Only the guy is completely freaking out the whole time about having to pop the question at the end, so, the girl ends up dragging the guy through the whole thing, doing all the work - Or, worse, we give them all the answers after an hour of standing around - All to reveal this ring at the perfect moment, only, that moment is completely ruined by this newfound perspective you have on your fiance, as this completely bumbling idiot who didn't solve one fucking puzzle the whole time 
And if you stick metal in electric sockets, you win on escaping life! 
What was the obstacle? If it isn't supposed to be climbed over, it should be designed in a way where people don't think to climb over it. 
Not really. They were kinda dicks to begin with. They just tried to explain why they did nothing wrong, which sucks because there are plenty of awesome cops in my area, and we got the shitty ones 
Yeah I don't understand either, maybe I'm just missing something, but how do you plant a spy in the group like this? 
I see this a lot too. One of our rooms has a jacket in it, and some people just assume its one of theirs. 
"What's your job?" "Oh, I make panels with buttons." 
This is the most confounding behavior in this thread so far. 
I find that watching people attempt to escape the room is an excellent way to assess their teamwork, problem solving skills, demeanor under pressure, and general character in multiple ways. Your friend's boyfriend sounds like a jerk. I brought someone I had just started dating to room escape and watching them was a huge indicator of lots of aspects of their personality early on. 
The odds of someone speaking Russian aren't *that* low. That's really cool though! 
Yeah it's super frustrating but also understandable, you've been working towards this point and when it's finally there it can feel as if it's not really "THE END". But there have been moments where I got into discussion about their logic behind not leaving. 
I don't think that would have mattered to the drunk guy... 
They told us later they didn't know what the hell we were doing, but didn't want to intervene. We eventually had to ask them if she was supposed to still be cuffed. I feel like they probably should've asked us about it, but eh, it made a good story! 
You can get out at anytime. There's usually a door that's not part of the puzzle. 
I think the idea is that the teammate on the phone sacrificed himself (turned into a chicken and couldn't talk) in order to deliver the hint involving acting like a chicken. 
The last one would totally be me. I'm super competitive. "IDGAF about that ring right now, it's not a clue, and we gotta finish the puzzle before time runs out. PUT IT DOWN AND HELP ME!" Lucky for me I'm married to a dude who gets this I guess lol. 
Why was this knife here if I wasn't supposed to murder the rest of the group with it? 
So you're gonna try to tell the guy in the $4,000 dollar space suit how to solve an escape room? C'mon! 
At an escape room we went to we started taking apart a photo frame with a "do not disassemble" sticker on it. They seemed quite annoyed but in fairness they also had "do not open" writing on a lot of things you had to open to solve the puzzle. 
Oh shit and then each time you repair it, it probably looks more like it's a clue, so people rip it up again! 
I'm not sure. The escape room employee said that he was scared to enter the room to tell the guy to stop. If I'm remembering correctly, he was asked to leave 
Anyone who ever apologizes for the mess they made, made a tiny mess in comparison to the person who leaves without saying anything. 
they automatically refill if you try to do that without drinking them, DUH 
From that one conversation I had with him, he seemed to lack a fair bit of common sense (who asks for the answers without playing?? Goodness...). I saw the guy again with his company some time later and he looked like he wasn't part of the crowd; everyone else seemed pretty chummy. Funny enough, he was pretty into the escape once he went in... My staff and I fondly shake our heads whenever we think back to him lol 
I mean I wouldn't expect the type of people who fuck in an Escape Room to be courteous. 
If you played point and click games in the 90s you know those might actually be things you'd have to do in some of them! 
It's pretty difficult to electrocute yourself with modern sockets. Not impossible but you have to try. 
I would guess it's the spy giving the mission to solve the puzzles in the room, (basically the game host) but it ends up being the spy all along. 
"Stanley, you escaped from life in 'da hood', we could really use you here" 
That actually fucked a group I went with once, nobody checked the damn coat rack 
I'm a panelman, like my father before me, and his father before him. 
One chick rode naked through the streets on a horse 
When we finished I thought we were only 2 or so minutes off the top 5 board and I remember giving her a bit of a death stare. I was being a bit thick though and we were just under 9 minutes off so it wasn't that bad. 
I bet that was annoying. We did another room with a group of friends and started off with the room really dark and only one flashlight. We are probably 85% of the way through and my friend made the comments about some lights in a box. Went to look and there was 4 torches in the first box that was opened she just didn't think to mention it. 
Ha! I can only imagine this is the reason she is your ex mother in law. 
Definitely smart to look at the books! But they are REAL published books, they have page numbers and words. If you need to use them you will probably have a clue/colormarker/hints. No escape room should make you look through 10+ books blindly. 
Reality has never stood in the way of a rom-com plot before. 
See I would have assumed I was supposed to decapitate the chicken 
So you'll fuck a rubber duck, but only if it's a female rubber duck? 
He's the only one who survives when they complete the puzzle and the whole station rapidly depressurizes. 
I feel like a lot of the problems with escape rooms would be solved if a minority of them *didn't* require guests to do things that would normally be inappropriate or potentially dangerous, like ignoring written instructions or pulling keys out of wall outlets. If your first escape room is like that, you're going to assume that it's normal. Obviously you can't really stop people who reach genuinely bizarre conclusions like the idea that a puzzle requires them to drink muddy water they got out of a jar they had to force off of a shelf, but it should be a hard and fast rule that guests shouldn't have to do anything destructive or risky to complete an escape. 
Yes! After a group ripped up floorboards in one room the next couple groups saw the misalignment from our repairs and assumed it was a trap door. We had to add 'don't remove the flooring' to our briefing. 
So you're saying that cutting up the carpet with a pocket knife *was* the key to escaping the room?! 
huh. this rubber chicken has a pulley in the middle. 
That's just evil, and clever! How does this work out? 
I made an escape room based on Viking history set in a college, and I put in some books about the vikings for decoration. Someone used them as a shortcut on a combination lock (which a clue hinted to be the year the vikings invaded England). I didn't mind them doing that because they showed ingenuity and didn't just look it up on their phone. 
There needs to be a movie where people go to an escape room then an actual disaster happens and shit gets really real. Could be a romcom or a thriller or both. 
Chained and blindfolded? That makes my country's escape rooms sound so mild 
Friday's would be perfect. If she says yes you can celebrate with endless cheese sticks and potato skins. If she rejects you then you can wallow in self pity with endless cheese sticks and potato skins. It's a classic win/win scenario 
Ya when op brought up sacrifice I was thinking 'no way is she about to do decapitate her friend 
I don't fuck my duckies, it destroys them after a couple years and I don't want to ruin all the good ones I have left. 
'But *could* I?' he wondered, 'and *should* I?' he thought - 'It's present,' he pondered, 'and *surely* I ought? It's *clearly* included, and *why* would it be - If not with a purpose intended for me? 'Perhaps it's a pointer? Perhaps it's a clue? I'll *never* be sure, But I'll know when I do! I'll do it!' he whispered, 'I'll do it!' he cried. He sat in his suit and he watched as they died. &nbsp; :) 
Put a polarized screen on the wall, then put a filter on the helmet that lets you see through the polarization. 
Haha yeah I can completely see that. I think out of all of them, Phyllis would actually be the only one to sit down and solve the puzzle first, even though Stanley could have solved it faster if he wasn't doing his damn crossword! 
I did escape the room once and there were the most hilarious signs and warnings. Like "do not try to escape the room through the sky light" and "do not escape the room by breaking through the wall" or "the in case of emergency fire extinguisher is for real emergencies. It is NOT a clue." and then all the extra warnings on top of warnings because people will think the warnings are clues. Eg "the fire extinguisher is not a clue. It is not hiding a clue. There is nothing involving the fire extinguisher that is a part of the game. Please do not touch the fire extinguisher unless there is a real actual fire." No joke. Funnier when you realize each one of those warnings is there because someone tried it. And in all fairness I'm sure some of the shittier places actually do use double speak as clues like that 
"Sir, the pages are blank" "I'll be the judge of that! " 
As much as I wanted to record it I can't ! But it would've been great for pornhub. Definitely would almost be black couch worthy. 
Monkey Island! :) Thanks! Good old days. is it available on pc anymore? my original cds wont run :( 
Can't get blood from a stone. Sometimes these groups are awesome. The kids have an epiphany. Not that it changes lives but it gives them a clue. Most of the time it's just what you would expect. I get crap for it. "Condemn them to failure!" I say bullshit why is it fair to enabling their leeching behaviors? 
Then Jim argues with Dwight and gets Dwight to say that he's impervious to all torture techniques and gets Dwight to agree to being subject to torture where in which Jim can get Dwight to confess his secret beet sauce recipe which turns into Jim tying Dwight to a chair in an empty room and then just leaving him there 
Yeah, OP that sounds like a lawsuit waiting to happen. You sure that's a public attraction you're working at and not a BDSM meetup? 
We went to one based on the saw movies where we were all chained to the walls/ chairs and blindfolded. Some of us had a little play in our chains. So there would be a clue near one person, who would call it out and it would allow someone else to open a padlock or locked combination box to get keys. It was exciting. 
Sounds to me like you're just looking to be in a relationship with potato skins and cheese sticks. 
You'd think an easier solution would be to adopt a safeword-type label that you can affix to objects like the fire extinguisher and emergency exit doors, that means "this object is in no way a part of the solution, do not touch this unless there is an actual real-life emergency." It could be as simple as the escape room company's logo. Small and simple enough to not break immersion too much, and yet clear without having to write a whole list of rules that reference each other. Much harder to signal that you shouldn't take apart flooring or walls, though, especially since that's often a solution in the online escape the room games. 
At some point we get a camera pan to Creed standing in the corner of the room visibly sweating. He points to the camera above him. "I did something like this in Kyoto for a lot of money a few years ago. Let me know if anybody brings in chili peppers." 
It's like when Dwight traded for the magic beans. 
The third one sounds like something my fiance would like. For some reason she absolutely loves hello kitty. I dont get it, but if I get her something hello kitty themed, it makes her smile, so thats more than enough incentive for me. 
I've been to one called the kidnapping. They go over everything with you quite extensively. The blindfolds are sleep masks that you can opt out of wearing. The chains connect with those easy open lobster claw clap things, and you can unclip yourself if you need to. 
Also the same place also has a game where you start all locked in a prison cell. You have to pass a cup of water between 3 cells to get the keys to float up to the top of a nearby bucket and use a broom handle to hook them into your cell to escape. You're then loose in an even bigger cell which you also need to escape to get into the main room. 
What he's been searching for has been right in front of him all along. 
Many escape rooms use don't touch stickers, usually a hand print with a slash through it or something similar. But once you think you have everything labeled or included in the rules, people surprise you with new ways to be destructive. 
Moments later, Kevin claims he is starving despite having been in the escape room for less than 3 minutes. 
Are you talking about Professor Copperfield's Miracle Legumes? 
Yeah people are clever and think these rooms are built for geniuses so they need to Sherlock the hell out of it. Whatever rule you come up with someone *will* find a way to interpret it to mean there's a clue involved. Which is part of why a lot of them have monitors and speakers, so the employees can tell you to knock it off if you've decided you need to dismantle the heating pipe to get a key out of it 
*If I don't get a Big Mac in the next ten minutes I'm going to eat someone* 
No one is in any danger! What are you not understanding about this? 
Because if the girl said no, then the answer obviously is no. But the thing is, she's *not going to* say no. She would *never* say no, because of the *implication*. 
It took me a really fucking long time to realize that the person was not speaking to jesus about his job interview where engineers throw bikes down and tops off 
A farmer and his dog are herding sheep. They finish and his dog says "I counted 40 sheep". The farmer replies, "OH SH*T A TALKING DOG". 
I've heard this one as, "What did the tie say to the hat? You go on ahead, I'll hang around." 
I told my girlfriend she penciled in her eyebrows too high. She looked surprised. 
The absolute MOST important part of this joke is to take a massive breath before the second whale speaks, like you're about to go off again 
What did the grape say when it got stepped on? Nothing, it just let out a little wine. 
Man, I just tried to go tell my wife this joke and I couldn't get past knock knock because I was laughing too hard. Well done! 
A young priest just out of the seminary is on his way to his assignment at a church in the bad part of town. He walks past a hooker who say, "Hey father, blowjob? Ten dollars." The priest shyly hurries away from the hooker and makes his way to the church. He meets the Mother Superior who proceeds to tell him what his duties were to be and where his room would be in the rectory. Finally she's asks him if he has any questions. The young priest says, "Mother Superior, what's a blow job?" She replies "Ten dollars, same as on the street." 
What did the doctor say to the dwarf in his waiting room? You're just going to have to be a little patient 
Mickey Mouse wakes up one winter morning to find that someone has written "Fuck You Mickey" in the snow on his lawn with piss. It happens multiple times each with worse messages. Mickey calls the police who start investigating and after a few days the detective comes to Mickey and says "well I have good news and bad news" 'What's the good news?' Mickey asks "We ran a bunch of tests and found that the urine belongs to Donald Duck!" 'Well that's great, but what's the bad news?' "Forensics has confirmed that the handwriting belongs to Minnie." 
Two snakes are hanging out, when one asks the other, "Hey, are we venomous?" The other snake replies, "I'm not sure." "Well I hope not," the first snake says, "because I just bit my tongue." 
Why did Whitney Houston snort artificial sweetener? She thought it was diet coke. 
How do you spot a blind guy at a nude beach? It's not hard. - You know what they say about those blind prostitutes - you gotta hand it to them. 
Did you hear about the restaurant on the moon? The food is incredible but the atmosphere is lacking. 
While we're doing priest jokes... (I'm ignorant of Catholicism and only loosely remember this one, so please excuse me.) A teenage boy is doing his weekly confession at a small-town church. "Father, forgive me, for I have had carnal relations with a young woman out of wedlock," he confesses. The priest, like all small-town folk, is a little nosey. "Was it Barbara who works at the Baskin Robbins?" he asks. "No, Father," replies the boy. "Well was it Janice, the coroner's daughter?" "No, Father," the boy says. "Hmmm... well was it Mary-Beth, the florist's assistant?" "No, Father. I don't want to sin again by damaging the girl's reputation." "I understand, son. Off you go." The priest gives the boy his penance and sends him on his way. Outside, the boy rejoins a group of friends who have been waiting for him, a huge grin on his face. "Well, what did you get?" they ask. "Five Hail Marys and three good leads!" 
lol -is how I imagine what that hippie looked when he was trying to get the lifeguard's attention. 
A young monk joins a monastery and is told he must take a vow of silence, but as repayment he will be allowed to speak two words every ten years. Ten years pass and the head monk asks him if he has anything to say. "Bed Hard". The senior monk nods and sends him on his way. Ten years later he goes before the head monk. "Food Cold". Again, the head monk nods and sends him on his way. Ten years later: "I Quit". "Well I can't say it's surprising, you've done nothing but complain since you got here." 
Why can't bicycles stand on their own? They're two tired. 
Jesus saves! Passes the puck to Gretzky, he shoots, he scores! 
In a similar vein, three logicians walk into a bar. The bartender asks, "Do you all want beers?" The first one says, "I don't know." The second one says, "I don't know," and the third one says, "Yes!" 
You get an up vote because I love me a good historical joke. 
Patient: "Doctor! Doctor! Is it possible that I caught VD in a pubic restroom?" Doctor: "Yes, so i would recommend you stop fucking in there." 
Why don't seagulls fly over the bay? Cause then they'd be bagels 
You know why when ducks fly in a v one side is longer than the other? Because there are more ducks on that side. 
I've heard this one enough that I just lay in with a real knock knock joke when someone tries this. 
Why did the French cook kill himself? He lost the huile d'olive. 
You just wanted to post this, didn't you. I'M ONTO YOU, OP! 
Did anyone else point out that alcohol is a solution yet 
I heard this joke before with an uncle who was a school bus driver. A bit darker than your version. 
What did the pirate say when he turned eighty? I'm eighty. 
I've always thought this joke is much funnier if it doesn't explain itself. "One day my grandfather said to me, 'Your generation relies too much on technology!' So I unplugged his life support." 
"Why do elephants paint their toenails red?" "idk" "To hide in cherry trees." "haha yeah right" "Have you ever seen an elephant in a cherry tree?" "no" "Works, doesn't it?" 
A man and a boy are walking thru the woods at night. The boy starts crying. "Why are you crying?" " It's dark here. I'm scared" "You're scared? I have to walk back alone!" 
I like the Transformers version. I met a woman at a bar and took her home. She asked me why I always had a gun on my hip. I told her it was, "for those damn Decepticons." She laughed. I laughed. The toaster laughed. I shot the toaster. 
Leper jokes are great. Why did they stop the Leper hockey game? There was a face off in the corner 
Why are blonde jokes all one liners? They have to be short enough for men to remember. 
In most of the world, fairy tales begin with, "Once upon a time..." In Louisiana they begin with, "First you make a roux..." 
Alternatively... A horse walks into a bar. The bartender says, "Would you like a drink?" The horse responds, "I think not," and vanishes. Those who are familiar with philosophy should get that this joke is poking fun at Descartes, who famously said, "I think, therefore I am." However, I didn't tell you the explanation before, because that would've been putting Descartes before the horse. 
Alternate version: A priest, a rabbi, and a minister walk into a bar. The barman says "is this some kind of joke?" Though I'd actually use "Englishman, Irishman and Scotsman" as that's more common in the UK. 
Where did Hitler keep his toesies? In his shoesies. How did Hitler keep his shoesies on? With little knotsies. Where did Hitler keep his armies? Poland. 
What do you call a blind dinosaur's dog? Doyouthinkhesaurus Rex 
Its sort of a "choose your own adventure" racist joke. Which ever race you wish to insult, you just need to know what their stereotypical food of choice is. 
But with the help of God and these two fingers, I saved them all! 
The way I remember that joke is that one: A deer walks through the forest and sees the little rabbit, dirty and smelly and crying and crying.... so it asks: "Oh my, little rabbit, what happened to you?" The rabbit answers: "The bear came along and asked me whether poop sticks on my fur! And I said it didn't. So he wiped his butt with me..." The deer comforts the little rabbit and goes away. The next day it sees the rabbit again, and now it is laughing and laughing. Of course it wants to know why the rabbit is laughing so hard. And the rabbit giggles: "Remember how the bear asked me whether my fur is sticky?" "Sure I do!" "Well, today he asked the hedgehog...." 
This is so all or nothing - I'm too scared to try! 
That's when you say.."shit, now I have to start again" 
Me too. Me: hehehhehh hey babe hehe I'm gonna hehhtell you a johohohke. Wife: Okay. Me: Knock knohahack. Wife: Who's there? Me: Dihihishes. Wife: Dishes who? Me: Dishes haHAHAHAHAHaha umm dishes Shaaaahaha... Sean Connereeehheehehhee Wife: Mm. 
I swear I read this exact same joke with Bill Clinton. 
That is one of my favourite jokes. Two bats are hanging from a beam. A third bat is sat on top. The one underneath says to the other one, "What's she doing up there?" The other one says, "Yoga." 
Like "draggin' milk", or am I missing something else here? 
There's no trees to raise your leg against, so the dog can't go. 
And here in Aus, it means both! I pissed off. (I left) I'm pissed off. (I'm angry) I'm pissed. (I'm drunk) I'm pissed. (I'm angry) Plus about 100 other uses. 
Whenever I'm waiting in line and I hear somebody say "This is a really long line", I immediately call back "Whitney Houston's last words" 
Or just scrap the articles: "C, Eb, and G walk into a bar ..." 
I had a blind prostitute once. She said I was the biggest she'd ever had. I said "you're pulling my leg." 
If you get the main gist of it down, you can ad lib everything else on the spot, which is mostly quotes of whatever they are doing when they meet, followed by the boss being skeptical. In 100 years nobody will actually know who Tom Cruise is. They will know Dave, however. Introduce Dave & Boss Meet Tom Cruise Meet President Obama Dave meets the Pope & returns Boss's Heart Attack Punchline from unknown person 
Reminds me of the Purple Polka Dotted ping pong ball joke. 
It's both a joke and a shitty brain teaser for job interviews. 
If I can help someone drop a deuce, its been a good day. 
I know right!? The others were good, this was incredible. 
A woman walks into a bar. She says to the bartender 'I'd like a double entendre please'. So he gives it to her. 
Why do birds fly south for the winter? Cause it's too far to walk 
This is the first time I've ever seen anyone besides my husband tell this joke. He saves it for when ducks or geese are actually flying overhead. On at least one occasion, he started laughing too hard to finish the joke because he knew how poorly the guy he was telling it to was going to react. That was awesome! 
A pirate walks into a bar with a roll of paper towels on his head. The bartender asks, "What's up with the paper towels?" The pirate replies, "Arr, there be a Bounty on me head!" 
Squirrel is hanging out in a pine tree, chewing on a pinecone. Suddenly the tree starts shaking like crazy, so he looks to see what the commotion is all about. Lo and behold, elephant is clumsily climbing his way up. "What are you doing up here?" asks squirrel. "Oh, I just felt like climbing up here to eat some pears," replies elephant. "Stupid elephant... this is a pine tree, there are no pears here." "It's ok, I brought my own pears." 
A string walks in to a bar and the bartender says "we don't serve your kind here." "Well, what kind is that?" "String. We don't serve string. Aren't you a string?" "No sir, I'm a frayed knot." * Boooooooo!! Hisssssss!! * 
How can you tell your Valentine is a leper? There's a tongue stuck to the envelope 
SCOTTISH PEOPLE DO NOT SAY FOOK AND THEY NEVER HAVE. EVERY SINGLE THREAD. Sorry. 
It's funnier if you think that the dog doesn't need a tree to pee because he's a dog, he can go where ever. The joke is he's holding his pee for no reason, or that his dog logic thinks he can't pee unless there's a tree. Or if you refer to a couple getting lost driving somewhere and one says they'll pee their pants if they don't find a bathroom soon. It's funny to think dogs share that experience. 
What did the leper say to the prostitute? Keep the tip. 
I wasn't implying that it would be difficult to remember the specific sequence of events, just that I'm going to want to recall that this joke exists when the time comes that I want to tell a joke. 
You know the ping pong ball one?... Last summer I was on vacation visiting New Hampshire. I went to a concert with a group of friends and on the way back the guy driving starts with the ping pong ball story. He lines it up so it fills up the entire 25 minutes to get back to where we were staying. 25 minutes. 
I have been laughing at this for over an hour now 
As somebody who's watched a bunch of clips of him on youtube, he seems like a real goofball. I like him. 
In college a prof told a story of giving a speech to korean dignitaries, and he told a joke that had them dying from laughter. After his talk he asked the interpreter why they found it so amusing and he said that it wouldn't have translated well so he just told them the speaker has made a very funny joke. 
You know how birds fly in the big V's and sometimes one side will be longer than the other? You know why that is? It's because there's more birds on that side. 
Captain Redbeard walks into a bar. The bartender asks, "Redbeard, where's your buccaneers? Redbeard replies, 'Under me buccan hat'. (if you want to see all the jokes I've posted in here, click on my username.) 
I've heard it like this '..... we don't serve your kind here. So the rope walks out the door and ties himself in a knot and ravels his ends a little bit and walks back in. The barkeep says hey aren't you the rope that was just in here? And the rope says nope, I'm a frayed knot.' 
Fook sounds more English to me. Feck is Irish and fouck is perhaps more accurate to what a Scottish "fuck" sounds like 
I was 18 and working behind the bar of a pub. The locals were fond of trying to top each other's jokes, and I'd be more than happy being paid to pour drinks and listen. But one time, they asked me if I knew any jokes. This is the exact one I told, and nobody laughed. I asked if they got it, thinking they might not be familiar with the symptoms of leprosy, or maybe they didn't get the faulty premise of the "tip" as change/penis. Then one of them leaned in close and said "Leopard?!" 
You should know the joke by heart because you know Dave. 
I honestly like the first one more because of the build up between the three guys. I was thinking there must be an ulterior motive for the arm wishes but they already head me cracking up. Then he walks into the bar, arms flailing and head nodding - I'm cracking up even harder. "I think I fucked up". Fucking got me good. Me and my friends say that when we're doing dumb shit so it hit home. 
The funniest thing about him is that occasionally he wakes the fuck up for a minute and does some real journalism. Nobody ever knows what to do. He also once wore the exact same clothes on air every day for (IIRC) over a year to make a point about sexism in media. He eventually had to announce himself what he'd done because people *still* hadn't caught on. He seems to be an intelligent, sensible dude who's well aware his job is to keep mornings light and vaguely factual. He just has fun with it while waiting for the PM to make the mistake of coming on looking for an easy bit of airtime, then pounces out and takes the cunt to task. Even a fairly easy question is disarming as shit when you're expecting to be spending a few minutes making bad jokes about soft news. 
It will actually be starring Eddie Murphy as both the pope, his wife and his mother. It will be hilarious, I guarantee. 
Really... if they wrote a 10 page poem for this joke I would not feel frustrated by the end. 
I feel like my life just found its purpose. That was to lead you to the Foo Fighters music. I will tell this story to my children. 
All his life he was searching for something Something never comes never leads to nothing Nothing satisfies but he's getting close When manly_lumber jack said "Watch him as he goes!" 
That was one very good reptilian dog you had there. Did you catch the guy? 
Oh my god that's amazing. What a total tool. You were super nice to him, MAN that would burn me up so bad it'd be hard for me to even finish the interview. 
I had good friend, when I was in primary school who had a step dad I really couldn't stand. He was quite a bit older than her mom and very strict. I even avoided to go to her place, when he was there. Later she told me that he beat her and her brother quite regularly. 
"Maybe it's because he was a 35 year old man who wore visors." Funniest thing I've read this year 
The amount of pedophile stories in this thread is freaking me out. 
Similarly: I got some really weird vibes from my high school-age group Sunday school teacher. He was also a church elder, was on the town council, and was a bigwig at some computer tech company, and so on. I was never really comfortable being alone with him. His wife seemed to be crawling out of her own skin when she was around him. Always bossing her around and telling her to shut up in front of people. Fast forward many years later: He was arrested and convicted of raping young teenage boys, age 14 or so. I was the same age range as the boys he raped at the time he was committing these acts. Dodged a bullet myself..... 
It's interesting, I think we (women) generally try to repress those feelings towards other women who appear to be friendly--even though we're getting a weird vibe. We sort tell ourselves it's us, not them. And then, turns out, it's them. 
Your cupcake statement reminded me of my friends bf who came to my house for the first time,to meet me and take her home. I had a pack of those mini cupcakes on my stove. He proceeds to open the top of the package,while not saying anything,touches the tops of all the cupcakes..(me and my friend are both shocked and can only stare in amazement) he then asks if he can have one... I snap out of it and tell him he can have them all,now he's touch EVERY SINGLE FUCKING CUPCAKE!!!! He leave shortly after eating all the cupcakes...I have never spoken to him again...fuck him for touching my cupcakes. Also for the record,she broke up with him shortly after,because only psychopaths touch other people's cupcakes... 
Yo momma so fat, she survived and lives a happy life! 
So he walked into the shower with a bunch of naked girls? And no one else thought it was strange? 
Your grandma sounds awesome. Leaping over furniture and escaping from a murderer. 
I've known some pathological liars and they always have a way of explaining why they work a mundane job when they're (every one that I'd run into, so far) rich or very well-off. One said he won the lottery and was worth about 40 million, but worked a regular job to keep from being bored. There was no winner when he said he had won, and he wasn't smart enough to go through an attorney. Another claimed he was worth just under a million and he owned a modded BMW M5 but drove his brother's Mazda to work, claiming it was to help his brother out by loaning him the M5. He also claimed to work his shitty $10/hr job as a way to keep busy most days. 
How horrifying. I went to high school with a girl who was a pathological liar (but didn't make paranormal claims) & this girl did so much meth during her pregnancy her baby died soon after birth. I always wonder why she was so messed up. 
I want to meet your sister and find out about myself. 
The assistant pastor at my parents church always gave me the creeps, couldn't quite place my finger on it since he never did anything particularly creepy, he just looked like he had something to hide. A few years later, he was arrested for upskirting young girls at the mall. No telling what else he was doing too. This was a decade ago, dunno if counseling worked for him or anything but I haven't seen him pop up on the news at all. 
"You're just jealous you're not hot enough to get hit on by a creepy teacher" that sounds like many of the popular girls in my high school & middle school. I wonder how they felt when he got caught. Keep trusting your gut! 
It's not often you hear about people still having contact with their first girlfriends - at least, I know more stories in which people don't stay in contact rather than they do. May I ask, how much time is in between you and her breaking up, and them getting married? It may be a bit of an offtopic question in this topic but I'm genuinely interested. 
A girl I know is doing this. All my friends love her but something in my gut told me something wasn't right. She was always flirting with all the lads, acting very single. Find out she's seeing a guy I know from other friends. Not only that, it turns out she also has another boyfriend she's had for years. So she has a long term boyfriend, is seeing this other guy, and is by all means, trying to get with my friends too. Was very surreal. But I was just jealous of her when I didn't warm to her straight away like everyone else. 
My sister's class at school had a competition to write to him to get on to his Jim'll Fix It show. She was picked, and she really really wanted to do the thing she wrote about. But she completely refused to go to the show because she said he was creepy. She got in a tonne of trouble at school because of it, but I guess that was better than what could have happened. 
This sounds like high school. Please be high school. 
I have a friend who has high functioning Aspergers. Unfortunately for him he loves people, craves social settings, and has a fear of being left out. Of course, most people instantly don't like him and won't give him a chance, which leads to a lack of social life and missing out. He is definitely (as you put it) creepy, but not a creep. Actually a pretty top bloke most of the time, been his friend for like 5 or 6 years since high-school. Will bend over backwards to help most people in any way he can. Even paid the rego on my first car, and loaned me the money for a new PC (I'm fucking poor as shit, he is insanely frugal - partially thanks to a lack of friends), both of which I'm now working off for him. 
I dated a guy that everyone thought was the greatest, and by all accounts, seemed to be. But my kids really didn't like him and my brother described him "as super mild mannered but the kind of guy that comes home one day and just murders his entire family" The relationship didn't last because of these reasons as well as my own but, as of 2 years, he's still just a great guy as far as everyone knows. Now it has me thinking. 
I read "sleazeball" as "baseball" and learned that calling someone a baseball is pretty fucking funny in its own right. 
Very creepy! My brother was an anxiety sleep walker in during his freshman year in college. He would wake up in different places in the dorm and one night his roommate, who he had just met, woke up to my brothwr standing over his bed. The guy transfered schools shortly after. My brother is a totally normal guy and hasn't had any sleepwalking episodes since. 
I'm not going to lie. I only started doing it because of the people I loved. I serve a small area (around 12000 people) and my ego said that I'd feel better with me caring for them than someone else. Turned out I fucking love my job and I hate it. I get a rush off the enormous emotional swings involved. But at the end of the day when I know I did the best I could possibly do I can honestly say I am proud of myself. I couldn't get that in the factor jobs here. The key is to never stop questioning yourself. I'm not saying doubt yourself, but double checking yourself. If you fucked up own up. Learn from your mistakes. 
Letting your child go unwashed with her belongings covered in waste IS neglect. There was 100% a reason to report this. Neglect isn't just letting your children go hungry. 
Not for that caper, but I think he got popped for something else. And I got a phone call a few months later from an angry ex-girlfriend telling me my suspicions were correct and which pawn shop he used. The police were just like, "Meh." 
To be fair, it's not a thread about people who gave a good first impression and later turned out to have an exemplary character. 
Thanks for offering a ride, but I think I'll just ~~walk~~run... 
Yes! There is a saying "she was thought to be crazy by the man who drove her there". So true. Or woman. I guess 
It was fucking horrific. We knew something wasn't right with him but we had nothing other than our gut feelings and some creepy looks he gave some little girls. And of course everyone else in the family just loved him so we looked like assholes for refusing to associate with him. Even after his conviction people in the family are still making excuses for what he did and trying to tell people that what he did wasn't really that bad. My husband doesn't talk to that side of the family anymore. 
I sometimes think my life story could have been a fantastic book for Oprah's book club. Maybe this is why I hate things like that and prefer humor? Sometimes dark, sometimes with cream and sugar. 
This reminds me of our close family friends - father had been molesting his daughter for years and his wife (my mum's best friend) treated her like the *other woman* in an affair. 
Yes, Dave sucks. But I, too, would like to know more about this avocado ranch. Specifically why it's not a farm, but a ranch. Also the avocados. 
The avocado farm was a hotbed of drama and passion, but that's avocado farms for ya. 
Right? How's she going to afford the rent without a roommate?? 
From own experience: it never goes well, and the person who tried to warn the others becomes a cynical bastard because of it. 
Wanna come over for waffles? Maybe it'll make your day better :) 
Yo mama so fat, only serial killer that stalks her is heart disease 
The great country of Nonobia resents that comment. 
I guess some did, I'm still friends with a girl, that also went there and she left the club for the same reason I did. I think they were either too embarassed to tell or they really didn't think of it as strange. As I said, he was loved by everyone, he also was teacher at my elemantary school. People trusted him. 
It was a legit reason for him to enter the showers and us being seven years olds somehow liked the idea of having a snowball fight... 
"when you look at someone with rose colored glasses, all the red flags are just flags" 
She's in better shape than anyone I know, that's for sure! XD 
I'm gonna assume that it was a knife behind his back and the last sentence does say the cops were called 
I think he was lonely and heartbroken. She was like this dream come true for him. She pretended to be into everything he was into, even though I could tell that bitch didn't like animals. If you like animals you don't look like your playing freeze tags when one accidentally brushes up against you. Was he wrong? Absolutely. Can I understand WHY he allowed himself to be fooled? Yup. 
100% totally agree. Not even a question. It took a lot for his mother to even speak to him again. 
I think if you spend time worrying that you might be secretly bad, you're probably not too bad. 
Another similar story here. I found the pastor at my mom's church super creepy. He never did anything overtly creepy, it was just the way he looked at me (I was 16-17 at the time). My mom told me I was crazy (she even said that my 'teenage egomania' was making me misconstrue simple glances) and no one else seemed to be weirded out or put off by him at all. Then one night at teen bible study, Pastor's teenage daughter broke down and confessed that he had been sexually abusing her for most of her life. It was awful. I can't imagine how lonely and isolated that girl must have felt, surrounded her entire life by people that think her dad is a saint; and the courage it must have taken to finally speak up at all, let alone to a huge group of people that thought her dad could do no wrong. Thankfully she was immediately believed and supported, and Pastor was reported to the police. 
Childhood sexual abuse is a manipulative thing. It's not uncommon for abused folks to remain in an abusive situation, sometimes their whole lives, say if their abuser is also their brother. 
This is the kind of content I want on r/nosleep Not some shit like *My Uncles PortaPotty is Haunted part 1719* Even though this is real, and not for the purpose of being scary, its so much more intense and enjoyable to read. 
Not only did I trust my gut, I also drew dicks on his car when I could find it in the parking lot. 
It did indeed. But this was some years after I'd graduated, so I didn't really have any reason to argue the case again with anybody. 
Probably because they knew and he gave them a piece of the pie. 
Don't remember her name, unfortunately. My parents were really good about not being dismissive when I was a kid. 
Now I'm wondering if OP just mistook a cute "You are so cute I want to take you home and bake cookies for you" for an actual kidnapping attempt. 
I know a Bulgarian girl doing this. Shes attractive and has a good job, and is married to an English guy, but has a 'soul mate' in Bulgaria. She also goes on dates with other guys, as long as they're rich or really handsome. It's weird, because all her Bulgarian girlfriends think she's perfectly entitled to do this, and being married doesn't take her off the market, while her husband is in total denial and thinks she's just friendly with other guys. 
Oh absolutely. I felt awful for him. But I wanted to hire a sky writer to tell her to fuck off haha 
I used to get people to pull their own harness up, and would show them how to close the buckles. When it came time to thread the rope through the loops, there was a good 5-6 inches of rope between my hand and the harness. Can't be too careful. Speaking of careful, I always double and triple checked harnesses, both to make sure they were tight enough and that they were properly done up. 
Same here, turns out the dog had secretly been evil etc 
Dogs always know dude. Just turn yourself in to the police now and save everyone the trouble. 
i finally understand why in english class they say to define pronouns 
Yeah, turns out some pensioner in the pub I drink in was a prolific pedophile, it turns out he was at it for decades, generally against very vulnerable people; disabled children etc, basically the worst you can get. What was horrific is that he was reasonably normal, you expect these people to be monsters, the idea that they're walking amongst you is the scary part. 
My understanding of it is that people give off micro expressions and your brain notices these even when you don't. So while, as you say the person controls the outer appearance, small expressions push through of their real thoughts. Some people are better at seeing these than others. 
Username checks out. History shows posts about Africa. I'm almost 99% sure OP is really Oscar Pistorius and is just trying to be relevant again. 
 Indeed, Johannesburg born and raised! Okay, so to be fair, please don't take my story as a full and complete portrayl of his character. After all, we were just teenagers at a house party - I'd hate to be judged for who I was at 17. Maybe he tried his best to be a better person in the following years. My story just tied in perfectly with the question so decided to stop lurking for once and contribute..... it's been cathartic. 
People like that are the minority, but they're the ones that stick in people's brains and turn our whole society to think "men can't like playing with kids or they're pervs". 
Try being a *dad* without your wife present at all times. I've had to defend myself from strangers accusing me of pedo intentions towards my own children on the playground. Though to be fair, this is more a statement on the sorts of people that would attack somebody they simply assume is a predator, than society itself - which seems to have more and more of those people in it anyways. 
damn, I imagine those who get through and now I understand a bit more why some software is so fucked up. 
Sometimes I wonder if I'm a narcissist, as I have been called one in fights before and I can go all scorched-earth, but I try to keep my ego in check by questioning myself. I feel like if I let myself go unchecked I could become one especially because I'm not perfect and make mistakes. Also when I go scorched-earth it tends to be in defense of someone I love 
Anyone who defends a rapist (of children, no less) deserves to be shunned. Fuck Jason and his still-supportive family 
Do you want rampages? Because this is how you get rampages. I hate hearing shit like this so much. THESE ARE YOUR FUCKING KIDS MAN. FUCKING DO THE RIGHT THING. OR DON'T HAVE KIDS. 
Sole manager of said Ranch here! You see, in order to become a farm, we need a proper set of investors backing us. With your help, we can put this Ranch phase behind us, and become a true Avocado farm once and for all! I'll take you for a tour sometime. 
That does make me wonder though, if they already signed a lease together shouldn't he still be liable for his half of the rent? I mean I don't know if I would push it to far and sue someone crazy like, that but if you got his half plus get another roommate BOOM free rent! 
Don't let it get to you. Sometimes you cannot fix stupid. You saw the problem when nobody else could. That is a very important skill. Keep your eyes open man! 
I'm thinking it was a not-subtle message from the judge. The number I wish was wrong is how many times the high-school girl stabbed her foster mother; why (and how, honestly) would you stab anyone 178 times? I couldn't even imagine stabbing Hitler 178 times. (I mean, the father may have talked her into killing the woman, but there's something *very, very* wrong with a person who murders someone with that much overkill. (Beyond being a murderer, that is.) That's like, almost *beyond* psychopathy. 
Yeah, that's usually the story. This is how they get to the position of trust they need to get what they want. Everyone is always so surprised. It's almost never the guy with the weird mustache. You'd never let him near your kids, so how would looking the part help? 
That in itself is creepy. Just the snowball thing... Yuck. 
Stand up move, contacting affected customers. If a restaurant did that for me over 5 bucks months ago, I would become a fan. 
I think they did but just did not expect it from their prized employee 
Reminds me of my favorite Mark Twain quote: "If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." I don't know how people have the energy to keep up an elaborate web of lies. I've lived by this for many years, and it has made life pretty easy, bitching even. 
I say the same thing to parents, if you spend your time worried that you're a bad parent, you're probably not. Bad parents don't give a shit. 
Ugh. That's terrible. Sorry you had to deal with that. 
Weird when you hear "oh they moved to this country" and it's your own country. 
I chuckled at this. Love it. My favorite meme is the one where someone asks Michelangelo to do the Sistine Chapel & he's all "ya but I'm gonna draw a bunch of dicks on it though" 
That's so awesome. That's the kind of parent I want to be someday. 
Kids can be super honest sometimes. Other times my daughters tell me about all the dinosaurs they hunted and killed and the caves they live in where they festooned the walls with the dinosaur intestines. Idk whats real or not real anymore. 
My Asian mom did stuff that other people could take as being creepy. She loves babies and would want to hold them. Then she would say something like "oh he/she's so pretty. Can I take him/her home". Obviously she wasn't serious. 
My Asian mom has also done some things that would freak out Americans. Once on a road trip we were getting ready to leave a ratty motel/apartments in a hick town, mom sees one of the live-in children watching her eat cookies. She has the kid come into our van to eat cookies with her. Needless to say when I came upon the scene I quickly explained in non-English why this shit could get her in some big trouble, this isn't Asia, get that kid the fuck out of the van before someone sees. 
Do you happen to know if this is common among Bulgarians? Or just a one off thing 
If anyone ever said they knew how to do it themselves I'd let them, but I would always always always double check the harness and make sure they were clipped properly. After every attempt too. When it comes to safety, it takes A LOT to be "too careful." 
Yeah I was imagining this dog setting up op. "oh really? The dog shit in the living room? The dog we all love?" "I SWEAR, WTF, WHY WOULD I SHIT IN YOUR LIVING ROOM?" "Get the hell out of my house you freak " 
In the original story for "Minority Report," Philip K. Dick actually had "predogs" instead of "precogs" but Steven Spielberg felt this would be too realistic, and detract from the scifi element. 
I feel like there's a new person with each pronoun. 
Awww what a good pup! I never had a dog escort me, but my friend's dog would always randomly show up on my back porch, demand to come inside to sniff and then leave. 
It's a tradition in our family to give a copy of this book to every girl graduating from high school. Really, everyone should read it, though. 
That's what I was thinking. I don't get how it's possible to do that kind of thing and keep parental rights. Especially since she said he had a daughter. 
Seems like its always the ones obsessing from the pulpit about homosexuality that turn out to be cock crazy. 
I've noticed micro facial expressions in myself during times of conflict and stress. Random muscles twitching or a darting eye or things like that 
You know you're entering Gary when it's 100 degrees outside and all of the car windows start rolling up. 
OP - Oscar Pistorius. I see what you did there! And I like it. 
You and your friend are decent people, it sounds like this was the beginning of the crazy and you weren't to know. Glad your friend got out of it. 
If you really want to creep them out, hate kids *and* football. 
I had my infant son out shopping at Staples with my wife's Guncle and a random lady literally tried to take the baby out of his arms because a baby that young "must have a mother" and we clearly stole him. It was insane. She went from, "aww, cute baby" to "I'm saving him from you perverted gay kidnappers" in 5 seconds flat. Thankfully store management escorted her out. 
what kind of confused brain thinks like, hmm I really love my daughter I want to be a part of her life. Divorce will likely fuck me over. What's the solution...oh I know, murder her mother! 
Yeah fuck snowballs. Snowballs are fucking pedophiles man. 
This is not a standard thing in the US or Canada at least. Group showers for seven year olds supervised only by a male coach? Also the post said he got in trouble after assault at a training camp for younger girls. Do 5 year olds have "training camps"? Maybe this is in a country with a different sports system or something? Seems possible as handball is not so popular in North America. 
It really says a lot about the owners. Good on them. 
It still doesn't check out. First time something goes missing at night you have your security system improved. Most people don't sit there and go "oh darn it, an electric piano disappeared again" and then forget about it. 
Coming from a guy who told people his name was Mark Twain 
Thank you :) It's all good now, this happened almost 12 yrs ago and I've moved to another country since:) 
I think variations definitely translate fine/exist in English. "Oh you're such a good kid, I should take you home/adopt you myself!" Or even naughty children, "if you don't stop acting up, your mom will leave you with me and I'll put you to work!" But there's definitely a tone people say it with that makes it obvious. The "not taking no for an answer" is what puts the situation into creepy territory. 
And now some kid is out there persuading all the other kids that getting into a van really does result in free cookies. Nice going, Asian Mom. 
I know couple of Bulgarian girls and they're nothing like this Might be it's just that group. 
Feels like graduation from middle school would be the more appropriate age for this. High schools girls get trapped in a lot of shit because they don't know how to stop someone without being "rude." (Personal experience.) 
That is so fucked up. How does someone do that to their own children (well, any child)? What a monster. 
A lot of preachers tend to do sermons on the things they struggle with more frequently. It's easier to talk about something you personally have an issue with than something you don't. 
It's crazy how justifying something with "think of the children" can make people into actual kidnappers, thinking they're righteous. 
I think it depends on how often they check their inventory. Do they count their items in stock every day, once a week/month? By the time they checked, several items could've been taken over a period of days/weeks. As an insider, he knew their system and worked around it. 
Please tell me he and your brother then went on to drink a beer together and became friends? 
can confirm, dated a Bulgarian girl for a while, can't confirm whether or not she put a curse on me when it ended though. 
Holy shit. The coherent sentence shows the darker meaning... 
Well also abuse from family is way more taboo and kept hush hush so you would never really hear about it. 
When reading stuff like this it is important to remember how the over-whelming majority of humanity would never harm your daughter. A lot of us would die before harming a child. 
I used to work at a rape crisis center. One of the staff had a FIL who had raped his wife, all his daughters, all his DILs, all his granddaughters and god knows who else. She finally put her foot down and made their family be no contact. But no one ever stopped him. It can totally be generational. Which makes me want to puke. 
Work in a store, and now count our inventory every monday. But before we did it 2 times a year. You could have stolen a shit ton of products in that time, but once you do inventory, you finally realize how much you're missing. 
Not that I know of. My brother moved five hours away shortly after that so I doubt it. 
These things go on usually because no one is willing/brave enough to report the rapist. They'll say things like "oh we can deal with it in the family", etc, and that's how more generations of children get abused. 
Right. I'm a teacher, so I have been able to observe the results of all of that in, oh, about 1300 children over the years. I HATE the stranger danger stuff. Kids very badly need to be able to deal with and interact with strangers. I wish families would teach healthy boundaries and assertiveness instead of the stranger bullshit. 
That is absolutely terrible I am so sorry you went through that. 12 and 14? A 2 year difference does not make you a pedo for fucks sake. you poor kid. Fuck that place, that is an awful way to mess with someone's perceptions of sexuality. 
I have a friend that works for a professional inventory counting service. They go to huge warehouses to count inventory and have these weird hip mounted computers they use to count and keep track of stuff. When I knew him in high school he could barely do math but now he has Rainman level skill at counting a group of matched items close together. 
Yeah mob mentality can be a lovely thing... I feel bad for all the innocent older men who look like Elvis and sing like him in Australian bars. 
Best thing about being full circle is that you're never straight. 
I have a friend who was raped by her dad. Years before (before she was born) he had raped several other family members. Someone did report it, it went to trial and he got off because of his standing in the community and no one wanting to believe someone they knew so well could do this. This all came out because he continued the behavior and when he started in on it again with his young granddaughter, his DIL flipped and is trying really hard to get charges pressed and get him locked up. However, despite multiple other people coming forward that he did this to them, he still hasn't been arrested and people are still taking his side. This has been going on for almost 2 years. Sometimes reporting it isn't enough. It may stop the abuse for 1 child, but we as a society have to be able to put our personal feelings aside for people like this (who we thought we knew!) and hold them accountable. 
As someone who is socially awkward to a borderline debilitating extent, thank you. If I'd have learned people skills young I wouldnt have to put so much effort into it now that I'm 21. 
Schools should just make kids who are bad at math do inventory. 
I don't understand why they can't/won't put the guy away after people come out against him. I understand if it is like 1 person, but if you have multiple claims against him, it becomes more probable. 
I sucked at multiplication tables all through school. Got a stock room job after graduating with a masters. Knew my multiplication tables up to 16 in three months. 
That's a really compassionate way of seeing the North Korea situation 
Have parents who grew up in Korea, I'd definitely say that they have more resentment towards Japan than NK. I'd have to ask them, but they seem to be more sympathetic towards NK, especially since many have relatives there. 
It is due to the isolation and difference in North Korean language and culture in comparison to the South I believe. 60 Years of total separation has its affects. 
Damn, this post was moving. Especially that you were taught that you're brothers and sisters, and "Koreans" meaning "one people" We're all brothers and sisters, when you think about it. It's a shame that the whole world wants to alienate us from each other. 
Yea my parents' generation, they used to have regular evacuation drills and stuff. But they do not Reddit. 
I think I can speak for the general majority of ROK soldiers when I say this, and in short, we are very appreciative of you guys. We have teaching sessions in the army, roughly translated as "mental education", during which we are taught that the American military presence in Korea serves as a deterrent to North Korean aggression. I remember one instructor talking about aircraft carriers with passion. "China has a military budget of XX dollars, but they have one aircraft carrier. The US Navy has ten aircraft carriers. End of story." So all in all, we like you guys, both because you guys are fun to be around and also because we are taught that we need you. 
Regarding the general South Korean attitude, yes they are not really accepted. Although ethnically the same, North Koreans are very different when it comes to dialect, culture, education, etiquette etc etc. They take classes on how to adjust to a completely new society but still struggle. Without common experiences, both South and North Koreans are having a hard time to adjust to each other. In my opinion, this is one of the more worrying aspects of reunification. We probably will mistreat North Koreans and without proper identification of the problem, education of a solution and a subsequent public shift in attitude, we will not get along that easily. However, with more and more TV shows with North Koreans (there are some popular ones right now) and more public exposure to North Koreans, we are getting better with regards to treating them better. I feel like that this could have been answered better but I hope this was adequate. 
yeah this is what I wanted to ask. Can't imagine that there were actually children receiving these letters, NK government probably wouldn't allow it. 
That is an incredible compliment, thank you. I did work in the translation industry for quite a while, so that may definitely helped. I also go on reddit on a daily basis, and read/watch a ton of English based media. 
There is a documentary called A State of Mind that focuses on the Mass Games in North Korea. I watched it several years ago and it was really insightful and showed how they push the value of group dynamics over individual achievement. 
Not OP, but what you say regarding the impracticality of reunification is correct. However, the ideal is for reunification; it's just no one has any concrete ideas for this nor do we agree on a lot of things regarding NK. Sympathy for the people is supposed to be a given, so that one day if reunification does happen, we can be ready for it. As OP mentions, the NK regime and military are the taught as the "main enemy/adversary". This is an acknowledgement of that the threat that is NK yet that we must not be confused with "regime/military" and "people". 
They probably didn't want to tell children anything worse. 
I think the difference is that North American media focuses on DPRK's leadership, while it seems like the people in ROK focus on the people of the DPRK. My perspective on the North American obsession with DPRK villainy ends at it's leadership and government. I feel for the North Korean people and wish they could be reunited with their families in the south. 
People forget that South Korea was once a fascist dictatorship. 
The popular choices were the US, Canada, and Australia. 
For younger generations, the consensus is to stay where they are now. SK people sacrificed a lot to get to where they are economically and does not want to lose their sons/brothers/fathers to war. My perspective is that the country must be united once again. Depends on what party takes over the government. If liberal, peaceful merge. If conservative, hit me and we will hit you back harder. However, both parties have aims to reunite. Just different methods 
Well, we had to watch the videos of those kids and we felt bad for them. It hits you hard when kids who look like you and speaks the same language dies off from starvation 
They did, but not the people. Implication was that NK people are just "hypnotized" by communism ideology and needs to be save. 
My question is: would it really be that expensive? I see how trying to drag NK into 2017 at a fast pace would be expensive, but instead of doing that what if we took a more bottom-up approach. They have resources, and they have manpower even if it is unskilled in large part. I can't help but think that if we opened up the farming and mining operations there it would generate the money and the raw materials to let them build out their own industries without importing much material outside of super advanced things like CPUs and really heavy industry stuff. Humans don't like fast change (well I do, but I'm weird) and if they suddenly had access to all the world has to offer it would likely result in a lot of chaos. If NK is like the US was in 1910, then we could likely move them through 117 years of progress in just 30 years. As long as people feel they are getting a fair deal, and can see their kids becoming more prosperous than themselves - they tend to be content with that. 
Its not a taboo topic to talk about or anything. Its comes up just like any other political comment. 
which part of Seoul were you visiting? I find it hard to believe people were visibly uncomfortable with someone speaking Japanese, there are Japanese tourists everywhere. 
My father escaped north Korea total of 3 times and 2 of the time he got caught in china and brought back into north Korea. We have a relative who are higher up in ranks of north Korean officials who refused to help our family but this time he helped my father from getting executed and made him serve in prison for total of 13 years after coming out he tried his 3rd escape which he made to south korea. From then he sent few people to bring me and my grandmother to south. I was separated from my mother when i was 5 since my grandmother adopted me. Still no news from my mother. Apart from my mother and rich relatives, no family left in north. 
I know! My grandpa didn't even recognize his little brother :( I'm pretty sure my grandpa abandoned his family when he joined the SK army with his best friend. He was a great grandpa but generally a pretty shitty person. His little brother is still alive and awesome! Eerily lives sorta close to the DMZ. 
Often in South Korea, North Koreans face social isolation and discrimination 
She didn't trust it. Said something about not being regulated or something 
No. Probably from the Chinese character for the U.S. which means "beautiful" and is pronounced "Mei" in Chinese. Same character is likely pronounced "Mi" in Korean. 
My father in law recently visited from South Korea and we watched that show together. Basically it is a Korean style talk show where professional South Korean hosts interview defectors about their life and experiences. Since North Korea sucks so bad, it might come across as propaganda but it does not seem to have a script. You can watch the most recent episodes on ondemandkorea.com but there are no subtitles. 
I couldn't either. It would be worth dying for to try and get them back. 
I mean Korea transformed so completely during their lives, can I ask how they talk about this transformation and how the country was under the elder Park, or how they use industrial tools that they might not have had as children if they were especially poor? 
I could potentially see a coup of sympathetic North Koreans finally overthrowing them. 
Not to mention the fact that, you know, he's committed war crimes and will probably end up in prison for the rest of his life and/or executed. Pretty sure he mostly doesn't wanna die. 
That's something aboutour military budget i feel is overlooked often. We spend so much on defense because so many strategically critical allied countries rely solely on us for protection. We have to shuffle all those ships around constantly bringing them in for repairs while supplementing those with spare ships that are just finishing being repaired 
Probably similar to the reunification of Germany. From what I understand there were big problems with this at first and there are still problems today. 
I have read about letters and propaganda fliers being tied to balloons and released at the DMZ where the wind carries them to the North. I could see these letters being gathered by SK and US forces for exactly that sort of psyop. Of course, I'm just speculating. 
That could be the case. We definitely don't tell our children about the atrocities we've committed in the US until much later 
there is a good reason for that. in the rather cruel and gruesome korean war about a third of the north korean population died. its easy to make fun of north koreas paranoia and hatred for the US when its expressed by a silly looking fat kid, but there are few countries and societes that were devastated to such an extent as (north) korea by us bombs and napalm. 
The defectors are usually called "sae-tuh-min" which means something like "newly-housed". I remember having one classmate in elementary school who came down from NK with his mom. I remember him having a normal school life, and no one had anything against him. He was actually quite popular due to his awesome soccer skills. As far as I know, even the parents including mine were "curious" of how they got there, but showed no hostility. 
By people do you mean South Koreans? The demonizing of North Korea was probably done under the exact dictatorship you're talking about. The people today are not ignorant of the dictatorships, and are very much resentful about it. This is especially so after the impeachment of the recent corrupt president, who was the daughter of the dictator. 
When I was talking to people who worked for reunification efforts in Korea, I heard that often times Koreans from abroad feel more strongly about reunification than native Koreans. He stated that unfortunately many people in Korea have become ambivalent towards the idea of reunifying. Would you say that's accurate? 
How much of that kind of footage exists? It seems like something NK wouldn't allow to be shot, let alone let out of the country. 
My father, who grew up in a communist country, was told of the poor starving kids in America. 
Yes and also compassion for the northerners. They did not choose to be that way. They we left behind. Many of our families fled from the North. They had sons and daughters and brothers and sisters who didn't make it. They weren't evil. They just didn't make it out. It is a source of grief. 
I find being bilingual so fascinating. I wish I could learn a second language fluently but everyone I know speaks English so I don't have anybody to speak a second language with to get fluent enough to know what it's like. 
There is a significant amount of radical left in Korea who are sympathetic to the North as a means to be be anti-American or are vehement with nationalism and jingoistic. Remember that there is a draft in South Korea for all young males of a certain age. Not unheard of that some Korean youths would look at their current situation and think "I'm here because of this unKorean interloper." It is very likely that there would be a few among the Korean armed services who don't want to be there and will have a "phase" that echoes radical left politics. 
They were actually my friends awkwardly enough. On a rowdy night a girl had a talk with me about how they despise the Japanese. Mostly because of war crimes. They're in their 30s. Living in the metropolitan areas. I've also had a man get annoyed at me when I said kanpai by accident when I was sloshed. Great people otherwise though. I hope the hate can be let go some day. 
That's an amazing story. It sounds like your father has been through a lot. I'm glad to hear your family is together and I'm sorry that you face discrimination now. I hope South Koreans will get more education about North Koreans so they are not scared of them. Do you know anyone else from North Korea apart from your family? I wonder if you would become friends and support each other. 
Very reasonable to say that, since there's not much science going on there, god knows what kind of food regulations they have over there. 
Yes, as you say, Migook does not come from Korean's view of Americans or America as beautiful. It is a direct borrowing from Chinese, and I would venture to guess that the Chinese word for America was from the "-me-" part of America (uh-MEI-ri-cuh), since that is where the stress is (that's why we get "Murica"). Once they had the sound, they likely chose a character with positive meaning that has the "mei" sound. Also, "han" in "hangook" does not mean one. It is just a proper name. 
Yup. My mother bribed the border with 'fine' products purchased on the black market to escape socialist Poland in the '80s. Times were tough... 
South Korea would have a huge hit to their economy. 
I'll have to be honest and say I'm unfortunately not a good resource for this particular question. My dad and I, while we love each other, like many father/son relationships, exclusively talk about baseball. My mother grew up relatively wealthy in that era and I've seen many people her age not even relate to her like "wtf you had a tv?" "wtf do you mean you took a taxi to school?" 
One important thing is they have a different vocabulary. The use very few English loanwords, if any, and instead use different words. The South Koreans use them all over the place. This isn't even including the rest of their sentence structure. Korea used to have many regional dialects and accents. Some were very strong. Seoul had a different one than Busan, and they had a different one than places in between. Now, South Korea is mostly a standard Seoul-ish accent. However, the North didn't merge towards the same language, so they talk different, even unintelligible to some. 
There's really no reason for south koreans to be bitter. You have to remember the split was ~65 years ago. A lot of people still have family in nk. During the war many families were split up because only some were willing to make the trek through dangerous conditions to escape north korea. My grandma had to cross through war zones at the age of 11 with her parents so we technically still have relatives over there. 
Most times it's not even explicitly told to them, regardless of how old they get. The only way you can find out about most of it is through research, since nobody wants to talk about the awful things their country has done in the past. It's always so interesting to learn about history from multiple points of view. It starts to show you how much history differs based on who is telling it. 
Pretty one sided description of the Korean War buddy...you do realize it was was the North Koreans...backed by China and the Soviets who invaded the South? And it wasn't just the Americans supporting the South it was 21 countries of the United Nations who helped defend South Korea from the invasion force. Don't make it sound like the US just decided to bomb the hell out of the North. 
The fact that she was elected in the first place suggests the resentment is not as total as you suggest. 
I teach SK university students and business professionals, speak Korean and have many longtime Korean friends - and also a decade or so of research and work re: NK. I would say this is accurate, although I'm not OP. Almost everyone from the generation during the war has and is dying off, and for the younger generations, reunification means accepting 23 million refugees overnight into an already highly competitive economy -- with little to no education, job training, and few modern society life skills. The practical means of reunification is a huge roadblock and most of my younger University friends from ten years ago to now seem fairly ambivalent, to be honest. This is just my broad view and I am not South Korean, however. 
I guess the same way actual photos we get from tourists that go there. Risk their freedom to get unauthorized shots. 
He wasn't entirely misplaced. Tens of thousands of inner-city youth were and still are starving. And I understand that the Soviets in particular liked to portray the problems of racism and black poverty as endemic of the inequalities of the capitalist system. It was a "you may not have much, but at least you're not left to fend for yourself like those poor people capitalism brushes aside". 
It's just how you phrase it. Don't form a causal relationship between the food they waste and people not having enough. The finish your plate mentality isn't healthy anyway. 
That's kind of adorable. Bonus points for good grandma. 
For me was always Africa. My mom gave me a kids book that had a spin wheel on it and on the spin wheel was an about 70% chance of hitting a third world country and it was supposed to say how lucky you are for not being born in shitty countries. She made me spin it if I didn't eat all my green beans. 
A lot of people buy in bulk because it's cheaper than individual portions and can last longer. Poverty mindset is hard to get out of. 
Biggest is food shortage. During famine, cannibalism happens often in rural areas. Also if 1 person defects, public execution for all family members left behind 
Well there are two types of gov officials. 1. Comes and goes with gov change every 5 yrs 2. Rose up the rank from bottom up. My case is number 2, so.. not much? 
Probably suffer the same fate. I'll imagine it be pretty hard to come out of that environment being normal probably will take years to reach whatever normal is 
Isn't there also huge mineral wealth and industrial capacity in North Korea though? I'd expect the Unified Korea would be a powerhouse similar to Japan (probably more powerful economically) 
German here: Our economy didnt collapse! The east drags us down a bit, but overall it works out. 
Many still are still wiling to, but the tax is going to be MUCH higher that what is now and younger generations may not like that much 
There are plenty north Korean communities are in south. 
Kim Jong Un personally taste tests every piece of candy produced in North Korea. 
That's good, some other users were telling stories about negative biases on NK so I expected more of that and it was just nice to see an alternative 
Hell, there are people in the Republic of Ireland who are concerned about the economic impacts of reunification with Northern Ireland and that situation doesn't even touch that of the Korean Peninsula. I'll give those South Koreans a pass. It's an absolute clusterfuck of a situation. Although in both cases I think reunification is ultimately the best decision. What's a few years/decades of economic hardship versus fostering an unnatural divide amongst a people that doesn't need to exist. 
I've seen this said elsewhere and it confuses me and makes me wonder if education has changed. I certainly learned about all the atrocities against the Native Americans and slavery. We didn't get all the grisly details in elementary school, of course. But we did in high school. This was 25 years ago though. 
Unfortunately, yes. Although it has heightened definitely since then. There are people who regard her father as a great person, since he was the only dictator that used his absolute power for "good" (for certain people). People who lived during his rule, that benefited from it, still hail him. Even today, there are protests by older conservatives calling for the decriminalization of the former president. The rest of us are hardly sympathetic, and a lot of this resentment is also being carried on to such people. 
I suppose there'd also be the lingual gap between North and South Koreans as well. Because of how isolated North Korea is from the rest of the world, even from its southern neighbour, there is beginning to be a noticeable difference between the dialects spoken by the people on either side of the border. 
It would probably be a million times worse than Germany's reunification. East Germany was backwards and poor but nothing like the disparity between the Koreas. 
Converting the NK population into productive citizens before a full reunification seems like the only viable option. As someone mentioned earlier, a full acceptance of millions of refuges with little concept of modern society and modern skills would be a very tough economic pill to swallow. 
The tourists are only brought to Pyongyang and other areas which are permitted. The tourists don't get to see the real North Korea, the villages, or obviously the forced labor camps. 
The ironic part is that NK was stronger - economically, militarily, etc. - than SK until the 80s or so. Additionally, both were dictatorships, so being a Korean just kind of sucked for a while (in a way, Korea is the Poland of Asia...). 
It's not just inner city youth. I live in a rural area, wife's a social worker, works with kids that have been abused, trust me, it's a very serious problem in rural america as well. 
If you landed on the 30% did you still have to eat your green beans? 
I think I fall into that category. Grew up poor, and although I'm doing very well for myself as an adult I feel like I am in a hybrid gray area where I don't always know what a "normal" person would do. 
I remember reading some stories of that in the book "Nothing to Envy," which is one of the few books I can find in the US that talk about regular people in NK and that doesn't focus solely on the government/larger political abstractions. I don't think anyone in the West can really conceive of what it's like to live in that kind of repressive situation. I'm an Orwell scholar and the similarities to Nineteen Eighty-Four are stunning. 
Excellent point. I'm sure SKorean realtors would get excited too. 
There was a 3:1 GDP per capita ratio between West Germany and East Germany. Between North Korea and South Korea it's something like 40:1. 
Well considering the fact that they've been only divided for short period of time compare to SK and NK. Also, East Germany was one of the riches countries among communist nations. 
Those at the top got there due to being complicit in the regime's practices, self-interests, and bootlicking. They're not all of a sudden going to have an epiphany about altruism and risk their life to save the peasants. Furthermore, a coup would take more than just one general-- it would take a group of people all risking their lives and the lives of their families for generations to come. Why would they take that risk when they're generals with the best lifestyles already in NK? 
How are things between ulster and Ireland now? I've been under the impression that the UK and Ireland have been chill for a while. 
I think it's about the same. Like in elementary school we knew about the slaves and Native Americans, but it wasn't really until middle school when we were shown Roots in history class that the conditions became more clear. Then of course we got even further into it in high school, although the primary focus of American history was ALWAYS the Revolutionary War. 
Same story with Francisco Franco, in Spain. Ruled from 1939 to 1975. Lots of political oppression, nationalism, women's rights violations, but the older conservatives that lived under him still seem to think he was good. 
That sounds a lot like my knowledge of reunification Germany 
There isnt a very big gap. The only difference is that NK doesnt use english loanwords, but the way people speak in NK is no more different than the way south koreans in jeollado speak, for example 
Except those 23 million more consumers are below poverty level. So they won't have any money to spend on goods. I mean, in the end, it could take 7-10 years for the Korean economy to stabilize. However on the same note, we don't know how fast it could right itself as well. With the open borders and access to better technology for agriculture and technology, and with a really strong/committed working force, they could break out in 3-5 years. I think your Civil War analogy is a bit off only because, technologically and economically, the southern states weren't in as bad of a condition as North and South Korea are right now. North Korea, by the looks and what people are saying, are stuck in the 1970s-1980s in terms of infrastructure and technology. With a very poor economy. It's going to be expensive to try to get them up to speed and competitive. 
I agree, I recall reading from several sources that regardless of the problems in communist East Germany, their quality of products and volume of production was better per worker than just about any other communist bloc nation. I personally believe it was due to the German culture. NK has been more completely transformed in such an entrenched fashion, I think the difficulty of orienting their population into any kind of a modern economy would be profoundly difficult. I do not believe the pre-communist NK culture had a society as modern as the pre-WWII German example. 
Yeah, it is pretty disappointing. When he took the power, I was hoping he would be more open to the international community since he lived and was educated outside. Last a few years, I rather wished his father lived longer. 
Indeed. Don't have to be poor to buy rice in bulk, in an Asian family you'll go through several kilos per week some weeks. 
Was wondering this too... I see the poverty mindset more in people who buy in small quantities because it's "cheaper" even though once for ounce it is more expensive. People used to going through financial difficulties tend to buy what they need to get by, while people who are more comfortable will spend more and pay less overall on things they are sure to use. Like how you can buy a single individual snack size of chips for like a dollar, or a large party pack size for $4 and it is clearly more than 4 times bigger. 
That's a great book. There are a couple very short anecdotes in the middle of it that describe why people chose to leave. One man defected when he saw a propaganda poster showing a South Korean worker, and the poster was about how workers were exploited in the South. But the worker had a fountain pen in his shirt pocket, which is an unheard of luxury item in the North. Another one was of a soldier who got his hands on a fold-able fingernail clipper from the South. The simplicity and smoothness of operation was utterly without equivalent in the North, and he thought that if they spent their time creating things like this to trim fingernails, it was proof positive that life was better. 
Would assume there would be a bump in tourism from curious outsiders too. I for one would love to visit Heaven Lake at some point during my life. 
Also, crucially, the West Germans were very highly educated. That's one thing the Eastern Bloc did get right. Building physical capital is easy once you've already got human capital. That sure as hell ain't the case with North Korea, especially because malnutrition as children stunts people intellectually. 
In the even of the North Korean government collapse it would be absolutely no problem to give dietary aid and raise the caloric intake of absolutely every living person within North Korea's borders. 
People at the top may live a more luxurious lifestyle, but they are also in more danger as the Kim dynasty regularly "purges" the ranks of anyone they have the slightest suspicion of. It's possible that at some point Kim Jong Un will leave the wrong person with nothing left to lose, then it's just a matter of deciding if they like their revenge hot or cold. 
It's been *relatively* quiet since the Good Friday Agreement in 1998, but Brexit is making things rather awkward, since they will possibly (probably?) need to reinstate border controls between the North and the Republic of Ireland, due to the ROI being in the EU. Hard to know what exactly is going to happen over the next few years, to be honest. 
My 2nd grade teacher was actually born in one. That's all she ever told us, I guess we were too young to get any real details 
The reason was politics. FDR was elected on a "we're dissatisfied with the economy and distrustful of foreigners who terk ehr jerbs" sentiment similar to what we see in recent American politics. The dead giveaway that they never actually thought it would make anyone safer is that they never actually bothered interning any Japanese Americans living in Hawaii, where Pearl Harbor happened, because that would have really been a hassle, and Hawaii didn't really have voters glad to see their Japanese neighbors interned they way mainland America did. 
My understanding is that the culture, wealth and education gap between North and South Korea is way more severe (now) than the gap between East and West Germany was in 1989. FWIW, even now it's pretty easy to tell East and West Germans apart if they're above a certain age (~ 35) 
I would imagine that the reunification would be more like nation-building after a fallen dictator. SK would have a lot of help from Western powers if NK government were to collapse. It would take time, but I don't think it would harm SK's economy in the long run. 
The US has orchestrated multiple coups of foreign governments, but our leaders still condemn coups done by others. 
I have always wondered how they determined 3 generations. Like if the women don't have kids are they raped? 
That was a mind-blower, that one. NKs are taught that they are the envy of the world and everyone else has it worse off, and it's amazing when you have the individuals who find out it's not true. 
Yeah, at least the East Germans were well educated and had enough to eat, they just were like 2 decades behind in societal development and weren't used to personal freedom or an open society. North Koreans are neither well educated or well fed, and are close to a century behind. 
You're thinking of Iceland. Ireland was where 99 Luftballons bombed North Korea. 
I don't know how much one of those would cost, but let's highball it and say $20,000. There are four other living males of the Kim line, so that'd be $80,000 plus shipping. 
Second grade was when I recall learning about Japanese internment. The lesson was simply "this is what we did, here's various points of view about it" and we moved on. That's about how I expect it to be covered. 
I still remember that picture of the Wartberg being passed by a Mercedes or Porsche on the Autobahn after reunification. Very iconic. 
Keep in mind China lives next door. I doubt they'd be thrilled about American GIs handing out freedom on every North Korean street corner... 
Cuba is an interesting example I hadn't considered. They're economically behind the world, but they've at least gotten materials and technical knowledge past the embargo - the digital revolution happened there. There's also a large US-Cuban population helping to tie them to the rest of the world. Integrating Cuba (into who I'm not sure) would be tough, but at least the culture gap wouldn't be absolute. NK is hard to even imagine. 
Also, the fact that east Germany had support from the then still very powerful USSR which basically subsidised them and gave them access to large amounts of foreign goods. They did the same to North Korea and, for the first few decades, North Korea was doing pretty good. After the USSR and the rest of the east block collapsed, NK basically spiraled downwards rapidly. 
except the higher resolution images on Google Earth are taken using aircraft... 
My understanding was that most of the time these family lines simply end in the concentration camp. The women are often raped, though not specifically to create a third generation. 
You're thinking of Hiroshima. Iceland was accidentally discovered by the Wehrmacht when they were retreating through the nuclear wasteland of Cambodia. 
Tried finding the pic but couldn't, would you be able to share? Sounds interesting. 
That one seems fairly easily solved, though. The US gives huge mountains of aid to South Korea, who then pass it on to the now annexed North Korea. Now you could argue that China wouldn't like South Korea, as an American aligned democracy, handing out freedom on ever North Korean street corner, either, but they wouldn't have a leg to stand on internationally if they complained about that. 
From what I've read, women who are raped by guards (sometimes they enter relationships through fear or because they hope to have a better chance to survive-in my book that's still rape) are executed if they become pregnant. Children fathered by prisoners who are born in the camp usually die because the mothers are starving and can't produce enough milk. 
For those who don't know, the show got its name from the way our devices resemble black mirrors when they aren't active / with their screen(s) locked. 
I saw that as a 14 year old kid in the late 80s. Shat me right up it was so plausible. 
The set and palette colour were very unsettling. All that grey and green and emptiness made me feel uneasy. 
There are a few jump scares, but in the context of Jacob's Ladder they don't seem cheap and they are legitimately unsettling. 
The book is like that as well. Even when she's being "sweet" you're on edge because you know she'll change in a snap. Such a haunting book. Need to see the movie. 
Eraserhead just confused the fuck out of me. I would go so far to say that I am still confused three years later. 
Talk about a movie that's hard to watch again... just because of the sense of impending dread. You just feel greasy watching that movie. 
Ted Levine was so crazy as Buffalo Bill it really makes you wonder if it impacted his personal life. If he wasn't married at the time it must have been tough getting a date. Who wants to date the guy who played Buffalo Bill. 
And now that guy is The Flash. What were they thinking? Giving Kevin powers like that. 
Ok I literally just said the big jump scare in The Thing was the best of all time. But I take it back. The one in The Descent is the best of all time. It was literally the climax of the movie. 
Oh man, I forgot about that movie!!! Mothman Prophecies scared the shit out of me as a teen, and then they casually add that it's based on real events? I just wanted to get that movie the fuck away from me forever. I gotta watch it again and see what I think of it now. 
The bathtub old woman is still one of the scariest things I've ever seen. That and the typewriter scene, which is one of the most clever and iconic horror movie scenes ever I reckon. 
God damn, the rape scene in that movie will never leave me. 
To be fair, I can think of at least one jump scare in that movie. [Specifically, when the cop is hovering over the junkie's face and he wakes up](/spoiler) 
The one part of that movie that always gets me in the last session tape where the doctor asks "Where do you live, Simon?" and the response is "I live in the weak and the wounded." 35 years old making my husband check under the goddamn bed and shit... 
One of the most grusome movie deaths Ive ever seen is from Bone Tomahawk 
I don't find movies like this scary. I'm not on edge or afraid just disgusted and sad. 
I was so afraid during that movie that i honestly felt like i would die if i didn't stop watching it. So i had to finish it the next night. 
You should absolutely check out Perfect Blue, the film that Black Swan was heavily inspired by. 
When you casually find all of your missing friend's teeth in a baggie... Yeah, love that film 
You sound like an idiot describing the premise to someone. "Oh yeah it's a monster that comes after you but they'll go after someone else if you fuck them." Huh? But it's probably my all time favorite horror movie. It matched so perfectly what I find scary about dreams. The whole thing felt like all my worst nightmares. 
I saw this movie on the last day it was in the theatre. I was the only one in there. I knew nothing about it. I just assumed the footage was real. At the end, I was so terrified that aliens were real that I sat in the parking lot on Google for 20 minutes making sure that movie was fake. I'm a grown ass man, and I don't scare easily (or much at all, really). To this day, I have tricked 4 of my friends into watching it with the pretense that the footage is real. 2 of my friends - also grown ass men - had nightmares. Good times. 
I'm forever torn on the ending. On one hand, it was powerful, bold, and *really* sticks with you. Like, forever. On the other hand, it's *really* sticks with you. Like, forever. 
I really liked this movie, just saw it recently. Great atmosphere, great period acting. 
I was skimming this thread HOPING someone would mention Signs. I have never been so terrified. I actually have chills reading the scene you mentioned because THAT was the one that took me over the damn edge. I absolutely love that movie, but hell if I'm ever going to watch it again. My family loves teasing me with it though. "Don't look in the pantry, Father...." nope nope nope nope nope! 
I was going to write this. I watched that while working an overnight and at three in the morning the disturbed feeling was super super real. That movie is eerie as fuck and way scarier than any slasher film I've seen. I really like how he starts out being portrayed as sort of socially clueless and intense but just driven for success. I sort of wrote off some of his creepy behavior as him being socially inept. As the movie went on I realized he knew *exactly* what he was doing and just didn't have empathy or care. It was a terrifying crescendo. It's one of my favorite movies that I'll only watch once. 
"Why are you doing this to us?" "Because you were home" *shudders* 
To be fair, he said without resorting to jumpscares and this one is pretty jumpscare heavy. Still uses them well though. 
Thats why they added these very long "Part One" , "Part Two" blackscreens, so that we'll see ourselves in the black mirror. 
I can't bring myself to watch another episode. It is that unsettling to me. And the major reason is: I know these horrific stories are completely possible. They don't write a frontend in visual basic to locate an ip address that's 666.553.343252.23423. They don't "zoom in and enhance". I was impressed by their accuracy. And not only technological accuracy. Socio-political accuracy as well. I love-hate this show. 
Everyone in my theater was silent afterward. It was very strange, but I think everyone felt heavy. 
Now Mark Zuckerberg is *everyone's* photo technician! 
Robin Williams is typically light hearted a goofy in movies, especially since he is a career comedian. They probably walked into this not knowing to expect a different kind of performance, only to learn that Robin Williams is an extremely malleable actor that is extremely talented. I don't think people expected Robin to play such a creepy character, so they wrote it off as bad when really it's a fantastic movie. 
I've bought a cheap Jacob's ladder and I agree they are surprisingly unsettling 
I've seen Jacob's Ladder, so I feel like I should never take a hallucinogen, because all that imagery is rattling around upstairs still just setting me up for a bad trip. 
To be honest that is the only book that has made me "jump". Don't want to spoil it for anyone but there was definitely one part in the book where I was filled with hope and excitement only to be utterly terrified at the next scene. 
It was 100+ degrees the entire time they were filing it in Texas. The movie sweats. The terror is sweltering. 
That's why it's so scary.. There's seemingly no motive for the killings. They just like to kill people! 
Yes yes, Leatherface has no care about being caught or what will happen next after Sally tells the police about that messed up family. He reacts like a child that was just trained to slaughter. 
The lack of actual gore is a testament to its genius. 
but none of the jump scares in that film feel like they were put in there just to make you jump, they feel more natural. More like "somebody kicked a door down in the corner and it startled me" vs "The camera panned around and suddenly there was a face right next to the camera and it screamed and I screamed, and everyone was screaming." 
(Serious) Yeah, that's the closest any movie's come to switching its entire genre within a minute 
The crawling around in the airduct Jumpscare is definitely up there...but it's not cheap. You kinda expect it to come. However, the worst part of the movie is when you know it's coming, and you can see it... 
I've always been a huge fan of the Alien movies and Alien Isolation was the first (and to date the only) game I bought on launch day. I love it. I love everything about it. It really brings the original movie's feel and atmosphere to the gaming community and I love how every corridor, every computer, every technology is just right out of the movie. Sadly, I haven't finished playing it, yet, in fact I didn't make it too far at all (no spoiler) but went "nope nope nope nope nooooope" the first time the xenomorph actively comes down to the playground and the real "I'm gonna screw you and your mind up real good" starts. Still I love it! And have no regret buying it. 
I love Tilda in it. She was fucking fantastic! I got stressed watching her driving around without saying anything. I am ambivalent about how I feel about her character though. I feel sorry for her but at the same time I feel like she demonised Kevin a lot. I'll stop here coz idk how to do a spoiler tag on mobile and I might reveal important plot points. 
To be fair, you may be thinking of one of the posters for it that does make it look like a comedy. My wifi is shit right now so I'm having trouble linking it, but it's the one where Tilda and JCR are sitting in what looks like a waiting room with the title above them in big block letters, which is a pretty common "comedy" style poster. 
I didn't know what it was about before I saw it. First half builds anxiety with touches of eerie and possible fantastic elements, and right after that scene, everything devolves to a rush of adrenaline. I love this movie. 
Can you believe that bitch lied about which cave they were going to? Fuck her! 
It held up pretty well. Read the book. The book adds a lot of context to what the actual events are they talk about. A lot of regular normal people saw and experienced a LOT of weird stuff right before the bridge collapsed. The book is good if you like UFO mysteries. 
I was holding my ex's hand during that part. We both jumped a bit and recoiled. He ended up snapping my wrist. I sat through the rest of the movie with a broken wrist. 
Scary and heart-breaking at the same time. This is what I want in horror movies. Scary with a story. 
When he is slowly walking up the stairs "Wendy. Let me finish. I'm not gonna hurt ya. I'm just gonna bash yer brains in". And he slides between such an eerily calm delivery to growling and back again in a way that is some of the best acting I have ever seen. 
Okay, but don't you agree that it's way too good of a film to say it resorts to cheap jump scares? And the jump scares aren't what makes the film so scary imo 
I haven't watched that movie in about 2 years but as soon as I read that line, I literally got chills running up my spine. 
Excellent point. The blood jumping out of the petri dish is one of the most effective "jump scares" in the history of cinema, frankly. 
"*I* drew those posters." By the way, that's the guy who voiced Roger Rabbit. 
I love the part where a man offers to drive a woman and her baby to the next gas station. The expression of the woman after we see the reflection of the station passing by in the windshield is just genius. 
Okay I've had the "making up a song about Coraline" part stuck in my head for like three days now 
I like the 80's horror movies (esp since when I was scared of any movie as a kid, my dad and I watched horror and action movies from the 80's to show me how funny they are without audio!), but I HATE movies like "The Hills have Eyes" specifically for the rape scene. I mean, c'mon. That movie was fucked up enough as it was, but adding a rape scene just disgusted me. 
It's even worse when he snaps out of it and realizes what's happening. 
Yeah literally they made a jump scare out of a door opening in that movie. That pissed me off. Still very good at building the impending dread though. Their situation just gets worse and worse and worse. 
Wonderful movie! I highly recommend another orphanage ghost story, The Devil's Backbone. 
There were two reactions I saw to that movie coming out into the parking lot. One was "that was stupid " and the other was "can you walk me to my car? " I was in the second group 
This is my favorite comment on this thread so far :D. I don't scare easily either; went to see this movie with my sister when we were on a girls' night. We planned to spend the whole evening in the city enjoying ourselves, but when the lights came up and the credits rolled, we looked at each other, nodded, and silently went back to the car so we could drive home and barricade our house against invasion. 
I went it pretty much blind, and I'd definitely recommend people do the same. All you need to know is that it's a very, very tense movie - so be up for that. 
I was on edge expecting Goodman to dunk him face-first in the acid but no, *pop* and he was gone like that. 
It also ended "openly"...and I absolutely loved it. We watch the main character go from absolutely helpless and easily killed to...a heroine of epic proportions giving her a role in future Cloverfield stories. 
I think Goodman seeming like such a kind and gentle man only contributes to how menacing he seems in the movie. 
Stephen Kings short story of 1408 scared the dogshit out of me. It was just forty something pages. But it was psychologically intense. 
Recently, the movie "31" came out, and I was shocked at how infrequently Richard Brake blinks during the entire thing. He performs an entire monologue at the beginning of the film without blinking once. 
That's the part that really fucked with me. There are actual psychopaths out there. This could happen to anyone. 
My parents saw 'cartoon' and thought I could watch it. It wasn't until about halfway through the movie they figured out that 8 year old NothingEverWorks shouldn't be watching this and he is now crying uncontrollably because he understood it. Was traumatized for a while over the horrors of nuclear war. 
Yeah, I made the mistake to watch *Threads* first. It made *The Day After* look quite upbeat, actually. (And yes, I'm serious. *The Day After* retains some optimism, comparatively.) 
Kind of like Bryan Cranston. I spent the first few episodes of Breaking Bad wondering why Walt hasn't done anything dumb and goofy yet. 
Another one is "Final Cut". His SVU episode based on the Milgram Experiment was good too. 
WHAT IS HAPPENING? Is it flipping? Flowing? FALLING?!?!? DAMN THIS MYSTERY OBJECT 
You just sort of assume it's always sweltering in Texas, doesn't matter the time of year. 
I expected to hate the TV series. But Mads did a great job concealing the monster that his character was with a serene and confident exterior. Some of the CGI and first season "Killer of the Week" stories weren't great, but overall it was FAR too good and high concept for network television. 
That's what made Lecter scary. Not the fact that he could easily overpower most people without breaking a sweat. The fact that he *didn't need to*. The fact that, given enough time and the right environment, he could simply convince someone that it was a good idea to let him eat them. 
Yeah, that one is kind of just tying that whole scene together. You know he is gonna die, it's just up to the Alien to make its appearance at that point. 
that's because The Swintonator is a goddess among mortals 
I can't imagine what it must be like to be in her shoes. Even from an incredibly young age Kevin seemed to know what he was doing in regards to how he was around his father, to make it look like the mother was always at fault. Imagine the mental battle of "my child hates me" and "but he's only young so I must be mad." 
It's fleshed out much better in the book. The book make you realize more why Kevin is how he is and his dynamic with his mother. I feel the movie went for the more classical mysterious monster for no reason type thing which is never the case in real life. 
On subsequent watches you'll notice that a lot of the cave creatures are visible in the cave before the big reveal. Usually only partially or for a second, so they look like normal cave fauna to the unaware. Good movie. 
And *The Innocents* is the movie version of Henry James' *The Turn of the Screw*. Such a creepy, unsettling story. 
Someone in a similar thread pointed out that Jack Nicholson doesn't blink at all during that scene, went back and watched it and got even more freaked out. Seriously creepy shit. 
Totally. That movie is so great at establishing a slow-burning sense of isolation and fear (and just a general feeling of "off-ness") so when the typewriter moment comes it's a perfect moment of true horror. Ugh, It makes me sick to think about it even now. 
Oh, yeah, of course. Its one of my absolute favourite 'slow burn' suspense movies. I guess I'm more just pointing out that even the best suspense movies like *Se7en* will have at least one jump scare, even though it was unnecessary to the vibe of the movie, IMO. It was the stuff you didn't see that horrified you. You had to imagine John Doe doing all these acts just based on the end result and crime scene photographs. 
From what I understand, that "dog" was acting like that because it was half wolf and in a terrified state. It was confused and scared, so it went into super quiet stealth mode. 
Palmers face just before they test is fantastic. A resigned "Oh fuck." What's more terrifying that it's the Alien impersonating him so well it's got his goddamn mannerisms. 
Yeah. They are frightening because something unexpectedly terrifying just happened. Not because the music swelled and a cat jumped out of a closet or some shit. 
Yes jump scares aren't in and of themselves cheap, they are only cheap when a shitty director doesn't know how to build tension, so he has the characters go around a lot of corners and through a lot of doors, making you scared of the jump not the actual danger. The defibrulation scene doesn't count, because you're not expecting a jump scare, the jump scare creates the tension, rather than there being tension waiting for the jump scare. The petri dish isn't cheap because you have this double level, of who is the alien, and will the test even work. Not just that but the tension is entirely based on plot and character development, not just "Fuck, something's gonna jump around that corner" When I first saw the Thing it didn't even feel like a horror movie to me, because it was so well-executed I didn't sense any of the standard horror movie tropes. It just felt like a horrifying movie, not a horror movie. 
Check out Kubo and the two strings if you haven't already. Made by the same studio and has a similar animation too. (The aunts are also pretty creepy) 
In an interview, the guys who adapted it added the little boy so coralline wasn't just talking to herself the whole time. It made for a better movie, but the book was perfect 
It caught me off guard. No jumpscares for the entire movie then one out of nowhere. 
I know every other form looked normal but for some reason the huge guy had like no eyes and it was terrifying 
I've never felt so on edge watching a movie but absolutely enjoyed it. Perhaps one of the best recent movies out. Ending was a bit on the cheesy side but I still would recommend for others to see the movie. 
She was an awesome heroine, I love how she wasn't a helpless idiot, like so many other women in these types of films. She actually used her smarts and figured out ways out of things. 
Yes! the short story was crazy good. I was kind of disappointed with the movie adaptation though. 
That's really weird, man. Who'd be into that kind of stuff? 
Had a friend argue that it ruined it for him. That there was no motive. I argued thats what made it horrifying. That there was no motive. Pure, unadulterated, opportunistic, random evil. 
That's not a bad thing to be traumatized about. The threat of nuclear war was serious business. 
Well, he did decide to manufacture and distribute Meth, that's pretty dumb. 
Kathy Bates seems to have really found her niche in American Horror Story. Love all her AHS characters. 
Further, he laments that he does not remember writing the book Cujo. He was drunk throughout the entire writing of it 
That first season is some of the best television horror I've ever seen. They did a great job. 
There's a line from the Hannibal TV series that simply states "Hannibal doesn't use coercion. He uses persuasion" 
That voice is so memorable. You can't hear it and not associate it with Bill. I remember watching Joy Ride and immediately being like "oh well fuck that" when his voice came over the CB. 
Alien: Isolation nailed it, but you'd kind of expect it to, considering. 
Im a very nervous person, started playing isolation twice, had to quit both times due to frighth diarrhea. The sound design in that game is horrifying 
I actually lost sleep after watching that movie. It's so deeply disturbing. 
It sounds like something that will intrigue me while simultaneously fucking my head up, which is sadly the kind of thing I like to read 
Yes, but she chose and planned for her daughter. Kevin was instantly regretted from the moment she had sex without contraception. She was terrified when she found out she got pregnant from it. Her entire pregnancy was a completely different experience than with her daughter. Same with the birth. Reading the book gives so much more detail to her thoughts and feelings behind everything. I really recommend it. The movie was good, but the book just gives you so much more. 
I clearly remember the scene where the heroine is alone with a lake separating her from "something", but I thought it was the only occurrence before the ultimate selfie. 
From what I understand, that "dog" was half alien and bursting open. It was wanting to kill people, so it went into super splatter mode. 
I love the tension everyone else has too in that scene, implying some of them aren't even sure about whether or no they're the alien. 
I read an interesting theory about the end when they sip the whisky...well, they filled all the other bottles with gasoline...and the thing has no idea what gasoline tastes like so takes a big swig and the guy next to him realizes who/what is next to him. The guy who posted it originally was much more compelling...it's been about 20 years since I saw the film and I'm not sure about the specifics. An interesting read, though, if you look it up. 
A lot of adaptations struggle with how to handle a character's *thoughts*. Changing it to dialogue is one way, narration by the character's voice is another, but it's difficult to do right. For example, the Hunger Games book had the chick go through a lot of indecision around Peeta, trying to figure out if she gives a shit about him or if it's all for the camera, slowly building until that one moment where there's a cannon shot and she without thinking says "Peeta!" And realizes she does care. In the movie you get none of the indecisiveness. She's a bitch to him and then they have a couple bonding scenes and then she loves him. The same scene with the cannon shot and her being all concerned doesn't really mean anything. 
Does the ball hitting the bathroom window not count as a jump scare? 
The It that appeared in her kitchen was the scariest to me. She was like pissing herself and missing teeth and she just looked wrong. 
That film is so underrated. Hugh Jackman and Terrence Howard also give amazing performances in it. 
Bates' very next movie was Fried Green Tomatoes. She was nothing but a sweetheart in that one. Although she does go a little psycho in the parking lot hehe 
I think cocaine was the bigger problem while writing Cujo iirc 
I couldn't believe it was cancelled when they announced it, it had amazing reviews, just a small audience. 
If you jack the brightness way up you'll see them in the background a lot easier. This is true in Quarantine and the Friday the 13th films as well. 
Absolutely. They caught that a brief amount in the fillings scene in the 2011 version... some of them clearly have that "How the fuck do I even know?!" look on their face (Chris Hulve sure does!) Naules at that point looks like he's just going to die regardless, the reactions and breakdown in the psyche of all of the guys is fantastic. "Now, I understand you gentleman have been through a lot lately... but I'd rather not spend the rest of the winter TIED TO THIS FUCKING COUCH!" 
Me too, man.. I'm so heartbroken by finding out all my goal bodies were roiders telling me all I had to do was work hard. 
His eyes changed depending on how he was interacting with reality. The reality he was facing was dependant on wether or not he was taking his medication. 
Seriously though, these guys sold that tension. if this wasn't viewed by everyone at the time as one of those cheap special effects block busters these guys would probably have gotten awards for properly showing that tension and fear from this scene alone. 
Then Tom Hardy comes along and says "i did steroids of course" Paraphrasing. 
Bobby, deh ever catch dat gorilla that busted outa da zoo and punched you in da eye? 
Do you see what happens when you FIND a STRANGER in the ALPS!? 
In a way... I'm kinda glad they didn't? It'd a cult classic. If it'd have had a blockbuster we'd have got The Thing: Reloaded and the such. 
I have serious respect for people who are open about their steroid use. The deception and lies spread by "fake-nattys" disgusts me, though. 
individuals, maybe they would think it's odd after a couple days. But having that translate to a global understanding and acceptance is unfathomable. 
You think this is funny but there are like 10 people with bleeding noses reading this and freaking out 
Good in theory, but as a nurse most people in the hospital aren't really sneezing. My thinking is that a day care worker or elementary school teacher might notice it first. Or someone with a severe allergy to cats or something. 
I sneezed this afternoon, so we're probably good. For now... 
That'd be good. At the end all of the soldiers put their weapons down as a sneezing man comes staggering out of the building. They weep. 
This was my first interpretation of the question as well. You've got that tickle in your nose, but your body is powerless to take care of it. Your eyes are watering, your sinuses are stinging, every breath you take leads to a tiny prickle of pain... I think we'd notice pretty quickly. 
I would realize pretty quickly because of this. With all the snow reflecting the sun in my face I'd be the savior who figures it out. 
I am right there with you. Fuckin love it. Especially when you sneeze like 5 times in succession and your eyes water and your nose just goes numb, like you didn't even have one. 
I wish! At least once a year I have a horribly painful hiccuping episode 
- Updated localization files someone please get the reference 
Same deal here. First time I walk out on a bright day, I'd know. 
I'd say with social media and people writing about anything, it wouldn't take so long before it gets in the news. I'd say a week or 2. I can picture a bunch of people on twitter or facebook: "Wow fantastic, I haven't sneeze in days" Then slowly they would notice each other's comments. Then some not so important blogger would write about it. Then more and more important blogs would, then celebrities would come forward. And Bam! People listen to celebrities's shit. News start talking about it and people get scared. Studies starts around the world. 
I can just imagine telling my grandkids about the golden sneezing days of yore. 
it'd take like a week max. sick patients that sneeze no longer sneeze. allergy sufferers no longer sneeze. social media connects us all easily. it would get noticed, go viral, and it wouldn't be hard to test the results. i think you're looking at 3-5 days for the general global community to be aware. 
I mean, there is literally people with conditions that make them sneeze constantly, if all of these people (idk how many there are) just suddenly stop, people are going to talk, not to mention tissues won't be sold, nurses around the world are bound to notice some weird shit is up. I think a week at MOST, for the civilized world to know about it. 
You guys should check webmd just in case. For the lazy bloody nosers that don't want to, I'll spare you the trouble. It's brain cancer. 
A friend of mine has this thing that when he gets stressed his nose starts bleeding and he has to sneeze. Doesn't help with the stress. 
Yeah, it would definitely be all the people with allergies first 
Well, *someone* is bound to overreact though. *This lack of sneezing is mentioned indirectly in Revaluations! The end is upon us!* 
It's actually identical to the last season of Torchwood... But with death instead. 
I think you're lying because I can't remember the last time I sneezed. OP is clearly a rogue government scientist that has decided to tell everyone the top secret research that governments perform to maintain control of the world. 
I can't wait to see the cinematography for that. A 10 minute long shot of Clive Owen walking with someone sneezing and everyone staring. 
Same here. I think that's how it would work. People with allergies would realize within a couple days, comment on it to other people, other people would start going "you know, I haven't sneezed in a while either" and word would spread until it became clear. 
How do you know that wasn't the last sneeze ever? You could have been the last person to sneeze. 
Some people are just loud sneezers, you judgmental fuck. 
Fuck that. Shoot him!!! We don't want that shit spreading!! 
I feel like Reddit would though. The only other platform I think might know sooner would be twitter 
I read this without noticing the exclamation mark. "I wish, at least once a year, I have a horribly painful hiccuping episode. 
It's an actual observed phenomenon called photic sneezing, or Autosomal dominant Compelling Helio-Ophthalmic Outburst (ACHOO) syndrome. (I'm not making that up.) It's not well understood, but it affects 18-35% of the population and can be genetically inherited. Source: the totally credible sources that the Wikipedia page uses. Also, my nose. 
I just keep thinking about what it'd be like trying to explain sneezing to my kids. "Daddy tell us again what it was like, in the before-time." "Well, kids, your nose would feel kind of funny for a second, then there'd be like, a nose-explosion that you can't control, and you sometimes involuntarily made a sound like, 'achoo,' and then you just went on with your day." "And what caused it?" "Cats, for some people. Pollen. Too much pepper. Sexual arousal, for one guy I knew in high school." 
I couldn't help singing it to myself out loud as soon as I saw it. 
You guys don't wipe anything other than sperm and snot? 
Do people blow mucus everywhere when they sneeze? That's never happened to me. 
"Huh, that's funny, I'm *not* miserable right now. Something's not right..." 
And his time to shine would come. He would be world famous, and die surrounded by loved ones and admirers. 
TIL the Bible has a section about adjusting the value on things 
They would, but lacking the ability to sneeze, while annoying, isn't life threatening. So while they'd notice, it'd be slower, as developed countries tend to have a higher availability of care and they're likely to have more important things to worry about than lack of sneezing. Not being able to sneeze would be odd, but when you've still got epidemics of TB and Polio, then it's pretty low down the list of things that you report to the WHO. 
Can confirm. I'm high right now and I think this is some profound shit, man! 
I sneezed earlier today as well.. Has anyone sneezed since then? 
people terrified inside of a car while people toss boxes of kleenex and bottles of dristan at the car's front windshield. 
Conspiracy . .there is no conspiracy here.. *waves hand like a jedi* 
I've been sneezing all day because I caught a cold, but now I'm not sneezing anymore. I could get used to this whole no sneezing thing. 
yep, worst case just turn the flashlight on your phone on and point into your eyes 
The sun for me, and some people after they clean their ears they sneeze. It would sound very strange trying to explain it. 
His nose bleeds when the beard requires a sacrifice. 
eh-eggs..? Why would there ever be...that's so wrong. I'm gonna go blow my nose now. 
No, you're still miserable but now it's even worse because you *can't sneeze*. You don't *lack* the symptoms or need. 
For that one moment he gets to be the guy at the beginning of a movie who wears a lab coat and gets to make press conference speeches. 
Aw, what a sweet thought. Thank you! Here's some gold. 
Its the Ferengi edition. Goes well with the Rules of Acquisition. 
I sneezed less than an hour ago. We need to set up a headquarters to monitor and lapse in sneeze reports. [6] 
Well you wouldn't know about how many people smoke weed and don't tell you, because well, they don't tell you. 
have not sneezed sense op posted, so i think we can safely say humans can no longer sneeze, confirmed here first 
The sled in the middle of the room was the jigsaw killer the whole time too. 
Hahah, I've done that too. I think what makes us look even more like fools though is when we're out in public and randomly start making faces at the sun. At least I can explain myself if I've told someone to look at the sun XD Although they don't usually believe me, so I guess I do still look like a fool lol 
"I'm going to make myself sneeze on live camera. AMA" But seriously, am I the only person who twists a tissue into a gentle rod to poke the upper inside of my nostril to force myself to sneeze? When I notice that it doesn't work, I'll be completely convinced that all universal sneezery has been eradicated. 
I have something very similar but it happens when I'm thinking about making a sexual advance. It's very specific, I can imagine sexy stuff and nothing happens but if I'm lying in bed and I get the idea to make a move on my wife some wire crosses and I sneeze and I hate it. 
This post would be longer but I kept getting auto-corre 
Oh God it'd just be the eternal need to sneeze, but you never could 
If everyone in the world stops sneezing, I'm pretty sure "world's foremost expert on sneezing" would have all the work he wants. 
They are both symbolic numbers. 7 is a sign of completion or fulfillment, and 40 is a sign of renewal or cleansing. There are a lot of symbolic numbers in the bible. 7, 12, 40, 3, 6, 50, 10 and others. 
Or is the past merely the future with the lights on? *~+44* 
I just sneezed. And will probably sneeze again within ten minutes. Yay, allergies! 
Did i read the word confirmed? HL3 (fingers crossed) 
the jigsaw killer was only pretending to be the handicaped killer from scary movie, he was in fact Keiser Soze. 
Wait do you have a source for this? I'm a little concerned my superpower is going to affect my future career now O.o 
And then as soon as you sneeze she's like "Not tonight honey, I have a headache." 
I think this is the real answer to the thread. It'd probably take about 3 hours for the public to notice and the realization to spread that more and more people are riding the edge of glory in sneeze-limbo. Maybe, ten minutes in the hospitals and schools for the nurses and teachers to notice every other person with a sinus affliction all complaining together that the sneezes just won't come. This would make a weird movie. 
If Man is five, and the Devil is six, then God is seven. 
What is this from? It sounds really familiar minus the sneezing part. 
Yeah, my impression (from Bible school as a kid) is that in Middle Eastern tradition the number 40 is used kinda like how we would use "a million"... it's not a literal million, it's just a large number that we use to indicate "a lot" of something. Also kind of like the fictitious numbers we use to indicate something that's really really large, but an unspecified amount, like "a zillion" or "a bajillion". "And then Jesus walked into the desert for like, a million days." "Moses and the Israelites wandered in the desert for a bajillion years." So "40 days and 40 nights" is really just "a lot of days and a lot of nights", and "Ali Baba and the Forty Thieves" is closer in meaning to "Ali Baba and the Fuckton of Thieves." 
That's how we'll know. People who have allergies won't sneeze. They'll be the first to know and soon the world 
Yep, Confirmed HL3, picture Lord Gabe sitting at his desk writing dialog for the game windows open listing to Born Free, all of a sudden he has a sneeze attack and sneezes all of his work on HL3 out the window. Now before you have a stroke, know this cant happen now because we are free of sneezing. 
that the strange planet ruled by apes was, in reality, the sled. 
Go to the wiki, click the first footnote link, and you'll find the synopsis for the article written on the flight risks of pilots who shows signs of being in that 18% - 35% 
Does anyone else love sneezing? It geeks to good as a release when you finally get it 
I was Googling for Bible verses when I had to sneeze. Now you've seen it again. 
Why is the Devil afraid of God? Because God eight nine...wait 
It's probably from Monty Python and the Holy Grail, the Holy grenade part. 
I like your optimism but i still need confirmation. please gabe just say yes or no. 
You can also reduce the cool down time by selecting 'munchies' from the inventory tab 
No call / no show sneezes will be billed a penalty rate of 25 sniffles. And don't go thinking your insurance company is going to pony up any kleenex, that one's on you. Literally. 
Thought you were a dude til the mascara part. Ehh, maybe you still are. 
Dry cleaning a whole suit is expensive to be fair, but damn lol 
He probably thought you were going for his cheek and missed. 
He and I could be friends. How can you pass up an empty pool cannon ball?! 
God... in middle school me and my best friend watched Scrubs all the time. We'd do a Todd high five in the hallways whenever we'd see each other, and one time the girl I had a crush on put up her hand like she wanted a five, so I smacked her hand as hard as I could and snapped... turns out she was waving to her friend behind me. I had forgotten until your comment.. 
Speaking from experience, odds are he probably got hurt a lot in life. I've had people flirt with me as a joke (and I knew it was a joke because she'd rejoin her friends, point, & laugh). That kind of treatment can build up and really damage your confidence and self-esteem. 
I had exactly this happen, but it was at my place. Eventually walked her down to her car at 2am and she turned around to give me a hug, but I was standing like five feet back by the curb waving goodbye. I knew I fucked up as these things were occurring, but that didn't stop me from fucking it up. 
I've been the guy in this situation more than once... I might be an idiot... 
To be honest, I'd think you were kidding unless I was your SO. It would be too awkward to walk in on you showering and be wrong. 
The only hint that is actually foolproof. Well done. 
I think some cases is about low selfsteem right? I used to talk with a girl online every day. And one day she told me "I love you". And I thought "no way someone can love ME", so I asked her "Is it a joke?" "Yes" And then I thought "wait what if she is serious" "are you sure?" "yes, it was a joke" Now I think maybe she felt I rejected her so she just make a save. 
I don't get it, who's that Matt? (not joking....please explain) 
I'm ashamed to admit I did something very similar to the eye thing 
My wife was very direct. Fuck me if I am wrong but do you wanna fuck. 
Honestly, I would probably do this just because I hate my landlord 
Jamie: I'm gonna fuck my sister. Avameow: Sooooo, you in the mood? 
I thought the dogs were in your living room for a minute and was confused. See what happens! 
She meant DnD, and was disappointed when you pulled out that weak shit 
You: *post a photo of you pet doing something silly* Him: "Hey remember that time you let me touch your boobs?" 
The arm thing is too subtle tbh. It could just be you being clumsy. Yesterday a girl I was sitting next to touched my arm three times in about a minute and the first two I thought might have been on accident, but the third time I said "what's up?" And she said that it was an accident. So yeah :/ 
I am so glad I read these posts when they come up every few weeks. The other week I had friends over and a friend of a friend lingered saying she was too drunk to go home. I offered her the couch and she replied "where's your room?" All of these posts flashed through my mind as I tried to figure out if it was a hint or not. Long story short, went for it. Got laid. Thanks, reddit! 
Sometimes Netflix and chill just means Netflix and chill... Doesn't it? ...Shit! 
I dunno man. I had a lady friend visit me in a different country while I was working abroad, share a bed with me for two weeks, and practically act like a wife with me. I told her I was into her and when I directly asked her if there was anything going on between us she said no. 
Nah, she doesn't think you're stupid. She's disappointed, but people are pretty familiar with the dangers of dipping your pen in company ink. You're not an idiot. The opposite really. Just keep her in mind if either of you leaves the company! 
...poor girl, that's like the ultimate rejection. JFC man 
It's ok...I can literally invite my husband to get in the tub with me, and he doesn't get it. Sigh.. 
Lol "Maybe she just likes sleeping naked and she moves around a lot." 
A girl in college asked me to study with her at her apt. At some point, she brought up PornHub and pulled it up on her computer. She said, "Omg! all these girls have weird nipples! Like who has nipples like that?!" I was confused af because I thought they were just normal. A few minutes later, I was like "ooh! Let me show you some of my favorite videos" She got super pissed at me and started calling me a creep. I got pretty defensive and eventually went home. Years later I realized that she was trying to show me her boobs..... 
What was he so engrossed in? Video game? Newspaper? 
You got zucced. But the only thing that got wet were your eyes. 
Fire is much more effective at keeping warmth than cuddles. That man's a keeper. 
My wife and I have worked out a code phrase, for when one of us isn't picking up on the obvious signals. We say, "Howdy partner." It's a quote from Shanghai Noon, and it works like a charm. 
also as a guy, its hard to tell to what extent that hint goes from a simple "i think you're a cool person and we should be friends" to a "you're pretty attractive and i wouldn't be opposed to having a relationship" to "perform intercourse with me" to "im being polite and keeping the party vibes up, but to be honest I am indifferent to you." its hard man. i can barely read books 
You find her and you explain it, you dense mother fucker. I NEED CLOSURE. THIS ISN'T ABOUT YOU. 
If I were in your shoes: "No thanks. I only wank during the afternoon" 
That would be my response if some girl kissed me at all even if we were the only people in the vicinity. "The light post is right there did you mean to kiss that?" 
This makes me sad because it's probably exactly how I my thought process would have gone 
I can just imaging that happening to JD, hilarious 
That or he is considering if he actually has feelings for you. 
She needs to take the guy's advice and just be straightforward about it. 
He probably has a major boner every time Hugo Weaving shows up on screen. 
Hahaha! Okay, I see your point. Counterpoint: I'm married to this guy. And I was married to him on every occasion of the above scenario. :P 
"Better not risk it, could be meant for someone else" 
We neeed way more context To judge this! Reddit detective here, I can't leave this case unsolved! 
What were you supposed to do? She said she wanted a closer look at the eyes. Problem, solution. 
I hear you. I've had bad landlords too. Unfortunately in this particular instance...our landlord was pretty great. 
If only you would have just pulled his dick out and started sucking it we wouldn't have to play these silly games. 
Having been in exactly that scenario in high school, I just started repeating "think unsexy thoughts" out loud over and over, it made her laugh 
Panic seems to be responsible for many of these stories going no where, but I panic too so I get it. 
That's pretty solid confidence. "Yeah I could do better than that and I don't even need to prove it." 
I looked in replies to find out why she was adopting out her dogs. 
This has been Late Night Dating Tips, with Reddit, thanks for joining us. 
I did this for shits and giggles to a friend's dog instagram. I sure hope that dog doesn't get the wrong idea. 
And women blame us for being oblivious. We are, but still... 
Yes, Netflix and chill is what I do when my husband takes the baby out for the afternoon and I'm home alone. 
And with that all my previous suspicions have evaporated. Any and every conversation I was presently considering to have had sexy ulterior motives was actually just normal friendly conversation. 
Yep, that's my husband. I've tried being coy and he picks up on it like 30% of the time. I've gotten to the point where I just say "Wanna go fuck?" rather than being coy. Works like a charm. 
*goes upstairs and turns the game on that tv instead* 
If your guy is still not getting the hint, try placing your vagina *around* his penis. With many men this may quickly result in arousal. 
Guys are also super terrified of being branded a creep for seeing bedroom-eyes where there are none. 
"What time are you coming in tomorrow?" "Around 6. What about you?" "I've always been here." 
That's what people I've spoken to have said, nothing more I can do anyway 
Teach a man to cuddle and he'll fuck for one night. Teach a man to fire and he'll fuck for life. 
Seriously. She said jump and he built a plane, overachiever in my mind. 
Yup yup yup, she's probably amazed at my fire building mad skillz. Wait, she's not smiling. Why is she staring at me? Oh shit. Did I take too long to build a fire? Is the fire not big enough? Is it TOO big? That must be it. Oh nonononono. She thinks I'm a wood wasting blockhead. I blew it. I'm never gonna get a girlfriend. Dude life sucks. I gotta go play counterstrike. *storms out of the chair into the night...* 
Can confirm, as I'm now realizing that I was in the same scenario not long ago and chose to painstakingly gather tinder and fire making materials, start and maintain a fire, and miss every hint she dropped. 5/7 would burn shit again 
*Build fire, demonstrate worth. Perhaps then female* will *be attracted to me.* 
At least you're a go-getter. Don't beat yourself up... 
Mine and my boyfriend's code in public is, "Wanna watch Predator?" 
Yea...that's a terrible hint, tbh. That would basically be screaming to me that it was a joke and to turn around/look away/give privacy. 
MICHEEL HOW ABOUT I COME INSIDE FOR A CUP OF NIIIIICE, HOOOOOT COFFEE?! *youre a wonderful man nico, tell me wonderful things!* 
Dont worry. I can mostly read books, and I havent really figured it out either. 
Seriously. Most of the times guys think "she's totoally hitting on me/giving me a sign." But we're afraid of being wrong and looking like an ass. 
"So where are you sleeping tonight?" totally sounds like she's making sure you have plans to sleep somewhere else. If a friend is drunk at your place and you want them gone before they crash there, you would ask, "So who's driving you back home?" 
Hahaha, I have an SO now so that's a ship long sailed...I also wouldn't know how to find her if I wanted to. Last I heard from our mutual friend, she went to Asia to teach English. 
Yeah, she could have made a move. Just enjoying someones company is not a clear mating signal. 
And also ask the guy in a way that is **not** hypothetical. 
"So she's sucking my dick and I'm here thinking, 'Does she like me, or...'" 
He didn't know he could do it doggy style so you could both watch X-Files 
My first time I swear the entire time up until we were actually fucking, and I mean up until I was balls deep I doubted she wanted to actually have sex and thought it was just some joke and she would stop joking before I did. Welp, neither stopped joking for 3 years after that. 
I used to have bad landlords. I still do, but I used to, too. 
Or it sounds like he interpreted it as previous boyfriends couldn't last more than two minutes into *Aliens*, the filthy casuals. 
I dunno... I've seen the movie Carrie. People be evil. 
I hate that. Or when you're deep in thought, staring into space and you realize that you are looking right at some girl and it's awkward 
We have a code now. "Want to take a nap?" The problem now with two kids, one a newborn, is I'm never quite sure if we are going to sleep or have sex until we get to the bedroom. Usually we have a nap and then have a nap. 
Ffs. I got all excited reading all these comments thinking I would act the next time something happend. It just took this one post for me to completely lose confidence. 
Every time I say "nope, no way she's actually hitting on me", I think back to the days when I would take advantage of the slightest hints and end up embarrassed and rejected. 
This exactly. Girls are still under the impression that the guy is just supposed to "act" on his urges and make a move. I've always been worried that I will cross some line that I didn't see thinking I was getting "make a move" signals. Girls, if you want to give signals do something physical like touching his hand or taking his arm. We will 100% get the signal if it's physical rather than verbal. 
But what if you're not good looking but can build an amazing fire?! 
The counterstrike part hit me in the feelz, back In the dial up days.... I had my neighborhood friend that I always hung out with. Always super weird flirty type shit.... I missed 100% of the hints growing up over the years with her sitting next to me while I pwned noobs. Then one night she attacked me forced me out of my chair we had some fun and the next day she said it was a mistake, we haven't talked since, that was about 12 years ago.... 10/10 still play counter strike to this day, my true love. 
I knew my LV. 99 fire making skill would one day come in handy [EDIT]: and then you can wrap her in your skill cape to keep warm [EDIT2]: wow, first time getting gold, thanks. May Saradomin forever guide your path:) 
I think that's for the best. He needs supervision. 
Ok so I think I've understood the "kiss me eyes" finally. When I feel awkward that they are staring at me I should kiss them 
Me and my girlfriends code is "Wanna go to the garage?" Because the first night in my bedroom she said, "So this is your bedroom?" And I said, "No this is my garage." 
As a military man, most of my 0300 coffees don't mean sex. They sure feel like it though. 
Look at you, Mr. Fancy Pants. I saw a book once. I've never even been close to figuring it out as well. 
Yea it was probably pretty dark in the room. maybe she couldnt see him. 
I don't think he was the one missing the hint there 
"She's probably just being nice, probably feels bad for me or something. It doesn't mean anything." 
You're 100% sure he got the hint? Some of these comments are making me wonder if that was enough. 
"Wow she's putting a condom on me, her commitment to a bit would make Don Rickles proud!" 
Good scenario: the girl's into you and you have a date to prom. Better scenario: a bucket of pig's blood drops onto you and you develop psychic powers. Win win. 
Oh god this is too familiar. You space out and come back to the wtf look. 
...guilty of this. When in doubt, I default to this. 
Well, yesterday I told a good guy friend of mine that I wanted to have sex with him. Just straight out. He was really surprised but hey, guess who got laid today? 
Mate you don't kiss the eyes. You're not ready for this at all. 
Healthcare worker. Coffee time is literally anytime. 
I was born illiterate. I hadn't seen the printed word until I was already a man! 
Yeah you really cant tell in this situation. Shes probably just canadain and beig polite. 
Sex happened so either he got the hint or just said "fuck it" and decided since the kids were outside and we were in the bedroom, why the hell not? Haha 
Well, from what I learned from others, it may have backfired more on her than on me. After I rejected her she got back with her boyfriend, and they dated for a few years. I'm not sure if they were together when he was arrested. She and her best friend stopped talking at this time too. I don't know if it had anything to do with me. I never told anyone about this incident. My thinking was that it was better that I lose my chance with her best friend than jeopardize their decade long friendship by trying to defend myself. There were plenty of other girls out there. 
Or "there's no way she's serious. Clearly she's joking and if I respond genuinely she'll think I'm creepy." 
She's probably just sucking my dick so she doesn't have to tell me what a loser I am. 
Married, with kids, pulled to bedroom by dick where you guys then have sex. "But is she *really* into me? I just can't tell!" 
Be the change you want to see. *raises arms above head and whirls tongue* 
Something VERY similar happened to me when I was a nanny. I dove over the island in the kitchen to slam my laptop shut to prevent kids from snooping. I then password protected my laptop. 
After my little girl's mum and I split up and I had her most of the time, being an apprentice with stupid amounts of bills I'd only normally cook dinner for my little girl (then 2) and I'd eat what she didn't. One night we had chicken bits I think? And I had a few and after I'd finish mine I looked at her eating hers and smiled at her, and she put some of hers onto my plate. I said " no you eat them" and she insisted. "You sure little bug?" (what I call her) and she said " yes! You are my daddy!!" I almost cried. Makes my heart melt 
I watched my own vasectomy, it was interesting. I was more concerned about the nurse...who I went to high school with and hadn't seen since. It was a bit awkward. 
My MIL passed away suddenly a few years back and I ended up being the one to go through her things for donations because my husband and SIL were too emotional. I found 2 whole drawers of sex toys and homemade porn that went straight into a trash bag and into the dumpster. Never told my husband. 
It amazes me how often people forward an email without checking the chain first. We've lost customers before because someone sent them an email not realising it'd been internal for a while and had all sorts of 'not for external consumption' content. Once it was just pricing information that showed we were charging a big margin on work for them, another time is was a straight insult. As the IT manager I get those questions like "can we stop it?" with such desperation in their eyes I feel bad telling them it's too late. 
At first I thought they were just super chill and open about this whole thing. Like I imagined it was 10am and you were helping a customer find some Code Geass manga and they just wanted everyone to check out their work. 
lol when my dad was in the US Army in the 60s he was stationed in Germany for a year and on more than one occasion they'd load up a missile in to the back of his truck and he'd drive it by himself to another part of the Country. All he had was a sidearm. I think security was really lax back then. Fun fact, he learned to drive in Germany in the US Army. Didn't have a drivers license or anything. They just handed him keys and he started driving around. He was irritated when he eventually got back to the States after a few years deployed and had to take the drivers test. 
i have never understood how you get a woman to fuck in the back of a van(excluding that pair in california). 
When I read this, I thought of a chemistry teacher for some reason, didn't realize it was alcohol until I read the thread. 
So I'm assuming as an 8 or 9 year old, you didn't know it was weed.. so when did you figure it out exactly? *15 years later, in bed sleeping...* You: . . . You: . . . You: . . *WAKES UP* IT WAS POT 
She could have been saying "it would fucking suck if I framed you as a serial cheater" 
When I was, I don't know, 6? I awoke to my mother trying to sneak a few dollars under my pillow. I then realized the tooth fairy was fake. I got SO MAD at her. I think I said "You've been lying to me for my whole life!" and didn't speak to her for a whole day. Still believed in Santa though. Of course he was real! 
"Damnit Britney, your sex doll cost us *another* sale! 
You and your friend were going to take a dump together. Damn. Friendship goals. 
Please tell me that they are on different sides of the family 
You know, my first thought is they were smoking pot or doing lines or something, or even simply sneaking cigarettes. Seems way more plausible she would risk doing drugs/smoking with a friend -which presumably all the adults there would be cool with and merely hiding it from the kiddos- than two adults fucking with their spouses and children all downstairs *and* you not overhearing a single moan or grunt. Not calling you a liar or anything, just thinking from our adult perspective. There's more grown ups do in secret than bone. 
Sex in the outdoors is awesome, just don't forget the blanket. 
He wanted you to find it, so you could get a raise. What a bro! 
I found my mom's vibrator as a kid. She told me it was a neck massager. I still cringe everytime I remember this memory. Btw, worst neck massager ever. 
My parents never allowed me to watch Ed Edd and Eddy. They said bad words like "stupid". 
14 is a very specific number. No more, no less? Exactly 14? I have to wonder, how did she establish that it was 14. Did he admit to 14, which would make the number suspicious. Or did she find credit card evidence of 14 transactions at 'Happy Hands Massage Studio.' Or what? Wow, I'm way too curious. I'm sorry you had to see those notes. 
Similar story: once I came home late at night when everyone else was asleep. My cat was sitting on the chair on the porch and there were about 5 or 6 strange cats sitting in the porch or the steps, all facing him. I watched for a moment and they seemed totally relaxed, all sitting with neutral body language. I took a step forward, they heard me and scattered in an instant, and my cat calmly asked to be let inside. He was fat, irritable, and a badass killer. I from then on assumed him to be some sort of cat mafioso. Happened in NJ btw. 
I have a similar experience where my mom refused to admit that Santa wasn't real. She had made the "To:" and "From:" labels on her computer to avoid us comparing "Santa's" handwriting to hers, but she accidentally left the program up when we came down the next morning. She insisted that Santa had used her computer. 
Man...I remember emptying my mom's purse out on her bed one time when I was a kid, and some condoms fell out. I'm being inquisitive, asking her what they are, I probably opened one? idk. Anyways, she claims they're balloons. And blows one up and ties it off. And that's how I got a balloon one summer day. 
I smoke cigarettes and it seems like the two coolest things in this thread were seen while people were having a light, but the coolest thing I've seen while smoking was two hobos fighting 
Dude, same here. I was too young to know just how low that number was but I knew it wasn't much. Thinking back, I have no idea how they fed and clothed three kids with that. Oh wait, I do. It's called credit card debt. 
That's when you show him some nudes of your girlfriend so it won't be awkward 
Well, thanks for giving all of us that mental image, I guess 
This reminded me of the time I pulled off some mission impossible level shit (at least to teenage me) with my dad. I put the slightest amount of some face cream I found in the bathroom -- not oily, but left the faintest residue -- on the TV remote buttons, and got him to put in his pin # to unlock his blocked channels on the cable box for me. I could see his fingerprints on the buttons and later while unsupervised, used that to figure out his code. 
You are not alone. I found out at the age of 20. My mom had started working night shift. My dad would be on his phone constantly, one night he came home and talked to someone all the way through dinner. I don't know if he thought I couldn't hear his headphones or what. One evening I went to use my parents bathroom and saw my dads phone open to a message. It said something along the lines of "I miss you so much" but wasn't my moms name. I'm the one who had to tell my mom. Had to hold her has she cried and had to face my dad when he came home. I thought he was going to hit me. I locked myself in my room for days. Only to come out when he was at work. They stayed together... I never had the same relationship with my father. Went to therapy for months. 
Similarly, Chris Pratt placed an order with us and i have his gmail address. i actually had looked the order up when i was investigating fraudulent purchases. People put in fake names sometimes. Sure enough, the address the package was going to was some huge mansion place so i deemed it not fraud. The email address is actually kind of funny, I'm sure he made it himself. No, I won't give it to any of you so don't ask. 
That's some Jason Bourne level shit for a middle schooler. 
To think bank robbers in movies lay these really elaborate plans to get into vaults, and then it turns out they could just go in early and see the combination for themselves 
That sounds exactly how my mom died. Staring up still me, then looking up beyond me, focused on something that only she could see. And then, the life left her and I could see that...like a light turning off. 
For some reason I absolutely think Ted Kennedy was f'ing with your teacher...totally a planned joke to freak out your teacher... I grew up with a very Irish Dad..the bullshit never ends 
Usually? So this was a habitual thing, and you didn't make a point to avoid it? 
We need a follow up. Does your mother know it happened? 
I looked it up. It wants me to confirm my city, with the only option being Detroit. Then it asks for my email. No explanation or details are given. I'm too scared to proceed any further. 
When locals in Mexico tell you a place is dangerous, you BETTER fucking listen to them! 
this one's kinda cute and not completely horrible compared to the others in this thread. the same thing happened to me when I woke up when my dad was putting coins under my pillowcase and taking the teeth for the tooth fairy away. 
Who has sex in their parents house with an unlocked door?!?! That's protocol number 1 for sex in the folks house rookie!!!!!! 
Nowadays you can just search on Goggle for nip slips. 
For the sake of my own sanity I'm choosing not to believe this. 
Hahahaha that's fantastic. Teach you to accelerate your child learning! 
Just curious. Did he actually ever mention anything like that to you or was this entirely something rabdom you decided to say? 
dicks are dicks, but the porn u end up at towards the end of a session... thats private! 
One thing I've learned is if it were socially acceptable, a large percentage of woman would prefer to be naked pretty much all the time. They probably would too if it weren't for all us men trying to mate with them. 
as someone who for several years could only afford to heat my house when my daughter stayed over, I know how awful it can be. Hope things are better for you, I'm lucky enough to be alright financially now 
My mom was helping her BFF and BFF's husband move, and when she lifted the mattress off the bed frame there was a small box labelled with my mom's name. She had never seen this box before, so she went and asked BFF about it. Apparently BFF and her husband had started "spicing things up" in the bedroom. The box in question was filled with sex toys, and they labelled it with my mom's name just in case something happened to the two of them; if their parents or children had to go through their things, they'd think the sex toys belonged to my mom. And now my (single, early 50s) mother has a cardboard box in her closet labelled with BFF's name. 
Because he knew how to *keep his fucking mouth shut*, capisce? 
The peasant! *At the diner...* He didn't pay his check. 
I'd guess it was trees. Possibly a makeshift arboretum of sorts... 
I don't think I was. She had a good 30 years on me, and never implied anything before or after. 
Yeah honestly I'm rooting for Team Dad here. I feel like it's a team effort in making sure he gets that nut. 
Or she was inviting him to dinner at Chuck N' Ducks 
"I taught gym back in the day. There were these two students in my class who were really strange and never left each other's side. One day, I was taking my lunch break (generally had to eat and shower at the same time because I don't have much of a break) when the weirdos come walking in together. They looked up to no good (they were about to head into the same stall), and it was especially odd because there were no gym classes during this period. I told them they weren't supposed to be there, and they got wide-eyed like I caught them doing something they shouldn't be and ran away." 
My best friend in my early twenties married his cousin. 
Yep, at family parties I regularly go up to my bathroom to smoke a bowl with various family members / friends. So if going into the bathroom with someone implies we fucked then I am one incestual whore of a man. 
Damn, I'm very sorry that you had to witness that. I morbidly think of how different/better/worse life would have been had she succeeded. My own mentality aside, if it weren't for her, I would have never come to America, but because of her she has single-handedly ruined my (half)brother's childhood, and in a way I basically had to raise a kid at 12 years old while keeping her bat-shit crazy ass away from him as much as I could. Families are fucking weird man haha. 
It's like when Daryl gets Michael to ask for a raise cuz they make almost the same amount 
Veteran here. VA mails me pills in an opaque ziploc bag with adhesive instead of the zip mechanism. No padding, easily tearable (thats how you open it), and is just loose bottles of pills shaking around inside. 
Did your parents also have to check parental reviews online before you watched anything? Yeah, I got made fun of a lot for that. 
When I was a PA I used to get sent spreadsheets from everywhere from my Manager which I then had to send out to the wider team. I always checked for hidden columns but also learned about hidden tabs. One time I almost sent out a spreadsheet to the wider team which had performance feedback per person and their ratings from their Manager and their peers. All this information was in a hidden tab. That could have been so damn messy. Silly HR. 
Haha. That reminds me of my brother who almost did the same. He found a pack of condoms in my dad's old jacket(coincidentally he was looking for chewing gum too) and he started blowing or filling them with water. When my mom came home he started asking why would they hide balloons from him. 
Honest to God, this happened once to a cousin years ago. My grandmother sold her home after my grandfather died, and my father, while helping clean out the place, made that joke to said cousin. Well, the cousin took it seriously and was found chewing a condom later. 
Shit man there are some days when I wonder how I'm able to feed and clothe myself 
"Hey, your daughter makes that same face! Lemme see if I have a pic..." 
OP saw a brush pass rather than a dead drop. Still, you're correct, in that people are not in the same place at the same time with a dead drop. 
you're not the only one. i found one written by my sibling from when they were very young. still really messes me up. i hope things are alright with you and your family, solidarity and all that 
I did something similar as a kid with an iPod touch. I wiped the screen clean before handing it over and could see the general directions their fingers were going but not the screen. When I got it back I could see the fingerprints and got the password in a couple tries. Felt like such a badass at the time, haha. 
I think highly technical parents is what breeds hackers. "Oh you gave me an account with limited domain rights and a web filter? Let's see how we can get around that." 
Though I'm Australian I was born on Papua New Guinea. A little while ago I couldn't find my birth certificate anywhere so I rang the hospital in PNG where I was born and gave them my name and DOB and my parents name. With little fuss I was just told to wire them $70 and they'd send me a copy. I then realised how easy it would be for me to steal someone else's identity either living or dead. 
We had the same friend group so it got passed on to them pretty quickly that I saw them. Those friends had my back and also stopped hanging out with them, which was nice. 
They usually don't realize it when you are hiding in a bush. 
I don't know if she knows, but everyone is still married so I suppose she don't know. For all I know I'm the only one who knows what happened that night since its not unlikely they where all blackout drunk. 
I believe the F-117 was responsible for a number of UFO reports before the government acknowledged its existence. 
Personally speaking, I was never to have my bedroom door closed growing up unless I was changing. Didn't matter what age I was. My mom threatened to remove the door when I wanted peace and quiet once and I had it closed. I actually live with my future in-laws currently and at first it weirded me out, because they give us *all* the privacy and don't bug us for shit. They don't come to our room whatsoever. We could probably die in there and they'd have no idea until our bodies started smelling. 
He's not wrong though! Edit : I mean he isn't wrong about sex being natural, not hugging your grandson with your dick that was just pulled out of your grandma... There... 
No kidding. There are so many logs generated for that. If it ever comes out, it is going to be pretty easy to find out it was you. 
That's sociopathic. I couldn't handle an affair to begin with, you have to be mentally fucked up to manage basically 3 families plus girlfriends. I knew a guy kind of like this, family friends. They had a normal life, big house in the OC, 2 kids, etc. Their life blew up 4-5 years back because he had another house and 6 kids with a woman 50 miles away. How the fuck... 
Yeah I'd rather anyone I know see me naked than have them know some of the shit I've gotten off to in weird moments. 
I've been the same for the past 4 years, I only put the heat on when she was with me, which isnt that often. For the past few weeks I haven't heard from her. I called her mother and she says "she doesn't want to go to your house to be cold and bored anymore". 
Holy crap, I would have done the same thing in your situation... ugh 
...and do you want to know something else?? I never liked your spinach puffs! *NEVER!* 
I'll do you one better. A friend of mine and his wife MET at a family reunion. Cousins. Same last name. Everything. I think they are at least 3rd or 4th cousins. But woah. 
I'm sorry this has happened to either of you. I can't imagine what walking in on any of that would be like. 
Haha he told Michael to ask for raise because Darryl himself asked Michael for a raise at which point he'd make more than Michael. One of my favorite episodes. 
What do you mean by hidden tab? A hidden sheet in the spreadsheet?? 
I found my mothers dildo and thought it was a big finger. Ran around the house screaming at people and pointing my "big finger" at them. 
to be fair, kids don't get that spoiled on their own 
"No, sorry, that's your wife again... hang on... I have your daughter here too." 
Thanks for saying that. I hope your sibling has recovered? My mother ended up pretty unhappy the rest of her life, unfortunately. She died ten years ago and I think she really wanted to go. If nothing else, I tried to not make the same mistakes with my kids as she did with me. 
In which case more power to them. It's like a red team/blue team but at home. I expect responsible disclosure though no telling your brother/sister until 30 days after you've told me how you did it. 
lol that's funny! What's your birthday again? I dont wan't to miss the party. And are your parents going to be there? I always loved your parents names but for some reason I'm forgetting. And weren't you born in a hospital with some cooky name?? Good catching up with you!!...... what's your name again? 
That is currently happening to my friend group we cut all contact with them 
I will do this, too. I don't even know what a wombat is, but I'm sure as hell gonna persist in saying that those fuckers ate my salad. 
Same for all secret aircrafts, its why UFO sightings change through the years. 
I used to fight with my parents about this but they eventually let me have my way. The issue wasn't so much that I was trying to hide anything... it was more just that they were loud as hell and I needed to close the door to be able to hear myself think. 
Yeah that stuff is stored in like 9 different places. If he used the email in his browser you can even find the cached page of that email. 
Yeh surely the mother could sue him or something . What did the divorce give the mother ? 
Seriously. How does one have the energy to do that? Much less the time and money. One kid is kicking my ass. 
I wonder what story they tell new friends and coworkers about how each met their spouse. 
"what are you doing?" "I'm declining to speak first" 
Yeah, right click where the tabs/sheets are at the bottom of an Excel document. If "Unhide" is selectable, it means there are hidden sheets in the document. 
Counterpoint, both my male cats are probably the best cats in the neighborhood. Everytime I get home there are multiple different female cats on my lawn waiting for me to let them go out. They are neutered though, so I guess they are just looking for a fling with my boys. 
"Whoops, that's your mom! Fiesty ol' gal, but not what we're lookin' for!" 
"I write secret messages on dicks, half in regular ink and half in permanent marker. It's for the CIA" 
Good to hear at least some examples of a group of friends doing this. 
Only the most adorable fat fucks to ever waddle the Earth. 
Yet the reports of anal probing stay remarkably consistent. 
This seems like a pretty clear case for alimony. The money and mistresses probably came out in the divorce lawsuit. 
"Met at a party" is incredibly accurate and easy to remember. 
And then there's the "very hidden" tabs you can only access by changing their property in the VBA editor.. 
"Isn't it amazing how similar they are from behind?" 
Woah, shit, you've got a keen memory. That was like 2 years ago. But yes, it was some dumb nazi death threat picture that I reverse image searched and found his Facebook from. Back in the good ol' days. 
i think it would be harder to explain why they're smiling as if for a photoshoot while being double penatrated. 
Special effects existed before Photoshop. A lot of the things you can do in photoshop have manual, physical analogues in film effects. 
I saved it so I can stat it up and use it in dungeons and dragons. 
Looks like it could be a cool drone or dark ambient album. 
It's real. Big farma doesn't want you to know how stackable animals are. #wakeup 
Yeah, the War of the Unicorn and Cat were dark times.... 
If someone would do this so I can add this to my ridiculous world leaders photoshop wallpaper collection, I would love it. 
Holy shit I've seen this picture many times but never realized it was the same guy 
Uhhhh, link anyone? My Drunken Fist has met its match in Google-fu. 
Either that or there are 99 more duck size horse behind that ridge. 
Nah obama isnt a dead pig so Cameron wouldn't want any of that 
There's another one that was even more popular. Like a day after 9/11, every one was showing an image of the towers with smoke billowing out of it that had a photoshopped "demon" face in it. People went crazy over it. 
They could just figure its a hat. Look what costume and makeup departments do for movies. Thats totally something you could do with practical effects. 
Humans. Guns. Bird. Shit. My grandmother used to tell me stories about the old days, a time of peace when Jesus kept balance between the birds and the humans. But that all changed when the humans attacked. Only The Bird mastered the black gun. Only he could stop the ruthless humans. But when the world needed him most, he vanished. A hundred years have passed and the humans are nearing victory in the War. Two years ago, my father and the birds of my tribe journeyed to Asia to help fight against the humans, leaving me and my brother to look after our tribe. Some people believe that The Bird was never reborn, and that the cycle is broken. But I haven't lost hope. I still believe that somehow, The Bird will return to save the world. 
I didn't know Germans crushed watermelons between their thighs in their spare time. 
SKRREEEEEEEE!! DONT LET YOURSELF BE KNOWN SQUAAAWWWWW 
It could be, Photoshop back in the early 1500's was called paint. 
Most of the top posts would be easy to explain without any knowledge of photo editing. Taxidermy would explain all the weird animals. Makeup and perspective tricks could explain a lot of the others. The Biden waifu thing would be weird I guess, though it would just make people think he's a weirdo who really likes anime character cardboard cutouts more than actually being unexplainable. 
Notice how Nico and Maki aren't creeped out. Maki is just chill about it, but Nico wants more attention. 
Theres a collection of photos of this strange man. Its called "art" 
Literal dodge and burn too, to blend edges and to counteract the the dimness on one side of an oblique projection. 
Me neither. The way the haircut looks different from every angle threw me off. 
Huh didn't know that was photoshopped I just thought it was confirmation bias or pareidolia. 
Yeah, this actually seems like the easiest to explain out of all the current top comments. 
For basic stuff like what coasterman posted (the uncle thing) that can be learnt in a day or less. 
Photographers hate him! find out his quick 10$ method to getting photos! 
WE MUST BRING DOWN ALL THAT IS NOT BIRD SCRAWWWWWW 
Leonardo Da Vinci created photoshop, after becoming frustrated with MSPaint. 
Semi-related: About 13 years ago one of my cousins was here, and we were just screwing around while I burned a CD on my PC... The disk finished and like usual, it was corrupted (That PC had a bad habit of doing that) So I bent the CD in half as a joke. He kept telling me "It's going to break" over and over. I managed to make both ends touch when all of a sudden it EXPLODED. A piece lodged itself in his forehead (Not very deep) and pieces were ALL OVER MY ROOM. Despite the fact its been 13 years, I just recently (About 5 or 6 months ago) found another piece of that fucking disk in my room. 
As in did I do it just for my reddit post? Nope. It's been there for years. 
It's funny how people don't know (or forget) that Photoshop and its tools have the names they have *because* it's supposed to be a digital photo shop. The same way Avid Media Composer (and Premiere to a lesser extent) and its tools we made to mimic/emulate a physical film editing bay. *cut, splice, split...* (same goes with almost any other digitized process, cut, copy and paste anyone?) 
**Casualties:** *10,000 rounds of ammunition, dignity* My sides 
GARGLE THE BIRDIES STAND NO CHANCE AGAINST POINTY STICK OF BIRD DEATH GAR 
I think Joe Biden must be a senpai, because I'm still waiting for him to notice me. 
That's not photoshopped, that's just Michael Fossum when it's not a full moon. 
Your point exactly. It's all because of when these programs launched, they were targeted for that industry. Using their terminology only makes sense. But now the history and context behind the terms is long gone for most. I remember when I was first learning avid in school, a foreign kid just couldn't understand why the terms were splice/ cut. While everyone else didn't even notice and assumed it was called those just because. 
The way that the mirror closes the loop is *immensely* satisfying. 
"On the plus side, Meredith's official report noted that his men had suffered no casualties." 
CAW CAW THE ALL FATHER WILL COME FOR YOU ALL CAWCAW 
We spell it like drawer in the US. Also, he's asking you if you're from Boston(in an exaggerated Boston accent) because they don't pronounce their 'r's. 
I saw a youtube video that I unfortunately cant find right now of an old graphic design artist showing how he used to make ads and such by hand. It was incredibly painstaking. Really interesting to see the techniques they used, and how much time it would cost you to just adjust the kerning or something. He was cutting and gluing letters and shit. 
Rewind and fast forward are particularly resilient. Even though DVD and CDs took over the tape media almost twenty years ago. Though, I did just rew~~m~~ind a VHS cassette last night. 
First one- &gt;"Not sure what you're talking about, need 40,000 examples." Second - &gt;Really good photoshop of Emma Stone's head on a body showing boobs Third - &gt;"I was thinking more the really bad ones, like this. [Picture of random low res doggy style with Sandra Bullock's higher res and oversized head photoshopped on.] This likely isn't perfectly accurate, I just typed it from memory. 
This would add another dimension to the character of Piggy 
I think that rock took one of those dimensions away from him 
If he says humbled twice in the same sentence, you have to snort it off a buddy's cock 
You could be drinking watered down hard lemonades and this game would still kill you. 
I'm preemptively cringing at the thought of him doing this. 
Whenever Trump says something you agree with, drink. It's only as dangerous as the rules make it. 
And instead of Simba, Joe Biden comes back in several years and fights Trump atop the burning White House. 
If you watched the RNC acceptance speech that's actually what he did. No idea if he actually wrote it or not, but if you want a preview go look it up, it was not the same as one of his rally speeches at all. Also a pitcher of beer isn't very much, it's like 3 and a half beers. I thought we were trying to get drunk here? 
I have been doing thaqw scnce the ellctionnn... Me poore livverrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrr 
For glorious orator, how do we know what's tangent and what's speech? 
he uses the word "very" more than an elementary schooler who hasn't learned enough adjectives 
Also pro tip: if you're underage, we all know that's never stopped you before. Knock yourself out. 
Or, if you can and want to, peacefully protest. A lot of cities will have small rallies and gatherings. 
Don't worry, you won't have to be concerned with money after drinking that much. 
Of all of these ideas, this one might be the fastest way to die. 
Hey makes it sound like he's saying vagina without the va. 
If they ask why you're stealing all the liquor, just tell them Kanye is Trump's running mate. They'll join in. 
Should do it with the requirement doubling every time, and that would still barely ward off alcohol poisoning. 
I think we've found the issue: His lexicon contains so few words that no matter what word(s) we decide to drink to, he'll almost certainly use them so frequently that there's a real likelihood we end up with alcohol poisoning. 
LOL. How'd I forget that one! Yuuuge mistake... my bad. 
You misunderstood. He's actually the best at dodging military service. That's what that meant. 
"I'm Donald Trump" (Weird_Fiches thinks about it, not sure he agrees) 
"Barack? Barack, wake up. we gotta go home. Barack?" 
Oh, no, it will still be in Trumpisms. It will definitely not be as eloquent. Believe me, I know. 
He's not an idiot. He knows his rally audience very well, and he knows who is watching what when he speaks. 
**A reply from Daddy Don:** "That's a tremendous question, very very tremendous. There's a lot of questions like that, and you know, I get a lot of the, but only the best, only the best of the best and the best ones are always the ones I remember, I remember this one friend, Paul, and Paul was a great guy, great great guy, really an amazing guy. He told me Donald, he told me Donald, you're by far the best candidate to be president, no doubt, you're the best candidate of all of them. And you know, it's something I realized then, you know, he was right. Tremendous guy." 
While the ruleset I've included might get you pretty hammered, this would kill even Andre the Giant. 
Fake News: Every time Trump criticizes major news outlet (e.g. CNN, NBC) as fake news because they wrote something he didn't like, take a shot. Orange Russian: If Trump mentions Russia take a shot. If he mentions Putin, take two shots. If Putin suddenly walks onstage, finish the bottle. 
You know there's a lot of research and complicated, very complicated stuff that goes on in the cyber, because it's made by very smart people. Some people once told me that China was the one that made it, but I look at them in the eyes and always tell them: "We're American, you can't fool us." Folks, we're at war, we are, we are, we're at war everywhere and there's people dying instead of being safe here with us, and having a tremendous time. Let me tell all of you something, I'm going to change all of it, I'll change things so much you wouldn't even believe, because I win, I win all the time. 
He uses it more than a valley girl with "like" and "literally." No offense to valley girls, I am one. 
You think he calls his wing dang doodle his Trump Tower? 
Can I get a small loan of 1 million bottles of tequila? 
I will be bothered, how realistic all of those looked and the power of photoshop. Talented and amazing but now I'm scared and scarred. 
I was going to say, that this wouldn't work in the reddest states. Then I remembered that Kanye is black. 
If two of those are together, the penalty is added then squared. All three, and you drink the whole thing. 
A word cloud of Trump's inaugural address compared to any other inaugural address would be interesting. It would be like comparing Dr. Seuss' vocabulary to Charles Dickens'. 
u/TheMalteseSailor forgetting catchphrases and utterly failing. Sad! 
It's like Head-in-a-Jar Nixon, only much more terrifying. 
It's okay, we can use it for 2024. Next election of course **has** to be "2020: Hindsight". 
"I am the President of the United States" *mournful sipping* 
This made me tear up. God I hate the feels I get from that part of the movie 
Funny enough, right now the odds on him saying "Fake News" are 10-1 against it. I put $20 on yes just for fun. I'm optimistic. 
I tested the drinking game on this and now I have cirrhosis. Thanks. 
**Everybody Drinks it:** Whenever Donnie says "Everybody says/does ____" Everybody drinks until he finishes that sentence 
It's like I'm listening to him. I'm nauseous now too. I'm sure that's just a coincidence. 
He probably has special ordered gold coloured condoms with his name on them. 
You really think that will get you through it? People tell me, I know they tell you and you hear them. They say we have the best tequila. The biggest agave, and the lyin' Mexicans will tell you they have tequila. I know, I know. Believe me. We will have the biggest, tequila and we'll see who gets the last laugh, alright? 
She's gonna be in the First Lady's suite in the White House. Just saying. 
I feel like, at this point, he will either come through as a decent president and wouldn't need Pence for the boost, or he tweets himself out of the oval office. 
Appeal to a common unspecified contradiction: "Maybe, maybe not". 
So sad. You know what we did to people like him back in my day!? 
You're making me want to give up my coping mechanism, you bastard. If I can't drink the next four years away, how will I deal with them? /s 
You mean the health coverage formerly known as Obamacare? 
I'm hoping a candidate will change their last name to Hindsight. **HINDSIGHT 2020** 
It makes it even worse replacing them with Obama and Biden, considering how close they are. 
Here's a little lesson in trickery, this is going down in history... 
Are you serious? You mean in the inauguration? Where are these odds given? Vegas? (sorry if this is a joke and it went well over me) 
I thought he spent the past eighteen months just making one long runon sentence? 
keep snorting until his skin becomes a normal color 
They love the winter They have the best winter retreats to do hard work 
You do not waste good booze on sorrow drinking. Sorrow drinking is for the cheap shit. Good booze should be appreciated slowly, and hopefully with friends. 
Just had an epiphany; an alcoholic who mistakes beer for root beer is bamboozeld 
Take the ginsburg route and just survive off pure hatred. 
Nah that'd be dumb. We need like a Jeff Hind with a Pat Sight as running mate on the ticket, that way it could be a Hind/Sight ticket. Hind/Sight 2020. 
May be a bit more realistic for 2020 to be "Make America Somewhat Okay Again, Then We'll See How It Goes From There". 
Bros to the end. Jesus I'm actually choking up now 
No I'm serious. I use a gambling website and you can place bets like that. Right now odds are 150 to 1 against him using the phrase "golden shower." Dead serious. 
Implying Kanye West bring in politics isn't something to be celebrated!? /s 
Pretty sure she's gonna be doing some rage drinking too. Notorious RBG showed up to Obama's SOTU drunk that one time. She's probably going to show up to Trump's kushed out. 
And once you work your way up to Congress, you can drink all you want. 
would you mind pming me the site? it could be fun. 
There is nothing about Kanye West worth celebrating. 
Sorry, I missed what you said. Too busy twirling, twirling, twirling into the future. 
Haha yeah right I wouldn't take that bet for the life of me. I don't have $100 to lose. 
People always ask me, they come up to me on the street, and they say, Mr. President, do you have the biggest work in the world? And I say, you better believe it folks. We're having a good time here, aren't we? 
'Tis the season to get air in your Anus from too much anal 
I'm in the same boat. I did hang an Xmas wreath on my front door. This has been an absolute sucky year, made a gazillion times worse because my 12 yr-old dog died in August. He was the family I celebrated with. 
I work in hospitality. You'd be surprised how many women in our restaurants freak the fuck out when Mariah Carey's "all I want for Christmas is you" comes on. It's alarming the screams from the grown women everywhere. 
Also working! Apparently people still expect an ambulance to come on holidays.. 
Holy fuck. I just went bankrupt a few minutes ago. I feel you dude. 
If you're both on the lease she still owes you for half the rent. You can sue her for what you've paid so far and any other costs associated I wth the eviction. Small claims court. Check out r/legaladvice. 
Parents just divorced, at my grandparents house watching elf for the 70th time with my sister, love the holidays! 
Look at Mr. Fancypants here flying one hour instead of driving. 
I'm still struggling with my soon to be ex wife's affair, the holidays are tough. It's been 4 years since I found out and everything fell apart and I'm still a wreck. If you need someone to talk to I'm here to listen, trust me you need to let it out or the holidays will fucking kill you. 
If I may ask, what does your wife think about it. If that was my mom, she would have gotten in their faces to tell them to stop with the bullshit and get them both something or neither of them. 
It's only 7:52 PM Christmas Eve here. Trying to get your presents early you time traveling piece of shit? 
Your day sounds like a great independent movie I'd put on a list to see once it hits the shitty cinema in my town which it never will so I'll forget about it until I see it on Netflix four years later after scrolling through my suggestions for half an hour. 
Sounds like your folks are thought poisoned. Sucks for them to miss out on a cool kid and awesome memories... I wish you Happy Holidays and huge successes in 2017. 
My family is content to sit in the couch together and say nothing. We're doing it now, it's great. 
I'm sorry to hear. I used to think I had a mood disorder and my depression was my fault. Come to find out my emotional issues were a result of narcissistic abuse by several family members. Cut that family off and life is amazing now. I don't know your situation but hang in there. Keep searching for answers. I hope you enjoy your Christmas Eve. 
God damn, I wish I had a compound. Or at the least a barbed wire fence around my house. 
Just remember, they're no longer the wet bandits, they're the sticky bandits. 
I can't help but think that the nearest animal shelter might have a lonely dog that's anxiously waiting to celebrate Christmas with someone who will love him back. 
Thank you. Your post sparked an interesting thought. I can rant. I can rave. I can curse and storm against fate. But through it all I am oddly ... grateful. I have been blessed by them, and no matter what comes next I will always be in debt to all that led me to this point. 
I'm a grown-ass man and you'd be surprised at how I freak the fuck out when it comes on. There's a diva in all of us. 
I read that as inexplicably jesus and got very confused lol 
AND firetrucks. *eyeroll* friggin' Divas. Put out your own fires and drive yourselves to the hospital. You'll never learn to take care of yourself if we're always doing it for you! 
3pm to 1am here. Single with no kids. I offered to work Christmas and Christmas Eve. Time and a half plus a two full day's worth of vacation. Gonna be a nice paycheck. 
We need a subreddit for people who lost Christmas games to recover. 
Can confirm, just got home from a gathering just oozing with passive aggression, taking offence to someome else's personal choices, and shit-talking absent family members. I *wish* I could spend Christmas alone. So much bullshit. 
All more trouble and additional expense to him currently. I could agree if he had the money to float $40 for a small claims lawsuit, but the guy is eating rice and butter for Christmas, chances are he doesn't have $40 to float like that. Also suing her would mean interacting more and twisting that knife. Probably better to avoid contact and move on. Extract what learning or lessons you can from the situation, turn the page, and start writing the rest of your story. 
My family has a picture of all of us kids and my mom in the front room reading books. About 10 years later we realized we had replicated the pictures...with electronics. 
Thanks for your kind message. Despite reddit's imperfections, it blows my mind that ranting into the digital ether can bring out genuine support like yours, even at a time like Christmas Eve. 
Thanks dude. I guess I've only delayed the inevitable; soon, she'll start demanding to know specifics of my "program." But it's reassuring to know this happens to other people out there. Out of curiosity, what are you studying? 
Mrs. Fancypants, and the drive is 9 hours over mountains with a two year old, so...nah. 
Oh gosh this hit me harder than some of the other emotional replies. 
Thanks man. Been playing Fifa and Final Fantasy XV! FF is so good! 
Hey buddy. I lost my mom in October 2012 and the first Christmas was absolutely awful. Four years later and it's a mostly happy affair for my family with a few sighs and sometimes the occasional tear. The pain never goes away but it's less "front and center" as time goes on. I hope you'll come to appreciate it for the time you have with the family that's still here at some point like my family and I have. 
I feel so hard for you people. I've never been married but my ex broke up with me after dating for 3 years on Thanksgiving 2 years ago and i found out she slept with a roommate of mine the day after christmas. Holiday's kicked my ass and I was only 19. I can't even fathom it being someone you trusted so mich to marry them and have kids with. 
I had this happen 15 years ago. My mom somehow managed to out together one of my all time favorite Christmases it was a real rough year but I'll always have fond memories of that Christmas. 
Because us jewy-jew-jews (everyone say that out loud) do that tomorrow night. 
I can't sing Christmas songs or decorate a Christmas tree, or leave water out for Rudolph cause there's something wrong with me. 
Or the person you'd rather be with told you to fuck off and ran directly into her exes arms. 
"Look, you can keep yelling or you can help me by harmonizing. Do your part." 
The writing would probably be pretentious as fuck and there'd be long, pointless close-ups on random shit like empty soup cans or whatever, but if you watch it with a kinda-hot art major she'll think you're deep and maybe you'll get a blowie 
my mom always says, "IDK, you start a conversation." Umm, you were the one who wanted to talk 
This is a great suggestion OP. I did 5 years in the Army Infantry and got injured in Mosul Iraq. Every night afterwards was a nightmare(literally). VA prescribed me mini press and life has been much more tolerable. Even if your PTSD isn't service related don't hesitate to PM brother. We're all in this together. 
Now that is the holiday spirit! If you guys want a 3rd, let me know. 
We live far off the beaten path surrounded by woods and streams. We call it "The Compound", but it is a working ranch protected by cattle and Dobermans. A lovely place by day, but a dark and forbidding place by night. 
Damnit! Should have thought of that when the stores were still open. 
Please make sure that you take care of yourself. You can really get worn down over time. The stress will really do a number on you physically and emotionally. My brother and her family could care less and it's taken a toll. I've let my life get off track for too long. Please don't make my mistake. I wish YOU awesome holidays and a fabulous New Year. Please PM me if you ever feel the the need. I never understood what far reaching impact strokes could have until my mom had both of hers. 
Are animal shelters open on Christmas? Because if so that's what I'm gonna do. 
One of the best Christmas songs to come out in the last 30+ years. So many people try to come out with "new" Christmas songs all the time. None are anywhere near as catchy. They all just seem so.... fake? Lifeless? I don't know. But they're nowhere close. 
That sounds exhausting. Have a Merry Christmas tomorrow! =) 
Ugh, I guess I'll make sure the runway at this airport doesn't ice up so all you jerks can go see your families... Then again, I'm Jewish so I kinda volunteered to work. Edit - WOOWOO!!! ALL ABOARD THE GOLD TRAIN!!! SEE YOU SUCKERS IN THE LOUNGE!!! Seriously though, thank you muchly kind stranger! I hardly think doing what I do is gold worthy. Honestly, I'd do it for free. I get to be up close and personal with big trucks and planes. Edit 2 - Hanukkah started tonight?! I had no idea... /s 
Had a stroke patient a few minutes ago. It's like they have no regard to my need to bake cookies and watch Christmas movies. 
So... Was that the shitpost of Christmas Past, Present, or Future? 
7pm to 7am here. Working at the front desk of a motel. Someone's gotta keep the rooms warm and doors open for hookers and junkies ;) 
"This is my human granddaughter." i can't stop laughing at this 
You're human man, there's no being worthy about it. Don't feel guilty for taking, when so much has been taken from you. 
The goddamn dogs. My parents have 3 chihuahuas. I might pop my eardrums with an ice pick. 
The way you write tells me that you are an intelligent well rounded and reasonable person. PhD or not, you'll be fine I am sure. 
Well, at least it sounds like you're living away from home. Distance definitely helps. Also, r/AsianParentStories is your friend. Applied math! Specifically, physics-based models that are used to study living systems. 
Did you keep the maiden name of Fancypants when you wed, or did you marry into the Fancypants family? 
Nice! Ive been wanting to play FFXV but I can't justify getting another game with the 5 im already playing. 
I know you weren't talking to me, but I really needed this right now, so thank you. Technically this is my 2nd Christmas without my little sister; she passed Dec 2015. But last year we were all so numb it didn't really register. This year however...it's been awful and I'm having a hard time keeping it together. 
Similar situation after 5 years. I know plenty of people have it worse, but its been 10 months for me and feeling like shit is putting it pretty lightly. She was once my best friend and I don't think I will ever be the same again. 
We have been really fortunate, we were donated a tree and ornaments. It's just been waves, I'm okay and trying to handle it, and then I just have a pity party. I go between pity/sadness and then guilt. I had so much, I'm fortunate, I'm lucky - why am I feeling bad for myself?? It's been a rough year. 
Lots of us did it tonight! In fact, I'm just heading home from a big ol Jewish Christmas Eve right now! 
3 hours behind and you cunts still can't get your shit together. 
I'm sorry m8. Hopefully you can still make the best of the holidays. 
I have PTSD from something not service related, and I have constant nightmares. I haven't been able to reliably sleep in years. Is there really a medicine that I can get that would help out with that? I never mentioned it to my doc because I figured the nightmares were just something people dealt with... 
I'm sure there's an origami version out there somewhere... 
Thanks I really appreciate it! I'm currently looking for work in nyc so the plan is in motion my friend. 
You're right.. Many rescues allow fostering though; it's a great way to have animals in your life without the financial commitment. 
You're like a modern day innkeeper giving shelter to Mary and Joseph 
HAHAHA. YES. I AM HUMAN. COME, FELLOW HUMANS, LET US ENJOY COMPANY AND MERRY FESTIVITIES WHILE INJESTING GLUCOSE INTO OUR ONE-WAY DIGESTIVE TRACTS. 
Damn, even other people's cats eat better than me. 
I'm trying to force myself to think and feel that way. I'm just so terrified of people getting the wrong idea about me or something. I've never *ever* been good at accepting help from others, but lord knows, if I've ever been in a situation where I needed assistance, this is certainly that moment. 
Hey, thanks! I intend to be fine, and to maintain sanity and decency in the face of my mother's extreme and outdated opinions. 
Yes, distance helps a ton. Wow, that sub is too real. And very cool! That happens to be similar to what I'd want to get into if I ever did pursue more schooling (which would hopefully be despite and not because of pressure from my Asian parent). 
That's gaming in your 30s for you. "This will look great on my shelf!" 
5 years in a relationship, but happen two years ago. I consider myself a pretty emotionally strong person. But I'm not going to lie, it hurts sometimes, instead of all the time. I still think about her every other day, instead of everyday. I'm in a great, happy, relationship with an awesome girl. But I'll probably still have that tiny part of my ex in my heart forever. I'd do anything to get rid of it because she doesn't deserve jack shit or an ounce of love from me. But everyday that part is getting a little smaller and smaller. But to get to your comment. You're going to continue to feel like shit. No amount of drinking, hooking up with girls, doing drugs is going to fix it. Man up and embrace the hurt. Take all that shit in. Let it fucking consume you and make you stronger man. 
It stays with you. I remember a bunch of strangers donated so much for us including beds, couches, etc. It was crazy. It's also ok to feel bad, you lost things important to you. They're just things but they were yours and meant something. I was 13 at the time but I still have moments now where I get sad thinking about my old toys and how I wish i had them still. What's nice is, you will forever have a greater appreciation for everything you have in life and know how quickly it can be taken away, making you appreciate it even more. 
My last few years of living at home, we started to do it both nights. Now I work at a movie theater both nights, do the movie Chinese food thing on Boxing Day all alone... 
Obligatory not a doctor. But if you can't sleep this is definitely a thing to talk to your doctor about. One of my roommates in college got prescribed medication to help her sleep because she had such powerful nightmares. There is definitely help out there for you if you ask. 
NICE TO MEET FELLOW HUMAN WITH ~~SYNTHESIZED~~ HUMAN OFFSPRING 
Hey buddy: take the gift and pay it forward. One day when things are working better for you, you can do the same for someone else. That day will come! 
There are few jobs for PhDs anyways. Does she realize that? 
I can't help but read the "One Present" like the dude in Episode VII who says "One quarter portion" 
as someone being dragged to the movies on xmas day, thank you for your sacrifice. 
Once I'm finally financially stable again, I'll be damned if I don't pay these good deeds forward. I've ever felt this way before, I've never been the target of so much caring, especially from strangers. It's sobering, and completely altered my perspective on some things. 
That's it young lady. Now you have to do my dailies for a month! 
Sage advice. Same strategy as breaking up with a significant other. 
My tired eyes read that as on oxmas day, I imagined you having this awesome pagan holiday around a roast ox and bonfire with lots of mead. 
That sounds like... 10x more exciting than Christmas. Someone needs to make this a thing. 
Haha this is why I cannot study or write while listening to music or TV. My papers will just be full of lyrics and dialog I heard. 
This made me laugh, cos SO & I respond to most of each other's questions (about anything) with "in your butt". I may change it up & borrow yours. 
similar thing happened to me: I was calling my internet provider and hung up saying "love you, bye" 
I did this. Moved 1 door down, but I never even spoke to the new occupants of the old place. Just barged in one day coming back from the laundry room with my laundry basket and there's a shirtless dude laying on the couch, probably high as a kite. We just stare at each other for a minute and I say "I used to live here!" and started walking out as he was laughing. 
What did you do with the beer and why is the answer you chugged it? 
On a similar note, I did park maintenance for awhile and often entered the opposite sex bathroom to clean. I have found myself yelling "FEMALE MAINTENANCE WORKER!" before entering the ladies room 
Been giggling like mad at all the stories, but yours? yours pushed me over the edge. I think My laughing just woke up the neighborhood.. 
Thank you for the diabolical idea of how to get rid of telemarketers! 
"Here's your cheesestick, hun!" *daughter cries* "why don't you love me?" 
Story kind of related to your #1... At the end of an evening scout meeting, we were playing Sharks and Minnows across the grass when this one kid runs to the end, trips, and hits his head on the sidewalk at the end of the field. We help him up, ask him if he's okay, he insists that he's fine. His injury ends the game, so we all head back into the auditorium to close the meeting. After a solid 5 minutes of announcements and flags, we're sitting and chatting on the edge of the stage. The kid who fell suddenly looks at me with a really confused look on his face. He had been functioning fairly normally, yet he **had no recollection of the past 10 minutes** - from the moment he hit his head until then. That freaked me out... 
Imagine you pick up someone elses signal with the baby monitor and start hearing voices in your car. 
I once poured the fresh grounds into the basket before placing the filter in. Upon realizing my mistake, I emptied and cleaned the basket and then placed the filter in its rightful place. Then I poured the water in and hit brew. Fifteen minutes later, I had a full pot of hot water. Not a good morning. 
The other day I was checking in at an amusement park. After the guy scanned my ticket, I, for some unknown reason, held out my hand. And the guy handed me his scanner. 
You can lead a horse to your kitchen, but you can't make it cook you breakfast. 
Haha I've done that. I was walking through town with my gf at the time, looking at stalls and shops and she was in my periphery, or so I thought... She had stopped to look at something else and a woman of roughly the same height and hair colour was stood next to me. I checked my phone for time, gently caressed her shoulders and said "come on now, it's time for us to head off". And just walked away from this woman. I turned around a few meters later to see my gf a luminescent shade of embarrassed and this entirely freaked out little old Asian woman. 
I had to go to Walmart once after finishing my midnight cashier shift from a competing grocery retailer across the street. I absentmindedly grabbed my stuff, approached the cashier and asked her if she found everything ok. We stared at each other blankly for a little bit. 
I was writing a practice essay for the SATs to turn in for class, and I must have dozed off or something while writing it, because the word "pineapple" was circled in the middle of my essay with a question mark written next to it. The essay had nothing to do with pineapples. or fruit. or even food. I had no recollection of writing it, and when my teacher asked me about it, I honestly had no explanation. The sentence must have gone something like: ".... The mind is too important Pineapple of a thing to waste and therefor should be fostered..." The word didn't even make sense in the context of the sentence I was writing. 
Yeap. The amount of times I've ended a phone conversation with, "Okay, love you, bye," that wasn't with my husband/mom/dad/brothers on the other end is embarassing. 
I wish that's how it always worked. If so, I'd be showing up at work in the middle of the night like every single day 
What did you used to do at the airport? I think airports are interesting 
I did something like that when I was like 8. My dad was in the car getting ready to take me and my brother to the game room, and I didn't want to miss out so I ran to the car without pants on. Then I hear my mom yelling out the window, "YOU HAVE NO PANTS ON!" 
I was making breakfast one early morning and cracked my eggs straight into the garbage. 
The trick to this is owning it. Put a lot of energy into it, frantically wave your hand, maybe throw in an enthusiastic "ooh, ooh!" Your friends/coworkers will respect the fact you are being ironic. 
Every year I have a day or two where my first period learns something a bit wrong because my brain isn't working. I usually hope they're not paying too much attention and try to reteach it the next day. 
My boyfriend tried to wake me up from a nap and he started tickling me and I started freaking out and getting scared because I thought he was a wire stabbing into me and I was a mountain? 
I have done this. Instead of grabbing my coffee, I got my tv remote and didn't notice until I got to work haha 
Once I was feeding my 1 year old a banana and talking to my mom. In the middle of the conversation, I pushed the banana in front of my moms face and just waited for her to take a bite. It took like 30 seconds to register that I was force feeding my 48 year old mother NOT my toddler. It was hilarious. 
i was really hoping it was the other way around :( 
That reminds me of my coworker at einstein bagels. We would call out customer names, hand them their order, and wish them a good day. He said "Have a great job" and on another day "happy birthday" 
It's better than looking for your glasses while you're wearing them. Not my proudest moment... 
Have done, but with just two. First egg: "oh, dammit!" *Rinses egg down sink* Second egg: "oh...oh, fucking come on" 
Sometimes I wake wake-up at like 6 AM thinking I'm late to HS and rush to get out of bed. Those were dark times. 
Most people are kidding when they tell Jesus to take the wheel 
Poor food Why didnt you help it YOU COULD HAVE SAVED THE FOOD 
"If you're here.. then THAT means.. uh oh!" (Cut to someone rubbing the rat on corn on the cob) 
You reminded me of my favorite one! I kick my truck door closed all the time. One time, I kicked it closed before grabbing my phone, and in a sleepy panic *threw my keys into the truck just before the door closed.* I was so out of it I yelled "Yes!" because my sleep addled brain must have thought that was awesome. Had to wait for my wife to get home to open the door to the house to get the spare. 
Could be worse. Your hair could be unprotected from 99% of odor causing bacteria. 
Ah crap something similar happened to me. I got to a party and saw people I knew, mostly female, so I gave them all a hug and a small peck on the cheek, get to the one guy in the group, both of us bearded men and proceeded to give him a peck on the cheek. We both just stopped and stared at each other. 
Fortunately cats have an ATTACK setting to protect against such mishaps. 
I can't stop giggling at the moo cows, now *I* look crazy 
I've peed on the lid before because I had expected it to be up, and didn't realize before peeing. Not a good time. 
Yeah... they probably didn't need the pee to know if you were on drugs after that. 
This needs to be higher, I can't stop laughing. That is 1,000,000x worse than calling a teacher "Mum" It reminds me of a time during a Japanese language class where my teacher was a very masculine woman who had a pretty deep voice. She was super nice mostly considering this was a grade 8 language class where nobody particularly cared and got pretty rowdy. In a moment of autopilot, I wanted to ask her a question and out came: "Hey Dad." I felt so bad about it. 
Ha, I've done this at work. The woman on the other end just laughed and said "Love you too" and hung up. 
I had this happen to me. I had procrastinated on a film study project, started working on it at 8pm the night before it was due, made it about 1/2 of the way through by midnight, and woke up in my bed at 5:30am to go to school with no recollection of anything after midnight. I was freaking out thinking I still had four hours of work to do to finish, but checked the document and it was *done*. Last saved at 3am. I got an A on a project that I barely remembered doing, and I had done the second half *faster* than when I was conscious. 
Not gonna lie, this one took me a bit to understand. Maybe I should go to bed before I put my phone in the trash. 
My daughter has always been a little helper. Once, I was folding towels and putting them aside so I could put them away later. Little daughter had just learned how to walk independently. She grabbed a towel and walked toward the bathroom to put it away. I told her "Put it on the toilet". The cabinet was right above the toilet. She came back all happy, once she had completed her task. A few minutes later, I went into the bathroom with more towels. I put them away, and then realized there was no towel on the toilet. I looked around for a few minutes. Then, I lifted the lid on the toilet. There was the missing towel. I guess my daughter had not understood the difference between "on" and "in". Or, the lid was up when she got there, she put the towel in the toilet, and then helpfully closed the lid. My daughter is now 17, and I never let her forget this. 
I've tried to put milk in the cabinet where the cereal goes a bunch of times. I've even tried to put the box of cereal in the fridge. 
Sounds like you forgot more than just her password. 
Why would you eat a stray mint that had just been in your pocket for months anyway? It would be all covered in lint and gross. 
I often rest my hand on my thigh and play with the seam on my jeans when I'm sat down, one time last week I realise I can't feel my hand on my thigh. Turns out I'd been feeling up my friend's thigh for a good 10 seconds before either of us registered what was going on. 
Did you owe yourself money? Send a little message to that deadbeat? 
I can't work out where the hell your brain was going with this. 
We drink maple syrup for breakfast in Canada anyway. 
Try retracing your steps. I do that too and it's probably increased my success rate to 3/10 
Never pulled that one but I did freak out and start yelling once when I got up to take a piss at night and couldn't find my pistol or holster. 
Had I been a year or two or I probably would have drank it. I have it to the lunch room teacher who has known my mom for years. 
I'm never sure what to do when I'm in the middle of using a public toilet and the maintenance person yells into the bathroom. Does one yell back, or just finish as quickly as possible and gtfo? 
this has been the most entertaining thread I've read in a while. I think my heart is starting to beat irregularly from all the laughing. 
Lol it's fun for that too. I have a standard angry "THIS IS A 911 CALL CENTER AND YOU ARE TYING UP EMERGENCY LINES" speech for when they call the actual dispatch center, so I just give that haha. Never get those calls again. Would recommend answering with a fake agency name so you don't get some emergency call out of the blue one day though. That could suck. 
Imagine you drive past an abandoned house with it and hear Russian agents plotting to assassinate the president, using baby monitors instead of handheld radios. 
I knew none of those people where paid. They all just pass on the torch. 
I would be flattered personally if I were old and some young thing accidentally carted me off, but maybe that's just me. When you're old it's always nice to have something random happen like that, as long as you're not being abducted lol. 
I worked as a greeter at a store that isn't Walmart. One day I was thinking about how I had to go to Walmart after work and greeted people with "Welcome to Walmart" several times. 
I'm glad I'm not the only one, something about airports is really fascinating to me. 
My brother did this- family of six (four kids, two adults) drives 30 min to restaurant. Get out of the car, brother isn't wearing a shirt. "I thought I was wearing one!" None of us can even retort, because no one else noticed either. 
1. open banana 2. discard white parts into trash 3. pick the stringy bits off 4. notice I'm holding a peel and not a delicious banana 5. ... 6. go back to bed because clearly I'm not functioning and need to turn myself off and back on again. 
That sort of mistake is the reason I was nervous for so long about tutoring kids. 
damn that's even worse since you left something behind to take the essential remote with you. 
"And if you look to your right... you'll see my house" 
Not as bad as not being able to find your glasses because you can't see without your glasses. 
I cracked one right into the trash can. One tap on the side of the stove then right into the garbage you go! Liquid first, shell second, patience last. 
haha, oh jesus, those poor guys must get so stressed. I cannot imagine another profession as stressfull that would make you wake up mid panic. "The walk-in freezer is open! Someone left the Walk in freezer open and there's a problem with it's fans!" Said no cook or waitress ever when waking up in the night. Poor Medical staff, you guys are all nerves. 
These kinds of stories are my favorite. Your brain was trying so hard to be helpful, but couldn't have failed any harder. 
I worked three jobs once, and they all had different ways of answering the phone, plus, of course, my own phone. One day, I picked up a call at one job, and my mind went completely blank. All the caller could hear from me was "Ah, uh, Thank, hello." Pause. "Thank, uh, This..." Then I hung up. 
Most of my friends would probably just roll with it 
The guy who was monitoring our test was just like "WTF?!?!" 
Unrelated story, but our bio class was working on a lab report and one of my buddies in the class was going through depression. Night before it was due, him, I and a couple of other lads were working on it in a Skype call just to make things easier. Soon, he goes quiet and we hear a quiet rumbling, enough to catch onto the mic. Turns out he fell asleep. We felt bad for him, so we broke into his drive account (security question was easy as shit) and finished his report for him. Week later he is telling us that he finished his entire report in his sleep and that he was feeling substantially better since he felt his body wasn't giving up so his mind shouldn't either. I think he got a 92 on it too. We never told him it was us. Dude's doing great now 
I did this once. In pretty warm weather. I didn't realize I did it until I came home from work and wondered why the whole apartment reeked of spoiled milk. 
I used to fall asleep talking to my first boyfriend when we were in high school. My favorite was when he was talking about something mundane and sleep-me responded with "I'm dressed up as an Indian right now." I woke up when he just said, "What?" 
I am rather forgetful. I've been called "scatterbrain" "ditz" and "head like a sieve" by my parents. But meh, I've made it this far :) 
Sounds like you had a few beers before writing this. 
I used to be pretty good at making people do this. If you say "Thank you, have a nice day" in the right tone of voice when you hand their card or change back, about 1/3 of the time they'll just drive away. I got two cars in a row to drive off one day. IIRC, only one of them came back, looking sheepish, to get their fried chicken. 
I told them I wanted heated seats, dammit! e: ty for gold :D 
It took me a minute to figure out what was going on. I looked down at my hand and I was like "uh, I think you need this," and handed it back to him. He just took it like "thanks..." and went on checking the next person like it was totally normal. 
I think it's because almost everyone at the airport is probably there for an important reason 
Absolutely. It's compounded by latency. Even a half second of latency makes that "who is taking the initiative to speak here" so much more awkward. 
Open the camera on your phone, it sees clearly and you can hold it as close to your face as needed. 
I did this more than a couple times when I was a cook. Cracked the egg into the trash and stood in from of the stove holding an egg shell trying to remember what I'm supposed to do next. 
There are many "codes" at a hospital. When someone "calls a code" it's a code blue. Hospitals have code teams that respond to codes outside of the ER or even inside the ER. Calling a code basically means drop what you are doing, this guy is dying. 
"There's a bug!" "Uh-oh" said the programmer, as he rolls over into a more comfortable position. 
My mom accidentally put our rat in a cupboard when she was pregnant with my youngest sibling. She ran to wake me up for me help. She was technically my little brothers rat, and she was so scared she lost the poor thing forever. Worried that maybe she got outside when she let the dog out. I eventually asked what she had been doing before that. The rat had made herself comfortable with crackers and some little snacks we had in there for her. She would have been in heaven if she was placed in the refrigerator. I know she would have quickly tried to get to the grapes, and then that would have been her new home. 
I do this a lot. I answer my own phone by stuttering out "good afternoon this is ouionme...Uh sorry yeah uh hey hi what's up" 
Just keep rolling with it until after the marriage. 
I love to see that good in people. "Oh look some stranger passed out on my couch, drunk. I should get him a blanket." Those people are awesome, and probably going to die from being too nice at some point. 
As someone who's had depression most of my life, I just want to let you know what an awesome friend you are. It's because of people like you that we're able to get through this 
My mom will ask me the same question three times in succession, forgetting I already answered each time. 
Ah, so he's a child. (Am also parent. Solidarity.) 
*Shuts eyes tight* "IF I DON'T MOVE, HE WON'T KNOW I'M HERE!" 
It all went downhill after his mom packed him a beer for lunch. 
I am laughing so hard thank you so much love you bye 
You think that until you start working at an airport Source: I work at an airport 
One phrase I do this all the time with. I often say "take care buddy" or "take care bro". More often than I'd like, it becomes "take care bruddy" or "brud". Makes me wonder if I English as good as I think. 
Ya you are driving normal, just kinda spaced. You just don't store it. 
"honey there's a bug" "post it on the GitHub. I'll fix it in the morning" 
That is serious dedication to gay chicken. "Will you marry me?" "Alright Frank you win, I'll move out!" 
I mean, If I was planning to kill someone, and they offered me a blanket and pillow, I'd probably change my mind. 
Did you consider that your mom may be a main character in a video game? 
Bruder is german for brother. So if anyone calls you on it, now you have an out. 
You cannot even blame it. Kind of sad for the rat to having seen the truth. 
I'm dying imagining him saying "don't worry, I got this. Follow me" and then him just day dreaming all happy driving along 
Not to mention that laying prone on someone else's couch is almost the worst killing strategy you could use 
Fret not, she was a spoiled little shit and she knew it. Straight pellets? Pah! They dine upon pellets mixed with muesli with little bits of yoghurt and some rice bubbles dotted in. Warm peas and corn on cold mornings, frozen peas in a shallow dish to dive for on hot days. Make tzaziki? Guess who gets the cucumber pulp. Steak night? Ratties get a tiny tithe. Making chicken, leek and tarragon pies? Pan for the filling goes on the floor during playtime for a ratty pre-rinse before washing. 
You can protect yourself by putting a chore list on your windows 
Friend of mine saw Robin on a red eye flight, but he was sitting across the aisle from them and was apparently asleep. They spent a good portion of the flight going back and forth about whether it was him, when he suddenly turned to them, smiled, and said "Yes, it's really me." Made small talk for a minute and went back to sleep. 
What do you call a man with his arm up a horse's ass? An Amish Mechanic Nanu Nanu 
It's not insignificant. It meant the world to you when it happened and still means something today. That story truly shows they type of person he was(its hard to use past tense with him). He brought humor with him everywhere. I actually got a visual of him with a huge backpack and smiled. 
I feel the exact same way. I'm not sure if it hit me so hard due to my own experiences with depression or if it because I grew up adoring him. Either way I have never been this saddened by a celebrity death and I can't think of anyone else that would have this effect. 
Spoken like someone who's struggled with depression. 
"Carpe, carpe diem, seize the day boys, make your lives extraordinary." 
I have been depressed lately, so the other day I went on Netflix looking for a movie to cheer me up. I ended up watching The Birdcage, even though I have seen it several times before. I picked it because I loved Robin Williams and he has never failed to make me laugh. I feel so honestly sad that there was no one and nothing to cheer him when he most needed it. I feel like one of the brightest lights in the universe just winked out and the world just got a little bit darker. 
It seems to me that the most successful comedians always have an intimate understanding of how life can make jokes out of us. 
That is who I want to be. A person like Robin Williams. That person that waits patiently and makes everyone feel as though they are worth listening to. I wish I could have met the man. God knows I need someone like him in my life right now. Really, I think everyone does. That's why his death was so jarring. Today was the moment when everyone collectively realized he was the kind of person we all needed to keep the world going. But we always realize these things too late. 
According to his publicist he had been struggling with depression. 
LOL! My friend and his wife saw him somewhere in Napa Valley some years ago. They were driving down the road and saw this extremely hairy guy (no shirt) riding a bike down the road. My friend commented it looked like a gorilla on a bike. As they approached and were next to the cyclist, lo and behold...it was Robin Williams! They shouted and waived at him and he smiled and waived back. I think they took pics, but I will have to reach out to a friend that I haven't spoken to in many years. 
You treat a disease, you win, you lose. You treat a person, I guarantee you, you'll win, no matter what the outcome. 
"We are willing to help, Lord, but what, if anything, is needed? For it is true we can seldom help those closest to us. Either we don't know what part of ourselves to give or, more often than not, the part we have to give is not wanted. And so it is those we live with and should know who elude us. But we can still love them - we can love completely without complete understanding." -- Norman Maclean, A River Runs Through It and Other Stories 
Until we roll 5 or 8, Robin. Until we roll 5 or 8... 
Now I understand Patton Oswalt's Tweet. Thank you. 
Eerily reminiscent of Oscar Wilde- "work is the curse of the drinking class." 
The thing is with Steve Irwin at least I could've expected to see him go in such a way. While tragic it was oddly fitting of him. But, I can't even imagine Robin Williams without a smile on his face much less depression and suicide. His death seems to hit something deeper because of how unexpected and unlike the image we all had of him. 
I don't think anyone could do it convincingly, this made me realize how one of a kind he truly was. 
My uncle saw him jogging in Hawaii--he yelled out, "That's Robin Williams!" Robin Williams heard him, turned around and screamed "Where!!!" Then continued on his run. 
When your job is to make everyone else happy, people forget how to make you happy, because they are always coming to you for happiness and assume you are sharing your own happiness, rather than putting off your own worries to cheer them up. It's easy to think the funny guy is in a good mood all the time and forget to ask him how he's doing, especially since when you do he tries to hide his own feelings nut to trouble you with his own 
You could almost see both the pain and regret in Robin's eyes during that moment that he said that quote... I almost wonder if, even then, he was depressed and felt alone. I wish someone could have done something for him. Of every person alive, famous, infamous, or just a normal-everyday-person; nobody deserved this fate LESS than Robin Williams. One day we laugh and smile and feel our hearts warmed by Robin Williams. One day, we cry and feel our hearts ripped from our chests. HE was truly a great man. 
Depression is a pretty fucked up thing. You can't think or reason your way out of it. You know it is dumb and pointless and makes no sense, but damn it hurts like a motherfucker. It twists your thoughts into awful things and lies to you. 
If I see a picture of him at the funeral I'll burst into tears. 
I've always argued against this rating. That's just an score based on what Critics thought of it in 1991z Spielberg made a movie for children. There isn't a single person who was a child in 1991 that didn't love it. It is my all-time most played film. Hook was my childhood. Critics hated it. The children loved it. By all accounts, I think Spielberg accomplished his goal perfectly. 
The poem is "The Stolen Child" by W.B. Yeats, if anyone else is curious. Worth reading in full! 
Another one where he plays someone deranged is Insomnia. He was fantastic in that movie. 
I cannot handle watching his work right now, but when I'm ready, watching the Birdcage will be my own personal wake for him. Gah, there I go crying again. I'm so sorry you've been hurting. If it's too much to handle, please reach out to a hotline, or heck even hit me up. Much love for you. 
He also paid for treatments Christopher Reeves' family couldn't afford. 
Oh man! That would be so cool to go trick-or-treating and meet Robin Williams. I wonder if anyone ever dressed up like the Genie or something. 
Wow, that's really deep. I'm not being sarcastic either.. and yeah, it seems like simple cheap philosophy, but at the same time, there is a bit of very dark truth to that statement, especially in relation to Robin Williams' death. Man.. life really is fucked up :'( 
Jesus, that is well written. Its dusty in here :'( 
This is a great comment. I keep hearing people say "I don't understand how anyone could commit suicide." If you don't understand it, consider yourself lucky. I was treated for clinical depression for three years. *It's not something you should want to understand.* 
"Thank you...for gracing my life with your lovely presence, for adding the sweet measure of your soul to my existence." May he rest in peace. In paradise. 
That was my favorite quote. The theme and ideas are so pure in that movie, the delivery is so perfect. 
I make a lot of dumb jokes on this website. Sometimes people say "aren't you a doctor?" as if to insinuate that I can't be goofy ... being a doctor is part of what I am, but not all of what I am. 
A couple of hours ago, I was watching the episode of Family Guy where everything Peter touches, turns into Robin Williams. After the episode ended, I refreshed reddit, saw the top story and just screamed in horror. Within moments I went from musing of a world full of Robin Williams to living in one without even one of him. 
Maybe this was the jungle and God finally rolled it... :( 
Those who are most depressed often seem the most content, because they don't want others to worry about them. 
When you're depressed, none of your successes matter, and all of your failures--real and imagined--loom large. 
I'm trying not to start bawling at Weinger's comment. 
Alcohilism and depression often go hand-in-hand; one causing the other. 
I really hope we don't see any photos. Family and friends deserve to mourn in private. 
Oh man, I forgot this fact and thanks for reminding me. God dammit Robbie, why did you have to go!? 
Fun fact: every single one of Obama's speeches includes the word bangarang somewhere. 
I'm rather surprised this is so far down. I guess it must be a generational thing... 
Completely agree. There is a very tender moment in the movie when he tells Nathan Lane's character something to the effect of "what does it matter if I say you can stay or you say I can stay? It won't be a home unless you're there." One of the more touching scenes I've seen regardless of sexual orientation. 
I started the movie thinking it was going to be dumb and over dramatic. In the end I was laughing every two minutes. He just played the role so well. 
I'm sure you can get can get a pretty good idea of what voicing the Genie was like by watching Good Morning, Vietnam. 
He's got another serious and almost creepy role in Insomnia too. 
I read this all in his Doubtfire voice. I'm smiling now. 
It's an amazing movie. Have seen it several times. 
My friend worked on that as an intern. Robin Williams remembered him by name throughout the production and even defended him when a supervisor was giving my friend a hard time. Even when the cameras aren't rolling, he was a great guy. 
I think the problem was marketing. Commercials made it sound like a screwball comedy, actual movie was a drama. It was a faithful representation of Asimov's book, too 
Our job is improving the quality of life, not just delaying death. 
I loved this one: "A doctor's mission should be not just to prevent death, but also to improve the quality of life." 
No--don't give in to the "feel worse" impulse. You're doing the best you can. And you're alive. 
I've always thought of comedians of sort of the dark humorist balancing the forces of the universe by making us laugh at sad shit. Comedians probably spend a lot of time thinking of crazy shit that would drive a less creative person fucking insane. Hats off to the clowns. 
my first language is not English, and I still read it with the Obama pauses.. 
They were roommates at Julliards and they promised each other that if one of them got successful they would take care of the other. 
Yeah, this is too far down. It's one of his best performances, IMO. 
I just watched it two nights ago, and he played the perfect "straight" man (har har) to Nathan Lane's over-the-top hilarity. But the true star of that movie is Hank Azaria. He steals the show, which is saying a lot considering who he shared the stage with. 
I might add that Robin treated us all, we all won. 
And they did. The Williams family took care of Reeves' son after both Christopher and his wife passed away. 
God, I would hate to be that son. Loses his mother, than his father and than his father's best friend in all tragic circumstances. I know that the son was probably preparing for his father and his mother to pass away (since they had 'terminal' illnesses) but can you really prepare yourself for that? And now with Robin Williams leaving, poor kid. 
Awww, well how 'bout this. Give someone you know a random hug. Just a no reason, out of the blue, big ol' bear hug. Then tell them to give one to someone else, and then to someone else, and someone else... Eventually, it'll make it's way to me. One day, I'll get a random hug from someone, for no discernible reason, and I'll say to myself "Oh! That's my Dreamstakeroot hug, right there!" Plus, as a bonus, every person in between will get a small moment of random affection and appreciation. It's a win-win, really. 
My sister and I both had this before. It is often unprovoked, and a rare occurrence. We just blink, and wham our vision is 20/20. Then we blink too soon and it's over. I remember grocery shopping with my mother once when I was about 13, and I blinked and suddenly had perfect vision. I saw everything clearly and could read all the labeled sections in the back. I blinked and everything was blurry again. I was amazed and also extremely disappointed that it disappeared so quickly. 
They call the Magical Bum homeless. What they don't know? The world is his home. 
He probably realized what it was and didn't want to get taken to crow court. 
Sounds like some messed up version of Over The Hedge 
Something similar happened to me. I was 5-6 and was playing outside with other kids. All of a sudden, those two cars stop by a sidewalk, they grab a girl on a tricycle and speed off. Only her bike was left. We ran to my mom to tell her someone got kidnapped. She was cooking, somewhat listened, nodded her head, smiled, "Oh, really?" and that was it. I think about it often. 
could have been the colour of your shirt as well. i work at an aquarium, and as someone who wears the uniform, animals get thrilled at the sight of me often, just because of my shirt colour. 
Ball lightning lasts that long? I always assumed it just kinda came down from the sky and burst. 
I'm sure there is some scientific explanation to this, like the lizard went into suspended animation or something (which is weird because I've heard that chameleons are quite sensitive to temperature), but that being said...this is just bonkers. 
I saw the same thing! I told my dad and he looked at me like I was crazy :( 
Our house was struck by lightening one night and my mom says she saw a hovering ball of lightning. Apparently it's something that can happen. 
you witnessed the squirrel/cat nations summit meeting. several treaties came out of it 
You should talk to the other guy with the post about doing his ashtray in the kitchen and never finding it even after a remodel 
I'm surprised he's not missing more than an eye. Abraham Lincoln has been dead for a very long time, he should be rotted to his bones. 
You probably touched a Brugmansia. They are loaded with scopolamine and can cause you to see things that are not there. Inverse colors are a common hallucination from them. Brugmansia are a very common garden flower, despite their effects, because only small children will be effected by contact alone. Did you have big orange flowers that hang downwards in your garden? 
Was there a portapotty nearby? I bet that blue shit can dye mice too 
Wait what do you mean exactly? Like you fell in such a way that your pants slipped down and your back twisted over? Or you like, saw a vision of your buttcrack appear before you? 
Could have been a Will-O'-Wisp especially if it was over a lake. The theory is certain gases like methane and phosphine are either ignited by lightning or chemically react and release light creating what looks like a floating light. 
Funny enough, yesterday I was reading a thread about satellite TV. Back in the day, you could pick up the satellite feeds that broadcasters sent to local TV stations. Like, if NBC was covering a basketball game, they'd have a satellite truck set up at the arena beaming up to space. The satellite would then beam that down to Earth, so that your local NBC station could pick it up and transmit it across its broadcast area. It was up to your local station to then put in advertisements during breaks and whatnot. However, if you had big dish satellite, you could sometimes pick up those raw feeds. Supposedly you'd end up hearing the commentators just BSing, the cameraman aiming at random things, etc. 
I was walking to class and passed by a trashcan with a domed lid. On top was a bottom piece of a bun. As was walking by it, a squirrel came out of the trash can and put a Chick-fil-A chicken on top of the bun, then went back inside the trashcan. I assume it was to get the top bun. I really wish I took a photo of it. Another instance was a squirrel with a cigarette butt in its mouth. 
My mom used to see her dead sister standing at the end of her bed watching her for years after she killed herself. It was always peaceful and tranquil, she says. She liked seeing her. But then one night it just didn't feel right. My mom got scared and shouted for her to go away. She never came back after that. 
As someone who lives in Asia. This isn't too hard to belive. 
The power to fuse and manipulate deli meats. Looks like X-Men is real and you are the Magneto of our reality. 
"no one will ever believe you." - that guy, probably 
Once on a bus going to a Christian youth group event thing, a friend flashed a group of girls in a car we were passing. 5 minutes later they're passing us and flash us back. Best youth group event ever. 
We (people in southern Appalachia) call that a Crow Court. I've seen it happen too, just with one in the middle. While it definitely does happen, apparently no-one knows why. We all know that corvids are crazy smart, so I think the idea of a Crow Court isn't far off. Maybe the crows in the middle did something to endanger the Murder, or they're sick or something. Either way it really is surreal 
That is neat. I can't come close, but, in around 2001 I was playing online poker (hold 'em) on dialup. I'd been dealt AK suited, played it moderate cool, then the flop came up giving me an instant royal flush. Immediately my connection dropped, and by the time I got back online I'd been timed out and we were on the next hand. It took all I could muster to not put my monitor through. That was the end of online poker for me, but over the last sixteen years of casual kitchen table games I've never seen it since. 
A driver in my hometown (suburban NJ) saw a giraffe run across his path. He immediately pulled over for a cup of coffee, and told people he thought he was hallucinating. They tried to call him an ambulance, but then they saw police cars going by... turns out the circus was in town and had lost its giraffe. 
You obvious that you did not see any old businessman, but THE businessman from which all other businessmen are born. 
Investigate this! Surely theres a science subreddit who can explain? 
What the fuck Steve? You said you wouldn't tell... 
My mom was at my grandma's side when she died at home. Basically, breast cancer had run it's course and Grandma was sleeping most of the day, would wake up for a little bit here and there. Anyway, Mon was sitting next to her holding her hand and my mom swears Grandma woke up looked at my mom smiled looked at her feet eyes wide open mouth agape and looked back at mom and said it's beautiful isn't it? Laid her head back down closed her eyes and took her last breath. 
Some skinny, tall farmers feelings are hurt by this. *I'm not an alien guys!* 
They broadcast it live. I was 15 years old at the time, and we watched it in my high school. It's one of those things that defines my generation; We all watched Challenger explode when we were teenagers. 
Are you in North Kansas city? Theres a guy in my girlfriends neighborhood that dresses up in a civil war uniform 3 or so times a week and walks his dogs. We finally saw him walk past her house the other day. Very strange, we even Googled to see if there were any reenactments near by but found nothing. He's a doctor of some sort so I suppose he just has a passion or heavy interest in that sort of thing and has the money to make or buy those uniforms. 
It was the space shuttle. They used to land at (then) Kelly AFB. The first few times they were transported into hangers, then later landings were just left out so you could drive by on Military Drive and see them. 
That could've been the start to a real touching Rom-com or maybe even a drama, but you fucked it up. 
Maybe a water spout forming? That's is a super creepy story. 
I too recall having a shaking bed, as if someone was lifting the foot of the bed up and down aggressively. It stopped around age 4. False childhood memories or dreams...maybe 
If a creepy TV ghost mouthed the word "Floppydlop," I would not stop laughing. 
Here in Japan there is an urban legend about human-faced dogs called "Jinmenken". They are said to appear running along highways at night and have the ability to talk. 
I've had similar experiences of this too, only with smells. My gran used to wear this cheap perfume that can only be described as old lady perfume. She was the only person I knew who wore it. I have moved house a lot since her passing, but every time we get moved in and semi-settled the smell of that perfume comes drifting through the house, my partner also smells it but he never knew my gran. I like to think she's just checking the place out and tutting to herself. 
This one I can imagine is legit. Just not real. I used to get very real hallucinations right as I was waking up. 99.9% of the time it was seeing a spider or spiders climb up a wall or across the ceiling. Like, huge spiders. Sometimes bigger than could ever exist in nature. I used to go literally flying out of the bed, scared outta my mind (huge arachnophobe). But then one day I stared at one, too afraid to move, and it slowly faded away as it crawled. Still happens once in a while now- I just ignore it until it goes away. Anyway, it seems very similar to what you described. 
My wife and I were in the dinning room and the dog was next to us hoping for scraps. Then suddenly the bedroom door opened and slammed. The dog immediately ran up the steps towards the door, just as I did. I searched the upstairs thinking someone was in the house but no one was there. What's interesting is we both (wife and I) heard the door knob turn as the door opened. Clearly the dog heard it too. It was also on a calm day, no wind and our house has no drafts. 
When my cousin died on christmas eve 2012 my aunt found a couple dimes at his crash site and now my whole family does this too. 
Most likely a penis that looked like snoop dog to be honest. 
My cat went to our neighbour's flowerbed. He was a roamer, so I can imagine that he'd been there before, but I remember him hiding under our rhubarb plant and meowing sadly a few hours before that. Poor baby. 
I will defend any dog in crow court, I'm very educated in _bird law_ 
"Uh... so what do we do now?" "Letting me go IS an option." "Fine~ Not like anyone will believe this anyway." 
No, never heard anything afterwards. That's why I've been wondering whether this was real or just my imagination. On the other hand, other kids were with me and all saw it. 
I once wore a maroon shirt to a zoo whose uniforms were maroon. I attracted the animals everywhere I went. This is probably the right answer. 
There's historical accounts of some of them lasting for several minutes and moving around doing all kinds of weird stuff, from boiling water in a nearby bucket to devastating explosions. Observing them out in the open like in OP's story is quite risky, you're much better off staying inside the car when it comes to lightning. 
Hermit crabs molt so what you thought was its body was probably just the skin it shed while it hid deep in its shell. They are "naked" for a couple days and often bury themselves in sand to molt* (edit for spelling) in the first place and then come out and behave just like normal :) 
I just googled it and you're right, not a chameleon. I think it was an Anole. 
Yeah, its called ball lightning. It can pass through windows, and is SCARY SHIT. 
Brugmansia are terrifying! Not two days ago I read a "trip report" about some dude who took Brugmansia tea he made out of TWO LEAVES *AND* TWO FLOWERS (one leaf per 32oz+ of water is MORE than enough), and the guy ended up crashing knee-first through a plate glass window and then ripped the back door to his house off its hinges with his own two hands. Shit is terrifying. 
And it was a Shiny, too! What a missed opportunity. 
That's a chalk line. Sounds better than someone catching him and spray painting him which is what I first thought. 
I have just spent twenty minutes trying to understand what way he flexed in order to see his buttcrack, by twisting up a teddy bear. 
I have a cousin who lives in Kentucky that has a petting zoo. She has a kangaroo, an alpaca, a camel, and various other animals you'd not normally see in Kentucky. She's brought the kangaroo with her to family reunions a couple of times. 
I think this is still possible occasionally? I remember last year when WWE broadcast from the UK someone picked up the raw feed and streamed it live online and you could sometimes hear the commentators during commercial breaks. It's fun to watch. 
The real question here is who threw away a whole Chik-fil-A sandwich? 
Oh Damn. Its 1:30 am here and while I was reading the last sentence my dad started shouting in his dream. Almost shat myself. Almost. Phew. 
Me too. The picture of cows laying on their backs, trying to defend themselves with their feet was also very absurd. 
Yeah but this breaks rule 3 and four. Only two crows to a fight and only one fight at a time. 
He was fishing with mates. They saw him go overboard. 
Why would "adolescent" aliens *not* do shit like this? Maybe it's my trash human brain trying to understand by relation to what I know, but hell. Kids are kids. Unless they're transcendental plasma beings I suppose. 
I'm no liquidologist, but if you had two very viscous liquids, the less dense of the two being black, and you poured the white liquid on top of the black liquid, I figure this could happen. 
Sorry Tim. Some advice, kick your heels off when you're walking down the street at 3am with a few drinks in ya. That way I'm less likely to notice you swaying. 
The other is Southern California. I woke up to one 15 feet away while backpacking in Cespi. They are massive! 
I lived in Korea for a few years and the road to my house was rice paddies and fields and some forest. One time I was driving home late, and out of the forest stepped an old woman with long white hair, wearing white traditional korean farmers clothes. My headlights landed just as she stepped out. I floored it around her and headed home. No one believed me. 3 years later I saw her walking down tne street in the same clothes and a few friends were with me and we had a good laugh. I really thought Id seen a ghost. I feel pretty bad for speeding past her at 10pm now. 
And so soon after the cue ball? Dammit, quantum tunneling. ~~Your~~ You're supposed to be statistically impossible. 
LOL, and of course it's the guitar pick you juuuuuuuuuuuust bought. 
Yes. Also the kitchen was recently redone and it still never turned up. 
It's probably an open secret, or like, secret from the kids or something. My friend who used to smoke would always tell her then-4yo kid, "Mommy's just going outside for some fresh air." 
I wasn't walking about 2 blocks from my house to 711 one night when a very low helicopter shone its light on me like that. A voice over the loudspeaker told me to get back inside immediately. I guess they were looking for someone dangerous. 
Not from KC, but I live on that side of the state. You sure it's a civil war uniform? There's a fort around that area that does a living history thing. He could volunteer there, or he could volunteer at a museum or in Lecompton. That area, especially Lawrence has a pretty deep, significant history in the civil war as well as in the territorial era. 
More like a horror. OP wouldn't be living to tell this story if he decided to fuck with whatever freaky ghost bitch decided to join him. He did the right thing. 
Oh. Even the laughter of a 3 year old at 3am is terrifying. 
My maternal grandmother drank coffee like it was water. I don't think I ever saw her in her house without a mug of the stuff nearby. Neither my mother nor myself are big coffee drinkers. Coffee gets made in our house only when we have guests that want it. Despite this, we occasionally smell a strong coffee aroma around the house, or even while driving down the road (and we live in the country so it's not like we're passing a Starbucks and smell coffee, more like driving through a huge cornfield surrounded by soybean fields and suddenly it's like somebody is brewing coffee in the backseat). This happens once a every 1-2 months. Mom says it's her mother coming to visit her, then gets upset because she explicitly tells all her loved ones not to come back and haunt her. 
Yeah I get that, only it's always the shape of a person I see. Doesn't even end up being shadows, just a blank wall my mind somehow generated an intruder on. 
oh my god, just picturing my little cat doing that breaks my heart. must've been really tough for you. 
Oh, *really*? Let's say you and I go *toe-to-toe* on bird law and see who comes out the victor? 
LPT: when going to the zoo, where the same color shirt as the staff uniforms 
Yeah anoles are pretty jumpy! Most reptiles are cold-blooded and need warm weather to survive. If they get too cold, they can go into a sleep state or die. I don't think one would survive weeks in hibernation, but it is possible that another anoles got stuck in the snow before you discovered it and warmed it up. Anoles can survive weeks brumating, but I don't think they could go for so long at freezing temperatures. 
Ball lighting chasing some teenagers through some woods could make a good low budget movie. 
Nah, shiny mice are green. This was clearly a sonic sighting. It's easy to mistake a hedgehog for a mouse at those speeds. 
My dad used to do that to vermin. He had a live trap, and if he caught one, he'd spray-paint it bright yellow and release it on the back edge of our property. If he caught it again, he'd drown it. No idea why he thought rodents deserve a two-strike policy. 
Did you ever ask him if he actually know what was happening? Or was it just in case it was your granma coming to tell you guys to go to bed? 
Kentucky Down Under? I took a field trip there in elementary school. 
I think it just depends on whether the feed is scrambled. Most of it is these days :( 
I did that once. It was a stressful day and I just wanted to enjoy a spicy Chicken sandwich. The bag broke which ruined the fries I was really looking forward to so I was already pretty upset. Then the first bite into the sandwich was that weird chewy feeling where maybe there's a tendon or something* that your teeth can't bite through and it grossed me out so I quit and gave up on the treat I bought myself. Just wanted to vent about that 
From northwestern Iowa. We get a cougar every couple years wandering through neighborhoods. Last one they killed in front of a school bus. 
Holy shit, maybe you missed some follow up story or something? 
Heck, it might've just been out for a walk and decided to pull a prank before heading home. If it was there in the morning, the zoo would never know. 
Or perhaps 3 What's New Pussycats, and it's just a really long song. 
Also if there was some reactive contaminant in the mixing vessel...which he probably wouldn't have known of. 
What else happened? If you don't mind sharing, of course. 
I feel like with the amount of picks I have purchased throughout the years, my bedroom floor would be covered in them. But I can't find a damned one of them. 
Right into the black hole that cars have next to their seats huh? 
Where do you guys live? I want to make sure I never go there. 
Do we really have to assume that all ghosts are murdering assholes? Why cant they just be chilling watching game of thrones with us once in a while. 
I know right? Not even to try to figure it out or anything, just to have a cool story to tell. I wish I had weird/cool life events like that to tell others. My go-to "interesting story" I tell others is about the time I tripped while running down the stairs and sprained my ankle for a week. I would trade my sprained ankle story for freaky doppelganger story in a heartbeat. 
Just enjoy all the people asking you where the bathrooms are. Animals aren't the only ones trained by shirt color. 
I saw ball lightning one morning while I was on an exercise walk through a cemetery. Scarier than shit. Fortunately I wasn't alone. Just before Dawn. 
I was reading through like damn this sounds kinda cool maybe I'll tr-oke nevermind maybe we'll leave chowing down on hallucinogenic garden plants for another day... 
Can one of you draw? A drawing would be nice, since there isn't a photo. 
Yeah. He knew. I was young and didn't know much about them. Just knew I should be afraid of them. Smell of rotting meat can be a sign that one is near. He knew this and reacted. The smell lingered for about ten mins then went away. Followed by dogs barking like crazy again. 
We have unscramblers galore in Bolivia. They even get monthly updates to keep up with the new codes. Pretty sure you can do that with UK signals, too. It's obviously illegal, though. 
That's okay, I lose my appetite when I hit those chewy spots too. Sorry your treat didn't work out. 
I'm pretty sure they're just trying to deny it to keep peace since it's getting pretty close to the actual town. No darker conspiracy. 
You know it's true love when they pat your back while you puke 
You appear to have a tenuous grasp of the English language 
My imagination says that last crow pecking at the already dead crow was the grieving mother of a baby crow killed by the said crow. 
Cherish it. When I was a kid my sister accidentally let the parrot out of the house. Within seconds a murder of crows tore him up. As if they had been waiting. They didn't posture, no preamble, didn't try to eat him, they just killed him and flew away. Seconds. Crows are savage 
They must live in Los Santos Tryin to make a change :- 
*"Since I'm haunting the place, can I get your Wi-Fi password?"* 
My mom always tells me that when I was born she thought I was abducted by aliens. 
Shit like that is more common than people realize. Alien abduction is a little extreme. But post-partum depression can fuck a woman up. Sometimes they can't rationalize why they aren't enamoured with the new baby, and instead feeling all these terrible feelings. Many consider, and some conclude (pathologically), that this is not their baby. Usual explanation they come up with is an innocent mistake by a nurse. But with hospitals today it's extremely unlikely. And with DNA testing and all, easily verifiable. 
Or faked his own death and took on a new identity to start a new life? 
Thanks, very much appreciated. 11 years goes by quickly, and while I miss her as much today as that day, it does turn into the "new" normal and you stop hating the world. Hopefully some random redditer runs across the story when they've got a lot of grief and it brings them some comfort too. 
Maybe he's on Reddit. Didn't that one guy who did an AMA say he faked his death from a boating accident 
it's different' but it's been 6,5 years for my brother and it's just hit me now that while I miss him like crazy, he's okay. I know it was scary and I know cancer sucks but he is so okay and I just miss him. I used to get really strong dreams about him whenever I was having a really difficult time or something bad in my life was happening. The dreams would be different in details but basically he would come and say he loved me and that he wasn't angry at me and how much he just loves me. A few months ago i had a strong sense of him and just kinda... told him that although I miss him he doesn't have to stay around for me. That it's okay to just go and I'll be okay. This is all really rambling, and I'm crying my eyes out but I'm also smiling really wide. Thank you for sharing your story. Thanks for giving me some peace about my brother. 
Oh man I'd kill for an extra hour of ~~sleep~~ watching old tv show reruns and playing with my phone. 
It's not even one of the Tolkien languages people have heard of, so you get a useless L2 and a bunch of Tolkien nerds stalking you because you're the world expert on Avarin. 
He'd clean the entire house thoroughly, then take all of the trash, dust, and misplaced items he's collected and toss them all into one important room. It would probably be most effective in a bathroom or bedroom. The genie could also "clean" the house of some things that would bother you if they went missing- batteries, some lightbulbs, a remote, maybe a door. 
I see a loophole here. Buy one of those two dollar toy cars, classify it as 'your car', trade that in for a 1986 Datsun, sell the 1986 Datsun, repeat, profit. 
what if you accidently rip off one of your nails? you're fucked dude. 
"Oh no, I can't find Spot!" *Arf arf arf* "Aw fuck..." 
Yes, but it still has the texture of ass and back hair. 
This reminds me of the "shitty super powers" game I used to play with my friends whenever we went to to all-night diner after a closing shift. My favorite one was telekinesis, but only within the context of making soup. Other winners included: - creating sexual tension - always knowing how old a person is - being able to turn on lights with your mind, but not off again 
Would it also throw the smell? If so, I choose this one too. 
I did this today... I work in a oil refinery and they WILL NOT lemme in without my badge... And I forgot it... Had to drive 45 minutes home to get it and then 45 back... Lost $50.... :( 
But the catch is that they don't suck; they actually do blow. 
$500 is a life changing amount of money for me right now. 
I used to fantasise about having the power to know where every bit of dropped currency was in whatever city I was currently in. I would then realise I'd rather just have the power to give myself lots of money without having to walk around for it. 
Could substantially change your life, though. You could use it to get laid a shitton, especially in tourist heavy areas. You would speak the first language of every foreign girl in the bar. That would be life-altering. In more ways than one. 
What if you're in a room with the door closed and it's outside the room? 
Dump it into the self-checkout at your grocery store, or wherever. It'll take a few months to burn through that much change, but it's free, and using the self-checkout avoids the burning judgement of a minimum wage cashier. 
There's not always an arrow, sometimes it's just an icon on the dial. AND ON MY PARENTS' 05 SUBURBAN, IT'S ON THE WRONG DAMN SIDE. That is all. 
I had a professor in college who only owned black slacks, brown dress shoes and white button-up shirts (the kind that are formal, but don't have an actual collar, so no ties ever). He owned a lot of each (showed us a picture of his closet), but it was all the same outfit. Great, smart guy but you're right, he was SUPER cartoonish. 
Shit aspect: one minute into your shit, a guy in a wheelchair rolls into the bathroom. Every time. 
"This is the last one" "Id like a sandwich" "Here's a fucking bullet to the head" "Thanks" 
Definitely shitty when you're on a long drive by yourself 
That would harm me so badly. I'm obsessed with the old arcade game Snake. 
Call Vector Control in your county and say there are a metric crap-ton of mosquitoes hatching because of all the water. Be sure to mention Zika virus concerns. They'll shut that down quickly. 
It's okay we'll just steal this question, reword it slightly, and ask it tomorrow while we have nothing better to do at work. 
The shitty part is that the genie is the one doing the other assignments. He dropped out of high school and doesn't particularly care, so the grade you get on them hovers just barely above failing. 
The shitty part: one of your more senior relatives cleans it up every time, complaining about it constantly 
Wish granted, but it doesn't fly. Instead, it drunkenly staggers about breaking things and trying to fuck your wife. Also, it's inexplicably racist. 
A small portion of your wish shall be granted. I just upvoted all your reddit activity of the last 20 days. Have I done well? 
You didn't specify what stuff or where it comes out, so now every time someone sneezes, you shit your pants. 
Nah, the real wish here is to have chik fil a open on Sundays 
But that wouldn't be shitty, it would have to always be ar 5% so it's always warning you it's running low and is in battery saving mode, but never dies 
The kinda shitty part is that you don't have to go, but you still get reprimanded for not showing up. 
Too bad sleep can't have a gray area. Like, oh, you're relaxing and laying down? Ok, that will be 50% of sleep required compared to actual sleep. 
I think people are misunderstanding "kinda" shitty and reinterpreting it as "completely fucking useless". The original wish was fine 
I think you have *Shitty Genie* confused with *Satan* 
That seems like exactly the sort of wish a shitty genie would be happy to grant. Sure you could be rich, but only in a assortment of 1986 Datsuns and you must progessively go forth to travel the states until none of the dealerships have them anymore, or they're worth less then the 1$ hotwheel car. 
They won't get ripped off, because then they won't be the appropriate length. 
Who the fuck spilled spot remover on the dog again? 
WHO THE FUCK SAID THEY LOST THEIR 3 FOOT DILDO?! WHY DO YOU EVEN HAVE THIS IN THE FIRST PLACE?!?! 
Well, if op doesn't have theirs anymore, I feel like this could cause almost infinite virgininess. 
my favourite is from red vs blue The ability to fly north. You have to walk any other direction though 
I imagine it like a magician, like Gob from Arrested Development.. "Ma'am, open that bag of bread." "It's toasted." "ARE YOU NOT ENTERTAINED?" 
My work is strictly about passes but they always keep a couple of temp ones spare if you forget...And you're nice to the receptionists. 
$50 bucks right now would make life so much more comfortable. Just enough to eliminate a few small worries. 
An Amazon review of Metamucil: 'It's difficult to fully convey how much I love this product. No single household item has so drastically impacted my life. It's like thinking that the whole world is black and white, and then someone flicks the colour switch in your brain and you see rainbows and Haribo for the first time. That's how I feel about my new found bowel movements. This is stuff if legit, yo.' 
Actually, it's pronounced "mill-e-wah-que" which is Algonquin for "the good land." 
Once you give your dog knowledge, then it just becomes depressed like a human. 
I found a hundred dollar bill on the ground once. I've probably peaked with my money finding. 
Ahhhh but it's only after I've gotten drunk *with* them; so, I have to keep them entertained while we drink a lot, while potentially being mutually incomprehensible up until that point. 
Then you're jusr throwing trash at a wall, don't expect anything fancy. This a shitty genie, here. 
Having been a "minimum wage cashier," gotta say, we're not the ones burning with judgement. 
Most banks aren't accepting loose change any more, only rolled. They exist, but finding one would be an adventure. 
The side the little nozzle of the tiny gas pump icon is on is *not* an indicator of which side it's on, some just don't have it 
I'm like this, four pairs of matching chinos, four plain black shirts 
And when you have a quick sneezing fit in the car on a back country road, that would lead to true discomfort. 
From the people who brought you "Is a hot dog a sandwich?" and "Is cold cereal a soup?" comes "Is a pedal a button??" (It's not) 
started my period last night with PCOS. Sleep with tampon+pad, still have to get up every 2-3 hours to change both unless I want to change my sheets too. 
And if it gets really successful, we'll do it again next week. And the next week. And the next week. 
Yeah? Well there's the old joke. What do you call someone who went to medical school, but had a shitty genie do all their homework so that they barely got passing grades and graduated last in their class? "Doctor." 
Holy shit! I did it and then I dropped the toilet paper roll in the toilet! **I HAVE THE POWER!** 
My wife and I refer to any sex that includes biting,scratching, bruises and broken furniture as Klingon Sex. 
The dad only spoke Klingon to the kid, the mom spoke English, kid started rejecting dad at about 7, and by 14ish could not speak or really hear Klingon 
Probably the same asshole who took a bottle of polish remover to Warsaw 
Yeah but think off all the great olive oil OP could make 
Nothing like the smell of ass hair in the morning. 
Teethshifting isn't shitty at all, woulda saved me $10k 
"Illusion , Micha- oh yeah that actually is toast." *It's the final countdown* 
Receptionists are the gateway to everything and everyone. Be nice to receptionists 
Shit, mate, I'd take 10 bucks now and be happy I don't have to starve myself for another few days. 
Nooo no no no no. A clean shit is more than just clean cheeks. A clean shit is when your intestines spend hours nurturing a single precious turd, which, upon its due date, you will birth directly into the bottom of the toilet. You will wipe once just to check, but you will find that it wasn't necessary. Both your intestines and your conscience become clear. Your body is at peace. That... is a clean shit. An unclean shit... is the fruit of your unholy communion with el diablo - that case of beer and the expired frozen burrito. You can try to expel the god-forsaken hellbeast, but a proper exorcism requires time and dedication. And I understand, you've got shit to do and don't have the energy to squeeze out that last fifth of a turd. You get up, attempt to clean yourself, and generally pretend this never happened. But your insides will know, and they will continue to be displeased. A bidet does not fix unclean shits. You need John Constantine or Shitty Genie. Or better dietary habits. 
Unless you're always down on your hands and knees picking up loose change, and end up getting kicked in the teeth anyway. 
You shall be called Sir douchebag, the dragon born. 
$2 for a years worth of inconvenience?! Even if that isn't your property it's still your throne. Just poo it! 
Can confirm, the people behind you in line are probably much more annoyed by it. Looking at you, old lady who still uses checks, didn't even bother to write out part of the check ahead of time, and writes as slowly as is humanly fucking possible. 
My credit union has a mechanical change sorter. It gives you a receipt to take to the teller, and that much gets deposited into your account. No fee if you're a member! 
One person would just shit their pants seven times in a row. Think about the pain that would cause. You monster. 
Still better than spending the night crying in a ball of pain on the bathroom floor waiting to puke again. (Me, age 13-23, until I went on birth control.) I would literally rather die than go back to that. 
I went for a wiz in a coffee shop restroom while waiting for my friends, and my cap fell out of my coat pocket and into the toilet *while i was peeing*. Had to fish it out by grabbing a dry bit, and put it in the sanitary towel bin. My friends arrived to meet me, and one of them left their wet cap beside the table (it was raining heavily outside). I recounted my story, and when one friend said "What did you do with your cap?" i grabbed my other buddy's wet cap from the floor and handed it to the first guy. *"I fished it out"* i said. Dude nearly gagged. 
Just to clarify a bit, the kid started rejecting speaking or listening to klingon, so the dad switched back to english. 
Every third bullet fired in the world then. You could get extremely lucky and have every one ever fired at you be useless, have it never work at all in a meaningful way, or somewhere in between 
If you have a paypal or something I'll send you 10$ right now. I'm pretty broke but I'm not "10$ will keep me from starving" broke. 
But then you get paid out by the tooth fairy. I fail to see how you could go wrong? 
A year in which I sit on the loo twice a week at most. I think you're vastly overestimating the size of this inconvenience, I literally picked the smallest flaw in my apartment. That loo seat will still outlive most of our society 
If it misses, you're totally being watched. If it goes in, who knows. Could've just gotten a lucky shot. Better throw 10 more to be sure. 
Long ago when I worked at a grocery store, I asked a customer why she chose to use checks. She proceeded to fucking complain to management about me after I finished with her. Excuse me for trying to understand the benefits of using checks. 
My bank has a machine that takes your change and deposits it into your bank account if you log into the counting machine first. 
I have no other symptoms of PCOS besides that heavy bleeding. I've been on four different types of birth control and my PCOS powers through like a champ. Now that i'm off birth control due to my slightly higher than normal blood pressure, I get depressed, have regular cramping AND a heavy flow. Plus I can get pregnant with unprotected sex. Lose/lose all around 
Not really, there are plenty for sale now, and it's not creating more supply, just shifting the ownership around. And the guy I responded to was talking about moving around the country to find new cars, so that would spread out the effect even more so. 
Plus, depending on where you live, you'll probably never have a bullet fired at you anyway. 
Thanks for the offer, but I wouldn't accept it even if you did. My mess to get through. 
I took a laxative and a stool hardener and they're really fighting it out in there! 
This guy only poops twice a week?! Or mostly poops at work... Twice a week *at most* . Wat? 
You can make a payment with no money I your account. Checks take 3 days to clear a bank. They can even bounce and then you didn't pay at all but you still have the food and now you're 3 days away. 
As someone who also is a mental health cluster fuck who thought they had narcolepsy, get a sleep study. Turns out I have sleep apnea, and the lack of good sleep resulted in narcolepsy symptoms. Tall, slender, fit, female. The doctor was a skeptical dismissive asshole when I showed up because I met zero typical criteria. But when it came to diagnosis time, he was all proud to tell his med student doing observation that not all patients present with typical appearances. 
Give us this day our daily Mead and forgive us all tresspasses as we did not see that this was not our own home... 
As someone who is living in Abu Dhabi at the moment, this is my go to joke. love it! thanks for making me laugh. 
**Edit7:** Wowee a second gold!?!? thanks stranger!!! 
it doesn't always work like this anymore. a lot of places process your checks electronically right then and there like a debit card transaction. 
Think of the sound that would make as he walked around. Like swishing a beaded curtain. 
And lead us not into DUI checkpoints, but deliver us from hipsters. Amen. 
It sounds like something like this could be a good writing prompt. I'm gonna post it. 
Can confirm. If they run your check through the little machine at the register it was just turned into an electronic transaction like a debit card. Even if they don't do it right there in front of you it is pretty rare any more to have a few days before your account is debited. 
Had those machines for 20years in Australia but don't debit the account. They send the details to a clearing house who insure the check on the spot. It will reject checks not based on account balance but based on a record of passing a bad check or if the checkbook had been reported stolen. 
I wonder if after 3000 years of living it up, you would completely forget all important dates within your original history. We have to stop 10/12! I think. Wait. uhhh... kill anyone named Randalph Hortler! 
Vikings show up and burn down your monastery with all your books in it. 
Hide for thousands of years and eat like shit the entire time. Fat as a bus, still can't die 
Lmao but you have all eternity to dig yourself out 
The secret to those genie wishes and monkeys paws are to make your first wish an insurance wish. Something like "I wish all wishes granted by [wish source] were interpreted benevolently for me and those I care about." now you only end up fucked if they decide to go over board on benevolence. Like 100%win rates making everything boring. Just keep your wishes simple and precise and it should keep you (relatively) well off. If you're truly concerned in a 3+ wish scenario you can compound a few wishes like this to have 1 really safe wish. (I play a lot of Dnd and have gotten used to countering dm bull shit.) 
Collect coins, Those things would bring a huge fortune (also invest in the top 10 companies as they form.) 
Nah man, you'd want to hide that shit. The last thing you'd want is to be captured and experimented on or locked away in a box and buried or some shit. 
Or invulnerability/ immortality that you can cancel any time you want. 
That's pretty noble. I'd probably just end up using my knowledge of the future solely for personal gain. 
 When you're born there will be two of you, at different ages of course. When you get back to the present the other you will go back in time. There won't be two of you after that 
I feel like trying to fix history would be more difficult than it seems. I mean, you'd have less to lose since you're immortal and all but how exactly would one go about it? Just waltz into Berlin and be like "Where's that little d-bag with the goofy mustache?" And unfuck the Nazi party before they commit genocide? Not sure how well it would work out. Also have to factor in what the possible outcomes of exposing your immortality could bring about. Would you be praised? Would there be a witch hunt? Would you get buried alive and just chill with the worms since they can't find a way to kill you? Would you become an everlasting god king? So many questions and possibilities. 
Why bang some of the most famous people in history when you can just become them? History wouldn't know it was you all along... But still bang them. 
Without internet and power you won't impress many. 
I'm not so sure that I would want immortal children. How many children would you and your wife have over the expanse of time? How do you know one wouldn't rise against you? Or rather, are you accepting immortality where you don't age? If so, how could your children age beyond a zygote? 
Well, if you're immortal, you get to see a whole load of history, then the current day, and then you get to keep on going into the future... 
Nah, you've all these random fuckers from this AskReddit thread to keep you company. 
you're immortal, just play dead when they try to kill you and walk away later 
And make a cave painting of Batman. Just because. 
Let's say you are invulnerable as well as immortal. Would you go then? 
I mean, you could just write that shit down. And then put it on the internet once you help it get reinvented! 
Not even. You just need to know some pretty basic shit and general ideas. It's only a matter of time until you become a God and everyone listens to your every word. You can work towards general concepts. Like for instance I understand the idea behind whatever the 3 field rotational farming technique is. Sure I don't know the specifics of modern farming techniques, but I just launched the world's farming technique ahead by 2,000 years. It's 1017 BC. You underestimate how much of the world you can change at that time. Unite the Americas, Australia and the rest of the world early, and so much disease by simply introducing throwing your poop away from your water and washing your hands and filtering water. The list goes on. Don't have to be a genius to get some pretty basic stuff right. 
I convince my monk brothers to build a secret room in clay soil. We impregnate wood with beeswax and use it to reinforce the room. We coat each page in a layer of wax. We fill the room with sand and ash. We seal the room. We build a new room every decade. We develop metallurgy. We build crossbows and guns. When the vikings come, they die. We dry them out. We impregnate their bodies with beeswax. We put their bodies on stakes at the coast. We build a warship. We eradicate the vikings. We are the chosen people. We conquer Europe. Our magic communication devices allow our order to coordinate operations on a massive scale. What is going on? The mongols rise. The mongols fall at our hands. We have mechanical birds of terror. Those who don't submit to us perish. We are the new world order. 
Until you're discovered by an American archaeologist played by Rachel Reisz. 
That's how he got past the boulder. He got gigajacked in 3 days and just shoved it. 
It would be the Rayrayrexian calendar. All praise Rayrayrex and it's infinite wisdom! 
Well if it's 3000 years ago, more like Archaic Greek or Etruscan is the way to go. Hebrew would also probably be good. 
Why does everyone keep assuming they are seen as a god? More likely you are seen as a demon. 
prepare them for war help them vanquish the european onslaught 
Just lawyer that shit. "I wish for a brand new Moleskin Writing Set that makes whatever statements written in the sets notebook immediately become reality". Then the first statement is "this book will alter reality based upon the intentions and desire of the individual writing the statement, not the exact literal wording of the statement itself as it is written". Then you *KNOW* that genie is going to be pissed, so next is "all memory's of my interaction with the genie are erased from his memory". 
Frankly, if you aren't insanely rich before the stock market comes about, you did it wrong. 
Yeah. Being immortal does not mean being omnipotent or even strong. Plenty of ways to disable an immortal, technically. Or just get unlucky and spend an ungodly amount of time being lion food/shit. 
Or predestination paradox. Then you *have* to meddle in history, because "history" won't happen unless you do meddle, or don't, it's pre-destination, so whatever you decide to do it's all good. Obviously you won't know until the date of your birth, but fuck it, at that point you have lived 3000-(current age) years, so its all gravy. 
*"It's longer than you think, Dad! Longer than you think!"* 
I dont know if I would want a suicide out, I feel like I'd hit one rough patch and end it prematurely. But some sort of clause that states, if all of humanity is extinct, I will also die. 
The only thing I'm hearing is a wonderful story idea, to be honest. 
Well it was around the time Rome was founded... so you can watch how it was not built in a day. Significant persons: King David, Solomon, Zoroaster are all in this century. That's all relatively close to each other (geographically) and you can meet all of them. 
Who just gets randomly invited to an orgy? I feel like that's something you need to seek out. I dunno I've never lived in a big city but I'd imagine you would need to put yourself out there and actively seek one out. In Ancient Rome the wealthy would have extravagant parties and their slaves would be required to sleep with the guests on request so it made the whole orgy scenario much more likely to come up. Like "oh you're also banging one of Argoses servants in here? Ah what the hell the more the marrier!" 
How do you farm something to extinction? Were they just really bad farmers? 
Assuming complete regeneration/healing capabilities, it would be faster just to amputate and regrow. 
But torture only works if there's something to lose. If he's immortal, he just has to wait it out with no lasting consequence. 
I'm assuming you're like the Highlander, except without a bunch of other immortals trying to cut your head off. 
Okay, that seals the deals for me. "I'd like to cancel my subscription to life please" 
Im pretty sure with even a fair bit of historical knowledge you could likely rule the world, or damn close. 
So you're saying that essentially I will live alongside my current self until my current self receives the same proposition I did? I am the first wave of a time loop of never ending WhatIsThisAccountFors? 
I can't become Marilyn Monroe on account of my penis 
I was assuming everyone in this thread was going. One of you must know how to make wifi. 
Yeah but then the end of the world, fast forward to a googolplex years and the whole universe is obliterated. Must be pretty hard to live when you are the whole thing in the "universe" edit : People, I don't think that you realize that there might no even be an earth in a billion years. Would you rather be stuck on a barren and dead planet until the universe fades out ? 
And one parrot that refuses to die who mimics your worst attempts at speaking to women that you would rather sustain a gunshot wound than remember again. 
And the best thing, the very best thing, is there's time now. There's all the time I need and all the time I want.Time, time, time! There's time enough at last! 
And Superman. And Wonder Woman. And not "just because" but because you are Batman. 
Then they decide you are the ultimate slave and you get buried with a Pharoh. 
Oh man I remembered that scene where Superman saved the future and Savage was finally happy. 
And then you impregnate the world with beeswax, yeah? 
But he could, couldn't he? Just off the top of my head. There are more an educated 21st century mind could figure out. Teeth and hair falling out? Scurvy, have some veggies or fruit. People getting sick, wash your hands, put latrines far away from water sources. Crops not growing? Find bird poop (guano) deposits and put it on your land. Also, rotate those crops, don't plant the same things in the same fields. 
If you're immortal just float your way over slowly or walk like an undead? 
Crush your enemies. See them driven before you. Hear the lamentations of their women. 
Yep. When people hear things about the peak of Ancient Egypt and Ancient Rome, they think those happened within relatively close timespans. Nope. The amount of time from us right now, back to Ancient Rome at its peak, is about the same as Ancient Rome at its peak to the building of the Great Pyramid of Giza. 
Right, You would be, but more money isn't always bad, give it away, bet on the Red Sox for ~~2007~~ 2004 world series winners, Cubs for 2016 World Series, and Secratariat for the Triple Crown. Fund stem cell research, space travel, nano technology, etc. 
The Romans invented concrete. Just sayin'. I'm having Jack Harkness flashbacks here. 
Is it really a suicide bombing if you don't die tho? 
"It's all good" isn't necessarily true. It's more you never had a decision in the first place. 
I just want the ability to hibernate for as long as I want, by the time I live enough, I'd have vast and immense knowledge about many things, such as time, so it will be relatively easy to determine that "for the next 100 thousand years, nothing much is going on, one huge star exploding, then nothing much for another thousand years, i'll wake up just to watch that star, then go back and wait for intelligent life. Because REALLY the only reason I'd want immortality is to fuck with as much people, and watch as much things unfold as possible, there is nothing ELSE worth eternal boredom. 
What people really want is immortality but with the ability to commit suicide. 
As long as there's still one other human on Earth, you'll still live. After that, you have the *option* to die. Because hey, what if everyone is living one galaxy over now? Wouldn't want to die on your new home just because the last stragglers left on earth finally kicked the bucket. 
Which makes me again wonder: Hmm, if we currently live in NA, would we still be on this continent? I mean, I guess if you can't die, you could try to make a boat and even swim/walk to Greenland/Iceland/England eventually. Because most of the cool historical stuff happened in Europe/Asia/Africa for a lot of early history. I mean, sure maybe the Aztecs make you their god and sacrifice virgins to you, but I'd rather be in Europe, and how the fuck would you get there back then? Hell, I'm in Texas...would not want to be in Texas 3k years ago, and it would take a long ass time to walk to Canada and start trying to get over there. Not that you wouldn't have plenty of time. 
You wanna go hang out under the bridge instead? Could be cool 
Ah yes, advanced calculus, that well-known orgy-door-opener. 
The plant was called silphium. Ancient reports called it impossible to cultivate. So they just over harvested the natural source (in north Africa, I think) until they couldn't find any anymore, and declared it extinct. No one knows exactly what it was, though there are a few theories. It may or may not be actually extinct, no one knows. 
Can't syphillis make you mad? Can't amputate your brain. 
Don't know man. Getting tortured for ages can't be good for your mind. 
Unless everyone on Reddit who said yes is there as well. 
"$40 bucks to cancel?? Fuck that. I'm never subscribing to Life again." 
Ruling 3000 years ago would be way easier than ruling today, you just sit around and eat grapes most of the time 
"Yeah but seriously in the 1940's some guy named hitler is gonna try to murder all the jews and conquer the world!" "the what now?" 
Judging by the comments in this thread if everyone is going it will be an all out war between the empires of reddit! 
In my mind, I would be able to guide humanity technologically so by the time we hit modern day we'd be space faring people. At that point you got a lot more options. Unless you end up floating through space in an accident. 
Well, your immortal i guess, In a few thousand years you can give some archaeologists one hell of a fright. 
I impregnate your mother. You are now my son, son. I love you. You die of old age. The world keeps turning. 
1. Even if he manages to increase lifespans and solve particular diseases like scurvy, he would have no idea how to solve 80% of illnesses. Without vaccines, tons of communicable diseases will still exist. Without contraception, STDs will still exist. Without OBs, infant mortality will still be high. 2. The average Redditor (myself included) knows nothing about crop rotations, and if I went back 3000 years, the farmers of the time would know a lot more about farming than I do. 
Now I'm imagining a Native Amercian Ghengis Khan, and I'm unreasonably excited about it. 
That's a great example. And it blows my mind to realize that the Western Empire's *collapse* took 50% longer than the United States has even existed! 
That is great. I hope to be able to do that if I ever have kids some day. 
*lava starts pouring out* "Fuck, that was THIS year?" 
Yes but you can pretty much piss yourself out of lime bound concrete given enough time 
On the other hand, if you can't die...*surviving* having white hot shrapnel get real intimate with your insides isn't going to be fun. 
Well its more like you do have a choice but you've already chosen. 
This. That solves all of the problems that come with it. 
This was my first thought. I reckon you're underthinking it. It would be faaaaaaar easier to go the route of real civilization making your way to Alaska to Siberia then to China. China to Middle East, at which point the early world is your oyster. England's a dump compared to China/India/Middle East/Meditteranean back then (I would assume). 
"Hey, ladies, mind if I integrate the space under your curves?" 
...then you realize women weren't invited, and the orgies were considered guys night out. 
Well if you can't die, cut off/destroy your head and watch a new one regrow! Unless it also backfires and that head regrows a body and bam you just made an immortal and deranged clone of yourself 
Fuck dude, you just killed me. Never expected a Henrietta Lacks reference here 
Couple weeks in they will realize he is a God. That or a witch and they will try to burn him. 
'i'm bored, think i'm just going to torture the mangled pile of flesh in cell 15 for a bit, boss' 
Ruling 3000 years ago would be way easier than ruling today, you just sit around and ~~eat~~ have grapes *fed* to you most of the time. 
Does Hitler come to power if I am Holy Roman Emperor at the time? My bet is on "No". 
Yeah, but still, what happens after ? As I said, the universe is destroyed, then you'll infinitely float through nothingness. 
10,000 YEAAARRRSSS CAN BE SUCH A CRICK IN THE NECK. 
Now accepting applications for the Church of Jesus Christ of Reddit-day Saints. 
We've drastically improved on the efficiency of that process. 
"You bitches know I'll be back for you, best be ready for that. Sleep with one eye open" -Jesus, probably 
Except you can't replenish your fluids, so you have a finite anount of piss. 
I'm pretty damn sure it's also not particularly funny if you *don't* survive. 
Yeah I remember Arthur thinking about how he has no idea how cars work. That part was really on point. We'd all be the Sandwich Makers of ancient Greece. 
It's just gonna be awkward when you realize *you* are the one who becomes hitler and "well I better kill all them innocent people otherwise the world might be different later" 
"At first I went mad of course, but after a few millennia I got bored with that, too, and went sane - very sane" 
You're correct, back then England was still home to the celtic tribes. The romans didn't turn up until a fair bit later to really kick off the whole civilisation thing. 
"Mind if I derive you? That way i can tangent to your curves" 
Technically you would be the head. The worry would be the body growing a new one. 
They will probably cut you up and deposit your body parts all over the world, while you are still alive... 
People seem to have no clue what "forever" means. If you are immortal, it is completely inevitable that at some point you are going to be the only thing left in the universe, and then that will be the state of affairs for ever afterwards. No escape, no stimulation, no heat or sound or light or anything. For infinite years. 
You bastards! Stop leaving pamphlets on my door, dammit! 
Ooh, is that a real achievement? That's a pretty cool reference to CK2's Sunset Invasion DLC. 
"And when I get back, I better not see any eggs, do whatever you need to do; paint them, hide them, I don't care, just make sure they are gone." 
At noon of the day of the eruption, Vesuvius spewed a large plume of steam for several hours. The deadly rock-encasing bit didn't happen until late at night. Watch out for falling rocks though. Also, keep in mind that thousands of people DID escape Pompeii and Herculaneum. 
"LOL POMPEII BRO 420 BLAZE IT ROFL THROW ANOTHER ROMAN ON THE BARBIE" 
It's how we'd start. But we'd teach them to boil water, and we all probably know a bit more about farming than we think. Nobody has talked about where we'd be three thousand years ago. It would probably be part of the trick, we'd be in the same place. So, a lot of us are dealing with Indians instead of Greeks. It'd be interesting trying to jump start an industrial revolution here or anywhere else. I mean we might not understand cars, but we could guide development and research towards what we do understand. We could definitely bring some ideas about modern philosophy and organization. 
Nah, it's more you *don't* become Hitler, you realise he actually had a massively positive net impact on the world by showing everybody what happens when you do that shit, and without that the 21st century is full of technologically advanced genocides. So you go back again, become Hitler, be the example the world needed, and drink your way through what just became a really shitty immortality for you. Either that or you are actually Jesus, and you *really* hold a grudge. 
I think I'm okay with regular old existentialism, thanks. 
With 'standard time' being approximately instantaneous. She's in there *forever*, or at least until they find a way to get her out. Which would be like instantaneous eternity * a few decades. What he did is absolutely a fate worse than death. At some point you have to get her out just so she can kill herself. 
Then in the 21st century some historian will dig up my parts, assemble them, and... wait, I think I've watched this one. 
Not infinite years. After the heat death of the universe, another universe will most likely be created due to quantum fluctuations in around 105600 years. 
Yep! **Sunset Invasion** *Own and have cores on Lisbon, Madrid, Paris, London, Amsterdam and Rome as the Aztecs.* 
But give me some chocolate covered rabbits. That shit is delicious. 
"OUR GOD KING SAVED THE POPULATION OF POMPEII! GLORY TO HIS NOODLY APPENDAGE!" 
Are you kidding? I'd be right in the middle of it. You'd be able to prove/disprove whether or not jet fuel melts steel beams. Actually, this is what I would do. I would spend the next 3000 years as a conspiracy theory buster. I'd make my own little show like Jamie and Adam and I'd go through the centuries trying to find out the truth on as many conspiracy theories as possible. 
Yeah. I feel like you'd be more likely than not to end up buried alive over the course of 3000 years. I'd still take the chance. Reward is too great to pass up. 
Yeah, that sounds like a pretty big warning sign to me. 
Maybe we're lucky that Hitler came along juuuuust before nuclear weapons started popping up everywhere. 
Yeah, some blonde bimbo will blow you up with a rocket launcher then. 
Third time round I guess it would feel like waiting for a bus. 
I was born in the carbs, molded by them, I didn't see a gym until I was already a man and by then it was blinding 
South America, too: *A Sun God* Form Inca, embrace all Institutions and own all of South America as core provinces. 
Bro.... you know those are rabbits made of chocolate, not chocolate *covered* rabbits, right? That would be disgusting. 
Also bear in mind you'd be saying it in Latin, which has crazy tenses. 
Keep in mind that just because 9/11 doesn't happen because Islam never existed, doesn't mean that nothing happens. Perhaps the religion that would have been Islam becomes something else, and they blow up a set of towers in the British colonies. Your edge of knowing the future is going to wear off wayyyyy before you even reach a year ending in A.D., let alone the 21st century. 
The Devil is always in the details, after all. Immortality can range from something as simple as being incapable of dying from natural causes (like old age, cancer, diseases) to that + a regeneration factor that can be as weak as only managing to stop you from aging or as strong as being able to regenerate from as single cell, to being able to pop back into existence even if every particle in your body gets reduced to pure energy. 
Lucky? Or calculated by our immortal, time-traveling overlords? Wake up, sheeple. 
I thought it was from The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy books. 
Eventually your trips through a universe full of stars would be like trying to get the high score on an arcade cabinet. You'd know roughly how much time this universe has and try to outdo your previous run and advance a species further, remembering the advancements made in the last universe and giving them to primitive intelligent life. 
My general rule would be, if the word Jesus exists, stay away from pompeii. 
You are god-king, you are speaking whatever the fuck you want 
Or you can be Jack Harkness, stuck in a timeless state of 'alive' 
My ex was scheduled to appear on Jerry Springer once. His girlfriend at the time was a topless dancer, and their show recruiters went to the club she was dancing at to pick up girls for upcoming episodes. She agreed to film, and managed to get a deal where my ex would get to appear on the show with her. Behind the scenes negotiations involved coming up with a storyline and light scripting (the plot would be that he was appearing on the show to propose to his stripper girlfriend, and she would reveal that she was actually prostituting herself and would introduce him to her pimp). The show runners loved it and even agreed to provide an engagement ring for the bit. So he woke up for his morning flight, turned on the TV while he packed, and watched the twin towers fall on live TV. 9/11 blocked his chance at white trash fame. 
My favorite is the episode (no idea which of the ghost shows it was) where they hear this wheeze. Most of the show was them freaking out about them. Come to find out it's a really fat cat just chilling on a bed upstairs with a breathing problem. It was pretty funny. 
It's a running joke amongst friends that if you see a white guy driving a yellow taxi in Manhattan, be ready for Cash Cab. 
I mean, if they're making you do things that you wouldn't do normally, that's literally fiction... 
Someone did AMA about American version of this. He said he had to end up selling the car to cover maintenance expenses. On mobile so can't find the exact URL. 
They piece together the narrative for these based on fan reactions. Social media is probably more responsible for keeping reality TV going than almost anything else. They don't like the fact that that BITCH Alison is somehow still getting all the attention from Tyler? Let's work with that, and make it so that she's actively manipulating him and really doesn't care. 
I was born in Henry County, VA and lived there until I was 8, and my sister is 40 and has lived there her whole life. Shining like that actually happens, but not nearly to the scale that it was shown. My sister's ex did have a cold water creek still and made illegal shine (albeit in Patrick County). Now I live in east TN, and everything here is legal. 
"...we already agreed what it would look like after its done." "I know but at least act more surprised!" 
From my experience watching the show and other HGTV shows, they almost always make the wife look like a whiny bitch. 
I have no clue how people love his show so much... my gf is obsessed. And I'm like wtf it's so fake it's ridiclious. 
Can confirm, Survivor is some real shit. I had a lecturer who used to be part of the medic team. People got hurt pretty often, although it was usually the crew, since there's a lot more of them. But exhaustion was a big part of the cast's issues. He also watched a fellow cast member drown, while on an expedition/day off on one of the islands. Those islands can be genuinely dangerous places. 
This shows how fake these show are. It's a show about pigs and they're using bullshit. 
I always wondered if they got to keep the furniture and whatnot. Do any of them offer to pay extra to keep it or try to set a budget for them to spend on it off camera? 
Did he just tell the *guy* that he wanted to be on the show so they just gave him a random item the shop already owned? haha Or did he borrow an item from *another* guy he knew? 
My friend was one of the rubbish acts. He knew he was awful, the producers knew he was awful. He was only putting on a character for a laugh. He got called back for the novelty "shit act ensemble" at the end of the season. Also, this is why so many people come out with shit like "I quit work to be here!" and are devastated when they don't go through, the fact that they've got through the untelevised rounds already has gotten their hopes up. 
I'm glad Bargain Hunt is largely real. I think I'd have lost my faith in TV altogether if something as wholesome as Bargain Hunt turned out to be all staged!! 
Even as a viewer, I've reacted to that. They do a lot of stuff that looks good, but they don't do anything to the bits that keeps it running and safe. 
"Wait, wait, can we try that entrance again? I don't think I seemed surprised enough." 
A month ago Reddit told that the show was filmed in a recreated studio, due to laws pertaining to the filming inside pawn shops. Anyone know the truth? 
My fraternity helped in a build of a house for that show here in our town. Can confirm, Ty is a dick. He just acts like he's god's gift to the world, and that he's too good to talk to you. Also, he doesn't do jack shit towards the build, they go off kind of like a Habitat for Humanity build. It was still a cool experience. 
Those guys are so over the top it's hilarious. *digging in the dirt and finds a small metal object* "Holy cow! I don't believe it! This is unreal! *runs up and down the field doing cartwheels, runs in circles whooping and hollering* Other guy goes, "what'd you find?" *panting, exaggerated heavy breathing* "I just found, are you ready, a metal bar!" *other guy starts whooping and hollering and turning cartwheels and running in circles* "Are you kidding me!? This could've come from Gen. Washington's wagon! This is unreal! Wow." Later on you discover it was a piece of metal off some unknown farmer's hoe. :/ 
My dad's good friend was on hell's kitchen too. because she had to wake up at 2 am and get yelled at for being slow, she actually cut one of her fingers off. they sent her off to the hospital and put the whole thing on air as a dramatic exit. 
I feel like this would have been a way better episode 
They clear out the store for filming and select people from the line outside to be extras during filmed sequences. Almost all of the items brought in are prearranged. 
What they mean is that he's not outrageously attractive but also not deformed enough to have a good sob story. Perfectly average just won't cut it. 
There's videos on YouTube showing them getting recognized during filming. I'm sure it's harder for them to film segments now. 
I wonder as well. Some of those kids are ripping the carpet up and poking holes in the drywall. Some lady comes by with a chalkboard and makes them do chores. All the sudden they are angel and can't stand to see them go. And the parents are incompetent boobs who become parents of the year by the nanny reminding them that their kid needs a hug sometimes. 
I had two friends on the show. There was a lot of disappointing issues with the way the show was made. They were very restricted in what they could do. Like not being allowed to go over that hill where all the edible plants are, or failures making it into the show, but not showing when they actually succeeded in getting a fish. Basically, the survival was real, but they were set up to suffer. And of course the editing filled in when needed for the "story". Also knew a guy on Dual Survival. It seemed pretty genuine, but there were definitely moments where you could tell something was up. 
... I can't help but feel this could become a kind of dark humor copy pasta. Two or three paragraphs that just suddenly and abruptly end with those last completely irrelevant two sentences. 
One of my highschool friends who is trans ended up doing a Springer show where they did this whole "I'm a man" reveal to their boyfriend. They had never met before. 
My husband worked for two years as a tour guide at Eastern State Penitentiary in Philadelphia. It was haunted alright - by bats, cats and rats. Never quiet, always something going on among the furry residents. He did a show in the rotunda, and the audience was dive-bombed by bats and a feral cat kept knocking over the props. We were both there many nights locking up by ourselves, and it was damned noisy for a deserted prison....but of course the other employees blamed "ghosts" or "spirits". 
My favorite for this is Destination Truth. The host is an archaeologist and part of the Adventurer's Club. He does another show on the travel channel now that's a little less outlandish in what's being investigated, but with both shows they go into pretty nice detail about the areas they're visiting and some of the customs of the local people. 
Those orbs are just dust motes that are close to the camera lens and out of focus. 
They went to some place they didn't know, got told to go to some completely different place they didn't know, all to be dropped of at some random place they didn't know. And in the end, having to play for your way home, and not get the big free meal they were promised. 
Haha for realz. To avoid that pitfall, the producer gave us an address that avoided highways 
When you get into the cab, they give you a rundown on the rules, and you'd be free to say "no thanks" and not ride anywhere. But it seems fun, so I'd do it. I'd be annoyed at being hungry though. There's no reason they had to tell to eat less at lunch. 
Not sure if it's true, but I heard they have that clause more in case they need to, but it's not something they actually use. ie- they find out a contestant is a convicted rapist, they can just vote him off the show without worrying that a convicted rapist will win the grand prize. 
Wouldn't surprise me. Lord knows if that happened to me, and I was unaware of it beforehand, I'd sue. I like my furniture thank you very much. 
The way it works here (in Georgia) is, as long as you don't sell it, or make an obnoxious amount that you MUST be selling, it's legal. But they payed it off as being totally illegal to even make it. And yes, we do have some "back water, back woods" stills, I got one myself, but that is just for fun and tradition. The good stuff is made in stainless steal vats, refined several times, and in a controlled condition like a storage shed or someones garage. The show was just all about getting ratings by pushing some ignorant stereotypes. 
"When I say 'Hello, Mr Thompson' and press down on your foot, you smile and nod." 
It's completely random from what he told me, his tattoo really doesn't suit is personality and it's fading like crazy already, a lot of people say the tattoos they got done weren't done to a very high standard ie. not deep enough in the skin etc 
Likely that and the part where I'd be talking about how X room would make a great gaming room. 
Are you saying that all reality shows should have their characters replaced by pregnant 16 year olds? Survivor just got *way* more interesting 
Holy shit. I'm sorry to hear that she was taken advantage of like that. 
The international version is just interesting to watch, especially if you are planning to visit or ever think about moving there. The Australian ones have essentially confirmed I will never retire there due to the stupidly high prices for real estate. "Bob and George want a three bedroom house near the beach, their budget is $1.6 billion..." 
I was watching some American survivor like show and one of the guys who initially scouted out the island got bit by an extremely poisonous snake and had his flesh on his leg destroyed. 
A restaurant I used to work for catered live celebrity chef events. Several of them were winners of Top Chef or various Food Network cast members (not the big names, but members of the teams that swoop in to help). They would send our owner a signature recipe in advance, he would show up with one of his chefs and while the Celebrity Chef was making one serving of their dish out on stage to demonstrate the two of them would bust ass and make a few hundred copies to serve to the audience once the demonstration was over. 
That is a great question. We outside performers just went home after filming. I bet they did stay together though, just not same bed. 
I know that for Fixer Upper, they use a bunch of stuff from Chip and Joanna's stores. The people are given a price to buy the staged items if they really love them, but otherwise it gets pulled and goes back into the stores. 
I'm pretty sure my uncle was asked if he wanted to be in the show by his friend. As for the item, I don't think he ever told me the part about where it came from. 
Best episode of cops was "I'll get you bitch" or that episode where that lady was so angry at her husband she takes out scissors and starts cutting everything in their house. Even her hair. 
"I'm wearing boots of escaping! I'm wearing boots of escaping!" 
I'm glad he knew, I always felt bad for the shit acts because I thought they all believed they were good when they were basically being asked back for the public humiliation. 
Kind of. You've got to be either really great or if you're terrible you've got to be a character. Kevin Smith, the fresh faced graduate who is terrible, isn't going to get anywhere near the judges auditions. Whereas, Colin Jones, the 56 year old plumber who's got a secret love for Spice Girls songs and is also terrible, is more likely to go through. It is an entertainment show after all. 
thats weird that just because he works for a company hes considered property of disney. 
She said she had no idea what day it was or what time of day it was. That alone will will mess someone up, especially after weeks and weeks like that. Then throw in alcohol and zero contact with the outside world it begins to feel cruel. She said she spent all day in either makeup or hanging out with the other girls. The show centers around the guy, but when he goes on 4 hour dates with one girl, that leaves 15 other girls with each other. And if he just went with Girl A, she has to wait for him to go on dates with Girl B, then Girl C, etc before Girl A even gets to see him again. The girls spend exponentially more time and get to know each other way more than any single one of them gets to know the guy. 
We had Natasha Raskin as our presenter, Dickinson was varnishing himself up elsewhere. 
Not always. A few people got lucky enough to have some decently impressive engines installed 
Pretty sure thats because you were in the target demographic. Doubt many 40 year Olds were watching that like "I'd be so cool bringing that to the office on Monday." 
They are *really* experts at preventing this kind of thing from happening. I have heard stories of people on big brother where the staff was trying to push them to trash talk on other people and they would ask the most horrid manipulative leading questions and when they tried to refuse, they held up their contract and threatened to sue them for not cooperating. 
I watched the show a few times, and always thought, "I'd be livid if they threw away my ratty t-shirts and workboots. I run a FARM, in TEXAS, I really don't care how lovely layered tops work with a modest heel, I need something I won't have a heatstroke in while I milk goats." 
Haha I actually have a feeling that might have been how it went down. I assume most people put together their worst outfit for the interview but I still had some self respect so I put on something I'd actually wear. I think if I had a pic everyone would agree it looked alright -- just looked like a movie assassin outfit or something. Woot let our spines fuse together! Ha pun. AS power. 
I've actually thought about how funny it would be if they show the guy getting taken down after he walks out the front door, and then it cuts back to Hansen just unwrapping the happy meal the guy brought with him. 
Adam Carolla actually called him out as being a fake. Asked him questions a real carpenter should know. It didnt go well, Ty is a phony. 
Oh yeah. Plus the family was fairly wealthy and totally didn't need to be rescued. Meanwhile my friend's dad's house was still flattened. 
You can, but local noise ordinances apply. Of course you can do whatever you want if no one enforces the laws or you bribe the neighbors. 
I went there a couple years ago. There is the pawn shop where you could buy stuff like a normal pawn shop. Apparently, the Pawn "Stars" come out sometimes to interact with people, but not very often. One of the workers told us there was another shop they did the actual filming at. 
Everybody that appears on Pawn Stars has to apply and have their inventory pre-examined for authenticity. It's not like random people bring in that kind of stuff. They also pick people with stuff that isn't real, to try to make the show seem authentic. 
I've heard stories like that happening as well as of families who pretty obviously have zero money management skills suddenly get a house free and clear, worth much more than their old one. They mortgage it, waste the money, and get foreclosed. So all that charity work and good feels gone because the family ends up where they were heading in the first place. Another favorite is I've read people who did Fixer Upper would move out of the house and then list it as an Air BnB or similar since it has that 'star power ' attached to it. 
Probably about a 2. You sometimes get an actual documentary about animals, but for the most part it's Finding Bigfoot season 23 and Jackson Galaxy Cat Whisperer reruns 
...because the ferrets learnt from the dog. It was his plan all along to get famous. 
My favourite part was on the show they got all this cool stuff and then as soon as it's over they take a lot of the cool stuff back. 
Was it where she was dressed as a hula girl? I didn't see the whole episode just a clip, I have no idea why she was dressed like a hula girl. 
Josh Gates is definitely in my Top 5 People to Have a Beer With list 
So are you saying that the cooking show opportunity was false, and that they baited you into cash cab? And that they abandon people hungry and alone and remote as standard operating practice? 
Hungry people have a harder time thinking and remembering things. 
Also on the x factor you usually have to have a sob story 
That would be me, but if they smashed my old stuff, lawyers would be inbound regardless. 
Like seriously, who the fuck thinks it's a good idea to redecorate and repaint a person's house without their knowledge or informed consent? I'd be fuckin pissed too, even if it was a quality job. 
It must be "De grote beurt", what a fucking shit show that was. 
"HELLO MR THOMPSON" *Presses down firmly on foot three times* 
I'm pretty heavily tattooed so I like to think I know a decent tattoo when I see one. I also know plenty of people in the industry. For the most part, the tattooers on Tattoo Fixers are utterly shite. "Sketch" especially. He's a glorified scratcher. The issue genuine tattooers have is the bad name they give the industry. Interestingly enough, one of my tattooers currently working on my second 3/4 sleeve said that one of the knock-on effects of the show that they have noticed in their shop is that they are getting fewer requests for cover-ups, primarily because of the reactions of the "tattooers" on the show. If a client thinks they're going to have a tattooer laugh and take the piss out of them for one bad life choice, then they're unlikely to want to get it out to show anyone. Aside from the actual poor quality of their tattooing, the way they deal with clients is just highly unprofessional. 
Survivor would become the prequel to 16 and Pregnant 
My husband started off passively "watching" The Bachelor because of me but now he knows all the tropes and can spot which girls or guys will make it to the end and thinks the show is hilarious. 
Oh crap! The real estate market has crashed??! *drops smashed avo on toast* 
Exactly this. I know it's fake. I just like to see the different house, pick the one I would like the most and then see how the renovations go. Although nowadays, everything in the US seems to "I want an open concept", with no separation between kitchen, dining and living room. And the kitchen MUST have an island or a peninsula. 
Nah, it's cool. I do remember that show. It's hilarious to see that the most cheffy thing Aristos did was go outside and fang durries. 
See I'm kinda more okay with that IF the recipe was made by the CC. I dont think it will be very smart time wise to just have the CC cook for the whole audience 
People used to do enemas for medical reasons a lot. Tobacco enemas were a thing in the past. 
Nah, hands down it's gotta be that "I can break these cuffs" dude. I was on the edge of my seat when he tried to break those cuffs. Turns out he couldn't break those cuffs. 
Wasn't there one guy who got a brand new car because his old one was Frankensteind from two or three different cars? 
Yeah it probably went down more like "hey we got a literal potato in a burlap sack down the hall, let's cut the normie loose so we can get lunch." 
*Chris Hansen turns to the crew* "Hey guys what do you want for lunch? I can message the next perv from the bait account and ask them to bring some fast food." 
Adam was a contractor so that makes a lot of sense that it'd piss him off for some dude to lie about it on a show. 
You know you've hit rock bottom as a tv personality when you start doing mortgage commercials. 
That's OK, it's probably half made out of cardboard! 
Or if the town wants publicity and willing to make a concession for a short period of time as long as the towns name and some of its features are highlighted somewhere in the final broadcast of a show 
Noise ordinances aren't enforced based on who's making noise. 
We have the same situation in the UK with polish guys. Hardest working people, do such a good job, never complain. And a lot of people regardless still have the same bullshit attitude to them, that they're terrible scrounging immigrants. 
The show is filmed in the back room with sets that look just like the actual store. I was an extra on it before. They asked us while we were waiting to go inside. 
Go on any autograph or memorabilia forum, bring up Pawn Stars and you'll see people complaining about all the fake crap they've bought on that show. 
Back when History and Discovery were still decent, Animal Planet was pretty good too. 
No from what I remember they were all dressed pretty casual/normal. The guy put on this whole disgusted act, but anyone who knows my friend irl or even has them on Facebook knows they're extremely open about their transition. 
He definitely seems like an awesome guy. I imagine just listening to him talk about his adventures would be fun. 
"I'm just a small town country girl" whosedaddyboughtmemyownrecordingstudio 
Hey guys I just found this cool new religion. It's called Wurtzism and I think you should all try it. 
Right? What are they expecting? That the person is so overjoyed they completely forgot about all the other things that have been in their daily lives for years? 
Pretty sure doing a makeover of someone's house and getting rid of their furniture without the hone owner's notice or permission is very illegal. 
Yeah, if youre gonna fake anything, fake the reactions. Tell them beforehand, have em sign a waiver, then have him fake surprise 
The people on that show, specifically that Sketch guy, are universally hated by the tattoo scene. He also steals designs from other artists. All sorts of controversy about him and this show. 
That's a good point actually I've never thought about it like that, thinking about it though if I really regretted one of mine and went to get it covered up and thought they'd laugh at me I'd be seriously put off 
The woman always need a place to "entertain guests" and the man always needs a "man cave." Or it's just "not authentically [insert current county] enough." 
There's always that one person in the couple that seems to complain about every little thing. "MMMm yeah I dunno bout this caaarpet" "Mmmnoot feeling this kiiitchen" "Yeeeah this one doesn't have a ocean viewwww" 
She also wants to live in the middle of the city but also wants it to be quiet and charming. Her budget is $12 and she also has a sack of potatoes. 
Thats true, but we really have no way of knowing if it was by the CC or not. And they *could* do a large batch recipe and have assistants help plate, but I suppose part of the event is teaching you a recipe to cook for your family in realistic portions, not how to cook for hundreds. 
Will you be my enema guy? You know, just in case I need one? 
Yeah. They gave him a new Scion or something that looked like a cube. He had a handicapped brother and some other kids he drove around for his mother. I remember this one pretty well, I felt super bad for this guy. He was pretty young, like 19. He was my son's age and he had a ton of responsibility helping his mom. Seemed like such a sweet kid. 
Behind the scenes: "Now remember, this bad boy puts out 500 BHP, your fiat panda has an original 40 HP, so never EVER floor it" "...and the new engine weighs about 300 kgs more than the old one, so technically you can't bring any passengers" 
LMAO. "Hey bb, don't forget the lube and condoms. Also, some Wendy's. I need a #2, large, with a Diet Coke. A #6, medium, with a sprite and substitute chili for the fries. A #3 with Sprite. I also need two crispy chicken snack wraps and a 4 piece nugget. And can you do lite ice on the sprite with the #6? Thank bb." 
Or payday loan commercials. *Looking at you Montel Williams*. 
Look at mr. fancy walls, using cardboard! I built my home out of toilet paper and used McDonalds straws! 
Noise ordinances are also probably not enforced when all the houses are flattened in the area. 
stereotypes don't help anyone. I worked with poles for years and like any group many were hard working, especially the younger ones. Then I'd go home to my house share with 5 of them, 3 were on benefits and two were incredibly violent alcoholics who I could hear drinking all day and often woke me up belching. They were both women. People are people. 
Which is the only reason why anyone watches his show. I don't think anyone actually expects he's going to find the Loch Ness Monster in a 30 minute tv spot. 
Trading Spaces used to air the ones where people were pissed. You should look for the purple house episode. 
Honestly, I always thought that's how those shows worked. Surprised that part is actually honest. Guess it's not that complicated when the family is behind it, but still. Doesn't seem like a great idea. 
One of the tattooists from that show is also in a new one as a judge for best british tattoo artist. The guy is nowhere near good enough to be able to judge other people's work. 
You can tell the "fixed" one because it's a gigantic black blob haha 
I have a piece on my back that while I don't regret, was definitely a struggle. The first artist I went to decided after outlining and putting in initial color he was only willing to do the rest in red because he apparently recently decided all dragons should be red. I ended up finding another artist for the color and he didn't do that great of a job. It wasn't a terrible tattoo, but it's something I'm not very happy with. I recently got a leg piece done and because the experience was so solid I went back to him and asked him what he could do with the piece on my back. It's far too big and black to cover up, but it can definitely be helped and he was really open to doing it and really complimentary of the idea behind it. It was such a refreshing interaction after being unhappy with it for nearly 10 years because of how shitty the last 2 experiences I had were. 
Sketch is so shit. Jay does pretty good black and grey realism from what they show. Then there's Alice: "I want death jumping a motorcycle over a valley of lava" "Okay so I've drawn this flower..." 
God that "man cave" shit has to stop. It's like a virus of cliches invented by a TV show that's spreading to reality. You're not keeping up with the Joneses now unless you have a side room with a 400" tv, a deer head and a beer sign. 
Not always. There was an episode awhile back where the couple ran a catering business. The house they looked at had new metal shelving in the basement with catering supplies on it, a bed in the master bedroom, and landscape material in the backyard. Needless to say, that was the house they "picked" and they had already started moving in. 
The other day I was watching that RV show. There was a new rich kind of couple - the backstory was that he had "sold an app" - that was checking a million dollar RV. While checking the bathroom the wife said "oh, I can't stay here because there is just one bathroom sink. The thought of sharing it makes me want to puke." Wow, just wow. 
Even worse is when it's like, "John sells artisan tinfoil hats and Sarah wrote the first paragraph of a novel six months ago. Their budget is $2.5 million." 
If I got the opportunity to hug Holly Willoughby, I'd insist on at least a few takes. 
I'm surprised they didn't just install a sack of gold plated potatoes. 
The "I'm studying and I guessed the answer to a question, checked it, saw I was wrong but yeah I kinda got it and moved on" style. 
Well, it's Death grilling you, I'd be 100% ashamed as well 
Shoulda made it out of bidets and straws, uses much less natural resources. 
And to be fair, I don't think they should be after a catastrophe like a tornado or a flood. When people are without a roof above their head construction should be allowed to continue 24/7 if you have workers willing to work that long. 
Poles are totally random, can confirm, I'm a Pole. 
I hope this is only "the stuff we did was not actually street legal so we have to take this out so you're allowed to drive your car" and not "well show's over, pack it up boys"... 
That show was terrible. It was like they were trying to play practical jokes on each other instead of making something nice. I saw one where they spray painted someones couch. 
I completely agree with you. When we bought our house friends and relatives were commenting that the finished basement was going to be my "man cave". I had to repeatedly tell them: No, it's the media room. It's where anyone in the family can come and watch TV, Movies, it will house most of the toddler's toys, I may setup the area under the stairs as a little club house for the toddler, and it will have theater like seating. There's no area in the house that is being used exclusively by me. Not to mention, you would have thought that the giant framed Mickey Mouse Club House drawing would have made them rethink their assessment of the area. 
Even in the video, they do it as much as possible. At the end she's like "please... Please stop... Stop touching... Stop touching me..." 
With a water cooled 3 inch lcd panel with vital potato related information 
How did it take me this long to realize he voiced death? 
"What do you mean I can't have a Playstation in the middle of the steering wheel?" 
There was one episode where they glued hay on the wall! Literally hay. Can you imagine how gross that would be!? I just imagine dust and allergies like crazy. Plus, how the heck do you remove that? 
"He's just representing the fact that he's been a member of the club for years! Good on him for repping his colors." 
It's just a job to him, and the $$ is too good to pass it up. It's not a carpentry show, it's a reality show. His job is just to yak cool-sounding words, converse with people, and act excited/surprised/sympathetic at the right moments. He doesn't give a shit about carpentry. If it was a show like *Holmes on Homes*, where the host is very hands on and does a lot of the work himself while expertly explaining the process...Ty would get fired by the first week. One thing Ty has going for him he probably worked hard on public speaking and how to host shows. Not a complete loss, I guess. 
"Let's count shoulders" Or "If you were a pirate would you have a parrot on this shoulder, or *this* shoulder" 
my boyfriend does this to me all the time would recommend 11/10 
He just went from like 100 karma to well over 16,000 
I think most of us read "movies" then came to the comments, realized it wasn't, but didn't care enough to switch mental gears. 
Oof. While hilarious, his account is toast for a few weeks. If he wants to keep using it, his best movie is to stop redditing for a couple months. 
Had to read this 3 times cause I still thought you said movie at the end. 
Haha OP is trying to get serious advice but has to spend his time clarifying 
AVP isn't too bad either. Girl and I went to see the movie. All we ended up watching were the opening and closing credits 
I read the OP perfectly but the damage has been done 
I'll never be able to watch the original True Grit without thinking "I had sex to this movie." I clicked on this thread thinking it said movies, too. 
Use the popcorn box on your lap while watching a movie. As the popcorn goes down she will find the surprise at the bottom. Also then the resulting blowjob will be flavoured for her pleasure! 
The hands one is spot on. Too many people just leave their hand resting in one place. Whilst that isn't *bad* you really do notice how it is far from good until someone actually does it; then you realise what you've been missing. 
Yo, I thought I was the only one that used LZ4 side one for impromptu tonsil hockey! 
It works really well if you just scream it at the top of your lungs and stare at the ceiling when you do it. Super confidence. 
Kiss the ears then go directly to slobbing her bobber. Got it. 
Do you... Uhhh... Do you want us to call someone for you? 
I'm going to sum up my stupidity by saying not only did I see "movies" in the title, but "movies" in everyone's comments and was confused as to what everyone didn't get... 
Every question on askreddit for the next week about movies is going to have "not movies" comments in it. 
Not gonna lie my brain read that as metal gears...It's gonna be a rough day. 
It's my girlfriends all time favorite movie so she never gets bored of it. Found that out the hard way. And by hard way I mean I was hard the whole time and she was too busy watching the movie. 
It only gets awkward if you dont sing along to "singing in the rain". 
If only there was a way to ask for serious responses. 
Are you saying I can dodge cum ropes? I'm saying when you're ready, you won't have to. 
You get to see Tommy Wiseau's perfectly sculpted ass *twice* in the first twenty minutes. No other movie has a sexier beginning. 
TL:DR gradually move from an engaging conversation, to pysical contact, then lean in and move in for the kiss if they don't resist or reject your movements at any of those stages. 
Same, had to read twice. I think its because the movie would also kinda make sense as a question, I just read what i expected to read instead of what was actually there 
This is how we know it is a legendary thread - when Reddit's famous poet laureate makes an appearance. Glad I was able to see it "live" this time. 
no it's all acting, she's just pretending to be decapacitated. 
Someone please psychologically analyze this and explain why me and a ton of others read movie instead of moves 
I remember the last Askreddit 'trend' "SIR, I ALREADY TOLD YOU THAT I AM NOT A MOVIE PERSON" 
Look for unusually long moments of silence where your just kind of staring into each other's eyes, sound cheesy I guess. Also keep an eye out for if she drops her gaze and glances at your lips. 
It's actually a really good move. Granted, my sample size is statistically small. 
While you're at it, explain how this circle jerk is the number one thread on all of reddit right now. 
With my current SO, I literally just asked her "hey, can I kiss you?" We had been hanging out for awhile already, and I had made it clear I was into her relationship wise early on. I have yet to have a miscommunication related incident. 
His username is his target karma haul from this thread. 
Instructions unclear. Dick stuck in The Matrix VHS tape reel. 
Bonus points if you keep on screaming as you're kissing them. 
This. I just went "can I kiss you?" And she had jumped on top of me before "you" got out God bless girls who don't drag you through the pagentry 
In addition, hearing it's "too short" is not a good inception. 
dude, they're not pictures, they're movies. get with the film 
The mods better movie into action before this gets out of hand 
Dude, they're films, not movies. Get with the moving pictures. 
Film, they're programs, not dudes. Get with the movie. 
Movie, they're dudes. Not films. GET TO THE CHOPPAH! 
Second party watched you fall down a balcony, shrugged it off, and let you stay until you decided to leave? 
If there are people in a pool, then it's pool party. 
YOUR CLAPS ARE OF THE HIGHEST CALIBER, FELLOW HUMAN. PERHAPS YOU WOULD LIKE TO ENGAGE IN A COOPERATIVE EXTENSION OF THE ACTIVITY? I AM CAPABLE OF PROVIDING A COMPLETELY NON-SYNTHETIC HAND 
I'm imagining him running out without pants on with arms flailing behind him as he happily runs all the way back home. 
problem is he married her. That might've been his breaking point, meaning shit like that has happened before. Good luck to your friend. 
do you live in new orleans bc i'm pretty sure i said that a few times 
A few years ago, a friend of a friend called everyone in his contact list and left long, rambling messages. It was how I discovered my friend gave him my number. Fun times. Anyway, he called his best friend - who was my friend's SO - and left 2 full messages crying about how he wanted to live in Middle Earth. Literally sobbing. He had a drunken breakdown because he wanted to be a hobbit. 
Last weekend I went to the clubs carrying a loaf of bread. I kept it in my jacket when walking between places and none except the last bouncer actually noticed. Bouncer is busy telling some really drunk guy he couldn't come in, I walk up to show my ID and he asks me what I have in my jacket, so I take out the loaf of bread, bouncer giggles and lets me in. From behind I hear the drunk dude mumbling "I can't come in but he gets to bring his stupid lunch?". It was a good evening. 
My friend has a recording of me sulking over a girl years ago and I said, "I'm gonna kill myself in half" 
Yeah just shut up and sit there. Once we were all drunk coming back from picking up some blow and my buddy's gf was driving. She rolled through a stop sign and the cop lit us up. My friend almost threw the bag out of the window. I had to yell at him not to and just sit there and not say anything. The car was packed and I told everyone to just shut up and let the girl talk to the cop. She rolled through a stop sign, that's why he pulled her over, that's all we have to worry about. He wrote her a ticket which my buddy paid. Just be cool. And don't do blow, that was during a rough time in my life 
My buddy was riding home when so lowlifes jumped out and threatened violence if he didn't hand over his bike. He ghosted it into a canal (live near the Grand Union, England) and cheesed it. Went back later to fish it out! 
I used to do this all the time. A bar I frequented was opposite a late night pizza joint me and my flat mate would order from all the time. We'd call and order a pizza and when the delivery guy came out we'd run over the road and jump in. 
That's awesome. I have a couple of Scottish friends. The accent gets stronger the more they drink. I love it. 
Very good possibility they went home and fucked like rabbits. That's a textbook cuckold fetish. 
Happened at my brother-in-laws house as well, champagne EVERYWHERE 
As a fireman all I did was road accidents. Busy night. 
"Hey have some noodle salad. Good isn't it? So anyway do you wanna buy a scarf?" 
Yeah, that's like, pro-level stupid. That's how you remove your face and vision. 
One night I pretended my name was Tony and it worked for me. My Korean friend Park didn't have much luck that night. 
One time I ate pizza that was left on people's plates after they'd left the pizza shop. Apparently I called it "garbage crusts" and I ask for it whenever I'm drunk. So I guess "floor pizza" isn't far off for me 
I have a friend who does this every time she gets drunk. She tries to hint that she wants to have an orgy with the subtlety of a freight train. 
I have done the whole busting blood vessels in the face thing. I was puking and looked up in the mirror and it looked like i grew freckles. 
Omg I had this kinda happen to me two years ago but it was pizza by the slice and a guy dropped his slice onto my back (I had a backless dress on so it literally stuck to my back). He apologized profusely and offered to buy me a slice or something, I declined, he just ran out, the cashier said he didn't even pay for his slice that he dropped on me. I paid for it in exchange for the cashier wiping my back for me hahaha 
Someone else in this thread tried to kiss a 40 year old and was 17. 
Hahaha this reminds me of my brother on our birthday (same day, three years apart) many years ago. I realized I'd lost track of him and asked his friend where he was. Friend pointed and said "over there, petting that guy's beard." Beard guy looked super uncomfortable. I felt bad, but quickly got him to stop. 
what the fuck is a cooler if it wouldn't kill someone if it landed on them 
this one is my favourite. innocent and hilarious. 
My wife does this 2 to 3 times a year, and the way she responds "you do?" is so honest and adorable it makes me remember why I fell in love with her in the first place. On occasion she'll also beg me not to leave the room because, "you're my friend!" in the exact same tone. 
This is why I don't drink heavily, until it becomes the reason I drink heavily. 
Well he was obviously attractive enough to get with two girls in one night! 
yeah, pretty much how the convo went down except with a dutch accent 
It looks an awful lot like they just pushed the rack back. 
My first time in nola I hopped out of the car, walked ten feet down the sidewalk, and saw a guy walking toward me with his pants unbuttoned and penis flopped out, just peeing everywhere. 
I like to think that it's one of those "every square is a rectangle" kind of things. If you're wasted, you're also significantly tipsy, and probably have a heavy buzz going on. Every subsequent level of drunkenness also includes the previous level of drunkenness. It's like building a pyramid, except instead of getting closer to the sky, you get closer to the floor. 
Three or four shots worth. That's how I would quantify strength as well. 
Dude probably has some kinda plumbing related PTSD. I hear shit goes down when you're a plumber. 
I'm thinking that's how the accent developed in the first place 
As a brit living in the usa, even the Americans I hang out with get bored of hearing me answer the same questions about where I'm from, how long I've been here, why I came in the first place, whether I like it, whether I go back home to visit. The questions are the same every time, and get fucking boring to answer to every waiter, shop attendant, or person that hears me talk. If I could fake an accent successfully I would. 
If they can do that with their bare hands it's probably best to just let them keep it 
"I know what I'm about and it's standing in camp fires" 
Not necessarily it might be like those heat shielding suits. They are fireproof and stays cool on the inside. 
This is why you only do this at someone else's party. 
It's a miracle he didn't suceed in selling his scarf with that, honestly. 
I spent way too much time trying to figure out what "k rap" is... 
He just drops 'bathtub fire' like those are two words that go together all the time... 
No no, I want to hear first how this wasn't *a* bathtub fire, but *the* bathtub fire. Like this is just how New Years is done there. 
I WANT TO HAVE AN ORGY. PLEASE. WHY DOESN'T ANYONE WANT TO HAVE THIS ORGY? *passes out* 
I'm three years off of my brother's birthday. I had to stop and think for half a second if I ever got drunk and petted someone's beard. 
It was a joint venture. Pretty much everyone in the household screamed, peed and subsequently cried at the stroke of midnight. 
It's an insulated box for keeping drinks and food cold. They're typically made of plastic 
Like calling your teacher "mom" and living in silent shame for the rest of the school day. 
i've done that... then tried to correct and the recipient said not to worry. 
To alcohol! The cause of, and solution to, all life's problems. 
They kept playing a cover or Leonard Cohen's hallelujah on the local Christmas station, people realize that's a super sad, not Christmas song, right? 
Sadly, no. It's a human skull so maybe it makes them happy ;). 
Um can I sign up for that too? If these,are the types of gifts reddit secret Santa does, I'm so in for next year. 
It's not a pyramid scheme. It's more like a funnel. 
Turns out, there is no actual Scottish accent. Everyone in Scotland is just drunk all the time. 
That's what I figured... like.. Merry Christmas to you bud.. enjoy your door 
He's also the sort of guy with no leg hair after standing in so many fires. 
I love Frankie Boyle's story of the most Scottish thing he'd ever seen. A drunk guy pishing against the door of a house. He finishes, gives it a shake, puts it away, takes out his keys and opens the door. 
It's the car dealership tactic: First they feed you, then they take your money. 
So, is this a one time thing, need a new bathtub afterwords sort of deal, or is a dedicated fireplace bathtub? Plz respond quickly, I'm on my way to lowes. 
it was probably one of those styrofoam gas station ones 
They had the same issue you did and mixed up "piss off" and "don't worry." 
Well, if I stop drinking now I'm afraid that the cumulative hangover will kill me. 
Not just every single girl. Not even every girl. Every *person*. What a champ. 
Now I kind of want to see a hieroglyphic of a dude using a beer bong. 
He's getting himself a house, one piece at a time. 
Can't think of a better way of starting 2017. He probably kissed more person in the first minute of 2017 than I will in the whole year. 
and it didn't cost him a dime. You'll know it's him, the shittiest house in town 
Oh that was Winston Bishop. We call him Prank Sinatra. 
Its a '16, '17, '18, '19, '20, '21, '22 split level ranch. 
It's 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33 mobile home! 
The Germans were meticulous record keepers, and a lot fell into Allied hands, at the end of WW2. 
I remember watching a show on History back in the 90's talking about different assassination techniques used by the US and USSR. The USSR basically had to go to some extreme lengths to pull off an assassination with plausible deniability. The US just needed someone with a steady hand a high powered rifle. I can't remember the exact reason why, but I think it boiled down to in the Soviet Union if someone died suddenly it was just best not to ask questions so their forensic expertise wasn't up to par with their American counterparts. 
My roommate told me about this a month ago and the very thought of it is creepy as fuck. Just an entire town, all the ruckus and noise and then....nothing. There are pictures too, those are just horrible. 
Anything that serious won't be actually true "declassified". Shit like MKULTRA had to be leaked. 
Kudos to the tech who said "Three is good, but four is better" 
Do you have any link or the full speech? I would love to read that. I searched around and only found bits of it in articles. 
If you think they'll declassify any relevant info, I think you'll be in for a shock. 
Why do you think governments are trying to regulate the internet? 
They did this in the States as well. Very very disturbing history. 
They mentioned this in the Great Train Robbery, that people would leave the factories at night so covered in phosphorous that their clothes would glow in the dark. Life in early industrial Europe was pure shit. 
I read somewhere that the German higher-ups didn't trust their low level workers and soldiers to carry out their orders against the jews thoroughly, so they made them fill out paperwork meticulously, thus that is the reason there is so much documentation of the holocaust. 
The only confederate war prisoners that were executed were the commanders of the prison camps. 
Largely for the same reason, if the US were to nuke Russia it would probably send more than 1 nuke. 
the evil experiments they are doing today will still be classified. scary to think what will be posted to a thread like this in 70 years time. 
I mean, doesn't everyone know that different police forces do this? There's literally a phrase for it: "agent provocateur". 
For some reason I love the idea of a nuclear powered rocket whose only attack ability is to fly all over the place at Mach 5 breaking shit with shockwaves. 
The scientists who come up with these ideas give them appropriate names. Whether they're ever actually used is usually up to the MoD. 
This could be the cause of the speculation of "Chem-Trails". Well, it's a plane instead of boats of course. 
What was crazy to me was the scale. Usually when you hear about these cult communes it's like a handful of people - maybe 100 people if that. This was over 900 people. Over 900 people willingly took their lives for a crazy idea. They also murdered a congressman. 
The distorted music does add to the eerieness of the tapes. 
he was almost certainly the guy who everyone else thought had the most boring job and only brought this shit up to be irritating. 
There was also a nuke accidentally dropped on Mars Bluff, SC back in 1958. 
Wait, so it could have been 200 times the size of fat man... fiddily fuck that shit RIGHT off. 
From what I can gather nuclear bombs don't detonate by themselves. They need to be triggered. So it just disintigrated on ground impact. Meaning they are not impact sensitive. They get triggered. 
I can't believe that we survived so many close calls during the Cold War. It's a miracle that we didn't blow each other to bits. 
For most people the thought was "Ok, go to Texas or Mississippi for a long weekend, come back, tarp up the roof and go to work afterwards." 
It was very surreal. I was a senior in high school at the time. Was napping on the couch and woke up to that bulletin. It was too late to go anywhere at that point. 
I was listening to Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy today and you reminded me of this. "It is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it... anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job". - Douglas Adams. 
I feel like this advice might also work in a non-assassination context 
The sixth symptom of groupthink is the illusion of morality, in which members participating in the group decision-making process tend to lose sight of their personal moral principles. Rather, belief in the overall morality of the group overrides any individual sense of right and wrong. 
You'd pretty much lose all sense of yourself and reality, I can't imagine going through that 
So the UnaBomber left Harvard in 1969, and that report was published in 1976. I was too lazy to read it all, but did anyone read it and confirm the unabomber was a victim? That would be some next level shit. If anyone was wondering he's 74 and currently serving 8 life sentences if my Max Payne trivia is on par 
it was mostly about trauma-based mind control. Torture someone till they break and program them with whatever the fuck you want. Evil shit, honestly. I'm pretty sure the conspiracy theorists are right to some degree that kids are being run through this process. I'm not sure the CIA does it any more but likely something more underground. I don't know. There is too many terrible things in the world and I can barely stand it some days. 
Just "The 4th Kind" and it is a very scary movie. 
Seriously, what's the worst that could happen. Best case scenario you got a new superweapon of people who can look into the office of USSR secretary, realistic case scenario you wasted a time of a few interns 
Some odd million years from now some space squid from Europa will be looking at a barren scorched Earth thinking. I wonder what happened there! 
There was actually a similar interview on NPR recently (last week or 2 weeks ago). Someone who had been writing a book on some of the CIA's research in psychic phenomenon basically said that yes, the material is crazy to be researching, BUT, when we have the budget and the means to scientifically analyze what's going on, why not just verify. After all, if it turns out all the crazy powers and phenomenon are true, why wouldn't you want to be able to utilize it? 
The most fucked up part? His "drug cocktail" to erase memory appeared to have worked. While trying to find victims, only two were found because others asked about it recognized tattoos on the women. When the women were approached they offered to talk to law enforcement but had no recollection of anything even remotely like that. Then the moment they heard the audio from the tape the memories came flooding back and they remembered everything. Last Podcast on the Left has a pretty good episode covering this. 
Yes, many of his victims were released after he got tired of raping and torturing them. Before he went in search of a new victim he would typically let the previous one go. 
Declassified. Its always the act of revealing that is surprising. Humanity are capable of anything. 
"What we're telling them to do is so bad, we don't expect people to do it. So instead of saying 'fuck that, no' we're gonna make them prove that they did it." 
Well the atrocities didn't become public for quite some time so many parents didn't know what was happening to their children. IIRC, most were orphaned children or young adults that couldn't take care of themselves because of their disabilities. 
It was directed by an alum of my high school so we watching it in a class and it's honestly a fantastic documentary. They really capture the air of uncertainty around the Crospy case and the feeling of horror that plagued Staten Island while he was on the loose. Chilling is really the best way to describe it. 
If you look at the time line the Tuskegee trials started 2 decades before Willowbrook and lasted almost 3 times as long. I would say Tuskegee is where they hot the idea to do the tests at Willowbrook. The only thing more disturbing is that they started Willowbrook after the defeat of the Nazis and should have known better. 
Right, but the concern was that the 1 missile was a first strike EMP, which would shut down the ability to track other missiles and communicate with your own launch sites. 
Yeah this still happens today all over the world. Can't legally arrest peaceful protestors? Then make then violent. Helps with PR too as it makes the protesters less sympathetic. 
Let's agree not to kill each other's kids. Don't attack clinics or the medics, we both need to help our wounded. Long ago people would trade PoWs back and take breaks at night, in winter, or during holidays. The goal is to keep the battle contained and restrict suffering. Our soldiers fight yours, and if we get a win condition we stop. After all, we all had lives before this that we kind of don't want to be super shitty when we finish the fight. This only works when both sides agree though. 
Another thing about chemical weapons is that soldiers can prepare and defend against them (gas masks, mopp suits) while civilians would be helpless. 
Jesus fuck. The Sundial probably could've burnt and irradiated nearly everywhere on earth regardless of detonation area. Holy shit. The dude who designed didn't stop to think at all if he should do it. Why would anyone ever need a weapon that absurdly destructive, to the point you could irreperablly damage the earth and kill literally billions of people? That's just... Wrong. 
It's endurance is described in *weeks*. That's serious shit. 
The Ministry of Defence tends toward random names that don't hint at what the project actually is while the Department of Defense likes to give the game away on the front page, a bit like the Germans during the war. 
Also neutron flux/gamma radiation being radiated from it. It was a 600MW reactor, basically 1/3 nuclear plant, unshielded. Really not something I would want to stand close to 
A lot of them didn't do it willingly. There were guards forcing them to with guns. 
Once everyone who was involved is dead, the docs will be released. 
I think he's saying it won't be creepy because it'll be mostly images or files stating mild stuff like that. 
Imagine screwing up the autopsy of the President of the United States. 
Optimists believe we live in the best of all possible worlds. Pessimists fear this to be true. 
Yeah, no core in it, though. I lived in Florence for a few years, found out about that then...creepy to think about how irresponsible we are with our nukes, then realize Russia has them too, then watch a dashcam video from Russia and think...how are we all possibly still here... 
That's why they invented ICBMs. We no longer have nuclear armed bombers on permanent patrol. 
Cant help but think people would point fingers at the soviets too. Nuclear war avoided. 
From what I've read and found, most nuclear explosions are in air, meaning timed or altitude triggered. Don't quote me on it though. 
Isn't there any ethics approval for experiments in US? WTActualF 
And Beeblebrox was perfect because he didn't care for governing. He made the people happy. That is until he stole The Heart of Gold. 
and the less body thetans you have (through thorough and expensive cleansing of course) your Operating Thetan level goes up 
THOR was the name for the theoretical weapons system that the U.S was scheduled to deploy in 2003. ODIN was the name of the first iteration in CoD:Ghosts, and LOKI was the name of the second iteration. 
Yup, the Soviets. It was a serious consideration at the time. If you fancy having the shit scared out of you, go and have a watch of the BBC drama Threads (readily available online) which dates from that period and depicts exactly what would happen to one of England's biggest cities in the event of a war. I was born well after it was produced and well after nuclear war was even a possibility but it still scares the fuck out of me. 
but doesnt acid lose half the power of its dose if you use it the next day, for example if you do 100ug one day, and do the same amount the next day it would only feel like taking 50ug? 
Hah, that's one helluva occupational hazard. "Spontaneous psychedelic experiences may occur." 
The flashbacks of being terrified by this movie are coming back. 
Worst case? An enemy spends the money and you don't, then turns out it *works.* 
Until some Jupiterian Overlord orders the Europan Army to finally advance on Saturn and it's moons, hoping to conquer and defeat The Saturnistic ideology because they are a bunch of dirty space cucumbers who keep picking fights for no reason and are slowly spreading throughout the solar system. 
Yeah I just read this dudes Wikipedia page and it said one victim had nightmares about the encounters but thought they were nothing more than bad dreams and had no recollection of any of the events until contacted by the FBI, at which point she was able to recall the events of her imprisonment. That's god damn fucking mortifying. 
Exactly. It really bit them in the ass when they lost the war. The allies knew exactly who did what. 
the higher the stakes, the more chance these gentlemanly rules get subverted 
The Sundial blast would've been the size of Texas. The fallout and subsequent nuclear winter would have probably killed almost everyone on the planet. 
There was a guy on NPR talking about Jones town. He said over half the people were either kids or elderly who would have had no way surviving in the jungle and would die either way. Basically the mos of the people had no real choice in the matter 
And you can imagine people being a little hesitant to raise their hands and admitting to accidentally nuking North Carolina. That delay could be absolutely fatal: someone's nuked NC and the military aren't saying anything. 
Damn, I'd go just to look at the sign. I mean, look how impressive it is. Really carries the weight of what nearly happened there. 
Even then, his job wasn't to govern, it was to distract the people from who was *really* in charge. 
What level is tom cruise & john travolta? Ooh. And will smith. 
Smart of your grandma. I would assume they'd just give the kid a different name though (once they took her). 
I watched Threads once a couple years ago. Never again. I was on edge for days. It scared me so bad. The raw suffering it simulates it unbelievable and horrifyingly realistic. You can imagine all this happening to you in your own circumstances. I have no desire nor need to ever watch it again, it'll be sticking with me for a long time. 
Yes, it makes me wonder how space travel would be different if those men hadn't come back. 
Well it's not exactly 50% but yes, LSD tolerance builds very quickly. However with government approval and a lab large amounts of pure LSD can be easily synthesised. So whose to say they weren't giving these people MASSIVE doses of lsd toward the end of the experiment to keep consistent results? 
Yeah, that was quite the exaggeration. These aren't even close to Google Maps quality. 
To further elaborate on the above. We aren't talking like a paragraph of extreme detail here. We are talking like a full on page or two about him and his buddies getting off on watching his dog rape the victim in more detail than you can be prepared for. I think the beastiality portion is what fucked me up and stuck with me all this time more than anything. But there isn't a "that's not so bad" part to any of the transcript 
Sounds silly but this would be the perfect defensive weapon. Don't attack us or we will detonate it and everyone loses. This was part of the plot of Dr. Strangelove. The Russians couldn't keep up with the us economic system so they built a weapon that would wipe out all life if a nuclear explosion went off in their territory. The problem is that once this weapon was built and the design known all it would take is some rogue state to say we all lose and boom. Game over planet earth. 
"I think the moon would look better if we added another crater riiiiight here." 
I had no idea this was in Guyana until you said jungle. I honestly thought this happened in the U.S. 
You should read up on Jim Jones, he was nuts near the end. Apparently he would give people Kool-Aid tell them it was poisoned as a test on a regular basis to see if they would drink it before he actually did this. 
Well, that's the most depressing sentence I've read in a while. 
Machi and her mom both fled to the US (they had enough money to get out luckily), so now her name is more of a reminder of how close she was to losing her freedom and family. Her mom was also a badass sweetheart who swore like a sailor until she passed away in her late 90's. I should mention that Machi is my Tia in the sense that I have known her from birth - I actually don't have any aunts on my mom's side, so my mom's lifelong friends have become 'Tia' very quickly. 
I feel you. It's because it is so utterly blunt about what it's displaying that it's so effective. The special effects are ramshackle and low budget and they simply didn't have the money to make it flashy, so what you get is just an hour and a half of normal people suffering presented as casually as a kitchen sink drama. I know someone who remembers being shown it in school, which is practically child abuse. 
I read somewhere that procedure was that NASA would cut communications. Imagine that, being stranded on the moon, just you and one other person until you suffocated to death. Scary stuff. 
There are very few things I know about on the Internet that I steer clear of because I just don't want to deal with them: - this one - and the video/audio of the guy driving along when a brick comes through the windshield and obliterates his wife's head. I know there's a ton more along those lines but I don't go looking for that sort of stuff, these two both come up on Reddit occasionally and are staying blue. 
That was the philosophy of most of the arms race at a point. Dr. Strangelove wasn't just some goofy movie, but it was an analysis and criticism of the concept of Mutually Assured Destruction. 
They also assassinated a member of Congress who came down to investigate 
He was nuts from the start. I was there. I saw him on stage in SF around 1975. 
The idea was to let them die in peace and with privacy, not broadcasting their every panicked word to everyone on Earth. 
if you think there's not at least one division working on that tech, you're out of your mind 
There is Mutually Assured Destruction and then there is Mutually Assured Destruction via SUICIDE BOMBING. 
Which Kool-Aid execs have to be just thrilled about 
As someone who works in a control environment I'd imagine it's also taking into account that listening in to them as they died would just break the comms guy and ruin his life... 
Yeah, I don't see any reason not to maintain communication in this situation if the technology allows it. 
With all the free information we are divulging on social medias, they would know us better than we know ourselves by know most likely 
Sundial - when MAD is not both hardcore AND fucked up enough. 
The thing is, they were actually drinking Flavor Aid. It wasn't even Kool-Aid. So it's probably doubly annoying for Kool-aid execs. 
That's what I was thinking. I'd hate to cut them off, but if I was responsible for the people listening, I'd have to do it. Mostly because I would be afraid they'd be like me and feel an obligation to keep communication open and it would fuck them up. It's better for the person in charge to feel like shit for the rest of their lives than expect their subordinates to. 
What is it with cults cutting corners and getting off brand crap? Kool Aid isn't even that expensive. 
This was actually the same guy who named walkie talkie. 
I've recently realized the same thing for the word "movies" "Look at all these moving pictures and stories... what shall we call this?" "eh movies" 
 I call eggs pre-birds, or future birds. Root beer is super water. Tortillas are bean blankies. And I call forks ... Food rakes. 
One of the best nicknames I've ever heard for HIV was the "high five." 
What do you call a Frenchman wearing sandles? Philippe Philoppe. 
From now on I must refer to GTA-V as "stealie wheelie vee" 
tighty whities 1935, walkie talkies 1940. The dates check out. 
It could certainly be described as restarting, resyncing or rebooting it, just not from the off position. 
Since movies evolved so much I think it's time to rename them: *movie soundies* 
If you put bistro in the name of a restaurant it's classy as fuck. 
I don't think u/dpgproductions has been using his phone correctly... 
Ah this reminds me of the time I chased my next door neighbor and her friends with our pooper scooper when I was 7 years old, pretending I was a T. rex that ate shit. Good times 
Wheezy Sneezies sounds like a Weasley's Wizarding Wheezes signature sneezing sweet. 
I'm a new dad... I'm saving this in my dad joke archive 
That means something else when you're at a nude beach 
The sandals were called thongs long before the butt floss panties became a daily wear thing. 
Rootie tootie aim and shootie, omfg that got me. Thanks for the laugh. 
AND DON'T MOVE OR WE'RE GOING TO HAVE FORCEY FUN TIME!! 
What if you're using the Snoop Dog voice? *Yo, zoomie boomie inbound dawg.* 
Guys, it turns out the Nazi party was *very* active during those years... We need to dig deeper. 
We used to answer our teachers phone like this "Mr. Barry's abortion clinic, you make em we take em. No fetus can beat us." 
I've binge watched it on Netflix all the way through at least 10 times. 
And when you watch them on a treadmill they are walkie talkies. We've come full circle. 
And I might be speaking only for myself, but I don't think most of us ever realized this or even thought about it. 
And all this time I thought Air was just being silly naming their 2004 masterpiece, "Talkie Walkie" 
I don't think the rest of us have used it correctly. 
The teepee appears to have some level of absorbency. Cone shaped water cup, on the other hand, does not. 
"I'm on a dolphin! Doin flips and shit, the dolphin's splashin, gettin erybody all wet." 
Be careful, you may get stuck in a loop of saying "hi, I'm dad" if you have a joke stack overflow 
Every beach is a nude beach, if you're brave enough. 
Am kiwi, never called a trolley a trundler before oO in fact, never heard anyone say that ever 
"I got a shooty shooty bang bang, hand over your phoney whoney and money holdy." 
Actually we have a bunch of slang that mimics Chinese phrases. My mind is drawing a giant fucking blank right now though. 
"Roadkill Cafe, you kill it we grill it." "County Coroner, you stab 'em we slab 'em." "Big Bertha's discount Abortion Barn, you rape 'em we scrape 'em!' 
Ice Cream = Milk on the Rocks Sprinkles = Rainbow Rice for Milky Ice 
Not even in the same sentence. As describing each other. 
Iunno man, I just googled Detroit and the first thing that came up was a miley cyrus concert in two days... I think I'll wait it out a bit longer. 
And never heard a speed bump be called a jutterbar.... where do you get your information from? 
For a comedian to be so clean and yet make me laugh is genius work. I'm a fan of Doug Stanhope if that puts things into perspective. I went to a Regan show a few years back and he was transitioning over to Godspeed which I hadn't heard at the time. Loved it. He did requests at the end which I've never seen a comedian do. People yelling "the big yellow one is the sun" at him from the audience, still makes me chuckle. 
Besides the other ones mentioned: No can do No shoes, no shirt, no service 
If little penises were that happy all the time it would have to be because they have those little hands on the sides 
Third...ed? I have been shit on, however. Never underestimate the distance diarrhea can travel from an uncovered infant. I was giving him a bath, picked him up, turned him around to hand him to his mom, and *pfbbbbbbbbt* I was covered in yellowish brown ooze. 
Judder bar. Not jutterbar. Because it makes your car judder when you go over them. Judder. 
Wow I saw him in 2007 and he took requests as well. He even signed some guy's box of fig newtons 
Well...that's what the little shit gets for trying to pee on me 
"GUYS! WE HAVE A JOKE!" "Oh wow, that's a whole joke more then we had for the last two" 
I'm on a boat and It's going fast and I got a nautical themed Pashmina Afghan 
Neither have I. It's on urban dictionary, but I seriously thought they were joking at first. In California, btw. 
More Absorbency = Less piss all over your freshly-changed baby boy 
Only point them in the direction of something you are willing to destroy. Never leave one within reach of a child. Never handle one while inebriated. Hmm, yep, it checks out. 
How am I supposed to teach him not to piss on me then? 
Special Frozen and Avengers versions for your kids! 
This girl on my FB dose professional modeling and shes a 10/10. All of her pics are "Damn, I look terrible in this pic" and the wave of people saying "What?! No, your beautiful. Plz date me" 
That's a great test though - if you want to know how attractive you are objectively just interrupt someone reading and see how they respond. 
The one that got the modeling contract? He recently did a show where he walked for a big designer. 
Underrated comment. I see this all the time. Also, reeeealy easy to say when you're hot. 
I went to school with an overweight, unattractive girl who sneezed and farted at the same time in school. She spent the next 2 years being called "sneezefart" by everyone until she moved away (unrelated). 
wink with both of your eyes at the same time to double the allure 
its being "quirky" vs being "What's wrong with him/her? 
To be fair, the girl was lied to and became pissed when the truth came out. 
I've seen this one cut both ways. Introverted attractive people often end up labeled as "stuck up" or "aloof" while unattractive people get "bookish" or "nerd", which may not sound great but usually come with an implication of intelligence. 
Also, wearing *weird* clothing. Pretty model wearing a shapeless oversize shirt to her knees with bedhead and smudgy eye makeup? Couture. Ugly person in the same outfit? Slob. 
Wow. I feel so bad for him. Being treated so badly and negatively just for his appearance even when he was being kind. 
Ask your wife how she would react if you cheated on her and told people that. 
Whenever I make eye contact (usually accidentally) I automatically smile. Most people smile back. This can't be related to beauty. I'm not awful, but I'm not beautiful. 
Similar thing happened to me. Lost weight after High School and freshman year of University girls who didn't give me the time of day in High School went out of their way to talk to me and stay in touch via social media. 
This is so true I think it's "The Halo Effect" - people automatically give positive attributes to good looking people. So if a hot person is acting like a douche, people may give them way more leeway (he's having a bad day!) or assign them positive traits (he's just very confident). 
This is definitely true. On a good day, I'll get the door held open even if they have to hold it for a while and get lots of smiles. On bad days (no makeup and dgaf) I get doors slammed in my face. 
To be honest, I think this also correlates greatly with how the clothes fit. In my stereotype mindvision the attractive dude wears jeans that fit fucking well, and the ugly guy just wears whatever his mom bought him. 
This is true. I can only assume I'm decently attractive because I've never had trouble with attracting the opposite sex, despite the fact that I have no personality whatsoever. Joke's on them. There is no "depth" to me. 
If someone reacts negatively to you bettering yourself, fuck them. Only a truly ugly person would put someone down for trying to improve themselves. 
Rom-com or Stalker-flick? Cast those lead actors wisely. 
That's exactly why I never, ever, EVER give compliments. 
Honestly though, I think that shit's just romantic in movies. Especially the "exact measurements" part. Gee 
Damn... As bar staff I have no tolerance for shitty manners. Hot women are too much of a common occurrence for me to give them preferential treatment. Maybe my eyes will be drawn to them first because they're attractive but that's basically it. Always a customer who is friendly and treats me as a real person will stand out regardless of looks. 
"I'm sorry sir, your balls are visible at the bottom of your skirt." 
Sort of related, I had a buddy that got really turned on by pretty girls crying. Bonus points if their makeup was running and smeared 
Hah! You work in IT, NERD! wait... I work in IT. 
Me: "Damn, I look terrible in this pic" Others: "You look terrible, period." 
I really hope my bf doesn't read this. He'll think that he's hideous based on how hard I try to ignore him when I want to read. 
I have no idea dude. I just remember people trying to justify whatever he done because he was hot. 
Yep. Most preachers of "inner beauty" are actually pretty average and good looking people. It is indeed super easy to say this shit when you don't have problems with your looks. It's just as funny when some Ronaldo or Bill Gates would say shit like: "Money does not bring happiness." or some shit like that. Like - yeah, everyone knows it's kind of true, but it's sure as shit easy for you to say that. 
Cant hate him, sound like he plays the game of life very well. 
Unattractive guy here. Didn't know stranger conversations were a thing. 
Oh my god i know what you mean, i know a handful of girls like this. They get like 100+ comments being like "omgz ur so awesome hahahahahah!!! Hilarious!!!!!" And its like no, actually youre fucking gross i dont want to see photos of you on the toilet taking a shit. 
Randy, you know, when I want advice on cheeseburgers or not wearing a shirt, you're the person I'll come to. 
God damnit... I thought I was the first to come up with that. This is how the conversation with my friends go: "I think she is hitting on me, she just double winked at me" "What like she winked twice at you?" "Yeah AT THE SAME TIME WITH BOTH EYES" "Why do I ever take you seriously?" 
That's my beef with "quirky" characters on TV. The attractive ones are seen as cute and special, and the unattractive ones are seen as basically inappropriate freaks a la Amy from The Big Bang Theory. But if she looked like Kaley Cuoco she would likely be a whole different character. 
These guys didn't learn to not put your dick in crazy. 
Yes, true. But by the end of the movie, all was well. Had it been Danny DeVito instead of Chris Pratt, the movie would have probably ended with murder. 
While it would be really interesting to see that, I just love the scenes of loneliness and isolation with Chris Pratt's Char, which would probably fall short with Jennifers point of view. The really did it well imo 
I have a big issue with the stigma against "self-awareness". Like it is a bad thing to be aware of your own body and self. You can be self aware in negative ways, but healthy happy people can be self aware. It just means you are in tune with yourself and your image. 
every school report I ever had I was described as "aloof". I was depressed, substance abuse issues, eating disorder, being sexually abused. But I was also pretty and from a wealthy family. Everyone, including teachers, adults who should have been able to have some perspective, thought I was stuck up. other girls called me a bitch/slut/etc. I'm totally happy & good now but it's kind of crazy how being attractive can put you (especially young women I think) in a terrible position, with no help or sympathy. 
Agreed. In high school when I was wearing glasses and had no fringe, I was labeled an ugly weirdo. Halfway through high school I switched to contacts and cut bangs. I was surprised at how different I looked, but fuck, I was even more surprised at how different I was treated. People started talking to me more but since I'm introverted and got some social anxiety, they decided I was stuck up and thought I was better than everyone! What the fuck 
Pregancy correlates much more with intelligence/education than with looks. Ugly people be fucking too, yo 
Haha... you know... that's pretty close to being exactly how he looks like. 
In high school there were a couple brothers everyone swore was probably going to come to school shooting everyone one day. I was always at least polite to the one I seen most often because I thought "if I'm at least polite, hopefully he wont target me." skip forward a few years after I graduated, turns out they had a younger brother who brought a big ass machete to school and threatened a teacher with it. 
Better yet just tell your wife you cheated on her because someone better came along (without actually cheating) and get the honest reaction. 
Dude, tell me about it. I'm always a little jealous of people who have automatic "style" because they're taller, skinnier, have better faces, etc. 
My therapist made me start doing that. It helped my confidence and helped me to not feel isolated. It even starts conversations by accident. I don't think I'm attractive but I know a good number of people disagree, so I'll say "average." Lol 
Seriously, this is true. When I was in New York, I smiled at a woman at the grocery store and she panicked like I asked her to donate a kidney. (I was saddened to think I caused her any discomfort.) We here in The South smile at everyone. So much so that one of my NY friends moved from NC to Rochester only to pack it up and immediately come back because no one was smiling and she got depressed. She said it just contributed to an overall sadness along with the gray skies. She is happy again! Edited to add: My friend was born and raised in Rochester but moved to NC for about 5 years before having to move back to help with her parents. I am glad she is back and she considers herself to be a Southerner now. I love to see her smiling again!!! 
Yyyuuupppp. Glad to see other people understand my experience. 
Yep, true. Saw this video one time that setup a scenario where an attractive white woman was stealing a bike and compared it against a black male. While the woman was tugging at the locked bike and trying to get it away, men would go up to her and try to help her. Other just walked by and smiled. When the black man did the exact same thing, people tried to chase him off, yelled thief, and some even ran off to find help/police. 
This is why I've *CHOSEN* not to be rich. It was a choice. That I made. 
People often don't seem to understand how much properly fitting clothes contribute to being attractive. 
I'd also wager a bet that unattractive people are also unattractive because they don't dress well. An ugly man with long hair pulled back in a well fitting suit is still going to look MILES better than an ugly man in a trenchcoat, fedora, and looking like he has pizza grease in his hair because he hasn't washed it in 2 weeks. 
I find this to be true of picking on short people in general, particularly when they aren't backing down. There's a reason for that--it may be fighting knowledge or it may just be crazy but either way that shit won't end well. 
What about attracting the same sex? That's when you know you've got it 
"Well we couldn't get Colin Firth. But the good news is we were able to sign Vincent D'Onofrio!" It can change in an instant. 
Yeah, it gets given a pass in fiction because the audience *knows* that the object of affection either already secretly returns the pursuer's feelings, or will do by the end of the story, which makes the persistence look romantic. IRL, where there is no way of knowing how someone else feels about you except when they say so, that doesn't work. 
Same with me and crop tops. Suddenly a hairy beer belly is deemed not "appropriate" for this venue. Well in the words of Randy Marsh: *I thought this was AMERICA?!* 
By any chance, are you Ted Mosby or Marshall Erickson? 
Hah!! You work in IT, NERD!! Wait.... i want to work in IT. 
Me Thinking: hmm, this pic dosnt look too bad. Ill make it my profile pic. Others: "Dude, you look like shit." 
I don't think it counts if you're already dating the person :) 
I don't even remember what he did but I still remember his beautiful face. 
"Having money's not everything, not having it is" -Kanye 
"Money can't buy me love!" *proceeds to sing about going after women by buying them fancy jewelry and providing for their every whim* 
Exactly. I was scrolling through these comments and kept wondering why I felt like this dude was kinda genius. 
Can't wait to see what he does when she shits her pants 
I once had a Pizza Hut operator while I was asking a question tell me "the sound of kindness rings true in my voice" and he had the silky smooth voice of a radio star in the early days of radio. Like. SUPER SILKY SMOOTH. Thanks Richard from Pizza Hut. Whenever I have a bad day I remember you. 
Move on gut Cassidy and the Sundance cheeseburger. 
Same with clumsiness. It's considered cute if the girl is attractive, but they are treated like something less over it if they are ugly. Interestingly attractive guys are almost never clumsy themselves, apparently it would make them less handsome. 
I really want to see a remake with Danny DeVito now. 
I watched a video explaining that the scenes should've simply been re-ordered to start it creepy and then reveal what Pratt's character went through to induce sympathy 
Yep, growing up I was very shy and even my moms friends thought I was snobby. I even got told by someone in middle school "you look the part, but you don't have the personality to be popular". I was like OK what am I supposed to do with that, lol. 
And smart hot people know how birth control works. 
Strangely enough, Louis CK doesn't seem all that cosmetically challenged to me. Just slightly overweight, but a reasonably good looking face. 
Exactly. I'm guessing this guy isn't deaf and blind and has a pretty good idea that he's not the best looking guy and isn't a fashion plate. But comments like 'he's going to shoot up the place' just marginalize and alienate people *further*. Seems like a good way to die from suicide by unstable coworker. Do you really want to risk the chance that the person you say that about *really does* hate their workplace and has violent tendencies? I mean, at the very least, it's extremely cruel and mean-spirited and they aren't going to like you anymore when they hear that. 
Haha just kidding! Your face! haha oh man... wait where are you going? 
I have always done this. I'm not sure why. I smile at pretty much everyone I come in contact with, even when I'm in a shitty mood. The ladies at the gas station sometimes call me smiley or sunshine. It's sweet. lol Anyways, I pass quite a few people on my walk into my office from the parking lot and smile at them too. One guy has started a random conversation with me and he was actually pretty cool. I just like smiling, even when I don't feel like it. I feel like it makes the world a little bit better. 
To be fair, I don't know if there are any happy people in Rochester. 
Which is the cute one in your Seth vs Jason example? 
I had a weight gain period and during that time people just stopped looking at me completely. Like they treat over weight people like homeless people, dont make eye contact, dont smile, etc. I lost the weight again and it wasn't until then that I noticed the change. 
abusers prey on and gravitate towards people that appear vulnerable and/or needy. same with creepy desperate people. somebody who's visibly suffering from either a mental disorder or some sort of condition is likely attractive to them for these reasons. 
All I'm hearing is "hire hot women to steal things for you" 
This has plagued me for years. How is he eating that many eggs? Brian Shaw, a top tier strongman and barge-size-haver only has eight. Sixty eggs is more than 4500 calories for *breakfast*. Cool Hand Luke barely got over four dozen and nearly died. Where is he getting them? he lives in a small village, that's Four hundred and twenty eggs a week, do they even produce that many eggs? Is he a poultry farmer? How is he financing that business if he keeps consuming his whole supply? How does he smell? How does he find time to do anything else? I'm pretty sure it's some kind of money laundering scam. 
I couldn't agree more. I used to wear jeans and a ill fitting graphic tee every day. Once I moved out I got kinda down because I wasn't meeting people like I used to and receded from a lot of activities I enjoy. Even though I used to be really social I felt like no one in my new town wanted to meet me (as opposed to high school where it was kinda forced so I'd meet people anyway and jump that initial barrier). I was given a nice pair of shorts and polo shirt and I realized that changing up my wardrobe was half the battle. Now that I have a few nice pairs of shorts/khakis and some button down shirts I look at myself and feel a lot cleaner and a lot happier. It even helped me be more social once I didn't feel embarrassed about looking like a scrub. It also helped that I cleaned up my acne a bit and I'm a relatively fit person but without that initial change I think I would have stayed in a rut. 
The secret is that many average people can look good if they get in shape and wear clothes that fit. And many ugly People can look average with the above tips. 
And if you're attractive doing nerdy shit is cool but otherwise it's just being a nerd. 
Heh, his love story in Daredevil was really good imo. I still remember how I was weirded out about watching a villain awkwardly hit on a woman for 10 minutes in a superhero series. 
Finally, someone who gets it. And will explain it to me. 
Same thing happened to me. Obsessive stalking is not suddenly acceptable because he's attractive. Actually, the fact that he was a buff marine made it worse when he was texting me that he could see me walking out of the grocery store and I couldn't see him. 
Where do people find these family members?! Jesus Christ, I gotta go thank my sister for not being a complete cunt. 
Or when you have a successful pic and it's been your profile pic for months and your friends suggest you should change it. ''Have you seen my face? Good pics don't always happen, I'll hold on to this one.'' 
When you're married, you can ignore them all you want! 
I think every rich person who ever married a supermodel would agree that it can't buy love. They usually end up divorced within 3 hours. 
Him: "Don't worry! That just means you're really healthy!" *He and the others then regale her with stories of having shit their pants on several occasions.* 
Hey man, WHEN you reach your goal you'll be hella topless! :D You'll do it! 
I would disagree with that last part. My attractive male friends used their clumsiness in a perfect way to stand out and be the center of attention. Of course they weren't like that most of the time but being clumsy sometimes would make them appear to be cute, approachable, humble and fun to hang out with. I don't think it would work well everywhere in the world so it really depends on how it is perceived culturally. 
Oh gee thanks, wait a minute while I completely rejig my personality for the sake of some teenagers fake-liking me. Honestly this kind of attitude just baffled me all the way through school. Why do people even want to be "popular" anyway? It looks like hard work and they all seem to end up lonely after school ends, usually with unwanted kids. That being said, my experience is limited to my school so it's not exactly expansive. 
I mean Rochester isn't that bad. I enjoyed growing up there. A Rochesterian's idea of a traffic jam is a 5 minute delay on 490 and you get used to dodging the old, miserable, Italian ladies in Wegmans. 
Yeah, sometimes that part is actually kinda nice. I lost a bunch of weight a few years back and waiting for the bus at night become much scarier. 
Most of the women in my family tend to be petite and young looking. My sister in particular is tiny, to the point she can fit children's clothing, and is often mistaken for a young high schooler or even younger. She attracts a very specific subset of creeps, all the time. Even those who know her age like a weird boss she had at her previous job. I used to as well, but they dropped off once I stopped being mistaken for a teen. 
Yeah. If I find out or think someone has an eating disorder then all I want to do is help. I've been there, so I know how horrible it is, especially when you have to face it alone. 
Well, it's definitely a bad experiment. In a proper study you should just change one thing at a time. Here they changed three (gender, race and 'good looks'). But hey, it probably got good ratings on YouTube 
That's why that lady in the opening song was pleading for six eggs. Gaston fucking ate all of them. 
Honestly, even if you aren't super fit, if you wear clothes that fit, get a decent haircut and just generally put more effort into your daily appearance you can go a LONG way. I think a lot of guys don't realize this because the guys that *are* doing this don't talk about it or even deny it. A lot of people also don't realize that the "effortlessly attractive" look that a lot of guys go for actually takes a shit ton of work. 
which is the same as 10/10 don't lie you loved it 
At the time of course it stung and made me super self-conscious, but looking back she was clearly the jerk. She was trying to bully me into being less myself...but in the end, I think I came out on top. 
An open map (especially if paper) and a slightly wild-eyed expression is like a neon sign above your heads that says HELP THESE PEOPLE BEFORE THEY FALL IN A MANHOLE. 
I once watched a group of tourists in Times Square bump into another group of tourists and the second group rolled their eyes and were like "Ugh, rude New Yorkers." 
Liar. Nobody tries to get you to *buy* their demo. They "give" you a free copy and then stalk you for "a donation." It's just polite to pay for stuff you repeatedly said you didn't want, after all. 
Yes and as a control you would need a moderately attractive deeply tanned hermaphrodite. Imagine the casting call for that 
It is work, but for some it is also a lot about simple habits and consistency, so it can be tricky to just convey that to someone who asks. My mom worked in fashion design for a time and I didn't really realize till I was older and became picky about the fit of my own clothes as a very tall person that I had always been made to wear well fit clothes as kid, wear fairly classic outfits, and get a quality haircut (Except for a brief blunder period of HS...). I wasn't allowed to leave the house badly unmatched or having uncombed hair. By the time they were my choices to make as a young adult they were more just habits. 
"The little guy hasn't done anything yet... He's just standing there... He's going to do something... And you *know* it's going to be good!" 
If the story is true, it's more likely the commenter simply wasn't aware of the other steps happening. 
Can I get 15 half eaten cheeseburgers to go? Nawmsayin? 
Or HELP THESE PEOPLE THEY ARE TAKING UP TOO MUCH SIDEWALK SPACE. 
**HEY DO YOU LIKE RAP MUSIC** Well shucks, I sure do friend! **HERE TAKE A COPY OF MY BOY'S DEMO REAL NEW YORK RAP TOTALLY FREE** Thanks so much stranger! I'll just be on my wa- **CMON MAN WE GON NEED AT LEAST A DOLLAR** 
*thinks to self* "Aw, a nice motivational poem..." *reads last two lines* "Goddammit." 
And when you think you got away, the Tibetan monks pop in from around the corner to get you to buy their trinkets! 
Didn't Google start ignoring literal string / exact match quotes a few years ago? 
Another useful trick for forms: inurl:showthread 
What's the difference between using "John Smith" and John/Smith? 
Google advanced search works if you're trying to sift through a tonne of things that are close to your search but not exactly. My problem is that my searches turn up nothing anyway so advanced search narrows 10 useless responses to 0 responses 
True, but this can also bring up biased information. Check the inverse search too, if possible 
That's how I found Reddit in the first place. After multiple google searches to my questions I would keep ending up here. So then I started always added Reddit to the end. Couple years later made an account. Now I'm on here every day. 
Or use proper questions. Google can interpret natural language. 
So what you're saying is that OP should have googled for this instead of asking us? 
This might be too specific of a question but I was trying to figure out something similar to this a few days ago. Would that work for a website that has overlays to blur things out? For example, if you wanted to see the answer to a question on Chegg thats partially blurred out? 
Sometimes the whole process is figuring out the right terms to use. But that's usually where the less adept fail. But fancy features become more useful when you are dealing with names/terms that have multiple meanings. Products named with common words, or just trying to find the thing that shares a name with a much more famous thing. 
I trust Reddit more than many other sites. I can read a bunch of different opinions and be sure that I'm not being misinformed by a biased source. 
oh so that's why i enter captcha so often i can't leave google now 
I don't think it ignores them, I still get more specific results when I use them, but I think it doesn't treat them as an absolute requirement that the exact phrase is the same, just that you'd prefer it. 
Google treats the slash (and lots of other punctuation) as basically any word delimiter, so `John/Smith` becomes `John[non-word character]Smith`. Since it has no spaces, then Google will not separate the terms and search them as a unit. The difference between that and `"John Smith"` is that `John/Smith` should return any of: * John-Smith * John/Smith * John.Smith * John Smith * etc. 
Dear Google, what's that thing where the guy does the stuff with his hand, and then the girl gets that thing that smells bad? Thank you, from Doris. 
As someone who doesn't get the reference, just searching "dank" would yield proper results if it wasn't for meme culture. 
The more words you use, the more of those words need to be in your ideal search result. Similarly, Google has an easier time mapping synonyms and similar words to those chosen if the string is shorter. *That said*, if your query is very close to what you're actually looking for, this isn't a bad way to go. 
Yeah. A couple of days back I was looking for one specific Back to the Future quote that I only half-remembered. So I searched "back to the future enough future boy" and good ol' Google found it, enabling me to make a low-effort shitpost without even having to remember the quote. Thanks Google engineers. 
If youjust searched "satellite with gold disk" you get similair results. Depending on what youre looking for too much filler words can make it harder to find things. 
Absolutely. For instance, searching "vaccines cause autism"... 
Sadly after years of watching people use search engines I would say minimum 75%+ of people ask questions. 
Same. Finding out about reddit has been both the worst and best decision of my life. 
I tried that, well I tried removing the overlays and it appears that they are just images being blurred. It could work, but I don't know. 
/10 is the glistening oasis in a desert of legal research. 
Teaching people about the + made me feel like a genius when I was in high school sad it's gone 
Thanks! I get so pissed off every time Google searches "verbatim" by finding synonyms, translating, etc... 
When they started Google Plus. I think they want(ed) to dedicate the + sign to search for user handles. 
I tried it a little while ago to search for products with UPC numbers registered to certain companies (within certain GS1 company prefix ranges) and discovered the cap. 
No, it's one search with wider additional criteria. The way you use it it's NBD -- what I'm talking about is something like 100000..900000 -- that shit will get you shut down. 
Even worse is googling something on mobile and the damn google amp page opens instead of the reddit page. 
Honestly, this site can be a gold mine at times but the search function here is garbage. So half the time I need to google something I add "reddit" at the end lol. 
Just when you think you found something cool, you have to make an account 
Yup. This exactly. If I don't add "Reddit" to my search I just get a bunch of clickbait articles. 
`"John/Smith" OR "JohnSmith"` would cover all variations, too. `OR` can be used, and it works as you'd expect. 
Every time my mom calls me, she always tells me about the movies she's watched lately. My mom has a habit of always forgetting the names of the movie but remember the plot very poorly, so she'll describe what happened in the movie to me in the most absurd way. What I'll do is google the movie exactly the way she describes it to me while shes on the phone, and it'll always turn up the movie in less than a sentence. Its so funny to her when I do it. She's like "Oh you googled that so fast! What did you type?" "movie where white guys saves black guy from slaves and they go to the slavers house and kill everyone" 
Same boat. It used to be that this was an ineffective way of searching, but now it works pretty well especially if it's a question that's likely been asked before. 
Between one broad search and one specific one I usually find what I'm after. 
Your comment is the to Google search result for 3DGlobe.wrf. 
that illustrates your point well, though I've often found when I google that it's overwhelmingly about how trustworthy vaccines are. 
I don't know why you regard that as sad. Depending on what you're looking for, typing a question is frequently a good way to turn up a result of someone asking the exact same question in a forum somewhere, followed immediately by the answer. This is particularly true with common software. You being the first person anywhere to have a particular problem with Excel is like winning the lottery - not fuckin likely. 
I'm sure they used that example in your understudy. 
Yeah thats what I tried as well, with some extension for google chrome. What he was saying though maybe sounded like you could just access the forum without signing in. Not expecting it to work, but can't hurt to ask 
No wonder I was having so much trouble last week. Why the hell did they remove it? 
Triple is 'real verbatim' and single is 'sort of verbatim with other crap google thinks is relevant'. e:although it seems very recently they've even altered that and made it similar to single quotes and I can't even find information on it anywhere anymore 
Damn, what will happen when they launch Google Colon in 2018 
God damn I hate it when it thinks its smarter than me. The other thing is when it takes the one key term *out* because it found way more results with that term missing... except I was *trying* to narrow down the search to the small subset of manageable results, not wade through 100,000 unhelpfully broad ones! 
Is there a way to turn that off? I hate Google amp 
Reddit is valued at at least $240 million dollars, and they can't make a half decent search function. 
The trick is to read the most upvoted post that confirms your opinion. This way you won't see any bias at all. 
If only someone made a Reddit thread about tips for using Google and the first answer was how to view sites without creating an account 
Weird, if I add reddit to my search all I get is clickbaity titles. 
On google, If you click on the "complaint" links on those DMCA notices it brings you to an organized list of each URL that was subject to complaint. This is a good way to find the mp3 or other file you're looking for, ironically. 
This worked beautifully for me once, i dont remember what movie it was but it was an amazing view into technological advances 
Google scholar puts this argument to rest. You can literally search "thimerosal" and read the abstracts of the top cited papers. You don't even have to understand the study, abstracts are often written in plain English and are easy to digest. 
I have had decent google fu for years now, and once in a while the old way gets me nowhere and I'll end up just typing a question like google is god. It actually works. 
Google's put in a lot of effort to try and give good results to the less-skilled searchers that only search using questions. I've noticed that questions work really well if they're "when...?" sort of questions. I've had less impressive results with other question-words, but still use them from time to time. 
My wife Googles literal questions. I use keywords. She sucks at Google. 
Just use quotation marks.. "adidas" "running shoes" 
You forgot a critical step: go up a row or 2 and delete *that* code, not the code that is initially highlighted 
Yeah she would. She likes the front door and the back door. 
Happened back when they released Google+, so probably because it interfered with that. 
The 500 early adopters will insist that the quality of shits taken with a Google colon is vastly superior, but no other shits will be given 
Results for "how to fix car in GTA": * How to fix cars! * missing: ~~GTA~~ 
Fuckin pinterest with their domination of the Google image results. 
People give posts ambiguous titles and wouldn't bother tagging them "I just found this weird tip today to help with my craft" is probably the title of that post you're looking for, and you'll never find it because of the stupid title 
I feel like this is what the internet is supposed to be and you have to enter the info in like a programmer. Not quite but most people won't put in that extra step all the time. 
Of course you have to do some thinking in the process to decipher what is bs and what is not. I feel like that thinking shouldn't stop at the internet but also in books especially history books. 
That's the correct way to do it on google; the parentheses are for ebay only (per OP's edit). 
Might aswell use the robot that was posted everywhere a few weeks ago then. 
I love and hate when the top search result links to a forum where the first / only respond is "How difficult is it to do a quick google search?" Well it was a lot easier if YOU didn't messed up the google results you asshole 
The other day I typed in "The other pig movie" Gordy was the first result. I was amazed. 
Fellow junkie here. Do not be led astray by people who are anti-science or anti-intellectual. This is real research. 
That's not true. Abstracts are generally written assuming the reader has significant background knowledge or is willing to read through the paper's introduction. Press releases are generally easy to digest. 
Well, he said they are trying :P He even admitted that Allo's assistant thing doesn't work very well which was surprising because it was fairly new at the time 
"ananas" is the word for pineapple in a few languages, it's not a plural of "anana". 
"Up a row or two" WHICH IS IT I need specific instructions :( 
Right there's definitely no discussions between the masterminds of Reddit who are secretly controlling the masses there. Seriously, don't bother! 
I've been in that situation before. Try saying aloud "siri, what to think". If that doesn't help you should try "alexa, what to think". If problem still persists just keep screaming until someone comes to help. 
And they didn't think of renaming their useless unused service rather than messing with an age old convention. Urgh, Google. 
If no other shits can be given, maybe Google is the superior colon. 
man if this was 2009 i would use some rage memes, welp. 
I read this imagining that she intentionally goes out and kills anyone with the same or a similar name to her in order to gain Google dominance. It's been a long morning, the coffee hasn't kicked in yet... 
It wouldn't be terrible if they'd let you go to the damn links. Nope, gotta sign up to continue FUCK YOU PINTEREST 
A Google cache that speeds up certain high-traffic sites on mobile devices. Makes linking a pain. 
"He got it!" *gif of a cat leaping 10 feet to catch a mouse* 
Lol it totally works, I'm very impressed. "The pig movie" turns up Babe, "The other pig movie" turns up Gordy. 
It isn't a joke, there are posts in that subreddit that clearly explain exactly what "VX" is... 
Abstracts should never require reading anything other than the abstract and the title of the paper. They are supposed to be a brief summary of what the paper is about, the method used if relevant, and the major result. They are primarily to give you an idea if that paper is going to be helpful to you as a researcher without having to read the whole thing. Of course, some papers are so opaque that even a subject matter expert can't make head nor tail of them, but for the most part abstracts of papers published in any decent journal will be readable by anyone moderately familiar with the field. 
Was much funner a minute ago when OP couldn't spell Banana. Now instead of comedy it's tragedy (comedy where I'm the victim) 
Yes, exactly, but by using a regular "or" you're kind of implying that it doesn't matter, as long as it's at least one. But grammatically, what you said is certainly more correct. 
but does it have sharks with freaking lazer beams on their forheads 
Not sure what is going on for you guys. But I get 10 results for (74) and 10 results for (75). 
Google isn't making much sense in general when it comes to Google+ 
"gta my coke business got raided and my crew got arrested" missing: ~~gta~~ 
Google engineers must be scratching their heads over this sudden surge in 'Brittney Spear' search - while looking for a way to profit from it 
Interesting... I use chrome, signed in to google on an android phone and somehow that's just never come up. Sounds annoying unless you have absolutely tragic internet speeds. 
When discussing something on a reddit thread I often open a new tab to Google the topic being discussed. More often than not my top search results will be a reddit link. I wouldn't have to use Google for that if reddit had a decent search engine at least for its own content. 
me too. Since my name is fairly unique, searching for the issue is easier if I knew I had done this before. I post my answers unbidden on usenet groups 
It's no joke! There's a lot of active research into sub-Coulombic inductance coils. Apparently they could have applications in electric cars, Hyperloop projects, and Cranford C-beams. 
You'd be surprised at how many people aren't familiar with a field though 
Or most things they do. Here's a laptop! But you can't take it out of the house as it needs data to work. No it doesn't have data capability haha 
Yeah, as others said Google just decides it's smarter than you and thinks "No, spear is obviously wrong because it doesn't generate nearly as many search results!" 
My buddy did his PhD on Cranford C-beams. Their paradoxical change in structural strength compares to withstanding deep oceanic pressures when the forces are applied perpendicularly, where only the hypercrust plating was applicable in the tangent corners. The sub-Coulombic inductance coils could funnel out the weak energy so only the forces necessary to maintaining integrity of the C-beam and increasing its resistance/kg property remain within the structure. 
The chromebook is a neat idea, and I could see some situations where it would be a perfect product, but I feel like most people want more from their laptop. My 4 year old $300 laptop does what a chromebook would, and then some. 
-narrows eyes at you suspiciously- ....-Slowly walks away while still staring suspiciously- 
Perhaps even grandma was abused herself and that could be what drove her to do it. 
Damn. That guy was fully responsible for his own death, you just happened to be there. Lucky he didn't take you with him. It's a shame, but double the speed limit in the middle of the night with no lights? 100% his fault. 
To hold a stranger's hand in his final moments. You are a beautiful person. I hope you are okay now. 
I keep trying to type something, but fuck anything I type just doesn't feel right. I'm so fucking sorry. For you and your family. 
That seems like it should have definitely been at least a two person job. 
And don't make illegal u-turns like a dumbass. That would've solved the issue. 
Thats not your fault. You didn't let somebody too drunk drive. Thats what you're *supposed* to do. 
He got to spend his last few days with his grandkids, and helping his child through a rough patch. If you could ask him, I bet he wouldn't regret his decisions at all. 
why did he attack you? was he on drugs or had a mental breakdown? 
You can't live your life at the beck and call of everyone else. It's healthy to take time for yourself. I'm sorry that this happened in this case and I understand why you feel guilty, but you couldn't have known. 
As part of my job, I work with seniors to improve their reflexes and balance. These are things that degrade with age. In most demographics, falls kill more older adults than anything other than heart disease and cancer. People with good balance and quick reflexes rarely seriously injure themselves from a fall. Your grandfather in his younger years could have recovered from his misstep, or could have gotten his arms out in front of him in time. Frailty, decline, and bad luck killed your grandfather, not you. It could have been a crack in a sidewalk. 
Sometimes people do this as a means of suicide. It's unfortunate you were involved and had to deal with the fallout but it wasn't your fault. 
I wonder how many lives you unknowingly saved by repoing someone's car. 
I had a similar but less serious incident as an adult in Taiwan. A friend dropped me off at the place I was staying. I opened the door on the kerb side and a kid on a bicycle slammed into it. He was ok, a few scratches. What some may not realize is that sidewalks are uncommon in Asia and so the area between buildings and cars is still road. The reaction of my friends suggested this was my fault and I should have looked before opening the door. 
My girlfriend gets pissed when I don't respond to that kind of thing while doing something potentially dangerous. This is exactly the kind of thing I'm afraid of. I'm sorry for your loss man. 
You aren't clairvoyant. I know you're in this profession to help and I completely understand the frustration, anger and sadness that comes with hindsight, but please don't beat yourself up when all of your efforts and training don't turn out to be magic. Focus on the people you do save, while still having sympathy for the ones you couldn't. I'm positive the former outweighs the latter. 
Do you remember this or did your parents tell you? 
You say that you were in the wrong place at the wrong time, but hey, you're alive. Sure, it would be great if that man had survived, but if he had been in front of you, you'd be the dead one, and he'd be typing up this comment now. I know that it sucks that you had to be involved in something like this, but fate works in cruel, yet mysterious ways. Maybe the guy would have died the next day from a heart attack or something? I know, still awful to think about, but look on the bright side: at least you weren't texting and driving. If that had been the case, then yeah, it would have been a lot more awful if someone had died because you were distracted, but that's not what happened. The other guy just got really unlucky that day. 
Neither of you knew about his condition. He was essentially a ticking-time bomb. The circumstances of it suck, but it's not your fault. 
Hey, it might not have been your kit that was used. Even if it was, you had no way of knowing what would happen. 
This was my thought too. All too often love gives someone rose-tinted glasses, so it seems likely he did something to damage that. 
Even then the decision making is difficult. They saw someone sprint out of the building, they opened fire. What if it was a Chechen soldier or a marauder with a gun? They were in the same moral predicament I was. They did not want to shoot a 17 year old girl, but they took the chance of what they thought was right and when they saw someone sprint, they opened fire. We do so many actions thinking we have the best moral interests and we still commit atrocities in those split second moments. I don't blame myself, I blame whoever put us in such a horrible situation that that had to happen. Those decisions were not made by us, they were made by the men who created the war and pushed so far as to create an environment in which people HAVE to make those decisions. 
Thanks. I don't know about that. I was scared. I was trying to keep him awake until the paramedics got there. I didn't want to move him out of the car, I felt like we shouldn't move him in case he had trauma to the body but bystanders insisted. He looked so lonely stretched out on the sidewalk and I kept thinking about how his long life had led to this, a car wreck with a 16 yr old girl. I used to think about it a lot, that my voice was the last he heard, my hands were the last he felt and if that even means anything. I don't know if he was even aware I was there. It's been a long time, I'm 37 now but I think about him every January 2nd which was the day of the accident. His family being so gracious and reaching out to me made a big difference in how I coped at the time. 
Im very sorry to hear about your sister, and thank you for the kind words. I've had to stop trying to associate 'blame' and who made the mistake where--it just goes down a hole that doesn't have a good outcome. 
They replaced the street lights that day, pretty fucked up it took a death to save a few cents. 
I don't know the full details on that, but I do know that the chat logs were saved so the blame was really taken off of us. We demonstrated meteorologically why we wanted hail. His argument was "I have more stripes, get rid of it." I just wound up having a discussion with my commander about it in private and he basically said that no one pulls rank on the weather. Next time this happens, we have to stick to our guns and don't get pushed around by a "senior" forecaster. 
It should have but in most cases the staff to aid ratio is ridiculous. Imagine being left to care for 33 people that's what our third shift does anywhere from 25 to 33 people most of them total care several are bariatric residents. CNA'S are not valued enough for what they do. 
Seriously this. Last Summer, I was vacationing with my family and girlfriend in California. We stopped at a wide, slow-moving river and we got in to swim. Girlfriend had never been swimming in water deeper than she could stand in before and I grew up with a full size pool and could swim really well. Girlfriend was supposed to stay near the shallow part but somehow ended up in the deeper area. I came over to push her back to shore and it was SO exhausting to nudge her the 8ft back to the nearest grabbable surface while also trying to keep her head above water. I almost passed out from exhaustion when I got to shallow water and my legs were shaking like crazy. Definitely could have easily drowned. 
I understand that that would've probably happened but I still wish I could've helped somehow. 
It was a very small town and the driver was old. Still no excuse. Things can happen. 
Exactly. Think of what would happened if he drove drunk with another passanger. Him, his passanger, and any number of people in 1 ir more vehicles coukd have been killed. Likely, at least one life ended up being saved that day. 
Or suicidal, even drunk me would probably look for a more comfortable place to pass out than train tracks. 
The gun is always loaded. It's not a toy, end of story. A hunter should know better than to give a firearm to a kid outside a safe environment (shooting range). 
This woman obviously believes she has nothing to live for, so I second the 'she's not fucking around' angle. It makes me sad that the mother could never find closure or place responsibility where it should have been, and that it's not allowing this person to move on with their lives. 
The thing that makes it feel like my fault is that after his second DUI he asked me to keep his gun so it wasn't an option. He then asked for it back a few months later to go shooting, I reluctantly gave it back to him and said to give it back afterwards. He said he was getting counseling and other things to help with his troubles. I would compare him to Robin Williams, he was typically the life of the party and could cheer anyone up. It just hurts knowing the last thoughts about me were that I hated him. I didn't/don't, I was just frustrated with him because I cared about him. 
Its easier to cope with the loss if there is some sort of scapegoat. They probably know on the inside he didnt do anything. And social pressures and not seeing the signs are why he'd blame himself If I were to guess. But the last part is very true. He obviously had the intent to commit suicide, he would've done it one way or another. 
One night I was out drinking with a friend that kept saying he wanted to go get some coke (cocaine). I didn't have any interest and told him no thanks. Told him to just go home and call it a night. We went our separate ways. Got a call the next morning from a detective because he was found dead. He overdosed. Obviously that was crushing, sad news. But I also felt terrible. I felt sick. I felt guilty. What if I went with him? Could I have changed the outcome of that night? Well, his mother, whom I had never spoken to before, called me a few days later to tell me that she absolutely does not blame me at all. She said he was "a big boy and only he was responsible for his decisions." I didn't realize it at the time, but thinking back, that call really really helped me. 
Drugs. Alcohol and pcp. I could smell alcohol, of course. I didn't know about the drugs until a while after. 
I think this is very important. This reminds me of a post here where a little girl had to have surgery and she was not allowed to eat the day before. Of course her parent gave her food and she almost died. People often think that these questions/advices are "just protocol". It can help to remind them they might die. 
If they've got something to hide, then they will hide it. If you're lucky, you *might* get the truth if you get loved ones away from them, but then you also might not. 
This and suicide by cop are just despicable acts leaving monstrous guilt and pain 
It always seemed like I killed him in my 9 year old perspective. Like I was sitting there watching as he died thinking he was ok 
Probably quite a few. Roughly a third of our repos have "empty alcohol cans/bottles" on the inventory list. I've never really thought about it until just now, but that does pop up quite often. Thank you for pointing this out to me. 
No. Not following basic road rules as a driver is the stupid fucking thing you can do. 
The investigation lasted nine months, at first they wanted to charge me with negligent homicide, it ended up getting brought down to a negligent driving ticket. There really was no grounds for that either but it seems everyone that day got something. The bus driver was substitute and she was no longer allowed to sub bus driving and the victims boyfriend who was walking with her but didn't get hit, he got a Jay walking ticket. Years later the family tried to sue everyone, but it got thrown out due to a time limit they had to file. My insurance company handled everything, I never spent a day in court. You could imagine what that would do to anyone let alone a 17 year old kid. Reliving in therapy is one thing, taking the stand would have destroyed me. I never even finished counseling. I wish I did. I'm still dealing with it to this day and I just turned 36. 
Why the fuck would the pedestrians walk over a red light when there is traffic? Is it just the German inside me that doesn't think this is weird? 
Here in Canada, if you open your car door, you're responsible. You are required to look to be sure it's safe, since someone walking or riding along can't predict when someone will open their doors. 
My girlfriend gets mad when i tell her to take her feet off the dashboard when i'm driving. Every time i have to explain to her what would happen to her legs if we were to get in an accident. 
I Actually learned this from my grandmother when i was 13 
unrelated, but during my time in high school, a kid shot himself due to being bullied incessantly. kid was a freshman, and it seems that after he died, everyone apparently was his friend afterwards. even the kids that fucked with him. might be a coping mechanism, might be something else more selfish, either way, he suddenly gained a lot more friends in death than in life. 
Life long asthmatic that has it under control now. You are totally correct. It is often exercise enduced or can be triggered in other ways but it is a pretty quick thing, not delayed. Not your fault at all. 
Also, he should've gone to the hospital. It's unfortunate to say that he may have done it to himself 
Exactly. You did what you thought was best and a terrible accident, well out of your control, occurred. I wish you the best and I hope that you can learn to handle and overcome that pain one day. Much love. 
Doesn't even need to know the month. He'll, they can get away with "Accident x city x month/year". I'm an emergency medical dispatcher and we never get to know the outcomes of the calls we take so it's something we often check. 
The second time a passenger ... critiques my driving, my go to is, "Do you want to fucking drive? Because I can pull over and let you have the driver's seat." My wife was mad at me for three days, but she hasn't done that shit since. 
I agree. Couldn't anyone just order an arduino online? I'm sure they're really easy to get anywhere. 
There is. That's why it's something I hate myself for. 
Yeah like maybe for her it was kind of okay to be the receiving end of her husband's abusive behavior but after knowing that he has also been harming their grandchildren, she goes that's it, it has got to stop. 
Thank you for the condolences, but my real message was, in instances like this, "blame" can't be directed - understanding the actual causes is almost as complex as understanding the results, and you were unfortunately caught up in a terrible story outside your own. I hope you've "moved on" as best as you can and have come to realize none of this was your fault - you were an unfortunate victim in someone else's story, and I hope it doesn't follow you 
Unfortunately it's called Blood Priority, very well known in the aviation industry. 
This is the part I don't get: Who cares if they object, regardless of their rank. You are the forecaster. It's your forecast (your subordinate's, in this case) with your initials on it. So long as your forecast is consistent with the operational area forecast, note the objections in your forecast worksheet and leave your forecast as is. If it doesn't verify, then be prepared to write up the missed forecast review. Too f-ing bad for the guy that doesn't want to brief it. 
No, they certainly are not. When I was a brand new nurse CNAs saved my ass on multiple occasions. Cannot thank them enough for all they do! 
I agree. I decided to end care for my now late husband. He had severe brain damage from a car accident he had. No chance of recovery. I knew it was the best thing to do. Couldn't leave him hooked up to a vent with feeding tube for my own selfish reasons. It wouldn't of been fair. But I didn't know exactly what end of care was until we were in it. They pulled fluids, feeding tube etc. It took 6 days for his body to finally release him from it. Watching him die slowly, hopefully never in pain. They did give anti anxiety meds and pain meds around the clock in hospice to help, and he never appeared to be in pain. But shit.... Watching that... Watching him die slowly... It broke me. I remember the minute he passed away...I cried so much because he left but also felt peace that he was no longer stuck in his body. 
My great grand mother passed a few years ago, and it was one the most.. non-sad? funerals I'd ever been to. I mean, we all loved her and missed her, but for about a year before that every time you left it would be like; "See you at Christmas grandma!" "Oh, I hope not." She was there, mentally. She was mostly blind, from cataracts. And she was just.. ~~waiting~~hoping to die. And she let her wishes be known. I just wish we were in a society where one could just.. opt out, in a legal, humane, acceptable way. 
Also, drown victims are very dangerous to be near, they'll push themselves up on anything or one near them. No way in hell an 8 year old could've saved another drowning 8 year old in the ocean. It's nothing like swimming in a pool. 
As an adult with training, maybe. As an eight year old? Not a chance. The *best* you could have *maybe* done was stay back and encourage him. But most likely you would have simply witnesses him going under for the last time first hand. Not a memory you need. Sorry you lost him that way. 
As someone who lives in a small town filled with old people, old drivers in small towns are the worst drivers I've ever had the displeasure of encountering. Because they live in a small town for most of their life they're not exactly sharp when it comes to traffic rules (they don't have to deal with any other cars on the road most of the time either), and they seem to think that *everybody* ought to go 10 km/h and have no courtesy to speed up or pull over when they have 3 cars behind them and they're crawling along not even putting their foot on the gas. 
I can't drink because I become deeply suicidal. I keep it at bay sober. 
Yeah as a non-firearm user this is the rule I live by. Can it fire a bullet? If so, assume it's loaded. 
I imagine it's really difficult to do. Guns don't just go off, the kid pulled the trigger. That's probably all that woman has focused on, that this particular person pulled the trigger and her little girl is dead. Doesn't matter (to her) that the responsibility of the gun owner who handed it over was to double check that his firearm wasn't loaded. *We* know that this never would have happened had proper safety precautions been taken but to her.. it sounds like she can't un-focus on who pulled the trigger. Yeah.. I would not be taking this threat lightly, this woman is not ok and sounds obsessed. She's probably seeking "justice" despite nothing ever being able to make this right for her. This whole story is heartbreaking. 
Oh I agree. The fact that he has restraining orders against her and the police don't do anything about those threats is a joke. They are legitimate. I understand she lost a child, but also, this man did not kill her daughter. 
I've lost two close family members this way. Not the exact same living situation, but same behavior and end result. I'm sure if they were still around they would forgive you and know you were right not to let them take advantage of you. I hope you're taking care of yourself and are able to let go of feeling guilt, I know sometimes it's hard. 
It is so important what you said, "Its easier to cope with the loss if there is some sort of scapegoat" this applies to SO many situations in life. For example, I got dumped because there was someone else is easier to accept than I got dumped because I was not the one he wanted. 
His mother doing that, and in such a timely manner given what she was coping with, is a testament to how great of a person she is. And I bet her son, your friend, was too. I'm sorry for your loss. And you are definitely not to blame. You doing any more than just telling him to call it a night just isn't realistic. What else could you have really done in what was a normal night to you? Nothing, and suggesting he go home was going above and beyond in itself. In this life, people are gonna do what they want no matter the advice given. 
We had a pool party for my daughter's 6th grade graduation party and we hired a lifeguard so the adults could relax a bit and not have to stand by the pool the whole time. 
That was me when I was a teenager. Was at the beach and swam out to a buoy -- I wasn't (and still am not) a good swimmer, and by the time I got there, I was completely exhausted. I was hanging onto the buoy while frantically waving to a passing boat. The passengers smiled and waved back. Somehow I managed to swim back to the beach. My body felt like it was on fire and I could see my entire chest move with my heart beat. 
Fuck the media, they always make up shit. You were definitely not at fault here. 
I had a Spanish teacher in high school that was an anesthesiologist in Brazil before he moved to the US and told us about this happening. When they intubate someone they will gag when you're taking it out then if they ate or drank they will puke and immediately aspirate it back to their lungs and basically drown. 
My dad's a cardiologist and he calls this the "door stop". He's been practicing for almost 50 years, and says when someone is leaving his office, if they hesitate for even a fraction of a second at the door as they leave the exam room and don't sneeze, there's something they didn't tell you and you need to calmly figure out what it is. 
But surely they should have warned you, and told you to turn him on his side if he choked? If you weren't there, it would have happened either way. If they had some kind of baby monitor, shouldnt they have come in to check on him? They probably blame themselves but took it out on you as a coping mechanism. 
My god, I had someone like that in front of me yesterday. Guy was driving a small moped with loosely fitting shoes. We come to an intersection where right of way is going left instead of straight ahead or right. This idiot makes a full stop, brakes screeching on his stupid little machine, to let a cab pass through that didn't even have right of way coming from the left. Actually, not coming in or rolling, no, standing, while waiting his turn. If I hadn't paid attention, or any of the other 10 or so drivers behind me hadn't, this guy would have most likely been reared and the cab might have just t-boned one of us. 
I mean, as a random person on the internet I just feel sorry for you. It's like you were chopping onions as a chef, at your workplace which is a normal thing for people to do where you are at, and someone threw a person on top of you and that person got stabbed. Like, what could you do, you tried with your human reflexes, and it wasn't enough for that time. I don't know how anyone could blame you. 
You likely did him a huge favor. If I ever end up in a nursing home I hope someone will be there for me to do the exact same thing. Once all the quality of one's life is gone, remaining on earth is sheer torture. 
oh god i am so sorry. how is your relationship nowadays? 
That doesn't seem like a great age to learn that. Did it have a negative impact on you and would you rather not know it? 
I don't think Amazon Prime covers Afghanistan. The only commercially produced product that is available for purchase in every inhabited place on earth is Coca Cola. 
"you can hurt me, but if you hurt my kids... now youve gone to far" 
Believe me, I learned all of that after this. I was zone lead, but I didn't have that much experience with it. I had certainly never received rank-based push back. Usually there some kind of met reasoning to go along with the "i don't want that in the forecast". I never let anyone control a forecast like that after this. I'm still livid that this had to occur for me to learn that lesson. And I've been on both sides. I know how shitty it is to tell the CC "hey, the weather will be straight awful for the next 12 hours. Things need to get covered and the area your critical missions are in is going to be unflyable." No one wants to hear that. But I'd rather take the heat in the moment and have no one get killed versus changing the forecast and sending dudes into a storm. 
I've thought about every possible thing that could've happened differently and that one has been hard to think about. I wish I saw him one more time since I just turned around and he was gone but seeing him go under would be too much for me. 
As someone raised with guns who owns multiple this is me even to the annoyance of others. I can unload the gun myself and hand it to someone to look at and if they point it near me I will scold them. 
Yeah, the main red flag is the arms. They don't thrash or wave, they instinctively slap the water horizontally, like they're imitating a bird. You can sort of tell that they have no control over their body, that they've just completely focused on not going under. 
When you are in trouble in the water youre supposed to raise your arm with a closed fist so it doesnt look like you are waving. There needs to be more info about this sort of thing. 
my mom was murdered and I was there and a week later when I went back to school everyone was asking me questions and the news made up shit saying she was hit by a baseball bat to the head. We didn't even own a baseball bat he just used his fists and punched her in the temple but yeah media is retarded. 
Balance and falls in general are so overlooked by people in good health. Living in the Northeast, I probably slip on ice 3-4 times a week during the winter. Another 20 years and that slip that I regained my balance on is me falling on my ass. Another 20 years after that and that's a broken hip. 
I agree theres a look that patients get if youre watching closely. I had a guy in a similar situation, denied with his wife there. He looked a little funny. Was going to apply nitro paste which wouldve been a similar effect. Didnt order paste, sent spouse on fools errand: guy had seen a prostitute the night before, hed used viagra. Had i not been looking right at em, id have missed it, and im pretty sure he wouldve lied. 
Me: Do you have any medical problems? 78 year old Patient: Nope. None. Me: What do you take the Lipitor, Coumadin and Metformin for? 78 year old Patient: For my High Cholesterol, Afib, I have had a heart attack, PE. Oh and I'm diabetic. 
That makes sense it was just hard to process as death I understood but hadn't experienced it on a personal level and felt liable for the kid in the situation, i guess it was the parents fault in the end 
It's true, after all quality of life is gone, every day is Hell. My father dealt with MS and Tinitus for a long long time waiting until my big brother and I were grown enough to understand and living our own lives before he took his. He was unhappy for atleast a decade. He went out with some dignity, he knew he wasn't getting any better. Still, the best man I've ever known. 
Uh... so in an unrelated incident 4 years ago right before I graduated high school, my parents kinda, for the lack of a better phrase, kicked me out? I wasn't able to do very well in programming like I had wanted and didn't build the prerequisites to go to UBC, and they basically went ballistic and never want to see me again. I'm living alone right now, and my parents haven't responded to my contact attempts since. I'm not sure if they're even in the country any more. 
It actually better knowing, my mom and I have had a complicated relationship, She said that she loved me(like any mom would) but could tell there was some form of resentment and its better knowing where the resentment came from 
Well I think there are other sources. After all, the Taliban seem to have access to all sorts of weapons, so I don't think an open-source microcontroller would be too difficult for then to get their hands on. 
I do hope you're able to forgive your eight year old self. Your cousin wouldn't want you to feel bad forever. 
If I ever hand someone my gun I always double check to make sure it's unloaded then before I hand it to them I tell them to keep it pointed at the ground and act like it's loaded. Safety is key. 
honestly I'm a lifeguard and I've never heard that. That's really good advice. 
Yup, healthy as a horse. No reason to be seeing me. Good day, sir. 
Most suicidal people don't want to leave a mess. But sometimes you just can't think of any other way. And depression changes your mind. When you go into a depressive fugue it's like the whole world is literally gray and grainy. The person in your head isn't you anymore. 
My father passed in 2013. He had MS and had completely lost all use of his body in the 10 years before he died. He used to tell me that it took everything he had in him not to ride his electric wheelchair into traffic while he could still use his hand. I was young and selfish and thought it was horrible for him to say that. Now that I'm a little older I am a huge advocate of assisted suicide. I don't want anyone to suffer the way he did. Sorry to hear about your dad, I understand why he chose what he did and I love that you still admire him! 
How'd you afford to live? Sorry to hear all that. :( 
I can see that. It would be better to know in that case. 
The number of NYC taxi drivers with graduate degrees from their home countries is really rather astounding. 
I would add one should also disclose herbal or nontraditional medicines because some do interact with other drugs. At one point, I used St John's Wort, and because I had heard of some interactions, I made a point of always disclosing. I also found that even the more skeptical health professionals would still rather know everything a patient is taking. 
Jumping in front of a train was honestly one of the leading ideas I had when I was having suicidal thoughts. I **never** wanted to leave any kind of mess for anyone, but I figured that with a train, at least my parents wouldn't have to see it and try to clean up. They'd also not have to live around the area where I'd died. Those were very big positives in the "death by train" column for me. Plus the fact that it could give them hope that it was a tragic accident, if that helped them cope. 
Yeah....particularly a dick move when it's the boyfriend of a girl who just fucking died. As if that guy doesn't have enough on his plate. Like all the guilt of not moving his girl, or being more careful about crossing the street or any of that. 
My boyfriend manages a movie theater and one of his employees is a Pakistani immigrant with a master's degree in mechanical engineering. Can't get a job in his field at all. 
Thank you for that; as a pharmacist I'd like to point out that taking St John's Wort with common medications like antidepressants can potentially cause serotonin poisoning, seizures and death. Considering it's a natural, over the counter supplement used to TREAT depression (amongst other things), the amount of people who begin taking it to help their mood and don't think about how it will affect their other medications is astounding 
Had a prime view of a woman jumping right in front of a train. I was standing about one a half meters from her when she jumped onto the tracks in front of a train that was like 5 meters close. She managed to lay down on the rail so she didn't make as much mess as if she'd get hit by the train itself. Pretty much cleanly cut in half, made it past the first set of wheels. Must have instantly blacked out from pain, because she only got one short scream out. Reason? Issues with her partner. Aftermath? Train traffic stopped for a few hours, police got there first, then firemen, then paramedics (essentially just drew sticks which one of them is going to pronounce her dead), railway firemen (half an hour drive), railway inspection (about 45 minutes drive). And of course they needed to get the people from the train to their destinations. And last, but not least she left behind two teenage children. &nbsp; Also one part is still bugging me. She marked her ticket right before me. 
I'm sure the cops did it to relieve the liability from OP who has to deal with having accidentally killed someone. It would help him if it went to trial had the family sued civilly. It would remove at least a portion of the responsibility from OP. It sucks but it's part of the process. 
You've got a really level head and good outlook. Harbouring a grudge does you no good. Keep on pushing forward and working towards your goals. Best of luck in life man. PS shout-out to BC! 
no kidding - like textbook. From another Canadian, hope things are goin alright mon frere. 
A friend of mine was a paramedic and arrived at the scene to find a woman cleanly decapitated some old school street trolley with steel train like wheels, they had no ideas where her head was and like 15 minutes later they found it in her purse. She put her purse on her head laid in front of the trolley got chopped then the purse rolled away and snapped closed in an alley. He was a long time emt so he wasn't even mad he was just impressed 
Just wanted to say I'm glad people like you still exist So hard to find a good poop engraver 
I just got expensive custom musician earplugs from an audiologist because I go to a lot of concerts and festivals, and boy do I wish I had done it earlier. I always assumed audiologists only work with old people but I could tell he does all sorts of interesting stuff. Now I feel old as I want to tell everyone to protect their ears better. 
Another SLP here. I work in a hospital setting, pediatrics. I've done inpatient and outpatient care. I mostly do feeding/swallowing therapy, receptive/expressive language for children with varying syndromes, voice therapy to reduce hypernasality, cognitive therapy with TBI patients. It's super interesting and I love the different types of patients we get to see and wide variety of cases we deal with. It's always a different day! Modified barium swallow studies are really fun, too. Look it up on YouTube for some interesting videos. 
As the assistant manager of an ice cream shop I know that sticky feeling all to well. Another bonus, people love me after work because I smell like waffle cones. 
Is going the full route to become a CPA worth it? Especially with how difficult I've heard the exams are. I'm currently an accounting student, and I was basically wondering if working for businesses and such are worth not getting the CPA? Another question would be is the job as boring as everyone that isn't an accountant makes it out to be? 
So, I'm studying Chemical Engineering (BS) right now, and I really like the concept of heat transfer and thermodynamics. What kind of background do you have that qualified you for this position? Additionally, did you have a really strong interest in materials engineering, or did the opportunity just kind of happen, and you ended up loving it? Thanks for any answers! 
I'm interested in becoming a nurse! What does a normal day look like for you? And what kind of schooling am I looking at? 
Your ideas intrigue me. I would like to subscribe to your newsletter. 
Why don't you look at journalism as well? If you're unable to get a job in your country, look at working overseas in international relations. Pick a party and volunteer. Look at candidates and help out. Be involved in your community and volunteer groups and charities if you can. Try and be in a leadership role of some sort. 
How does someone get into Umpiring or refereeing in general. My dad was an Athletic Director at my high school, but he never told me. 
I am so happy to see someone actually say they love teaching. Everyone always bitches about teaching and when I tell them what I am going to school for they tell me not to. I'm going to teach social studies and English, so a bit different from you but it is still so refreshing to hear someone say they enjoy their job. I guess my question is, is the common core no child left behind problem that bad? Are teachers really that backed into a corner and allowed no freedom to teach how they want? 
I disagree with that last bit. Otherwise it wouldn't be very mobile. *edit ITT: my numerous illegitimate children 
So were you like a computer science or engineer major before youtube? You seem to know a lot about coding and circuits. 
How hard is it to get in the field? I'm considering doing a Masters in neuropsychology, then research. What's the research like? 
Job fair can't be complete without the armed forces :) where's the telemarketer guy? 
Yeah. OP was probably thinking more along the lines of "Career Day." 
I love cooking, always considered myself good at it, and that's exactly why I never ever want to do it for a living. 
It's the kind of job you love to hate. Kicks you in the ass every day and you keep coming back for more. I wouldn't want to do anything else 
It's really not that hard at all, that's the problem. 
Funny thing is when people take the link to be both ways. As a locksmith, I lost count of the times I was asked to reattach a heel or something. Sorry ma'am, I'm aware that shoe repairers cut keys, I can't fault your logic, but I can't fix your shoe. 
Audio engineer here. Yes, everyone SHOULD be protecting their ears. I wear earplugs to every concert I'm at, it's just always too goddamn loud. Why? Because that's how everyone *likes* it. The louder music gets, the less clarity it has. It becomes just a wall of sound. That's no fun for anyone, and that's where guys like me come in. To weed out those unnecessary frequencies that "muddy" the mix up, and to bring out those frequencies to give the highs more definition, and the bass more oomph. Most concerts sound best between 100 and 115db, depending on what you're listening to. You *should* have earplugs with you, but if you happen to forget them, that's okay. It's the SUSTAINED EXPOSURE that will damage your hearing. Please protect your hearing. 
Exactly this! I'm currently working a fairly complicated page with lots of graphs and charts, and it works perfect in Chrome and Firefox. IE outright crashes before I can hit F12 to open the debugger. I hate Internet Explorer. It is probably the single most annoying part of my job. (I'm a web developer/software developer.) 
To QA people: please, please, please be descriptive as you can be when reporting a bug. The steps to reproduce a bug must be crystal clear to the dev - "I pressed a button and the system blew up" is not a good description of a bug, we will push it back! 
I have a 4 year zoology degree, which included a semester long unpaid internship at the zoo. And don't discriminate against minipigs... 
If you want to work in accounting, get your license. It provides immediate credibility and speaks to an expertise. The CPA exam is tough, but it's really just a gut check - are you willing to put in the time to learn the material. Don't need to be a genius to pass, you truly just need to spend 6-12 months studying. I spent around 500 hours (total, for all four parts) studying and passed each one first shot, and I was never the best student. Truly just a "is this person willing to put in the time" My job isn't boring in the least. I'm sure there are some boring accounting-function jobs - being an accounts payable clerk somewhere probably sucks. My client base is really diverse and the services I provide are as well, and I am also involved in firm management. Every day is different, definitely keeps me on my toes. Now, that's not to say each day is the most exciting day on my life, but the job (at least mine) isn't the stereotype. 
Understanding chemistry and/or metallurgy will help you greatly in a heat treat field. You'll have to be able to read and interpret microsturctures. When I was graduating high school, I really wanted to go into Aeronautical Engineering. THANK GOD I DIDN'T!!! I had to take a class of that in college and I hated it. Anyways, I had my choice of any other engineering disciplines. I ruled out mechanical because there are like 80 billion of those already. I didn't want to go into nuclear or civil engineering. So, between chemical, industrial, and materials....I went with materials. I went to the library and research what the fields were about before choosing. And, I've ended up loving it. In Materials, we dealt with ceramics, polymers, and metals. I initially wanted to go into ceramics because I thought metals were almost dead. I WAS WRONG!!! Metals rule!!! I have a knack for metallurgy and heat treatment. It's such a fun and interesting field. 
Thank you! It means the world when someone appreciates the work I do. :) 
I worked on a step down ICU unit. Expect to have a BSN (Bachelors of science in Nursing) as many hospitals are only hiring nurses with at least a bachelors. Feel free to PM me with any questions! 
I am a nurse that changed careers. It isn't that I didn't know what I was getting into (and you do clinicals fairly soon after you start school, so you at least get an idea fairly quickly), its that nursing took over my whole life and left very little room for anything else. I was working 60-70 hours a week, with little or no vacation, and I did that for 10 years. Also, I disliked constantly feeling like I had way to much to do and not enough time to do it. We were constantly understaffed, and, at times, I would have to leave someone begging to go to the bathroom or whatever because I had other more important things to do. I didn't like the way that made me feel. It got to be extremely stressful, and although the money was alright, it wasn't good enough to justify how unhappy I was. I also want to add that I wasn't a slow nurse or a bad nurse, I got all good reviews and was never written up or reprimanded for anything. AMA if you want. 
Doesn't look like he answered. I am going with money laundering. 
As soon as you start talking. Its not nine, its niner etc. like when you write strips you underline your S's, and slash Z's. Also you have to say everything correctly, if i said remain clear of class bravo airspace instead of remain outside, i can get fired. The pilot may only hear what he wants to hear and think "oh hey cleared into class Bravo" then when he goes into it and causes a problem, it comes back to me. 
Not at all! Fcing is my favorite! i live in a headset 
I'm thinking he means the opposite and was going to write 92-94% has yet to be explored or something. 
I have delivery help. And a few other things, but basically I'm a one woman show. 
Not an Editor yet, but on my way up via Assistant Editor work. No college degree, I went to one year of technical school, did a ton of networking, and now I'm making really good money. It's hard to land if you're 1) bad at your job AND 2) shitty to be around. Lots of people get hired because they're talented assholes or friendly n00bs. You don't HAVE TO have both, but it helps. 
It's a well-known chain, yea. I was hired on as a "production baker" after years of fast food experience with other chains. 
I work 10 PM to 6 or 7 AM. I love trying new designs when I have the time. I made baby shower doughnuts for someone a while back. 
I can if I want to, yea. I don't usually. I might have a doughnut or two or sometimes just a bagel. Some of my coworkers bring home several dozens for their friends or kids. 
I have eaten the buttercream whole but mostly to make sure the food coloring didn't change the flavor. That brownie batter filling we had a while back, I could eat that by the spoonful. 
It's decent enough. Certainly more than I've made at other jobs. I worked at a sub shop in the same city and made 7.25 an hour. 
Not all jobs need college. Nobody can answer that question until you know what you're gonna do. College is expensive, but very rewarding and can lead you to a great career that pays well. You have to decide for yourself -- is it worth it? 
Find local youth leagues in your area, they are frequently in need of a lot of help due to lack of volunteers. They are normally more then willing to train people who want to referee or umpire. Through those leagues is how you can find advanced clinics that prep you for high school games, which pay fairly decent. 
Criminal. It is, actually, more boring than people make it out to be. At least until you step into court to argue your case. 
Yeah, but then again where's the excitement without some danger? In all honesty I'm not too worried. Chances of that happening are fairly low. 
It's the water, as well as the idea of a real hands-on job. I've been SCUBA certified since I was 13, and I've been swimming competitively since I was 9. So, yeah, I like water. 
Not OP, but pretty much exactly what it sounds like. Someone that welds while diving. It requires licenses that take time and money to earn, but can prove to be profitable if you are willing to put in the time. It is still a manual labor job, so you will need to consider how long you can do it for. Finding the right contracts can be very lucrative with people allegedly earning a six figure salary in USD. 
Yep, I have a degree in computer science from one of the top colleges in the United States, and I worked as a software engineer for Microsoft before doing youtube full time. 
Nope, everyone is very supportive. They mostly just think it's really cool that I'm able to make a living this way. 
Actually, ElementAnimation did the animation for those videos, so I'm sorry to say that I don't have any good advice for you. Best of luck, though. 
I'd say I work roughly 40 hours a week, though it varies. I'm working a bit more now that I'm live streaming several times per week. I work a lot on the weekends. My friends generally are very interested in my job, its much easier to relate to the minutiae of my job than a normal desk job. I also get a fair number of video ideas from my friends, and they like that sort of limited involvement. 
Varies widely, but activities include playing around with random ideas in minecraft (sometimes as a vague as "what are some cool things I can do with x block"), livestreaming for 3 hours, browsing reddit a lot, checking comments on my videos, writing some experimental code, and, of course, building things in minecraft and recording videos. For various reasons I can't/won't say how much I make, but it's enough that I don't worry about paying the bills. 
I'm a plant chemist for a metals manufacturer. I do handle our environmental. I have an MS in analytical chemistry. Instrumentation is probably the 2nd best path to go on to get an environmental job. Environmental is probably the first. Most of my environmental work is done with a Hach UV-Vis kit. A 10 year old could run it. Some work is done on an ion chromatograph. Some is done via complexation/colorimetric on a UV-Vis. I also handle electrolyte chemistry and HF/HNO3 chemistry for our pickling/cleaning line. Plus our acid recovery plant. Lots of titration there. I also run the raw materials analysis group. We use an XRF, remelting furnace, graphite furnace & flame AA, ICP, and spark-OES. I get to play with 70% perchloric acid all the time. So that's a plus. I work 50ish hours per week and get payed about $80k per year. I have 7 years experience. I drink a lot in the evenings. 
Aww, thank you very much, that is extremely kind and even more flattering! It's really humbling to hear things like that, so thank you. Good luck in your studies! 
In terms of interesting? Getting to work with friends who had birds of prey. They're just fascinating animals! Typical high school stuff: AP Biology, AP Chemistry, AP Physics, AP Calc, etc. For college, lots of ecology classes, lots of field biology classes, a smattering of chemistry and organic chemistry among others. A couple geology/geography classes, too! 
There are three* general fields: prep, production, and post-production. *maybe also marketing and distribution... I work in production, where the actual shooting gets done. Specifically, I work as a grip: sort of lighting and rigging and support department. and yes, all aspects of the industry are pretty stressful. But usually quite rewarding. 
As another person who does film work, all you really need is to know other people who do it and they'll get you jobs. You just tell yourself what position you want and you tell other people that is what you are going to do, no less, but obviously you can do whatever the fuck you want. Eventually, you'll want to work yourself into the union which is Local 80 for grips, Local 600 for camera, Local 700 for editors... etc. Each one has their own set of rules and ways to get into the respective union. But they offer workers comp, retirement plans, health insurance, and they fight for your wages as well. 
I did phone surveys for three years a while back... 
Luckily for me, I'm not on ship. I'm on a military installation and I do get to go home after the work day. 
I hope this takes off in some way. I'm at that point in life where I know what I want to study, but no idea which direction to go career-wise afterward. :s 
The phrase: "If you love what you do, you never have to work a day in your life." is total bull shit in my opinion. Never ever turn your hobby into your job. Just accept that work sucks and that you need to sell some of your life to make other parts better. 
People have to like their mailman otherwise they'll get their credit card bills and parcels stolen. Source: I'm a postman working for Royal Mail. 
For anyone curious: The current set up is basically just a guide linked to a carbide cutting wheel. The original key and a blank are secured in the device. As the guide follows the grooves of the original, the cutting wheel makes those same grooves in the blank. The new key is then lightly wire brushed to remove sharp edges. Source: I got a key cut and was curious so I asked to watch... 
 As a drummer that sits next to amps all day, everyone tells me to protect my ears, but I don't hear them. 
One of my most favorite and least favorite parts of writing software is fixing bugs. While you're fixing them, it's hair pulling madness and frustration that only increases when all the standard steps don't do anything. But then you fix it and for the rest of the day you feel like you just saved the world. 
I went to school for creative writing, too. I'm currently a bartender at a major chain resturaunt... 
"Don't taxi to runway one niner-" "DID HE SAY TAXI?" "ARE WE TAXIING?" "he said don't taxi.." "WAIT DO WE TAXI OR NOT?" 
I know this may sound a little stupid, but how does one get 'connections'? Is it purely luck in knowing the right people or did you actively seek them out? 
Strangely enough, also a professional editor from Boulder, but working in NYC. Small world! 
Have you ever been tempted to make sweet love to one of the donuts? 
I will be thinking about this all night. Thank you. 
**Engineer:** "These wires carry a lot of electricity through them. We must be careful not to touch them." **Lineman:** "Lol let's fly a helicopter next to it and I'll totally climb all over it while the wires are live." 
Thanks for the reply. Initially my comment started off in my head as a bit of snark, but that I came to a similar realization. Now i'm concerned that I've doxed myself 
I'm a legal assistant for a PD office while I finish up my undergrad, I don't think boring quite cuts it. Mind numbing amounts of paperwork and going into court just to get your next pretrial date set or lay the factual for a plea agreement that is shit is the general opinion I get from the attorneys. But damnit if their eyes don't light up when they get that case they know they have a slam dunk way to fight a bullshit charge. 
I didn't like welding in the rain. I couldn't imagine welding in the water. Especially in water with salinity. 
Yeah, most underwater welders dont last long though, usually 7-10 years before their body can't keep up with the pressure. That's why the pay is so high 
If the views ever stopped coming in would you go back to working as a software engineer, or try to stay in the video game world? Also, I love your videos! Good luck in UHC! 
Well I get all the info second hand Mr. Bling. I'm just a mom. They would probably kill me for messing up a conversation with one of the "famous YouTubers" anyway. But I promise the only way I even know your name is because all the kids in the neighborhood love you. Anyway, stay gold. 
that's pretty neat, always wondered how much time youtubers spent working. Really appreciate the answer, and good luck in the future! 
Doesnt it ruin movies for you if you see how everything gets done? 
What kind of jobs are available in the navy and what can i expect in your line of work? 
It's Okay, It's only 18 months. I had the same freak out.. It's from December 2012, not two years..  this guy and his exaggerations. 
Hah I totally agree with this. But on a different level. I like to apply for jobs that would be difficult to learn. If I dont get the job, oh well, but if I do. I get to learn something new, and I love learning new things. It keeps life interesting. Too bad, now a days you kind of have to have a degree for almost everything. 
We can't hear you either with your cymbal noodling. 
I graduated with a creative writing degree. I moved to taiwan. I spend 14 hours a week teaching English and all my insane amount of free time reading and writing. I still make enough money that I literally don't know what to do with it. I save 1k usd every month. Its just sitting in my bank account cause its so cheap to live here. 
The "reddit all day" sounds bad but its really not. His job is to fix things when they break, but a good system admin will manage to engineer a network that never breaks. If your sysadmin seems to be doing nothing all day that just means he's great at his job. If they're constantly running around putting out fires then they suck at it. It's counter-intuitive. 
You have to actively participate in the film community. You meet other filmmakers, talk about your passion for editing, see what they're working on, let them know you're interested and see where it goes. Generally you build connections over the years after learning who you trust and like to work with. It's a process for most of us, unless you were born into the trade. 
The way he abbreviates "you would" is extremely forward thinking. OP loves to be efficient, definitely would hire. 
Your flair is everywhere, Welding with salinity!! Welding with salinity!!! "Screaming infidelity" song, ya know. 
There's a lot of serious risks that come with it. Arterial Gas Embolism, Decompression Sickness, Pulmonary Over Inflation Syndrome and that's really just the tip f the iceberg. All of which can be life threatening. Most of those risks can be avoided, however. 
I'd probably try to stay in the video gaming world. Move on to other games, or even game development. 
If anything, it makes you appreciate the good movies even more since you understand how much hard work went into them. 
The military as a whole has a lot of jobs to offer. We're just the militarized/deployable versions of our civilian counter parts. In my line of work, you can expect to be dealing with teeth. There's a lot that can be learned though. 
thank god! now I have 6 more months until I feel like I should go outside! 
I'm currently in college, going for a creative writing degree myself. I've heard a bit about goung overseas to teach English, and it sounds really interesting to me. If you don't mind me asking, how do you get into doing something like that? What kind of training/proficiency/etc. is required? 
The emphasis put on "LOL" really makes you feel that he is laughing out loud, as opposed to the less sincere, bastardized "lol". 
this. firstly, i LOVE watching behind the scenes stuff. why wouldn't i? it's like being a fly on the wall of the big budget movies i havent worked my way up to yet! secondly, i'm not very critical of movies, i'm a pretty easy-going viewer. i like all the big blockbusters, i don't get too caught up in Awards; i just want to see some spectacle, and a good story or some fun characters. :) i actually kind of enjoy explaining to my SO or my friends and family "how they shot this thing" or if they're nodding to something else behind the 4th wall. 
You should be a mechanic, I am and I have a hard time pronouncing my name some mornings. I ruined a "defective" fuel pump because I wanted to see how much distance and pressure I could shoot water across the shop. Got bored a few days ago and was curious to weather or not anybody fucked with my tool box so I wired roughly 120vs to that bitch and went to lunch. He doesn't mess with my toolbox and I feel bad because the porter got involved and she's such a sweet girl. She hasn't talked to me in 2 days now and throws my tickets at me 
The boxes say "sprinkles" but my family is from New England, where they're called jimmies. I'm so conflicted! 
I don't know why you'd get that much grief. I've been wrenching for 15 years and one of the big rules is to not go into someone else's Box unless they told you it was cool. Hell, I've worked in the same place 9 years now and I won't go into another mechanics box without talking to him, even if he has told me mi Casa es su casa. 
My dad says jimmies. The way I see it, if they're just chocolate, they're jimmies. If it's rainbow or any other kind, they're sprinkles. 
It's military v. Military v. Police v. Public support for coup v. Public support for erdogan. Then you've also got the Kurds...many against the coup, some I presume will see this an opportunity for advancing their own political aims, etc etc. What a complete mess. 
They're the ones throwing the coup, not overthrowing it but yes it's a bit of a tradition over there. 
Yeah the live thread is very confusing "Coup has failed" "Military in control" "Erdogan in Istanbul with thousands of supporters " "That is old shit he are streaming" My head hurts. 
I hope you stay safe, just wait it out and it should blow over, Erdogan's on the ground so hopefully the immediate violence will stop. It's a bit of a dirty trick to use the call to prayer to push his message, and a bit rich when he was circling safe in his jet. 
These past few years have proven why "may you live in interesting times," is a curse and not a blessing. 
What's particularly telling is that the rebels compelled people to stay in their homes for their safety. Erdongen, on holiday, compelled people to go out to the streets and confront the soldiers, knowing many would die. It sort of doesn't make sense though that you'd take over a bridge and a handful of places to rebel. Why not just storm the parliament when Erdongen was there? You'd have to think that the military commanders were just fantastically bad at strategic thinking... It's clear that the coup was conducted too late. If the idea was to intervene to prevent a theocracy from consuming Turkey, it should have happened earlier. 
Both the AP and CNN idiotically claimed what was propaganda without verification 
Urging them to take to the streets and fight *people who have fucking tanks and attack helicopters*. Nothing says "I love my people" like asking them to go aggravate guys piloting 50-ton murdermachines while you desperately flee the country on a private jet. 
Yeah, it didn't really last long and now he can put forward more extreme laws and reduce the power of the military who's only job since the foundation of the country was to make sure it stayed secular 
"We are hearing that a coup is occurring in the democratically elected Turkey, the military wants to out democratically elected leader Erdogan, who was democratically elected" -CNN 
Calls people to the streets, flees instead of helping. Lmfao 
Yup. A failed coup is a hundred times worse than no coup at all. Erdogan will now have reason for vengeance, and some very twisted legitimacy for further action. 
no one knows. the only "repelled" reports are coming from Turkish state and government agencies. the ones whom would benefit from actually repelling it. 
Does it make you feel comfortable that he is talking about Pennsylvania and implying CIA involvement while we have nukes in his country? 
Counter-psy ops. Gotta make it look like the government is still in power so the people in the streets stay there. If they think the coup has succeeded, they may just go home. 
I read something (trying to find it in this thread) that he said the cycling F-16's where there to threaten him and that they bombed his previous location or something like that? If they bombed his previous location why didn't they bombed him at the airport? I mean they are fighter jets they could have taken him out of the air before he even had a chance of landing. Numerous fighter jets and helicopter everywhere and they just let him land? He can give a speech in front of a crowd with cameras? There is either something fishy about this or this is the boldest and most incompetent military coup in history. 
Good thinking! Those fighter jets would have made light work of him. 
Yeah, Ankara is pretty much locked down by the Pro-Coup forces. Still haven't seen anything other than Police vs. Military either - I think the lack of Military vs. Military might show that a far larger group might support the coup than originally broadcasted. 
more incoming: * 16 soldiers were sent to take erdogans palace where there are at least 250 armed elite force defendants. * 20 swat equivalent police officers waited side by side with 13 soldiers at taksim square. * captured soldiers claim they are conscripts ordered to make a drill. they surrendered when they realised what was going on. more will come. 
CNN aired footage of some sort of confrontation on the bridge. There were tanks on the bridge, and civilians crowding under an overpass with flags and the likes, chanting something. You could hear gunfire, but nobody knew if it was being fired at the state police, or if it was riot control weapons being used to disperse the crowds. 
I am and I'm terrified for Turkey. Erdogan would be unstoppable if the coup fails. 
Can't help but be thankful. But I feel sad for the innocent people that are caught in the crossfire. 
Not everyone lost, there was one winner and his name was Sultan Erdogan 
Most Turkish coups have been relatively peaceful. Ataturk had a big influence on the military and on the secular bits of Turkey that are still left. 
The censorship over there makes it difficult to hold a discussion. 
Turkey already had a couple of millitary coups before while part of NATO. America likes the Turkish military a lot more than edrogen and wont stop this 
If they attached a generator to attaturk they could generate enough power for half of turkey just from him spinning in his grave. 
Why are the Kurds against the coup, I thought they didn't like Erdogan? 
That's pretty bizarre, but hey if it's stupid but it works it's not stupid. 
Ferdinand Marcos did this shit in the Philippines too. Suspicious attack/coup and then martial law for a decade. He syphoned the Filipino reserves and got rid of anyone in his way. He only lifted martial law because the Pope refused to visit if he didn't. I hope this doesn't happen with Erdogan, but it's not looking good. Be safe. 
That is my interpretation as of now. New developments may change my opinion but it just seems too staged to me. 
Well, tyranny lasts for as long as people refuse to stand up to it. Every nation so far has shockingly, subtlety backed ergodan tonight... 
As an American who knew nothing about him until an hour ago he sounds like a total douche. 
That's the second most important thing a military should be doing. All enemy's both foreign and domestic. 
What I've read is that people really like the military and support them when they overthrow. You would then think that the people would then elect people who would please the military. Yet, obviously not. Why? 
what times are not interesting? Remember there was world war one and world war two times. Cold war times. There is always something going on but of course since we are alive now it seems worse. 
Believe it or not that's a strong argument here. And considering Erdogan's supporters don't even hesitate to call for our death(infidels) even in peace, the guy is seen as the evil-found-body by the more educated population. Don't mistake, Erdogan's voterbase is unarmed ISIS. 
CNN is disgusting. They are nothing but a State Department mouthpiece. Of course CNN didn't use that type of rhetoric for the coup in Ukraine because it was supported by the US. But Erdogan is a strategic asset to the US because he helps the US arm the radical Islamists in Syria and is hostile to Russia. There is nothing moral or ethical about modern US foreign policy and there is no real journalism at CNN. Disgusting shills is all that they are. 
Sounds suspiciously like an attempt to raise a shield using the turkish people as bait to force the army to retaliate against the population. 
Germany rejected him, now's he's looking to the UK 
Inside job by Erdogan to go "SEE, told you the military would coup" and using the fervor of his supporters, he'll sign in a new constitution that effectively neuters the power of the military and makes them a puppet for his Neo-Ottoman ideas to be used to put them into action? Also for a power grab and become like a dictator? 
If you're on holiday in the country, I suggest you contact your embassy in the country (if you have one) and ask what they advise you to do. 
Germany should've accepted and then put him under house arrest so he can't stir up more shit. 
Following the playbook. Night of Long Knives will follow, then Kristallnacht. 
They hate both. Secular military dictatorships in Turkey have historically been no kinder to the Kurds than Erdogan has. The enemy of your enemy is not always your friend. Besides the Kurdish parties themselves, no political force in Turkey is friendly to the cause of Kurdish independence or even Kurdish autonomy. 
Despite how serious this is, this single post made me lol very hard. 
Well not necessarily stopping turning back to Islam but more to stop any straying from secularity. 
This seems more plausible than a completely faked one. Erdogan hears of a plot and allows it to go forward in a controlled manner, and reaps the benefits. 
It's wrong, but not shocking. For example, Turkey is a major NATO ally, and they have a very strategic position to influence the Middle East, so obviously western leaders don't want to speak out against the Turkish government. 
I had a Simpsons level flip-flop. "Oh a coup, that's bad." "Oh the people leading the Coup aren't doing too good, that's good." "Oh, the leader of Turkey is an Islamist with an agenda, that's bad." "Oh, the people leading the coup support democracy, that's good!". "President Obama just backed the government instead of the military, that's..." "It's bad." 
I don't think it's really realistic to expect a state, esp a state like Turkey, to be overthrown without any casualties. 
Really depends who you talk to in Turkey. The military was at the head of some very unsavoury Turkish governments in modern Turkish history. Don't blindly believe one side is better than the other just yet as many on Reddit already seem to have made up their minds on who are the good guys. 
German government was even more vague: "The democratic order in Turkey must be respected." 
It is, but the dangerous bit comes in deciding who is the enemy and who is not. 
Secularists in major cities like the millitary more than edrogen and his Islamist party. In the 1980 coup the millitary ruled for 3 years before democracy was resorted same.will.happen now prob if they succeed. The goal if this coup is to remove edrogen who is trying to seize more and more power 
haha they better have done - seeking asylum in Germany who he tried to sue cuz of that comedian 
I feel like an idiot when I fantasize about being around some drama like this or a tragedy. I want to feel like I've seen REAL shit and have crazy stories. But I always remind myself that peoples lives are obviously more important. 
It sounds suspiciously like he's using the population as martyrs. Step 1: Find out military has launched a coup because you're a shitlord president doing exactly what the found of you country didnt want. Step 2: Call public out to prayer while there is active fighting going on. Step 3: "SEE! I'M NOT THE BAD GUY! THE MILITARY IS GUNNING YOU DOWN IN THE STREETS! ISIS ISN'T SO BAD!" Step 4: Share a good laugh with the rest of lizards running the world after ensuring the middle east stays in a state of war over ideals so that you and you cohorts can keep making that sweet money from all the business that conflict creates. 
Tell him to fuck off, we dont want him Bring him to Glasgow if you must, then we can deal with him efficently 
Sadly, here in Germany you'll also find many fundamentalist supporters of him. I was on the street a few minutes ago (there were TWO lure modules in one street!), where a bunch of braindead / coked up turks gathered, to show their support of Erdogan. 
The U.S. embassy in Turkey has said try not to go to the embassy. 
Armies tend to do that when there's little to no oversight. I was gonna mention 16th-17th century armies in the Wars of Religion in Europe, or the American Civil War, but those guys were pretty much fully sanctioned to fuck shit up. 
Correct, but considering their position geographically it's unlikely that they'll lean to anything except Islam. 
More or less, yeah. It's really confusing compared to Western powers, but it's a very interesting setup the more you read about it. 
Someone like him was in power. Until certain countries didn't like him refusing them access to his country's oil. Some shit happened, and boom, modern Iran. 
I don't think he's really backing Erdogan it's just that if the coup fails we still have to work with him so best not to say we support the people trying to kill him. It would make meetings awkward 
The message from the followers of Khorne were slightly less so: "Blood for the blood god! Skulls for the skull throne!" 
There are a lot of shitkickers in rural Turkey. & rigged ballots, maybe. But it must be said; lot of shitkickers. Huuuge crowds of shitkickers. In this, Turkey is a lot like everywhere else. 
Yea, just look at Egypt for the opposite situation. 
problem is, turkey is huge, and apart from the big secular cities there's a lot of not-so secular countryside 
Considering the military is (mostly, supposed to be) secular, while Erdogan is an Islamist, I would think so. 
They should, better to stay calm and not 'pour out' onto the streets like erdogan says. Maybe they're used to it or expected this stuff anyway. 
Even more disgusting is the call to prayer. If I was a practicing religious muslim I'd be offended my beliefs were used towards political gain WHILE RISKING MY LIFE. 
What is the reasoning behind that? Is the embassy in Turkey and too dangerous to go there? 
Political religion (islamism) is not the only 'un-turkish' or 'un-Kemalist' thing that the military has fought. Socialism and regional or ethnic (Kurdish) separatism comes to mind. 
Based ataturk. I will read some books about him. Sounds like a great man. Real shame they seek to destroy his legacy. 
The government will say Erdogan has won until a helicopter is flying his hanged body through the streets. 
Like when the US voiced tacit support for the 2002 coup in Venezuela, during the brief period when it looked like it would stick. 
Personally, I think if you're in a region that has a risk of Islam coming to town and taking over, it's probably a good thing to say, "hey, FYI...military can come in and protect the people's democratic rights." 
Say what you will about khorne, but we always know where he stands. A real straight shooter. 
Erdogan is a fucking moron. He's going to get his own people killed. 
A call to prayer like this and the prayers for when a person dies has taken place all over turkey in about 90000+ mosques. A call to prayer like this is a Call to jihad. u can see why we're worried over here in turkey. Secular turkey is gone after this day u can be sure. I will be weeping. 
They probably say this because it would mean leaving shelter to go there, and if the embassy is attacked, there is a higher chance of civilian casualties. 
Well the last major rebellion in the U.S. was about a century and a half ago. Looks like we're due over here. 
That's because if it's a coup and it's in Latin America the United States is almost always the one throwing it. 
Yeah that's assuming the Army never undergoes a religious awakening. I know it's super unlikely as they think it's their job to be secular, but weirder things have happened. 
The main problem with democracy, and its greatest internal contradiction: What happens when a leader or government is democratically elected, which seeks to undermine or dissolve the very democracy that brought them to power? 
If people obey the military, they become de facto rulers of turkey. Erdogan can't maintain his position and say that he is still the president, still in control etc etc, if the army call the shots and everyone listens. If he wants to remain in power he has to tell people to do the opposite to what the army is telling them. As well as that, a shooting or two would up the persecution narrative. 
no way would they attack the embassy - isn't that pretty much declaring war on the us? 
At this point I would expect fancy invitations to be sent out by the State Department... 
I think after this, assuming the army loses, which it appears it will, there will be a massive purge and it will "enjoy" an awakening. 
Ataturk thought he had an answer to that question: the military. Everyone loves talking about how Turkey was designed as a secular state, but how is it supposed to stay constitutionally secular with a fairly religious population? For Ataturk, secularism was supposed to be the military's responsibility. Whenever a despot threatened to dismantle the constitution or act against the nation's fundamental secular principles, the military could swoop in, temporarily suspend the government, and swiftly hold new, legitimate, democratic elections. That's been the impetus behind most of Turkey's previous military coups. That's not to say Ataturk's idea is any good, or that this current coup is working in that spirit. But it's crucial context. 
Attacking an embassy is a very common move for non-state terrorists or guerrillas. US embassies are a relatively common target because the US is disliked by many non-state actors, that's why they're so heavily guarded. 
But in a way, if they are eliminating democracy, they are also undermining your vote. They are also removing the very process that brings them to power; meaning they shouldn't have an immediate right to lead a non-democratic state if they were democratically elected. 
Ya everyone in school lives on 7 layers of irony and I love it 
I am guilty of secretly enjoying watching parents of students who graduated with my daughter last year having complete melt downs now watching the children they diligently helicoptered become the drunk-party-animal-failing-all their-classes students. Karma may bite me over it, but I hated watching them give their kids *zero* leeway to enjoy any part of their lives. 
But how dare your father not give their *little angel* an a+ on everything. What's frustrating is that the same parents that read your post will likely agree with you. But then a teacher gives *their* kid a bad grade? Well, now that changes everything. 
Once you hit college: you better have brought your calculator mother fucker, no we don't have one for you to borrow. 
Now it's just "you do that assignment?" "I got it from Johnny you need it?" "Yeah send it" then we just text pictures over 
I mean I'm HS class of 2016 but can confirm. I don't know if I'm alive for 50% of the days I get out of bed. Just keeping a physical body alive long enough to go to class and study and do homework and and go to clubs you don't care about and then go back and sleep and repeat. There's no passion in life to a lot of '17 kids. People are doing the grind ever so passively because spending time doing something else is a risk in it itself - unless you're using that time to distract yourself, in which case most students will do it to excess. Man, and I'm part of the problem, sitting in bed texting on Reddit when I should have gone to class but instead slept through it because I was watching a Twitch stream. But I'm just gonna keep doing it, cause I'm just so fucking tired. 
I came out in grade 12 in 2010 my senior year. It was surreal, everyone was just cool with it and no one really cared. I even stopped being teased for 'being gay', because once it became real I think people were afraid to diss it. Anyway, I'm so happy that atleast in my area (Ontario) it's quite safe for lgbtq students. My highschool had a positive space group, we had about 10 or so openly gay or questioning and everyone was cool with that too. We'd meet every Friday and have pizza for lunch, even once or twice a semester the teachers who ran the group would take us all to an art gallery and into the 'village'. So surreal. I'm so glad I haven't had to deal with much negativity, but it saddens me that I had one of the best out comes and others don't have a chance, anyway I'm rambling but your comment kind of put my brain on a tangent. 
Can confirm '17 I work for a cell phone carrier and one of the most highly congested part of our network is surrounding high schools. So not surprised 
My little brother just recently graduated high school. During his junior year, another student streaked at a football game. He was arrested and they tried to get him booked as a sex offender. He ended up killing himself. It was devastating, many many people were horrifie at the school's reaction. I remember my parents specifically saying that streaking at a big game would've been frowned upon but ultimately not a big deal when they were in school. 
I had a history teacher reference in high school how he used to ask students "What was the first political scandal you remember?" It was always Monica Lewinsky until my year group. 
Former Coast Guard Boarding Officer here. I would have never done that shit, but who's to say you weren't dealing with the Yost Guard. 
Yes, I've always heard about stereotypes (high school) like jocks not caring about grades and partying all the time. Some of my best friends are sports players and they work incredibly hard. 
I was under the impression dabbing died with 2016. Was hoping anyway. 
not a bad thing at all that they know to question nonsensical answers like that 
Can I ask if you're in middle/high school or college? When I was in high school, every single person thought they were the exception and that everyone else in their class was a hairless barbarian. 
97 - racial slurs 07 - you retard 17 - ~ironic~racism, homophobia, sexism, etc 
Then they go bitch that this generation is too soft 
It's even worse when a professor says "Go ahead and cache the entire internet on your laptop and bring it to the exam. It won't help you. Have fun." 
Same. And my mom was CONVINCED I was a drug dealer. Mom, I'm on honor roll, student council, I'm a varsity volleyball player, and I just got a full ride to college (state school, but fuck it) ... I'm NOT dealing drugs. I just like my friends to be able to get ahold of me while I'm out driving around aimlessly, possibly mildly intoxicated, so I can stop at the Taco Bell and call them back on a pay phone. DUH. 
A Google drive or a network for the students to share everything, making cheating streamlined and efficient. 
MBA is a networking degree. You should get it after excelling in the private sector. Kids who get them asap miss out. 
God damn if this isn't the truth and most of us are still dealing with the repercussions of not knowing how to handle failure. 
To be fair, this description sounds pretty much exactly like my life in high school graduating in 2006. It was fucking exhausting. I just kept doing more and more and grinding through the work until I pretty much had a nervous breakdown midway through college. 
Yup class of 2018. I was literally crying last week because I realized all I care about right now is my grades and that I'm so caught up in it that I can't even answer the questions "what are your interests?" Or "what do you do for fun?" 
That is all streaking should be. but people have to take it to the level of "OH MY GOODNESS MY CHILD JUST SAW A PENIS HOW DO YOU EXPECT ME TO EXPLAIN THAT TO HIM, THIS MAN NEEDS TO BE CHARGED AS A SEX OFFENDER AND HAVE IS LIFE RUINED BECAUSE I DONT WANT TO TELL MY KID WHAT A PENIS IS!!" If my kid sees something and has a question i answer it honestly and just say "dont go bringing this up in public place because it is rude to talk about body parts around other people, it could make them uncomfortable". Parents need to learn that their kids will see some shit when growing up and how to handle that in the proper way with your child is what being a parent is all about. not calling for someones head who is playing an innocent prank! 
I lived literally through the "hey, look, Internet!" and "hey, look, cell phones!" age. Maybe it's because I was tech inclined, but I learned very quickly to use both really well. There are a lot of people from my generation that don't, though. 
I remember being made to write fake correspondence emails about random bullshit to my English teacher in high school as part of assignments. Good practice really, it's unbelievable how many people can't string together a coherent email or attempt any semblance of formatting it. 
Well, AP classes *are* supposed to be specifically preparatory for the AP exam. So I'd blame the nature of the exam over the teaching style of the individuals. 
I laughed when he said she was hot. (it's probably a plus that she gets along with his daughter) 
That's exactly what I was thinking. I mean I think that movie exaggerated it (the cool kids don't think that "organized sports are so fascist"), but I do think it's true that the nicer, more accepting kids today are the "cool" ones. 
Good news everyone, we're going to visit the internet today! 
'I was born far too late to discover the lands, And the seas, and the skies, and the shores and the sands. All the steps have been stepped, and the walks have been walked, And the sights have been seen, and the talks have been talked. 'I was born far too soon to discover the stars, And I'll never set foot on the red dust of Mars. I shall only encounter the future in dreams - But at least I have memes. But at least I have memes.' 
Referential memory has been a thing for a long time. That's why you'd see the shelves of books in every engineer's office. Not just because they'd read them, but because they used them to look up what they didn't need to know off the top of their head. It's a trade off between how fast you need the info, and how difficult it is to look it up. It's just gotten so easy to look things up that more and more things are easier to remember via where you found them. 
I work at Chuck E Cheeses. When I'm in the outfit I dab. Little kids seem to love it still. 
Its crystal meth around my area. When I was in school, cocaine was cool, but weed was already on the downward spiral of being typical. Turns out a good bit of my friends were stoners, I was just too oblivious to realize it. Which is probably why everyone looks at me funny when I say I've never smoked weed or did any sort of drugs (with the exception of alcohol, but even then, I didn't drink in high school, only when I turned 21). C/O 2012 
I'm seeing a few responses similar to this below. I can't help but wonder if this is a result of these kids knowing they'll be competing for fewer and fewer jobs that pay less and less in the near future. 
Kid is lucky as hell if he's not dead. Poison ivy smoke works the same in your airways as it does on your skin - breathe it in and everything starts swelling shut, very similar to the most severe allergic reaction. If you straight up smoked it purposefully, I'd guess you have maximum 1 hour to get medical treatment before youre dead 
People still say niggerfaggot and call people retarded we've just evolved for more 
Can confirm. I'm in an igneous and metamorphic petrology course right now. All our tests are completely open note, open book, and bringing your laptop is required (both for the internet and Excel being used). Test averages still end up being around ~40-50%. None of the questions are Google-able, we literally just have them because without being able to check various online databases (MinDat, etc) it'd be impossible to get through the test in the 3 hours allotted. 
Our school has a Dropbox. The previous class sends pictures of the test questions:answers from last year. Technically not cheating because they released the test last year. 
This is the correct answer. The goons with MBAs have the same answers that goons without MBAs have: more cloud-based data-driven solution engines that free them from doing any real work, and having all sorts of accountability dirt on everyone around them. The difference is the 35 year old that just finished his MBA now knows a shitton of other MBAs that have C-level jobs at other companies, and it's much easier for them to land that sacred C-level on their job title. 
The cost of failure has gone up, people can't afford them anymore. 30 years ago, if you dropped out of high school and couldn't even read you could still find a job of menial tasks to make a decent living off. If you pull that today, you will get paid slave money and have to work 3 jobs without even affording a place to live, if anyone would even hire a high school dropout. Multiply by 1000 if you drop out of college and god have mercy on you and your family if you ever get sick and don't die instantly. 
Probably, considering our future economy is likely to resemble Japan's more and more in the future. Over-educated and under-employed young people working part-time work to eke out a living and finding satisfaction in personal pursuits rather than career ambitions. 
Not just on an academic level. God forbid you make a mistake in front of others then the whole world will know because of social media. 
i don't wanna become a doctor i just wanna go home and listen to death grips 
I feel like I'm beyond a nervous breakdown. I've gone past it and now I'm just in this intermediary where no amounts of stress gives me urgency anymore. 
Yep and also I teach/do research on sex/sexuality topics so a lot of students come out to me. 
I assume the only reason they haven't blocked all those apps is that your IT guys must also use those programs to stream video content all day. 
Can you get enough bandwidth through the vpn for Netflix though? 
That's a much better response than threatening to confiscate phones out of (i'm assuming) lockers. 
This is exactly what we did my senior year (2008). We bought a bunch of cheap alarm clocks, set them for times we would be in the classroom, opened a ceiling tile, and chucked it, so we could honestly say we had no idea where they were. We also parked two students' compact cars in the hallway, moved a teacher's entire room (desks, chairs, tables, everything) from her portable to the elementary school playground just outside, put every plant, fake or real, inside our principal's office, and put a RickRoll on a loop in the cafeteria TVs, then hid the remotes and ladder to get to the DVD players. I'm still pretty proud of that night. 
The really funny thing is due to the internet more younger children are now aware of human anatomy and sexuality than ever. The parent's whole "won't someone think of the children" has now become willful ignorance. Your child has probably seen more porn than you have. 
I got the pleasure of watching a drunk guy outside of a frat house pissing on the side of the house when campus police confronted him. They told him they saw him pissing, and the dude's response was "That's impossible. My dick is so tiny you couldn't have seen it!" Campus police left him alone after making such a watertight argument. 
It's not laws and regulations that are the problem. (Except for zero tolerance policies). There are certainly cases where you'd want a naked guy hanging around school to be brought up on sex offender charges. The problem is everyone, especially school administrators, being unwilling to use common sense. 
In my senior class of 09 we all brought one golf ball with us to our graduation. After we each walked and shook the principals' hand, we would give him our golf ball. After quite a few walks the principal was frantically cradling about 20 golf balls as they keep falling and bouncing everywhere. His pockets were absolutely stuffed with them as well. Half way through someone just brought out a bucket for him to throw them in. Innocent yet amusing. 
No, they should have been burned at the stake for condoning heresy. 
When I was in seminary I was responsible for decorating the 30ft tall Martin Luther statue in the quad. I did it seasonally. I used the school's ladder to do it. At like 1am. At seminary. People these days need to get a bloody grip. 
Yup. It sounds like bs, but it really IS who you know. I went to Western fucking Michigan of all places for my undergrad and did nothing but get drunk for four years. At my previous job I worked directly alongside two Berkeley kids my same age and one Princeton grad, simply because I met the right people. Fuck, I didn't even have an econ or finance degree (was in capital financing and acquisitions), I LITERALLY just met a guy in line for lunch, made him laugh, and got recommended for an interview. Boom. Close to tripled my income in less than two weeks. School recognition helps, but connections and work experience are far bigger factors. The biggest factor in most non specialized fields is being likable. 
Been in IT for 30 years, beginning on the "big iron". It's the pace of change that is different. Related is, which horse do you want to ride (.net, java, Ruby, etc.)? My kids still roll their eyes at me because, for example, I can't get something to work on it. But when they have computer problem, who do they come to first? Yup, dear old Dad!! 
this is simple achievement vs mastery. the complex thing is figuring out how to raise children to be motivated by mastery instead. 
You are absolutely correct! I do not blame the teachers, I blame the idea that surrounds them. However they say, take AP classes because they prepare you for college. That is not the case at all. I did not find myself more prepared, if anything I had to readjust to how I approached things because college does not hold your hand through a project or paper, you need to guide yourself. Maybe I am in the minority here, but I personally did not benefit from the way AP classes are taught 
That's the stupidest policy I've ever heard. For all what's worth though, back when I was in early primary school (years 1-4, they changed the rules afterwards) you could only give a student a "progresses adequately" (aka pass) or a "needs to improve" (aka fail) grade, in order not to demoralize the kids. Even then it only applied to primary school (up to year 6) not to everything afterwards (so for small kids it kinda sort of makes some sense, but still) 
It just all flowed together in a way that suggested he was making a genuine comparison at all levels on his radar with no regard to the perception we might have of him. Just a slice of life. 
21 and 22 are two of the best comedies I've seen in years, and the main takeaway is how realistic it is for youth culture (like Mean Girls was when it came out). 
The day my history teacher announced that he doesn't give a shit about dates was the day I was actually excited to go to History class. 
The brilliance of this poem is that it is truly depressing. I'm impressed and depressed at the same time. 
Yea but you didn't do anything wrong I don't understand. 
That would be my hypothesis as well. Kids in high school now have, in a way, had the veil lifted that was on students 10 years ago. Most of them seem to realize that their future isn't as bright and open as everyone was telling them it would be when they were kids. 
I would guess you do it by being a 13 year old who's never smoked weed or spent time in the woods. 
Further adding to this : The social cost is higher as well. You made a gaffe or made yourself look stupid before cellphones and internet? Yeah people remember and might remember for a long while if no one does anything worse for a while. Now you do it and it's caught on video or talked about online? it's there forever and people who were not even involved or even there or even in your own fucking town will be coming at you. IDK if teen suicide rates have gone up though...but I think it would still contribute to the "holy shit I can never mess up not even once" fear that young people have today. 
Now if only we had a nationwide transit network like they do... 
Social Media has truly shown how narcissism and low self esteem is a pandemic. The only people that get joy out of others misfortune are people that are not happy with themselves and have to get that small feeling of being above someone else. Before social media the trend started with watching reality TV. I can't wait to see what the next 'ego boost' machine will be. 
This is very important. People don't realize that we don't post our bad shit on social media, only our best. We shouldn't compare other people's highlight reel with our behind the scenes. 
Haha yeah I hit that point last semester and basically went semi functioning and failed most of my classes. Going better this semester but I genuinely don't care anymore. 
Thank you for being there for those students. I'm sure for some, you were the only accepting person in their lives. 
the IT guys can just whitelist whatever sites they want for themselves. Most school IT people have access to anything on the internet... Filters aren't auto-applied to every single account in the district. For example in mine, as a teacher I can access basically anything but porn or graphic shit (liveleak, etc) whereas kids can't use facebook, youtube, anything like that on their accounts. 
Nice. Our senior prank (2009) was to go to Michael's, buy a BUNCH of glitter in our school colours that we sneaky poured out while walking down the main hall. Glitter.... THEY WILL REMEMBER US FOREVER IF THEY LIKE IT OR NOT. 
Yeah.. I remember when my son was 9, I was checking his computer history, and he had searched for "nekid veginas". After I excused myself to laugh for 10 minutes, we had another sex talk 
He must have been going for his MS because his BS was already on point 
Zero tolerance is the easy way out, they don't actually have to think critically and asses things on a situation by situation basis. Laziness. Also, special snowflake parents. 
See, this is a senior prank that is funny and not just kids being assholes. When my husband was in high school (as a junior; I teach at this school now and have heard the story), some seniors snuck in the school and straight up vandalized shit--destroyed the school emblem on the brand new commons floor, shot off all the fire extinguishers, put glue into most of the locks, tipped over the shelves in the library...all shit that was just criminal and not at all funny. 
"Approved senior pranks" That's about the saddest thing ever and pretty much describes our generation. 
Yeah, I remember my days at Catholic school all too well... 
I have a soft spot in my heart for goats this is awful 
I have the TI-84 Plus CE and it's my favorite calculator. No ragrets on spending $190 on it 
My dad learned to program on Fortran. When we looked at my Sophmore year high school schedule and saw the PASCAL course he called it "new fanlged.". This was 1999. 
Her ass was thick as hell. My wife and I discussed it more than we talked about my kid's grade. 
Not doing anything wrong and not having your day/holiday/life fucked over by over-zealous police are not mutually exclusive, sadly. 
Pirates aren't MY enemies, checkmate international law. 
I graduated in 2014 and this was exactly the problem. Our history teacher called us the disillusioned generation. We knew the world sucked and we didn't have time to mess around. We all had jobs and did early college or got certificates if we could. I knew a few kids who wore suits every day for their internships after school. Not even a rich area, but we worried. 
I had an interview for an internship, but they also interviewed 40 people for the position. ...Apparently they didn't want me. I didn't have enough experience to get the internship to get experience. 
Yep. Rates are way up. 16-21 seems to be the "danger zone" Fun fact. Female teens are more likely to attempt suicide. Male ones are more likely to succeed in the attempt. 
We westernized long before we got rid of our shogunate so it's unlikely we will get the set of circumstances that will lead to that. We haven't even gotten a first shogun. 
I also find social media can really crush one's self esteem because you have all your peers or your old schoolmates or people around the same age as you doing things or collecting all these great achievements, making great connections and seemingly having their life together, while you feel like an utter piece of shit in comparison if you're taking a longer time/less "successful" path to get to the same level. It can get fucking depressing and pressurising. 
Exactly. And even when people do realize it, they often don't realize it fully enough to actually compensate for it in their mind and ego. Subconciously even though they know it's just their highlights, they don't feel it to the core enough to counteract the feeling of being lesser. 
I didn't mean to imply that I receive no postivitive reinforcment because I do. Most of the time it seems like there is more negative than positive. Or maybe I just see the negative more 
Probably. I'm really not ready to be an adult. At all. 
I took me like a month at my job to have my Internet Access unrestricted. My job: Programmer. 
The IT guy knows, but he's likely too overworked and underpaid to give a damn. The school administration probably thinks that VPN is some kind of illicit drug. 
My school's senior ditch day was ruined Because a senior asked her dad if she could participate in it Her dad was the principal 
Jesus. I guarantee there are still teachers there who despise you guys because they're still finding glitter everywhere. That's almost satanic. 
When my son was the same age I found "girls who are not wearing underpants" in his browser history. I actually still can't type that without giggling. 
This is why I think it's awesome that pornhub now has a sex education channel to talk about the reality about sex. It's kind of fucked that we now need porn sites to properly educate people on sex, since schools aren't doing it. 
After I graduated, the senior prank of the juniors at the time involved bringing the duck owned by one of the students' family members and letting it roam throughout the school. They also followed it in a huge crowd and took pictures with it. They all lost their senior trip to Disney and were threatened with calling the cops and being accused of animal cruelty 
Do people have honey allergies? When you touch that shit, good luck getting it off. 
If only that riverbed would have had a soft spot for goats...R.I.P. goat bro 
Nah, gotta go nspire CX cas. Not much more expensive and it can do just about everything 
The true hipster learns to code exclusively in fractran. 
Report that. It's one of the few things the boards actually take seriously. Patient confidentiality issues are a huge fucking hammer they don't want brought so they try to self regulate. 
Eh if your daughter corrects those two zeroes, Dat Ass is priority #1 conversationally. 
It's worse when you live in a small town that collects most of its income from tickets. I drove under two miles to McDonald's yesterday and passed six speed traps. The police have nothing better to do than sit in their dark, unmarked vehicles with the lights off and radar. Well, that and pepper spray teenagers for skating in an empty parking lot. Florida's great. 
It's hard to not see it when you can see all the facebook profiles of people who graduated ahead of you and notice that not everyone got good jobs or are doing anything with their lives even if they went to college. And on sites like Reddit you can easily find stories of people doing jobs not related to their degree because they couldn't find anything. 
If he's able to learn C++ well right off that bat that is great. I never had any programming until college and once I did get some taste of programming I loved it. If your child isn't keen to take on C++ (as it might be a little 'dry' for a youngin') you might look to the higher 'framework' languages (like swift, or .net framework with C#) which don't get into the dirty parts that C++ will have, but will increase his interest in programming. I hope your son is enjoying programming. I love the ability to 'make solutions' that programming allows. Good Luck! 
Been there! Rejected for an internship and they actually wrote in their letter that they wanted someone with more experience. (Joke's on them, though -- a month later I was accepted for a full-time position with a more established company in the same field, and a few years after that, the company that rejected me went belly-up.) 
Most males use suicide such as hanging or guns which will kill you pretty quick and usually works. Females tend to use something like OD on pills or slitting wrists which is slower and is less reliable? (If that's the right word for it) 
Worked for a company that was working for Dell. Part of my job was to remote into other computers to do stuff and fix issues. Took about 2 or so months for them to allow me Internet access. Yet they still couldn't work out why I didn't do work during that time, even though they had been told numerous times. Yeh I worked in a place that didn't want to give me Internet access to do a job that requires the Internet. 
Am surprised you got caught, school administration is normally very tech illiterate. I could have told them straight up that I use a VPN and they would think it was done kind of drug. 
Our senior ditch day was ruined because our "valedictorian" had her mom ask the school if it was an excused absence. Are you fucking kidding me?? The answer was in the name! 
You mostly get girls in underpants with those search words. It is important to be able to use google in a good way, so you need to have a talk with him. 
...since parents aren't doing it. I had the first "talk" with my son at 10. (Basic plumbing, dangers of becoming a young father, and mention of disease and the possibility of his weiner falling off.) Small discussions and questions along the way since. We'll have the final talk this year as he turns 13. (Foreplay, what diseases and why you might wish they actually made your weiner fall off, consent and the danger of being labeled a sex offender, emotional harm, etc.) 
... I'll give you an upvote, but I'm not happy about it. 
Yeah he'll be taking Java and Python in high school, but until I can get him into a programming classroom I figured I'd try to teach him nuts and bolts stuff. He builds computers with me so memory management during software development is something I want him to understand/think he can understand. 
I beleive this is correct, in most cases women feel they need to leave peaceful, where men are more likely to just end it quick and easy. 
There's some sleeper IT guys in school administration. It's a steady paying gig with regular hours that you're usually doing by yourself, and with little supervision. For someone coming out of corporate life it's easy enough to look past the pay cut and take the easy pope gig, and get paid to troll high school students all day. 
How was it ruined? Just ditch like normal. Them knowing ahead of time or not doesn't change anything. 
"Son, your bad spelling and lack of keyword knowledge will never show you a quality vagina." 
This is exactly the kind of thing that shows what is wrong with some parents. They think their child has looked up porn and they're mad? I assume you were a teenager when this happened. 
The only talk I ever got was when my dad told me "If you get a girl pregnant, you don't have to marry them. Pay for an abortion, take care of the kid, be a father, whatever, but only marry someone if you actually want to marry that person. You can be a parent without having to be married to the other parent. Both sides being happy for themselves is best for the kid." 
We got the cops called on us as kids probably around 13 or 14 for hitting Crab Apples with golf clubs to clear out of our neighbors yard. Which the neighbor asked us to do because the bees/wasps love them. So we decided hitting them with golf clubs was the most fun option. Crochety old neighbor next door called up the cops and the cop came and was like "Yeah so you guys have permission to clear these out? Did he say with golf clubs? No? Well... Carry on I guess" Old ladies with too much time on their hands are the worst. 
Unlock your phone so I can illegally search it or I'm going to arrest you! 
A man rented a small cabin in the woods with his wife for the weekend. She wanted to get away and relax for a bit and he wanted to get some fishing in. One morning, she woke up early and took the small row boat out on the lake to read her book. No sooner did she get settled than a park ranger shows up and demands to see her fishing license. She says she doesn't have a fishing license but that the equipment is her husband's and she wasn't touching it. The ranger says "But you have all the equipment here... that's good enough for me". She responded with "If you try to ticket me I'll accuse you of rape... even though you didn't touch me, you have all the equipment for it... seems good enough to me". That probably didn't work either. 
At my school, when the administration caught wind of a skip day, they would enforce rules very strictly for an unexcused absence, meaning your teachers had to give you zeros for anything missed that day and it also opened you up to getting put into detention. I more than made up for that time my senior year when I'd skip out on pep rallies. Not too upset about not having a skip day. 
Your dad is a wise man. I've watched several people ruin their lives doing exactly this. Don't compound your mistake by tying yourself to the wrong partner. 
Is there a law on this, so I can actually source it instead of a random Reddit comment? 
I'm 35. I don't even know what the fuck a VPN is. 
"we believe the new drug 'VPN' has been sold to children by 'The 4Chan' more tonight on 'The Factor'..." 
Fuck, senior skip day was a set day every year and the teachers mostly planned around it at my school. 
Son, your search history is a disgrace. What is this, amateur hour? 
Yeah but the high from a single whiff of Old Spice Original is enough of a gateway drug that it's clearly to blame for your current coke habit. 
I don't know why but this was the only one that made me laugh out loud. 
How would that work if they were home alone? Would someone just break into their house exclusively to ask them questions? 
Yeah, I can't imagine Mr. Salt n' Glass Penis-Tube up there sleeps well at night. 
You have to let them get some sleep, otherwise they'll die from sleep deprivation. Let's make it random whether the scream goes off or not. Maybe 1 out of 10 times. Enough so that on the outside they appear to be functioning normally but they're being slowly driven insane by Satan jacking their Bluetooth speaker. 
But wouldn't getting half a boner be an awkward situation, thus giving you a full boner? 
I remember back in the day when you could (if a friend's Facebook was left unattended) set someone's _default_ group for status updates to 'only myself'. This resulted in the user being relegated to their own, solo, echo chamber of sadness... Quite cruel, really. 
But any advertisement will load in perfect HD and have no buffering. 
I wake up every morning in a bed that's too small, drive my daughter to a school that's too expensive, and then I go to work to a job for which I get paid too little... but on pretzel day... well, I like pretzel day... 
I'd prefer giving them that feeling of having to cough but no matter how much they cough nothing ever comes up. They keep coughing because they figure "This time, something will break loose and I'll have some relief" but no. No relief. They keep coughing because there's something in their lungs but it never comes out. 
I have one of those stereotypical Asian parents. One of my friends would just randomly blurt out "Hey, when was that paper you needed to write due?" or "Are you ready for the math test?" and for the next week, my mom would be all "Pbghin! No playing video games, you have test coming up!" I'd correct her, but the idea of "there might be a test/paper/project due" outweighs the idea of "James is a shit-stirring asshole." 
I have no feeling in parts of my right arm. No feeling, that is, except for when it's itchy. I can feel the itch, but *I can't feel it when I scratch*! It's like nothing is happening. And the itch just stays there for hours, maybe even a day or two. It's literally an itch I can't scratch and it drives me nuts! 
And replace all of their salt with calcium bromide. 
Christ almighty, it's difficult to imagine what that would be feel like. Nice curse 
Time to castrate myself, because if people knew the sexual thoughts I was having then they'd run away. 
Ow god Jerry you can't even get your own name right. 
Hold off on this, I'm experimenting with behavioral altering by purposefully stumbling into them. Especially if they have their fucking laptop open walking around. 
or, instead of deleting browser history it would make browser history viewable to everyone. 
Just picturing this being implemented is hilarious. In places like the person's home or work, a device of some sort could be placed above the door to dispense glitter. For other places though I can only imagine someone hanging above the door waiting for this person to walk under or someone would have to follow the person with a bottle of glitter and sprinkle it on them every time. I think in order to not be predictable, each doorway would have to have a different person who pours the glitter. 
as someone with hyperhidrosis and social anxiety this is just another day for me 
Joke's on you; they will utilize this for free clean energy generation, making millions!! 
I like this. Very creative. You have a talent. You're probably on a CIA recruitment list somewhere. 
Alright, I thought we were doing funny comments here, not ones which hurt. 
This is actually a thing - although to a lesser degree than you intended, I imagine. It's called distichiasis. For me, the most annoying bit is that I get these regular length eyelashes in the inner corners of my eye. They'll poke/tickle my eyeball and cause random tears ( crying not damage ) until I pluck them. I get them less often and shorter in the outer corners, and least of all on the mucous membrane of the middle of the lids ( bottom more than top ). 
Had this happen to me IRL. I took sleeping pills until the problem went away. When I'd wake up, I'd often spend the entire time crying because it was so uncomfortable. Can confirm, this is the definition of hell. I have fonder memories of being stabbed. 
Thanks to a one-two punch of OCD and synesthesia, I can't round the tv volume to multiples of five, so come at me. 
This is fucking horrible, maybe the worse not violent one for me. I have a pretty serious drug problem and usually the only time ill stop and go home is after a few days because I smell, I don't know why but for me being smelly is maybe the. Most embarrassing thing, strangely more than being a drug addict. 
that's clever as fuck, and would be insanely inconvenient. 
My wife and i agreed that if either of us was terminal, instead of stringing it out by "making us comfortable", we bail on the hospital, say goodbye to our loved ones, and go on a bender, that for the terminal one, wont end. 
So... ulcerative colitis? I already have that. What else you got? 
But if they read a left-sign (and understand right) they will try to go right but then go left because they always turn wrong, which makes them right again....? 
Finally a good answer that is not a magical curse. 
Honestly this one wouldn't affect me much. Sometimes hearing a spoiler just makes me want to watch the movie even more to see the events leading up to it or afterwards. The exception would be movies with an important twist, spoilers suck for those. 
Pretty sure necropheliacs wouldnt have an undying fetish... 
Ok, that's a unique one. But it's pretty evil too. The octopi would almost certainly die pretty much immediately so you're gonna have some nasty rotting octopus everywhere for a few weeks, at least until it rains. 
Ha, you fool! I already suffer from this! Your plans have been foiled. I also look like a panda from the dark circles under my eyes all the time - even when I sleep properly. :( 
Ha, lucky for me I'm shit at electronics already. In fact the more blue smoke I inhlae, the worrse I become as eloctrics. bortle baby bortle 
Even worse if you lose your job and it keeps happening. 
That would eventually be fatal. Without any real sleep, your health will fail and you'll die. 
Make it higher odds, like 4 out of 10. This is supposed to be a curse and with my last act of non murder, I'm gonna splurge to make sure they're miserable when they go to sleep at night, not mildly inconvenienced. 
Came to say this, lol, it's not a curse, it's a real parasomnia, and it sucks! 
Maybe, but then since it's no longer awkward, it would deflate back down. Thus becoming humiliating again. 
Nope, his job pays slightly too little cuz his rent is slightly high. The taxi driver went slightly too slow to avoid avoiding the accident. 
The only videos they could watch is the important videos list. 
Thank God I didn't have friends until my parents stopped giving a shit and moved on to shaming my brother for being a disgrace to the dynasty 
Have you tried using a mirror and scratching where the itch is on the other arm? You might be able to trick your brain into feeling the scratching. 
And replace all of their calcium bromide with sugar 
Nothing is worse than meeting your best possible self from all the choices in life you has to make over time. 
Then it just turns into "Back before I was castrated, I'd totally have tapped that." 
Try to look out for the contractors testing signal strength for telecom. They get shit on enough and actually serve a purpose stopping and finding dead spots etc. 
maybe that's why babies cry when they poop, they're learning to ignore their assbuds 
You can lead a horse to water but you cannot make him sink. Except with concrete shoes. 
Interviewer:So why should I hire you? You: Well, did you *see* me walking in? 
Ahh the good ole "My armpits ALWAYS sweat. No im not hot just sweaty" 
Similar to when you're warm after consuming alcohol, you will still die in cold temps no matter how warm you feel. :/ 
If we're doing one per day, I feel like it's important to mix it up. Random place each day. 
Admitting you have a problem is 9/10ths of the law 
It would also be a neat party trick, though, so not all bad. Could even win some bets with it if you're clever enough. "I bet I could break this glass by dropping it an inch above this table." "Psh, no way, you're on!" ZIP! CRASH! 
That's my plan. I smoke and drink a lot and once I get cancer I'm just gonna ask for painkillers and go wild 
oh no my plan is flawed. i've been cursed with stupidity on my death bed!! gosh darn that jim! 
They're also insanely intelligent, so you might have a rough time finding the ones that didn't die immediately. If you have standing water anywhere, and they find it, it's their house now. 
Well I didn't know it had a name. I hear doorbells or banging on like a wall or gunshots. I don't live in a great neighborhood which I think started causing it. Some days I can never seem to fall asleep without it happening every 5 minutes. 
Holy shit, you could just let your dick do the thrusting on its own! 
It's worse than Time Warner. I didn't think that was possible, but it is. 
My Asian friend married a white girl. His parents just started completely ignoring him. He considers it a mixed bag. 
Barbarian....who doesn't wear socks with shoes. Hell i cant even step outside in my orange crocs without socks on. 
Doesn't work. I think it's because I only have some small patches where I have no feeling, with the areas around those patches able to feel that *something* is happening to my right arm. (Also, it's hard to scratch one arm without using the other arm...but it is amusing to try) 
Ah, the good old sugar/salt/calcium bromide paradox 
Both. White people have the "add extra x, y, and zs sterotype" whereas black people have the "laquafanidashaida" sterotype. Both of these are jokes of course, and are not mean to offend anyone. 
Nah, I'm an engineer myself. I'm not going to bother anyone working. I can recognize someone doing that. I'm sometimes the contractor. :) 
i'll take fleas over an animal with "bullet" in its name every goddamn day e: christ himself could not make me pick one single fire ant, let alone a bullet ant. fleas all the way. 
I think I like this better than the original saying 
However op specified they would be too hot, rather than feel too hot, so their body would actually be warm rather than just feeling it 
But the premise is they still can't get cold, so I think he could be the greatest explorer ever 
I'm pretty sure that an extended time of complete isolation and lack of simulation would actually kill someone. They'd go insane quickly and be unable to feed themselves. 
I think you read his username wrong. He wants you to PM tits, kittens, and the letter "N" 
Not necessarily, you can't trick this curse, it will do the opposite of what you want no matter what you do. 
The problem, IIRC, is that they bound keyboard shortcuts to it, also put it in the same place as the previous button in the UI. Which was very stupid. Not to mention it muted future responses in the conversation, so not only do you look like a minion-loving idiot, you also missed all of the replies asking for clarification. Modern web apps have already conditioned users to ignore small changes over time. 
On one hand no disappointing glares, on the other hand no free food. 
A man who wears crocs is a man on the edge with nothing to lose. 
Get a scratcher on a stick and grip it in your teeth - would be awkward as hell to use but might at least be amusing trying? 
You don't need to apologize for explaining a stereotype 
Yeah. I've had fleas (a stray cat somehow got into my house and slept in my bed with me, I shit you not) and while they suck, it's not the worst thing in the world. I've seen a video of a guy being stung by a bullet ant and I'm not taking my chances with something that has minimal mental capacity and can cause so much pain. Ant's definition of chill and my definition of chill probably vary 
you're welcome :) my mom would be so proud of my contribution to this thread. 
I mean, you can make a horse drink with a length of rubber tube and a pump of some kind, but it will be difficult and messy. 
The only feedback you have is yourself. Imagine you can't talk to anyone. Look into a mirror, for about 2 minutes. Right in the eyes. You'll get bored and want to do something. Maybe you'll talk to yourself, or fix your hair. Now imagine there's no mirror. There is only the four walls and you. Isolation is a horrible curse that I wouldn't put on anyone. God may have mercy on the poor future astronauts who will explore space by themselves. 
Maybe you should stop being so close to her so you can get over her before you resume the friendship. 
I didn't know about the keyboard shortcuts. Now *that's* stupid. 
Your cat was like "You seeing this shit? Literally. He shat, right there. What the fuck." 
"Never fight a man wearing crocs and a fanny pack, as he has nothing to lose and will fight to the death" - Confucius probably 
And thats why Matt Damon kills everyone when they come to rescue him 
Or, just don't resume the friendship. If you came to *really* like the person before, all the reasons for that to happen are still there. 
You can be friends with people you used to love, once you've moved on emotionally. 
Damn right I do, you guys are a new kind of sadistic 
It was only a matter of time till Michael Bay started filming romances. 
How do you feel about being included in so many writing prompts? 
Depends on the prompt, some are OK, others ehhhhhhh not so much 
And that's why when you have a bunch of animals in one place, it's called a zoo! 
I have 02 I feel you. I was at a red light with my friend and a challenger shows up next to me. As a joke I start revving my engine pretending I was gonna race him. He didn't even hear my engine lol. 
No kidding. My mother was on that shit for years. One night she did deep knee bends for two hours in the dark living room. Another night she asked me "where the black man was that liked your hair", when she hadn't had a black guest in years. Yet another night she tried to make a cake - in the morning there was pancake mix, an uncracked egg and maple syrup in a bowl on the counter. Ambien will fuck you up. 
Funny. I'm pretending my 1.8t gti is a dodge viper. 
People ask me what my cam is. I tell them it's a 7/11 cam. They are like what? I say that my valves are always open. 
You can save a lot of money by just removing the exhaust system altogether. Just sit still with the windows closed and rev away for as long as you can. I meant want. As long as you want. 
Bubble backs with 14" fart cans and shocker stickers 
Yeah, me too. Except I don't know of this thing you call "park." I have speeds 1 through 5 and a gear marked "R", which I assume is for race. 
I used to have to do this. single carb, air cooled engines hate cold weather but it was my only way around. I loved riding a motorcycle and loved working on it but living in a walkable neighborhood is such a relief 
Holy shit, there's a 24-7 fitness place that actually has people who work out at 2am... that's kind of awesome. I've always wondered what it must be like to use a card lock place to go lift at 3am, some weird 24-7 Popeye-bro in there who has been waiting for years for someone to spot his benchpress. 
"Revving your engine" to kittens is pretty messed up 
Ugh I had a neighbor with two ancient trucks that he parked in front of my house. These trucks shared *one* battery, every time he wanted to switch trucks he'd have to switch the battery. Hoods banging, engine revving to get things flowing, don't miss that at all. 
Yes! My neighbor just has a very shitty off roader truck thing, he likes to get started early. To make up for it, he brings back fish or hunted meat, and hosts neighborhood bbq's. Everyone in the neighborhood has something irritating, but we all make up for it. Lady with the noisy dogs down the street opens up her pool on weekends. The couple with the 3 screaming kids lets us use their amazing woodworking shop. I have the eyesore house but let anyone load up on produce from my fruit trees/vegetable gardens, as much as they want. Etc etc. Whole neighborhood is like this. The irritating stuff fades away if people give back somehow. 
Just stay the fuck away when they're pulling out of the parking lot. 
2000 Corolla Last summer my muffler literally fell off, picked up my girlfriend later that same day and she said it sounded like a Ferrari. Nicest thing anyone has ever said about my baby. 
Ha! Never knew that. Apple has a profanity recognition algorithm that detects when customers are getting angry, and connects them to an operator. Comcast, on the other hand, has a profanity generator, known as their entire goddamn system fucking comcast get your shit together 
Yeah they are pitched so I can see the faces of the people I'm driving towards. Why would you have them any other way? 
That's an interesting idea, adding the syrup to the pancakes ahead of time. Did you correct the pancake batter and have a delicious pancake breakfast? 
Ambient horror is my favorite kind of horror. Next to post-rock. 
Sheeet...I just want the mad street credit in my bright red polo :( (secretly wishing it was an rx7) 
For about a year my car did this. Unintentionally. Every time I would use the key to unlock it (key fob didn't work) it would go off. It wasn't a enjoy hearing it as much as embarrassed I didn't really have the money to get it looked at it the time. 
I thought 7/11 was called 7/11 because it is open from 7am til 11pm? 
Oh dear, it's metastasized to your radiator (I know nothing about cars). 
Don't worry he'll be revving his wake up engine for you then too 
Dats like an alarm clock or sumthing, you should be up cooking breakfast an'way 
My brother is actually Satan and once an hour he has the fuzziest of kittens tied and tortured to death by blind otters that he doesn't feed. 
Except Harleys sounds like shit due to their horribly fucked up engine design 
Ah you don't know? The revving makes you slowly deaf, so you hear less of the stupid things we say and the relationship gets better! 
Yes, this. Some little shit at my work thinks his fart can civic needs to be damn near red lined to get it to warm up when we're leaving work. JUST LET IT IDLE YOU RICEY LITTLE BASTARD. 
Its the highest gear. You go from 5 to R as fast as you can driving around 180kph. That's when things really start happening 
this particular one gets used at all hours of the day, but the broiest of the bros with their tricked out 3fast5furious civics and window-rattling bass cabs tend to be the ones that work out between 12 - 2am, and they tend to be the ones that tokyo drift out of the parking lot, but not before taking 30 minutes to come down from their cross-fit high, sitting in their car listening to what I can only assume is an album of the sickest bass lines to ever be dropped, and only the bass lines. When I moved to this neighborhood I thought it would be pretty nice living within walking distance of a gym, I'd have no excuse not to work out. Now I hate that place and the particular type of moron it brings around the area late at night. 
"Honey, it's five a.m. come back to bed." "It's those goddamn kids and their Ira Glass again." 
Should've bought him a cheap battery as a gift and leave it next to his car, no more noise and he might've gotten the message it's loud 
My girlfriend has a '98 Corolla, unfortunately still with muffler after 200,000 miles. My best friend has a Grand Prix and the muffler has a giant crack so it basically does nothing. People say that sounds like something bigger too. 
My dad bought 1000 knives from an infomercial and it came with a katana 
Ambient horror movies are the best. They just establish a real low, mellow baseline sense of terror and let it sort of hang their without escalation. 
Do you guys like your cars? I'm getting my license next month (the age for license in my country is 18 and i'm 19), thinking about getting a polo. Any thoughts? 
VR6's scream like the devil with a proper exhaust. You can never stop smiling 
It's scary how well you are able to describe my ownership experience 
They have to create the sound and pipe it through the speakers! 
It would metastasise to either the cam gear, the lifters and the rockers or really just the rest of the head in general. Really not a good situation unfortunately. 
Gotta triaxleate the induction capacity to 5.1-ish to compensate. 
Motorcyclists use this reasoning too, loud pipes save lives is the mantra. Except there's no evidence of that, and really they just like being loud because they think it makes them look cool. 
With a username like yours, Chad is the least of your douche bag name issues. Brah. 
It is the best dick, believe me. I don't know. A lot of people are saying it. They call me and they say your dick is enormous. You tell me. 
Hey man, Harley's are the most efficient things on the road for turning gasoline into noise. 
Lol isn't the point in 'warming up' (esp fuel injected cars) to let the engine idle/drive at low rpm to get the oil warm? How can you think revving it high helps here? I know carbureted cars are a different story. 
Yep, it's better to warm the engine while moving. Just keep the RPMs low for the first few minutes. 
I feel like you're me. You don't happen to live in Colorado off of 470 and Broadway do you haha. I just bought a house RIGHT up the street from a 24 hour fitness. It is seriously the broiest of bro central. The hilarious part, is that it's in Highlands Ranch (which, in this state, is suburbia exemplified), where you wouldn't think the bronozzles would be hanging out. 
Ha! Fuck you guys. 96 Corolla. Do I win? She's grey lavender and I call her the Misty Plum. 
I like to think he was just ordering a present for his sober self. 
I was on Ambien and one night I kept trying to eat a taco, but I couldn't eat it. It was a picture on a taco shell box. That along with many other things that happened that night showed me that I shouldn't take it anymore. 
A Polo is a good choice for your first car. Drives nice, relatively cheap to drive and maintain. Look for one with a recently replaced timing belt and you should be safe from any expensive repairs for a while. 
I feel like you're not getting the respect you deserve. I want you to know I'm here clapping for you. 
Had 7 of them thanks to vwvortex and the MK3 guys. Moved on to BMW. Same amount of problems but RwD 
Some of the Civic Si's had a hose that came off of the intake and diverted sound into the cabin. So you could hear your engine rev. VTEC, yo! Not making that up. 
This must be what it feels like when I talk about algorithms and computer science. 
That sounds dangerous, we should probably ban that technology. 
Those people were uncultured assholes. Probably never read Gatsby, either. 
I live in a house that used to be owned by a dude in a motorcycle gang. Every single Harley that drives by my house revs or opens their throttle up to max as they pass by. Every. Single. One. Bikers use their loud pipes to say hi. 
Wouldn't a turdcervix indicate a complete lack of douche? 
Ferrari engines too. They are tuned to a certain note. 
You don't need to warm up any semi modern car these days, just don't drive it hard as fuck right away. 
I know exactly where that 24 is, and can confirm the unusual existence of the broiest of bros, the 1 percenters of the bro world if you will. They seem so out of place in the suburbiest suburban area in the state. 
'96? Not even close. I got married and my new wife brought a '71 Toyota Corolla with her. Cardboard dash and interior. Black Vinyl upholstery. Manual choke lever on the dash (I am serious). Top speed 67. The cherry red had faded to an uneven light pink - EXCEPT the trunk which had to be repainted (in America) after my she had locked the keys in it with wine at 1ge 17 and got her older sister's pos bf to crowbar it open. Claimed ignorance so insurance fixed it. But to be fair, it stopped running so I sold it to a friend at work for $50 and some weed. So you probably still win. 
Damn do I feel for you. Sometimes a taco is all you need to be right with the world for the moment, don't take that away from me_ 
Also, the Top Gear trio love it. They might bumble and muck about but they know their stuff. The Cool Wall was legit. 
The BMW i8 has partly synthesized exhaust sound combined with speakers piping and amplifying the real sound through the cabin. 
The thing about Ford is they always try and drive it in 
Plebes. I'll wager they don't even have the James Joyce collection. 
I suppose you need to specify which universe. Somewhere, there's a universe getting ready for the 27th season of the show. 
You should greet them with an air horn. After you jump out of the bushes. 
Just so your brother is aware, every single other person in the world as he drives by thinks "Wow that guy is an asshole!". 
Fair point. Also, I just threw up in my mouth a little. 
He saw that the dicks were out as he had commanded, and it was good. 
Lexus had the LFA's exhaust designed by Yamaha to also produce a certain note. 
Boxer engines in the extreme cold require a warmup period due to oil starvation. But it's all of about 60 seconds after turning it on. 
My 95 sounds like a kitten purring, then you hit 40 mph and the car becomes acoustically attuned to sound of the drive grinding. But hey, the A/C blows colder than a snowmans balls. 
It's like the hokie pokie: left foot in, right foot in, left foot out 
Yeah because that's an excellent thing to do to a member of a motorcycle gang. 
I think I may win this one! My 91 corolla is so quiet when it idles I sometimes tap the gas to make sure I didn't stall. Then the cooling fans kick on and I can hear it from inside my bedroom past 3 closed doors and my computer's speakers. 
455's are torque monsters. Small bore and big stroke. They don't like to rev high because of that so you don't see many at the track. 
... and you do a big burnout. That's what it's all about! 
We go to bed, you doze off So I take your country-girl clothes off 
And speed parts are crazy expensive compared to the Chevy, fords, hemis. 
Or you drift it all about, depending; that tofu isn't going to get itself up the mountain. 
I put my hands on your body It feels like hay **IT'S A FUCKING SCARECROW AGAIN** 
This reminds me of back in the day when people hacked* people's facebook accounts. *Hacked=Leaving your account logged in. 
Some people use exaggerated emotions as a tactic in business setting. Executives tends to do this the most. They know they do it, though they'll deny it until the day they die. If they do it enough, they'll get a reputation that proceeds them. But that actually helps them when it comes to working internally. Most people tend to roll over and just go with the flow of someone is emotionally intense. It's a subtle type of organizational bullying. The best tactic is just to act like it doesn't bother you. Don't raise your voice and keep a stone face if you can. Keep the discussion factual and talk in a calm voice. Ask them questions. Eventually they will run out of gas, if they realize emotional chaos won't push your buttons. 
Yeah I've coached and reffed kids at soccer... sigh. I never minded them worrying about the kid getting hurt, but getting angry at a refereeing call or that your kid isn't playing enough... For one, it's very rare for a call to be that controversial at that level. They aren't playing fast enough, it's usually clear what happened. For another, most rec leagues have playing time requirements. Positions are discussed at practice, kids get a chance to play where they want. It's just raging for the sake of it. 
Saw a menu that said something along the lines of Gluten-free substitutes: $2 If you're drinking a beer: $3 
Reminds me of those parents who took their kids to see Deadpool and lost their shit, demanding their money back and threatening to sue, because there was adult themes in a comic book movie. It's fucking rated R, you idiot. What did you think was gonna happen? That's some lazy, shitty, goddamn parenting. 
Fun fact: Nuclear reactors are designed to not explode. Nuclear bombs are designed to explode. 
Put a sticker on the window. It doesn't have to be huge. 
Nah, I think it's pretty legit to be pissed that you have to wait a long time at the doctor's office. You make *appointments* at those places. If they're not ready for you at your appointment time, they fucked up. 
I had a mentor that used to tell me that in the end you're always stuck with you. So, make sure that's a person you want to be around. 
It happens any time a change in the film industry takes place. Films with sound? That's just uncultured. Films in color? It's the end of movies. At home streaming? That isn't true cinema. I swear these people have the memory span of goldfish. Change happens. Embrace it or get left behind. 
It's fun to compare the objective pros and cons of technology, but it's pretty rare that *A* is better than *B* at everything rings true. There are things I love/hate about iOS, Android, Windows, Linux, OS X, BSD, etc. 
Maybe if they strapped her backwards to the top, all that hot air would do some good. 
I coach 12s and 13s and by far the worst part is the parents. I've had parents rip their kid's faces off before the fucking game even started! Like, they're in the stretching lines in tears. How the hell are they supposed to perform with that on their shoulders? And as much as I'd like to I can't really go tell them their parents are wang-rods or anything, fuck it sucks. 
Because there is always "limited space in the overhead bins" 
We're going to hit 30 on saturday in Britain. The weather forecast just slapped a huge 30 over the whole island in a "its gonna be s hot the specifics dont even matter" kinda way. 
I stand up even though I know I have a 15 minute wait simply because I need to try to get some feeling back into my long legs before I have to walk off the plane. 
I'm the same way. I'm an Android enthusiast. I personally won't use any other phone. I couldn't care less if you use an iPhone, Samsung, HTC, hell or even a Windows phone. Just don't be a dick about it. I hate when people with iPhones just want to talk shit to me about my phone. That's the only time that I ever say anything to people about their phone. When they say something to me, I typically like to destroy their beliefs around their phone because they've decided to be that guy. 
He makes me want to chew gum and stay out past curfew! 
I started my first office job recently, at a subsidiary of a fortune 100 company. I work with 5 other people and they're all older than 40 and have been working there for several years. Most of the job *should* be done through computers, but several aspects are still done with a pen and paper because they can't adapt to the technology. I had to show someone how to download files from an email and attach them in another. They had worked there for YEARS. I did all of the daily tasks in under an hour and they were amazed. I just don't understand how huge companies are able to function. 
The people selling the expensive toast and coffee *are* the American dream though... 
The worst is when millennials themselves write these kinds of articles. Way to throw your entire generation under the bus assholes. 
This is just Minions all over again. If you aren't a middle schooler, odds are your primary exposure to these things comes either from Facebook or from complaints on Reddit. Reddit loves to hate things. In particular, Reddit loves to hate popular things, often solely for the fact that they're popular. Many people here have a real eagerness to grumble about all the "damn kids" and how things were different "back in my day." It's the tendency to hail one's own childhood fads as high-culture while shitting all over the fads of newer generations. If Pokemon came out for the first time tomorrow and became absurdly popular in elementary and middle schools, the bulk of Reddit would probably lump it in with Minions and fidget spinners. 
It's been getting less violent but in exchange, we're now able to see every violent thing that happens. 
But also, I hate when people shit on me for not liking things. I don't like Star Wars and I don't like the Beatles and I don't give two shits about most comic book-related media, but I just don't talk about it. If the conversation switches to something I don't like, I just politely sit out because everyone should be allowed to like their things. But when they find out I don't care who shot first or how Yoko ruined the band or whatever, people can get really mean. Some of us aren't trying to be shitty just to be shitty, some of us are just not into space samurais. 
Weren't there also female French Resistance characters in Call of Duty 3? 
To be fair, you WON'T talk to most of them ever again. You will go out in the real world and realize that it's a much bigger place than you realized. 
I don't do the flag on the profile because you have that really awkward moment when you have to take it down... 
Right? I am all for being a more health conscious population (i.e. maintaining a healthy, balanced diet) but some of the advice I have seen come out of the "movement" is sometimes just hyperbolic. 
This is an excellent way of handling it, I agree. We have a few notable people here in the office that have flown off the handle and it's really easy to bother them by asking for them to speak coherently and nicely. It either a) pisses them off further or b) makes them realize they're out of line. However, most of them get away with it because like you said, people just fold. Bugs me. 
And don't forget that there was a period of time when parents would burn Harry Potter books because there was "witchcraft" in those tomes. 
And people who could not afford Samurai did not hire Samurai. 
Extra effective if the sticker is a life-sized image of a hawk. 
Hang around with an older man who wants some young Dick to mentor. 
I didn't know the stigma existed when I started liking Coldplay. And I was honestly surprised to learn about it. Same with Nickelback. I didn't grow up listening to any type of rock music, so they sounded fairly average when compared to other musicians in the same genre. 
I'm with you. I wish it would go away, too, but I have zero expectations that it will. Elitism exists in every hobby and interest imaginable, and will continue to exist as long as some people think their personal tastes make them better than other people. 
Yeah, my orthodontist was always 20-40 minutes late. However if I show up five minutes late my appointment is cancelled and i'm charged?! Hate this double standard. However if it a first-come-first-served time deal then I have no issue with a long queue. I'm part of it after-all. It does annoy me when people bitch about traffic, like they aren't directly contributing to it. 
I had a bunch of trophies that were participation because I was really bad at the sport. I wanted to get rid of them or move them so I would have space in my room. My mom was angry because I earned them. I didn't. I just showed up and pulled the team down because I hated the sport and I wanted to quit but they wouldn't let me. 
I've got a MacBook and a Windows desktop, they're both great. I use them for different things, they're both great machines that I don't regret investing it at all. 
The only other reason is if you're trying to figure out whether you can iMessage someone. 
Oh I love the ones that say "I'm never flying this airline again" out loud when it's something like a delay to the gate or a weather diversion that has nothing to do with that specific airline. 
1. There's a term, it's called "Gate Lice". 2. For those with crap status, getting on as soon as possible reduces the possibility you'll have to gate check your carry-on. Doesn't impact me as I always check my bag for trips longer than 1 night, which is almost all of mine, but as long as airlines charge for checked baggage and don't strictly hold to their own carry-on rules, there will be validity to this strategy. Edit for clarification: The charge is for checked baggage at the counter, not the gate. 
When I was like 9 there was a kid on my team with 1 arm (no idea if he was in an accident or it was a birth defect or what) and I remember one game he was in the on deck circle taking practice swings and his mom came up to the fence and started scolding him about him not having a hit all season and that he better get one that at bat. The kid had 1 fuckin arm, the fact that he could even swing the bat 1 handed at that age was good enough in my eyes. 
This. There's been countless times I've only had a carry on but because I didn't assert my place in line they ran out of overhead room and I had to check it in. It adds around 20-30 mins to wait for it at baggage claim when I could have been out the door. 
To be fair, if it's 25 or 28 or 30 the result in the UK is the same: Overweight men will still walk around with their shirts off. Every single woman under a certain age will wear one of those long, maxi dresses, regardless of whether they owned one before this week. The Sun will have a picture of some students in bikinis on Brighton beach, together with a 'heat' based pun. The entire population of Scotland will turn bright red and shed their skin. 
I've been flying transatlantic a lot the past few years. Never have I been more happy to be a shorter dude (5'6") 
Have a couple of friends in different branches, the ones that have never seen combat or been deployed are all mouthy about wanting to blow shit up etc The two that actually got deployed, don't speak much about it and when they came back, they weren't the same. They have a look about them that just screams 'I've seen shit' but I know they will never talk to me about it. 
He makes me want to overdose on bennies and drag race my friends until the loser dies in a fiery crash. #real1950s 
I''m 35 and this seems unreal to me. I've owned my own computer for 20 years (bought my first Gateway 2000 at 15 y/o). I work in a small office with 8 other people aged 34 - 81 and everyone knows how to attach a file to an e-mail. Yes, even the 81 year old uses a computer proficiently. 
Usually it is ok, and if people start saying I am trash I just laugh because that means that they are just as terrible at this game as me. Especially in Bronze, what the hell are players expecting? 
Fuckin Smite man, dude can be feeding and you die once then he starts this bullshit. 
This expensive toast actually sounds pretty tasty.....going to the store so I can some right now. I guess it's not expensive toast anymore though if I make it myself. 
1% payrise, 30% increase in rent costs over the last two years. Definitely the avocado I'm sure. 
My brother was yelling at me for no reason, and his main argument was that I was a millennial. Bro, you're 2 years older than me. You were born in 1991. You're a millennial, too. 
Like the people 17 and under as of now aren't even millennials, they're technically gen z 
Pokemon actually has been absurdly popular again, at least where I'm from. I made about a good 150 splitting up my old cards into little makeshift booster packs, and selling them to my friends and coworkers for their kids. Fidget spinners, on the other hand, have already taken a huge nosedive. Like, one week they were all the rage, and now the kids are over them. Its kinda funny since Reddit seems intent on hating anything kids like, but by the time they get around to circlejerking about it, the kids have already moved on to the next thing. 
Joe Rogan made an interesting point about this a few years back on his podcast. He was talking about bad news in general, but put forward the idea that humans grew up in communities for so long where the extent of bad news was just that, in your community. But every day has some bad news going on somewhere in the world, and that is what makes the international headlines. His point was that people can only carry so much bad news, and before maybe this constant wave of it wasn't as much of an occurrence. But now, you have to cope with bad news on a global scale rather than that of your community, making it very difficult to deal with. One in which you can't take actions to help for most of it. I thought it was an interesting viewpoint. 
'Say my name' 'Heisenberg' 'You're gosh dang right' 
Some people left those French-flag profile pictures on for *way too long*. Disclaimer: I do not hate France; I actually love France. I kinda hate Facebook, a little. 
Maybe I got whooshed but the humor is supposed to be in the debate itself. One of the many memes where the joke is the gross over exaggeration. I.e harambe, gingers having no soul , mei being the actual devil spawn and the whole Sugar vs salt on grits Thing. I personally see it as a cheeky ribbing between the two parties. Sorry if I'm being captain obvious. 
Do you want to eat a milkshake, fries, and a burger for dinner here and there? Go ahead! Just try and go on a walk, head to the gym, or play a pick up basketball game with friends sometime during that week as well. 
A wise person once told me sex is not a big part of a relationship until it becomes a problem then it is a huge part of the relationship. 
Yes. It is a romantic comedy, perfect for Valentine's day. 
Probably thought it would just be blood and violence - you know, stuff that's perfectly fine for children to see. They didn't expect there to be anything actually adult, like boobs. 
*poor people who could not afford to hire Samurai did not hire Samurai 
Extra effective if, instead of a sticker, you use a life-sized hawk 
I think I'll keep giving this guy's daughter nightmares, thanks. 
Last Coldplay concert I went to Chris martin says "thanks for dealing with all the shit you get for liking us". Broke my heart and made me laugh at the same time 
Definitely. I can get into pretty much any genre of music because I want to find new things I enjoy. Liking something less because you feel it's beneath you makes you a douche, not a discerning listener. 
I will never forgive them for replacing RDJ with a talking banana 
Yeah this argument is stupid. So many great and original movies come out but all people focus and pay for is the comic book stuff then turn around and complain about lack of originality. It's not hard to look at what's out and do a little research instead of blindly and ignorantly saying a medium (that might as well be at the HEIGHT of its artistic variety) has lost all of its attributes and quality. Just recently Get Out was a big hit. 
Plus you can make fanboys' heads explode on both sides! 
"Excellent, now I know which airline to use so I can avoid your whiny ass." 
Should have called child services with him threatening the kid as well. 
Parents are fucking crazy. I used to ref hockey and was in like 8th grade. I was usually given preferred games as the association saw me as unbiased and professional. They gave me the final in an atom hockey tournament - so the kids would have been 7-9. Final game, tie game. Give the home team a penalty with 4 minutes left (the kid I gave the penalty to basically baseball swung his stick in to another kids arms... not a clutch and grab play I could pass off as "intense hockey". That was deliberate.) Anyway, visiting team winds up scoring. End of the game I get met by a father who tells me that I am a fuck up and that I should be careful leaving the arena tonight. Got in the dressing room, locked the door and called the cops. Noped the fuck out of there with a police escort. 
Piece of shit here, can confirm. Always disappointed my kids don't live up to the idea in my head of how good I could have been if I didn't suck so hard. Maybe if I just yell some more they'll get it. 
Can confirm, am Scottish and already shedding my old skin. I'll be totally white again by morning ready to start it all over again baby! 
I've seen two types return from deployment: You get the one guy that talks about everything and goes in to great detail about his deployment and you immediately know he didn't see shit, do shit, or accomplish shit; he just sat in the green zone pushing papers. Then you get the guy that is withdrawn, refuses to talk about his deployment and is genuinely trying to move on. You immediately KNOW he's seen some shit and did some shit while over there. 
I save that shit for when I listen to Chuck Berry. 
I climbed to silver/low gold from bronze and down there everyone expects you to suck. In silver/gold most people are decent but lack consistency with trickier moves. I can be great all game and then fuck up one aerial interception that leads to conceding a goal. 50% of the time I will get shit from a teammate if this happens; and its almost always from a ball-chaser. 
It's pretty amazing how an intentionally limited chat hasn't stopped players from quickly creating a new way to say, "fuck you" to each other. 
If I hadn't lost my Bitcoin wallet seven years back I'd own a home outright and be setup for retirement by forty five... Not even being sarcastic. 
apparently the trick is to own one of these hipster coffeeshops that sell $20 avacado toast and $5 coffees. then you'll be a millionare 
Gen X'er here. You're totally right. The dialogue hasn't changed. 
Reddit is the grumpy old man complaining about Disco in the 80's 
This is very true. I grew up near the area where the serial killer Michael Ross killed 8 young women a couple years before I was born. He made the news again when he was executed. It was one of the biggest crimes to have happened to that area, and people still occasionally talk about it. At the time it was international news, so everyone who watched the news knew about it. It's one of two violent crimes committed in over 30 years for that area(I know there's much higher crime rates in other parts of the country). Pretty rare, but with the media blasting us constantly with shit like that from all over the world it makes you think everyone is a sicko and out to slaughter you. In my experience we have more tragic deaths from car accidents. More than I can count on my hand in the past 3-5 years alone. None of those make international news. Edit - a word 
I've seen people say stuff like "does it seem like there are *more* homosexuals now? You never used to hear about so many people being gay, now it's normalized and all the women are choosing to go with women!" Like...no shit you never used to hear about them when being gay meant social and professional ostracism at best and institutionalization or death at worst. Ditto premarital sex/pregnancy. It sure did happen, it was just hushed up and the baby was adopted or claimed as the child of a married relative. (Happened to Jack Nicholson - grew up with "mom" and "sister" only to discover after their deaths that "mom" was really his grandma and his "sister" was really his biological mother.) 
Kinda made sense for walts character to not swear as often though. Characters like pinkman shoulda been FAR FAR more vulgar. 
wait what's he got? 10x cooler than a spinner you say? 
You're missing the point. People are mad that kids are playing with anything the adult is unfamiliar with. Down with fidget spinners!! Make Cup and Ball Great again! 
I'm not religious at all, but that quote pretty much sums up what I think about it. 
I think there are two camps. The ones who are just being playful about a difference of minor opinion, and the ones who get legit emotional about what strangers eat. I think part of the problem is that some people don't realize the first group is playing, because they behave identically to the second group. TLDR: Poe's Law. 
Wait a minute... I can't remember being born. Does that mean it may have never happened? 
I asked about that silly dichotomy (Boobs bad, blood good) when I was a kid. I was told I'd understand when I was older. I'm 36 now. Still don't understand. 
But in the year -40,000 it was here, and you could walk to it. 
One doesn't mutually exclude the other. Edit : get her father to mentor you and scare the young girl at the same time. 2 Robins with 1 costume. 
You sit closer to the screen at home! Way better than the humongous curved screens that make you sick because you're too close and staring straight. Don't even get me started on wearing 3D glasses over my real prescription glasses. 
If a member of the cabin crew woke me up like that I'd be god damn furious. 
Would've 'accidentally' stuck my foot out in the isle a bit. Oops, sorry kid, maybe YOU SHOULDN'T HAVE BEEN RUNNING AROUND LIKE A LITTLE FUCKING SHIT. And fuck your parents, too. Assholes. 
Yeah, if he's willing to say that in public, imagine what he says to that kid at home. Actually... don't do that, it's pretty sad. 
Yeah. He's made a very good living out of running the league (and still coaching full time in it). Quality dude. 
It's not volume-based, you can be as loud as you want (I mean, within reason). It's all tone/content. Disappointed "You can do better" might get a look but nobody would say anything. Meanwhile, "You got this, Jimmy, come on!" is totally fine. And the coaches are all employees of the league, no parent volunteers, which helps as both a distancing device socially and for training. 
They really are. In high school, a friend and I did the stats (counting goals, face off wins, etc.) for the boys hockey team. My friend is this super meek fragile sort of human who flusters easily so when the dad of our goalie cornered her one day and demanded that she fix his kids numbers to look better or else (imagine a large yelling guido if you will) she ended up completely shutting down. Everytime his son would get scored on, he'd glare at her to see if she'd record it causing her to shake and eventually want to quit which, considering how much she loved it, was huge. She finally told me what happened and we reported it to the coach. What a jerk. 
Guy with no kids here. I sell participation trophies because the parents can't handle their kid not having one. 
My friends would talk about their down time and stuff like that but nothing else, just about how they got a really great tan, played games, hit the gym and stuff like that. Not once would they say anything about anything else, they just have a look in their eyes that is kind of distant. 
This seems to be the case for a lot of things. Homosexuality, autism, transsexuality...they've always been around to some capacity, but our society has grown to the point where we're not shoving them aside or repressing them anymore. 
Kids who get hooked by the spinner realize it is just a toy and that it doesn't help them concentrate, but they LOVE the cube. It has a switch, some buttons, a rolling ball thing.... his is something they love to play with that doesn't absorb all of the attention like the spinner. Also various fun pencil toppers 
It's an interesting phenomenon - a group of clever people pretending to be idiots can inadvertently attract idiots who think they're in good company. 
Some more scientific research over the years showed that 'sometimes' is the key word in the aforementioned scientific research. 
I long for the day when man is not judged by the color of his skin but by the color of his dick. Sorry ladies. 
Give the kid a fucking t-shirt or something. "I was there" is more valuable than "I worked hard and 'won' this trophy that says 'Participant.'" 
Maybe if they strapped you backwards to the top, all that hot air would do some good. 
Damn. I want to be that guy. No kids yet, but I lived at the soccer complex as a youth. If I could make a decent career out of running a league/coaching I'd quit my job tomorrow. 
Participation trophy here. You are superb just for even trying! 
If you are in the unit with them, and you are training, you hear some shit. You hear those downtime stories, but you also hear stories about the scenarios that you are training for. Part of me wishes I would have deployed so that I feel like I helped, and part of me is extremely thankful that I completed my six years without seeing those things. 
Haha, that reminds me of back during the 2012 election here in the States and Romney said that kids who have an idea should borrow $20,000 from their parents to start a business. Since you know, most college age people have parents with $20k just sitting around. I think Romney meant well, he is just clueless about the average American. 
Cut me off a slab of that sweaty cake...mmm, delicious 
I got some in the back you can take with you - everytime 
I loooooove my fidget cube. It's fantastic. I just keep it in my left hand while I'm working and only set it down when I need to type something. Just constantly fidgeting with it and it keeps me from feeling restless and distracted. Tried a spinner and didn't really get how it was supposed to help me other than be my primary focus. I also have these mesh chinese finger trap type things that are sealed at the end and have a marble in it. I just move the marble back and forth by manipulating the mesh. That one is great too. 
Even later scientific research show that 'maybe' was a key word in the aforementioned comment. 
He screams, a cold sweat runs down his back as the flavorless pisswater makes its way down his throat...! He wakes up in his bed made of Coors cans. Oh thank god, it was just one of those double-layered "It was just a dream!" twists. 
Dusty shelf here. Looking forward to getting cleaned off. 
True that. Only time I heard anything was in boot camp. From my chief. Given my position, I'll never see the things he saw, but he drove the point home. This isnt about the down time or the fun you have or the people you meet. People are out there fighting and dying doing things I probably never could. I'm thankful my position keeps me away from it all, but also envious of his experiences because I want to feel like I'm doing more. Even so, my job is to support and provide a necessity to the guys out there. I'm content with that. 
Narc? What a strange insult to say to your own child. 
Pledge can here. Orders are skyrocketing. Can't wait to make that shelf slick as shit. 
We need more of your attitude in the armed forces. It is a collective job, and a lot of meatheads don't realize how vital people like you are. I am logistics myself, though I have one of the more dangerous logistics jobs (transportation) right now. I have seen videos of first hand accounts from my buddies, so I am extremely thankful I didn't have to witness these things. 
Oh, look at Mr. Fancypants over here with a hoop. 
I'm an IT, so I keep them communicating with remote stations. Nothing glamorous or intensely difficult or anything like that. But it is an absolute necessity, and somebody has to do it. I appreciate your outlook on it being a 'collective job'. In all fairness, I'm in about the most dangerous place I could possibly be right now without going to work with Spec Ops. 
'She opened my eyes' sounds a lot like 'she opened her thighs'. What a douche. 
Junkies with kids? Might explain why the kids stayed somewhere else. 
They were totally different songs. You see, yours were like "ding ding ding ding da da ding ding". But theirs were like "da ding ding ding da da ding ding". Completely different songs. 
this shit always happened to me too, and making friends is not an easy feat for me, like a lot of people. i noticed each year they were always "busy" (i.e., not texting, calling, answering messages) when my birthday rolled up. no matter how far in advance we'd plan shit, i'd always be the one left alone. everyone else got plans made by the others when it was their birthday, they'd plan freaking parties for them. and i always went to their birthday whatever they were doing. that was me though, i was the one there for them and when they didn't want something i was inconvenient. always about anything. if they were having bad shit in their life i was the first one they called. first one they'd call, first one they'd blow off. it sincerely hurt how much i was there for them through a lot of heavy shit, helped them out before they were kicked out and almost homeless. fuck all those people, I'm sorry that happened to you but hell yeah it kinda working out in the end! 
I stayed friends as best I could with an ex of mine. On the surface, things seemed pretty bad as she started dating my roommate. But on the inside, she was conspiring with another friend of mine to keep me single. They told the girl I crushed on that I was just using her to make my ex jealous. Made that girl cry. Eventually made me cry after all was said and done. It's been a year and a half and I have no regrets. The other "friend" was a shitty person anyways. Edit 4/1/17: I have not forgotten these events, though I legitimately wish everyone the best despite this. 
If dude had depression issues then this is plausible. It's shitty but plausible. 2 depressed people are much worse than just 1. 
With the details you've given, it sounds like your sister's husband is doing some manipulating. He may have told your sister that you came on to him or something else. I never trust a go-between. 
Man, some people are sadistic. I don't get why they would get joy out of others' suffering, and to be aware that people who do that ARE sick, and yet do it themselves? Sociopathic... These are people that eventually become the same conniving snakes in the workplace, causing toxic environments and office politics. 
I hear that... 7 years, 2 beautiful daughters, she had an affair and charged me with assault to over shadow what she did, Never laid a hand on her. Wish I was able to get over her. I have that feeling I will carry her ghost the rest of my adult life. 
My God what a wonderful ending. Completely infuriating, though, that the teacher was able to get away with so much. How long ago was this? 
Raise your hand if you can see a chunk of pencil lead under your skin years after getting stabbed. 
Do they know you know? Or do you have a chance to mess with them back? 
There are two sure ways to lose a friend. One is to loan money to a friend and the other is to borrow money from a friend. 
That is particularly fucking evil. Acid tends to make _most_ people really sweet and vulnerable. These people must have been born evil. 
dumb pieces of shit. your life should not be entertainment for others. 
Not to shit on anyone, but this doesn't really sound like she stole your boyfriend considering he was just using you the entire time. More like those two people are complete shit and deserve to be stung by wasps every 5 minutes. 
This thread makes me feel better about not having friends in the first place... 
That's when you melee him in the back, and start an impromptu deathmatch for 30 minutes in the middle of your legendary campaign. Until truce is called and you continue the campaign for another 30 minutes until the same thing happens again. 
I hope you don't hold it against him/her. Risk alliances are supposed to end in betrayal. 
To be honest I was very angry about it, and very hurt but I had so much to do with just picking up the pieces that I couldn't even focus on them. After the graduation, what I really took from the situation is learning that I never want to make anyone feel the way I felt when they hurt me. I've been more open and more strict about honoring commitments and making sure people I care about can count on me when they are helpless. It would be nice to see where this attitude gets them in a few years, but I think it's best to try and cast them away from my thoughts. 
Dude get ready to feel like the fun governor. I live with my girlfriend and another friend I've known forever. Problem is that the roomy has all the world development of a teenager. Girlfriend used to be similar early on in the relationship, but she has a good head on her shoulders now when she wants to use it. Anyhow, the amount of times I've had to be the guy to shoot down plans or ideas, or bar people from entering our home, or put the kibosh on things that even seem fun to me at the time, is insane. You regularly have to start looking out for you and yours, and it is going to suck for the first couple years. People are going to get upset and not understand at first, but they catch on and see you have a reason for it if they stick around. 
16 years later is the perfect time to exact revenge. 
Yeah, and they were probably under pressure anyway. 
That's basically what happened. But that was high school which was about 15 years ago for me. 
Giving "business stuff" to friends eh? Just lying around the house you say? How much for a gram 
That's exactly what I would have done in this situation and it's not like he'd have any right to be pissed if Op had done so. Makes me wonder if that guy picks his "friends" based on who he knows won't challenge him over BS like this. 
yes 100%. I dated someone once who was devastatingly handsome and whenever we talked about marriage he said "I don't believe in me wearing a ring, it's different for you, you have to". Thought that was a pretty big red flag. 
 Yeah exactly. When I figured out what she was doing I cut her out of my life like a tumor. Didn't make it into a big scene filled with drama, just quietly turned and walked away from that friendship. Don't need that in my life. 
My boyfriend and I both have repeated lapses of depression... Most of the time is fine.... But sometimes it gets really ugly. When he is trying to cheer me up, it's usually okay. But if he gets into a funk I can't pull him out of, I get really depressed and sometimes breakdown for multiple days because of the feeling of unrelenting guilt that I can't help him the way he helps me. As much as I love my boyfriend. My depression makes it really hard to be near him sometimes. 
[](/cocosad)Hard to judge on a case-by-case basis, but I get what you're saying. Helping someone with depression, especially when they're depressed for extremely long periods of time, can be very draining. 
It's really difficult for me to say because when he talked to me about it - he was uncomfortable and he truly was sorry for what was going on. Also, he even said he doesn't understand why this happened. My brother talked to her when this was happening and he just said something along the lines of: "A lot of the stress and anxiety she is having is from you. She can tell the way her husbands family treats you and they treat her differently". My sister has mental issues and is very unstable and can be unwelcoming. I made a connection with the husbands family a while ago and to me they are family. All she does is complain about his family (when they are literally the nicest and best family I have ever met in my life), so no wonder no one likes her. I guess she just got pissed off that the family is nicer to me lol but that's her problem for being not a nice person! 
Oh yeah after what she pulled off.. never again. Wedding happened January 23, and she still hasn't said anything. Doubt that she ever will. 
Work really does bring out the worst in people when you rely so heavily on it and are overburdened so much by it. 
Not to mention a VP shouldn't be going directly to an employee if there's a manager between them. Chain of command is important in any business structure and both his former friend and the VP broke it by circumventing the manager. Shitty deal. 
So many people try to deny that this happens, it's refreshing to see people talking about this type of behavior. I've been the above board, blunt, "I'm just here to work" type of person my whole life, but the type that wants to create havoc for no reason has been a burden through most of my professional life. The less you participate, the more they single you out with this shit, it seems. 
Thanks... and yeah, in a way it's helped me to develop sort-of healthier friendships. I've made a lot of new friends since then and am generally well-liked by everyone that knows me, but I don't feel like I can really open up to people and the depth others see in me feels very shallow. Like they think they know me, but really they don't. It's doubly frustrating because being more closed off and fake seems to have actually helped me make friends. There's probably a lot of other things that contribute to this but this one experience seems to mark a definite change in how I relate (or rather don't relate) to others. It gets kind of lonely. 
"Hey God, can I take a trip down to hell real quick? I'll only be a second" "Is it about brian?" "Yes...' "Take as long as you need" 
This happened almost 9 years ago (this coming April). My dad was overcome with grief and I was trying to hold us together, so I don't know if that even crossed his mind. It's thoughtful of you to post this and let me know. Thank you. 
I think its like a weird possessive claim on a person without having to worry about whether they return your feelings. Like if you treat someone like they're your gf/bf its creepy, but if you try to insert yourself as "theyre like my sister" its just...protective? Even if you have ulterior motives, its lile a weird loophole. Liz was NOT happy when she found that out though. She trusted the dude and he creeped her right the fuck out. Granted, for some people its probably mutual denial. Like a "will they/won't they" situation where they rationalize their strong feelings as just caring a lot instead of romantic attraction because theyre 'close'. Usually, though, its just a case of creepy karl. 
Yep, I've learned to be careful about cross-pollinating my various friends and social circles. You never know how things might collapse in the future. 
Yeah, but then they got back together and broke off Satan's horn in a Rock-off. 
If i was Dylan, I'd punch you in the dick. Atleast once. 
Yeah it still hurts if I'm being honest. I miss what we had. He's spoken about it to a few mutual friends and is all for moving on apparently, as it's 'ancient history' in his eyes... but once you lose trust in who you thought was your closest friend, there's not really any going back. It's not, and never was, about the money. Cheers. 
This stuff happens all the time still. Kids are virtually never believed over adults, even when there's evidence. So much abuse continues because of this. 
That administration is everything that is wrong with education. There will always be individuals who bully and abuse, but when the administration protects them or punishes the victims, then that destroys everything. 
Yes do this EXACTLY. Tag them on Facebook, tweet at them, tag them on insta, snap them. Wherever they are and whatever social media they are on, make a huge deal about sharing the same wedding anniversary and maybe the bitch will let it go. 
I was stabbed in the hand with a pen by a girl in my class. She showed me her boobs a couple years later. We were cool after that. 
Wow, she dropped so many hints and you didn't notice. Typical guy 
I made it abundantly clear to them that I'm aware of what they did. Would having a third party send them a fake "local man found dead after harmful prank" news article be too much? 
You clearly haven't played Settlers of Catan with friends 
You know those emails you get about avoiding obvious phishing links and keeping your password safe? That's the person they're for. 
I wasn't concerned with the situation with the woman. That concerned both of us, but my family life/ethnicity/parentage and the like was fucked up. 
I once stepped barefoot onto a pile of fishhooks that was sitting on one end of the dock. I don't know why the guy thought leaving them there was okay, but it definitely was not. My brother spent the next hour pulling hooks out of my foot. 
Yeah, it's experiences like that which have made me cynical. Also, I'm now the guy who will be first to turn up to a party or night out that someone else has organised, to help prevent exactly the sort of awkwardness that plagued me that night. 
I guess it would depend on who did the breaking up. If it was you, I can see you not caring. It would be hard to have a friend do that if you had been broken up with and had lingering feelings for the ex. 
Wow I can't believe the prof didn't believe you but I hope karma gets to those people. 
"What happened to us?" "Same thing that always happens. You didn't know me, then you fell in love with me, and now you know me." 
It's 1:1 same psychology. Most basic example is random loot (one armed bandit, mobs in mmo's) as uncertain reward is known to cause a higher spike than certain and just in expectation of the possibility even if you don't receive it. 
The correct response would've been "you have the wrong facebook." 
Or maybe OP really is a rapist and a pedophile. The roommate did say "secretly." So if it *were* true, OP probably wouldn't tell us because it's a secret. 
Couldn't help but chuckle at the "two bottle of mountain dew a day" comment. 
A friend of mine in college spend three months hardcore studying to learn sign language - basically all his free time that semester - to ask out a deaf girl he was crushing on. She ended up being gay. So he decided, hell, I already know sign language now, and changed his major from marketing to deaf special ed. 
No, no no no. You'd better tell us about that marriage of his. Sounds fun. 
Judging by how she handles things, I'd give it a lot less than 6 months 
As I told another person who accused me of dealing drugs, you're absolutely right! I sell tobacco for a living. Like actual tobacco. Djarums and Acid on the low end, Cohiba, Macanudo, Arturo Fuente, etc. on the high end. I'm actually not sure what my cheapest per gram item would be (probably my loose leaf stuff like fronto leafs). But I live above my shop (because that's been a dream of mine for most of my life). I love the commute, and I love the lifestyle. 
After I said that I didn't want to be in contact with the "friend," she claimed that I was stalking her. Like what. 
Why were your ex gf, new gf, and her parents all at their house? 
That's a good man right there. Sorry it didn't work out. 
This makes me think of my old roommates. They are absolutely perfect for each other, but both struggle with mental health issues, primarily depression. It's pretty easy for them to spiral. He is upset and She doesn't feel like she can help, which makes Her upset, which then makes Him more upset because he realizes that his depression has made Her upset and so on. Like you said they are mostly okay, but sometimes a minor incident will cause a week of them being down. They basically never get mad each other, but are sad at each other which is almost worse. 
I work in mental health and you really need to set boundaries and be able to detach emotionally or you're gonna have a bad time when a patient doesn't succeed 
Agreed. VP should've immediately contacted their direct superior and been like "why is this dumb fuck bothering *me* with this pointless bullshit? I have *real* work to do." 
They take it personally when you don't participate because they perceive that they're not worth your time- which is usually true. 
Sounds like the afterlife in Remember Me, one of my favourite books as a teen (it's a Christopher Pike book). The person sees their entire life and realises everything good they did and everything bad. But they experience from the perspective of the person they helped or harmed, so they feel the good and the bad emotions exactly the same as the other person did. 
Not... Uh. Really. I promptly joined a co-op consulting company and the guy handling billing was a dick and wouldn't force clients to pay that weren't his. Took me 9 months to get half what I was owed. Next company was a start up that took advantage of me. Next I LOVED, but I got sick, shifted to another manager, and was fired for being too sick. Next I LOVED again, but was again fired for being too sick. I tried making my own company, but was too sick. Now I've given up and preparing to be a stay-at-home mom. My very-soon-to-be-husband (drama twist: he's the office manager from my story!) just got a great job he's super excited about. 
But what if he made it all up to trick you and over an elaborate scheme taking place over 20 years he will steal your identity and all your wealth just to buy weed? 
I got stabbed in the hand with a pencil a few months before getting stabbed in the chest. 7th grade was not my favorite year. 
Prank them by torturing them for weeks on end in a shipping container and then reveal yourself as their captor by wearing the skin and clothes of that model. Trust me, it is the only way. 
*rolls a 7* YOU MOTHERFUCKER YOU HAD A SHEEP ALL THIS TIME. I JUST SPENT 4 CLAY ON THAT SHEEP 
But what if they need my Social Security number to check if I won the prize? 
It wasn't me either time. There was only lingering feelings for one of them. The first girl was fucking crazy. I'm pretty sure she's a sociopath. I warned him about her, and that she'd fuck with his head, but he was thinking with his dick and went for her anyways. He lasted longer with her than anybody else but in the end he admitted that she was too crazy and it was time to let her go. Fun fact: we both lost our virginities to this girl. The second girl was pretty, nice, and really enjoyable to be around (usually). I was kind of jealous for a while but I'm glad they were happy together. Eventually they broke up and he moved on. We've been best friends since kindergarten and I support his decisions. If he wants my sloppy seconds, that's his choice. Whatever floats his boat. It's not my place to get in the way of what he wants in life. After 17 years, he's more of a brother than a friend. Ex girlfriends are irrelevant in comparison. As long as he's happy, he's got my support. 
Haha right?? I was the guitarist so this shit made no sense on many different levels. 
YOU THINK YOU CAN KICK ME OUT OF THE BAND and then Zach you come in with a facemelter 
We would need to factor in how attractiveness is directly proportional to bullshit tolerance to get an accurate forecast. 
My ex went wild when I told her that I am seeing someone else. This was about 9 months after our break up. Not in her head though. It was probably my fault too: i wanted to be friends after the break up, she interpreted that as "there's still good chance that we will get back together". I did tell her multiple times in the 9 months that we were NOT getting back together. Hearing about my seeing someone else was the closure that she probably didn't want. She dragged me to the house of the girl I was seeing (who was incidentally her good friend) and created a big scene there with the hopes of sabotaging my relationship. She went into the gory details of the physical aspects of my relationship with her in front of my new gfs very conservative and religious parents. The last ditch attempt to sabotage my new relationship was the prediction she made about me dumping my new gf. 
No, no. Then- boyfriend because we're engaged now. I kept a man like him around :) 
Oh god that sounds like us. The worst is when I realize it got set off my something little. 
Exactly this. A competent VP would ask this person if they had discussed the matter with their direct supervisior. This kind of stuff, in my opinion, is not my direct concern. This is a sign that the VP is either excessively controlling or doesnt have anything to do. Probably the latter. 
The freedom of a workplace is amazing compared to a school setting. 
My friend quit RS in like 2006ish and gave me her blue hween mask. I logged back on a year ago and saw that it went from 300k to like 300m. Lol. 
You got suspended... For being stabbed? Because they assumed you must have deserved it? 
Clay? I have Settlers and Seafarers, new resource in a different expansion or different name for something? Now I type this I'm assuming you're calling Bricks, Clay? 
You sound like a chill ass mother fucker. Wanna be friends? 
This broke up the band Hanoi Rocks. Their drummer, Razzle, was killed in a car wreck caused by Vince Neil of Motley Crue driving drunk. The singer, Michael Monroe, was devastated. While he's crazy with grief, the guitarist, Andy McCoy, started nailing Michael's girlfriend Stacy and got her knocked up. Then it comes out that, while THAT was going on, the bassist, Sami Yaffa, was nailing Andy's girlfriend Anna and got her knocked up. Is that clear enough? Andy had a baby with Mike's girlfriend. Sami had a baby with Andy's girlfriend. The band broke up. Michael married a different woman entirely and moved home to Finland. 
Turn it on its side and "Celloooooooo" you've got a bass. 
OH. Then CON-FUCKING-GRATULATIONS. Original wording can be...misleading. 
I would have thought my wife made a reddit account except you said boyfriend. We keep on working on strategies to deal with this, but one of the ones that seems to be helping the most is, say, me understanding her depression isn't about me, and vice-versa. It's not easy to actually believe that, but when it's working, we're able to try to help each other without spiraling down ourselves because we feel inadequate. It's a fucking challenge and a half, though. We love each other to death but we both have some of that going on and it leads to all sorts of random fights that aren't about anything at all. 
"Dad you know I don't like nails" "Just get the bat medamnit" 
Seriously. As a kid, all the adults were like "being a kid is great, you have no responsibilities!" but they very quickly forget how few rights kids have on top of that. 
Yeah I know. It's dumb as hell. But when you're young and naive, you'll believe a lot of what adults tell you. I walked out of that office feeling like I did something wrong. In retrospect, he was just an asshole and I didn't really do anything wrong. If somebody tried to tell me that now I'd promptly tell them to fuck off. 
I've been touched by your kids and I'm sure they've been touched by me 
Huh. I would have gone with congratu-fucking-lations. 
Full character immersion with the "medamnit" and all, good job. 
Every account on reddit is this manipulative piece of shit except you. 
He probably meant for you to *stop cooking altogether* 
Can recommend Jacques Pepin as well when it comes to learning basic techniques. 
Damn. 49 yrs. The rolling motion. I forgot about the rolling motion. Welp. I probably have 20 yrs left before I'm spoon fed so thanks. 
my mom will only cook with max heat because its faster, but it always ended up tasting better than my dad's careful heat management. then i found out that chinese food is to be made on high heat always basically :/ 
I learned this while coming up with a perfect spaghetti sauce - originally I wanted to add every ingredient under the sun because I thought it'd give it more of a complex flavor, then I didn't have 2 or 3 of the 10 ingredients I typically used one day but went ahead and made it anyways and the sauce tasted almost a bit more savory. This is great advice for beginning chefs who are experimenting with their recipes! 
Man...every time I want to brown something, and my dad is around, he'll put a lid on the pan because all the 'flavor is being let out', apparently. Sometimes I have to be stern and say I'm following a recipe, but how can I explain this to him? All the meat my parents cook seems to be half-boiled in its own juices from putting lids on every fucking pan... 
To piggy back on this, DO NOT use sweetened cocoa powder or semi-sweet, as the sugar will caramelize. 
* Does not apply if it's tomato based, add sugar instead. 
Very important for baking. Cookies shouldn't look done when you take them out. 
I went for the catch one time because my cat was like rubbing itself on my ankles at the time. No regrets because cleaning up the bloody mess from me catching a knife by the blade was easier than cleaning up the mess of a dead cat would've been. Plus I kinda liked my cat and didn't want to accidentally stab it. 
Or if something comes out a bit sloppier that you expected, you have created a nice wholesome "Rustic" dish. 
I thought that meant that everything is supposed to be keep in its rightful place. So you can find it when you need it. 
Cut everything before you even touch a cooker. Mise en Place. 
This but also with tops of certain veggies. I've used carrot greens, radish greens, and celery leaves sauteed with butter and salt. They also taste good thrown into salads. Just do a quick google check to see if it's edible beforehand. 
People should eat "filling" veggies instead of going for salads if they want to feel full but lower the calories. Broccoli is a great filling veggie, as are squashes and bok choy. There is also great produce to be found at asian markets for greater variety, like enoki mushroom, elephant stalk, and water cress. 
I usually multiple the garlic in recipes by anywhere from 5-10x. I've never gotten to the point where I've thought "shit, maybe I put too much in". 
Jesus, i can feel your arms flailing as you speak. 
When you get good enough, you can just look briefly at the recipe and already see why the person that wrote it doesnt have tastebuds. 
Following up: Don't experiment if you don't have an alternative meal planned. Especially if you're already hungry. That's a recipe for disaster. 
As a rule of thumb, the more you paid for something, the less you should season it. Some yuppie farm-to-table chicken? Salt, pepper, olive oil, maybe a tiny bit of some green herb, oregano, thyme, or my personal favorite majoran. 2 bucks a pound frozen chicken breasts? Hell fucking yes paprika is amazing. 
If there's anything I've learned from the Food Network, it's that I shouldn't be afraid of salt. 
Ooh, now that is useful. I'm always pedantic about having clean hands so this will probably help 
Have you ever tried to cut a large sweet potato by only letting the blade do the work? 
That's what I'm thinking. There's no way a fillet of fish, scallops or a steak would turn out well if you turned off the burner, walked away and turned it back on again. 
It's always easier to pull it off the stove or turn the burner off and just stop and think for a second. The thing I always tell people is that you can always cook it a bit more or add more seasoning but the second you over cook it or over season it, you're pretty much done. 
I wouldn't recommend the rolling technique with a spoon. Stick with the airplane method instead. 
Chinese food is 25 minutes prep +3 minutes of applying high heat. 
Bought lovely new pans. SO (who is major kitchen hazard) used for midnight snack, burnt then scraped clean with a knife. Get a mad facial twitch just thinking about it. 
When I do a roast chicken I always roast some garlic along with the potatoes or whatever delicious veg I am having. And then smush it onto whatever I happen to be eating. Love dat garlic. 
Stomach ache, huh? Did she try eating garlic? I heard it can have some medicinal properties. 
Son of a bitch, I thought I could make it one week without buying some new high-falutin' foodie crap. Never heard of black garlic before, going to give it a try of course. 
My mother does this with "fried" chicken. Just a little more oil than it takes to cover the bottom of the pan, and covers it the whole time. She can never figure out why it doesn't come out crispy like the fried chicken she has at restaurants, despite me constantly telling her she's making steamed chicken, not fried chicken 
It's a dry barrier that will discourage adhesion of the baked good, allowing it to rise as it bakes. Butter is fine if rising isn't a concern, but fats are "sticky" and can actually hold flour-based things down. It's the same reason you would flour a surface when you're rolling out or kneading dough. 
I dunno, a tiny splash of red wine vinegar is my secret ingredient in chili. No added sugar, just meat, beans, crushed tomatoes, pepper, onion, and spices. 
Good advice. Ground turkey needs all the help it can get. 
Baking is harder, but some of the best ways to get consistent cakes (or other baked goods) is to: 1.) Get a scale and use recipes that give measurements in grams/ounces 2.) taste the batter! Raw batter will not kill you and in general if the batter tastes good the cake will taste good 3.) learn what a well cooked moist cake feels like. It should be lightly springy, but firm, when you gently pat the middle. After a few times you'll be able to tell with no problem. 
Take a small amount and toss is in a hot pan to cook it through. 
I remember seeing a Jamie Oliver recipe with a typo so it said something like 30 teaspoons of salt instead of the required 3. All the comments were complaining it was way too salty. Imagine having that much faith in Jamie Oliver. 
I'm with the kicking the cat crowd. Only time I have intentionally kicked him was when he jumped toward an open oven door. Poor kitty was a soccer ball for a minute. 
I'm the other way arround. I drop things and have caught them before I register anything more than "Catch the thingy!" If I can't get it with my hands, I cradle it with my foot for a softer landing. This will someday be... not a good thing. 
An inch? Wow. Is your floor made of balsa wood? 
My former head chef always said: If you mess up a main dish, call it "Rustic" If you mess up a dessert, call it "Artisanal" 
Pairing, chef's, and bread. I have never had a need for anything else. 
i only use a katana personally used by Jin Kai Moto-san to conquer the 15th century child emperor Taka Hami-san 
Professional sharpening is cheaper than people think, and a good pro will tell you when it's time to replace. Also: Learn the difference between sharpening and honing, hone regularly and sharpen as needed. 
The problem a lot of beginner chefs have is that we feel the need to watch the pot on the stove instead of walking away and letting it cook on its own. 
Buddy, I think you're doing it wrong. You're not supposed to be in the viking. He just helps you out. 
Which really is just the French's tactful way of saying "get your shit together before you start." 
Be careful with this. Some ingredients taste better when chopped fresh. Onions, for example, will be noticeable more flavorful if diced just before using them vs. if they were diced a day or so ago. 
It.is.in.everything. If you ever want one of your meals to taste more like a restaurant just add butter and salt 
All these gif recipes show them just dumping ramekins full of pre-chopped and pre-measured ingredients into their places, is that the way to go? Should I invest in some more ramekins/similar? 
Tell me at the very end to check if its safe. you've got your priorities all wrong! Now I have to go to the er because I made a rhubarb leaf salad. 
I mean, I get tat you mean 1 plate of "good food" can be more satisfying overall than 2 plates of "bad food", but the fact is 2x the food volume will make you feel 2x as full. For most people on diets, the constant hunger is the #1 reason they fail. If portion control while eating cakes was easy, nobody would get fat in the first place. Also, if the food tastes great, it's harder to not overeat than it would be if it was so-so 
My point is that baking formulas were made for a specific ratio of sugar-fat-flour-moisture and if you fuck with the formula it can make the final product inedible. 
Saint Julia is right. Especially because, much of the time, you are reducing the wine for a sauce. Reducing already fortified wine is quicker for the same flavor punch. 
That's...actually a great idea. Only downside to that is you don't have most of a bottle of wine that you "have" to drink now. 
Does this happen? As there people who..... Don't finish their wine? 
Yeah I can imagine how moscato infused marinara would be terrible 
THANK YOU My family acts like I'm crazy when I actually toss it in the sauce with a little butter. Dumping sauce on some dry ass pasta might be what they do at the Olive Garden, but it's not how we roll in my house. 
You're absolutely right, but this takes a lot of experience. My husband was a chef for 20 years. When he reads a recipe, I know he's goimg to change it because his eyes drift off to a thousand yard stare, his mouth starts making weird half-chewing, half-lip-smacking movements, his hands start flexing as though he were pinching imaginary seasonings, and he mutters to himself. It looks like the summoning ritual of a culinary demon. 
Came to say this, was excited to see it already here. Kenji at serious eats has a great read through on it if you want the science behind it 
Instructions unclear, try to eat clock. No is potato. Such is life. 
It shows curiosity and initiative! Keep it up and you'll have something tasty one day:) 
Came in just to say this basically. You need to know a few things to make your baked goods more gooey/fluffy/crunchy or you may end up with different results than you expected. I bake in high elevation and have to tweak all the recipes I find slightly so they turn out the same as my East Coast cook book wants them to. 
Are you really going to weigh 1/2 tsp worth of salt? 
My mom did this to all our nice pans, so now she's pissed that my dad and I don't want her using the NEW nice pans... (I spent $80 on a set of nice cake pans and she thought using a steak knife to loosen a cake I was letting cool was a good idea, and ruined the coating on, and she used steal wool to clean a non-stick frying pan) 
I put slices of garlic under the skin of the chicken so it roasts there and flavors the meat 
I can see that being infuriating. The worst part is if you ever tried to show her how to properly fry something, she'd probably chew you out for wasting too much oil. 
Oh my god! Is this why homemade cakes tend to have a huge rise in the middle, but are almost flat towards the edges? 
Personally I need some sugar in there to balance it out. Either brown sugar or sweeter ingredients like carrots. That said, I live in a country where rich, sweet, balanced tomatoes are harder to come by. 
A cheesecake without sugar would be horrible. Have her try tomato sauce that's too acidic and ask her if it needs anything. When she can't figure it out, sprinkle some sugar on and have her taste it. 
Taco seasoning. Some of the best homemade tacos I've had were with ground turkey cooked with taco seasoning. 
Instructions unclear. The batter was delicious but now there will be no cake. 
I've made meatballs 1000 times and have never thought of this. I too struggled how to test my meatballs and resorted to tasting it raw. Great idea 
My friend had a Jaime Oliver cookbook I borrowed once and it had a recipe for salt crusted fish that I wanted to try, because apparently you don't actually eat the salt (it was a while fish, the salt was on the skin) but my mom said no since she's very anti-salt. 
On the topic of pets in the kitchen. Burning teflon will kill your bird so don't cook with Teflon if you have any pets birds. 
The woman just likes her cooking daggers very sharp. 
Artisanal is what happens when you leave the flour from the couche on the bread when you bake it. 
This happened with my step mom because she cut herself really badly while cutting potatoes. She doesn't practice safe cutting habits. 
My grandfather was a butcher. Always said " no one ever got cut by a sharp knife" so true... well... in the kitchen anyway. Every house should have a decent set of sharp knives. 
I have two chef's knives, actually. One for me and one for anyone else in my kitchen. 
I only use my Hatori Hanzo, but to each his own... 
That guy strolls down my street now and then, calling for people to bring out their knives and scissors. I live in a traditional meets modern area. It's not rare to see a road rage incident where a Mercedes and donkey cart full of cabbages are both trying to pass each other on a one-way street. 
Ohhhhh!! You just explained so much to me!! I never understood why my roommates did that, didn't realize it was born of anxiety about leaving food unattended 
r/VikingsGoneWild Don't you tell me who to be inside. 
As a kid my parents told me that raw onion was poisonous because otherwise I would eat it all while they were cooking or just right from the fridge. They also told me this about smoked bacon slices. Genius bastard. 
First time cooking (trying) to impress my future wife, I literally did not know the difference between cloves and bulbs. I was desperately mincing two entire bulbs when she fortunately walked in and disabused me of my mistaken belief. She's been the smart one in the relationship ever since! 
Honestly, I just use tupperware/butter containers/cool whip containers when I mise en place. If I don't have any, I use sandwich baggies. 
I met her at a dinner party in the mid90s. Very nice woman. She helped herself to a full, unashamed grab of every guys ass as she took a picture with them. Literally a handful, not just placing it there. She also told a story about smuggling meat from overseas claiming it has been smoked when it hadn't. Julia Child gave 0 fucks. 
I've been told there are people our there who aren't alcoholics, yet to meet one though 
With cooking, exact amounts aren't that important. I've cooked enough that I can generally eyeball things to within +/- 10%, so unless I'm doing something really finicky, I don't usually bother. Baking, on the other hand, relies on chemistry. Exact amounts (of some ingredients) are important there! 
When I was broke, my go-to meal was pasta coated in buttery garlic and steamed broccoli. I never got tired of that meal. 
Oh my god this is my mother. This drives me mad, and she does it constantly. 
I think that has more to do with most recipes being cut for time. I mean, I'm no professional, but I take my cooking pretty seriously, and when I get home at the end of the day I want to be able to make a meal in 20-30 minutes. Ain't no one got time for 15-20 minutes of sauteing onions when you're starving. On the weekends though, when I have time, you bet your ass I'm sauteing those onions for as long as I can. 
In Latvia, there is no clock or potato. KGB let you know time by beating you. 
Yeah, I do the accuser grip with my knives. It's really not as unsafe as you might think. 'But what if any part of the knife of your hand slips?' Well....it won't. In my....ten plus years of cooking I've cut myself maybe ten times on knives. Most of the injuries I've gotten have been from something that you wouldn't expect. Like the jagged metal part from foil boxes.... 
Yeah! What is it, anyway? I've tried googling it, but I can't find any chemical explanation. It tastes glorious. 
Not gonna lie. I get really pissy when people manhandle cake pans. And pie plates. I can see all the scratches on the bottom of one my aunt uses because she's so damn rough with them. (Her pies also taste of sadness) 
Ceramic pans are great until someone does this. Still don't know if my mom or boyfriend fucked the pan up. 
Do this with ground meat too. Cook it longer, past the gray color. Brings out the beef flavor instead of gray, boiled, flavorless meat texture. 
But even if it was sweet, you'd probably be coughing because it's powdery. 
Sometimes, but not exclusively. Another reason is that the outside of cakes in tins will cook much faster - that is, they'll rise, but set before rising as much (the middle cooks slower, so is able to keep rising longer). To help this issue, you can cook in a bain-marie (water bath) which provides better balance over the temperature, or I have these oven-safe straps that I soak and then wrap around the tin, which provides _some_ balance. 
You said you wanted the flavors to be more alive. 
They said they add onion though, the sweetness from the onion is probably enough. 
Good idea. Another thing would be to just make the cheesecake without sugar like the mother wants and have her taste it. Then make another with sugar and have her taste THAT! 
That always bugs me, because applesauce and honey are still basically sugar. 
Yeah it's amazing! It kind of turns to mush and you can squeeze it right out of the clove and spread it on bread. The taste gets much more mellow too. Delicious. 
Well, the last time I handled a sharp knife I made a nasty gash in my thumb on the first try... happened at work (yeah, it wasn't the first time) so I've now been banned from sharp objects. Happens all the time. 
what the hell is a restaurant-grade mandolin, and who the hell needs restaurant-grade when playing their mandolin, be it for themselves or an audience? 
Haha. I have three, one smallish one I use all the time, one larger one in case there is watermelon, and a huge one whose name is getouttamykitchen. 
Everybody knows Hatori Hanzo now. He's become a sort of celebrity sword-maker. Totally commercial - complete sell-out. I only use swords from Korehira Yoshimoto - you've probably never heard of him. 
Where is this? I've never heard of a traveling knife sharpener, living in CA. 
best horror movie ever - you throw out grandma's knives causing her to come back haunting you, trapping you in your apartment insisting she won't let you leave until you're fed because you look like you're wasting away. 
I don't trust food not to go to complete shit if not watched. I know what's needed to make the food, but me and my stove have a faulty relationship. One wrong move and shits burned, or cooked on outside and raw inside, I may suck. 
Also, white dishes are sexy and make you look like a pro 
"When you're famous, they let you do it. You can do anything you want to them" - Julia Child probably 
Broke? I'm an adult with a full time job and a family and I still cook that at least once a month. Same with ramen noodles. Throw some veggies, the left over chicken from last night and an egg and you've got a $7 takeout from a noddle shop for $0.92. 
If I cook while she isn't there, my food is perfect. If she's watching me cook, I use way too much salt, she doesn't like cumin, you won't be able to taste anything over that much garlic, and I'm just going to burn everything cooking it that high. When it's done it's missing something. 
I saw a review of a recipe floating around. "I saw your 1/4 cup of sugar but decided to add 1/3 cause my husband doesn't like things too sweet". Why can't people math? 
From my friends who work in the industry, they say that the accuser grip isn't always recommended because it can lead to early carpal tunnel. Something about doing it every day rigorously for a few hour especially during prep can take a toll on the joints. 
It translates as "breath of the wok". It's a bunch of aromatic stuff produced in the seasoning process as oil is seared into the metal. 
This is when you go out and get an nice heavy cast iron skillet and beat them to death with it. 
You use a bain-marie for regular cakes too? I know you would use one for cheesecakes and custards but I've never heard of using it for a regular cake. 
And now you're sobbing in the corner uncontrollably. 
You mean... make another with sugar and don't let her have any. Let her wallow in her self-made sugar straight jacket while you are immersed in the wonderment of decadent cheesecake and all of its glory. 
Gee, I never thought about it that way. Thanks, mister! 
She does the whole granny cutting style where she peels and cubes potatoes against her thumb and because she uses a dull/practically 400 year old knife to do it she'd never cut herself before. 
Lmao whoops. Not even gonna edit that. I enjoyed it too much. 
The watermelon knife is key. I keep a sharpened machete for those, pineapples, large cuts of meat, etc. 
Yoshimoto's knifes are overated and for ignorant hipsters, i only use Kateshi Samadi ones, they background check you and don't let peasants buy them. 
I live in Toronto. Every 2nd week, in the summer, this guy drives slowly around the neighbourhood in his knife-sharpening truck, ringing a bell like he's the ice cream guy. Not only is he NOT the ice cream guy, he won't stop for anyone! You chase him down the street holding your knives and he won't stop to do his job. I think it's a mob front. 
My grandma always tries to feed me while I'm eating. She'll literally shove a plate between my face and the one I'm currently eating from. "Would you like some gingerbread?" Yeah, I probably would, but how'bout you let me finish the stew you just gave me first? You know what? Screw it, just put it next to the smoked fish. Grandmother's cooking... resistance is impolite. 
Turn down the heat. Don't go over a bit higher than medium unless you're boiling water or searing steaks. Gives you more time and forgiveness and stops the burnt outside cooked inside deal. 
Mine just can't follow the fucking recipe to save her life. She doesn't get that different ingredients yield different results, particularly with baking which is more an exacting science than just cooking. It's completely maddening. She subs various oils in for what it says, she thinks wheat flour will do the same as all purpose, etc. NO. IT WONT. Then she gets mad because "that recipe is shit". No, ma, it's you. 
I would assume it encourages wrist extension (lifting up) to compress the median nerve, which is the culprit in carpal tunnel syndrome. 
so like the same concept of why grandma's cornbread in the 30 yr-old never-soap-washed cast iron is way better than mine in the 8" round tin? 
Part II: You discover the magic of non-coated wrought-iron frying pan. And your roommate washes it with soap 
If it ain't broke... and old people... Oh and when my grandmothers electrical foot bath thingy broke and she wanted to return it, turns out it was 13 years old. She still had the receipt though 
sis i'm imagining this mandolin player who only plays at the FINEST of five star restaurants. he only plays restaurant-grade mandolins. one can dream. edited because OP is so bro she's sis 
Can confirm, have frantically chased West end Toronto knife man with dull but large kitchen knife. Luckily I heard him coming up the street behind the house so was able to find money, grab the knjfe and make the sprint. I came out onto the street right behind him, so then I just chased him waving my knife like I was trying to land a plane. He noticed. $5. 
totally. my grandma used to tell me i was too skinny and that i needed to eat more. look at me now - mission accomplished grandma. 
"Hey babe. Coconut flour is just flavored flour, right?" "No, sweetie. It really isn't. And now you owe me $30." 
I did this once at work and I felt so betrayed and confused because I had no idea there'd be a fucking sharp edge UNDERNEATH the machine. 
Yes, plus a bit of smoke flavor from the high heat. 
Now that's some quality grandma story right there. 
Tell that motherfucker to stop for people when he comes to East York! 
That reminds me of the time my mother in law, while visiting us, used an entire 2 liter can of Spanish extra virgin olive oil to deep fry a batch of chicken wings - this with a bottle of canola sitting right next to it in the pantry. 
My grandma's coffee maker broke once. It was at least 30 years old. She was upset. Went down to the basement and came back up with the SAME coffee maker. Turns out it had gone on sale once in the past and she knew she would need a new one some day so she bought it to be prepared for the day that happened. Still being upset, she fiddled around with the old one and got it working again. Pretty sure she still has the "reserve" one in the basement. 
Leslieville. He's unbelievable. Unless you're already out with tool and cash, he's not stopping. 
My grandmother has backups of every countertop appliance. But the biggest grandmother thing she does is keep the calendar at the end of the year after filling it out with when she got gas/changed oil for her car, filled oil tanks (heat), and random weather facts. She could probably write a god damn almanac. 
Oh, that's just maddening. :( I had something like that happen fresh out of high school. I applied for a receptionist job and was interviewed, but they never called me back. Finally I went in again to inquire about the position, and they said they wanted me to work full-time as a prep cook in their restaurant (which everyone in town knew was a shift place). And they wanted my answer immediately. I said no thanks, went home, and cried. 
I have a little anecdote about the illegal questions. I was an Assistant Manager at a well known casual dining chain, and my GM told me that he had a suspicion that one of the girls he had just hired was pregnant. It was such an odd to thing to say, so I asked why he thought that, and he said that she looked pregnant. I had no idea what he meant, but because he had a history of saying wildly inappropriate things, I was just glad that he hadn't asked her anything. So, a few days go by and I finally see her doing her training with a large belly bumping against the production line. She was at least 7 months pregnant lol. I had a good laugh at his "suspicion". She quit a couple weeks later. (Yes, I know some women can look pregnant when they aren't, but this employee was very slender except for the basketball extending from her abdomen. Clearly pregnant.) 
Out of curiosity, how would you suggest to bring this up? I am at a job I love with a great work life balance, but I still think they would have counted against me if I asked about hours that early on. 
This needs to be higher. I mean, a lot of these red flags are good, but this is a pretty much guaranteed sign right here. 
I always feel when I interview someone and make an offer that if the interviewer wants to skip their notice that's a real red flag. Because you wouldn't want someone to do that to you as their boss - it's happened to me in the past and it does burn bridges. Sucks. 
When I was still working minimum wage jobs to get through school, I had an interview where they mentioned this, and it ended up being one of the nicer places I worked. I think the context for mentioning it is very important, as is the type of job. E.g. a high turnover rate at a legal office would be a lot more worrying than a high turnover rate at a McDonalds. If they say it has a high turnover rate because of high stress, or a "fast paced environment", sure, that's a red flag. But the place I worked just had a hard time finding people who gave a shit. They'd basically never show up on time (if at all) and weren't reliable enough to remain employed. When I finished my program and took a new job, I gave my two weeks notice in person and in writing to the department manager, who was incredibly happy to have been given enough time to find someone new before I left for good. Most people who'd quit in the past just stopped showing up. 
I once drove 3 hours one way only to be told as soon as I got there that they had just hired for the position, and he was such a great guy and he could start on Monday! Is that wonderful? All I said was "Well, good for you." And then when I got back to the parking lot I called my dad crying and he thought I had been in an accident lol. And then a friend told me that it was clearly my fault because I should have called to confirm the interview! Fuck off bitch. Those fuckers should have called ME to cancel, OR just interviewed me anyway and not even tell me that THEY had wasted my fucking time. Also their office was TINY. Like fucking Nick Valentine's office/home in Fallout 4 is bigger than this place was. 
Ugh. That's a shite interviewer. If she's more about her vacation than her job, then claims to not remember you, that's a red flag. 
Our CEO bragged he has never taken a vacation or sick day and doesn't understand why anyone else isn't the same. He refused any PTO until HR explained to him he can't dock salaried pay unless he offers PTO. He was literally taking money out of your check if you took a day off on salary. Occasionally an employee would have a family member come in and give them a tour of our production floor. He would express surprise anyone would do this, and when someone said they were proud of our company and the work we did he told them they weren't the ones doing the impressive work. I have lots of stories about him. We didn't get the nickname 'Asperger's Anonymous' out of thin air. 
Had a similar experience with a company who got people in the door touting bonuses "up to" a certain percent. What they didn't mention was that that was at one time in the company's history and the numbers were always far lower than what they told their workers during the interview. When it came time for bonuses they would say something like "we didn't hit our aggressive profit projections, sooo... no bonuses!". Meanwhile their workers were putting in 60+ hour weeks and management always seemed to be talking about which of their yachts was their *favorite* 
I'm working a job I hate but pays well. When we do the group interview bullshit we do the reverse stepbrothers. The company recently fucked me out of 10k. I tell ever prospective employee. 
Had a similar experience. Was waiting in the lobby to interview at Lockheed. 2 employees walk past escorting someone to the door they had just interviewed. Everyone is talking pleasantly, they hold open the door for the girl who just interviewed, she leaves. As soon as the door closes they burst out laughing and start making fun of her. In the lobby, in front of other people waiting. 
Also, anytime they mention travel, ask how much of a heads up you get. Almost worked at a place where trips TO KOREA were planned DAYS in advance. Screw that I'm not about to tear apart my schedule last minute for shit like that. 
I just quit my latest job a few weeks ago and one of the things the girl training me said was, "if, no actually when (manager) pulls you up on something, don't say anything just agree even if he's got it wrong." Lasted 7 months in the place and I honestly don't know how I got that far. The manager was an absolute cunt and everybody was terrified of getting on his wrong side. 
I had an interview with a company that offered 'software solutions'. Yes thats vague. For a half hour this guy asks me maybe 1 question and just rambles on about acronym after acronym. Software products i had never heard of before and that he clearly did not understand past memorizing their acronym. He then says i would eventually replace him. "Is that something you want to do?". Yea, uh no thanks. 
When I was getting into bartending, I applied at a local place that refused to pay you until you had done unpaid "training", even though I had served before and attended mixology school. I walked after the second day, in which I mostly cleaned. Coincidentally, it burned down 6 months later. 
I had a similar experience with a major corporation. I had a phone interview with the company recruiter, a phone interview with the prospective manager, then a round-robin of panel interviews that lasted five hours. It was fucking exhausting. They warned that the job would be excruciatingly busy, and told me that almost everyone comes in before 7 a.m. It was flattering to be one of the three top candidates in the nation for a very well-known company, but I walked out of that final interview wanting nothing to do with that department. 
I once interviewed for a job and was offered the position on the spot. I told the guy I would need two weeks' notice for my previous job. He asked what my current schedule was, and I told him M-F. So he asked if I could swing by Saturday at 10AM since I had the day off, to "get me logged into the company computer system." I thought it was weird, but I lived close by and didn't really mind. I got there and he asked why I wasn't in dress code. I told him I had no idea he intended me to work right away, so I wore jeans. He said "That's okay... you can go home and change on your lunch break." That job did not last long. 
Go to costco instead- they have great employee benefits and high starting salary 
If I hear anything that sounds remotely like "work hard, play hard" I'm out. I work hard, but when employers say that, I've learned it means they have zero respect for work life balance. 
They asked me about my hobbies, and I said develop apps and mobile games in my free time. Both of them laughed and one said "free time? Well, if we hire you you can say goodbye to that." And they didn't believe my previous employer was real because they'd never heard of it. I got a rejection email that night at 9 PM. Couldn't have been happier. 
Why were you still in high school in your thirties? 
Do they not follow-up with the college to verify the degree? My alma mater has a search function on their website where you simply search my name and year I graduated and it will tell you my degree and that I did indeed graduate. My degrees are framed and they sit in my office at home because nobody gives a shit about them - they are just pieces of paper. As for the passport, I can't think of *any* reason a company would need to do that...unless it's a cult and they are afraid you will flee the country. 
Companies calling themselves "families" makes me angry. It's an insult to the word. My last company loved to call its employees "the [company] family!" ...I ended up getting laid off via google hangout with no notice. My company email had been disabled before the conversation was even over, and people I talked to daily thought I was just on vacation for a week afterwards. I woke up with a job and discovered I no longer had one just before lunch. Some fucking family. 
They dropped that one on me during my last job interview and it turned out differently. In my case, "We work hard and play hard" is accurate *if* by "work hard" you mean *working at a very relaxed pace in a cushy office job* and by "play hard" what you mean is *sometimes we drink one beer together on Friday before everyone gets home to their families*. Don't get me wrong I have no complaints with my work environment, but at this stage this expression is just a cliche that could mean anything and its opposite. 
I hated this shit when I was younger applying for department store jobs anyone could run. The Interviewers acted like he place was the big top of something. The worst was RadioShack. Had to drive 1 1/2 hours for an orientation thing. The district guy gave us a talk and was like, if you work hard, you can be just like *me*! No thanks.. you look miserable as shit. 
"We refuse to hire enough people to get the job done without overworking everyone" If you're salary, it's kind of expected - and there are times I'd say it's justified depending on your function, but if Joe down in packing has to work 60 hours a week, you're just not running the building effectively. 
I would have a hard time saying no. I just really like gallows humor. 
Yeah fuck that. I'll work overtime when needed, but I have a life. I have commitments. 
Please blink twice if you are being held against your will. 
Damn this is depressing just to read. I DONT WANT THE JOB 
This. A lot of people go into interviews like beggars. They're not giving you a handout, you're doing them a favor. They will get way more money out of you than they give you in return. That's how they afford to pay you. 
I was between jobs once and did a group interview to be a substitute teacher for a school district. The group interview lasted 4+ hours and involved weird team-building exercises. On top of that, they didn't respond to any of the candidates for the better part of a year. In my case they were stunned that I was no longer available... 
Dude, I agree 100% with this. When I first started my job 1.5 years ago, they had name brand, soft toilet paper. I remember thinking "It's all these little things that show a good company". Now they have 1 ply shitty paper and we've had 3 people quit in the 2 weeks. Come to think of it, the change in toilet paper coincided with the change in culture. 
"Looking for highly-motivated people" = We expect you to do a lot of unpaid overtime. 
My boss said this countless times during my interview, and still says it occasionally. I actually don't see it as a negative at all. We're a pretty small business so it's expected for everybody to do a lot of stuff. It gives my days variety and gives me experience in lots of different areas. Some of it sucks and I'd rather not do it, but some things are pretty cool and I wouldn't experience them if I worked at a bigger company and only wore one hat, so to speak. 
A friend of mine worked at Crate and Barrel, they had a designated nap room in the office. It was a ROOM though for God's sake, not a bed just sitting out there. She liked the job, for the record. 
Kinda related, I got contacted for an interview by a call center and when I came in they took me around, showed me the entire place. Offices, break rooms, like they were ready to hire me off my application alone. Got to the interview, it went well. Never heard from them again. I don't even know why they bothered with a 15 minute tour. 
I actually received an offer, was told to call and schedule a time to come in the next day for paperwork (it was a late afternoon interview). Called and was told that she did not realize I had small children when she made the offer, and after talking it over with her spouse (who didn't work there), decided I wouldn't be able to work full time and manage my family. I was already working full time and had applied there just to see where it would go. Bullet dodged, but it still pisses me off. 
Coffee at the office is sometimes the best part of the day - So, yeh. Good one! 
I find that's standard for any interview for a government job or highly structured company. I had two interviews for different universities and they were both panel interviews with one HR, your future manager, and your manager's manager. They all just read from a script of questions and wrote down my answers. 
how did they turn your answer into a weakness? was like it: you: i believe teamwork is important to company success. them: sounds like you can't do anything yourself lol *texts* and yes they said lol outloud 
I think that "kool aid" is totally legitimate for some companies. Many companies are fantastic places to work with employee-focused culture and all kinds of non-financial benefits. The problem is that NO company can stay that way forever if they plan to grow. Things have to be standardized and refocused on profit and cost once you get past a certain size, so you see that original culture either fade away or just be drastically changed. 
I was asked in an interview, "if you could be any kind of animal, what kind would you be and why?" And I said, "why do you ask?" The interviewer (my future supervisor) said, "well, people are caught off guard and answer honestly. I had a woman tell me that she wanted to be a cat because they sleep all day and someone else takes care of all their needs. We didn't hire her." He gave a few other examples, too. I ended up saying, "obviously I would be a Clydesdale because I always work hard at a steady pace!" They laughed. I got the job offer. Sometimes they ask stupid questions because stupid people will give answers that say a lot about who they are instead of stopping to wonder why they're getting asked such a stupid question. 
"Miss I'm gonna need a permit from your husband that assures me he is allowing you to do this." 
I am involved with a much smaller business than what most people apply for (12 total people at my office), but when we do interviews we find it perfectly acceptable to ask us what the typical work week is. We are looking to add another person, and he asked us during the interview..."What are the typical work hours? Is there potential for overtime?" Just asking what the typical work hours are was fine in my eyes, but by also asking about the potential for overtime, he was able to frame the question in a manner that made him look like he would be a beneficial employee. 
I concur. Some might think - well, it's only a little bit of money and I'm willing to make a small investment. However, if the company does this it means they are absolutely not willing to invest anything in you. In other words, you are completely expendable and replaceable; if you go, they don't care. 
You didn't need to confirm shit. They should've called you cancel. I woulda wanted to bill them for my wasted time & gas! You're lucky you didn't end up working there. They sound inconsiderate and disorganized. F em! 
yeah I know it should have been obvious, but I was in dire need for a job. I finally got something small through the college where I was taking courses. Every single rejection and every asshole that never gave me a chance has been inspiring (out of spite!) for me to see this program through. I'm almost done too! Every bit of effort has been so I never have to be put through that hell again. 
Hold this goat's head back firmly while I whet the blade. 
im terrified that my workers do that to me, like are they agreeing because they think its a good idea or because they might be scared of something? 
I interface with Sitel senior management on a near-daily basis, and I absolutely believe that. We're one of their largest contracts, and its like pulling teeth to complete any major project deployments because we have to get an entirely new management team up to speed every few months. Least they're cheap? 
I applied for a job within my own company, but a different department. This department isn't known for its org skills, but the job sounded good. I heard they were setting up interviews but didn't get a call or email, so I figured they weren't interested. No big deal. The next week, I'm on vacation, it's 7pm and my phone rings. It's the hiring manager and she wants to do a phone interview, is now a good time? Well, I've had two glasses of wine (I'm on vacation, and I'm at home) so not really, but for some reason I go through with it. Clearly I didn't get the job, but I feel like I dodged a huge bullet here. Anyone who feels like it's ok to just call someone at home after hours for an unscheduled interview is not someone I want to work for. Bonus - they moved her department into my building so now I see her all the time. I've since applied for and gotten a much better promotion. I'm grateful every day she didn't hire me! 
That job for me likely would have lasted until my lunch break. 
Yep. The "play hard" part can mean they take employees on "team-building exercises" on their supposed days off. Nothing like doing a ropes course on Saturday, or staying late on Friday for a keg of beer (no thanks, I'll buy my own six pack on the way home which, BTW, I still have to drive my car to get to). 
I had someone who didn't believe something on my resume... "This doesn't seem right. Care to explain it again and be more... Accurate?" "Nope" 
"We're like a family" - Quiting for greener pastures is an unconscionable betrayal but it's totally okay if we fire or lay you off as an unnecessary cost cutting measure. 
"We work hard and we play hard" = anything from "we work way too hard but pretend there's play if it helps you feel better" to "we work sometimes but mostly fuck around" to "we do an easy, sensible amount of both working and playing but saying that makes me feel like a cool guy." 
I was gonna say...it's just a standard finance job 
They won't let him leave until he finds a replacement. 
Most staff move on but the manager is at 12 years and no intent of leaving for another 3. You see he tried, but being a big guy the trunk snapped. It was a funny day. 
I would have loved to be a fly on the wall when you did that 
I worked for a subsidiary of BoA, in tech, they had some of the most draconian bullshit standards ive ever experienced. Thought all banking was like that. I work for a much smaller entity now, and it's roughly 8 billion times better. Give or take several illions. 
That's all about getting you for cheap. Owner negs you so you are less confident in salary negotiations. Had this happen to me twice by tech companies. You don't want to work for someone like that. Because they start doing that shit every year for a couple months before review time... dropping hints that your performance is bad, etc. 
I have a buddy who hired in at a place that was supposed to be four 12 hour shifts - 48 hours a week, right? He figured since there's OT in the schedule, there may be some more, but that a four day week is nice. He's got kids. Dude's working 14-16 hours a day six days a week now. And they're trying to get him to take this salaried coordinator position (he's doing it currently because somebody left). But the salary they're offering is less than he made hourly last year 
This is what they wanted. It might be the weekend or your day off but you'd be expected to come in. $45,000 for a specialist technical job was shit pay for a standard 37h week. There's no chance I'm going on 24/7 call out. 
Agencies are fine when you are getting your foot in the door or need a job quickly, but the OP had significant experience on his resume, and shouldn't *need* to be put on what is essentially a probationary period. It becomes an insult more than anything once you've reached your peak in the workforce. 
Nothing more empowering than interviewing when you don't need the job. One of my managers said he would go on a few interviews a year just to sharpen his interview skills. 
Insurance sales jobs are often very grindy and unhappy; all day on the phone cold-calling people to sell them insurance. These people don't want to be called and aren't happy with your call. It sucks. It's a job anyone could do, it requires no knowledge or skill. Places like Scott's company invite anyone who applies, and hire basically everyone, and everyone quits or is fired in short order. Commission means you get paid a percentage of the value of the product they sell. So you could make a lot of money...but you won't because it's designed to keep your pay low, because they don't care about you. 
I had a similar group interview for a retail position. I was turned down for the job but when I happened to go into the store a few weeks later, I saw that they'd hired the people who had just done as they were told and hadn't contributed anything to the group tasks 
Back when I applied for Pornhub nearly a decade ago, they said they were looking for 'highly-motivated people'. They were just looking actresses who would fuck with enthusiasm. 
"Opportunity for overtime" = you will need to work 9 hour days and skip your lunch to manage the workload. also, how do you feel about coming in for a few hours on Saturday? 
I'm going to second this. I work at a small company and people do indeed wear many hats, but nobody is overworked and for the most part it keeps things fresh. 
Before my current job I had this happen a couple times as well. Tour of the entire facility, introductions to all kinds of people, no job offer. 
No no no! The kids were at school/daycare. I had a rearfacing infant seat and a booster seat in the back seat of my car. 
That's so dumb. Like I like sleep and would love to sleep all day at home but that doesn't mean don't need a job and I'm not a hard worker when I'm at work 
Agreed, once you are in the interview phase (especially near the end of the interview), asking about hours or pay shouldn't be too far out there for the majority of low to mid level jobs. If they are sketchy on pay or hours, that's a red flag for me. They have literally your whole life and usually past pay rates in front of them, but you aren't allowed to determine if it's worth your time to work there? Forget that. Usually if they won't tell you the pay, it's because they are trying to determine who they can pay the least out of the people they interviewed. 
More than that, it's usually a sign that the company is a scam. 
I got stuck in a lot of out-of-the-way places, but I found that as long as the assignment didn't go on for more than a week or two, it was okay. I would try to look up state parks in the area, well-known local restaurants, shit like that. It's not the most exciting stuff in the world, but it is always something new. 
It depends. How do you react when they offer a different idea, offer suggestions on your ideas, or, god forbid, actually disagree with you? If you embrace the discussion and input then you don't need to worry. However, if none of the above events ever occur, it's happening all the time. You don't have to agree, but you do have to be respectful. 
I love when you can tell a Vulcan is just barely keeping their shit in check. Which is all the time. 
That was also in the contract, a ban on working for clients or competitors for 2 years. And if you give your three months notice, they will start withholding your paycheck. Glad I checked glassdoor on that one. 
I made about $2 an hour less than the other call centers around town paid, so yeah. Cheap is the word lol. 
It isn't a big legal battle. One phone call to the Department of Labor (or state equivalent) and your lost wages will generally magically appear. They will handle it. The restaurant industry takes serious advantage of their workers and counts on them not knowing the rules or standing up for themselves. 
I would have left on the spot. Why waste half your day? It's not like they're gonna pay you for it 
The key is to bare your gums and flick your tongue over your teeth and out of your mouth wiggling it around like a snake. You know, the way the alpha wolf would do if another male came sniffing around his bitches. That should establish dominance right away. 
never take a job without a contract, you're in for a rough time here, probably 
Oh my god preach. That's exactly what happened to me. Four years, laid off with no severance because the company was low on money. They constantly referred to their employees being treated like family. NOPE. And one of my bosses couldn't even be bothered to say anything as much as 'thanks for everything' in an email or anything to me. 
Not so fast. What is your collection of tattered denim and flowy neckwear like? 
We just tell people that we expect that work will get done but have a relaxed atmosphere. Some people don't want to play hard and certainly not at work. I go to work to get paid and get things done but the fact that I can shoot the shit with my co-workers for 20 minutes after standup and have it not be a huge deal keeps me relaxed and coming to work with a positive attitude. Sometimes we go out to eat or drink too, but that's just good team building. 
So that's why only the fat bakers remain. Natural selection at work here. 
I seem to remember after that it was "We'll get back to you." 
I work for a moderately sized regional bank. When we have reps from Chase, Wells and US bank visit us, they can't get over our culture and how much better it is than theirs. 
I never understood this tactic. Don't employers constantly whine about turnover costs and the high cost of training new people? Why make it policy to insult your employees in a misguided attempt to drive salaries down? Best case scenario is you succeed. Your negging works, the employees feels less valuable than they actually are, and feels they are either not good at the tasks required for the job, or thinks that the job is too demanding. They either become dejected likely decreasing their productivity to a degree that offsets lower salary costs, or they simply leave out of frustration. Worst case is they know exactly how valuable their skills are, and are aware of their own competence relative to their peers. You slowly lose your best employees who leave for better prospects and you're left with a group of people that actually ARE incompetent. 
Which is exactly why they want him salaried. There was a forman on the last construction job I was on. He wound up working between 80-90 hours a week. Salary. I would have quit. 
I once worked for a deli/sandwich shop making minimum wage and they had us on call on our days off because the managers sucked at scheduling. 19 year old me thought it was bs. 26 year old me would laugh and hang up. Those owners screwed so many good employees over the years 
I agree with this. However, I will point out a fun exercise... go on as a contractor... They will usually do this if you are the sole role or one of two. Take on a couple projects for your 90 day probationary period. Kick ass at it. Own the shit out of at least one or two critical. Basically, at this point they have to hire you or watch all this shit hit the floor. This is the perfect point. They then go, "Okay your probationary period is over. We are gonna bring you on board." And you can say, "Yeah based on my interview and what I was expecting, this is quite a larger workload. I'm going to need at least 20% more and an extra week of vacation." If they balk, they risk losing all of these projects because they wanted to go the 90 day contractor route, putting them months on months behind schedule. tl;dr - if you're savvy, you can really make this work for you :-) 
Yup, that's why I said "the best you get". Most of the time they don't give a damn. 
That's actually somewhat hilarious. What they told you was: 1) We actually don't want you to make us money 2) We want to waste several manhours of our day being spiteful when we could be doing something that actually would make us money. 3) The worst thing they could have done was to keep you on but never call with work. Instead they set you free to join another temp agency who would compete with them. Who got screwed here? 
From evertyhing I've heard Netflix is an awful place to work. It's insanely competitive & you are basically always on the copping block. They burn employees out quick. 
Also commission means you're reliant on the quality of their product and the leads they give you. 
Shit, wish I had known "opportunity for overtime" means you will be shamed by all your coworkers if you don't do "your share" by working 10-11 hour days. At least my company gives double time for extra shifts. 
It is. People act like they can make instant, factual judgements on other people based on little things way too much. Especially with vague and open-ended questions. 
Usually. I just started working for a coffee chain, which will remain unnamed but American runs on them, that gave me one free uniform shirt and wants me to buy the rest. It's definitely legit but still a pain 
lmao. I worked at an eight person startup, I was one of two salespeople. Working my ass off every day with my one coworker, who worked even harder than I did. Our boss was a month behind paying our commissions, we weren't making half as much as he claimed we would based on our comp plans, and six out of the eight employees quit on him three days after he returned from a three week vacation to Greece. Like... you can't cut my fucking paycheck, but you can take your family of five on a three week vacation? Adios. 
Withholding your paycheck? As in, your last 3 months aren't paid? The labor board must love that one. 
It's a call center chain. The one I worked in handled inbound customer retention calls for a large internet provider. 
I once started a job and had to defend myself in the first month for something that happened before my start date. Didn't last there long! 
Every reddit post I see "oh it was years ago" "oh it wasn't worth the trouble" "oh it was just XX $" makes me sad since getting taken advantage of is so prevalent in society. 
I worked at Costco as a summer job 8 years ago. The same people still work there today and they barely have openings outside of seasonal work. 
If you want me to do work without a contract, you pay first. In cash. 
Employers always complain about the high cost of turnover they just never think they are the cause of it. 
Yeah, if it hadn't happened right at tax time, he might've ended up taking it. But since he'd done his taxes while they were kind of hem-hawing around about it, he new exactly what he made the year before. The new position was 3k a year above that, but salary. But he got a $2/hr raise last year. Then they were upset he didn't want the promotion. 
When I'm rejected, I'm disappointed. When they never even get back, I get uncertain and stressed. I'd rather know I didn't get the job than be left in the fucking dark. 
I did an interview with Amazon for their AWS IT department. Similar culture. The interview was 6 rounds and the last in-person interview was 8 hours long. More than one of my professors and colleagues warned me not to take the job because everyone they knew who worked there was miserable. Everyone I talked to in the interview process worked there less than 2 years. It paid a lot but I did not end up working there. 
Haha jokes on them. I don't give a second thought to my job or coworkers once i left the building. Not working those extra hours just lets me ignore it more. 
Yeah, the real answer to why they ask those questions is "we're arbitrary but like to pretend we're analytical". 
I'm a mechanic and worked for a Honda dealership that tried that. I've been provided uniforms by every shop I've ever worked for so I wasn't about to start paying for them. They ended up changing their minds when they got tired of me wearing everything I deemed suitable for getting dirty at work. 
I actually looked up the labour tribunal proceedings and found a case taken by a former employee against the company for that exact reason. Apparently the company instructed their legal counsel to not attend the hearing, and instead requested the hearing to be adjourned for a further two months. The judge awarded the employee double the withheld wages and refused to adjourn. 
I feel like working in a call center would be crappy no matter what the atmosphere was like. There would probably always be high turnover at call centers. 
You may be joking, but this has actually happened to me on several occasions. 
Costco is like the holy grail of retail jobs. Seriously. I tried multiple times to get my foot in the door there back when I was trying to make a living in retail. 
And keep well trained employees so they do not have to spend time with trainees and the other problems related to turnover. I'm a small business owner, but this is the reason why I start anyone who works for me at 15 an hour, and 17.50 as soon as they are competent in their position. It takes me a week or two minimum of hands on training to get someone else up to snuff assuming they didnt' have bad habits from other jobs. I want the people who work for me to stay and continue to want to work for me. It makes my life a lot less difficult. All someone who pays minimum wage is saying, is that if they could pay you less they would. They dont care about you. :P 
Your really good bonus was less than 300 dollars Though, my company doesn't do bonuses... Or employee appreciation 
Are you sure he didn't just say, " AH holy shit! This fucking hurts 
"We paid people with degrees and 10+ years experience slightly above minimum wage, demanded they work unreasonable hours, tried to make them question their value, and they all left. Today's workers are so entitled!" 
Amazon has a very high turn over. I know a few people who went there and only intended to work the 2 years, get their stock signing bonus, cash out to pay their loans off & find a place to actually be happy. The signing bonus in stock is paid out weirdly. You get 10% after 6 mo. 15 % after 12, 25 % after 18 & the remaining 50% after 24. 
I've never looked it up, but I'm pretty sure they just can't make you buy anything only available through the company or only useful in your position. Buying the rest of the uniform usually consists of wearing black below the waist. It's not the same level of job, but it should be similar legal status to requiring people to show up in a shirt and tie. 
Man, I'm a pretty mediocre worker. But I am ridiculously reliable and ALWAYS come in if i'm called in from somebody elses callout. Got 49 hours this week part time. I just show up, and show up when somebody else can't. People talk me up like i'm good or something but I just show up. 
I don't think anyone has ever seen a listing for call center positions and thought it's something you want to do forever. I almost wound up in one since the job market was shit. Call center always sounded to me like a very small step up and 2 steps back from working as a retail clerk. You get a desk and fulltime hours, but now your entire job is dealing with the insolent incompetent sociopaths who need a hapless low wage worker to ride into the ground in a pathetic power trip. The sad fact of the matter is people who can't help themselves tend to be entitled pricks. Anyways, point is I'm amazed that you don't hear about call center employees just lighting the place up more often. I can't imagine anyone has ever had their faith in humanity remain intact in a call center. 
Yeah, even as I was posting that, I was thinking that it probably did happen to someone for real. :/ 
I have many years as grocery management, I attempted to get a job there at a particularly shitty point in my career, and didn't even get a call back 
I did a report on him back in Catholic school elementary, I found the same reports this guy was a talking hamburger 
"Workers these days asking for a fair wage! They should be willing to work for free just for the *experience*!" 
The running gag I was told was that everyone works for Amazon for 2 years before moving onto Google. 
For a lot of jobs in the service industry (retail, fast food, etc) just showing up consistently puts you above most of their potential employees. 
More or less that just happened to my wife. Took time off after having a baby. Control of all her projects was given to manager X. *Every single project* had extra people put on it and their budgets exploded. (Basically, manager X parked idle people from his projects on her projects so that they wouldn't have to be laid off.) End result was wife gets back from maternity leave and every single one of her projects' budgets exploded. She was laid off as a direct result. Manager X was promoted to VP. *Fuck those guys.* 
The 2 years makes sense to max out the signing bonus. But from what I have heard google is just as bad. All the tech giants are. You hear about the awesome pay, you hear about the rock walls, and ice cream bars, and parties. What you don't hear about is how all those extra benefits are designed to keep you at work. Keep you working. My buddy quit google when he got a bad review for not "pulling his weight" because he was only putting in 50 hrs a week on a project. 
I manage a summer candy and ice cream store and was talking about this with a guy that manages a bar across the way this morning. It's nice to have someone that is really good at their job but it's more important to just have someone be there when they need to be. Show up on time and don't call out and you'll have a job for as long as you want it. Alcohol can't pour itself and ice cream won't scoop its own way into a cup. 
I see you haven't experienced the joys of Rochester NY, where the temps consistently are sub-zero in the winter, while in the summer you literally breathe mosquitoes. Fuck Rochester. 
I live in South Florida. Every day I leave my house, two contradictory thoughts go into my head: "wow the weather is amazing, so happy to be here." *2 minutes later* "wow the people here are a mix of stupid, trashy and insane, wish I could live somewhere else." Never fails 
Hey we have four seasons in the south as well: Bugs, Air made of hot soup, Air made of soup that was left out, Cold-ish sometimes but not really Edited to add commas, since making it look like a list on my phone apparently makes it something else on desktop. 
And hockey. And skiing. Winter sports are pretty damn fun. 
Bavaria here: no earth quakes, no tornadoes (well there are apparently 1 or 2 every now and then), no tsunamis, no dangerous or vicious predators (seriously the most annoying thing here is the occasional mosquito). It's usually temperate, not too warm, not too cold, not constantly raining, no droughts. It's generally very pleasant. Only some floodings now and then, but most of those are man's fault... 
I like how the top two comments are talking about opposite climates temperature wise. 
I agree! Heat definitely makes me very lethargic. I have no energy to do anything when its 115F (46C) out. Plus I get heat rash and sunburned very easily... I just think I was never meant to live in a desert. 
This. There is nothing like the feeling you get in the spring when everything comes back to life. The green seems so much brighter than I remember from the spring before, the sun feels warmer, the birds seem to sing prettier. As much as I don't like winter, I'd miss spring and fall ten times more if I didn't live in a place that experienced all the seasons. 
Ditto. The love of my life invited me. What was I supposed to do? 
Only other person who gets my riff raff perspective 
Your third point made me chuckle! I'm from a university town in Canada and its awesome watch all the international students freak out about the cold in November when the locals know...... oh they know 
Also if a zombie apocalypse ever does happen they will freeze before they get to us. This only applies to the winter for me but it's a real quick jog to make that all year long. 
I believe it's the olfactory that produces the smell. 
For those of you in the Bahamas, Belize, Cayman Islands, Palau and the United States: 25C is 77 in Fahrenheit. 
"I've got trees and vegitation in the city I stay, The (low) rent's in the mail, and I can always find a parking space. The women outnumber the men two to one. I got parks and zoos and things to do with my son. The nightlife ain't all that, but that's ok: I don't need to be distracted by the Devil everyday. And the jobs ain't really too hard to find, in fact You could have mine if you knew how to rhyme! So roam if you must, but come home when you've seen enough." -"Shh" by Atmosphere, a pretty good list of why Minnesota is dope. 
Correct answer. I grew up in Michigan. Once, in college, it was so cold as I walked across campus I had to stop at the school store and overpay for a winter hat just to feel okay walking to the class building OR walking back to my dorm. My fault for not having a hat, (yes mom, you told me so) but it was strange to literally feel unsafe without one. For 6 months I lived in South Carolina, and in June and July it was mid 90s on a daily basis, creeping up to 100 semi-often. It was excruciating, I would dread leaving the house, delay grocery shopping until the evening and basically never be outside. And I'm a moderately active, moderately outdoorsy person. I just couldn't do it. I was practically homebound during daylight hours on weekends and I would stay up late and sleep in just so I could be up during the night more and be more active as a result. Given the choice I would rather endure the Michigan winters than South Carolina summers. 
idk,NY is getting pretty bland, weather-wise. We haven't had any really good snowstorms this year. 
Another Canadian here. Work construction, you get to enjoy it in all its glory. And honestly, I prefer working outside in -20 v. +30. -30....Not so much. 
Hey, if it's gonna be my first time experiencing a real winter, I may as well go for the coldest state in the lower 48 I guess. 
"I was born in the cold, molded by it. I didn't see above freezing temps until I was a man and by then they were nothing more than scalding" 
The air force sent me from Missouri to California then Iraq. Like some kind of cruel joke. Then Turkey because I loved the middle East so much apparently. Then back to Iraq because I didn't get enough last time. Then Afghanistan. That place gets cold in the winter though. 
Fun fact it's eerily quiet because the snow absorbs a lot more sound 
It's the "Cold-is sometimes" that is the best. In SC it'll get down into the mid to upper 40's for a week in January, then back up to the 60's and 70's for a couple weeks, and then back down again. By the end of February we have mini tornados of pollen. 
Have you ever been in the forest in the height of summer here? So. Many. Bugs. They are mostly around bodies of water and I still fucking love it here, rain and all. 
I guess I didn't consider OP was talking about heat. Like sun burn? I've never had heat hurt my face other than the sun its self. 
Complete opposite for me. Once it starts dipping below freezing, I lose all motivation to do anything but cover myself in blankets and hibernate in my free time. 
I can push well below 60, as I'm a New Englander, so anything above 40 is fine with me, but you're also right. I've never once felt too hot, and while it rarely reaches triple digits here, it reaches 90+ with tremendous humidity. At this stage, it feels as if this entire thread is just splitting hairs between people who prefer the cold and people who prefer the warm, with the opposite group trying to tell the other that their preference sucks. 
That first spring night sitting out drinking a beer with friends on a porch is always amazing too. 
And we still have very little of either thing compared to places with warmer climates 
Wow... Monterey is one of my favorite places in the world. Goal in life is to retire in a home on the 17 mile drive. 
The Gulf Stream has an effect on Northern Europe. A lot of Nortern Europe faces submersion if the sea level rises. Also with the sea closer, the heights will be warmer anyway. 
Hawaii checking in. Are you sure about this? We just had a major cold spell come in over the weekend. I had to close my windows at night. 
Until you live in a place where it can be as equally hot as it is cold. Then everyone is an asshole at anytime of the year. Looking at you Ohio. 
Life isn't fun when you step outside and sweat from every pore on your body instantly. 
Yeah. It's fucking raining. It's the end of January. The shit 
Lol, like being drunk stops Wisconsinites from driving 
The cold is not what is bad about living in the dakotas, im in shorts and a hoodie at 10 degrees but the wind is what kills you. Fuck the great plains winds. 
I know it's just a joke, but in ND the temps get over 100F in the summer. And around this time of year, the temps can change by over 50 degrees in a couple days. 
So California was the worst place of them all right? 
And it's brighter because the eyes of the Damned are watching yo... I mean the snow reflects moonlight. Yea. 
Nah, if you live in the UP you stay in the UP. You know how hard it is to get to Canada from the UP? You can either drive around Lake Superior or head to Sault Ste. Marie at the easternmost point of the peninsula. I lived there 19 years and never went to Canada. Why would I with the Copper Country, Porcupine Mountains, Canyon Falls, Pictured Rocks, and hundreds of other beautiful scenic areas all relatively close by? That said, I'd love to visit Canada. Seems nice. And Sunnyvale is there. 
Yeah, fuck this January thaw. I want to go tubing at Cannonsburg, but I can't do that in the mud. 
It would take several hours to shovel my driveway. We have to have someone plow it with a truck. Depends how long your driveway is and how good of shape you are in. Also, if you work/school early you don't want to be shoveling a ton in the dark before you can even leave. (We pay the same person to plow my grandparents driveway even though it's short because it's just not safe for them to do it though they have a shorter driveway). 
North Texas reporting in: Sleet (2 weeks) Spring (3 months) Hell (6 months) Brown (2.5 months) 
The plains are so infinitely worse. PNW really is a remarkably nice place when you consider the pros and cons. They payoff is definitely worth it 1000x over. I know everyone says that about where they're from but we've got it good. 
It's not heavy rain; often more "drizzly" than "rainy". 
Hey now. Summertime Chicago is incredible. Love Fall here as well. 
Finlander here. Stupid thawing and freezing cycle all winter. On bad days it's wet and sloshy. Other bad days it's slippery, hard and *sharp*. 
I always find it strange how people say that the northern states are exactly like Canadian provinces. The difference between where I live and southern part of my province is astonishing. It's always hard for me to believe when I hear people say that Montana is just like Alberta. Y'all wildin 
The dry heat of Vegas was surprisingly painful to my lips, nostrils, and eyeballs. Still a nice place to visit though. 
Yes!! And the first few weeks when all the restaurants have their patios open. 
Pretty sure the homeless population goes down too... I mean... they leave, right? 
Hush. It's nice because we *don't* have that many people. 
Just purchase the tape of it now and fast forward it to see what happens 
I natively asked my Hawaiian cousins what they do if it gets cold with no heaters. They looked puzzled and said shut off the AC and open the window. 
When you step out of a cold shower and insta-sweat. 
You can always put more clothes on to get warm. You can only get so naked to stay cool 
See, 30 degrees really isn't severe cold. I'd call it severe cold below -5F. I'd take 30 over 100, but I dunno about -15 vs 100. 
Come to Scotland, the air may hurt your face a few days a year and you might want air conditioning a few days a year but neither situations ever last more than 2 days, each might happen twice a year 
Oh come on. Why, as of this January in Wisconsin your FIFTH DUI is finally a felony. (But, you know, only if within 5 years).... 
Living in South Florida now for college. Had a fairly nice place last year with almost no bugs but it was too expensive without splitting a bedroom so I moved elsewhere. Holy shit the palmetto bugs. If we don't get the place sprayed at least every other month I find dead ones everywhere, several a week. I cannot wait to be back up north after i graduate and never see these things again 
Idk the fucking no see-ums are one of the reasons I disliked the nights in the South. 
Yup, I'll take -10 with no wind over 20 and tons of wind (Minnesotan). 
Welcome to the Midwest where it can snow in the morning and be 70 by afternoon. 
Who wouldn't want to drink liquor and smoke 6 paper joints all day at the trailer park? 
Yeah, i grew up on a hill with high winds and a 100 yard long drive way, if we tried to shovel it the end we started on would need reshoveling before you were halfway done. 
Hey now we get like a day to a week of snow just about every other year so its fine 
"It may only be 5 inches, but I've got 16 stone to push it in with" 
Sshhh don't tell people that Tell them you haven't seen the sun in 7 years 
It's the "constantly wet" part that turns me off. I don't care how the rain is coming down, just that everything is always wet. 
Totally! That one day in fall when the weather is perfect. 
I am from IL and it's like the weather channel just gave up a long time ago cause I SWEAR their 7-day forecast changes by the hour, especially in the spring. It's like summer and winter are somewhat predictable. Cold as fuck and windy as fuck and hot as fuck. Fall is a mess in general, but usually it begins to freeze and the bugs go back to hell. But spring? Springtime is like your uterus, mother nature version. Goes from nice and cool to humid from the rain to hot from the rain and humidity to getting the space between your toes bit from the fucking mosquitoes that came back from hell for their vacation. Then a half cool half hot night, a nice cool morning, and repeat by 1130/1200. Edit because I'm tired and English isn't my friend when I'm tired. 
aren't we worried about the warming trend? I thought global warming was not supposed to affect us this much this soon 
January average high/low temp for Calgary is -1/-13, for Helena, MT it's 1/-10. I'd say that's in the same neighborhood. 
Living in the bottom of arizona really fucking hurts all exposed skin during the summer. Think living in a giant convection oven. 
Yeah, heh heh. They go somewhere warm and cozy, like a friends' house or something, right? 
"Awww, does your face hurt? ...'cuz it's killing me." 
It is almost like the planet is getting warmer or something. Just a theory though. 
Knowing American TV, we'd get 60 minutes about it easily 
You say cold shower, but you really mean "Slightly warm", because it's so hot that the water in the pipes is like 90 degrees. 
I think that' a big part of what I hate about cold weather. It always feels like a big event to go outside. Gotta put on a ton of clothes, and then take them back off again when you arrive. Leaving the house in warm/hot weather is a much more casual affair. 
Or come to the Midlands of England instead. It's grey all year round and nothing really happens, weather or otherwise. 
Anywhere people are shitting behind curtains is a horrible place to live 
My sister lives in Seattle. She keeps all her food scraps in an open bag in her kitchen to eventually empty out into her compost bin. We grew up in Florida- if we tried that shit back home we'd be up to our eyeballs in ants, roaches, and other miscellaneous creepy crawlies. 
OMG you're such a liar! We can all see through it. It rains for 15 minutes at 4pm! 
That's strictly a Florida Man thing. It's too cold to truck jack here. 
Secret's out about the PNW, sorry to say. It's too bad you have a huge housing affordability crisis that's making it impossible to live there for basically everyone except tech bros. 
I don't like rain. It's wet and irritating and it gets everywhere. 
Hey there. North is Chicagoland, everything else is south ;-) 
Hey now!.. I seem to recall at least *three* in September! 
The way that's worded sounds like you're laughing at their demise. 
Still, anecdotal evidence *for* global warming is just as bad as anecdotal evidence *against* it. There's enough science to support the theory of global warming that it would be better if people refrain from comments like this. It makes it harder to counter someone who doesn't believe in GW, when he comes with an anecdotal story of a really cold winter somewhere. 
I tell you what, man, that's dang ol' crazy man, he can only do one ol' character, man. Dang. 
All those house hunter shows already exist. Househunters: Inevitable Climate Change doesn't have quite the same ring to it though. 
Many times people *have to* wear more clothes though. Not everybody works in an air conditioned office so protective clothing means you're too hot and that's that, not to mention you're probably doing physical labour so you'd be warmer without the extra gear anyways. A couple hours weilding a chainsaw in kevlar pants will wipe you out. 
Trying to use my phone outside in cold weather is so frustrating. The touch screen doesn't recognise my gloves so I have to take them off. But then my fingers are too cold and the touch screen doesn't register them either! What do people do in cold countries while waiting at a bus stop if they can't browse reddit? 
I tell people that the PNW is full now, along with saying it rains constantly. 
There are two types of people in the world. Those who laugh at the name Kankakee, and those who.. hahahaha, who the hell named a city that? 
Well I'm pretty miffed about the missed opportunity now 
CCPrepper: And here's where I'm building a seawall to protect against storm surges. HH: But the ocean's 750 miles away and you're over 4,000 feet above sea level. CCPrepper: Only for the next 1,000 years - then we'll see who's laughing. 
Basically nothing. The trick is to get a job in a city that lets you work remotely so you have that city salary and that country COL. 
For people who prefer qualitative descriptions, that's rather fat 
That river is part of the three that contains "Little Egypt." All three are quite important. 
Well the northern half of the province is almost completely covered in boreal forest so I think maybe a few more than 4 trees. But on the prairie... 
I once ate from a bag of mixed nuts for about ten minutes before noticing a live cockroach crawling around in there. It was all covered in salt and looked like a little almond with legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
I feel you. I had jaw surgery as well and my bottom lip and chin were numb, I got into the habit of wiping my mouth a lot when I ate because stuff would get on my chin and NO ONE would tell me. It took about 4-6 years for the full feeling to return to my chin. 
Or he was just testing to see if you'd take stupid advice for real. 
sighs, i try not to use them because of that video. i hate it though when a waitress just tosses straws on the table. they wont take them back because they are dirty ( or the paper wrapper gets wet). so even if i dont use it, it still does not save a straw. i will use paper straws 
True, but when I used to work at Wendy's, we always tried to get the phone number of the girls who asked for a straw with their frosty. Edit for those not getting it: 1. We were stupid horny teenagers. 2. Frosty are very thick shakes and quite difficult to suck through a straw. 3. In case you still haven't gotten it, if you an suck a bowling ball through a straw, then a horny teenage boy might extrapolate you could give a great blowjob. Edit 2: I replied below, but it's getting missed. I don't remember if anyone got a phone number, although we did attempt a lot. I never got a number while at work. 
Hmm, well if it's camels you're looking for, then there are four places. There's the Camel Hut, that's on third. There's camels are us, that's on third too. You got Put Your Butt On That Camel, that's on third. Swing Low, Sweet Camel... That ma... Matter of fact they're all on the same complex. It's the camel complex down on third. 
You let a man tell you how to live your life. Sounds like *you're* the bitch. 
It won't give you wrinkles as long as you also smile while sipping and you won't look crazy at all I promise 
Would you take that straw out of your mouth please because it looks like your sucking on a tiny schwanz? 
Well that's lame. I'd instantly laugh then immediately ask if you were ok! I just don't get the "and that was the end of the date" outcomes in these kinds of situations. Like the person who you're on a date with has never tripped, cut themselves, etc.? People are weird. 
Nice dude. That reminds me about the time I ordered some fried chicken salad from this new delivery place at my college. After picking at the salad for a couple minutes I noticed a live cockroach crawling around in there. It was all covered in ranch dressing and looked like a little piece of chicken with legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
As long as you weren't drinking it through a straw, I think you're good 
I just died a little. When I was in high school, I got McDonalds and passed out after a hard day. When I woke, I had forgotten all about the tea. Fast forward a day. I get home. I find my tea. Big old swig. Threw up. Check the interior. Fuzz absolutely everywhere. 
Is it very common to lose sensation after surgery? I'm a brass player who is going to need upper AND lower jaw surgery because of apparent growth issues. I'm super ready for a more pronounced jawline, not so much the loss of ability to play my instrument. 
I would like to hope that I would tell you that you have made a mess of your food all over your beard. But like a bro. Not some douche canoe trying to get a laugh at your expense. Maybe we come up with a sign? 1 beard stroke means I'm thinking. 2 means there's something in your beard. 3 means there's an evil ninja creeping up behind the person to your left. Etc. 
Rule 2 is equally as important: Don't Be Unattractive. 
They do make alcoholic root beers, but 99% of the time when you see root beer on the shelf in a store or on a restaurant menu, it's a non-alcoholic drink. 
Description of the video says he likely ate it and then regurgitated it, but it went up a nasal passage directly connected to their mouths. Poor thing. 
Did you want to get your dick ripped off from suction or something? 
Even so, the straw works in this scenario by cracking the badass mystique for effect. Such is the power of the straw. 
The key is to always bring the straw up to your mouth. Never bring your face down to the straw. 
I heard there's one where MaryAnne rides the camel with you.. 
Don't be absurd. No one will ever need a house made entirely of brick. 
They do exist - I've seen them at music festivals where vendors are required to provide compostable utensils and straws. I don't know how available they are to the public, though. 
"As I made my way past the breakers a strange calm came over me. I don't know if it was devine intervention or the kinship of all living things but I tell you Jerry at that moment I was a marine biologist!" 
I like eating those with a spoon (shakes and smoothies that is) 
Turtles lives for decades, maybe even centuries, so 8 minutes of pain and a bit of blood is a small price to pay. It likely obstructed its breathing and ability to expel water and stuff out from its nostrils and its ability to do coke. 
Coffee does stain teeth (they're also acidic) so it's a toss up. Or you can have a cup of water to sip from while sipping your coffee. I don't know a win-win situation here but this way you could come out super hydrated :) 
I WASN'T looking, and i was trying to get to the lip of the cup so I could get some ice, but instead wound up with the straw WAAAY up my nose. it was super bad. 
Cool man. Reminds me of the time I was delivering my baby with my wife. After cradling my newborn child for a couple minutes I noticed it was actually a giant live cockroach crawling around in my arms. It was all covered in blood and looked like a little baby with legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
I'd say that tomato juice is repulsive enough even without cockroaches 
He did say a big gulp, I am imagining it completely filling up his mouth and choking him 
Excuse me, I think you mean *Mr.* Ed. Have respect for your elders, son. 
I have this theory where Reddit is secretly staffed by 300 professional comedians who moonlight as anonymous Redditors to help make our world a better place. Nah who am I kidding, it's just the cast from Whose Line. 
Rule 3: if you can't not be unattractive, be charismatic as hell. 
Glass is the way to go- you can see if it needs extra cleaning with a pipe cleaner on the inside. With the metal ones it's anyone's guess what the inside looks like 
Camel with two humps, if you know what I mean. ... ... Sex. I mean sex. 
Gingerbread is the future of residential construction materials 
Ya the college I went to switched to those years ago. Made out of corn I believe. Would break down in like a week. 
THE SEA WAS ANGRY THAT DAY MY FRIENDS! LIKE AN OLD MAN TRYING TO SEND BACK SOUP IN A DELI! 
I think a straw in your nose increases your ability to do coke. 
That's what I mean, always look. It takes half a second. Sorry to hear it went badly though. 
Sweet bro. Reminds me of the time I was saving a family from a fire. It wasn't until a couple of minutes of saving that I realized I saved a giant cockroach instead of any human. It was covered with smoke and looked like little father legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
I'd say that cockroaches are repulsive enough even without tomato juice. 
Have to clean up the larvae. They like tight spaces. We found them in drawers, in the breadbox, in the crevice between wall and ceiling, in screw holes, etc. It's disgusting, because our vacuum isn't strong enough to suck up the sticky cocoons, so you may have to pull them off with a toothpick and then suck it off with the vacuum....... 
Freeze everything for two weeks before use, this will kill all the eggs and you will just east them and be none the wiser. 
Excuse me sir, I am a professional *meme historian*. 
This is redundant in view of Rule 1, since charisma is attractive 
Me too. Well, only one set of kids from one set of hideous parents. I honestly think it was a case of multiplying a negative with a negative to get a positive. Literally. 
Same. I guess I used my final straw yesterday when I was drinking a mojito. Maybe I'll go buy a glass one with a filtered end. 
After reading these suggestions, I think I will just revert to using a sippy-cup. 
I mean specifically the girls who asked for straws. Only thing I can think of is some connection with blowjobs, but I'm not making it. 
You have to have the gear right. A backpack with a machete and hatchet strapped to the sides looks badass. A hiking pack properly weighted and strapped doesn't move and you can miles and miles a day with it. Sadly laptop bags never look cool(unlike bowties or Stetsons) you have to hold them down and run for the subway in your geeky outfit. WHY CANT WE BRING BACK BRIEFCASES!? 
Way ahead of you. Please look up my Indiegogo campaign Gingerbread Freakin Houses and consider donating. 
"From where I was standing I could look directly into the eye of the great fish!" 'Mammal!' "Whatevah." 
Rad homie. Reminds me of the time I was in middle school taking a math test. It wasn't until a couple minutes of test taking that I realized my teacher, classmates, parents, siblings, and myself were all cockroaches and that I wasn't taking a test and that I didn't know what a test was. I was covered in urine and so was everyone else and we were in a bathroom in Soho. Wasn't using a straw though. 
I mean, they got a kick out of it. But they did shit all to help. Took me a year and a half but finally got rid of the moths. I moved. 
I have to say, I'm blown away at how relevent this comment thread is as I just had upper and lower jaw surgery four days ago. Still very numb and swollen so I can't tell you much from personal experience, but my surgeon told me word for word what j_rod went over. The numbness in the bottom lip is rarely permanent, although it's fairly common for it to stick around for up to six months. I'd say prepare for some difficulty with playing up until that point. And good luck! The aesthetic difference for me in the past four days has already gotten me compliments 
Hell, even if they don't for a week it makes some difference. I agree we should all care more. But every single bit matters 
Yeah but unless you stay on top of maintenance of said sippy cup it accumulates all sorts of bacteria and mold. And just dishwashing it doesn't work. You have to full on scrub that sucker (pun?) out. 
It's really difficult to suck a frosty through a straw. Ergo, if they ask for straws, they can suck really, really, really hard. 
Sick, friendo. Reminds me of the time I was elected President. It wasn't until election night that I realized my opponent and her entire team were just giant cockroaches and that my entire campaign was a joke. It was all dressed up and talking and just looked like a Secretary of State with legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
Probably more effort than the actual eradication of the moths? 
Gods damnit... I was really hoping for the secret to defeating the mothy menace, but alas... It appears the only answer is to cede my territories to them to start anew. 
So the best course of action is to waterbend your drink to save the environment 
Though let's be honest, more people use the fact that nobody knows they're *not* an anthropomorphic wolf to pursue their interests. 
Righty hoe. Reminds me of that one time i was praying at my shul. It wasn't until a couple minutes of scheming that i realized my rabbi, parents, myself, and the rest of my congregation were cockroaches and we werent praying but feasting on the feces of some liberal arts major who had relieved xirself into and all over the coffee machine at starbucks. I was covered in some liquid the humans called "iced frappuccino" and so was everyone else but we didnt really much care because we were cockroaches. Wasnt using a straw though. 
Well, this was more time/effort than the Battle of the Baking Cupboard (the first one), but much less than the overall war. Eggs can remain viable for up to 300 days. Months after I thought it was all over they'd be back. 
I got one of those Contigo travel thermos' and I've wondered if I'm cleaning the buildup from coffee and tea properly. Just bringing it up because it's pretty much an adult sippy-cup. 
The list of things you can shout at your friends when they blue shell you is considerably longer as an adult. 
Ripper, cobber. Reminds me of the arvo that I was sinking tinnies with Steve. He was on barbie duty and the bloody drongo had burnt the snags to buggery. It wasn't until I was taking the first bite of a snag sanga that I cottoned onto the fact that Steve turned into a fucken New South Welshman, and the woolies snags were actually just minced up blues fans. Wasn't using a straw though. 
Annnnd nobody is questioning this guy because of his username? WHAT IF HE'S LYING?! 
And a lot more satisfying. I was never able to call Peach a bitch ass cunt when she stole first place from me either. 
Magnificent, mate. Reminds me of the time I was riding with my mate down under. I saw my dog being held up in a headlock by a giant cockroach. I got out of my car and punched the cockroach straight in the jaw. It was all buff and looked like a kangaroo. Wasnt using a straw though. 
Are you kidding? He's got a written declaration and everything. Even if he is lying, he's taken it past what may be resolved through diplomacy. 
Congratulations... you made me google it, and now I've seen a wolf dick 
My dad got so fucking drunk, he wouldn't stop screaming "THE CUBS WON THE WORLD SERIES" for 2 hours and then he passed out 
Son of a bitch, the Sports Almanac was wrong by just ONE year... 
To be fair, that answer will apply to all major events they may ask you about 
I'm on the red line and we're about to hit Addison. Send help. Everyone is singing. I fucking love it. 
I was coming here to see if anyone has a gif or video link to that. He was cheering before he even grabbed that ball! 
Theo Epstein could run for governor of California by basing his campaign around two words: drought buster. 
It's god tying up loose story ends before he fucks us all up. That's right. I called it. Trump victory. 
I'm about 6 blocks from Wrigley Field. There is a mass exodus to the field right now. Complete pandemonium outside. My dogs are confused. Pretty awesome! 
This girl named Becky Schwartz said she'd fuck me "when the Cubs win the world series". I don't know how to explain to my SO that I have to do this... 
Baseball has that weird magic and romance to it though. I can't follow it the whole season, it's too slow for me, but I love big sports moments anyway and tonight the slow speed really drew out the tension. Loved it 
Tomorrow night the Cubs will win the World Series again 
Enjoy that shit, this kind of thing will never happen again, you're in the middle of history 
That's how most of us feel I think. I don't know shit about baseball, but I've always heard about how the cubs are cursed. Good for them! 
This is why I really wanted the Cubs to win. I remember watching that game in 2004 on a tiny tv when I wasn't supposed to be awake because of school. They broke the curse and I got to see it as a sox fan. I'm so happy for the Cubs and their fans, it's a great feeling 
I'm totally biased since I'm a Cubs fan but I mean if you have to lose to someone, might as well be the team that hasn't won a championship in over a 100 years. 
I feel kind of bad, because I was raised as a Cubs fan, and I've always felt the love for them in my heart. I grew up watching Andre Dawson, Mark Grace, Ryno, Greg Maddux, Sammy Sosa, all those goddamn greats. Feeling that heartbreak in high school with the 03' team (losing with Wood and Prior...HOW?). But I'm the type of guy who doesn't really have the patience to *care* through an entire 160+ whatever game baseball season. So, I'm not really fairweather because I always keep tabs on the Cubs, but I also can't muster up much of a shit about baseball esp if the Cubs aren't good. I suspect a lot of people have similar stories. 
I'm a server at Applebee's. I get excited when people ask for Shirley Temples, because I can respond by saying, "Surely!" But nobody ever laughs. 
Trump vs Clinton. Let that sink in. We're in a crazy ass world. 
I feel the same way about my 93 year old grandpa! Say, he's looking for a girlfriend... Let your gma know he *still* can drive ;) not bad eh 
How many Cubs fans are going to die happy to have seen the Cubs win the World Series any ways? 
Isn't a baseball game always down to the last batter...? 
Ah we're past three. Leo won an Oscar remember? And all of those celebrity deaths. 
Lifelong Red Sox fan here. ALL HAIL THEO!!!!! I was at that game in '04. Nothing compares to that feeling. I'm so happy for the Cubs! (and poor indians) 
Someone joked about that at the bar last night. "If the Cubs win, the death rate in Chicago will shoot up because of all the people waiting for the Cubs to win the World Series to die." Admittedly, it was the bearded guy who stands at busy intersections with a "U.S. is not free" sign and spouts conspiracy stuff, but it was still funny. 
Hahahaha. I'm so glad. I want a parade!!! A 3-day parade. 
That's because there was going to be a tornado. A tornado of drunken fans going crazy. 
Half of Chicago might be destroyed tonight with the celebratory rioting. This is bigger than anyone who is not a baseball fan can understand. 108 years since the Cubbies won a WS. Huge thing. 
And then it'll turn out that the cut on Leo DiCaprio's hand in *Django Unchained* was fake all along. 
Last time the Cubs won the World Series, Barack Obama was President. 
Actually the last time the cubs won the world series Ireland was part of the United Kingdom. 
Only because Biff screwed up the original timeline when he changed his name to Trump 
I plan on watching the Browns lose the 2080 Super bowl and immediately shitposting about it on r/nfl 
Where are you going? ***Why did you leave your house???*** 
I know those are streets in Chicago but I still read that as you being in some kind of quantum state 
I'm glad someone else saw that. I'm genuinely concerned. 
You deserve to lose tens of thousands of dollars if you're basing your sports bets off of movie predictions. 
He's the biggest winner of all, imo. Red Sox then Cubs? Dude is amazing. Which team is next? How much money is he getting? 
Cubs win the series and fucking Biff the presidency 
My dad passed 13 years ago. I'm wearing his Cubs hat. 
Dude, for these old timers, these long, long, LONG suffering fans, this is the promised land. See the Cubs win a World Series? Any Cubs fan who's been around for a long while could probably go pretty damned peacefully after that. 
I am sure she will understand. But plot twist, Becky also said that to 65 other guys so you may have a line to wait in... 
I had no money riding on it and I almost had a heart attack. 
It won't last. Even if you narrow it down to American sports I guarantee you 100% odds that you'll lose the shortest drought title in the super bowl. 
Even as a lifelong Cubs fan, I was rooting for the Sox so hard in 2004. I was in seventh grade. I remember staying up way too late too, those extra innings games where you guys rallied against the Yankees. Ortiz with those clutch home runs. Curt Schilling and his bloody ankle. All of it was beautiful. 
Has to. There was at least one Cubs fan and one Indians fan that got 2016 tattoos. They couldn't both fail. 
Exactly man, I've been a Cubs fan my whole life (20 years). but 20 years isn't shit to the generations before us, they were the real fans. This win tonight was more than a win for us true lifelong Cub fans. This was a win for the lifelong Cub fans who went their whole life without that, but just wishing for that World Srries win. That was monumental, that was for our ancestors. 
You're completely right. I don't even understand how big this is. But it makes me think of my second Grandma to die who I didn't go to visit in the hospital as much as I should have because I was mainly scared of being as hurt as I was when my second aunt to die died because I felt I got too close to her in her final months. But every time I went into visit my grandmother would just speak of the Cubs. how much she loved them. How much she just wanted them to win. SHE WAS IN HER NINETIES. she never saw the Cubs win the World Series. So to me this is very important. She was the sweetest woman ever, who would given everything for anyone. So to me, this is for her. She watched it all since she was a young girl in the depression, but they never won. This one is for her. 
As an Indians fan, this is true. If anyone knows what it's like to come back from 3-1 to get the city's first championship in a lifetime, it's Cleveland fans. Enjoy it. It's a great feeling! 
You're not the guy we're talking about . We're talking about the people who've been diehard "_____ team" fans for the last 5 years, and their facebook feed is full of "go red sox" or some shit, but the moment the cubs won suddenly they've been diehard cubs fans their whole life and they've always wanted to see a win. I had a friend of mine do that with football. Was a diehard chargers fan until the patriots went undefeated and suddenly he was a diehard patriots fan. Next years he was back to the chargers. 
Seriously if I were OP I would start shopping that shit. 
'It's a fight to the finish.' "Well that's a good place to end!" -Mitch Hedberg 
Also, Biff ran a SUCCESSFUL casino. So theres some pretty big differences. 
As soon as they won I hopped on the red line straight to Wrigley lol 
I'm in London and NYC right now and things are pretty crazy 
Yeah, I'm pretty sure this means Trump is going to win the presidency and North Korea is going to discover internet porn. 
To be fair, every set of predictions over the last 50 years included the Cubs winning the World Series. It's been a running joke forever. 
Breaking a 108 year curse? No, it was something nobody ever could dream of. 
Brown's fans be like: Theo what do you know about football? 
"McFly's a hero because he's a butthead. I like people who aren't buttheads, okay?" 
Been wearing my gramps old Wrigley Field hat all series. Sorry for your loss. 
2.5 hrs out of Chicago, and still fireworks 30 min after the game. Crazy 
As a Chicagoan I had 100 on the cubs losing, barely watched it, heart skipped several beats several times. Money aside my mom (lifelong cubs fan) was hyperventilating and cursing the whole time, broke down in tears for a good 15 mins when they won. 
My dad got to go to game 7 against the Yankees. That was awesome as a kid to know he was there. Now that I'm older it actually seems more amazing. 
Sounds like a book and movie adaptation waiting to happen. Hey OP, include this comment in the movie please. 
Yep, it was against the Royals last season. I cracked up so hard when that happened. Listening to Ryan Lefebvre and Rex Hudler's commentary was hilarious. 
Death, taxes, Arsenal finishing above Tottenham... some things never change 
23 is also Cubs Hall of Famer Ryne Sandberg's number. 
Pretty sure North Korea finding internet porn would probably be a good thing. Maybe finally jerk that one out and calm the fuck down. 
this is why i have to go into every thread. This is great. too much really 
That was the best ballgame I'm ever gonna be fortunate enough to witness, and some of the best commentary to go along with it. 
if you watch the last play Rizzo puts it in his back pocket the moment he gets the out. 
"I want all the illegal Mexicans to make like a tree, and get outta here." 
He just texted me he's trying to make his way home, it's just the traffic. He said not to worry. bro code for life 
Always involving a team from Cleveland, one way or the other. 
As a film student, this is without a doubt going on my list of potential films to make. 
Last year was fucking precious.Tottenham for most of the end of the season ahead of Arsenal, and Arsenal gets....second 
Breaking news! RG VI has torn his ACL while climbing the stairs to greet his new comrades. 
Or as my brother likes to put it, Tottenham came in third in a two horse race. 
He'll be out for three or four snaps while they 3D print him a new knee. 
Jesus Christ, the sportsball is coming from inside the house 
Not only to upvote himself, but to downvote people he disagreed with. Was once a beloved Reddit celebrity who always chimed in with cheerful and enthusiastic biology facts. I always read his comments in Claptrap's voice. 
Poor girl was probably holding them in all night and you happened to get up when sleep took over and she lost the fight against her body. BEEN THERE lol 
If your name is Doug, I have to say you hid this one poorly. 
My dad was the same with my childhood cat. In everyones eyes he hated that cat, because it would always meow at his door to get let outside, and then meow at his window to get let in in the early morning. Secretly, after a bad day, he would grab that cat, snuggle it like his life depended on it. Ironically, my dad ran over the cat by accident. Dad also passed away shortly after. I like to picture them hanging out having a beer watching everyone. 
Wow what a fucking idiot. Like, why send a pic with him in the room goddamn 
He planned to propose for a year and a half before he did it? Why? Did he just get a good deal on a ring and buy it just in case? 
I just read this to my husband. He immediately got up and put a bag of croutons in the freezer. We're trying it tomorrow. Update: Sorry it took so long but it makes them crunchier, which we like. Not bad, not bad at all. Much better than the cat food Tina Belcher told us to try. 
Damn dude, she risked giving you pink eye... the worst marriage transmitted disease you can get from sharing the same phone 
I had a friend who did this to all of her friends and her boyfriend... We figured it out but she never knew. 
Years ago, my wife quit smoking, but couldn't keep it up, so started again behind my back - I don't want her smoking, but I'm not going to stop her I knew practically straight away (You can tell when a smoker goes from not smoked in a while, to having had one) For months I kept hinting I knew she was keeping a secret, a few times even straight out asked her if she was smoking again, to which she denied. In the end, she caved in and told me, and was confused as hell when I said I knew all along 
Some day when you are a distant memory he is going to think about you and feel sick to his stomach. You deserve better; give yourself a chance. 
Whether it counts or not, I felt the cathartic waves from here, man. I'm sorry for the shitty ex, but the internet's listening to ya. 
This is kind of a blessing Just let her walk away, don't escalate the convo into an argument (be fair and nonchalant) Then immediately go to work on yourself: become a better person in different ways, and do exactly what you want to do Your life doesn't need to depend on those that don't see value in you 
"Honey, you're not going to believe this. The guys are *dragging* me to the Stanley Cup finals tonight. I didn't ask for it, but really it would be rude of me to say no." 
As the opposite half of that equation. I fell back in love with my wife. Fairly recently actually. We have been together 15 years now. Rough spot about 5 years ago. Separated for a year. Got back together. Honestly, in the last year, it's really going well. I am back in love again. Just letting you know, there is hope. Couples therapy helped. But we both had to do slot on our own. And the biggest piece for me was that I needed to see she was truly making an effort. 
This happened with my wife and a friend - before I knew her. Actually, it is only because I am friends with him that I met her. He encouraged our dating. I don't know if she knows that I know that they had a little thing, no reason it ever needed to come up really. I don't feel any resentment toward her but to be completely honest I have a small amount of (unreasonable) resentment toward him. He is a super nice, genuine guy so I am chalking this up to a biological, human condition. 
Five of us in a skype call playing LOL together. One of my buddies just starts reading off some recent comments from my reddit account all nonchalantly. Will never forget that immense feeling of panic. Now when i post things i have to make sure id be ok with my buddies ragging on me for it haha. 
Sounds exactly like my ex. In addition to all the excuses you listed, I also got "it's mouthwash I used in the car after work" quite often. He came stumbling home drunk a couple times and once with a severe head injury and I had to drive him to the emergency room. When I left him, he told his family, my family, and all my friends I cheated on him so he was filling for divorce. Most of them still believe it and this happened almost 7 years ago. 
Oh god this reminds me of me:( when I first started dating my bf, I was super shy to use the bathroom or toot or anything in front of him. Well one night I'm hanging out at his place with his friend who I had just met for the first time, and I get a stomach ache. I ended up clogging the toilet big time (I used to be really bad about the amount of tissue I used) and he didn't have a plunger. I had to leave the mess in there, tell him what happened, and then go purchase a plunger from the store. First, buying just a plunger by itself at the store is embarrassing enough, but then I had to walk through the living room where my bf and his friend are hanging out with the damn thing! Very VERY embarrassing but luckily we all had a laugh and now me and my bf have been together for almost 5 years :) 
Too many times in this world are people such as you overlooked. 
I came home from 3 months abroad having left my boyfriend to care for my pets. According to my African Grey parrot there was someone by the name Linda that did "something" very good. She also kept calling people "Fucking Shmuck " and demanding that they get her a beer. She had also master the sound of a gurgling bong and followed it with loud coughing sounds and the occasional "BOOYAH!" Sounded like he had a lot of fun. 
Hey I do that too! And I did the exact same thing, telling a girlfriend I loved her while almost asleep. I didn't realize it until the next day when she brought it up in front of her friends. I said I was drunk and didn't mean it. That relationship ended two weeks later. 
You know what's amusing, this far into the thread so far...I forgot it was "worst" secrets....I've been enjoying everything regardless. 
I've walked in on my husband watching Gilmore Girls more times than I can count. 
Aw that's adorable :) I'm happy for you dawg. 
I'd start with breaking up with her. Then go buy yourself a steak. 
That's very sad. :( My aunt and uncle got divorced because my uncle couldn't handle being married. (They were still dating, just no longer in the same house). When talking with the marriage counselor, they realized my uncle actually had severe aspergers the whole time. Once he started getting treated for it, they remarried and are pretty happy together, because now they know what's going on. Hopefully there's hope for you and him, if my aunt and uncle got things to work 
My gf hates when I oversleep on a regular basis, so she plays with my cock when I'm supposed to wake up. Jokes on her, I still oversleep every time. 
My ex told me before we married that he was disqualified from driving after drink driving. He had to retake his test. I later discovered that this wasn't true at all - he'd never even had lessons before, let alone passed his test and then been disqualified. He was such an arse that he preferred me thinking he'd got done for drunk driving, than knowing the truth - that he'd never learnt to drive. Idiot. 
Fun fact: Pearls were considered to be the most precious jewel in the world for centuries while diamonds are actually quite a common gem. Your SO has taste. 
I had a crazy ex accuse me of hitting her, which is absolutely untrue. One thing I said that immediately made her stop was that when she says that she minimizes the experience of women who have actually been abused. For some reason that really worked and she never said that again 
She might still be telling the truth. I don't want kids and I can't have them anyway. 
Going through this right now and I can't find it in me to forgive his friends for the way they treated me. I see you're speaking in past tense, may I ask what happened? 
Dude. How much has to happen before you GTFO? That will not be the last crazy shit she does. Not at all. 
I do this to my wife, if she wakes up she punches me(for waking her up not feeling her up) maybe if she went topless it would help. 
I went through hundreds of comments here and THIS is the one that made my jaw drop open. You are living a bad adult romance novel, my friend. 
He sounds fantastic. Can I borrow him for a hot sec? 
They probably interpreted it as asking, "What is the worst-kept secret your so is hiding from you?" 
If you don't break it off now, you'll get complacent and end up marrying her. You'll be married for the most miserable 10 years and she'll get alimony and child support. 
I apparently did something like this. I don't really like cuddling when I'm awake. It's hot and breathing through her hair / my face right next to her neck is uncomfortable. But apprently I used to really cling to her when I was asleep. Weird. 
Out of curiosity, why are you getting him something so thoughtful when it seems he's looking for the first opportunity for greener pasture? Obviously a relationship is much more complex than a few words, but yeah. 
I don't know why, but this idea reminded me of another post where some dude kept very slightly refilling a ketchup bottle making his gf think they had a magic infinite ketchup bottle. 
Some people get off on the manipulation. Makes them feel powerful and special in a sick way. 
Knew she had found it and had to wait longer so she would actually be surprised. 
Yes, very confusing year an a half for me. Wondering is it gonna happen now, then disappointment when it didn't. And pure elation when he finally did. 
It's not fair, is it? I always feel like we were both oak trees that grew next to each other; our roots tangled with one another. When she died, I felt like my roots were twisted and turned in many directions where her roots used to be, but now there is nothing. I hope you're doing okay. 
You're talking to an oak tree rn. I don't move an inch until I'm up for the bathroom 
Should've did him a solid and typed in a few quality porn sites so they'd pop up 
Fuck yes. Going through this right now. Bye bitch. 
Same here. Two years, wasted. Now I have to work 65+ hours a week, and that sucks. I may be tired but at least I'm infinitely happier. 
This whole inconvenience is why I hunted down and slayed all my girlfriends evil exes. 
All my friends know my account after I made a post in the league subreddit that did well. I'm willing to bet anything that they they are too lazy to stalk me. Just in case, fuck you Eddie. 
The best is when you *only* buy a plunger. Everyone knows whats waiting for you at home. 
This is hilarious but I am so sorry that happened. 
Let's not jump to conclusions, maybe he just likes Blake Lively's legs. 
Yup, definitely. Giving is fun, but it's even better if you can see the result of the appreciation. 
5d chess. He gave her a check, then after a few months they mated 
Then go get tested...for STD's. Sorry this happened to you. 
I'm very glad that autism is better understood these days. So many more tools for managing it than in past decades. My toddler is showing some red flags of autism, and we've had some speech and behavior specialists coming by to evaluate / work with him, as well as teach us how to better work with him. In just 2 months, he's started speaking (as opposed to grunting/crying), his tantrums are shorter and less frequent, and he's far better with eye contact. His improvement is just staggering. 
If you go for the book option, read 'The Curious Incident of the Dog in the Night-time'. Christopher, the protagonist, isn't explicitly stated to be on the autism spectrum in the novel itself, but he's a character who certainly demonstrates some of the traits that people with autism of Asperger syndrome may display. It's also just a very funny, moving and all-round *good* book, so it's a win-win. 
That's like giving the dog a hamburger for shitting on the carpet. 
Yeah this is heart-wrenching. If there's one thing I could change about this world, I wouldn't allow bad things to happen to good people. 
100% should be a bumper sticker if it isn't already 
Sounds like it was a reality check she needed. I think people that make those accusations have just never been called out for bring the utter assholes that they are - more people need to be aware of their behaviour. 
We had been together 5 or 6 years at that point, so a while. 
Same. My chance of a successful pregnancy (I'm told) is in the single digits, roughly 2-5%. People always presume I lament losing the option for option's sake, but I don't; I'm thrilled over it. Your SO might be the same, OP. 
This is the most baffling part of the post. He thought she'd just wake up with jizz on her and not think twice about it? 
My ex and I dated on and off. When we were off, he would ruthlessly bash me to his friends. I didn't know this. So when we got back together and I actually spent time with them, they were awful to me. Did everything they could to make sure I was uncomfortable. Later when some of them warmed up to me and realized I'm not an awful person, they kind of let it slip that the SO was who made them think that way in the first place. We broke up. Turns out it was him and not them. 
if she gets even a wiff of what's up her BC will magically fail and OP will be father to her fallback meal ticket. 
I can't wait to see the look of 'oh my god I'll actually have to start going to university to be able to support myself' face. 
That's pretty much what he said, too. He gets anxiety attacks and breathing my air (like when someone is face to face and super close) or having my hair in his face made him feel like he couldn't breathe. 
Found out too late. Painting takes time, and I can't back out now. I might just keep it and turn it into a dartboard. I am many things, but wasteful isn't one of them. 
Of course. I am so sorry this happened to you. I could only imagine what you've gone through. You are a very strong person to share this with us, and I have nothing but respect for you. 
So she smokes inside the house? Wouldn't you be able to smell it anyway? 
Same. I wake up the way I fell asleep; on my back with my arms by my side's. My SO thinks I'm a vampire. 
Just open up the gas cap, get the model number of the tracker, make a deal with an electronics guy to buy a similar one off the books. Then when you get home, replace her tracker with your tracker, open up her tracker inside your house and attach a radio to the battery so that it slowly drains energy rather than suddenly die outright to avoid suspicion. Now, she has to go get the tracker and replace it. So you stake out at your window with a good view of your car, but darken the room so she doesn't see you. And remember to have a bowl of pistachios handy. 
I should re-watch Chuck. That was a pretty fun show 
That's only legal in Toronto though. And make sure they explode into coins, so there isn't evidence of the murder. 
This is why you need to keep a tighter cutlery inventory. 
That's why a plunger is my go-to house warming gift. 
Scared the shit out of me one night. But we got a good laugh out of it the next day. 
Like a squirting orgasm while she's sitting on your face 
Thanks for making laugh really hard with that mental image. 
hey, host it by yourself! have her open the door to you holding a balloon and wearing a party hat with a cake or some other self made gift! 
Her friend: She's totally coming home on the 21st! You: It was right about then I began to suspect... 
I hope you're doing better now. Know that you seem like a awesome person! 
Sounds familiar :) Being the little spoon was better, but by far my favourite was our backs against each other. Easy breathing, feeling her warmth without being sweaty, and feeling really safe, with no-one able to sneak onto us from my behind. Expect for the fact that we were asleep, of course. 
Swap out the family members with the women he's seeing. Take all your stuff. Leave the painting hung above the bed. Halas. 
I remember doing that. also taking half an hour to open a sliding door so that it didn't make enough noise to wake anyone up. 
As a teenager I used to sneak out to smoke a joint: sometimes I'd crawl out the Attic window and sit on the roof (at night after everyone was asleep), during the day id slip outside and take a short walk to a nearbye river and sit on the bank to light up. One time a cop drive past, stopped (while I frantically put out my joint while also trying to act like I wasn't) and then started to chat me up, not sure if he saw me smoking a joint or if he was just flirting with me. Eventually he wished me a good day and left but my heart was pounding the whole time. 
It's why you have a guest cutlery set, and a secret personal set. 
Thank god I'm not the only one. It's my wedding gift for young couples as well. Although I do get odd looks when I ask the hardware store to gift wrap it. 
He didn't say anything about insertion, perhaps they are just ramming them together. 
That is when I am at my happiest. Nothing in life can top that. 
My gf grabs my hand and puts it on her when she wants to be touched. She started doing it in her sleep, the first time I thought she was awake and kept going as usual, but she woke up and was annoyed (until I explained). 
That could have been a pretty innocuous mistake, especially from a third party. 
He does that, too. He'll scoot over when I go to bed so we are touching butts. He'll face the door and I face the window. But I've woken up with his head resting on top of mine and his legs around me more than once. Edited for autocorrect fail. 
Wait, other people actually do this? Am I being had? 
I give two books, The Joy of Sex and The Joy of Cooking but I'm adding a plunger into the gift basket after reading this. 
I think she posted something on Instagram quoting Baby Got Back and people got pissed about it for some reason. 
Every fork you've had in your mouth has been a poo scoop 
My buddy did this to me so I replied "boo" and he said "boo who?" Nervously as things were no going to plan for him. "Aw are you crying because I fucked up your joke?" 
What did the mexican boy say to his father who left to the city? Ciudad 
TIL that Human Centipede is actually a form of net 
What do you call a Mexican that lost his car? Carlos 
They say at one point he supported a family of four 
You want to hear a clean joke? A man took a bath with bubbles. Want to hear the dirty joke? Bubbles is a man. 
What do you call a cow with no legs? - Ground beef. What do you call a cow with three legs? - Lean beef. What do you call a cow with two legs? - Your mother. It gets people every time 
My thesaurus arrived yesterday, but when I opened it it was blank inside. I have no words to describe how angry I am. 
What's E.T. short for? Because he's only got little legs! 
I told my friend that her eyebrows were too high on her head. She looked surprised. 
Where do generals keep their armies? In their sleevies. 
You might know, but there is a much longer version of this joke. It is my favourite joke. The reactions you get from the punchline are worth however long you make the buildup. 
What's large and grey and if fell out of a tree would kill you? A car park. 
Why do elephants paint their nuts red? So they can hide in cherry trees. What's the loudest noise in the jungle? A chipmunk eating cherries. 
This one confused me as a kid and i always retold it where the rabbit says yes. You know, because if shit doesnt stick to his fur, he doesnt make for a very good asswipe 
Two soldiers are in a tank. One looks at the other and says "GLUB GLUB GLUB" 
I once breed a bulldog and a shitzu together. I called it a bullshit. 
A boat off the coast of Germany sends an SOS, "We're sinking, we're sinking!" The coastguard responds after a few seconds, "Okaaay, vaht are you sinking about?" 
I've always heard the more subtle, "Two men walk into a bar but the third man ducks." I like the knock knock set-up though. 
What did the cannibal do after he dumped his girlfriend? Wiped. 
"We're you in the boat when the boat tipped over?" "No. I was in the water." 
Knock knock Who's there? Europe Europe who? No, YOU'RE a poo! 
Similar one: What's the difference between a buffalo and a bison? Can't wash your hands in a buffalo. 
I wonder how many people read this as "day-tah" first and got confused. Nice one~ 
What's green and has wheels? Grass. I lied about the wheels. 
*starts laughing* *puts vibrating hand through chest* 
Two cows are standing in a field First cow says, "Moooo" Second cow says, "Dang it! I was just about to say that" 
I like my women like I like my coffee: bitter and half-full of liquor. 
I remember watching this in Sesame Street. Is it Bert and Ernie? 
Oh god, I'm sorry people of reddit, I need an ELI5 D: To say sorry have a joke: I laugh three times at a joke, Once when it is told, Once when it is explained to me, Then 3 hours later when i get it 
This I like. Here's mine: How can you fit four elephants into a Mini Cooper? Two in the front, two in the back. How do you kill a blue elephant? With a blue elephant gun. How do you kill a red elephant? With a red elephant gun. How do you kill a pink elephant? You choke it 'til it's blue, and you shoot it with a blue elephant gun. How can you tell if there's an elephant in your refrigerator? Because there's tracks in the butter. How can you tell if you have two elephants in your refrigerator? You can hear them giggling. How can you tell if there are three elephants in your refrigerator? Because the door closes, but only just. How can you tell if you have four elephants in your refrigerator? Because there's a Mini Cooper parked outside. 
Nice try, German. You'll never develop your own weaponized joke. 
A snake walks into a bar. The bartender says, "How'd you do that?" 
I like to use Interrupting Starfish and then stick my spread out hand on their face. Works better in person 
Where does Napoleon keeps his armies? In his sleevies. Where does Hitler keep his armies? In Poland. 
This is the comeback I've been searching for! Now I just have to wait until the next time someone tries this on me... 
You're not supposed to get knocked up on a first date. 
What did the Indian kid say to his mother before leaving for school? Mumbai. 
I do a similar one to my roomates 4yr old. "Guess what" "What" "Chickken butt" Then he proceeds to break down laughing. Everytime. 
We are number one but the net is a human centipede 
You sure? Every Mexican I've ever known without a car has been Joaquin. 
There are a series of jokes where a hard hearing genie or stammering wisher messes up a wish. A ten-inch pianist is a common punch line. This is an anti-joke version of that, you expect the man to have messed up his last wish and ended up with an orange for a head; but really he just made a stupid wish. 
Robin Hood: My goldfish goldie? Blinkin: Eaten by the cat. Robin Hood: ...my cat? Blinkin: Choked on the goldfish. 
Fun fact, red paint is typically colored with iron oxide (rust) so it typically smells like, well, rust. 
What do you call a deer with no eyes, no legs, and no dick? - Still no fucking eye-deer. 
So a guy reading a thesaurus saunters into a bar... 
Which leg is longer on a stork? They're equally long, especially the left. So why are they so long? So it can reach the ground. 
This is how I operate too. If a funeral ever comes up in conversation - or if you pass a graveyard - ask your friends if they've heard about the new trend in the burial industry towards glass coffins. They'll say no. Tell them that it's still early stage - no one knows if they'll catch on - remains to be seen. 
I forgot to tell the wife I replaced the bed with a trampoline. She hit the roof. 
I checked the guys comment history and he said it was a sinkhole, 2km and muddy at the bottom so no sound got out. Miraclously they popped down and got the man's goat back later that afternoon. 
I don't know if they are gay or not, I never asked. 
Why did the general get kicked out of the army? For playing with his privates 
Those two jokes never fail at parties. Single handedly paved my way to the alcohol. 
One snowman turns to the other and says, "Can you smell carrots?" 
So he's going to grow up and get into one of those "France is Bacon" scenarios. 
Hi, I'd like to hear a TCP joke. Hello, would you like to hear a TCP joke? Yes, I'd like to hear a TCP joke. OK, I'll tell you a TCP joke. OK, I'll hear a TCP joke. Are you ready to hear a TCP joke? Yes, I am ready to hear a TCP joke. OK, I'm about to send the TCP joke. It will last 10 seconds, it has two characters, it does not have a setting, it ends with a punchline. OK, I'm ready to hear the TCP joke that will last 10 seconds, has two characters, does not have a setting and will end with a punchline. I'm sorry, your connection has timed out... ...Hello, would you like to hear a TCP joke? 
This one just confuses the hell out of people and it's fantastic. They start only to quickly realize their error. It's basically just a joke for you, and annoying and confusing for the other person. 
Two whales are in a bar and the first whale says: "Aooooooooooohhhhhhhhhooooooooooaaaaaaaaooooooooaaoooooooaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaoooooohhhhhhhhhhhhhhoooooooooooooooaaaaaaaaaahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhoooooooooooooooooooooooooooooaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeehhhhhhhhhhhhhooooooooooooooaaaaaaaaaaaaaa," The second whale says: "Go home Jerry, you're drunk." 
And then she leaned forward off the boat and fell into a well she hadn't seen. 
The best part about telling this is that you're free to embellish and pantomime the last guy as much as you want. 
My best friend told me his story telling a time waster joke that spanned several days. He was telling his friends the joke and started with a back story. He was simply telling his story of what happened on one day; woke up, took a bath, went on a few public transports to go to work, what he did at work, went grocery shopping after work, went home, cleaned up and changed to go to a party in the evening. Now all of those complained about having to queue up on a long line, just told events that forced him to basically. It was when he arrived at the party that he got thirsty and was looking for something to drink. He found a table containing a fruit punch bowl. He finished the joke with: "Thank goodness there was no punchline." One would need some story telling skills to keep the audience interested and, in my friend's case, ask for a continuation the next day or so. Anywho, his friends don't trust his stories anymore after that. 
Can confirm. Just tried to tell someone at work and the whole office was laughing at me, laughing. 
Hey Bert Hey Ernie Hey Bert, why you got bananas in your ears? To keep the crocodiles away from Sesame Street. But Bert, there are no crocodiles on Sesame Street. See, it works! This is how I remember it anyway. 
It's funny because it makes no sense at all. It has all the proper set up of a joke, and on the surface it seems like it could be a coherent, funny joke, but when you think about it, it makes absolutely no sense, and that confusion is the source of humor, primarily for the joke-teller when observing the puzzled look on people's faces. 
Either that or you found your mom's reddit account. 
How do you put an elephant in the refrigerator ? Open the door, put elephant inside, close the door. How do you put an giraffe in the refrigerator ? Open the door, take out elephant, put giraffe inside, close the door. The animal kingdom has a big convention, every animal must attend, who is missing ? The giraffe, it's still in the refrigerator. You want to cross a river in which deadly alligators live, who eat anyone that gets near them, how can you safely cross it ? Just swim through, the alligators are at the animal convention. 
I think something travelling at 0.36c towards you is bad for much more than your teeth. 
My son likes to say: Why did the chicken cross the road? To get to the crazy person's house. Knock knock! (Me): Who's there? The chicken! 
Judging by the size of his dick, I can probably take him. 
"guess why?" "why?" "chicken thigh" "guess who?" "who?" "chicken poo" 
What do you call two mexicans playing basketball? Juan on Juan. 
or the swimming pool of wishes were the third guy slips while diving and yells "shit!" 
One cannibal asked the other: "are you enjoying yourself?" His friend replied: " having a ball" 
Thank you for that. I can die peacefully in my sleep now. 
Whats pink and fluffy and doesnt move? Freddie Mercurys slippers. 
Because people ignored you after telling them, thus letting you drink in peace? 
Sounds like some unpublished Dr. Seuss WWII propaganda. One fish Two fish Red, white and Blue fish Make their way On up the ranks Killing Nazis From their tanks 
Do you want to hear a heartbleed joke? It will be 1,000,000 characters long 
This one works best in person when you can draw out the first whale's vocalization for an absurdly long time. 
Frappe, frappe Qui est la? Los. Los qui? YES, THAT'S WHY I'M KNOCKING 
I'll never forget my grandfathers last words... "Stop shaking the ladder you little shit!" 
My favourite variant of this starts the joke with: "There's a plane carrying a load of bricks and one fell out...waitasec, sorry, I fucked up the punchline on that one, lemme try another..." Then you continue with the above series of jokes before finishing with: "You die when you reach the other side anyway, why is this? You got hit by that brick from the plane." 
I told a variation of this joke (black knight on a black horse) to a friend at a bar once. For forty five minutes. He's still mad at me 
iDunno man, the guys with the smallest dicks have to compensate the most with muscles and big trucks and stuff. There's a reason I'm fat 
We'd usually end with "Guess where?" "Where?" "Chicken hair!" And then the kid cracks up and goes ballistic about how chickens don't have hair. 
How many Mexicans does it take to change a light bulb? Just Juan 
quick, someone get an out-of-work dataviz journalist and make a map of how this joke ends in each state, then draw spurious conclusions from it 
The bear means to ask "Do you have any issue with shit sticking to your fur?" As in "do you mind if you have shit in your fur?" The rabbit interpreted it the way you did. In case you're still confused, which you probably aren't. 
The definition of Success is in the eye of the beer holder. 
Would you like to read a thwifhsjzwufuI448_!3("?48#9&02)15(fjwod 14+28* Segmentation fault. 
Then before you tell the drunk to go home, take a really deep breath like you're about to do the noise again 
The one I tell is about a wasp, where the punch table is at his 25 year high school reunion. You get to tell the wasp's entire life story, rise from poverty to go to college, his struggle with amphetamines, triumphal graduation, navigating his 20's, falling in love, and so on. Easy to stretch this out over an hour. 
Yeah, forget the punchline, I actually like reading it as a short story. 
Why did the Mexican drive his wife off the cliff? Tequila 
I'm not a journalist and don't know anything about data visualization but I am unemployed and have Microsoft paint so I can probably do it 
I tried this and I can't stop laughing while I'm doing the long whale noise so I just look like a moron making awooga noises while laughing his ass off in between. 
Yeah, the version I always hear/tell involves him becoming an accomplished lawyer and war hero and eventually president of the United States before finally retiring and coming back to the hive. The wasp joke is so easy to expand forever. 
By the time you get to the end you're so invested you forgot you're reading a joke. 
have it on my desk by tomorrow morning and you're our new white house correspondent 
Is Sean Connery himself gilding you folks what is going on? 
Seriously. I took a toilet break halfway through and when I came back, I'd forgotten I was supposed to read a long joke, and thought I was reading another piece of internet fic. 
Great. There are at least five white houses on my street. I'll go knock on their doors and see what they have to say. 
I like the image of Sean Connery on a computer, reading this thread and going "Ha ha, good one! Have shome gold!" 
I'm with you bacon, I too was diagnosed with aspergers syndrome, well, at age 10. I know exactly where you're coming from. What I've sorta picked up on is that you have to have your own "script" to conquer social encounters. Like somebody asks what's up and I say, Man I'm rockin n rollin! Get brave, accept the fact that you'll fuck up. It's okay to get teased a little as long as you draw a line somewhere. I didn't accomplish my social awkwardness till late in highschool, but it doesn't end. Thing is, you end up being so proud of yourself that you forget your problem being a "problem". 
A friend of mine explained it to me like "Imagine you're meeting someone new and right out of the gate they dump "I got molested as a child so that's kind of like a duck in cold weather." You'd have a fearful mix of "holy shit wtf do I say now?" but also "wait, what do they actually *mean* by that?". And you get that feeling for almost every conversation, with everyone, forever. I'm not jealous. 
The therapist who diagnosed me once told me this story about how one of her patients basically thought "Why is everyone so fucking weird?" for about 17 years before he got diagnosed, because he genuinely didn't realize that _he_ might be the odd one. That's me, as well. 
I actually think that we have too much empathy. I often times get visibly upset when I feel I hurt someone. 
This really. I personally have some ADHD thrown into the mix, so the concentrating really well part is out of the window for me. Unless it's something I'm interested in doing. Like theres a,certain threshold of interest that needs to be present to start high concentration mode. 
I wish you many smiles and happy thinking :) I am glad I could make you smile. It is hard sometimes and it is scary but there are ways to make life better. Never just go "they have autism they can't do ____" Because sometimes they can and other times they may not be able to say put their socks on, but they can get the socks and ask for help to put them on. Its not the same but its better than just assuming they have no understanding of the socks. Thank you kindly for your response. 
My step daughters go to the climbing gym with a boy with autism. And last summer all the parents of his assotiation went to a mountain refuge. The mother told me that it was great because all of them were parents or children with autism, so nobody look at them weird when the kids had a meltdown or escape, they didn't have to excuse themselves or apologize for their children. It was incredibly relaxing for them 
When ever ppl ask me how i am i still want to say somewhere in the middle between great and terrible. They want you to say great 
b...but it's just a harmless case of social anxiety, r-right? 
That's accurate, and I've actually said stuff like that before. 
The Internet has been one of the best things ever for autistic people. It is so much easier to communicate through text devoid of all the body language and vocal tones... 
I don't necessarily break down, but it might take me a bit longer than normal to go to sleep. 
Of course not if its a one off thing that I know about in advance (e.g going to see family in the afternoon) then I feel nervous (pit of my stomach ish, no apatite and butterflys) for the rest of the day in the lead up (sometimes the night before too) and that stays for at least 30 mins in to going off usual and that goes depending on how conformable and relaxed I become. if it's unexpected will hit much harder and take more to relax again if it is a permanent change then for the first few times its much harder to be comfortable, I can fixate on it but it goes down over time as that becomes the new routine basically i can get comfortable over time almost as if I'm being detracted from the change but that does take a bit of work 
I was diagnosed about 15 years ago I think as a young child. I did get some help in primary school so up to 11 but after that virtually nothing. I have been getting help for Anxiety and at the moment I want to get that well and truly sorted as I know how dangerous that can get Thanks for the advice, you're too kind! 
If it makes you feel any better, I am quite capable of socializing but have found that people generally suck and have chosen to stay at home much more often doing computer things and crafts. IMO you both seem normal to me. 
I should probably see a therapist, then. I recognise myself in more than a few of the answers given in this thread. This one in particular triggered a few slighlty uncomfortable emotions. 
I have huge trouble telling someone they've made a mistake. I've let people go calling me by the wrong name, or I change the subject in conversation, because the idea of making someone feel bad for making an error is intolerable. That one's a bugger to get around. It was worse as a teenager, I was once frozen to the spot for 3 minutes outside a teacher's door because knocking would interrupt them. Never mind that I had to see them and that they were expecting it, it might slightly inconvenience them and it would be my fault. I'm glad that stage is mostly over with. 
I'm similar but didn't realise for a long long time, it's totally possible to have sympathy without empathy which i have. I couldn't previously tell the difference until i spent probably 3 hours discussing the distinction with someone who was simply curious. 
Ok so I see the same thing in my sister and her problem is that she doesn't include the necessary context to get her joke or what she's talking about sometimes. Just to give an example, during her diagnosis of autism a lot of new terms for what autism is were being invented and one had the acronym of A.S.S. (In the Netherlands here, so the acronyms were made out of Dutch words and ass isn't a Dutch word). So my family joked about how if you had autism you were an ass. My sister explained to a guest one time that she has autism, and joked about how she's an ass. The guest was confused because he didn't know about the acronym, and it never occurred to my sister that most people wouldn't know that. Do you think you have trouble determining what details you need to and don't need to include when talking with someone? 
I have a cat, she is my friend too. She is very friendly. I was afraid of contact too but I was able to gain a volunteer to take me to library and through that I have become a bit more able with contact. If there is an organisation with you nearby, they may have a volunteer program it may help. Things are much better now I am older than when I was younger. Maybe you can try once again one day soon? :) Happy thinking to you. Best smiles. 
Thank you kindly for your nice words :) I like to help people and if this can help then I help. Its very different from my usual lego reddit postings :) 
Hello, I am glad you feel lucky sometimes. That is a nice feeling. I was also very distressed by crying and screaming babies. However I have changed how I am now. Sometimes it is hard.But other times I feel okay if I can ask the parents questions. "Why is the baby crying" "will it be okay" I love babies but it can be hard to understand some sounds they make and express. I am sorry your best friend is misleading, that is sad. I am glad my friends are not misleading. 
I walk in circles a lot too. My flapping is only when I am really happy and excited. Hehe when I got gilded in this I got excited and my arms went everywhere and I giggles. I guess happy feelings make that happen. And excited. 
I wish so much with all my heart they made a playground big enough for me to play in also. Some things like the slides and climbing and ropes I can do, but then there are small tubes to crawl through that I can't fit and my 8 year old friends wishes I did. So yes I wish there were spaces for all different kinds of needs and wants! Especially sensory and play spaces. 
Social groups, being invited to something. I never experienced an invitation to anything till I was older. Even if I don't want to go the feeling of being included is the best feeling ever. Like my friend she had a party just for me. She invited 3 people to play board games and they chose board games that I was able to understand. It was the first party I had ever been to. I was 25. Jobs and basic skills are okay, but if you don't feel like you belong or don't feel like anyone wants to be around you. Then it can be scary and sad. My friend invited me to the board game night with an actual invitation it said Time: Place: What to bring: it made it structured and it was the best adventure I ever had because it was my first real social adventure. So I think Planned Inclusion. 
:) I am very bad at messaging people first, they often have to message me. I love messages. Thank you kindly for your kind words. 
I hope this is a good thing. I am unsure by your post. 
I do this too, but I learned its okay to say. Can I talk about something else now? And that has helped a lot. I hope you are doing very good and lots of happy things are your way. I think you are brave. 
I am unsure of the term emotional Levels, can you explain what you mean so I can better answer the question. 
People should just stop (ignoring the problem of) bullying alltogether. I don't want to tell all the people I meet "please be extra kind to me because..." (= code for i-am-officially-offlimits-for-bullying). I have nothing to contribute, I'll shut up now. 
When he was 2, I used to defend him to strangers and their rude comments. I quickly stopped doing that because I didn't want him to hear me use the word autistic for the first time. When he got older (he's 5 now) and figured out he was a little different, we discussed how he felt and went from there. I've always told him how special his is and how it's okay to be different. I've also learnt to ignore strangers, I don't want their negative energy to affect my happy, bubbly child. It's been a long learning curve and everyday their is something we have to face. But that's life. He learns things like a sponge, and like you he goes through phases of interest. I'm really thrilled this was thread this morning and that I got to read all of the comments so far. You gave me a light of hope that one day my little cutie will be able to converse with strangers (anyone outside of his comfort zone) Thank you again, and many happy smiles to you! :) 
That's human nature. That's never going to change. 
Oh, whoops, I should've specified; it hadn't closed permanently, just for the night. But that was enough to derail the standard chain of events. But there was a restaurant here that was replaced, and caused kind of the same effect mentally. My parents are retired, and I'm the youngest and not out of school so I still live with them, but also go with them on their outings they couldn't do before. One of these involved going to a silver service restaurant. This had been my first experience with one of those, and it was really good. We'd been there twice before now, and it was really good, high quality food. Upon arriving here yesterday, we found it was replaced by some Italian place with a massively reduced menu. I knew it was this place because I recognised the layout of the tables and chairs, not even joking. 
To the best of my knowledge (cannot claim to be a mental health professional), Autism is a spectrum disorder. In order to diagnose it, they have somewhat of a checklist. I think it was if you meet five or more items on the checklist, the line is crossed and then it's time to establish where you sit on said spectrum. It's not just being quirky or slightly awkward, it's also difficulty processing and expressing emotion, the sensory issues, and some people may even be nonverbal until rather late. I just explained how it affects me, it could be totally different to the next commenter :) 
Come to Europe, where I had better days is an acceptable answer 
Just say "nothing much". Most people will take that. 
I thought it was like a coder's term of endearment. Like: I'm with you sweetie. I'm with you, bacon. I think I'm going to do this now. 
I think they have many symptoms in common. I don't have ASD, but I do have social anxiety, and I scored 153 out of 180 on a Asperger's test (an online one though, you can take it on the Aspie subreddit) 
That and you have time to think through what you want to say. Or at least that's the case with me as an aspie. It's not weird on the internet if it takes 2-3 minutes to respond to a tweet or comment, but it's definitely weird if you do that in real life. 
Yeah, I'm just upvoting and nodding. I wish I could explain that well how I felt 
It is also easier to run through something you've written and revise it after a minute or two. Ask someone a question in person and you expect a predictable kind of answer within 2 seconds, and there's no room for proofreading. 
It's more accurate sure but most people don't understand computer scripts either... 
Reading this thread, I'm starting to wonder if I'm autistic. 
That's interesting. I used to feel like that, but to a much lesser degree. I'm not autistic, just was a very nervous kid. I'd get very nervous about something I had to do later in the day or week and totally work myself up about it so I felt stressed and miserable. As I got older I just managed to be more in tune with my feelings and when I felt that way I'd be able to stop and think, wait, why do I feel this way? Some stresses I eventually just cut out of my life and others I learned weren't as bad as I thought. Hang in there, hopefully it'll get better. 
A lot has changed in 15 years with therapy, I am 28. Therapy now is much different to when I was younger. Even just 10 years ago. Much has changed. I wish you many smiles and happy thinking. Just if you want to change, there maybe a way you can get help and not have to do it alone. 
Just remember that no matter what the doctor tells you, you're the same person you've always been - you just may have a name to some of your behaviors. 
I've always thought I might be on the Asperger's spectrum but this thread feels like it's confirming it for me. I have so many of these idiosyncrasies and I feel like they really have held me back from being as successful as I could have been. This topic is a bit of a mind blown moment for me. 
Wow, I had never heard of hyperempathy before. My son is autistic and can't watch movies because he gets too stressed and upset whenever something bad happens. We can't watch Peppa Pig because her brother George cries a lot and it drives him crazy. 
I can't watch sports personally because they show the sad people who lost. It hits me too hard. My friends think it's too funny how I can't enjoy my team's win because someone else got hurt because of it. 
This is exactly it. Former employee was on the spectrum. As soon as he was aware that everyone else lacked the context that existed in his head, workplace interactions smoothed over dramatically. 
My thing is complicated by CSA and three rapes and the resulting ptsd. I'm getting treatment and hopefully will become desensitised enough to finally take my dog out for walks. That's my only goal so far. I'm still too scared to think about interacting with humans face to face. Even this reddit thing is giving me heart palpitations so I'm probably going to stop fairly soon. Thank you for the happy thinking :) 
I wish we could nominate you to mod an autism related subreddit. I wish I could pay you to help me better understand my kids and be a better mom. 
I'm not sure if it's true, but I've heard that the sound of a crying/screaming baby hits on a primal instinct in humans. I've got 4 kids (1 who's Autistic, actually, which caused me to read this thread) and when they were babies, the sound of what I'd consider maximum crying intensity was unbearable. It was panic inducing, like that panic you feel when you're about to vomit - you feel absolutely compelled to fix it immediately. But sometimes, you can't get a baby to stop crying (or at least not quickly) so you just have to live with the panic knowing you can't fix it. So my thought is that maybe the feeling we all get from a crying baby is similar to how you may feel from other sounds. 
I haven't been diagnosed with autism but I absolutely understand the hand flapping. I do it when I'm really happy or excited; it's like the happiness is electricity and I have to channel it through my hands to process it properly. 
Thank you for that, I'm going to remember this and use it for the future! :) 
You seem like an incredibly nice and genuine person. It's amazing to me that you are so positive. I am going to be more positive today and try to pass along the happy smiles and happy thinking! 
I think he's trying to say that you're a strong fighter & You should be proud of yourself. I agree with him :) 
He's expressing what I think we're all feeling. Your writing has a way of bringing a very personal feel to a problem that seems very distant to us. For me, it's very interesting to hear something that I can't comprehend described in a way that lets me understand it, especially since I majored in psychology. It's like learning about astrophysics, eventually you read an explanation that just makes sense to you. Thank you for giving that explanation. You genuinely seem like a caring person. I'm sorry society stigmatizes mental illness so much. No one should ever be afraid of you or nervous around you. 
In my first semester I took a creative writing class because I enjoy writing fiction. Early in the class, the professor gave us a bunch of weird, modernist poetry and told us to interpret it. Since the class was open to all majors, there were a lot of STEM folks in there who were completely confused by the text. The professor then said, "That's okay. There's a trick to decoding these," and described what I did above, along with more about that "how soon or late the word appears" part. I took another literature class the next semester and noticed that the top-scoring example essay in the syllabus did pretty much the same thing, even though the passage was from a famous letter instead of a poem. From that point on I applied it to every form of writing they gave me, and the feedback stayed positive. 
I had a hard time at first, but the older I get, the easier it is to just tell people. I made a new friend recently who just totally gets it and I feel comfortable saying to her "I struggle to accept compliments, but what you've just said is very nice and I appreciate it, but am also uncomfortable now." AND SHE JUST DROPS IT! Or she asks me if I've read a thing and I tell her "my tastes are very specific and I only know three people who have never let me down. I get resentful of wasting my time on things I don't enjoy, and sometimes that bleeds over to the person who recommended it, even if I wish it wouldn't." And she thanked me (sincerely) for bluntly explaining to her and no longer does it. She will answer if I ask her opinion, but has not volunteered again. It is so refreshing to have someone that isn't on the spectrum grasp how to effectively be my friend without making me feel like it's work. 
I call it information saturation. Eventually you reach a point that you have the majority of the functional and required information about a given topic. As there is nothing really new or enticing to learn the obsession fades into another topic until its saturation point. Rinse and repeat. The reason I find for not regaining interest is the same effect as when you sit down and read an entire book series. You can be completely enthralled and finish the series quickly. But when the next book comes out the rush to read it is not like it was when you read the second/third books. 
It's an acceptable answer everywhere. Lots of folks just don't want to dive any deeper. 
I'm coming up on 40 years old in a few months. I feel like I have learned enough of those things, that I can now pass for completely normal. I've got a wife, I got a place, I keep my bills paid, I haven't had to move in over 4 years which is a new record for me. At worst, people think of me as an under achiever. Nobody has any ideas. It can be done, but it does take time. A lot of time. 
I don't know if this is common for aspies, but I definitely am someone who can be incredibly articulate and intelligent if given time to form a statement. In public social situations I usually just say what comes to mind, because in the time it would take to formulate an articulate statement the conversation has already moved on. On the internet or through text I have time to think about these things 
I mean I think they get the basic if this then this. If they don't you could say "logic trees" 
Autism is a spectrum disorder. It's very likely many people have one or more symptoms but would still not cross the threshold for diagnosis. 
I find that if I take care of things right away I have no stress and accept things the way they are. Most of the time I procrastinate and the anxiety just builds and builds. Then when I deal with it, it wasn't a big deal at all. I take a simple issue and blow it up into a potentially life changing event, it will keep me awake for days or weeks. I've never been diagnosed with anything except ADHD. I'm 45 and it's gotten worse with age. I have really good days and days that I think the world is ending. Some days I can be totally confident and have no worries. Other days I fear everything, those days I feel like I'm the only one in the world who sees things like me. It's really disheartening and lonely. I don't know what's wrong with me, I've been to multiple doctors and therapists. I've tried what they recommend and it's hit and miss. All I know it's a very stressful way to live. 
Thank you so much, I wish you many good times as well 
Somehow this is really comforting. Thank you so much :) 
Where it gets real fun is that Introversion/extroversion aren't binary. I'm a natural introvert with an extroverted personality so hanging out with friends is a lot like hiking up a mountain; it's fun but when it's over I am *spent.* 
I share the majority of these symptoms (hyperempathy, fear of doing something wrong, "outlandish" social behavior, etc.) and have been diagnosed with a personality and stress disorder. I would definitely seek help if it's something that really affects your daily life. 
George drives me crazy, too! Im glad my kids are out of that phase. 
I have to say I'm so glad I don't have to shop for my groceries like that. I hate going to the supermarket enough without having it full of people shouting and arguing over every price. I'd pay double (probably do!) to avoid all that hecticness. 
Asymmetrical perspective is the corner stone of the human condition. 
Just wanted add a little something to this. My kids are like this but are not autistic. They assume because all their friends know all the memes, then everyone must know the meme and the meaning behind that meme. Reddit is like that too. 
Thank you, thank you for existing. Please know that everything you do, did and will do with your friend, makes ALL the difference for him or her. And I just wanted to tell you to please rock on. You are forever in my heart and thoughts. 
I did not like change when younger! It would have been impossible so many things I do now. Small steps! 
Sometimes people just like to touch everything really cool. You know when I was younger I was told, never swear. Swearing is bad. So I have only said two curse words in my life. So seeing someone able to curse like you just did, in my head your like a super rough good guy in a movie, like John Mcclain from Die Hard :) ! Keep being awesome! 
I am unsure what CSA means but I am sorry for these things happening to you. But it sounds like things maybe not related to just having autism but by things that autism has made worse that have happened to you. I think you are brave and strong. If reddit is making you uneasy it is okay to not use reddit. :) 
The happiness is trying to come out from inside :) That what I say. 
:) Thank you kindly for putting value in my words, they would just be words if you didn't like them. Now they are liked words :) Its an upgrade like in a video game. 
Lots of happy thinking and happy smiles for you to pass from me to you! Happy thinking smiley day sounds like a nice day. 
:) Thank you kindly. I am not sure if a strong fighter. But I try to be brave. 
Yes, difficult. But! Also joy. I was sick recently. My 8 year old friend and her mother took me to the doctor. Afterwards when back at my home, she put a blanket on me and kissed my cheek to help me get better faster. I think that was a joy, even though being sick was hard. It is like that, there are some bad things and then good things and so not all of it is hard, just some. Like dressing I need help to do, but patting my cat I can do myself. Typing on the computer I can do, but tidying my house is hard because I am unsure what is useful and what goes where. A mix. 
Thank you, I am glad you found my writing very useful. Many happy smiles to you too!! 
Check out r/aspergirls! The symptoms of HFA/Asperger's syndrome are pretty different in women, I was surprised to see just how different. 
yea I don't know where people get "great" being the only acceptable answer. I hear "tired" like 3 times as much 
But you are surely better than in another 40 years! 
Congratulations. I am nearly the same age and in a similar position. Everything is so much easier now that I've learned how to cope with my limitations. To the outsider it looks like underachieving, but every day of peace and happiness is an achievement for me. 
I want to think I treat everyone with dignity, patience, and respect. But apparently I don't sometimes. What do people do that make you feel that way? 
My husband gets soooo annoyed with my son because he has a hard time differentiating attitude and autism. One time he told my son to "wipe the table". So my kid took a towel and did one swipe right down the middle. Hubby couldn't understand that he LITERALLY did what was asked. Aspie kids benefit from having everything explained in detail the first few times out. 
I'm on the spectrum too and I agree wholeheartedly, communicating through text is FAR superior to actually speaking with someone. 
And now we've literally got a bunch of autists sitting around breaking down the options of how to address this specific hypothetical social situation. Been there many times myself, friends. 
Possible. Here's why I'm wondering about myself: I have SEVERE social anxiety, especially at work. I can barely mumble out two words to co-workers. It's 100x worse around my supervisor. I am CONSTANTLY evaluating and reevaluating social interactions in my head. If I know a social interaction is coming (even a small two sentence exchange), my anxiety shoots through the roof, and I play out every conversational possibility in my head. I am constantly afraid that I will be reprimanded or even terminated at work. To be clear, I work at a good place, moving up, and turning in high quality product. I have zero reason to feel this way. I am very detached from my emotions, and they tend to hit me after the fact, if they do at all. I am very closed off, even with significant other(s). If I'm around a lot of people, I feel the need to get out and get out now. This doesn't happen all the time, but it does happen fairly regularly. 
Interesting. I was listening to NPR last night and they were talking about Autism. One of the thoughts was that the brain is essentially processing too many signals at once. I found it fascinating to listen to. If you're curious: Radio lab is the show. This thread has been quite enlightened to read. Thanks! 
You're welcome! I had a long time when I would say things like "I'm focused because I'm autistic" or "I'm smart because I'm autistic" and eventually I switched to "I'm focused because I'm train-of-thot" and that made all the difference in both allowing myself to feel great about my good qualities and taking responsibility for the rough edges. 
Holy shit, you can be a mix of both? This just answered a lot of confusion I tend to have about my inconsistency in my dealings with people. 
As an introvert I'm completely fine talking to strangers if there is an external non-personal purpose in the interaction. Serving tables implies one. I'm 26 and as I grew older I learned to make small talk/talk to people when there is no inherent purpose, but it's never enjoyable and drains mental energy. 
I relate to this.. if I see someone in a public setting, I don't want the conversation to last more than a few sentences of small talk. I'm always looking for a way to hint to the person that I want them to leave.. 
The ol' shit sandwich! Compliment-Critique-Compliment 
Who do you see though? I honestly feel the same way. I experience a lot of the same issues and get some pretty severe social anxiety at times. So much that I can't think about anything else when it's on my mind. 
I feel like because of this, the average Westerner is TERRIBLE at negotiation. Like, if you were from Asia, Africa, the Middle East or Latin America, difficult negotiations are just a part of life. My friend from Kenya managed to get a Sony store employee to sell him the DISPLAY TELEVISION THEY USED IN THE STORE for 50% the asking price. It was dope. 
Heck even my non autistic brain does this. Wife: I had to get gas on the way home, boy it's expensive Me thinking 'gas is expensive, what if it was really farts that were expensive, and you had to get charged for them... hmm, government would probably tax farts too, such greedy assholes Me out loud: governments shouldn't tax farts!!! 
it got a lot better already luckily :) And I also learned to recognize when I am opposed to something just because it's different and my autism has difficulty handling it, I manage to take a step back and re evaluate. 
Touching cool stuff is cool be it a wall, a leaf, a strangers awesome hair (ok maybe not this last one) totally with you on that. Only two?! That's commendable, no idea how you managed. I'm a tiny mid-20's woman with the mouth of a sailor, it's fun and apparently makes me sound like John Mcclain, which is fantastic. Yes I will and you keep being your damn awesome self too, you brave, unusual soup. 
child sexual assault. Autism is definitely complicating the PTSD and its treatment, and as I'm a female with autism that means there's less knowledge/awareness of how it manifests vs how it typically does with males. 
Oh my god, I've been reading your messages now, and this one made me laugh and cry at the same time. I never made that connection before! 
Please know that all of the upvotes are each a person who is sitting somewhere appreciating you. The rest of the day may be difficult and problems may develop, but just as sure as all of this, know that a lot of people out there approve of you. Keep this knowledge somewhere safe within yourself and check in on it regularly. 
I'm not autistic and I don't know what's useful and what's not when cleaning house. Haha! But in all seriousness, that's a reallwy great perspective to have. Finding joy in the everyday things. 
........................................That is correct 
Congratulations from someone who gets it. Lord knows those are few and far between. 
Because autism is invisible I'm expected to have the same social prowess of everyone else. Breaking down this wall would go a long way to supporting autists and inducting them into normal society. 
Hahahaha. I wish I could meet you all IRL so we could have hours of these pointless arguments. I love it but no one else will entertain it 
100% sounds like social anxiety not autism. I think you're good. Minus the crippling social anxiety of course :/ One thing I found helpful in dealing with mine is to actually force myself into situations where I have to speak to people. Socialisation needs to be practised. 
It, like many things, is a spectrum. Nobody is a pure introvert / extrovert amd you can easily borrow traits from both steriotypes. The main effect of introvert vs extrovert is if social interaction drains your energy or if you get tired of being alone. Both things happen to near everyone just in different amounts. I love being around people: am a good public speaker, like social activities and generally am ok with people. But if I am not careful too much interaction leaves me tired, get a headache, become irritated with everything without reason and just want to be at home playing Civ or whatnot. 
Thank you. I'm so tired of people using the "introvert" label to explain away their shitty behavior. I read a thread in here a few months back about this guy getting all pissed off because his sister's fiance kept trying to hang out with him and he didn't want to. Eventually the guy lost his shit and told the guy to fuck off because he was "an introvert, wtf did they expect?" And then was the giant circle jerk until introvert might as well have meant "someone who might be self-centered, irrational, egotistical, narcissistic, selfish, arrogant, rude, socially awkward, quiet, shy, timid, autistic, have aspergers, have PTSD, or anxiety, or any combination of the above. Oh, and they also like to stay at home." Being an introvert is not an excuse to be a jerk to people. If you're a jerk to people and like to stay home reading then you're an introverted jerk. They're not related. 
Had a boss once that was the absolute master of the shit sandwich. He could get his point across - criticism - while still allowing you to feel good about yourself. 
As someone who has the same kind of problem and tried this way of handling it... It only made things worse lol The thing is starting with something like "I don't mean to be critical ..." was usualy just enough to upset them, no matter what was following... Now I'm not from the US and there's quite a lot of differences in culture and communication from here I guess. 
That's pretty much my dads go to. I don't think he's ever bought a "big" electronic that wasn't a display model. He's worked in sales for about 35 years though so stuff like that is just second nature. 
I would not say several at once, maybe one or two at a time before moving onto more things. Yes your adventures I hope are full of smiles too. I am glad you are so kind to your friend, it is a very good thing. 
I have a published children's book :) I love to write. 
I am a girl :) I do not know if I manage it, but more, others help me manage. When the support is in place lots can happen. I hope this makes sense. Like before I could talk people had to guess my needs. With therapy and support and care I became able to talk. With talking I was able to express my needs, then they were able to take that further and help me better myself more. Independence as much as possible is the goal for anyone with any disability. 
I write poetry, stories, mostly for Children, sometimes just what I am feeling or finding hard. I have one published childrens book available on Amazon. 
That is wonderful and you are very amazing for working that out! I hope you make many more steps in the future forever! 
:) Thank you for kind words, You keep being awesome action hero too! 
I am also a female with Autism. There is not less knowledge or awareness always, it depends on the people who are trying to support you and what experience they have. 
Glad to know I'm not alone. That is a beautiful statement. 
I patted her for you. She likes rubbing her head on things. So I also let her rub her head on my hand for you too! 
Thanks for kind words! I am just glad that they are helpful. 
Today when I visited my neighbour, she has an 11 month old baby. She was feeding her. She let me with my shaky and unsteady hands, feed the baby a spoonful of food. The baby smiles at me. It was the best part of my day. Funny too, sometimes the worst part of my days have nothing to do with the things that make me life hard like autism and that. Instead today the worst part of my day was going to the store to look at new televisions as mine broke and I am sad as it was my company in the quiet. And finding out they are so expensive and I cannot afford a whole new television I can only pay for 3/4 of a television. So I guess maybe sometimes some of the hard things seem not as big as some of the other things that come. 
I've seen comments, know i had a good reply, and still waited ~30 min To think it over..... 
It sounds insulting, but I mean it in an endearing way when I say that this reminds me of when you set off a few Siris to talk to each other. 
This. I get social anxiety and I look like a weirdo(when talking, been told I'm physically attractive). What I started to do was forcing myself to be more talkative in class, whether if it's around my classmates or I started asking more questions to the professor so the spotlight is on me-forcing myself to continue being coherent with the professor and to learn to be confident in my own voice. That and I'm 27 at a community college. So maybe I'm giving less fucks? 
I guess in the context of electronics, sure. But in general, prices, in most retail settings, are non-negotiable in North America. Whether you're buying TVs or bananas or Hanes underwear, typically you just pay the asking price. If you don't like the price, you don't buy it. From what I understand, the way it is in Nairobi, EVERYTHING is negotiable. I guess, considering most of the world has haggling as an aspect of daily life, we're the weird ones in North America. 
4chan is very high functioning when they want to be. 4chan needs to be challenged though, else it sits there in the dark jerking itself off. At least when we jerk off the lights are on and we have some decent materiel to fap to. 
I'm loving all this information. Have you thought about doing an AMA? 
I've always been curious when I see someone able to type so well but had/has difficulties with speaking - would you mind elaborating on your experience with the two? Were you fine with writing/typing even at the time when you could not speak? Or did both abilities kind of evolve together? 
That is great!! And by the way, I've noticed many comments are about lego...So why do you like them so much? :) 
You're awesome! It's really made my day reading your comments, you seem lovely. I've really liked learning about you! Good luck with your adventures and your writing! Feel free to message me if you ever want another friend!! :) 
When you wrote that your arms went everywhere and you giggled, it was a perfect description of experiencing joy. I think almost everyone who read that ended up smiling, because for a moment they could feel a little how you felt. 
Thanks, I'm glad! Sometimes I watch my grandmothers cat for her, his name is Mio. He also likes rubbing his head on things. He is very skittish and afraid of new people, but if you're gentle and give him time he really warms up to you. We also have a cat in our house whose name is Panter, the Norwegian word for panther. He is more feral and only allows you to pet him if he comes to you - if you reach out to him, he will avoid your hand. He's a bit of a jerk, but when he feels like it he's very cuddly as well :) 
Do you have a PayPal account? I would like to contribute to your TV fund. If you or your parents or someone who helps you has a post office box I could send it to you that way. 
I type out comments and then delete them before they're ever posted you're lucky I had the courage for this one Now if you'll excuse me I'm going back into the corner. 
27 at a community college....thank you for your service. I'm 22 and the thought of being around 18 year olds scares the fuck out of me 
They both evolve together. Starting with PECS and other kinds of communication. I really like words. Now I can talk. I still use PECS as well as AAC with ipad and type/write. My abilities to get thoughts exactly right with writing is nice. With talking, It can take a few mistakes. Though sometimes I miss small words as I think in pictures. "The" "and" "but" because those are not significant in my brain. Yesterday I sent a text to someone it said "I had the longest ever" and I meant longest nap. but my brain skipped over nap because in my head I was still laying in bed and so my brain jumped that word. Its very strange and I do not understand it. 
Not OP, but a person who has worked with many children with Autism for over 15 years, plus has a brother with Autism. What kind of AAC does she use? Typing only, or does she use a picture/ symbol based one as well? There are a lot of different systems and devices that use pictures/ symbols that might be easier for her. You can get programs for iPads too, which might be more accessible/ affordable. I haven't worked with speech paths for several years now so I don't know any current ones to suggest, but there are many out there. For a lot of people with autism, they think in pictures, like OP said, and this method of communicating may be easier. It doesn't limit her to basic requests or really simple sentences, but can be used to put together fairly complex thoughts. Your daughter may find something like that easier than typing. Best of luck to both of you. 
You have wonderful adventures too! And you find lots of smiles ! :)! 
Good, everyone should be happy! I like that feeling. 
I second this. I was diagnosed as being on the Autistic spectrum when I was young and although I live a full life on my own, I feel like I know a tiny bit of that battle and would like to help. 
Yes! And they let you stare at them and never get angry about it! 
It's really not that bad. Most of the younger crowd like to stick with each other and they just assume I'm an old fart(I look older than my age). It's when they start talking to me that they find out I have a lot in common with the majority(not out of touch with trends and up to date news). It's also a bonus that professors tend to respect older students and I usually find myself in being a group leader position for group assignments since they tend to think I know what I'm doing (faking it 'till I make it). 
Maybe you'd be surprised to hear this, but this is pretty normal. Most people have done it. On Reddit, the proper response to it is, "I think you out a word." 
UnusualSoup you sound like a really cool person I hope we meet oneday! 
Oh I understand now, I thought you meant to say it wasn't the case. The doctor that does the home visits seems knowledgeable but my support worker isn't. They know more about the anxiety. They want me to get better enough to leave the house and then attend some meetings of kind with other autistic people, but did say it was all men so I don't think I want to, because they frighten me. My support worker once mentioned she thought about it and if more autistic females were properly diagnosed then it would be easier for me to find all female groups to go to. 
When my daughter was young, I modeled behavior for her; movietime was one. She learned to laugh when I did and I would explain concepts that I thought were confusing her. Now, she's the one explaining plots to me when I become confused, and I laugh when she does. It's ironic the role reversal, but she's becoming my teacher. I suspect you are something of a teacher now. Thank you for your words here. It's a wonderful opportunity for people to see past labels. 
I've been reading a bunch of the comments on this post for the last hour or so, and yours was the first one to actually hit a heart string and bring tears to my eyes. So here I am, a damn near 26 year old man on the subway with tears in my eyes. She sounds like my mom, and I can't imagine what my life will be like when her time comes. I'm truly sorry to hear about your loss man. 
My dad, when in the ICU a couple of years ago, spent about five straight minutes gasping for air just to tell me that he'd had an ultrasound and my mother needed to be informed he wasn't pregnant. I honestly thought he was going to say he wasn't going to make it. I love that Glaswegian arsehole. 
Similar story from another point of view: my uncle has 2 children. Legally, his son is his, although he's not his bio dad. When he later re-married, his wife already had a daughter, and he decided he'd raise her as his own, especially since her father was out of the picture. For years, even though he was really happy with his family, he wanted to actually father a child of his own, but it never happened. He tried for years to find a way to adopt my cousin, but she has a father and it just never happened either. My cousin, when she was in her teens, decided to change last names and take my uncle's, because he's the only father she's ever known, even though his name is not on her birth certificate. My uncle says this was worth a 1,000 I love you's because she also chose him to be her father. He compares it to a sort of marriage because they both said "yes" to each other. That day was the last day he regretted not having a child of his own. 
Parents actually owning up to their mistakes and saying sorry is really important for a child 
That is beautiful. Thank you for sharing. It's so important to be kind with everyone around us. Even those we don't know 
Fuck I need to hear this more often NOW. Wish it was said when i was younger. 
I love your cooking story. I cooked my first ever dinner for my uncle (basically my dad). It was soooo bad. I couldn't eat it. He ate a whole plate without a fuss or eye roll. Why? He said that I cared enough to cook for him and he was grateful for the food I provided. He didn't expect everything to be perfect. I felt this huge rush of gratitude for him. Honestly it's probably the time I felt most loved and accepted, mistakes and all. And, 30 years later, I'm a kick-ass cook. 
That's funny. My mom fled El Salvador because of the political turmoil. Whenever I was bad, she told me she would send me to El Salvador to work in the coffee bean farm with my cousins. 
Words to live by. It's far too easy to get caught up in shallow pursuits like material possessions- your father was a good man for sharing that with you. Thanks for sharing it with us 
The moment you discover your parents hypocrisy can be devastating 
I mean, I think that's what my dogs do, too, so maybe it's just genetic memory? 
I remember doing this once too but because of my brother's advice. He sent me a card with cab money my first week at college asking me to never drink and drive and that he'd refill that money any time I needed more. One night we went out and my car was at my friend's house. Got dropped off and drove around the cul-de-sac and realized I had no business driving. Especially 20 mins across town. So I stopped and turned the car off and got in the back seat and slept there til the morning. I realize I probably still could have received a DUI (isn't there laws about sleeping in a car drunk and still getting one?) but it was easily the best decision I could make at the time. I'm convinced that night would have turned out much worse if I would have tried to drive home. 
"The only way to make money at a casino is to work there." ~ My uncle to me when I was a kid 
My older sister was always beautiful. Head cheerleader, lots of friends. When she went away to college, people would stop me in the grocery store to ask about her and tell me how gorgeous she was. It made me hate myself. A few years ago, when I was 25 or so, it finally occurred to me that maybe my sister had been jealous of me too. I was the smart one. Nobody even ever bothered to ask her what she thought about anything. So one night we got drunk and I asked her if she ever felt bad because I was the "smart one," and she answered "of course! Everyone was always going on about how bright you were. It made me crazy." 
My parents took the opposite approach. I saved and saved and bought an $80 Lego set. My parents thought I was nuts, but it was money that I had earned and I knew what I wanted, so they let me get it. I came home, put the set together as quickly as I could, stared at it, and cried. That shit was not worth $80. Lesson learned. 
Right about when my hormones started kicking in at age 11, I started crying because my mom told me the splinter in my finger might get loose and travel to my brain. I wasn't upset over that fear but rather that my mom could be so insensitive about such a dire situation and let me go to bed with this in my finger. Hormones are, like, so weird. 
I had a dream where someone said that coins are not real money and I can spend them on coffee without feeling shame. 
My mother was debating whether to get a brand new car or a second hand one. I said to her, it's probably going to be the last car you get so it should be brand new so you can enjoy it and rely on it. She's 71. But still, pretty stupid of me to needlessly remind her of her mortality. *kicks self* 
My wife and I, after 18 years of marriage, still say 'I love you' every time one of us even just runs to the store. Just for this reason. 
It's crazy that in thousands of years, people might view our scientists how we view Aristotle, and wonder how we missed so much 
My uncle (married in in case people become confused) was a kid and then a teenager in a war that utterly ruined his homeland and from what I know now kept him from any normal childhood. As an adult he has, as long as anyone knows been the most patient, kind and just generally nice man In the family. My younger brother once asked him about it and war in general. All my uncle said was "Please never find out." We had never heard him sound sad or upset before. I think that shaped half of my younger brothers life, because he went from wanting to be soldier to going to study human rights in a year. 
She told me the same thing two years ago, at 22, when I was already financially assisting her. She even cursed my future children too. Now she's wondering why I act differently with her. 
I feel you. I was my parents glorified live in maid. One evening as mom was making dinner, after I spent most of my day cleaning the house, I told her I spent all day cleaning and "could you not mess up the kitchen?" She said to me "well you can clean again then." So it is no surprise that shortly after I moved out that their living situation deteriorated to squalor. 
I preach this at work all the time (I work in a factory). I always tell people there's never anything so important that you can't stop and think about what's happening. I tell them that because there was a time that I didn't. I let my emotion get the best of me, I didn't let myself stop and think, and I directly caused someone to get injured and lost my job because of it. It works in so many ways in so many situations. Stop and think about the situation for a minute. 
Wow, your Dad was a dick. I'm so sorry you didn't get a good Dad, this really says something about who he is not who you are, but I know that doesn't make it better. I hope you have good people in your life now. 
Aw man, my heart is so full reading this. I'm glad that you had a dad who was paying attention even though it might not have seemed like it. Sorry for your loss, sounds like he was a good guy. 
My wedding ring is understated with 3 small sapphires set in white gold. There are some small diamonds around it, but they're not what you notice. You know who compliments my ring the most? Ladies with huge diamonds. When we were picking out rings, I got the one I liked. I'm the one that has to wear it all the time, anyway. :) 
when my dad found out he told me that im a fucking idiot. you bet that helped me a lot -.- 
Well now this is just the sweetest thing. I bet he's even prouder of you now :) 
Don't be sorry. Just appreciate the hell out of them. Parents like yours aren't a given 
That's a fucking awful thing to say to your child. Someone will love you, never give up hope. 
I am gay and had a father like that. We have been estranged for more than a decade. But when you realise you are gay, a sentence like that from someone you love stays with you forever. 
As a mother whose children have grown up and moved out, it absolutely thrills me like nothing else to have one of them walk through the door. You gave her the best final gift she could ever hope to receive. I am sorry for your loss :( 
I love this. You're on the same team. It is frustrating when I hear my friends argue with their spouses, trying to "win" the argument because they "lost" the last one. In an argument with your spouse, you both lose or you both win. You're on the same team. I like the way your dad differentiated the language, it's succinct and perfect. Thanks for sharing! 
My uncle told me I was tone deaf when I was ten. I never tried to sing 'properly' again. 
I know exactly what you mean, my mother doesn't give a shit about anything I'm interested in... Sometimes I just wanna talk to someone about something I like and I try and mention it at dinner or something and all I get is 'we don't care'. Really puts a dent in my self confidence... 
If your mother really said that then she is a bad mother 
I feel your pain. I used to get called fat by the other kids, but I never believed it until my mom called me fat one day. She did a number on me. Told me I should lose weight but never go on a diet because diets were for vain bitches. I also had to eat everything on my plate and was punished if I didn't. She also explained constantly that I should eat whatever I want because my body will naturally crave whatever it needs. She also made fun of me whenever I tried to participate in a sport and would tell me how horrible I was at it. I weigh 350 lbs now. Hate sports with a passion and alternate between hating to eat and gorging myself. 
I share this in that I had above average intelligence levels up to about 13. Then I just became average. My parents are to this day convinced I'm some super genius who's going to change the world. I wanted to do Computer Science but my mom told me I'd be "wasting my intelligence" and refused to pay for me to go to college if I did it. I feel so average that I doubt I'm going to get into her approved choice (Law), which will lead to her ultimate disappointment. My life since I stopped being in the top 0.8%, she's made excuses for me, saying "you were sick that week" for mediocre test results, or "I guess you were just tired". There's no excuse in her mind for me dropping in ranking. I have my personal opinions as to why it happened, but her inability to accept that her little girl isn't a budding rocket scientist has led to my "I'm not good enough" complex. 
A similar thing happened between my mum and I when I told her I was pregnant at 19. I overheard her saying to my dad that "maybe nature would take it's course". Her and I are so close and she was very upset when she found out. That really hurt me but 3.5 years later my mum and my little girl are the best of friends. I know she was upset, worried and scared for me so I forgive her for saying it but it hurt a lot at the time. 
Replying to you because my mom said similar things to me growing up. My mom used to try a lot of diets that don't work, and she would get extremely frustrated about not losing weight and being hungry all the time (mind you, she's not a heavy woman. Women in my family are pretty curvy but certainly not to an unhealthy degree in most cases). When I was probably 7 years old or so, I was scared and upset by her outbursts so I asked her why she ate like that if it made her so unhappy. She told me "I eat like this for your sake, because someday when you start dating boys, they'll look at me and know that I'm what you'll look like in 30 years. If I'm fat then they won't want you anymore." She even got my dad involved, and he agreed that when he started dating her that the way my grandmother looked was important to him. Now they get frustrated with me for being self conscious about my weight. 
When I was 5 or 6, my dad told me that spaghetti meatballs are made with eye balls. I'm 28 now, so obviously I know meatballs don't contain eyes, but I still have a hard time eating them. 
This is so wholesome. I hope that you get to take your mum on a lovely adventure someday soon! 
She truly was. As for her advice, I try to treat others as best I can, but trying to not be my father is becoming more difficult everyday. Maybe it's just that I constantly remind myself to not be him, but no matter what, I am going to treat my kids far better than he did. I have a whole speel of shit he's done that has affected my siblings and I, but it has nothing to do with this thread. 
That whole movie fucked me up. He was so content with everything. 
That's funny! Im adopted and I'm from El Salvador! 
It was said in anger. It was never addressed once tempers had cooled down. And it was said many times. Every parent says or does things in anger that they regret later - people make mistakes. But if you really didn't mean it then you should talk about it, explain you don't really feel that way, and apologize. Otherwise your child won't have a reason not to accept what you said in anger as the truth. 
That's beautiful. What an touching way to memorialize your bond with your daughter. I hope good memories like this help you deal with her passing. I'm so sorry. 
Yes. Joey does a dramatic reading of the book as a present for Emma's (Rachel and Ross' daughter) first birthday. It was an impromptu present because he hadn't gotten her anything but it made everyone cry. 
Uber should advertise gift cards for young college students. 
I used to work at a gas station amd I had to suggestive sell shit, so I always just mentioned the scratch tickets because they were easy. One guy I did that to said, "Nah man, I never buy those things. Why would I buy back my own money?" Not my dad, but that stuck with me. 
I hope you returned the thought your had on her beauty. 
I know that feeling. When I was a kid, my dad and step-mom used to say that I was selfish and punish me whenever I didn't react exactly like they wanted or basically grovel in gratefulness for tiny things they did. Now that I'm an adult, I can attribute it to their own insecurities, but I have issues with asking for help and guilt for needing anything to this day. 
When i was like 9 years old my grandpa jokingly said that grandma's food once made him poop so much his intestines came out and had to be pushed back in. I didn't poo for 3 days because i was afraid of it happening to me :( 
Gaslighting is one of the craziest forms of abusive, to me. The old black and white movie about it is pretty intense, even for a movie that old. People can be very cruel. 
I had an ex who used to put his change in his grocery bags and throw them away. Thankfully he stopped doing that when we started dating. 
My friend... at that age most people have already come to terms with their mortality. Don't feel bad about what you said. 
Watch, he's going to love another good 20 years with that attitude. 
Thank you, I am! I was kicked out at 18 and although it was one of the worst times of my life, it was honestly the best thing that could have happened to me. Honestly my life is good and I save a lot of money on Christmases and for mothers/fathers day too! 
That's awesome. I forgot to say it to my dad when I left the hospital room, and that was the last time I saw him conscious. Still messes me up to this day 
I kicked my mom out of my house a month before she died. She was living rent free, calling my boss during work when I wouldn't answer my cell phone, told her friends and my brother I wasnt feeding her and stealing her money, would literally shit everywhere and not clean up, would tell my wife how she hopes I end up dead, and more. She didn't have a mental issue but instead was just pissed at life and, as always, thought she should have stuff handed to her. Yea, not sorry and I told the person she was living with when she passed to effect of when the twit started guilt tripping me. 
Have you told them this? I would want to know if I ever said anything so hurtful as a parent 
I am still amazed that most adults don't call each other names and yell over small mistakes. And people who do that to children don't do that to adults. No wonder I wasn't excited to grow up. I thought life was just adults yelling at each other but you weren't allowed to cry. 
No one looks at Aristotle with that kind of contempt these days though. Aristotle was a genius with the information he had. Had he had the information you or I have, he would have still been a genius. The human race progresses by building on the findings of the previous generation (a logical model Aristotle actually recognized and cheered). Aristotle was wrong about many thinks, but he was wrong correctly, and hats what is key. No one should look at Our scientists who are working logically, methodically, and openly and criticize when they've made a logical conclusion that was wrong. That's ridiculous. 
I've tried, over the years to talk to her but I just can't. The hurt and rage is too much. Twelve years ago I went full no contact. And before you ask, I'm in therapy, but I still can not bring myself to talk about this with my therapist. 
I visited for the first (and last) time in almost two years last month. They had a large family gathering and didn't have a single clean towel or dish cloth. I can't even. 
That sucks. What happened when you left for college? 
The one-plate thing is a great idea! One of the best things I ever learned was to run a sink full of soapy water and wash as I cook. When I'm finished, I don't have a pile of greasy pans/bowls/silverware to clean. 
Yeah, the mom was the only one who thought that was a good thing to say. 
God damn that reminds me of the mutherfucker so-called "family psychiatrist". All I ever wanted to do was read in peace. I would do my chores, bathrooms, kitchen, trash, and I had to cook. But for some reason my younger sister would never leave me alone, it was either stealing or breaking my stuff. It was of course always my fault for responding to my little sister. So our "therapist" told my dear mom that if we kept fighting, to kick me out of the house. Great shit to hear when you are in 7th grade. Asshole also told my mother that when she was going to punish me, don't talk to me about it, don't discuss it, because he told her I would win. Yea great fucking fun. 
Had this same thing with my roommates for the past year. Evnetually got all my silverware, plates, bowls, etc. And locked them in a cabinet and only I had the key. I never left anything of mine dirty so then I truly could say they were the awful slobs that made the apartment smell since none of it was mine. 
My sister-in-law has said this to me about her younger son. Her first son is very well-behaved. Polite, easy-going, soft-spoken, etc...but the younger one is stubborn, *loud*, and very hard-headed. They could not be more different. 
I know this feeling. I normally need a while to fume and be left alone because I don't like getting explosive angry. On the other hand, I developed a serious anxiety about confronting people about things because the first time I talked back to my former roommate (because i came home to find him being an angry asshole), he tried to kick me out. Like flat out just wanted me gone. This had been a guy I had known for years and had been very close to so I'm still just... trying to deal with that, but there are many niggling "What ifs" all the time. 
Oh, hell yeah - nobody is going to hand you a happily ever after. You gotta wake up and decide to stay. Every. Damned. Day. 
We have a "Take 5 for safety" rule at work that is our gospel. I pissed off my slob coworkers last Thursday when I said "hey let's take five and clean up all these trip hazards." These guys are perfectly fine working in a shithole but I (famously) refuse to. They felt I was taking advantage of the safety rule to impose my agenda of cleanliness upon them. We cleaned it all up and kept it clean but the entire time they pouted like grade schoolers. 
Oh, I agree with you on the Paralysis by Analysis bit - I've lived that. Once you have all the information you need, make a decision and let the chips fall where they may. My dad was speaking about sales pressure - the "OMG, you have to buy this/sign this right now or you'll miss out!" kind of pressure. I've found that the same applies to sales and fears. "We have to do something right now!" is usually a sign of trickery. Why can't I wait until I have more information? 
Same situation. Always make me livid whenever I stumble upon threads like these with people who lost their amazing dad. And I'm here like... and this piece of shit is still alive. Some people deserve life so much more. 
I'm in my 20's and the thought of calling my mom a bitch *still* scares me. Not because of my dad, because of my mom. She's the nicest person in the world but Jesus, moms can be scary when they want to be. 
I'd be a liar if I said I didn't cry writing it. You have my sincere hope (which isn't worth much) that the other relationships in your life are filled with love and respect. 
I think that's also a problem with the school system. It doesn't challenge those who are able to pick up the content faster. Instead it leads to them being bored or thinking themselves superior. 
It wasn't that violent, but when I was a kid, my mother and I watched a TV show where the parent of a gay teen joined PFLAG and my mom turned to me and said "I hope you're not gay because I would never join PFLAG and hang out with those people." It's one of many little derogatory comments that she now insists she never said and I just made up. 
I don't think most dads that do this type of crap understand the effect on their straight sons too. Stipulations to love? Not love. 
Agree with this! Also, on the rare occasions that they are all home at the same time, I sleep better knowing that, for the moment, everyone is safe. It's hard when your heart is out walking around in the world, out of reach. 
It's not the last thing you said that matters, it's the sum of all the times you told her you loved her during your life that does. 
Yeah, it's not 'you vs them', it's you and them vs the problem 
When I was 12 we got a Table Tennis... Table for our house. My dad isn't usually one great with words or praise, but he tried. I was playing some Table Tennis with him and I was getting better at the game, returning shots properly. At one point I managed to smash the ball on a hit he thought he'd got me on, and he looks at me with a smile and said the most genuine 'WOW' I've ever heard. It might sound stupid but I felt so great with just that one word - it's my favourite memory. 
Am engineer. Step-sister is fighter pilot. Thanksgiving is awesome. Do what you want or you'll never be happy! 
"I love all my children equally." Five minutes later: "I don't care for GOB." I think his mom is Lucille Bluth. 
I was always told to finish my plate. Then once she realized I was past the point of being chubby for a growing kid , it turned into just eat the meat it costs the most. Now it's, "You want to lose weight, just eat less!" later followed by "I buy all this food and no one eats it" I love my mother, but holy hell, she likes to ruin everything that makes me happy...can't wait to move out. 
In what universe is pursuing computer science "wasting intelligence"? 
My parents connected their credit card to my uber my senior year (which was when it came out) and have since been paying it. This is exactly their logic. "Doesn't cost us much and virtually guarantees you won't drive drunk." 
"The lottery is a tax for people who are bad at math." 
Not just that but her popularity and people's concern for her still even after she left. 
Be proud of her. Stop giving a shit about what others think. Be your own person and find something that makes you happy. 
Are you talking about the one where someone convinces this woman she committed a murder that she didn't commit or something? I have vague memories of some fucked up black and white movie but cant remember anything about it. I think its involves chickens or something at one point? 
Look at this fatcat wasting perfectly good calories walking to where there's sunlight 
Wtf why? By change I hope you mean just pennies. I'm not even sure the right word for that strange behavior. 
"Can't you tell that bill is fake? That's not even paper!" - a really dumb friend 
Yup. My grandparents are reminding the whole family of their mortality. While difficult, I think it helps ease us into the more difficult emotional waters. They will die sometime. Who knows when? But they're 82, they're going to die eventually. My father isn't taking it well, though. He's beginning to examine his mortality at 53, which in my opinion is pretty early. But each person has their own grieving process. 
I like your name, all I can think about is my cat cursing me out in cat speak 24/7. 
My condolences. I am sure he knew, but I feel for you. We can never know what comes next, so don't tear yourself up too much. All we can do is try show those around us that we care for them. 
Hey man, don't listen to the other reply. Children shouldn't have to take care of their shitty parents and it seems like you were compromising your mental and emotional health in order to care for her. Don't feel guilty. 
My husband gets that shit said to him by his mother all the time. The fucking bitch will deny it and refuse to apologize. 
My mom worked juvenile corrections for a while. She's a tiny lady, 5' nothin' and barely 120 pounds. She was one of the officers that was always respectful, and it paid off. There were multiple times she had to jump in to break up a fight alone. She always said the boys would fight around and over her, and would go out of their way to make sure not to hit her even when she was literally in the middle of it. She also said a new kid tried to pull some stupid shit on her once, and the others put him in his place before it got out of hand. There's value in being decent and respectful to everyone, even those "beneath" you. 
"If I have seen further than others, it is by standing upon the shoulders of giants." 
That's like how my roommates live. Sad that adults live like that 
My brother calls and basically complains about all the stuff I complained about as a kid. So its like listening to my younger self. I don't feel bad for him cuz he's was always apart of the problem. I finished college in December of 2016 and over the course of 4 and a half years I've went home probably no more than 5 times. The first time I got jumped/tag teamed by them. And she's come to visit me once and I only live 3hrs away in the same state. She only came cuz my grandma harped on it. There's a lot of filler I don't want to bore anyone with but basically the damage is done and I don't ever see us being close or friendly. 
My kids are teenagers and I try to teach them how to cook a new meal once or twice a month. I always stress this as one of the most important parts of cooking. So much more relaxing to enjoy our meals knowing there isn't a pile waiting for me. I had a family member living with me for awhile and her leaving out her crusty plates and pans was the most stressful thing about her living there. 
My mom used to say that my older brother was a pretty normal toddler to raise. He had to be told "no" two or three tines for it to sink in. I was a perfect angel (I made up for it later) and only needed telling once. My little sister needed 50+ times. My mom used to say that she was really glad she had us in the order she did, because if she had had me first she would have been completely blindsided by my siblings and if she'd had my sister first she would have thought she was a terrible mother. 
I'm so sorry, friend, that's a totally shitty thing he did. Did you make up? But also prefacing confrontations with "I" and "to me it feels like" statements helps so that other people don't feel attacked. 
Yeah, how dare you take advantage of safety regulations? What are you trying to do, not get people killed? 
This makes me think of the office episode where Dwight buys Andy's car for a cheap price because he "sales pressures" him or whatever 
I get a feeling all people in this thread who dared to call their mom a bitch were all white people. I can't even imagine an Asian or a black person dreaming of doing it. 
"Don't be gay" "But don't hang around girls" ??? 
My mom just randomly blurted out during a family drive "the worst thing you could ever do to me is be gay" I was 14 and hella in the closet at the time. It's still got me fucked up now, a decade later. 
It is! You spend so much time making sure they are safe, and then you have no idea what they are doing or if it is safe. I know their jobs are not safe. Each little text means so much more than what it actually says. Pay attention adult children of reddit...talk to your mom, even if it is just a text to say "Hey." 
I'm not the guy you replied to but thank you. I kinda needed this after this thread. 
My mother is of the opinion that the only career you get from computer science is being that IT person who everyone calls when their computers are broken. Me wanting to work for Google was insane and crazy to her (and, considering where google is located, she may have just not wanted me to be far away from her) 
next conversation:" You know sprout, you sure Uber a lot." 
Exactly, not all popularity is well-earned but being genuinely likable and personable is a talent. 
How old is she? When I was a kid, there was something about feeling the bills and coins in my hands that made the concept of bartering more real. Even having tokens or something in a kid's possessions that represents money could help them understand the nature of it. 
This woman marries a guy who murdered her aunt. He gaslights her to basically take the heat off him while he searches for the aunt's jewelry. One of the ways he does this is by flickering the gaslights in the house and making her think she's the only one to see it, hence the term gaslight. It's a super good movie! Ingrid Bergman, Charles Boyer and Angela Lansbury are all in it. It holds up very well. 
Fun fact: American cash isn't made of paper either. It's a blended fabric composed of cotton and linen. That's why you can put it through the wash without destroying it. 
I'm pretty sure that just what they actually do, interspaced with demands of food or pets. 
Your mother in law sounds like my mother in law. My wife's mother was always really, really mean to her, talking down to her, etc. Finally the wife said "No more, until you can get over yourself" and broke off all contact for a few years. But this all reminds me of a joke: Two cannibals are sitting around the fire. One of them says "My mother in law is making me sick". The other one says "Well try the potatoes then." 
Exactly, took years of therapy to understand that these types of people don't have the ability to understand they have hurt you. Everything is a battle that they must win, even against their own children. 
I just moved into an apartment with friends and they're just like that. Within two days of me getting fed up and cleaning all their stuff for them while I cleaned mine too, the *entire* kitchen area is filthy and festering to the brim with all their dirty dishes and things. Wtf! How hard is it to clean up after yourself? 
From my own experience, the Norman Rockwell nuclear family ideal is great to ponder about, but for some of us the healthiest thing for family is distance. If you're happier without them, don't let them drag you back down into their unhappiness. Stay strong friend. 
When my grandma had her first child (my mom), she thought she was the best mom. When people talked about their children misbehaving, she thought if they were her kids they would be perfect. Then she had my uncle. All 14+ of my grandma's siblings had 4+ kids, but my grandma stopped at 2. 
You realize how terrible a salesman Andy is for not recognizing that tactic. 
_The astronomer is here._ ... _You may all be seated._ 
Yea i know, that was me all my life, but sorry Im really sleepy and I should've been more clear haha, I was only allowed to hang around a girl if I liked her. 
You guys made me tear up and now I'm really excited to visit home for a week. 
Haha good joke. Your MIL sounds like my mom! I'm currently ghosting her trying to cut contact. Unfortunately we're stuck being in contact with my husband's mom until we move. 
Yup, I'm not going to tell them how to live since I'm only subleasing the place for the summer and have no prior relationship with any of them. But whenever you move into a new place with friends or whatever, have the cleaning expectations laid out. I would never expect a perfectly clean place, but I also shouldn't have to work around other people's messes just to make breakfast. 
The funny thing is that the salesmen I've known have been the most susceptible to sales pitches (though not necessarily the high pressure ones.) Maybe they just appreciate a good pitch so they buy the product? 
Well, here are your options: you can sell it for parts, drive it off a cliff... you can donate it to a person that you'd like to see die in a car crash, or, you can sell it to me, and I'll use it as I would a wagon on my farm. It will be towed by a donkey. 
Can confirm. Even if I don't end up purchasing or upgrading said item(s), I'll say "amazing job" to them. If I decide to do it I say "great job, you got me!" I appreciate a good pitch. 
Approve the loans for risky men with something good inside 
Is that why my husband randomly started peeing in the sink? Goddammit 
Fucking Christ. Reminds me of another story where some guy on a forum supposedly posted a way to make some crystals - that turned out to be highly toxic and hospitalised a few people, with a couple of deaths. Could just be a myth for all I know, but it's scary. 
I remember that post so well too because I read a line that was like "The police don't have the thousands of minds working on this like we do." and just thought "I'm not sure that is how things work." then sure enough a day or so later they caught a guy and was harassing his family before any actual proof. 
I think I remember seeing something similar, but a girl planned to go to Europe with her best friend, the mom, and her new boyfriend. Last minute the girls parents decide she can't go, and the girls best friend and mom is never heard from again, although they promised to call as soon as they landed. 
That's total bull though. Guy claimed to have fought at Normandy despite being 13 at the time. My grandfather joined up at 15 and that was a stretch in itself. There are tons of inconsistencies in this whole story. It just seems like a sophomoric creepypasta type deal. 
I believe the only information they got right was that there was in fact a bombing. 
Similar to this: the guy on 4chan who messed with a handgrenade and flushed it down the toilet. The next day there were news articles about an explosion in someones apartment that originated from the pipework and im pretty sure someone died. Either it was him or the grenade made his way through the pipes and killed his neighbor or something 
20th largest website on earth. Yeah, it has baggage with it. 
Reddit is actually trash. Every post related to a woman being raped gets two kinds of replies: Doubt and "Men can be raped too!!". Redditors are trash. 
I remember this. It was in a semi bad area, looked shady from the outside, and the staff refused to talk with the guy investigating. So he decided it was a drug front or something. IIRC it turned out to be a legit day care. 
That sounds like the saddest short story ever written. 
I came here to say the Ask a Rapist thread, that was the most disgusting and deplorable thing I have ever seen here. 
Explanation for others: dude posts a long series of stories about how he discovers his wife cheating on him, turns out it was all fake. 
Power users are a plague on websites like Reddit and it's a good thing that he's gone. When a guy comments on a subreddit and is getting upvoted to the top no matter what he says, it's not healthy for Reddit. 
My day isn't a day until I talk about a cumbox, or vaginal bacon 
This was a big enough fuck up that it was written into an episode of the HBO show Newsroom. 
Never knew the full story about Victoria. She was literally the only admin *everyone* loved and was absolutely fantastic at her job. 
I naturally assume incest whenever it can go either way,but I think it's about canabalism 
As someone with a severe birth defect that happens to affect my arm this doesn't seem as likely to me as the kid thinking he was born without it but not asking. With my condition (cavernous Lymphangioma - don't google if squeamish) I thought I knew everything there was to know about my arm. My parents and I never had certain conversations because we all thought I knew everything. Turns out - nope! For example my arm/hand is severely swollen and I thought it had always been like that. Turns out the swelling was a complication from surgery. I got mad thinking my parents had lied to me but it was my child brain processing and forgetting things. I obviously don't know the poster what he posted so I'm only speaking of my experience with a similar type of situation. 
Yeah I'm having a good out-loud chuckle at this one. 
Yeah that was good old 4chan. IIRC the instructions were to soak pennies in a mixture of bleach and acetone, then to blow on them to "speed up the reaction". It creates toxic gas, like mustard gas or chlorine or some shit, and leaning in to blow on the mixture just encourages you to inhale it. At least one person had to go to the hospital over it. 
Yeah and his last post says "Fuck this world" and the one before that pretty much says he's going to kill himself. I wonder if he's okay. 
Sounds like the type of person that thinks 9 women working together can deliver a baby in one month. 
After the Boston Bombing Reddit decided it could help by having thousands of people look through whatever videos/pictures it could in hope of helping the FBI figure out who was responsible. It turns out thousands of people who don't really know what they are doing are not as good as professionals with years of training in a certain area. Innocent people ended up on the front page of newspapers. What's worse is the FBI knew who did it very quickly and because of the reddit interference they had to release the names sooner than they would have liked. 
As much of a clusterfuck as that one was I can't help but feel that he gets shit on unecessarily, because everything in that thread made it seem like he was genuinely only told that it was a PR event for Rampart by his agent/people who arranged it to be just that, not counting on the fact that reddit wouldn't play ball. Whoever handles PR fucked up bigtime and it seems to me like he just got caught in the middle. 
I thought it was a microwaved grenade? That might have been a different one though, I don't know. 
One time the lead dev for COD bo2 I think changed it so that it was harder to get trick shots. Then had to get a body guard as people were telling him what his 5 year old son was wearing during the day and harassing him. 
I feel like I only ever see "men get raped / are victims of DV too" when it's in the context of derailing a conversation about women. It makes me sad because I feel like the people who keep bringing that stuff up aren't doing it because they really care about the issues men face, they just want to exploit that suffering to shut down women. 
They drag their feet. Write down names and numbers, call and leave a voicemail to the number that called, then go away. They don't watch out for you, they can't. They act as if they'll find this person today when in reality it could be weeks before they even do. I told them where a person was, they asked the landlord "Does this person live here?" and when they said no, because they didn't know the crackheads living there were sheltering like 4 other people for a few dollars so they could all get high...they dropped it and didn't look into or even watch that place. 
It did. It was ridiculous. They didn't want to talk to him because he was harassing a daycare. 
You don't have the full story. The kid did not just apologize for not getting views or anything. Someone else (likely from reddit) ripped all of his videos and monetized the videos and reuploaded them. The kid was heartbroken to find someone else stealing all his work, calling it their own, and making money from it. The kid said he was going to take down his channel and stop producing content. But he didn't, he had a good night to think about it and calm down etc, so he took down the 'bye' video and uploaded an apology video for his behavior. Now he's still making videos I think. But the real conflict was with him getting views, someone trying to steal those views for dollars, and the kid being reasonably upset by this. 
Exactly, how would someone assume that someone taking photos of their tv, purse or watch have foul intentions. You are SUPPOSED to hide photos for insurance reason, because if someone comes in and robs you and steals the camera, you now have no photos. Clearly a robber isn't going to look under a kitchen sink for anything of value. People try to read too deep into things. She never posted again, because she probably said; "Honey, why is there a camera under the sink?" "For insurance" "O, ok" 
I believe it's been quarantined and not banned yet 
i'm still angry about one of the guys in there talking about how he had made friends with the cops at his college so that it would help him get away with shit a little easier. 
How did reddit fall for that? He wrote, "she came over for some kisses" and even better " touch his penis, but only a little" lol 
Yeah, a lot of people there are actually fucking crazy. 
No, it's more like cancer. Herpes implies that they are getting laid. 
"if an incel cured cancer nobody would care but instead of curing cancer i spend my whole day playing videogames and bitching on reddit" 
Site wide witch hunt, threats being sent to the wrong families, kid reddit thought was the bomber later found dead in a river. 
Considering how massive of a fuck up that was, it's still not mentioned enough when people start getting ideas of vigilantism on this site. 
You should naturally assume incest whenever it's on Reddit. 
She just had to prove how stupid and gullible everyone on the Internet is for her "social experiment" and then gloat about it on other subreddits. She posted in r/TwoXChromosomes for crying out loud, not someplace like r/TIFU. I mean there people are going to give you the benefit of the doubt and try to help you out, instead of trying to prove you wrong; it's meant to be a haven. 
Dead or alive, i think its safe to say he is not ok. 
To be fair, in the movie it's her mother hiding the letters from her, when she actually would have wanted them. 
My dad had a social worker in the 70s who raped him, he was in the Brighton area when it happened. Then over 20 years later the same social worker showed up at my parents flat just after I was born. Needless to say my parents didn't allow the social services anywhere near me. 
I thought it was fake? The verification picture was proven to be fake 
Sadly, I think there may have been two grenade incidents. 
I think it was a gas explosion (water heater leakage) 
It's amazing to see.. people will become absolutely outraged over something but no matter how bad it is, the hype dies off in a day or so. Unless someone responds. The thing that everyone claims is "all they want" triggers a shitstorm of unrivalled proportion. And then they bitch that the developers never engaged with the community over contentious issues. 
You are absolutely correct in feeling like that. For the most part on reddit, male rights and advocating for male victims of assault and rape only seems to be brought up as a counter for female victims, rather than as an issue in it's own right. It's disgusting for all parties and degrades victims of all genders. 
Ah yes, the ultimate proof for conspiracy-minded folks. 
I was one of the ones who subbed to that kid. This breaks my heart. What kind of asshole steals videos from a little kid? 
This person's been reading too much Chuck Palahniuk 
Seriously, what do people think happened? This isn't a bad Lifetime movie. 
So, uh, what exactly was it? Just pictures of dead girls? 
The PI that had a live feed, etc. overall a pretty fun weekend. 
But like, why would they go there and post there? Everyone knows it as that rapey place, so why would anyone think "oh cool, I'll hang out there and post"? 
Purging a system is what a lot of people did during the fappening. 
Who cares about comment karma when you get so much gold! 
I am so incredibly happy that you have overcome this. Well done for turning your life around and I send a million virtual hugs. 
Ya I was on /b/ yesterday and 3 posts in was a video of a guy attempting to rape a woman sun bathing. The guy himself was taping it 
Based on his submission history, he submitted a post to r/me_irl saying he'd get the top post from the following day tatooed on his ass if he got X upvotes. He got the upvotes, posted the next day to remind everyone that that day's post would go on his ass, then posted the *next* day to call everyone who believed he'd actually do it idiots. 
It makes people question if ANY post is truth. (especially in safe haven subs) 
No shit? Knowing not to mix ammonia and bleach should really be taught in school. 
Agreed. This is the best one I've seen in here so far for the topic. 
It was confirmed by his Twitter account, so it was very likely his agent running the whole thing. 
I think there's been more than 2 grenade incidents. 
The lack of evidence only strengthens their conviction. 
I feel like I'm one of the few people it still watch his videos regularly. I showed it to my younger brother and me and him watch them together all the time. 
The lemon battery didn't feel strong at all, especially in comparison to the TV outlet, but it still tingled enough that I could get aroused. And yeah, now I'm aware of how strong electrical outlets are, and I consider myself to be really lucky i didn't get seriously hurt. I didn't do THAT again at any point after the camping trip. I know that my story is very unusual and I don't blame you or anyone else from thinking I just made it up. I'll be able to give you the closest thing to proof I have in a few days when I go home. At my parents' for Christmas right now and I didn't exactly think it prudent to bring my sex toys. 
Seem to remember he was also having "steak outs" as well! Overall it was like a text based drama series and I was totally hooked 
They literally believe that all women are whores, and owe them sex. They also say that "because sex is a tool for women and they can have it any time they want, men can't be raped." The place is filled with the saddest angriest, most delusional type of people 
Beyond that, it's easier to stand up against child abuse than it is against the potential for one to arrange your murder at any time. It seems like protesting a hitman website is exactly how you would end up on a hitlist. 
I wonder if they even told him what a Reddit AMA was, or if he just didn't give a fuck and gave the go-ahead for a PR guy to do it. 
Oh great, now you're telling me grenade incidents are on the rise too? 
Conspiracy theorist dies and goes to Heaven. At the gates he meets God and asks: "God, who shot JRK?" "Lee Harvey Oswald did." God says. "Jesus Christ the conspiracy goes even higher up then I thought." 
They put it on the person looking for evidence to show evidence it's NOT true. That's how their thought process works. 
But the story continues. While the Mom and Son are living together without the dad (he was the one who moved out), the Mom has to take the Son to the hospital because the Dog bit him... in the crotch area. Mom realizes the Dad was telling the truth and calls him, he goes and picks up the Dog. Dog is now safe living with the dad. 
We have summoned him! All power to you. Do what you want, man . 
It says a lot that the stickied post at the top of the sub, which gives more good advice than the rest of the sub combined, is supposed to be sarcastic 
When you make it good for business for hitmen to kill you, you're gonna have a bad time. 
Last comment he made about it, 203 days ago. "It was directly related to my wife thinking I was the one who sodomized the dog. We are on decent terms but I feel that she still thinks I did it. She still thinks our son is the golden child. Of Course I love him too, but I know the truth about what he did to Colby. We only speak now when it concerns our son, otherwise we dont talk, which I'm fine with. She also harbors resentment toward the dog, which is beyond me. " I hope somebody else opens their eyes for that messed up kid and reports him. Needs to be institutionalised. 
Is this why the apps are BaconReader and Narwhal, respectively? 
Except it would be raspberried by the bike seat. "ppppppppffffffffFFFFFFFFTTTTTTtttttttrr" 
It's already really weird to watch a live recording of the beatles. Why go to a fucking concert if all you're gonna do is shriek? 
Here's the catch, in this world when a man gets aroused his dick begins singing, "Hello my baby, hello my honey, hello my ragtime gal." 
What on earth are you doing at your local library? 
There's an alternative universe where this happens. There's a Reddit thread in that universe asking how life would change if vaginas bled every month. It's heavily downvoted and everyone thinks the guy who posted it is really weird. 
Let's get down to business! To defeat the Huns Did they send me whistlers, when I asked for sons? 
Alright ladies hit the showers. *Wwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwweeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee 
Oh joy. Thousands of screaming 13 year old girls with whistling pussies. 
#JUST BECAUSE IT'S TEA TIME DOESN'T MEAN IT'S D TIME. 
I don't think he would question it, he'd just automatically assume he's dropping panties. And everyone else would be telling him "grow up, it's just your tinnitus." 
Try whistling with your lips together. It would sound like the campfire scene in Blazing Saddles 
Nah, tea pots were clearly invented after the human vagina had been around for a while, so Britain would be the most disgusting and vile country there is when it comes to hardcore perversion. Like, Amsterdam and Bangkok rolled into one, dipped into 4chan's furry board and neatly wrapped into the used underpants of a Japanese schoolgirl, and that in country form. Why else would an entire nation get together, at a designated time, every day, regardless of age, to listen to some contraption make sounds like an aroused woman and then all share into the often yellowish liquid it producers? Like, c'mon, Britain. We're all ashamed and disgusted over here. 
Even worse would be calling her while you're at work and just hear intense whistling in the backround. 
Or maybe a slide whistle sound and then when he goes flaccid again, it's a slide whistle going down 
English women would have it made. Just like men blame farts on the dog women could blame their audible arousals on the kettle. 
Even the Beatles was pissed off in the end because they could not even hear themselves play. 
Medical school would be a lot different! Gynecologists would have to do their major at a conservatorium! 
Man: Doctor, my dick sings when I get a boner! Doc: Prove it. Dick: ribbit 
"The kettle isn't on, dear" "Then wha- *oh my fucking god mom*" 
"WHY DO YOU WHISTLE EVERYTIME YOU SEE THE MAILMAN??" 
Ew. This just made me realize the tonality of the whistle would probably change with age too. 
My sexiness is like a germ. If you get to close to it, it will affect you. 
They think he's a misogynist who wants to see women suffer. 
So they can play major chords with their vaginas? Can they get together and form a band using nothing but their lady bits? What would their band name be called? 
The infamous and gross "like a hotdog down a hallway" would change to "like a barge in the fog." 
I would just carry a whistle around at all times, hiding in the shadows next to a busy street, blowing it at random times during the day 
Imagine the sound of 600 slide-whistle orchestras all competing to play *Flight of the Bumblebee* at 350BPM. 
Huh. This thread is quite funny, but if we were seriously discussing this, then there would be substantial impacts from women being unable (or a lot less able) to fake arousal. I imagine strip clubs, to use your example, would be a lot less entertaining if you knew the performers weren't actually into it. 
I could legitimately imagine this as a Anti-Rape poster in this alternate world. 
Don't get me wrong, I'm a straight dude, and can say without apprehension "yea that (insert movie star dudes name) is a pretty damn good looking guy", but Channing Tatum is one goofy looking fucker. Describing him as a tater tot is pretty close actually. I don't get the appeal either. 
Agreed that I just focused on Western culture, and very specifically American history (which is my specialty). I can't really state what would happen elsewhere. However I'd be curious to hear what culture you think whistling vaginas would lead to advanced technology? ((we're all in way too deep but if we pretend it's normal maybe no one will judge us)) 
Yeah, I find it interesting to think about how primal tribes would have reacted. Like maybe women would have initially evolved it accidentally, but then the sound attracted more men, ensuring the gene was passed down. So initially it would be something that would probably be celebrated and admired, and the could be that the louder the whistle, the more dominant the woman. 
You're welcome! Everyone said go for STEM, but now we see the true power of a history and social science education. 
This could be! Never underestimate the power of sexual attraction as a driving force. But considering how woman's sexuality has been controlled historically I went with my version. I certainly like your version better, but am wary of putting my faith into it knowing how human societies like to punish those they deem as having deviant sexual behavior. One thing's for sure, if your version is correct, steam powered sexbots would be made quite rapidly compared to other automaton. 
But most English people have electric kettles that don't whistle when boiled. 
They basically didn't do live shows for the second half of their career. 
Maybe they love the sound of teenage girls screaming 
You could tell they were annoyed by it on stage too 
Not sure if it'll help, but an overtone is a musical note that is part of a harmonic series above the fundamental note (the note that is being played) and can be heard with the fundamental note simultaneously. A tritone is another name for an augmented 4th interval. Generally, this tone is dissonant (unpleasant) and sounds wrong/bad to the ear 
*walks off in disgust* *slips* *breaks arms* "Shit." 
Flex the muscles in your legs continuously for about a minute. Your blood flow will be redirected from your penis to your legs. 
HA! Several years ago before the bar exam some students decided to, er, blow off some steam one evening in the law library where I work. They left the used condom in the trash can. These are grown folks with apartments. Go home to do that or ask for a Clorox wipe to clean off the table when you're done. 
"Sounds like a thousand screaming harpies back there... " 
Oh I can guarantee people would make something out of it. Not sure it would necessarily be art, though... 
It's ok, sometimes she does laugh because we fall out of bed or the cat is meowing at the door like his tail is on fire, or I steal her underwear and try to make off with them. It's a great thing when you don't have to be so serious all the time. Someday, the kids will finally decode all the stealth grown-up stuff that goes on in this house and they're going to be sooooo mortified. 
You could really confuse some people by blowing that whistle in a room full of dudes 
Mostly, if a culture celebrated whistling vaginas they wouldn't have any fear or hangups regarding the noises that steam engines make and thus, would be willing to work with steam power and make all the technological advancements that only really happened because they were built off steam-powered things. 
Americans actually still use whistling kettles? How quaint. 
Hilarity aside, the flaw in this logic is that these women must be aroused to do so. So either feminism, or rebellion, gets them off - or they're basically a rolling orgy to keep it whistlin'. 
Yeah, and they mentioned that the reason was the screaming women. 
Damn, I should have paid more attention in sex ed. 
Something something... ... ... ... ... ... EVERY...FUCKING THREAD! 
This changed my life the first time I heard about it, straight up kills your boner in 30-60 seconds flat. If someone is asking you to stand up you can almost always stall for 30 seconds. 
Or just lump it in with the guy editing the videos 
And here I'm just thinking this sounds like a great way to get laid... 
It sounds like your marriage has way more sex than sitcoms have lead me to believe is usual. 
What if they're 13? Or on library wifi on a library computer? 
Gonads and strife, Gonads and strife, Gonads and strife. 
I think a rolling orgy protest sounds good for all involved 
Screaming and, their later music was too hard to recreate live- a big point. 
This interval wasn't even allowed in any music played in the catholic church during the middle ages, they thought that it literally was the sound of the Devil. 
"SIR, I SAID STEP OUT OF THE VEHICLE RIGHT NOW" Almost there..... Hold on just a few more seconds, officer! 
Alternatively you could just hoist it around your neck. Like a cute scarf 
Additionally if you blow to hard into a vagina you risk that the airflow goes around the bend to the anus and blows out fecal matter. 
People need to learn it's only a penis you blow air into. It's called a *blow* job for a reason 
Bounced on my boy's vuvuzela to that show for years and years before I looked down and realized it was Nelson Mandela, fresh out of prison and ready to die in 1991 
He's not. I creeped his profile. Lives in Vancouver,does marketing or computers. Rooms with a doctor who doesn't understand fish. 
GONADS... IN THE LIGHTNING! IN THE LIGHTNING! Oh boy I watched that recently and I have no idea why I thought it was so funny. 
Yeah wtf is that sub. One post is CP and the rest are warning you about the link... 
The Whistle Pornographic Universe is going to start a porn revolution. 
"Rolling Orgy Protest" makes for a great band name though. 
The more complicated music was because they couldn't play live. P.a systems were not loud enough and didn't really exist back then. Their back line was very quiet and the lack of a proper monitoring system meant it became impossible to hear themselves in the venues they had to play. Of course women screaming added even more annoyance. The Beatles were great musicians not just something to scream over. They decided not to tour again and because of that most of the time was then spent in the studio. Having an endless recording budget and studio time allowed them to experiment more. George playing the sitar, John learning piano and experimenting with double tracked vocals, Paul playing everyone else's instrument and ringo leaving the band and then coming back to sit and drink tea in the corner. Thank fuck for the screaming girls. 
You just got tazed. Who's to say what muscles are now contracting... 
Now I have the version of Do Your Ears Hang Low with dicks stuck in my head. 
They dragged Nelson Mandela off to a FEMA camp in the 90s and managed to cover it up, and they'll do the same to you, except people wont remember your sorry ass at all. They've got eyes and ears everywhere, chem-trails are real, but what you've got to be more worried about is the cum-trails the New World Order will leave through your flat after they've fucked you a new asshole. Open your eyes people, and vote Jill Stein 2016. AND POST! 
How does one not understand fish? Better question, what isn't there to understand? Actually I don't know, but that statement makes me hmm. 
I want to sit in the corner drinking tea and listen to you talk about music. 
They tried it, but two of them died because they used George RR Martin 
No, no, that's the taint. The Chuckle is that movie about the red headed killer ventriloquy doll. 
Do your balls hang low? Do they wobble to and fro? Do they slap you in the -ss when you f-ck a dirty ho? Do they drag along the ground, do they make a clapping sound? Do your balls hang low? &nbsp; Does your dick stand high? Does it point up to the sky? When you hug your dear old mum, does it poke her in the eye? Does it stick out of your pants, can you use it as a lance? Does you dick stand high? 
Well their butthole and their peehole are the same hole so that's pretty weird for starters 
If you ever watch any Beatles interviews. You'll hear them talking about "drinking tea" a lot. This was a euphemism for drugs. 
I'm not so sure - they all loved and were founded on rock 'n' roll, and heavy touring schedules would have kept them on booze and uppers instead of psychedelics. How about this for a bit of conjecture: The Rolling Stones stuck to the rock and didn't get as experimental as the Beatles because they weren't good looking enough to get their tours ruined with screaming. 
Not to hijack, but the main point being missed here is the Beatles mostly quit touring because large scale streamlined touring infrastructure had not yet been established. Security, safety, transportation, police escorts, not getting mobbed by fans, proper sound mixing and inner ear monitors, all the things modern bands take for granted exist, at least partially, due to the necessity demonstrated by the Beatles' horrendous touring experience. *Better words 
This is what the future looks like. Dystopian meme-verse where all language has combined into a universal meme language 
The thing is too, is that they were seasoned live performers even before they well selling out Shea Stadium. They used to do a whole bunch of speed and amphetamines and play multiple shows a night in Hamburg. It's not like they just were bitching about some issues. They also had some huge resources, and due to technological limitations, they couldn't execute the live show they wanted. So, they went to the studio, and made a tonne of studio technological advancements that changed the face of modern recording, including the unconventional use of Leslie speakers, utterly gaming the fuck out of four tracks, drum micing techniques, sampling of other people's material, DI recording of bass guitars, the invention of the ADT and heaps more. Lessons. 
Really wish someone would have noticed earlier I was on a 14 month drinking binge. I've stopped now though. Just gotta shed the pounds the booze added. 
I'm thinking that my roommate might be super depressed after reading this. I know he wouldn't want me confronting him and telling him if he needed my help, to just ask. Hell, he does need it, and maybe i'll take him to a movie or some shit. Fucker needs to get out of the house. He complained so hard about the pizza place not delivering last night, pasted huge facebook rand on how he was so hungry but couldn't get any food, and I was like, dude, we live 10 min walk from a grocery store. Then he sorta shut down and became unresponsive till he went to bed. haha fuck 
I don't think I've ever have nor ever will relate to a reddit comment so much... and unfortunately it's not a good thing... Damn son 
Or under reacting to everything, big or small. Almost having no reaction to any problem no matter how much it involves them and just fixes it in silence practically on auto pilot, or just walks away not caring. 
Goddamnit. I just had a near mental breakdown trying to cook salmon. This hits home. 
Calling in sick a lot is/was my thing. Just too hard to get moving. Started not taking a shower every day..went to every other day...then every third day. On the fourth day, I'd call in sick. When I would make it in to work I'd get lots of, "how are you feeling?", "how's your health?", "are you sick?" These questions made it worse for me because I couldn't answer or felt that I had to lie and make up some random sickness. These people don't really care and besides if I were to answer I'd completely break down into a blob of tears and wailing. Just be happy I'm there and assign me something that will keep me busy. That was the best way to keep me coming back each day. 
I actually use how much time I spend on Reddit as a rough way to gauge my mood. The more time I spend here, the worse I seem to be doing. 
I don't mind sharing details about my life, it's just going to be generally uninteresting. I will avoid talking about how I feel though, for the simple reason that I can't tell you myself. My answer from birth has been "I'm fine". 
This could also mean they're a waiter or shop attendant on a 14- hour shift. 
The best you can do is chalk it up to experience and realise you are a better individual for understanding how not to go about things. If you feel guilt and regret then the present you is not the same person who fucked up. 
Undersleeping and oversleeping can both by signs of depression. So can changes in sleep patterns or changes in diet/food consumption. 
I teeter on the edge of extreme joy and crippling loneliness most of the time. This thread is half of who I am. 
I am an avid daydreamer and I feel emotionally violated. 
I've noticed that I tend to laugh with other people even when I didn't hear the joke or understand it correctly. After I do anyways I ask myself, "why am I like this." Nothing other than what I've already known I suppose. 
Or can't focus like they used to. Sometimes even reading a book can be a struggle. 
Me too. I pace around my house doing nothing but thinking for hours on end in dead silence. I go to the window, peek outside continuously, and go back to pacing. I must look like a crazy, caged animal. In a way, I am. 
I feel like former depressives have a more realistic outlook than other people. And we can appreciate moments that should be enjoyed and not just be mindlessly happy. 
I do this all the time... so people *can* see through the act, huh? haha 
Hey man coming from a clinically depressed guy, that is what depression is. Its a numb feeling where happiness is not felt. Depression does not always equal sadness, its the lack of happiness, please get help now. 
i know people like this they're unbearable primarily because i'm exactly like that, too... ive just been making an effort to shut the fuck up if i've got nothing positive to say lmao 
This needs to be higher. The happy person, especially socially happy person, can be secretly very depressed. Double points if they're trying to make other people happy, or pretty funny. Robin Williams is actually a very good example of this. Comedians in general, really. 
There's a great quote I recently heard, "I'd rather be condemned than pitied." 
So in other words, any behavior that is on either extreme end of the spectrum. Or they drive a Chevy Cobalt. 
Not everyone who does these things in the thread are unhappy but pretty much every unhappy person does these things, if that makes sense. 
I feel that. I started drinking pretty constantly for 5 months and I stopped eating as much. I ended up losing 15 pounds, and people keep saying "congrats you look so much thinner" so I just keep acting like it was just dieting or whatever. 
I have a third one: Overplaying everything with jokes. Why? I am guilty of all three things. I have never been in a good spot, but the past 7-ish years it's been really bad. I basically went from being bullied heavily and never having friends to being completely isolated. My emotional scale is basically binary at this point. Either a zero (when I like something) or a ten (usually when something bothers me). Also, I compulsively joke about everything. I can't really control it anymore, but I understand why I started doing it, and in a way it still helps me to at least fake a connection to the rare people I meet. Appearantly I got pretty good at this over the years. Doesn't help that everything is out of whack with no chance of recovery. 
I think one of the biggest signs is being devoid of emotion. Like you can't 'feel' anything. There's basically this transition phase where you go from being uncontrollably sad to where you don't feel anything. Which is incredible for a few days, and then it's soul-crushingly awful. All you want to do is 'feel' something, anything, and you can't. 
Yesterday I broke down over a homework assignment I missed in an online class, but my significant other didn't understand that wasn't the problem that had me so upset. It was just the straw that broke the camel's back. I had been bottling up more serious issues for much longer than just yesterday. 
this can also be a symptom of anxiety. I have GAD and often ignore texts or paying bills without any reason. it's so stupid 
Well technically you were sick, weren't you? But yeah you couldn't tell them the truth anyway. 
My friend actually confronted me about this. She told me she can watch me plant a smile on my face as a walk up to talk to her 
I believe it was Louis CK who said something along the lines of "As long as you think your past is bad, you must be improving". 
Yeah, it's tricky. I've always been quite self-deprecating, and I worry I've been offputting before. I *think* I was always quite good at hiding it, but it's hard to say. 
It's the "up to a certain point" that's key there. Obviously to an extent, it's fine. And there's nothing wrong with being modest in most situations. But I've known people who talk like that all the time. All their humour revolves around it. It starts to feel like they're really attempting to reach out or be honest, but are hiding it behind "it's a joke". 
Likewise, not sleeping a lot at all. Think only about a couple of hours at night and a nap during the day. _edit_ Ok, this seems to have some people riled up. I'm not at all saying that if you don't sleep a lot that means you're depressed. However, depression can come with a severly dysfunctional sleeping rhythm. 
Makes me feel better to hear that it's not just me. Sometimes the smallest thing will set me off. Ice cream! Everything is great! I love the whole world! So much energy I can't control myself! Oh wait, they're out of the flavor I wanted. Everything is terrible, mind immediately focusing on every bad memory it can come up with. There's nothing worthwhile left anywhere. Zero energy. Even I know I'm being ridiculous when it happens, but I don't know how to stop it. 
Don't be too hard on yourself. Laughing is a social function, and seeing other people laugh might just make you kinda happy. Also it's just contagious sometimes. 
-Hey, you look tired! Are you sick or something? -I'm just not wearing make-up... 
My go to answer if people ask if everything is alright is just to say "I'm just tired". 
I suffer from depression and I haven't read a book in years. I used to read all the time but now I can barely finish a magazine article. Hell, I even skim longer reddit posts. It's just impossible to be interested or care. 
That also makes people like you more! If you're funny and always steer the conversation so people talk about themselves they won't notice the gaping chasm of darkness that you live on the edge of! 
There's a podcast called the Hilarious World of Depression that hosts comedians to talk about their depression & mental illnesses... I had no idea how common it was until I scrolled through and saw most of my favorite comedians on there 
That's awesome. Kind of a depressed dude here, and I've really only found true happiness since I started taking care of rats about six years ago. What I've found is the more love I give them, the happier I am. Their short lifespans plays a large role in this. Knowing the clock is ticking and dealing with the frequent death of something I care about forced me to realize the importance of the limited time we have. So for me now, any day that everyone is feeling fine is a good one. 
I dunno how i feel about this. I used to be like that, the kind of person who kept it all inside. And that only meant that when shit pissed me off, i wouldnt bother telling anyone and everyone thought everything is okay. Now i complain. Not to everyone about everything, but to the right people about the stuff they understand. And it feels good. I feel less alone because i know that someone knows and will understand when i have a breakdown. 
Robin Williams had Lewy Body Dementia. It was destroying his mind and judgement. He didn't kill himself out of depression. 
Thank you friend, you just explained away my momentary personal crisis. 
I'm so sorry to hear this. People like your brother is the reason behind this post. Much peace and love to you, friend. 
Similar thing happened to me - reached out for help and got ignored. Later told that they "didn't know how to react" so they did nothing. 
The initial being so beyond not giving a fuck is kind of amazing. It's basically "I have *become* the Void. Whoa." And then eventually you realize literally nothing has any meaning to you anymore and nothing is worth doing. 
As someone who's been depressed, you are the best kind of friend, and we're thankful for people like you. 
Yeah. I always wrestle with focus issues and actually getting stuff done, but I've noticed a huge change it what constitutes 'easy' work. Depression makes loading the dishwasher or putting away a sheet of paper into an act of will, where without it it's pretty easy to go "huh, guess I should toss some stuff in the dishwasher". 
Ya I mean I would describe myself as a happy person who is satisfied with my life, but my place is a mess. Not unsanitary, but just very very disorganized (or at least organized in a way that is only apparent to me. Ok who am i kidding it's a shitshow) I'm just busy and I don't like to halfway clean the place cuz when I start cleaning I go IN 
I have SAD but some GAD as well. When my anxiety is up, even if I'm not anywhere it onsetting to some full blown attack, I put off things like this. I will wait to the last minute to pay a bill or even go through mail. They just seem like big tasks and I find myself avoiding them even though they are constantly on my mind. I hate it 
Watched it with my also depressed SO. Fuuuuck, that last season finale. 
It reminds me that someone, somewhere out there feels the same things I do. And probably a lot of people actually. And makes me not feel as alone or broken. 
That hits home. My past wasn't amazing but I do look back on it very fondly. 
Most people do hide behind it because a piece of them wants someone to acknowledge they're feeling down or feel concerned for them... but the other part of them is just like "Nah, you're being a whiny bitch. Just kid about it instead." 
I didn't even know there are defined levels of depression. Do you know of any reliable sites where I can read about this? 
Digitally disconnect and get out into nature. Take a walk in the woods. Go hiking. Go camping. I recently started this and it has done wonders for my anxiety/depression. :) 
I have the whole not sleeping thing as well. I don't nap during the day, I just don't sleep very much. 
I like dreams the best because for a moment I have a life I actually want to live. Plus there's space monsters. 
I always hate it when I'm in a great mood all day and then I'm just... Not. Nothing happened, but I'm upset now. 
I'll RSVP but cancel at the last minute with some lame excuse why I can't make it. 
*looks at time* I should get out of bed and ready for work. Maybe just one last Reddit thread... *reads title* "Oh fuck, here we go." 
Because usually that's enough for people. When I'm depressed, I give this response and people usually say "Oh okay, cool." and leave it at that. I hate the idea of dragging other people down with my pointless shit. Doesn't help that I'm bipolar and it comes and goes at the drop of a hat. 
-Hey you look like shit today! Are you sick or something? -I just put ON my makeup... 
"You have dark spots under your eyes" "Bitch I'm a panda" 
Same. I used to read at least one novel a week. I haven't finished more than a a few chapters of any in the last 2 years. 
When people ask me why I'm alone (not dating or married) I just smile and tell them that I am so far into depression that I can't find my way out. I just ware the mask of a happy person so people won't see just how bad it really is. I say it all with a smile and a laugh and they think I am just joking. 
I'm just glad to hear there are others out there in this world just like me. 
I searched that expecting to spend a long time scrolling through names. There are six episodes 
they dont even have to be treated bad, the mind can fuck itself up pretty good. That's why it's so hard for some to understand where depression comes from, life is good to them but still they feel empty and disconnected. 
DLB often causes depression, actually, so it could have been both. 
I really dislike people sometimes. I've gained massive trust issues because the day I reached out for help, I got cheated on and later dumped. "Too needy, I can't handle it." I just joke around now as a clown and try helping out whoever I can, but no one reaches out if you dont say anything memorable/significant, and I think I prefer it that way now. Sorry, I think I should have just posted this in r/offmychest 
One of my friends was caught, knife in hand about to kill himself. He's the most generous person I know. 
the thing is, that it makes me happy to make others a gift, or pay their meal, even tho not for long, every bit of happyness is a gift of god for me 
Well hello there perfect summation of my internal being. 
You're a good boyfriend for trying to motivate her, even though in the moment she might resist or maybe even resent it. My roommate was such a positive force when I was deeply depressed for doing that; it makes a difference to know someone's looking out for you. 
If you don't mind me asking, how did your mom react? 
I can pull out the most genuine full-face smile you've ever seen and have it mean absolutely nothing. Heck, sometimes I fool myself. 
"...Sarah?" Saw it recently and wasn't expecting it to get so dark. Even though it had gotten progressively darker since the first season. It's a miracle reddit hadn't spoiled it for me yet. 
Conversely if I look back on my past and think, "Well, I'll never accomplish anything like THAT again, never have good friends like THAT again, never hike the Milford Track again, never backpack solo through Europe again, never experience the rush of young love again . . . well then I'm probably doing the opposite of improving. Oh, right. This is what secret unhappiness looks like. 
Very true! At first you'll think, "Great, now I'm just depressed but in the woods" and then you start moving. There are few things that can make you better and stay feeling better than going for a hike and just listening to some calm, cool music. Shoutout to sleepmakeswaves for being my official hiking soundtrack. 
Bought a fitness tracker thing that showed every night even when I'm 'asleep' for 8 hours I only actually get 3 hours of sleep a night, being exhausted doesn't help with anything especially emotions 
I don't really wear make up anymore. It's hard to wash out of my beard. 
At least your boss is nice. He worries about his employees. Worth more than an MBa from Harvard. 
You don't have to teleport, there are many just like them near you. Finding them is the problem. Also, you have a relevant username. 
If I can't make myself happy, I try to make others happy. That helps somewhat. 
Fucking right? I can at least get mad at sadness and try to fight it, self improvement to ward it off, use it as rage fueled motivation... But then i get tired, or i hit a snag, and decide fuck the world I dont need em until im a goddnma goddamn husk. 
Look at this guy with all the time in the world. I liquefy it and inject it straight into my bloodstream. 
Like the angel she is, she stayed on the phone with me while I cried about basically every aspect of my life for over an hour. She knew I'd been having a hard time (going through a divorce I hadn't wanted), but up till that point I'd been putting up a pretty good front and my family thought I was handling it far better than I was. I made an offhand comment about not engaging in self-harm only because I was a coward, and she packed up and drove four hours to come stay with me for the next few days. To be honest, I couldn't ask for better parents. 
The fact that they skip over the entire funeral scene empathizes really well how out-of-touch Bojack is. Poor horsey. 
Opens door for you - "cheers" Open next door for them - "cheers" "cheers" 
On the other hand, we're happy to tell a taxi driver our life story within seconds of meeting them. 
Bear in mind those fitness trackers have no idea when you're actually sleeping, they just see if you've stopped moving. If you toss and turn while asleep they'll count that as not being asleep. Similarly, if you lay really still when awake they'll count that as sleeping. 
It's true. For someone who generally has no facial expressions my boss came by one day and said he was shocked he could tell that I wasn't happy today and that's a different look than he's ever seen from me. Hit home party hard. 
That's the kicker. We see the pattern as it's happening it and just kind of watch it unfold time after time. Sucks but look at this thread. At least we're not alone 
Very true, I've found maybe five or so but there's probably many many more. If you need anything, someone to talk to or something like that, my inbox is always open. 
agreed. if I can't have happy myself, I might as well try and make someone else happy 
I struggle with this a lot. Friends/co-workers /family can go on about how nice I am, and here I am brooding for the 1000th time over how shitty of a person I am because I don't think the things I do are for the right reasons. 
Wow, I know exactly what you mean. It feels like your thoughts are shaped by sadness, yet there's no sadness and they appear with the sensation that there must be some kind of emotion to justify the negativity of the thought, but that emotion just isn't there. What's left is some kind of atrophied sensation that mourns the depart between thought and emotion, which I can only describe as emptiness. 
Thanks for the PM. I try to be kind to myself. The problem is that I find myself bragging about my accomplishments, and then the people who are supposed to be my support group end up mocking me for my proud, little accomplishments. Oh well, I guess we do this for ourselves, right? I dunno. I had a very hard weekend, and I'm feeling really down. So I really appreciated the PM. Thank you. 
I had a similar moment back in college. It was sophomore year, everything seemed to be going belly up for me, and I was pretty much lost. I called my dad sobbing and could only really get out "I'm lost, I don't know what to do". My dad just said "meet me at the tank in 2 hours" (there was a tank on campus, gift from the army for providing free education to pump out more Army Corps of Engineers during WWII). He drove an 2 hours to come talk to me about everything that was going on. I ended up switching to a major I enjoyed more, and still failed out. I busted my ass with his support to get back in and almost got myself to that magical 3.0 by the time I graduated. Dude's my hero. 
Exactly! Even when I do try to talk about myself they seem like they are only waiting for me to be done so they can talk about themselves again. Being a "good listener" really let's you see how self absorbed a lot of people are. 
That makes me very frustrated on your behalf. Sometimes we have to be proud of even our smallest accomplishments. When I'm too deep in my depression, I get pretty excited that I got out of bed, put clean clothes on, and maybe did some dishes. Absolutely be proud and maybe when you have some better days look for a new support group? 
I'm sorry to hear that. Some mothers are better than others at...well...mothering. As my Mom keeps reminding me, I will still be her child no matter what age I am. 
All the other last words, and then the Polish Airforce with just "fuck" 
Found footage because it was recorded by the SOSUS listening network and nobody knew they had it until later. 
When I was in a high school, a girl a little older than me was kidnapped from a mall near our house. She was walking to her car and these guys pulled up next to her in their car. One pointed a gun at her and told her to get in the car. She did, and what they did to her afterwards was horrific (she did not survive). My mom told me if that ever happened to me, to just refuse to go because it would be better to be hurt or killed right there in a parking lot than go through what that girl did. 
Well, he wasn't a corpse so I'd say that the ending was a happy one. 
That was from the video for "Down In It", which released back in 1989. In it, Trent Reznore appears to throw himself off a building and fall to his death. Trent had to prove IN COURT that he was still alive. 
That guy was kind of an idiot. I hate that his dumb choices were romanticized the way that they were. 
same, reading this at 1am in Aus so I have to be careful. 
Thank you for mentioning this; I *really* shouldn't have listened to that audio, and reading about a bunch of firefighters rolling their eyes as they wiggle their butts to stop the noise was a funny distraction from it haha 
We use the word "kurwa" so much, we call it the comma. 
Air New Zealand, stiff fucking upper lip right till the end! 
My philosophy is basically this, and this is something that I live by, and I always have, and I always will: Don't ever, for any reason, do anything, to anyone, for any reason, ever, no matter what, no matter where, or who, or who you are with, or where you are going, or where you've been, ever, for any reason whatsoever. 
A common problem with people who are drowning, they panic and pull their would be savior under the water, drowning them too. 
Bud Dwyer if you haven't seen it yet. Much more upsetting as he was an innocent man saving his family from the burden of his guilty sentence. 
Yeah. Pretty sure it's air escaping more than a willful groan at that point. 
Later in the film one of them seems incredibly remorseful and takes responsibility in (I felt) a really genuine way. Like he fully develops a stutter whenever he talks about what happened, but he forces himself to talk about it because he owes it to the family. The other one though blames everyone but himself and his parents are clearly enabling his delusion that he is blameless. 
Yeah that was messed up. Zero remorse. No hesitation in their voice when talking about what they are doing. It's horrifying that a person can think like this. I hope these two boys are in prison. 
It's Wisconsin man, we're the red headed redneck step child of the northern midwest. 
It's significant, historically. It's happened several times throughout recent history. I couldn't tell you specific names, but I've heard about this on the news several times. Some people kill out of spite, or for revenge or justice. Namely, people in gangs kill this way. However, normal people, that fly off the rail and start killing people have had a psychotic break. They don't do it because they want to, but because they feel they need to. After they do it once, they often feel they cant stop, and feel the nagging urge to do it again. This often comes with strong feelings of remorse afterwards, which can be seen in acts such as a respectful burial, or resting place for the victim, or even calls to the police begging to be caught and stopped. This isn't always the case, just a glimpse into the mental state of (some) remorseful killers. 
Always have the angle going "up" so from the outside they can't look "down" between the blinds. 
Closed and locked. Also super creaky floors, and dogs. Don't come down my hall.. just take the TV and go. 
Yep. He created a drug cocktail to mess with there memories and released them. He only killed them if he felt it necessary. 
And she had a slit throat... That's pretty dedicated for someone who was just "cheating"... What was the husband thinking? 
IF YOU WANT TO THINK OF THE WORLD AS A CALM SAFE PLACE - DO NOT READ JURY MEMBERS LEFT THE COURTROOM CRYING AND VOMITTING UPON HEARING THIS RECORDING. THIS CONTENDS FOR THE SICKEST SHIT ON THE INTERNET. DO NOT READ. 
They would also poison the children first. They knew that if the parents saw their kids dying that they would be more willing to kill themselves. 
You know what? I just got my Nintendo Switch and I'm having a fantastic day. I'm going to take your advice. In fact, I'm going to abandon thread. 
The coroners report stated that he shot himself, though disputed by others, and he was found to have a toxic level of barbiturates in his system 
If someone ever pulls up to you in a car, run in the opposite direction. If they bother to flip the car around, you'll already be gone. 
That fucking music still terrifies me to this day. I was kid when that was first on the air and got popular, and if Stack's voice wasn't enough, it was the music that scared the hell out of me. I'm in my 30s now and I still won't listen to it. 
The government had the balls to say those messages and videos were staged. 
A bunch of panicked stampeding school children would have ruined *his* chances of getting off safely. 
I remember reading that divers had to recover the bodies in shifts of one body per diver, because it was emotionally too much to handle. One had to separate a boy and girl who were holding hands. Their class went from 338 students to 88. It's one of those events that still gets me close to tears. 
I never saw that one, but the one that pushed me over the edge as a teenager on the Internet was the one of that Japanese lady in spiked high heels *slowly* torturing a puppy on a dock or something. There was a string of similar videos, but I never made it past the first one. The sounds were probably the worst part of it. There's one part where she like puts her foot on the dog's leg and then rolls her foot back so it just completely twists the leg into a broken oblivion. That's about when I closed out of the video, and since then I've been a lot more cautious about clicking potential gore links. Pretty sure she, and the person who paid the women to do this shit, got arrested at some point. 
I hate when people say he was homeless. It's like they are trying to make it less terrible. They killed a good man. They lured him and tortured him while his family wondered where he was. 
Sensationalism bullshit. Tbh it's creepy enough just knowing the background. 
If you were the guy who found them you'd definitely shit yourself. 
I feel like if I saw a scuba diver show up after 3 days I would think I was hallucinating. 
I ignored your comment and listened anyways, and i feel stupid for doing so 
Shit I had never heard about the failed pin attempts 
Could be why folk tales warn people about leaving paths. might be a way to scare travellers who might be more scared of monsters than 'you might get lost' 
What makes it even creepier is that the outfit she has on is what he made her put on just before he murdered her. She was kidnapped whilst hitchhiking with a friend IIRC, and nobody hitchhikes in a dress and high heels. 
Wait they used video effects so well he had to prove he was alive? That's a professional job gg editors. But iirc "dying" then coming back to life is very expensive and hard 
yeah, if you ever go to alaska don't bring him up. They hate him, and that his brazen stupidity was glamorized. There's been a few copycats since he died. 
I believe it was because there were two tracks, and a train was passing on the other track at the time, so they probably assumed the noise was from that train instead of the one they didn't see. 
We were taught to just calm down, take a deep breath and dive or "sink" if a person panics during a rescue, they are not going to follow you down. It's possible this is a "pool only" solution to the problem. 
The video of Dwyer is still with me today, after seeing it back in high school about 15 years ago. It will always be with me. What a gruesome thing it was. It haunted me for months after. 
They are, the one seems genuinely remorseful, the other one, even though he talked about how much he enjoyed doing the murder on the tape before and after, still maintains his innocence. 
Can I have the TV instead? No need to let a criminal take it. 
They still have no idea how many he killed though. The whole thing is a horrific mystery. 
All of this just proves the world isn't a calm and safe place, though. This whole thread proves that. I hope everyone going through here stays safe. Y'all travel with friends, carry mace or a pocket knife or something. Sick people are out there and you sometimes have to rely on yourself to survive. :/ 
Many protested - asking Jim Jones why couldn't they just pack up and head to Russia as was discussed as a possibility numerous times. 
Some people did pretend. I remember there being at least one in a documentary I saw. 
If this was at a mall I'd run back into the fucking mall and take my chances. If I played my cards right I'd be in a fitting room while someone called the cops. 
Isn't that the very same government who got caught doing some weird cultish shit and demanding bribes from Samsung? 
Well I hope that year or so of living he got before being sentenced to life in prison was worth it. 
If you're in deep water, no big deal. Boats at sea can have a tsunami pass right under them and it just seems like a large swell. It's when it reaches land that all that water and force has to go somewhere. 
Isn't that what makes tsunamis so dangerous? Unless you know the warning signs by the time you realize you're in danger it's too late. 
I have to lie and tell myself those videos aren't real because I cannot deal with the fact that a woman would torture an innocent puppy or kitten to death for sexual pleasure. It upsets me so much. 
Actually they killed about 15 people including a pregnant woman and recorded all of them, this was the only one that managed to get leaked from the police department 
My mom always says that if someone gets in your car and tells you to drive somewhere, try to crash the car on their side. Kill or be killed 
plus they are a lot more likely to get caught if they kill you in the middle of the street. 
As I recall, the diver that found him did get pretty startled. He said something to the effect of thinking he found another body in the water and when he reached out they guy grabbed back at him. Probably a pretty surreal moment. 
That guy's mental state was probably close to that. Three days in total darkness, nearly silent, and no real way to orient yourself. I dont think i could ever imagine how long thkse three days must have felt. 
Out of everything I can imagine that man went through, the worst for me would be the not knowing if you were going to be rescued or not. Not knowing what time of day it was, where you are, how far down you are, do people know yet? It's scary that it's possible people have survived plane crashes doing this exact thing, and they were never found. Imagine dying, alone, at the bottom of the ocean with the hope someone was going to find you? 
They were barracudas, not sharks. Still horrifying though. 
Considering how rough and small that overturned boat is, I'm inclined to think they were pirates, too. Probably tried to intercept the fleet, but was capsized for whatever reason. 
Sounds to me like something that happens when it's dark and you're panicked 
I buy bright pink and orange flagging tape. I got lost once and that was enough for me. 
Not only did he force her to put the outfit on he had also just cut off her hair as a souvenir. 
As they were filming the shot, the camera accidentally fell along with the fake body they threw out a window. It looked like a suicide tape. BTW: Nine Inch Nails is a pretty good band if you're ever interested. 
His major problem was that he didn't bring a fucking map. If he did he would have realized there was a bridge to get over the river fairly close to him. That dude is basically a prime example of why you should never let romanticism override common sense. Good movie though... 
Yep people have to get rescued from hikes to the site every summer. 
I keep my mouse safely on the scroll bar in threads like these. 
I'd say decomposing into the soil is a pretty solid connection to Nature 
Yep, and also kick the shit out of them if they're endangering you. Worst case scenario you knock them unconscious, and then they're easier to rescue anyway. 
I too have a "the ocean is no fucking joke" story, where I was swimming at night with some friends of mine and just was too excited, didn't realize how far out we were, and waves started beating the fuck down. I couldn't keep my head above water, and when I could the only thing I thought to do was scream for my two other friends. turns out one was also drowning, and the third was on the shore, just paralyzed by fear watching the both of us, not knowing if they could help, and even if they could, knowing they couldn't help the both of us. pure luck got us back to shore, where we shook and chain-smoked a lot, making really dark jokes. I couldn't even hear the sound of waves for a few years without having a panic response. 
When my friend and I got caught in one, all of the other people boogie boarding were yelling at us to swim diagonally. I listened to them, since it meshed with what I knew already. My friend didn't hear them or something, so he just kept getting swept along. Luckily there was a lifeguard at the beach that saw him. 
The way the blood just *pours* out of his nose once he falls to the floor is something that I would have thought was overdone if I had seen it in a movie. 
The "I'm getting horny thinking about it" was disturbing to me. What the fuck. These are the type of crimes that make the death penalty hard to get rid of. There's no chance they are innocent. 
I remember that kid who keeps saying he is innocent and even his parents say he is innocent and blame the other kid. It's interesting in children who murder, because normally one has sociopathic tendencies and the other is a follower who latches into whatever grand plans the other has. It was clear that the one guy who feels remorseful and absolutely devastated by his actions now is the follower and I think he even says in one of the tapes I watched that he needs to live his life for Cassie. But the other just refuses to take any responsibility and that's even scarier. 
IIRC he later stated that at the time he was in a delusional state that made him believe he hadn't really killed her and that she was really missing, and not just because he killed her. He went as far as to help out in search efforts because he wanted to believe she was still alive and that the murder was just a dream. So when he is told about the body being found in this interview he is actually reacting to the fact that she really is dead and he can't believe someone killed her. He is grieving as opposed to freaking out over being caught. Then again, this is just what he ended up saying later on so who knows if he is actually being honest. I think he is full of shit, but it's possible he was just so delusional that he really believed he didn't kill her. Dude is a nut. 
Can I take the creaky floors? No need to listen for thieves with no TV. 
I couldn't read all of it but in the first parts he discussed how easy it was to constantly do it, and details about previous kidnappings. If truthful, terrifying. 
That's one of the most interesting parts of this audio. There is the lady who is like "hey guys, maybe we could not do this..." and the rest shut her down and then they do it. Bizarre. 
It was Flavor-Aid, not Kool-Aid! They've been slandered long enough!!! 
I was in the country during that time. He was on the run and the cops were stopping buses to look for him 
Yes, the president had a top advisor who was from a cult. There are some theories that the response to the ferry was deliberately poorly managed to offer the children as a sacrifice for the cult. 
Wasn't even a year. He and 14 crew members were arrested that same week. 
Yeah, a lot of people don't realize this. There's a video somewhere on Youtube that is supposed to be of a boat going over the Japanese tsunami way out to sea, but the comments are full of people not believing it because it just looks like a really big swell. 
Often even then, depending on your surrounding geography. 
Yeah.... There's nothing fake looking about it. Honestly tho it's the sounds that bother me 
And if you're struggling it'll likely be a lot more sloppy, hopefully leaving some sort of trail. If they're able to take their time they'll be super careful. 
Can you imagine being the guy on the boat for three days?! He could only assume he was going to die. 
I remember from the interview he gave shortly after getting rescued that he said it wasn't silent. He could hear sharks and crabs scavenging the dead bodies on the wreck. That sounds 10000% worse than silence to me. 
That's really good information in case I'm ever trapped in a pocket of air in the ocean. 
The guy talking is on the surface watching a monitor, but the diver is surprisingly calm as well. I remember reading that Harrison had seen the light of the diver pass by in the hallway outside the room he was in, and he then proceeded to grab the arm of the diver. Imagine diving inside a wreck you are sure is filled with dead people only to be grabbed by someone from behind. I would have shit and pissed myself to death. 
During an interview with the guy he says he could hear sharks below swimming around and rummaging/eating. I'd probably try to drown myself just to escape the terror of being in the dark with apex predators 
Sounds more like 1 girl trying the pin on the other girls phone (because the latter one is unconcious?) 
If youre going to do some serious frontiersman shit, wouldn't you have learned that simply following alongside a river can tend to lead you to a settlement of some sort? I also heard that he poisoned himself because he harvested and ate the entire Eskimo Potato plant when part of it is actually not safe to eat, especially in the large quantities he ate it in. 
I could see that, when I read it i thought he came off as somebody who thinks he's way smarter than he is. 
This is fucking ganster and they never taught this method in lifeguarding class. But good thinking on the fly. whatever works works. 
'Swimming at night in the surf'....found your problem. 
I was planning on shooting myself one day and was watching videos of it to see what my family would find. After Dwyer I couldn't do it. I couldn't let my parents find me in that much blood. It put me off long enough to eventually get a little help and now I'm healthy and hopefully never to be in that position 
I don't think this is true. He had made postings on forums online about "hypothetical" stalker-murder situations and how he would play dumb and be in a daze if apprehended. His full interrogation is on youtube and it's just him giving yes/no/i dont know monotone answers and staring straight forward like a creep. Also the detective is obese and leans back in his chair super far at one point and you have to marvel at the integrity of the chair. 
Because they had run numerous previous fake trial runs before. They would wake people in the middle of the night, get them to take fake cyanide, and then severely punish those who refused. Over and over again. They would have people act as if they were resisting, or trying to escape to gain helpers, then punish anyone who went along with it. The psychological fuckery was extensive and devastating. 
IIRC on the Jonestown documentary they interview a girl who remained still on the floor hoping she wouldn't get shot in midst of a shootout next to a plane. The incident happened parallel to the people being fed the poison within the Jonestown complex, although the girl wasn't part of Jonestown she was just visiting along with some politicians who got assaulted when they tried to escape, I think. 
I'm on the East Coast of the US so we are lower risk for tsunami. But I'd be lying if I said I didn't check my height above sea level after the Japanese Tsunami. Fortunately due to the Appalachians and where I live I'm 222 feet above sea level despite being only 19 miles from the ocean. And honestly if I have to worry about tsunami flooding at that height we have far bigger problems. 
That's how the whole city felt, so proud of her for fighting back. Everyone believes he would have sexually assaulted her if she had she not fought so hard. Mickey refused to be give up till the very end. There's now a "ghost bike" memorial downtown and a bike loop around the city for safer bike riding in her memory. 
The thing that really got me was imagining the darkness. Not just the alone underwater for 3 days...doing it in pitch black...only to have a light just turn on suddenly. He for sure was blinded, but you can clearly see in the video that those eyes are seeing god. 
Aren't we all just trapped in a pocket of air in an ocean, really? 
Ya this is the much better video. Finding bodies as a diver must be a pretty terrible job, but to suddenly have one of them grab your arm must have been absolutely insane. 
I imagine it was body recovery so that guy has seen some shit. Doesn't make it any less terrifying though. 
Did he know they were sharks because of the music? 
My best theory on this is that they went off path and one or both of them got hurt. I saw pictures of the trails they were on and once you go off path by like 10 meters you can easily get disoriented/hurt. This is the reason why all park rangers tell you to stay on the paths. The photos were taken by one of them during the night. My best guess is that an animal was stalking them at night and the flashes kept it back. Both of them succumbed to either their injuries, lack of water, or loss conscious and the elements took them. The lack of remains is just what happens when the body parts are scavenged by animals. The foot stuck in the shoe is because the animals couldnt get through the shoe to the meat. Stay on the paths people. 
Youre kinda glossing over the weeks spent in the back of his truck cab being tortured and raped. 
There's something strangely beautiful about knowing that a death saved a life. It doesn't erase that it happened, but it makes things a lot better knowing that there's someone alive today as a result. Glad you're doing well. 
Amid all the morbid stuff, your comment made me chuckle 
that is literally one of the first places the police look for the killer. they ask for volunteers to help find the victim/body and take a list of everyone who helps and use that as a "suspect list" 
True story. When I was about 10 and my sister was 6 we were at the beach. I said something about being afraid of sharks and my sister says "Don't worry. There aren't any. The duh duh... duh duh... duh duhhhh music isn't playing." One of the funniest things I've heard that came totally random. 
Huh, this is the most likely theory I've ever read on it. 
The ex-boyfriend in Making a Murderer gave me a really bad vibe for exactly this reason. He was way too gung-ho to help the cops. 
You really can't blame yourself for crazy events like that. The twin towers would have never been knocked down on 9/11 if the architect never designed them but no one makes that connection because it's completely absurd. Existence is chaos, you can't control what happens to something or someone down the road just because you interacted with it on your own journey. 
My daughter is 11, has never seen Jaws, is probably only vaguely aware it exists, has never heard 'the shark music', yet when we're in a pool (and this goes back a few years even) if I would swim toward her doing 'the shark music' she would freak out. 
Did you not read the Daily Beast article? Looking at those imgur pics, if that gully flooded they'd be toast. One of them survived for 10 days at least. This is in no way foul play. It was a major storm the day they went out. A flash flood is also not out of the question. And, they were in tank tops and jean shorts, nothing else. Even in the tropical jungle you can die of exposure/hypothermia. 
Its also possible the pictures were being taken because one of them was out of it. Lack of water can cause people to become delirious and what were seeing is photos taken by someone who was hallucinating. But its the southern jungles so it could have been an animal stalking them considereing most animals are not active till night when the photos were taken. 
I was thinking tripped on rocks/twisted ankle before the 911 call. The picture of hair was checking a head wound I bet. 
Was she disabled? I don't see any other reason besides that for not being able to just do it herself. Or maybe she had some kind of traumatic freak out doing it herself so he tried and got freaked out too? I don't know. 
This has some twisted backwards karma going on. Let a murderous psychopath go, then a murderous psychopath lets him go. 
How does one "do it right"? I'm genuinely curious. 
Way to stop a secret agent you dick. Mr. Hoover is going to be pissed when he finds out you foiled his plans 
Supervisor be like "It says here he's a donor... We really need brains" 
An overlooked sign of abuse, I feel, is when a kid is way too mature and cool-headed for their age. That 12-year-old knew exactly what to do and how to protect her brother from the sight - which means she either had to do so before, or was mentally prepared for the possibility. 
Wow. To think that this could have been how I ended up. Except I survived my time in the dumpster and was rescued weighing 2 lb. Thank you guys for what you do. 
yikes, this one is awful and would've been so creepy to see in person. 
One of my work colleagues was on jury duty for a case where a lady of the evening died on the freeway after falling out of a pickup truck. The driver's defense was that "out of nowhere, for no reason, she just opened the door and jumped out while we were in the middle of the freeway." 
She stared a literal dagger at you and you just went on by? Damn. 
It's one thing to want to take your own life, but how dare you take someone else with you. 
I was at the hospital drunk as hell at like 2am a couple months ago (went to the bars with some friends and a female friend got drugged and no one wanted to take her to the hospital). I hear a lot of noise so I open the curtain and there's a guy covered in blood. According to the nurse he was high on Meth and picked huge chunks of skin off and cut himself. If I was any more intoxicated you could have convinced me the zombie apocalypse was happening just by the looks of him. 
god damn...that sounds weird as fuck. i didn't know blood did that either. 
Oh man, I bet they hung themselves in the attic so their kids didn't walk in on that sight. 
Burglar/necrophiliac was pretending to be a corpse and ran out when you weren't looking. Or the start of the next Mummy movie. 
See, I do my best not to be an overprotective parent, then I read shit like this. 
"Attention pumpkinfucker! Do you need assistance?!" 
What was the outcome? If you could still smell the alcohol the person must have still been around. 
You know it's going to happen, but I wonder how the dogs handle this psychologically on the back end given the pack/owner relationship? 
This is the reason my 4 year old knows the proper words. And I am thankful for it since she was able to tell me a couple months ago that her older half brother had put a Nerf bullet up her vagina. The matter has been investigated and is being dealt with. She has not been to her fathers house since the incident happened. ETA - in the thread below there is more information about the incident. I am done for the night on responding as I have now given my self a headache from thinking about it and need to just unwind and not think about the situation for a bit. Thank you all for your support and kind words. 
When you say he was resisting. Do you mean he was trying to assert his dominance? 
that's enough internet for today. How fucking sickening and tragic. 
That was one of my questions as well. Rural areas are wired like that 
When the S.W.A.T. team has to destroy a wall because they can't get through your barricade, you've done it correctly. 
He didn't foil his plans! Can't you read? *The kid took the cake.* In and out of the White House kitchen in a flash, stealing Joey Biden's secret cake stash (that he had to hide from Michelle because she only allowed them to keep healthy food in there). Mission success. The only "foil" here was that in which the cake was wrapped to stay fresh. 
Mother was never charged. The baby suffocated sleeping with her. Don't ever feel asleep with your baby. This is not uncommon. I've seen it more than a few times. 
I've just started dispatching, and I've always been hesitant about therapy. Not anymore, I'm signing up for the next doctor that will take me lol 
And a heart... and courage... and a way back to Kansas. 
No one believes you when you tell this to people in real life. All of the oldest brothers on my dad's side have had the same ring with a ruby and a diamond and all of them have died under the age of 55. We tried to get rid of it after my dad died at 45 (we were going to throw it in the hudson), but for some reason everyone wants to tempt fate and my uncle has it. 
As someone who suffered abuse leading to a nasty situation, and the way I acted with it back then, this really hits home. In a way that I've never thought of before. 
Wow! I'm really glad you're ok! Having a rough start into life like that has to leave you feeling that you can handle anything. Look at what you've already been through and survived. I hope you have great life. Thanks for speaking up. 
It sucked for sure. In the days/weeks that followed an autopsy was performed. The results indicated that the baby had been born dead. The mother had disposed of the body to keep her boyfriend from knowing she was pregnant. The town I work for named the baby, paid for the funeral, and held a nice service. 
Agreed. This is insane. No unit in it's right might would ask an officer to help dispose of a family member. 
"You see officer, I was here mindin' my own business when out of nowhere these college kids just started killin' themselves all over my property" 
A kid in my home town laid his head on the tracks bc he tweeted he was gonna kill himself and someone responded saying he didn't have the balls or some shit. Ppl are fucked up. 
Hi pay me thousands of dollars and I too will happily pee somewhere in your house! 
None of us were sure what to make of it. I was firmly of the opinion that she was just severely mentally ill but one of the paramedics was looking round the house for some of this magic powder... 
Also, helmets nowadays are made to break or crack, nullifying their use later, but it's basically forcing the helmet to take all the shock. So a super hard impact I can imagine just obliterating the helmet, and the head having bruises from the straps and shit, but hopefully not skull damage. I'm surprised his spine and neck were in good enough shape for him to walk around and bend over, even massively fucked up on adrenaline and shock. 
First big car wreck I worked as an EMT, the senior medic gave me the duty of mopping out the ambulance. Blood coagulation is a strange thing. It reminded me of hair like jello. Very strange 
Yeah OP. I need to know how the hell that happened. It sounds terrifying for those children. 
Hopefully. My FIL hanged himself after sending a text to his son to come find him, because dude has always hated his kid. Heaven forbid you have a kid and don't want it. No reason to make his life a living hell for the next few decades. 
"Hey, let's see what happens if we stand in this shallow pool and hit our heads against each other as hard as we can" 
The best form of protection is education. Make sure that your kids know how to spot a potentially dangerous situation and what to do in one rather than attempting to keep them away from anything dangerous. 
Yea but then why the hell didn't she just say, "HEY LOOK OUT! THERE'S SOMEONE RIGHT THERE?!" lol 
We towed the truck, ran the plates, got his home address, and found him there. Did the usual "I have no idea why my truck was out there" routine. Not much we could do. But I saw his truck in impound for months after that. Guess he couldn't afford to get it out. 
Yeah that's nasty. I've seen milk squirt from a dead lady's boob about 6 feet across the room too. 
10 year old me used to wander into the fields surrounding town just to explore those untilled forest patches. Every farm near town appeared to have one. You'd find ruins of old buildings, and ponds filled with frogs. Abandoned tents, and collections of shopping carts with random objects like blankets and tv's in them. 10 year old me was adventurous, but none to bright... 
You'd be amazed at how well people manage to justify their beliefs and/or actions to themselves to the point where they fully believe what they're doing is OK. And of course, some of them know it's inexcusable but don't care, in which case they're acting like outraged victims to put on a show of innocence and make it harder for the police to do their job. 
Everyone is a little shocked that I told my (at the time) almost 3 year old about boys' and girls' anatomy using the proper terms. But here's the thing, to him there are no bad connotations to those words. They are just words like any other words, they describe things. He had questions and he was calling some parts in words that he had invented, so it was important to explain. Anatomy is not shameful. 
My parents don't sugar coat anything. I learned that a peepee was a penis pretty early. Because of that, I was able to tell my mom that another boy showed his penis to me during class, in the first grade, when she picked me up after school and asked me if anything interesting happened. She was able to talk to the teacher about it the same day. At the same time we also never believed in Santa Claus because our parents also didn't sugar coat that either lol. And it was pretty well known that the tooth fairy was just parents stuffing money under your pillow...yeah, they made no illusions with us. Thats probably why we're godless heathens too lol. 
Infrared body cams need to be standard so we don't have to wonder like this. 
It could even be -your- cat! O_O You know. If you adopted in Michigan. 
Yeah you are supposed to put red flags on the wire for exactly this reason. 
He's lucky he didn't accidentally shoot himself in the hand. 
It honestly sounded human to me. I can't quite describe it but it sounded just like what you'd think whispering sounds like. Maybe both was caused by wind. Or maybe animals. And it probably has a simple explanation, but I WANT to believe it was a ghost telling us to get the fuck out. It'd be so cool if ghosts and shit actually existed. 
I know a girl who was left alone at 5 and told 'not to give the kitten a bath." Well being 5-years-old that is the first thing she did when her mom left. Her mom called a while later and said she was on her way home. The girl got scared because she hadn't listened, and attempted to dry the kitten in the microwave so her mom wouldn't find out that she had bathed it. Her mom definitely found out when she came home to *that* 
I thought maybe the guy had regular fires or had some sort of wood burning stove so seeing smoke wouldn't have been *that* weird? Idk. I live in the Midwest so our neighbors would've been down at the first sign or smoke. 
I am wondering how she knew how to do that..like, had she had a lot practice 
Interesting that the mom watched her husband get killed for doing something, then immediately did the same thing. 
The more you believe something is going to happen, the more the chances raise. For example, my grandpa said he would die at 73, just like his dad did. RIP Grandpa 1928-2001 
Holy shit. That is one hell of a blindside. :( I was suicidal last year and I tried to tell my gf most of what I was going through, even though I knew it hurt her a lot. I didn't want to make up my mind one day and have it hit her out of the blue. On a positive note: I've never been happier in my life than I am right now and we have a vacation planned early next month. 
I'm both not drunk enough and way too drunk for this shit right now. I can't explain it but this thread is freaking me out. 
Its not exactly easy to throw someone out of a car while you are driving. 
I believe you. Ive watched a demonstration of a helicopter and K9 unit. "Perp" starts off running across a field, helicopter comes down hovering a few feet off the ground, door opens and this GS just explodes out of the copter at a frightening speed after the guy. "A missile with teeth" is the best way I could describe it 
I'm really curious as to how widespread child pornography is. Someone once told me something about one website having 12,000 pictures posted in a day. I feel naive saying this but it seemed so shocking. It felt like a brick wall to the face of realization just how many images there may be in existence. I know it's global but how many people are trading images and how many images are there? What percentage of the global population has this issue touched, either as a consumer or a victim? 
I am so happy I graduated right before the digital age got going. In 2003 we had livejournal and the internet was still mostly for nerds. Texting cost per message so few people did it(I sent my first one the summer after grad) and few people had cell phones. I can't imagine going through that shit with facebook and everybody texting. 
Well, if the powder had worked in the past, then it's possible that it had a placebo effect and that it might have worked this time as well. 
Bruh. I don't even want to imagine waking up in a hospital not knowing why I was blind. 
The first time a chunk of coagulated blood fell off a patient it reminded me of canned cranberries at thanksgiving. Couldn't eat at thanksgiving a few months later because it just all came back 
I had a turbinate reduction where they stick a long needle up your nose and electrocute the offending tissue and was sitting there talking to my son's godfather when the dead tissue sloughed off and came down my throat. Good times. Good times. 
From what info OP gave us, I think the husband may have gotten drunk and raped the wife. 
"what do you do?" "oh, I work at a funeral home." "cool! So what do you do there?" "oh, I'm just the serial killer. You know how it is, just trying to *make* *ends* *meet*." 
Why do you use flashlights in this situation as opposed to just using the lights of the building? Seems like it would just make your current position super obvious while enabling someone to hide from you and avoid you. 
And even if you do that... Children will be Children. Damn how many times I did stupid stuff my mom explicitly told me not to do... 
I'm throwing out anything with a hood in my little ones room. Your poor friend :( There is never a recovery from this 
I always stick my fingers in my ears and hum loudly to drown out warnings yelled from upstairs windows. Keep it real, you know? 
At least he didn't end up over the cliff. This happened to an aquaintence of mine. Guy got sloshed and on his way home up a very rural winding road stopped to take a piss and went over the edge. The cops had his truck towed and 6 days later, after his girlfriend sobered up enough to realize he was missing, he was found dead there. 
I think the worst are the accidents. Everything else, the offender in some capacity chose what to become and even though it's sad we know why. But the accidents, you have no control over it, and then you've become a monster. 
When I was younger me and my friends would build little forts in the woods. Every time we'd go back there would be Tim cans and blankets inside. Bums would take over our forts! 
thats too flattering for these people. we need to develop a technology that lets them breath and stay alive in space so they can forever suffer in the cold, dark, soundless vacuum of space 
Here is my elbow. I have a penis/vagina. There. Simple. The bonus is that it isn't funny or exclusive, so there is no attraction to use it in silly or naughty ways. It seems to have worked fine. 
100% agree. Supernatural denizens would feel a lot safer if there was video evidence documenting police interactions. 
The probable explanation here is that what you saw is a common occurrence in abandoned mines 
Since OP said her dad sexually abused her I'd assume she figured it out while hiding from him. 
"What are you gonna do? Stab me?!" - words of man stabbed. 
Before you get a quarrel in the guts while you're in the privy. 
I wish he had said something. We were together for a long time & I had dealt with my own fair share of depression the first, I'd say 3 years of our relationship. I would have understood and he had to know that. I would like to think that he did at least. Unfortunately for everyone involved, he never said anything and ultimately it did cost him his life. I'm so very glad with how amazing things in your life seem to be though, and I wish you all of the best in your future. Have an amazing time on your vacation! 
Holy shit that sounds badass. I'd love to see that. 
It's rampant. Honestly, in my experience, we only arrested the 'low hanging fruit.' There are some complicated, sophisticated CP-rings where you can only get into their circle/network by bringing in new manufactured CP content. Those were some of the most intense, labor-filled investigations that spider webbed the fuck out. Never ending cases. 
Yep, grab some baby powder, or go outside and burn some paper to ash and use that. You'd have to make a show of it, and be very serious and convincing. Unfortunately, her calming reaction might be triggered by a ceremony or ritual that you may not know. 
I helped with a support group for pregnant women and new moms for awhile. I was there because I'd survived dealing with severe antepartum depression. One of the other support mamas had survived severe post partum psychosis. She had no history of mental health issues. After her son was born she just lost it. Her husband was home for brief leave and he had to call her parents to move her all the way from Alaska (I think? It was somewhere crazy far away) to Maryland so they could keep her and their son safe and her in treatment while he deployed. His "holy shit this is serious" moment was when he woke up to her crying that their son's "chest is bad and he won't be able to breathe" (he had bony and odd shaped ribs) but if she could "just open him up, everything could be back together and he'd live" She's okay now. She said she didn't fully get back to normal though until after their son had his first birthday. 
This surprised me when I turned 12. I don't know about other girls and may be tmi, but it's something I see almost monthly if you know what I mean. 
Job security. That guy's got upper management written all over him. 
I've always wondered the same thing as well. I always yell at the tv during crime dramas when they don't turn the lights on when they could and the serial killer gets the upper hand, kidnaps a team member, then holds them hostage for five minutes until they get sniped in the head. 
Life is pain, highness. Anyone who says differently is selling something. 
If not a hood, then it could just as easily be falling wrong and hitting your head on the curb, or the corner of a table, or even just the floor. Human beings can be remarkably resilient creatures. We can survive some insane things, but we are also remarkably fragile. Sometimes all it takes is a forceful bump in the wrong spot. 
I play with the screen off and just sense everything using the speakers. 
It took her SIX DAYS to sober up?? I can't even imagine being that drunk for that long... 
A father-son domestic dispute over stolen money ended this way 3 blocks down from my newly purchased house last year, dad stole the kids cash and the kid pulled a gun, dad asks him "what are you gonna do,shoot me?"... Yep 3 times and then steal his car and go on a high speed chase. Pretty crazy for a small Indiana town. 
Thorn has made this program where they are penetrating the dark web now to try and save victims of child porn/slavery. Ashton Kutcher founded it. 
Does her son have any idea? How old is he for that matter? How about your own child(ren)? 
You know how sometimes people can hear music in whatever random sounds. I wonder if sometimes the random sounds can seem like words and whether people's brains are more likely to interpret random sounds as words if there an imbalance of some kind going on because I had a similar experience, kind of. I was tired and driving my family down the road. I kept hearing something like a cop on a loudspeaker saying, "Pull over." There was no cop but I keep hearing it. Finally, it dawns on me that I still have my wipers on and as they move over the window, they are making a sound that sounded like somebody saying "Pull over." I was just tired. I can imagine if a person has some sort of imbalance preventing them from thinking straight on top of having random sounds seem like words. 
Suddenly the image in my head became less gruesome. Thought it was something entirely different happening. 
Jesus H Christ. Most kid stuff I can understand but that is legitimately stupid, lmao 
"So what I'm hearing is I'm getting a promotion?" "No, you're getting arrested." 
Life will eat you up if you can't laugh at its horror sometimes. 
Absolutely. I had a high speed motorcycle accident (triple digits) and survived with severe road rash, broken metacarpals and concussion. While I was undergoing PT, my therapist had a friend fall off the back of a bike traveling less than 30mph, hit her head on the curb and died. The major difference is I was wearing a full-face helmet and she wasn't wearing anything on her head. I've been a hardcore advocate for safety equipment since. 
Well if they were legitimate/full-on alcoholics, then days can go by unnoticed if it's a bad binge. 
lol me too, I was picturing something way more grotesque than period clots 
Wow I thought the clumps were just chunks of uterine lining. I'm not sure what's worse to be honest. 
I put by brother in a cardboard box and started stabbing it with a screwdriver. 
In my experience the uterine lining has more of a thin, *tissue* like texture to it, whereas the blood is like gloopy jello. 
watching a let's play, looks cool but the voice acting is...free quality. 
I loved when one of my younger dwarves got a strange mood, and made an artifact depicting the failed kidnapping by goblins in year X. The artist himself was the child that was nearly kidnapped, but saved by his father. 
And for those who didn't know, you have to play it through a second time, because once you've beaten the game once it lets you go through and listen to various hilarious tapes scattered throughout the game 
As a long-time Metroid fan, AM2R is *exactly* the game I wanted. It feels refined, the controls are great, the atmosphere is fantastic(it does some interesting stuff with lighting the 2D metroid didn't do), and it just does Metroid "right". 
It's fun until you die N1 as investigator to vet :( 
This game is so good it blows my mind. And the community is by far one of the best. I played Assassin's Creed and Prototype and multiple combat flight simulators and I can say 100% confidently that *none* of them have given me the same feeling of speed, freedom, and poise that the Warframe controls do. You wanna be a goddamn ninja? Play this game. 
Pokemon showdown is the best thing online right now IMO 
Yep. Played it exclusively for years. A real shame. I've left it behind now as getting a good scrap on Miller is nigh-on impossible. The second it hits a Bio-Lab, game over. Join in the stale-mate grind or leave. 
Loved ET. Played far too much as suicide engi trying to get the obj done. 
The game still has a suprisingly high number of people playing after all these years 
Hell yeah! I plowed an unspeakable number of hours into the Escape Velocity series when I was younger, and just played through Endless Sky in it's current state a few weeks ago. It's the first EV-like that has been anything like as good, and is (IMO) actually better than the originals in some regards. The progression is excellent (Nearing the end of the main plot arc? Surprise! There are more arcs in places you just found out exist!), though there are some unfinished edges. The biggest annoyance for me was that fleet management isn't good enough for how much it's needed in the late game, and I kind of miss the gravity well mechanic. 
I've had loads of fun playing this with friends. I wish I had played it before l4d though. 
World of Warships is amazing, especially considering it came from the same company that made world of tanks. 
HOLY SHIT Really??? I've been meaning to play Blood Dragon but never got around to buying it. 
Dota 2 is also authentically free to play, instead of the freemium pay4advantage model. 
Just watch out that multiplayer isn't always the most enjoyable experience. Singleplayer is amazing though. 
I've been saying for a while now that with a bit more marketing and promotion Smite could be a really popular game. Engaging gameplay, 80+ gods, several modes, and entertaining skins makes it really easy to get hooked. Not to mention it costs nothing to play! 
God the soundtrack in that game is so fitting, I still tear up a little when I listen to it. Such a great story! 
I actually really like singleplayer; pretty depressing with no bandits or other players, but sometimes I like it that way. 
Everything. BF2, 2142 and all DLC. Best bit, there are a lot (relative) of populated servers world wide. 
I think EA turn a blind eye. In fact, i think some of the guys behind it were in the Sir community, a mod maker for BF2 and community partner. 
I also heard that he programed the software to make the music, because no other software had the sound he wanted. Thats why some of the music has off time signatures mixed with 4/4. The music is definitely up there in the top 5 best soundtacks of all time. 
I think ti-86 outnumbers even Android sales by at least 2:1, so don't feel bad. 
Didn't you see the darkness in your own soul? The crushing weight of reality? Trippy images of your inner demons? ... doesn't everyone see this? :( 
My legendary engraver has an obsession with the disappearance of the old expedition leader. He draws things like Dwarves surrounding him and him laboring. Must be very emotional about it, because all of his masterpieces are about the subject. I like to think it's because my Dwarves are making up theories as to why he disappeared, and the engraver just wants to celebrate his life. In reality, the expedition leader was just dumb enough to stand under a drawbridge I was testing, which really sucks because he was useful. 
What got me was my friend explaining: "It's a futuristic space station where every job is a player, including you. The players just try to keep it running, which goes downhill really fast." I'm paraphrasing, but then that got me interested in his stories. 
I'll get downvoted to hell but fuck it. It's worth mentioning to new prospect players. I'm the kind of asshole who joined non-English speaking corporations (because people lower their guards when you speak their native language) and climbed high enough in the corp to steal everything and transfer it to my main account. It's totally legit in EVE. Piracy, corporate espionage and sabotage. Sabotage as in joining a corp and do everything you can to make them lose territory in null sec so your main faction can get in. I created drama between the CEO and his right hand to weaken the corp. I did that for a while. Mods won't help you because it's part of the game. Don't go complain. EVE is brutal. I was bad in combat so I went the easy way to make money. 
It seems to be powered by some sort of electricity. 
It is what you make it. If you want to be top dog then yes, it can become very much like a job but otherwise it can be a lot of fun. 
Sort of. It lets you get up to the third sized ships (frigates, destroyers, and cruisers) and only of your chosen race. Where subbed players can train skills to fly any race. But there is a ton of content and action that will be available to alpha (f2p) players. I know most corps/alliances have plans to entice newbros to join them and show them the ropes. I would recommend checking out faction warfare where those size ships make up 90% of fleets. 
To me, OFF was like an adventure game with the mechanics of an RPG. The actual combat and puzzles themselves were never really the main point, they're there to give the game progression and to immerse you in the setting / game world. 
Yeah, the game was really fun. I kept waiting for more levels and guns or anything really. Turns out there was nothing more coming :( 
ShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpaceShiftSpace 
Good concept, bad design. Even when it was populated; getting into an actually contested fight was a miracle. 95% of the time it's either Zerging or being Zerged. 
I just join some public platoons when I play, usually there is one or two that gives you organized objectives. You can also mute the inherent weirdos and annoying people. 
You get most characters unlocked, but be aware that 2K announced Evolve's F2P transformation was "completed" in the past week or two.. Meaning they've taken control of the game away from Turtle Rock Studios and it likely won't ever be patched or content updated again. I don't know if they ever even finished setting up microtransactions, so I don't think it will last despite a huge player influx when it first went F2P. 
They bogged it up with the sheer amount of cosmetics they added. I remember when the first hats came out, everything was fine. When it became clear that the addition of cosmetic items were going to become a recurring thing, people actually posted in forums about how eventually the game is going to suffer because of it. TF2 had become nothing more to Valve than a testing lab for trying out microtransaction systems. This is why the game went f2p shortly after the release of the item store and why they implemented the exact same system into CSGO. TF2 has turned into a marketing project more than a game. If the whole 'contract' thing in TF2 actually took off, I expect it would have made its way into CSGO too. 
Well, now that we have Casual matchmaking instead of Quickplay, you can select the maps you want to play or not, so if that was your issue with the game, you could think about getting back to it! If you don't remember the maps by their name, you can always search the game's official wiki. We have stupid queue times now, though. :/ 
Emi is best, but it was the Lilly route (specifically the good end) that made me cry ugly. 
My only complaint is that it's nearly impossible to find a vanilla server nowadays. All the servers with people in them have all kinds of mods and shit to where the game is just like L4D- unlimited ammo, lots of guns, etc... even turned friendly-fire off, and make it so you can't get infected and die like that. makes the game piss-easy since the game isn't balanced for being primarily a shooter. also, just who the fuck plays anything with unlimited ammo? I loved L4D1. i just don't want NMRiH to try to be that.... it's cool and unique, but it's a waste to try to replicated left4dead. 
They outsourced its development, and by the time they realized what was happening, too many people fucking loved it. Soon as Warships came along, I abruptly abandoned the Tanks account I'd sunk four years and thousands of dollars into. Warships is just so crazily better in every single aspect. 
I started Warthunder as an arcade player myself which is ok for air battles if you just want to fire away,but for tanks it's realistic or nothing imo. Also air rb is waaaay more rewarding and fun once you get into it not being like arcade. There is no other feeling like winning a 1v1 with the odds against you and using most of your ammo,only to see another enemy pop up 4km out and 1km above you while you got about 40 rounds of 20mm left. Gives you the kicks if you got the will to actually try your best. 
He's back, and still #1 (with some competition now). 
Is it really free to play, if you pay with your soul? 
:v ? Notice the space in between the question mark and the v. Every fucking time. 
Yeah man, i'd agree. 1600 hours on Dota 2, I'm 6 months clean though. 
Well, my teenage years are back! Bf2 special forces and 2142s titan mode are the most fun I've ever had with online multiplayer. 
I guess it all depends on if EA is still selling battlefield 2 and 2142. 
Never had a game where literally every single song I listen to is my new favorite song in a videogame. The art, music, and story are so spot on I can't believe the guys name hasn't been on any more games the Cave Story. Though I don't follow Pixel, I just haven't heard *anything* about him since Cave Story. 
I doubt there are 2 billion ti86s sold but probably more ti86s than windows phone 
It's not a proper engraving unless an inanimate object/animal is screaming. 
And the Clowns! Oh the Clowns! The Circus is a must visit! 
Then when they go to attack us we can just leave socks everywhere outside so the terminators will keep forgetting to exterminate us and run to pick up the socks. 
What the fuck.. this game sounds really weird/great. I'm downloading now. I'm going to be pissed if cool shit like this doesn't happen. 
but doesn't multithread (unless it changed recently) 
You are going to need more than today to learn it. You need to come in probably 3 weeks worth of time and even then still probably had significantly more investment to go. 
"I finally figured out how to build stuff, how the crafting works, what my dwarves need, how to build a hallway full of cage traps, etc. I've got enough beds for everyone, everybody's happy because I have plenty of diverse food and booze and statues and shit. There's no way this fortress could fall, I pretty much beat the game." URIST WALLFLOORS HAS BEEN FOUND COMPLETELY DRAINED OF BLOOD URIST WALLFLOORS'S WIFE IS THROWING A TANTRUM "no please don't do that" 
It did. you can almost see the outline of Eve Online behind dwarf fortress 
They fixed the Tiger cheese though, props, that made speedrunning hilariously easy. 
That was when they cemented the fact that they can make anything hilarious as dicks. 
It's like, 10 minutes of doing your job, and an hour and a half of putting out metaphorical fires. 
I won't downvote you. Scumbags like you are what make EVE the amazing place that it is ;) 
It happened in Toronto a few years back when it rained and then the temperature dropped, freezing everything. It snapped alot of power lines and my neighbourhood (sub urban area in GTA) was out for almost a week. Not a impossible thing to happen 
Yeah I have absolutely no idea what I'm "supposed" to do in that game but I've just been running through single player missions and love it! Hell you can even clear one area then just sit there admiring the view if you want because that game is fucking gorgeous. 
Oh yeah, when you had a fight that was small, like ~16 v ~16 it was really amazing. 
What do you mean by contracts? Because the contracts are similar to the Operation passes and their missions 
Why would somebody play computer games at work (unless they're self-employed) 
Lilly route is simply best route. It's a sweeping romantic epic. 
Yep. Nobody should be able to copyright something so vague. 
I just started playing it about a week ago. I can't get enough already in tier 5 ships for every country except Russia. My friend says it's not a huge accomplishment because now getting new ships is so much of a grind. 
Also Kled. "After we finish murderin' these folks, whaddaya think? Tacos? Yeah, tacos." "HOLY S#@% WHERE ARE WE?" "Shh! It's time to get violent... and *weird*." 
2142 titan mode was what made me fall in love with FPS games. It was so much fun back in the day. 
They arnt and they shut down the server's a long time ago and have said they're OK with project reality so it's fine 
He makes a lot of small games; Cave Story wasn't intended to be a hit either let alone translated. He has 2 free games on Steam (Pink Hour and the sequel Pink Heaven) and a paid game Kero Blaster. Actually, Kero Blaster is half off right now on Steam. 
Wait, so your telling me that this game simulates the cats licking themselves and actually checks the floor they are on to see if they ingest anything? After that the game also checks how much alcohol the cats have accidently licked to see if it gets alcohol poisoning? How do the devs think of this?!?! 
It'll happen, but it'll take you a while to understand it and make it happen. There's a quickstart guide on the wiki, you'll need it. 
It didn't. Still, if you reduce the amount of dwarves and regularly clean up behind those ungrateful, drunk, stinking, vomitting, brawling, singing, tantruming,... bastards, it's not much of a problem. 
To be fair 3 weeks is a bit much. IMO you can learn how to get a simple fortress running in a couple of days. Then theres the bazillion things you can do on top of that but as you know you'll never be able to try them all. I can recommend captnducks and 51ppycups tutorials on youtube 
Twist: Urist Wallfloors's wife is also the most well-liked dwarf in the fort.... and she's just decided to die of melancholy in response to his passing, so you've lost two for the price of one, and the source is still on the loose. Your dwarves don't have Discipline, so they can't bring themselves to bury the bodies, and the sight of the dehydrated wife's corpse in the dining hall is giving everyone really bad thoughts. Have fun! 
Read the wiki, play as assistant. If you have questions, feel free to PM me! 
Also the reason why scumbags like me exists in EVE is because the universe allows (encourage) it. I left EVE for a while and when I saw the Butterfly effect trailer I realized how much I miss that. Haven't touched EVE in like 4 years. A little too involved for a subscription game. Maybe I'll go back when it's free to play (although I expect some heavy restrictions/quality drop after that. 
Dude, I've been playing for three years and I don't know what I"m supposed to do either. 
Though it got incredible when a zerg going one way met a zerg going the other. Fucktons of players but even numbers preventing one side just getting obliterated. 
Call your gaming PC and see if you can get dinner. Maybe you guys just drifted apart, through no fault of your own. 
I used to be amazing with the choppers in that game. It was fun to fly them upsidedown under bridges and such. 
I swear it was weird seeing him cracking jokes in an American accent. But great movie nonetheless. 
It's actually more than that. It simulates the dwarves drinking in the tavern. If they get a bit jolly they can spill their drinks on the floor. When creatures walk through, they can get contaminants from the floor on themselves. When cats get contaminants on themselves, they clean themselves. When they do, they ingest the contaminant. If an animal ingests a thing, it gets the positive and negative effects of the thing - in this case the alcohol content. It then simulates the cat's body and understands that too much alcohol will kill it. 
Well the bigger issue was that their livers were too small to deal with the amount of alcohol they licked up. A dwarf will maybe have 4 units of alcohol a season. Any more then that and they would die. The cats were ingesting upwards of one unit of alcohol and dying. 
I think he was talking about mermaid farms, I haven't played much but mermaid bones are very expensive so people started making mermaid farms and killing baby mermaids to sell bones. It was patched out obviously. 
It also helps to remember to send every kitten straight to the butcher, *before* it can claim a dorf thrall. 
I've been playing for years and theres still industries I have no idea how they work 
Then a butterfly holds the door open while the zombie elephants and reanimated badger heads pour into your main (non-trapped) entrance. Meanwhile the guy who mans the lever for the door is on break, and Urist McDumbfuck decides this is the perfect time to hold a party, and Urist Nuktuk decides this is the perfect time to go into labor, giving birth to her child right in the stairway where the undead horrors are descending. Of course your military is all knocked out from bruises from the danger room and can't muster into action, and the military commander decides it's a full moon and turns into a wereweasel because some fucker slipped into the base the month before and bit him. As you finally have your undead secretary pull the "pump lava onto the overworld to fucking just burn everything" lever you suddenly realize that her door isn't made of a magma-safe material and she, too, burns as the lava and miasma suffocate the rest of them. 
Oh man, that attack chopper/jet hybrid thing was the best. Doing attack runs on ground enemies with the rockets was so fun, even though they were practically useless on anything but other aircrafts. 
Trouble is DF is still single threaded. It can't make use of a fancy new CPU. 
People have had dwarves strangled by *their own* disembodied hands. 
Not really patched out. They just reduced the value of mermaid bones so it wasn't as worth doing. The basic idea was to catch mermaids and chain them them in a pool of water just barely deep enough for them to survive. (Mermaids breathe water only.) Keep a merman or two nearby. Eventually, nature will take its course and the mermaids will become pregnant. Once they give birth, take the babies away immediately and chain them up in an open field. They'll quickly suffocate with no water to breathe. Leave the field of dead babies alone until the bodies decompose into bones. Collect the baby bones and use them to make cool stuff like flutes, mugs and even little arrows. You can make a fortune selling them to other people, like the Elves that would be horrified if you were to make them out of something unethical, like wood. 
Which ones? The new manager actually makes it really simple to set up most of them. I now have beekeeping, soaping, and paper making fully automated. All my cloth is being dyed different colours. My roasts mostly consist of dwarven sugar, cave wheat, quarry bushes and turkey eggs. Setting these things up was really, really simple with the new work orders. You basically just have to build a couple of every workshop and then you don't even need to worry about where it's actually taking place. 
Now that sounds a lot closer to the sort of thing that will bring you back to reality in Dwarf Fortress pretty quick, yep! 
There is a reason for that. The current UI is temporary. Toady is worried that if he spends too much time working on it now, he'll just have to change it again later or re-do it when he adds new things he hasnt thought of yet. The UI is on the dev-list, but practically last on it. 
I once had a legendary axe dwarf rip apart a troll with her teeth for some reason. In the same invasion, a troll kept trying to kill a kitten, who kept dodging and eventually managed to dive into the troll, making him fall into a rock trap which ended up breaking his leg so the kitten got away. That was a clowny fort. 
That's how you know he was actually disturbed by it. If he wanted to balance it he'd just make other races disgusted or something. He just wanted that shit gone 
They would go insane. That's why you have mist dance from the ceiling. It's the best way to grow up as a well balanced adult. 
It's hard to think of insane details like the cat thing while you're promgramming your other insane ideas. I'd imagine that's where the other guy comes in 
I DIDN'T have mist dancing from the ceiling. I wonder if that explains the way I am. 
That shard of reality was retconned, and no longer exists. We do not speak of it. Modern cats are much less likely to consume alcohol in amounts likely to annihilate the liver of a dwarf. 
I watch the YouTube channel for this ALL the time! It is my absolute favorite. 
I was just wondering about that the other day. Somewhere out there is a lobster who is bigger than all the others. How big is he? We dont know, but he is out there. 
The Marianna trench is just a space ship crash site. 
I can't believe that Old Gregg references still get thrown around. That shit is ancient. Could you learn to love me? 
I'm just imagining a T-rex swimming around in the depths of the ocean, furiously flinging around its tiny arms. 
"We will construct a series of breathing apparatus with kelp, we will be able to trap certain amounts of oxygen. It's not going to be days at a time, an hour hour 45. No problem. That will give us enough time to figure out where you live, go back to the sea, get more oxygen and then stalk you. You just lost at your own game. You are out gunned and outmanned. That go the way you thought it was gonna go?" 
Scientists found a shark off the coast of Greenland that they believe is over 400 years old. Think about that. That thing is damn near as old as European colonies in North America! 
Don't forget a fish that literally has a fishing rod/ bait sticking out of the top of its head 
There was a whole lot of nothing at the bottom of the Mariana Trench when James Cameron went 
Dude you just gave me the heebie-jeebies. Goddamn. 
Dude I haven't thought about that in years. Creepshow may have been my first live action titty. 
Once you're in past your knees, you're no longer at the top of the food chain 
Mammals not likely because they need air... But a 40-50m fish demon, or a 35m radius cephalopod? Maybe. 
Craaaab people, craaaab people. Look like crabs, talk like people. 
Thanks - we're mapping our way up to Canada right now, and Remotely Operated Vehicle dives start on 07 June. 
Funny thing about never dying of old age and just getting bigger, is that you start being unable to find enough food to sustain yourself and eventually starve to death. 
The lobster grew tired. It knew it could no longer survive and hunt on it's own. It's growth had peaked, and if nothing was done, death would soon follow. It laid down, and prepared. The shell grew, the flesh changed. Soon it could sense other lobsters. It could sense their little brains. It would need their pitiful assistance to survive. #SERVE ME More lobsters gathered. #FEED ME They brought clamflesh and shrimp. #CLEAN ME The other lobsters began to chip away at dead shell, freeing the new shell beneath. And so it went, day in, day out. Until it again could grow no larger. The other lobsters were too slow, too inefficient. Again the flesh changed, and it could sense new minds approaching. Their shells massive, housing more than one flesh. #SERVE ME The submarine crew began screaming 
The Marinas Trench is all that remains of a previous Earth 
I knew this would be here. Really cool to see what he learned from *Sphere*, and then to watch him finesse it a bit more in *Prey*. If you like being terrified in the same way, definitely read *Prey*. 
All the old powers of the Ocean have entered into a holy alliance to exorcise this spectre: Octopus and Shark, Fish and Whale, Crab Radicals and Jellyfish police-spies. 
There was this fishing game way back on PS1, you can catch lots of variety of fishes. Near the end of the campaign, you can catch insane fishes like Pharaoh Perch in a pyramid. For the last boss, it's a T-rex. Yup, big old T-rex swimming in murky water, trying to nibble your tiny bait. E: found it : Fisherman's Bait 2: Big Ol' Bass 
WE ARE OUTGUNNED. OUTMANNED OUTNUMBERED OUTPLANNED 
or he just sucks are finding life because his lights were on the whole time! 
*swims to bottom of ocean* Giant fucking shark: ayy finally! What took so long? Want a beer? 
It's looking more and more like Cthulu is the correct answer. 
There is a lot of poisonous shit by the shore. Freaking pointy water plants that make your balls shrivel up and fall off. I'd say anything past a small puddle on the sidewalk and you're out of your element. 
All of my nopes. I can't even kill it with fire. :( 
I would pay a hefty $17 to see a 45m fish demon in an aquarium some day. 
I thought it was "taste like crab, talk like people." 
They'll come out next time, "Hey, what the fuck happened to those huge lizard bitches?" 
why cant they just eat less and stay a certain size? are they always eating one step ahead of their size? 
Shhh. I prefer to believe there's a monstrously huge lobster down there somewhere, preying on giant squid and horrifying eldritch abominations in the depths of the ocean. 
Madness is knowing Cthulhu is a lobster, and we've been eating it's spawn. 
They just aren't meant to be that big. It'd be a hell of a test for modern science as the bigger they get, the more issues would pop up. 
Would be even more ominous if they were determined to have only been there for a few days. 
i thought that too, i guess that's what they were going for and not just some random creature lol who knew 
When someone agrees with you and uses that many capital letters, it's time to change opinions. 
IIRC octopi die after they have babies, yet those babies still become intelligent. Jesus, imagine if they DIDN'T die after having babies and could teach them stuff. They'd be smart as hell 
Man those old ps1 games were awesome like that. You remind me of the wcw wrestling game. 
I gave my love to Erin, she promised to be true, I went to war and to come back to find 5 British soldiers had their way with her... It was consensual. 
Smart move. Everyone knows cotton blankets repel shark teeth. 
I doubt they're great a detecting light but I wouldn't be surprised if they detected him and swam away anyway 
The water is not that dark/black in real life, the camera just didn't adjust to the light. To the person diving, they can see 20+ feet in front of them, this is just like diving to the bottom of a 50 foot pool. 
Do you take any opportunity to talk about the fact that you have a jet ski?? 
It's more a matter of a certain animals' genetics that dictate whether they grow endlessly or stop at a certain point. Besides, most animals don't have a concept of dieting. Their instinct is to eat and reproduce. But once they can't find enough to eat, and they're not a migratory animal, they just starve. 
Just stick cybernetics on it until it becomes a gargatuan monster. THen you stick guns on it. Lots of guns. And a cybernetic implant that makes it want to kill and blow everything (except your dudes). 
hey i've read that book/seen that movie, sort of. you should check our sphere by michael chrichton or the movie by the same name. its a cool story about a crew investigating a spaceship found in the ocean thats been there for hundreds of years or something. but theres something interesting about the ship. I don't want to give away too much more. I could give a minor detail if you want. but its a cool story. 
Holy shit stop, I'm dying from laughter. I love you. 
Thunder was my shit! You could play as animals and stuff, it was awesome 
Or they detect non visible light and saw what looked like the fucking sun moving towards them and bolted. 
When you buy Artorias' armor in the untended graves, it reads:"The twilight blue tassel is damp, and will ever remain so.". It's not a far stretch that something tainted with the Abyss would be permanently wet if has a connection to the sea. Having a dark sea conflict with the first flame would be a fitting contrast, too. 
It's more the fact that you're going even more into a hole under water with limited air supplies exploring whatever beasts lurk among the sands and rocks. One mistake and you're hiccuping water. Dead. You're fishfood now. No one finds you ever again until your unfortunate bones are found well rested under some sand 1000+ years from now, your soul tormented, restless, unable to be set free, wandering the dank dark sea floor until you can finally be put to rest. 
Listen, just because I have a jet ski, it doesn't mean my whole life revolves around my jet ski. You just don't understand because you don't have a jet ski like me. 
All but the last sentence support what could be a sci-fi horror movie 
This isn't upvoted enough. Australians are afraid of real life Jaws. Because Jaws is the worst kind of demon. 
man i got an SGA boner right now. Why the FUCK is all this shit on TV now and that isn't?! 
Wouldn't be surprised if some of them were fucking blinded by it 
"Deep Sea: Great bodies of water serve as a bulwark guarding sleep, and an augur of eldritch truths." I have that rune memorized for kicks, but when Aldrich was said to have dreamt of the age of the deep sea, I had a slight nerdgasm. I'm just fine with the series staying separate, but what if... 
I don't know what's more horrifying, a lopster eating me, or a lopster reproducing with me. 
I know we are so boring and anal about things. I sit here and watch a boring old white or black guy talk about the latest murder as he stares into my soul with no emotion of happy or sad. 
I read that as Jews. Late night redditing is starting to mess with my head 
Okay, somebody needs to toss the Welsh some spare vowels; they keep trying to make do with "L" and "Y" and it's just not working. 
Death by Mewtwo ain't nothing to scoff at! However, being revived by the... the tears of every other pokemon in the room... yeah. 
It's also implied that pokemon hunter M (or J, maybe some other letter) died in a crash 
Dragons fly in the eastern sky Easy to miss for the untrained eye Remove your gaze from the blue up high And you'll surely be dead this night! 
Also, if you think about it, it is only drops per gallon, which isn't fully absorbed in the slightest, and once they are rinsed and cooked there isn't any smell of the clove oil and as such a strong smell you can assume they are clear of the oil. 
In 7th grade I read a bunch of Crichton books including Sphere and Andromeda Strain. Both were good and fucked up to read as a kid, but AS was on a different level. 
What the.....does God hate you people? Have you done something to offend him? What sacrifice do you all need to make in order to appease the almighty? 
When we share a country with literal dinosaurs, bad stuff's bound to happen. 
Tinted visors are intended to help with post concussion syndrome, however your point still stands because that's not why most people wear them. 
To be fair, if I had plenty of money, I might do it. Have you ever tried an entry level, but decent, peaty scotch and coke? Say Laphroaig quarter cask? Smokey and delicious. One of the best highballs around. That'll run you around $70 (Canadian). I wouldn't spend more than that, because past that price point it wouldn't make a difference. But add the coke, and divide by the number of 1oz drinks you can make out of it, and you're spending anout $2.80 a drink. That's better than at most bars. 
Until halfway through the second sentence I thought your hobby was BDSM. 
I used this on my second grade project on Ancient Greece. 20 years later, still associate it with that. 
Wait... people actually do that? I wouldn't dream of doing that shit. Except maybe five stripes as a joke. Have these students never heard the phrase "earning your stripes"? 
I'm really not a tea person but when I was a Starbucks employee and teavana was introduced in store to replace tazo, a lot of people were really unhappy. Most of their teas are really gimmicky and have a added flavour. I guess that's fine and if people like it, that's ok, but it's definitely different from tea as I grew up understanding it. 
I know not everyone that is into fencing is rich, but i'm totally picturing you sitting at a giant mahagony desk in golf clothing with a greyhound sitting next to you while you type this. "Isn't that right miffy, leon paul is for douchebags". 
Pornhub is entry level anyways. Do xvideos if you want to find some specific videos and don't mind seeing thumbnails of gross shit. 
Not quite the same, but I'm in the Air Force, currently doing training on a Navy base. There's a dude that regularly wears a shirt to the mess that says: "Stay low, go fast. Kill first, die last. One shot, one kill. No luck, all skill." And every time I see him all I can think is like, dude you're an electronics technician in the fuckin' Navy. You ain't killing shit. 
Also, don't get me started on the yarn and yarn snobs. I'll take James C Brett and Stylecraft over 'luxury' brands any day :D 
Back in the day I bought everything Butterfly, how are they doing nowadays? 
Nothing wrong with having rose hairs, regardless of how much experience you have. Don't need to fix what's not broken. 
As a good friend of mine said: I get all my sex gear from Bunnings (Australian hardware store). 
Fake subdials are what I can't stand most about fashion watches. 
And their HDMI cables, Jesus $100 for an HDMI cable? It's sad people fall for them 
I actually went with an ASUS gaming motherboard because I liked its specs. It does have lots of stupid bullshit like pulsating LEDs but otherwise has been a solid board. At least you can turn off that crap. 
Do you mind explaining why? I've been thinking of buying a tent. 
I always thought it was intended as a luxury line, you know, him being him. 
While I agree that Rubik's brand cubes don't come close to real speed cubes, I'd call the real Beats of the speed cubing industry V-Cube. Their cubes are low quality, and ridiculously overpriced. Beyond that, they use their vague patents to take advantage of other cube companies that actually have much better cubes with designs that are not vert similar. 
Every HR rep everywhere: Must know big data methods Must have 10 years experience with databases Get to the job and it's an Excel workbook with 60 columns, only a third of which are imported into SQL Server. And yet, somehow, we still didn't get a DBA who could manage it for almost 3 months. 
Hey now, no other biwheeled product is as efficient at turning gasoline into noise without the byproduct of horsepower. 
Moleskine notebooks are overpriced for what they are tbh. They're still not bad notebooks, but I wouldn't use them everyday because the paper is a little too thin for me. My go-to notebooks are Muji notebooks. They're less expensive and better-quality than Moleskines; a 5-pack of notebooks only costs $4 and the paper is much thicker. Unfortunately, some things (like the notebooks) frequently sell out online, and the only physical stores (in the US) are located in the NYC area or California. 
Good one. I only care about boutique pedals if they're some crazy thing that has no equivalent in cheaper mass-produced pedals, like those crazy Mid-Fi Electronics pedals that sound like a tape recorder dying, or ones that recreate a pedal that's not produced anymore like the BeeBaa or something. But yeah, more often than not it's like... dude, this is just a distortion pedal. 
I just buy a branch with the right curve for 15-30 and it works for me. 
Don't be silly. I've seen the types of cuffs security guards have, BDSM'ers wouldn't be caught dead with those flimsy bracelets. We have much cooler restraints. 
A lot of officers get differently colored cuffs so theirs don't get mixed up with other officer's cuffs. 
There are schools who give out stripes for each license the kids get. (Like, one for private, a second one for the instrument rating, a third for commercial, etc.) Usually any school where the students have to wear anything you could put epaulets on is a place to avoid like the plague. 
My problem with Teavana is that to differentiate the tea they're all herbals, florals or fruit teas to some extent. And then the decent "pure" teas are expensive. 
Read in the voice of Patrick Stewart. It was fantastic. 
That's what I was thinking. There's only one real way to settle a fencing dispute. 
Excuse me, but do you have a moment to talk about our Lord and Savior, Bing? 
Bro, don't hate, I bet that guy has a 2.0 K/D ratio in Call of Duty. 
That's actually kind of funny. Seems like more of a joke at their own expense. 
Well y'know, everyone needs a hobby. For some it's trains, and for you it's drinkin' 
Is that what I was doing wrong? I was using their app to brush up on my high school and college German, and I was disturbed by how it didn't explain the conjugations; it just throws them at you in sentences. I never looked at the website. 
I'll unravel mohair and cashmere sweaters from the thrift shop. 
Still very decent if you look at their higher tier items. I've been out of the competitive scene for a while but I've been rocking their Sriver FX rubber for a good half decade. 
Absolutely. Shielding and durability is important, don't get me wrong, but it's there to protect against a lucky blast. If you train pilots to rely on soaking up hits, you're training to fail. A starfighter is, at heart, a low cost, high efficiency surgical damage delivery platform, not a mobile mini space tank. Although the costs remain a tightly held secret, even the Executor fleet and second Death Star ultimately went with TIE Interceptor escort fighters - basically TIE Avengers but without shields. Imagine perhaps that a TIE Avenger is around X times as effective as a TIE Interceptor, but costs 2X as much... The economics ultimately work out one way. 
This. I had a female from mid high-school, through 5 years of college, and into my adult life. She was the best pet. She got big. She was never mean, always pleasant to deal with. Perfect pet for someone who wants a tarantula. Named her Pele. When she died I buried her in a fancy box and put her favorite rock on top and cried a ton. I briefly had what turned out to be a male orange baboon tarantula. That mother fucker wouldn't even let me open the cage to drop in food. I had to work a way to get water in with a fucking straw. He went complete psycho (breeding vibes perhaps) and would run around and anything he saw his legs would flail up and attack. Like 48 hours of that shit... then died. I threw him out in his container. The only benefit was it scared the homeless guy rooting through our dumpster and he decided to go to a different dumpster. That freaking spider... it taught me to never want something more fancy or exotic. 
I think glass boards were more of a thing in the 80s because they fit the decor better 
*cashier ringing up fly paper, 2x4s, and chains* "What are you two on about?" *Couple looks at each and pauses before answering in unison* "... Monster hunting." 
I like the Amazon garbage for what it is: cheap decorative shit that I can take to a burn without worrying about ruining my nice stuff. 
I responded on the firefighter's post about those shirts. "Straight Outta Nightshift" is funny (and not self aggrandizing, it works for a lot of professions), "Cute enough to stop your heart, skilled enough to restart it" ehhhh, sure that's not too bad and still somewhat funny(?) "I'm a nurse, what's your super power," "Do you want to talk to the doctor in charge, or the nurse who knows what's going on," "I'm a nurse, let's just assume I'm never wrong," "I'm a nurse, so I'm better than you. Hero worship me while I jerk off on my stethoscope." Okay, the last one's not real, but it's close enough. I take pride in being a nurse, it's my passion and I feel honored to help people (to recovery or a good death) and all that, but I'm not jerking myself off in the street about it. Nor do I feel superior to anyone because of it. 
Holy crap! Crazy Idea. Hide-and-seek pro-league! You do it in an enclosed jungle space with marshalls around. You can wear suits and stuff. 5v5, you hide then touch the 'base' to win. 
Or chronograph buttons that don't do anything. Even worse is the submariner esque dial that doesn't rotate 
I know what you mean,. I have a big collection of Vallejo, army painter and scale 75. However gw paints are very good quality, some of them anyway. Mephiston red, agrax earthshade, they have the best collection of beiges also imo. So kind of agree but wouldn't see it as a wasted money. Their carry cases, limited edition codexs, however would also be something I would see as similar to beats. 
It definitely is. I got one of them fancy, expensive wooden clarinets (for concerts; used a plastic student one for marching band) and I still bought a separate mouthpiece to go with it. I definitely don't see the benefit in buying a fancy *bell*. In my experience the bell seems to mostly be decorative. I mean, there's a sound difference when the clarinet doesn't have a bell, but it's not super noticeable. So I don't see what possible benefit an expensive, custom-made, handcrafted bell would have other than aesthetics. (Mine has a fancy carving design on it! :D Nobody has ever noticed.) 
Motherboards are kind of an exception to the rule because: 1. They are actual computer parts that might have features you want for gaming 2. It's a meaningless buzzword label, so they can slap on the entire line of products There are plenty of hilariously expensive motherboards out there and worthless features that are bundled in. But many of the good ones are still "gaming" versions. 
Cabela's likes to mark up items with their brand name on it, so while their tents are more than serviceable and are usually well made, they're also prices significantly higher than something else of the same quality. This actually doesn't pertain to just tents from Cabela's either, it's practically everything they have a name on. Which is really smart when you think about it, because catalog hunters and a lot of younger folk like to throw a couple extra bills their way to get a big Cabela's logo placed all on their stuff. Cabela's knows this, so they play to that crowd. I don't blame them, either. 
BD is definitely the most popular brand, but climbing isn't really a big enough market to have a 'beats' equivalent yet. Probably because a lot of climbing culture revolves around living out of your car and being as cheap as possible 
I'm one of the weirdos that likes the smell of Ballistol 
Real Techniques is fine for me. I even use their beauty blender sponge instead of the real deal 
Exactly! Why does this post have so many upvotes?? His brushes are known to be of fantastic quality- even for the price. 
I liked them because they fit comfortably in my ear (unlike those apple headphones) and if I paid $10 for the 2 year Best Buy Warranty they'd replace them no questions asked every time they broke (no additional charge, or $10 if I wanted to renew the warranty or change colors). Since I had my phone/ipod in my pocket, the wire was getting jiggled around all the time, especially while riding my bike, and I'd break them all the time, right at the connection between the jack and the wire. I paid like $70 total for 10-14 headphones between 5th grade and graduating high school. 
I still use Skullcandy for earbuds. They're not terrible quality, not terribly expensive, and they fit in my ear comfortably. Granted, the skullcrushers I ditched within a year of getting them. Way too heavy. 
Yeah, I only got mine a few months ago, but they hold together well, which is a problem for me, having destroyed several pairs of earbuds. I'm in Canada, so maybe they're different here? 
I haven't seen anything vcube in years, I assumed they phased out of popularity after shengshou improved all their mechs 
What I would guess, from reading a lot of historical military fiction lately: killing a man wearing plate armor. Come to think of it, now I'm curious whether you could drive an arrow through a bulletproof vest... ETA: okay, I get it, you totally can. TIL that bulletproof vests are not arrow-proof vests. 
*rabble rabble rabble* Don't get me started on those GD GC-X12's!! 
Depends on the category. Air tools: CP, Astro, Ingersoll-Rand, Sioux Hand tools: Gearwrench, Williams USA, Knipex (still pricey), Wilde, Taiwan made Tekton (for less essential pieces) Cordless: Milwaukee M18 
And do it as expensively as H-D. Man their bikes are pricey compared to similar sized bikes from other brands. I briefly considered Harleys (I admit I liked the Fat Bob) and the salesman told me flat out, "we are selling a lifestyle, we're a lifestyle brand." Uhhh, no thanks, I'm actually looking for a motorcycle... 
Go check out their sales for 2015. They went back to previous specs and ditched the Robot bullshit after the customer base made it pretty clear what their thoughts were with their money. 
Never knew that was something you had to provide for yourself. I guess I assumed they were issued by the department. 
I don't think you'd *lose* a sale on it in Sweden, as we're very conflict-avoiding as a people; but salesmen wouldn't try it anyway, because it'd be unbelievably rude. Unless it's something not easily re-divided, like meat. 
Plus it's tea so a few g's isn't a like a few flecks of tea. 
Exactly. "Hop up onto daddy's lap miffy, it's time for your morning champagne" 
My dad used to have "FENCER" as a vanity license plate and all my friends thought he was a contractor. 
You can also use Bing Rewards (soon to be Microsoft Rewards) to get free amazon gift cards for searching for porn. 
Look at Mr. "I have the speed to download 1Tb of porn". 
You can tell who they are from the three minitor pagers, duty boots every day and t shirts for your firehouse that no one else seems to have because they had them custom done... Source: Volunteer Fire Officer 
XC runner here. We hate ourselves and running in general. But we can't quit for some reason. Please send help. 
I speak fluent German and decided to play with Duolingo a while back. I found the complete lack of grammar training to be unbearable. As much as people hate learning grammar (unless you're a nerd like me and love it!), you absolutely need to learn it. A language like German is impossible to speak properly without understanding grammar. 
I recently found a sweater on sale at Nordstrom ($30) that is cashmere from last season. Not my size but got it anyway because there is no way I could get that kind of yarn for so cheap in skeins. Now I just need to get a yarn meter to get better estimates when I recycle it. 
I'm a vet tech. Anybody who brings a snake in for the first time gets an hour long appt. Most of the time, whatever habitat and nutrition instructions they found on the internet were complete crap. Had a guy bring a python in who kept a large hot rock and heat lamp in his habitat, without giving the snake a cool place to escape from the heat. He ended up slowly cooking the snake to death over a couple months. 
People are afraid of meat juice contamination, so they use glass or plastic instead of wood. A friend of mine posted the other day that wood cutting boards are unsafe and part of the reason people get sick. I haven't had a glass cutting board since my dog turned on the stove while I was out of the room and the fucking thing exploded. (you know because I'm a moron and left it sitting on top of the stove after I was finished - didn't want to toss it in the sink because I thought it would break.) 
Yet trout are often drawn to hare's ears, which looks like the cat vomit of flies. 
Fossil makes most of those brands' watches. Burberry, Michael Kors, Adidas, Marc Jacobs, Emporio Armani, Diesel, etc 
I have a buddy who owns an Invicta diver-style watch...and the bezel has, instead of numbers, the text "I N V I C T A" printed around it. 
But to me, the person in the audience who doesn't play clarient and understands nothing, fancy bell guy is totally the best performer and the others are just super thankful to share his stage space. 
It was actually a parody of a real Galliano show themed after homeless people in France. 
u buy these, your mom sees them when you go to visit and throws them out thinking you're really down on your luck and buys you a nice new pair of $25 shoes from walmart. 
I sleep on my side and stomach in my hammock all the time. The key to hammock sleeping htat most people don't get is to turn your body diagonal to the hammock, then you end up with a perfectly flat surface that you can lay on any direction you want. 
New marketing idea: Road Grime in a spray can! Name suggestions? 
When I was up in Alaska we had to do something called courtesy patrol, which was basically driving around to all the bars and picking up drunk soldiers so they didn't try to drive or walk home. We always had to stop at this one bar (i think it was called crazy horse, or something like that. It's in the middle of town in this random ass pit across from the Ford Dealership and the Ice rink) that was widely known to be owned and operated by Hell's Angels. The scary kind. But every time we went in there to check if there was any drunk ass we had to take home, they would send us back on our way with redbulls, water, and some bar food. It was really nice of them, but I absolutely do not ever want to be associated with them or owe them anything. 
Same. Another thing I can't stand about Harley culture is the lack of gear. "You're a pussy"/ "You're not really riding." I had to actually yell and my father and uncle to wear a fucking helmet (they had the rest of the gear because it had Harley brand splattered all over it) so they could live through WHEN they ate shit. I used to go to track days, and I've eaten shit at least twice at over 90 mph across pavement, going ass over tea kettle. Worst I walked away with was a repair bill and a sprained wrist because I punched the ground while I was sliding to flip myself over. I also got to personally spray the brains of a Harley rider off the road because he hit a tree at about 15 mph while He was looking at the scenery. 
Yeah same, I actually like the earbuds they're quite cheap and alright quality 
I wear one at my office job so that people know I'm the real deal. 
Pilot Metro is such an amazing pen for such a low cost. If you want to get in to Fountain pens, that's one of the best places to start IMO. 
Old-style Kevlar yes. New style with the plates....between the plates. 
Can confirm. First time I went hunting and got a deer meant every Christmas gift I got that year was dipped in camo. Was the weirdest thing. 
"Sorry sir, this emporium is for poseurs not bikers" 
One of the best South park episodes. Right up there with cartmanland and the one where the NASCAR drivers ate vagasil 
They usually are, but you have to keep track of yours. There are often several officers handling a situation. 
Well, perhaps the Swedish are conflict avoiding, in which case they not lose the current sale, but they'd probably lose future sales. Because why would you go back to a place that does that? 
A friend once asked me; What are we running from? So I said; From ourselves. And our coach. He is a scary man. 
I've used Duolingo before, and although it's repetitive the grammar is never really explained. What would yo suggest for someone just starting to seriously learn the language? 
Slept with a red tailed boa (Scorsby) about 8 feet long. One night I had a nightmare someone was putting a cold hand and sliding it across my face. It was Scorsby, so I put her back in the cage after that. I'm proud to say that even after a couple dates that wouldn't even come into my apartment because of her, I kept her and she lived to be over 20 years old. 
I'm definitely doing something when my doggy goes. I'm not sure exactly what, but he is sticking around with me. I joke and say i am going to get him stuffed so he can still sit with me by my computer, but that would probably just depress the shit out of me. 
I used to play on an Ibanez GIO bass. I almost never tuned that sucker. Typically, I'd start tuning it, notice it was already in tune and start just absolutely playing the hell out of it. Because I sucked. And I was 16. And never got laid. Because the bass player never gets laid. Unless your name is Flea. 
I'm not saying they have to be pretty, just that you need to be slightly more aware of the visual aspect since they're so visual. I probably phrased it bad. 
You just made me realize something about myself. Thanks. 
Do you mean Jacob for Marc Jacobs, for Marc by Marc Jacobs? 
I remember reading about an ex Best Buy employee that made a shit ton of money doing this! 
It's kinda amazing that Zoolander predicted what fashion would be like in the past. 
I've heard the saying "dress for the slide, not the ride" 
I actually really like the Skullcandy Ink'd line. They're cheap, comfortable, and actually sound damn good for the money. I have a pair of Beyerdynamic DT-770's that I use for reference mixing, but I always check my mixes on the Skullcandy's and if it sounds good on them, it'll likely sound good anywhere. They're like the headphone equivalent of the Yamaha NS-10's, they're shitty but they in the right way. 
I wear one not because basketball but because I pack boxes all day and it keeps the cardboard from irritating my skin. It's my PPE. 
This man doesn't need quarterly reports, he needs a ball. 
This sport makes me sad. You know there was a study this year that suggests frenchmen feel pain? 
I'm gonna weigh in here, the plates in police issue body armour will not stop a reasonable bow shooting broadheads. A police officer in Ontario was killed in the last couple of years by a psycho with a compound bow. 
Lindeybeiges bits on movies are awesome too. Ironclad, kingdom of heaven, Helen of Troy ... 
His name would be Anguy. They almost never used it in the show. In the book he won the Archery contest at the Tourney of the Hand and then blew all the money on hookers and turned down Ned for a job offer. Probably a good choice in the long run. 
Basically us VX enthusiasts have an incredible interest in certain modules for VX machines, and of course the machines themselves. We talk about different brands of Ferrocores, such as the DS-9-KK Orange Series, the BP-200 Swedish model, etc. We also discuss the different VX versions (VX1-VX256 obviously), and the best ways to make your oblidisks more efficient at computing third-level enometrionic calculations, while accounting for flux variations and compression levels. Also, if you ever get into VX, please don't use the D7-A software, it's so anaemic in comparison to the Q5-685N software by Byton. 
Usually it's a nightmare of a snake sliding over your face and it turns out to be a cold hand 
I have mixed feelings about this. On the one hand, omfg, a snake in your bed! But on the other hand that's kind of adorable... 
Ibanez GIO guitars are fucking great for beginners. Easy setup, always in tune, quite flexible tone. 
One time I unknowingly bought illegal drugs thinking it was fishing bait, and even that worked just fine, I'll tell you what. 
But for serious, what the fuck is going on with that. I used to work right next to the Copenhagen offices (same building) and besides Marc Jacob inception they were also really fucking loud at their meetings. As in they yelled at each other it seemed and we could almost follow the basics through the wall.... 
The story I heard was that a employee would buy the cables. Then turn around and give them to a friend who would return them with "no receipt" and get full price store credit. Then uses that store credit to but whatever he wanted 
Shit I should start doing this. I pack air plane parts for 8 hours a day and my arms are always shredded up by the end of my shift. 
I like them because I can write without fatiguing my hand. It's entirely psychological, as you can write with a ballpoint in a decent manner, but there's something about a fountain pen that makes me write with a light touch. It's more legible, and it just feels better. That being said, I'm completely happy with my Parker Quink and $30 Lamy Safaris. A $100 fountain pen isn't *silly* to me, meaning that I wouldn't mind receiving one as a gift, but I wouldn't actually buy one. 
LOL in what world is Byton software being recommended. I was with you until that. The open source version by QualQuake has all the features Byton has, USED to have and has NEVER had. 
Hahaha right. "What the fuck is that!!!! A hand?" "Nope it's just a giant snake, thank god" 
These days, you probably save money fishing with illegal drugs compared to buying bait. 
Must be stressful to work at a company that isn't completely sure what it is. 
Yeah that was it! Idk if you read the same story but he got busted because he was also stealing shit and as he was about be "sentenced" but before they could do it they found out his higher up was stealing way more than him and they let him go! 
I donated a skateboard to my job so the mechanics can skate around behind the lanes and fix things with the eXtreme efficiency 
Holy shit a positive one! Stay strong little post! 
Can confirm. Everything is pre-weighed and put into disposable cups (sauces and such) or plastic bags (broccoli, ect), microwaved and then placed on a plate at the Mid area (I was mid). Even the pasta is microwaved. (Pre-cooked to almost done and then bagged in portions, microwaved at time of order) Meats, Fries, Tortillas, Salads, ect are not microwaved.. But all vegetables, soups, sauces, rice, ect. All microwaved. Oh and when we were SUPER busy and some meat was under cooked the manager would have Grill cut it up and microwave it quickly. 
As a nurse .... we do this too. And we conveniently walk by those patients' rooms to make sure they're OK. 
I wanted to name my son Rafe. We were in a store and my wife said Rafe is the kind of name they use in romance novels. She picked up the nearest book and the main character was called Rafe. My now 8 year old son is not called Rafe. Thanks for that. ;) 
After a few domestic violence calls to my aunt's house, the sheriff finally said, "You know, we don't got no CSI here in Podunk County. If he gets shot, there ain't gonna be an investigation." 
I can't count to 21 without taking off my shoes. Most of the time, the dealers tell me what to do. It's pretty effective. It takes me longer to lose my money on blackjack than on slots. 
"It will be a minute while the account loads (already loaded). So what do you like to watch on TV? (really running their address for coming sales pitch)" Good times. 
That's interesting. Someone else in this thread mentioned getting annoyed when customers keep asking "is that the BEST you can do?" which makes me hesitant to ask for a discounted rate. 
When I was in college, I asked my primary care physician if he thought I should become a doctor. He told me, "If you want to work like a gentleman, become a lawyer. Doctors work like animals for many years." I'm now a lawyer and I have zero regrets. I have no idea how you guys do it. 
I bought a bunch of grapes and put them in the fridge and every so often I'd grab a couple and eat them until maybe 2 or 3 days later, I found a big white grape and I was like "Wtf?" until I realized it was a big fat SPIDER chilling with my red grapes. I almost had a panic attack because I have a major fear of spiders and now I meticulously inspect every piece of fruit I get just in case. Kind of like how I now always shake my towel out vigorously because one time a spider was hanging out in mine when I hung it on the hook on the back of the bathroom door D': 
Can confirm. "What did you do this weekend, Adam (not his real name)?" "My dad got some really cool plants! He said we can't grow them outside so we are growing them in our basement underneath these cool lamps!" I made an instant facepalm 
Thanks for the shout out to pharmacy! We do more than pull pills from a shelf, especially inpatient. I'm just a tech but I've caught some pretty nasty med errors myself (not always the doc to be fair). 
Startups? 90% of all IT systems in existence. You saw what happened to the NHS the other day. 
My wife and her college roommates would flush grease down the sink with cold water. They thought the reason you don't pour grease down the sink was because it would burn the pipes, so they cooled it down real good first. She is beautiful though. 
The gym you bought your membership from probably printed your credit card details onto a piece of paper. The membership consultants then punch it into a machine and throw it into a dumpster out the back. They also saved your email to the mailing list regardless of whether you checked no, and it was not in fact the last 10 memberships on offer. They are limitless because 90% of members never go and you probably wont either. Cheers for the donation. 
I think most people are aware that carnival games are rigged in a way but still winnable, and that's what makes it "fun" 
Infantry here got out two years ago.. unless deployed we're just glorifies janitors.. trained to do nothing but kill.. but had more time in service sweeping, mopping, picking weeds out of the motor pool than actually even attempting to do what I was trained for.. hell at least by the end I was able to tell other privates to go sweep the motor pool while it was raining 
Thirty years of law practice (80s, 90's, 2000's), a lot of it pre-technology and more "polite and cooperative" than it was in the latter era, when it became nasty with a lot of dirty tricks and foul play. During many, many court appearances, there was an unspoken understanding between counsel and the Judge. We'd ask for a continuance of a hearing or trial date (all civil, mind you) and the reason? "Witness Green isn't available." "The Green Report hasn't been completed." "Green Data Tables are not ready." Any problem "green" related means client has not paid your bill that month, or in months, and the attorney isn't going to start a trial and invest more time until he or shes gets paid. EDIT, BECAUSE IT BEARS REPEATING: Much of this was 30 years ago. No, it's not common now, and yes, you'd withdraw if you couldn't fix the problem. It was just a little secret in that era. 
Man, I'm working through a major deployment right now and feeling all of this, so much. 
I self inject medication once a week for arthritis and I'm 75% certain my kid's teachers have heard about "mommy using needles" without context. 
I interviewed with a consulting company that step one of their consulting process was to literally go in and ask the employees which things needed changing. They'd make the changes in different stores and find out which changes worked and which didn't and which had interactions. 
Yeah, food service is brutal about taking sick days, like you better be half in your death bed to call out. And considering how virulent some pathogens are, like norovirus (winter vomiting bug), one sick worker could infect half a town. 
Same past job, if your box looks a little bit crushed, it was probably one of 20 that were wedged together in a chute somewhere along the belt line that took all of the strength someone could summon to un-wedge. If you're going to ship something, make sure it can survive a fall from chest height. 
If you don't start it you have 0% chance of surviving. 
This is true in other mediums, too. Jim Davis has not drawn a "Garfield" cartoon in years. He has a staff that does the cartoons and he just "approves" them. Also, some pop-fiction authors--the ones who put out a book or two every year--often have staff write their books. They will just write an outline and notes for each chapter. 
I worked receiving at Costco for 5 years. I can attest that these people are sleep deprived as fuck. They always look like zombies when I buzz them in. That, and apparently Swift Transportation doesn't offer their employees Dental. 
Jeez that manager has some balls. Most of the time, people who keep pounds of weed in their car don't really care for following laws. That guy could know a shooter or two. 
I remember that one security guard that got sued because he uploaded a video of some woman who was texting and fell into a fountain. 
My SO worked in customer service for a year and dealt with rude and angry people very frequently. When she got someone who was polite and friendly she'd go out of her way to take care of them. It can be frustrating calling customer service/tech support/etc. but it being patient and friendly can really make someone's day (especially if you're calling near the end of the day on Friday). 
Yup! My mother watched kids in our house and it was a rule not to mention a milestone until an excited parent mentioned seeing it at home. Sometimes we would know a kid had started walking DAYS before their parents did. 
So that explains why my seats aren't bolted down. Huh, TIL. 
Y'all need to come up with a codeword to put in your papers when you know that it's bullshit. 
People love to think theyre getting charged out the ass because its a wedding, but really they usually have had no prior experience with the things they're being charged for and therefore dont know how much it should cost in the first place. Most people arent hiring a catering service for 200 people on a regular basis. Or like, $150 for a wedding dress hem. A lot of people will think thats gouging but when your hem requires carefully removing delicate lace and restitching by hand, yeah, that shit aint cheap. I dont care if the place next to your office hems pants for $8, this aint fuckin pants. 
Pretty much anything food based. A real fast food burger looks much sadder than advertised. 
They tore my fascia during a c-section. It was an emergency and saved my baby. These things happen. They talked about it in front of me (a nurse) and my husband (a physician) during the procedure. Hell, he even saw it. 2 days later I had massive stabbing pain in that area and was given IV pain meds to control it. At my 2 week appointment it was found that I had a moderate hematoma in the area of the tear and the OB that saw me told me that the c-section was unremarkable. He said there was no mention of a tear. I get that they're trying to protect themselves, but having that written in the notes would have helped their colleagues to better understand these complications. Oh yeah, and the whole thing about it being illegal pissed me off. 
Wtf? I worked at Wal-Mart back in the day at the service desk and called 911 so often the cops knew me. That must have changed. 
I try to do this with every services company I do business with. Cable. ISP. Lawn care. Pest control. Mobile phone. I call them up, tell them I'm going to cancel the service and see what they have to say. It works more often than not. The key is to actually be ready to pull the trigger on leaving if they don't bend. 
Can confirm. My nephew and friend called in to a radio station once. They said their request never got aired until 3 am. 
Former chipotle worker here, chopping that insane amount of lettuce everyday sucked sooooo bad. So I'd be ok with this. LP at chopping lettuce. Zero fucks given. 
LexisNexis, baby. Also we make really shitty 80s looking software. 
I would say that this solves 1% of the issues. The other 99% were not even issues at all. lol 
You'd think it would be illegal to make a patently false claim on the label. 
The business term for this is "planned obsolescense." It's quite common now, and it's not just phones--it's everything. Gillette has no interest in manufacturing a razor blade that can last three months--they want to sell you on a product that lasts just long enough that you don't try something else. Car manufacturers could move to more modular platforms, make engines good for a million miles. They could focus on timeless designs instead of trendy ones. Make interior infotainment/control systems easily upgradable. They don't. Consider plastic blower wheels in dryers. They are designed to fail and to be difficult to remove. An aluminum one would cost a few dollars more, and it would last forever. Planned obsolescence is everywhere. 
The restaurants I worked at, we cleaned or ice machines every shift. We also cleaned the soda nozzles nightly. I've never actually worked at a restaurant that was that gross. The health department would have our asses. They're super strict here. 
The post will stay strong, it's been inspected and x-rayed. 
Huh TIL engineering class on rollercoasters exist! 
This explains a lot. My favorite nurse used to always come by on her lunch break when I was "stepped down" from ICU... and I hated my new nurse bc it would take her 2-2.5 hrs to give me scheduled meds. 
In spanish, a "rafe" is the line behind your penis that goes from the gland to the shaft. 
Wow lmfao there is gold hiding at the bottom of this post. 
I'm a little concerned about how you CAN count to 21 by removing your shoes. 
"I don't have a TV. I got rid of it in 2007." "But don't you...uh.....wh........" I think I had someone up to five consecutive stutters on my last call to tech support. 
The trick I learned a while ago that always works for me in this situation is to plug your nose, bootlick hard, and lie. I very politely tell them that I'm happy with their service and a satisfied customer but I need to cancel because I'm moving into a place with a roommate who already has an account with them. When I cancelled my first ever plan they put me through the ringer. When I actually did move into a house where we had the same ISP and an existing account the phone call only took five minutes. This always works for me and they don't ask about the new account or any other shit like I thought they would, you're just pushed right on through so they can move on to another call that they can try to upsell as fast as possible. 
Asking "is that the BEST you can do?" is an easy way to annoy people. My go-to line is "Thanks, but I'm on a bit of a budget. I'll check out some of the places nearby first." 
They also get treated like animals whenever they board a plane 
If there's one person I really want to be well rested, it's the person responsible for my continued existence. I'd definitely rather be treated by two well rested doctors than one exhausted one. 
Exactly. I am capable of unplugging that shower. But I'd rather pay you to see, touch and smell that gunk that is plugging my pipe while I stay away and not gag. 
I had a doctor mistakenly write some guy's diazepam rx as 30mg instead of 5mg. Faxed twice to confirm if what he wrote was true; he says yes (both times!). I was still hesitant so I called the doctor, and he finally realizes it's a mistake and tells me, "Sorry! My bad!". 
Ugh. Scientist here. So much undocumented Fortran code written by people who never learned to program and document properly. Myself included. I don't get why people like me get hired to maintain stuff like this instead of people who actually know what they are doing. 80 % of my job is fucking around on stackoverflow to figure out which code snippet to copy/paste to make [basic task] work. 
I was recently on an out of town trip with my boss. He tripled our rental bill because I left the counter for 3 minutes and he got all the additional insurance. Insurances that are covered by the credit card we paid with, and also covered by our business automotive umbrella policy. 
Yup, in IT you can have it fast, cheap, secure. Pick two. 
Haha that's great. That way would also avoid congealing in the mainline and only mess up their own. How thoughtful! 
Its pretty bad stuff environmentally and makes our jobs way nastier/ tougher than it should be. In certain conditions (low oxygen) bacteria can eat it and create hydrogen sulfide gas which collects at the bottom of sewers and kills sewer workers (h2s also severely degrades pipe integrity) . There was a recent event in s. Florida where three guys died, one after another, after entering a manhole. Grease buildup will also eventually clog the mainline and overflow into the streets or yards or wherever the mainline runs into. My current project is actually epa mandated for excessive sewage spills which grease is partly to blame. Put grease and oil in jars or jugs, seal them, and throw in garbage! 
Yeah I follow a bunch of infosec people on Twitter and it's making me reassess my desire to go into that field. The sky really is falling, all the time. 
And besides, carnivals aren't about getting a good deal on a teddy bear. They're about proving you're not broke to your date 
They topped off fluids in my car and asked me to pay $120 when I just asked for an oil change because I'm a young girl and they think they can fuck me over. He told me the total, I said what for when my oil change was less than half that, he said that it was standard procedure to top off fluids. I said that's funny, but I just asked for my oil change so I'm only paying for my oil change. He tried to argue saying that they couldn't let me leave without it because "reasons" and I said that they don't have the authority to do that and I'll gladly call the police and let them know they're attempting to steal my vehicle. So I just paid for the oil change. 
...do they not have motions to withdraw where you practice? Noncompliance with a fee agreement is almost always an automatic grant in my state. 
When I was 6, I told my teacher, "My dad drinks and drives all the time!" My teacher had to have a conference with my parents and my dad was put in the awkward position of explaining how I confused drinking 7-Eleven Big Gulps in the car with alcohol. 
There's a boy who's in the scouts. His "sleeping outside" merit coincided with the dad having a date over, so Monday morning he tells me "dad had his girlfriend over, so I slept on the porch". 
It sounds messed up but sometimes you need to hear it from someone who isnt ina position to profit from the change. 
My boyfriend works in a kitchen. We got sick from something a coworker had and were shaking, getting hot flashes and chills, violent diarrhea and vomiting and the other manager wanted him to come in to do a catering order for 500 people. Took three hours on the phone arguing and a doctors note before his coworker dropped it but he was passive aggressive for weeks 
That means I have infinite better chance of surviving with CPR! 
James Patterson doesn't even hide this shit anymore. The books are appallingly terrible but people keep buying them because they say his name on them. I just don't get it. The Jim Davis one doesn't really bother me because I work with kids in a library and I'll be damned if every kid between the ages of 8-12 doesn't go through a massive Garfield phase where they go insane if there are no more books they haven't read. Those kids are rabid and I love their excitement for a new book. If it means there is a Garfield Ghost writer who is keeping these kids coming back, then so be it! 
It's actually really, really old. Like, thousands of years old. There's Greek and Roman pottery where historians aren't sure if it was painted by the person it's attributed to or by an apprentice. Which is probably why it's such a widely accepted practice. 
I'm so glad I wasn't the only one who thought or Madarame. 
Swift would let my dogs drive if they had thumbs and could reach the pedals. 
Making the bus into a 30,000 lb death missile FULL OF BABIES 
I work in a hotel, online prices are always more because we have to pay commission to the website on each room they sell. If you book direct, you will get the real BAR price. If you book adv you will get an even cheaper deal. 
Yes. You might hear "Nah, we'll deal with it ourselves." 
I've seen people spray cleaner in them and the do a quick rinse which didn't get the cleaner out. Most of the time they would go untouched or just pulled out of the coffee maker and put upside down on a paper towel to air dry. The flight attendants would offer us all the leftover sandwiches from the plane at the end of the day. Takes about 2 days until you can't eat those free sandwiches anymore because you hate them. I can still taste them now as I type this 
Hey, that happened in my hometown. That's all we're known for. That, and the poverty. 
A few modifications to that and you could have some sweet ejector seats! 
Maybe I'm a weird outlier on the quality control spectrum but i dont let that shit fly at my plant. Production and shipping can push for parts all they want but im protectong the customer. Who do you supply? Chrysler? 
they have an entire section on it called 'research limitations' 
Wait... You actually strapped a plane to the side of a rocket??? We were drunk when we drew that! 
That's funny cuz as a finance guy, I'd think, "The answer is definitely 2 ... but I'll make it 1 just to be safe." Under promise, over deliver. 
Went to an AF base close to my home, saw a c130 leaking, wife said it was perfectly normal to leak. Like what the shit 
I remember my Hydrology professor saying that if we had more than one decimal place in a homework amzser he would count points off because there's no way we could be that precise hahaha 
You know something? Those plastic ones BREAK. Sometimes inside the patient's vagina. Yeah. There are pros and cons to metal vs. plastic speculums. 
Basically lol, and if a reboot doesn't fix it then you're in for a fun time and actually have to troubleshoot it. 
Yet it's the opposite. It's the bullshit natural versus artificial distinction. Because some nitrite is isolated from vegetable sources it doesn't count as nitrite. Total nonsense. 
We had a kid with ADHD and the parent figured camp would be the perfect time to stop taking the medication. He got very violent with most of the other campers and we had to send him home or tell them to send the medication. 
Seriously. That's like saying doctors look stuff up in a textbook. No shit, but you really need to have a well developed intuition, and some actual knowledge. 
Send a letter to the hospital :) I did that after a nurse was wonderful and the CEO wrote me back saying how grateful they were to get good feedback... 
No joke, I used that line once. No television. The guy told me they are an absolute bargain down at Goodwill. 
Agree. When something seemed "hiddenly negotiable"... My (now ex) husband and I sometimes played the "cheap wife" game. They'd give him a price... He'd act totally fine with it... Then I'd step in, and tell him stuff like No way husband, that's out of our budget, the place down the street was $40 cheaper, there was a 25% promo code for this place, blah blah blah, etc. He'd look at whoever the person was apologetically, and say something along the lines of "Sorry, what the wife says, goes". I'd say the fail rate was close to 0. Sometimes, it wouldn't be as big a discount as we wanted... But we always got something. 
 Exactly this. I have a snake, various wrenches, and YouTube, but I've used that snake. I've seen what lives in the darkness. I only call plumbers now. 
My sister in law is a pharmacist and she has caught mistakes like that too. 10 times too powerful preparations. 
The trick is to just run your hot water for about a minute straight once it has hit peak tempature. Then you can heat all your pipes up nicely so as to only clog the main line :) 
I've never properly disposed of my grease. That's gonna change today my man. I never knew the correlation between that and h2s, which unfortunately kills a few ppl in my line of work too (oil and gas). Stay safe! 
Plus showing how manly are by being both athletic and stubbornly competitive. 
I'm so glad I work for a reputable company. I run a Lube Center at a dealership, you know what our standard oil change costs? $25, and that includes topping off all fluids and a car wash. Our lube center doesn't make much money, but the work we sell (which I only sell if customers actually need) brings more money to our main service center. It's not a perfect system and honestly I think we should charge a little more, but it makes our customers happy and we're never slow. 
I'd imagine they do but you still want to leave a case in a position that would not prejudice your client and makes the transition for them to find a new attorney easier. That's probably why there may be additional appearances needed even after the client has paid the bill for a while. 
My wife's dad got in trouble once because back then she told the teacher that her dad "was breaking everything in the house". They had renovations and he was breaking old stuff down to replace it. 
This is like when psychics got my sister to dump her shitty bf. Didn't matter who it was she listened to, we'd all said it to no success; then the psychics said it and boom done. 
I bet boss was just like "I've been sending as many emails as I can" and corporate says "but have you tried sending more emails?" and boss is all "wow that is an amazing idea, I'll get on it right now!" 
Classic management. Let's force sick workers with doctor's notes to come in sick and bitch at their coworkers for calling out sick. 
Holy shit I remember my Garfield phase. I guess actually it was just a straight-up comic-strip phase. Calvin and Hobbes, The Far Side, etc... Anytime the bookmobile came through my neighborhood I would grab any comic-strip book that I could. 
And those massive frescoes and canvases from the Renaissance and after were done by whole workshops supervised by the master. Rubens had a big crew where one apprentice would do the sky, another the clothes and so on. Most likely the master only did the faces and most important elements himself. 
My mom and aunt tell me it stands for "Sure Wish I'd Finished Training" 
No, too stringent. Chrysler wouldn't pay for QA testing in the first place. 
Look at this guy, writing code clear enough that God can understand it. 
My fellow coders' computers are more likely to encounter Murphy's law rather than Moore's law. 
Can confirm. Parents hired a home builder, but had two good friends in commercial construction and would drop by every Friday. It took an extra six weeks to get the house completed because one of the guys is anal about everything in his life (not just his job), but I was surprised how shitty their house would've been had they not "advised" the builders how to do their jobs. 
No, get this We take a rocket And we make the rocket a plane And We Put it On another plane Dude, get some graph paper 
It's rare that engineering and construction are aligned enough to have weekly meetings. 
A bad accountant will tell you 2+2=3 a good accountant will tell you 2+2=4 and a great accountant will ask you how much you want 2+2 to equal. 
When I was in the army, our mechanics told me that if the truck wasn't leaking something, somewhere, it had issues. 
Yep. Or that a lawyer looks up laws and legal precedent. We can't all know everything, but we can filter or interpret the results and know what to look for. 
A+ for effort on his part. Very few people's responses have made me laugh in 10 years of using this argument. 
I wish I had the savvy to pull this off. I would probably attempt it and they'd just say "OK" and that's it and I'd have to actually find another hotel now 
This sounds like the main character's ending monologue of a Lovecraft story. "I have seen what lives in the darkness, inside walls and under floors." 
A baby in the city I study in died a few years ago because an error like that wasn't spotted. Also another one died in the hospital because the immunsupressant was prescribed for daily intake while it should have been for once a week. 
It's very annoying when military recruiters try to glorify and upsell everything about it too. 
I just had an idea. Be a roaming fake psychic that is paid to get people to dump their shitty SOs. Kind of like the show psych, but breakups instead of crime solving. 
My favorite from this week: "How do I send email to all of the customers who unsubscribed? They're going to want to see this promo!" That is a verbatim quote from a marketing director 
Can confirm. I was almost written up for being in the hospital instead of dragging my ass to the manager with a sick note. I'll probably get written up for dying one day. 
Stevie Wonder Institute For Trucking OR So What I Flipped the Truck? 
Dude, I'm 15 minutes in. Feels like no time has passed. This guy's interesting AF. Nothing like watching an hour long video about doors on a Friday night! I just finished it bc I watched it at 1.5x speed. That was seriously amazing to watch. And awesome advertising for that guy's company. 
Worked in the billing department for a call center for UPS. You cant even fathom the amount of paper we used. There were recycling labeled bins all over the office but the janitors just dumped them into the regular trash cans because the company didn't want to pay for a recycling service. 
Note to self; if I'm ever smuggling drugs, hide them in sex toys. Security will laugh, I will laugh, and none of them will want to handle the giant dicks for a thorough inspection 
Can confirm confirmer's confirmation. My dad was an electrician and my uncle is a carpenter, so they constantly went behind the home builder's work on my parents house and eventually fired them b/c of the shit job and just did the work themselves. Dad's best friend is also a plumber, so they just hired a few kids to help them build the house. 
*"I have seen what lives in the darkness, inside the walls, and under the floors. Dare you peer into the unknown? Are you content to reach into the black, with no fear of what might reach back? If not, call someone with experience! Call HP Lovecrap today!"* [Insert company image of tentacles reaching from toilet] 
At my hospital, we don't have any pediatric patients except neonates. Anyone under age 16 has to have a double check by pharmacists when an order is entered and then when something is filled or compounded, it also has a double check. Also, all steps have to be checked on anything compounded before it's done, like reconstitution, we draw up the diluent, the volume and diluent is checked, then we reconstitute and draw up the dose. Same thing with chemo, but for all ages. Generally it's only the neonates but sometimes we have pediatric patients in the emergency department or we have a teen girl in L&D. 
Recruiters are used car salesmen selling a shitty product. Don't get me wrong, the military is a critical part of our infrastructure, but ... EVERY recruiter lies his ass off. In fact, that's the first thing they tell you when you get off the bus. "Your recruiter lied to you." 
Apparently sometimes it just needs to be said by someone you pay to say things, as opposed to family who are rather invested in your happiness :/ 
My doctor does phone appointments and email appointments for free. She never had a problem writing a note with a quick explanation of symptoms. Of course, as a doctor, she was a firm believer in the doctrine of "sick people belong at home." 
Definitely less "police may get me my drugs back" and more "prison may save my ass getting jumped". 
Every 12 days you get 2 days off with no provisions for making sure you're home at the start of those 2 days!? That's absurd! 
How this isn't upvoted more is beyond me. The word safe is like a trigger word sometimes on this site it's so infamous. 
Jolly rancher made me puke. That's Why it's my favourite 
Scrolling down and seeing "AND MY AXE!" pop up randomly through the chaos is fucking priceless. 
Likewise. Goddamn that was a journey. This world does not deserve a man like Streetlamp Le Moose, but goddamn we need one. 
people started downvoting him for mispelling geraffe He retorts, apologizing, and spelling geraffe incorrectly again people downvote him more, probably for the laughs at this point The rest of the edits are his descent into madness. 
It's also a little sad. People still reply to her posts like "dragons", "science based" etc. and sometimes they are rude and insult her. Just let it go guys. 
I legitimately think its fascinating from a psychological perspective. You could sincerely turn something like that into a social psychology research paper 
The reddit chat (robin or something similar) was great, and I wish they kept it around. 
I really don't think everyone felt like it was important 
ORANGERED WILL TRIUMPH OVER THE PERIWINKLE SCUM AS WE DID BEFORE!! 
Quick warning to anyone who goes to that link, don't try to click on the giraffe picture, the link's dead and it's been taken over with a site that hides your mouse and tries to get you to download shit. Also for anyone who ignores me and still tries it, remember that the shortcut to get to the chrome task manager and kill the tab is Shift+Esc. 
It is an international holiday. Source: I am the Chairman of the International Gjallarhorn Day Committee 
Hey man don't go blaming Kevin for Flint's water problem. He's got enough to deal with. 
Crazy to think *"yeah, you like that, you fucking retard?"* is already three years old. I remember reading that comment when it was something like 37 minutes old. Oh, memories... 
Over 2 years on Reddit and you've never been to a porn sub? You have a lot of catching up to do. 
Those threads where absolutely everyone is in on the joke amaze me. 
He's just a super interesting dude who happened to get exposed by a joke. I think he's honestly one of the most interesting people on this site. He's got a lot of perspective on life and he's worth listening to. 
It was so poorly timed that it was amazingly timed. 
To be fair I feel like a pokemon MMO could work. PoGo may even be a (flawed) example of one. I get it there are bootleg pokemon mmos 
I think that was the end of that. But the account is still active I think, she still posts on Reddit. 
I just wish it weren't total bs. That's why I prefer the Doritos story. It's more disgusting imo, and it could actually have happened. Gonorrhea nodules don't exist. 
Wasn't the criticism more like "You say you're working on this game, but all you have is some 3D modeled concept art"? 
Robin was AMAZING! I ended up in a chat with someone my same age who lived less than a mile from me. Super freaky. 
Don't worry, she probably already knew what a vagina looks like. 
"Catching up" is an interesting euphemism for masturbation 
I thought you were going to say "it wasn't broken his wife was just lazy". 
That story moved me. Half crying in the middle of work and I'm a grown ass man. 
Things like that really make me think that there's only me here and 1 other person on this site is running all other accounts E: Fuck. 
Yeah but if you go through her history people give her shit every time she makes a comment anywhere on Reddit. 
Godamn right...(secretly pushed it on an alt account) 
I've quit reddit forever so many times. You can check out anytime but you can never leave 
The core idea was pretty good, relatable situations in a format that anyone could make. Then it got overdone to shit and everyone just used it as their personal diary and the quality went waaaaay down. But the period in between was pretty enjoyable. 
I wouldn't say it's rare yet. I still see it daily. 
I thought it was going to be, 'It wasn't broken, his wife was just dead.' 
I think at some point I'd just make a new account. 
Fuckin A. I pushed that shit on the first day, and it was great. 
Eh, it's real, but it's just women with small/flat asses. No freakish photoshops like you'd think. 
This sub is mostly where the "Le Reddit" and "Narwhal bacons at midnight." shit lingered, iirc. 
Look at his username, and report back with your findings. 
"To be fair" stops applying when its 5 years later and people are still ridiculing her about it. Like yeah, the jokes funny for a bit, but at what point does that not just become harassment? Seriously, go click on any of her messages. Any one of them. And they all have dozens of people saying the same thing. 
It is. Everytime I read I book I wonder if Streetlamp could make it better and the answer is YES HE CAN 90% of the time 
Always check the MSDS before snorting stuff in the chem lab. Basic lab safety. 
This happened at a local street fair a couple years back. Crazy how a little fall can do that much damage 
I've had bariatric surgery. Sadly she traded her food addiction for a drug addiction. It happens to a lot of folks who have these procedures. :( 
As someone who's worked in pizza places and has had delivery driver friends, good. Fuck that guy. He shouldn't have been so fucking eager to point a gun at some underpaid kid doing his job. 
In high school a friend's brother died car surfing. A lot of the "why did this happen" and "he was taken too soon" stuff went around for a while. I don't get how anybody can figure car surfing is smart 
Had a friend who was clean and sober for 4 years. He had an apartment and a job, and saved up for the motorcycle he had always wanted. He bought the bike, drove it straight to a dealer, copped, went home, and fired up. The neighbors found his body 2 weeks later because of the smell. RIP. Miss you my man. 
You declined crack cocaine because you were busy? That's extremely fortunate! 
Where do you live that has random pipes laying around to smash with, the game of clue? 
Did he download a video or make one? If he made one, maybe the part where he downloads cp is not the exact moment where he fucked up his life. 
Perhaps it was his first taste of "failure" (even though being overlooked is not truly failure) and he collapsed as a result. Perhaps not. Either way that's too bad. I hope you learned from his mistakes. 
"Spice" was a fairly popular synthetic cannabis, in the UK it was considered a "legal high" but has since been outlawed. It's a pretty loose term these days really, it's basically any old chemical shit mixed up and sprayed on plant matter. A few cities in the UK are now struggling to deal with it (Manchester hit the mainstream news recently), a LOT of homeless smoke it because it gets you absolutely fucked and is cheap, but it's starting to creep into poor suburbs and neighborhoods. Problem is because there is no one form of the stuff now you have no idea what you're really smoking, it can either make you violent and belligerent, or put you in some k-hole "zombie" state. Just say no kids. 
It's really sad when people can't learn from the mistakes of others. It dooms them to learning first hand. 
How does someone even get a loan approved for that amount...for a wedding? 
Yes but it's awesome that he is now 6 years clean! 
Actually wanting to stop is already a big accomplishment in itself, so good on you. 
She couldn't continue med school when she was dating the army guy? If he was deployed overseas, might as well study until he comes back. 
That one video where he pushes his kid into a stand ): 
I just read what he did. What a complete and total idiot. And he doesn't (yet) see anything wrong with it. 
I had a mate at uni that had D A V E in massive gothic letters tattooed across her lower back as a surprise for her on/off bf. She showed him, he freaked out and basically said "I'm not ready for that kind of commitment, luv" - and dumped her on the spot. She went and got it covered but now just has a flower, tribal thing, smurf and something else across her back - that still says DAVE! 
One of my best friends came inside a girl he knew for a couple weeks because she convinced him she "couldn't get pregnant." Fucking idiot. 
Damn man, I'm in the process of cutting out all the toxic people in my life and one of my best friends is just like this. It actually took me a while to realize how lazy and narcissistic he is, but there's no doubt now. Everything is someone else's fault, he can't be wrong. My roommate and I let him stay with us for over 2 months with the promise he would find a job and contribute. Dude did nothing the whole time and when he watched my roommates kids for like 4 hours demanded money even though we had been buying him food, coffee, cigarettes, and smoking him up with our personal weed. Fuck people like that. 
Not to mention that just "lightly" pushing the gas pedal isn't going to make you fly out of a parking spot. She definitely was being careless. 
Well... I'm going to say the hard left turn happened when he decided to try his own crack. Up until that point he showed a lot of enthusiasm and a strong drive to advance upwards in the company. Hell, he even had the initiative to start his own enterprise! That pesky crack though, it will ruin you every time. /s 
In an alternative dimension: Friend gets job as a janitor at a hospital. Sees how much the nurses are getting paid and gets certified, slowly making their way up the ladder and continuing their education. Decides that they want to become a doctor, keep going, working hard, striving for more. Does their residency with a doctor who focuses on artificial limbs, realizes that these limbs could be so much better. Founds his own artificial limb company, researchers for a decade to create the most realistic artificial limbs on the market. "Welp, time to find out if they really work" *draws around knee and grabs the saw* 
Its true, why wouldn't he have one of the crackheads try it? Just seems like poor judgement there. I think he just wanted to try crack. 
Yep. Unfortunately the skull doesn't have a lot of space to deal with bleeding and swelling :( 
Oh the procedure worked wonders. VSG is truly amazing. But please for the love of hell get counseling to go with it (not you, just anyone in general). I think I had heard if you have the procedure done in the US counseling is mandatory. She has here's done in Mexico, and while the quality is on par with the US (and the cost is significantly cheaper) trading one addiction for another will bite you hard. 
Yep. He's not facing 10 years for "being stupid" but for being an armed robber. 
I always think of this book when I see witch-hunts on reddit. It's scary how little information people need to paint a picture and form a mob against someone. 
That's because outrage culture has the memory of a goldfish. Remember the dentist that killed that lion? He's fine. It blew over. 
These are the drug stories that scare me the most- the ones where they get clean, pull their life together and then relapse and pass away. It seems to be a common story and says a lot about the insidious nature of addiction. I'm sorry about your friend. 
That's a minimum sentence. He's probably going for way more now that they found child porn. 
Yeah well honestly, before I watched all that happen I had the mentality that I would try anything once. Seeing that though made me realize that lines had to be drawn somewhere and that I'll never try hard drugs 
I used to be Twitter friends with a guy who was stunningly handsome. He had a fantastic job as a writer at a world wide publication. He had beautiful girlfriends and was a genuinely nice guy. He killed himself when his beautiful girlfriend rejected him. He posted on Twitter he was going to do it and then did it. It was awful. I never met him but I was upset. Wished I would've tried harder to be a friend. To the outside world he had it all. Appearances are shockingly deceiving. 
A lot of high performing kids are taught that it's not ok to make a mistake - that their identity is based on not fucking up. Not to trivialize DUI, but you could imagine someone like that struggling to see how they live it down. 
My parents made it clear they'd rather drive me home than bail me out or bury me. They never gave me any grief, never any questions, just thanked me for not driving. Would drive my friends home too if they needed it. IMO, that's the way it should be. 
That's a good idea. I guarantee uber is cheaper and less unpleasant than the alternatives. 
Yep. People wouldn't stop bringing it up so she couldn't keep her own name and have a normal life. Depressingly it seems like things aren't really improving as she recently posted pictures of bruises supposedly from her boyfriend 
The drunk college guy, on the street corner, with a pipe. 
Worst part was it was mother's day morning when it all happened. It was a shit year, he pled not guilty and the trial went on for ages. Not a fun time. 
OP be like "I know this one guy who got pulled over for speeding. He didn't have his license or registration and had unpaid parking tickets so they took him to jail and impounded his car. Oh yeah and also he ran over and killed 6 people a couple blocks back." 
Yeah. Everyone is focusing on the old asshole, but the wife was (presumably, though who knows) an innocent in this situation. Why wouldn't the lawyer help? Yeesh. 
Oh man my first taste of failure was hard, and it was when I got into college, at the time I was really Arrogant thought I was the smartest guy, Einstein ain't got nothing on me kinda deal and then I failed a class for the first time ever and holy shit it opened my eyes 
I think that's the difference between using them for purpose over fun. 
It's pretty common among us drug addicts. Most people don't know or notice until well after things start going downhill, and often it doesn't become apparent until shit SUCKS. UPDATE: Wow. It's cool that this sparked up such a conversation, but I didn't mean it at all like what it sounded like. I'm perfectly fine, all that's behind me now. Although what I said is still pretty morbid now that I read it. 
Recovery, at first, is like the most congested interchange you've ever seen. So many different exits and turns, tolls, switching lanes, and you have no idea where the fuck you're going. It's confusing as fuck, scary, and everyone around you is honking and screaming at you to learn how to drive. Then you finally find your exit, you finally find your path, your road. And then you realize it's I-10 to San Diego... but you're in Jacksonville. That's when the depression hits. It's a LONG BORING SOUL CRUSHING drive. But just keep on keeping on, count down the mile markers, and eventually you get there. One mile at a time. 
I had a new 25 year old roommate attend a funeral of one of his friends...he said it was the third one in four years. A few weeks later I witness some members of his friends group riding motor cycles without helmets upwards of 100mph. I was fucking nervous as shit riding along in a car at that speed, and then one of the jackasses swerves into his friends motorcycle and pulls out at the last second. They then proceed to play chicken....see how close they can swerve to each other without hitting. These were rich kids, if that helps contextualize. 
lol pretty sure you've gotta commit fraud. "Yeah, I uh, definitely need a second mortgage on my house for you know house stuff. Absolutely not for a wedding with live elephants and shit." I would love to be a wedding guest and eat my gold covered popcorn as that shit implodes. 
They had 800ish guests. It was open bar (5 separate bars) and more food than I have ever seen in one place in my life. 
Well, it's a little thing called a home equity loan. I spend all the money I want, and the house gets stuck with the bill. He he he he! Sucker. 
Right? That's not a romantic thing, that's just a big red flag about dependency issues 
"Army guys" aren't deployed for the most part of their service. A lot are never even stationed overseas. The guy was probably stationed a far away or even simply not in the same city as her school, but they wanted to live with each other or near each other. 
Not that much of a coincidence as a thread like that is created about every 2 minutes 
My favorite was the 16 yr old kid who came in and said "well, I thought the girls would like an older guy so I pretended to be 20." They were like "you're so stupid, don't do that again, go home" 
I don't get the concept of cheating in a way that you don't even benefit from. My husband's girlfriend before he started dating me cheated on him by sucking another guy's dick. When he told me I was like, and then they had sex or he went down on her, right? Nope, she just sucked his dick. Multiple times. She ruined a relationship with an amazingly sweet, smart, hilarious, handsome, caring guy and all she got was balls on her chin? I mean thanks, because I am loving life with him, but I'll never understand it. 
I was in Atlantic City one time, playing roulette and this woman was playing next to me. Next thing I knew, cops were there and they said to her, "Ma'am, you left your two kids in the car in the parking garage, it's time to leave." Do you know, she would not leave! They had to drag her out of there. It was one of the craziest things I've ever seen. 
I think that was the guy who set up at a zoo parking lot. The zoo assumed he was a city employee and the city assumed he worked for the zoo. 
You are MUCH more likely to die on a relapse than any other time, since it is when you have the lowest tolerance, but are used to taking larger doses. 
The problem with drugs is: You might see yourself as a strong-willed person who can resist temptation and "just not get addicted". But the drugs turn you into a different person, a person that doesn't have the same willpower. 
I don't remember where I saw it, but a guy was talking about how ashamed he felt over his suicidal thoughts. Dude had tried to hang himself, but the belt snapped and damaged his spine or something. Thankfully it was able to be mended, but he had to go to get help in a group therapy. One of the people he met was this brilliant guy with a flashy car, gorgeous supportive wife, tons of money, etc. That was what drove it home to him that suicidal thoughts weren't necessarily something that he had because he was weak or worthless. It could strike at anyone with any level of success. We focus so much on whether or not we're allowed to be depressed, that we miss out on thinking about how we can take care of ourselves and get better sometimes. 
That's one reason why ivy league schools have high suicide rates. Suddenly, all the kids who were always at the top of their class are together, and someone has to be average. It's hard to adjust to being average when you've always been on the right side of the curve. 
That's known as anhedonia. Meth causes it to an extreme but all drugs have the potential. Meth is so powerful that things you don't enjoy doing can suddenly be pleasurable. More often, anhedonia manifests in the diminished pleasure of certain activities. Like you might enjoy reading a great deal but a substance abuse problem cause you to enjoy it less and less, to the point it starts to feel like work. Gradually your life narrows and fixates around the substance, because your brain has been retrained to increasingly feel pleasure only from that one thing. Part of withdrawal is the sheer boredom and lack of joy because your brain hasn't readjusted to feeling pleasure from normal activities yet. 
Sadly sometimes abused people get stuck in the cycle because they don't really have a good gauge for normal behavior. That is their normal, and are in some ways conditioned to just go with it. That may have not been the case here but it's a sad phenomenon. 
How does one refuse to blow for the cops? Usually they'll take you in right then and there for suspicion. Maybe cause private property? 
Probably why they threw the book at him. He didn't take a plea deal, which would probably have gotten him out sooner. 
He would have gotten away with it too if it wasn't for him diddling kids 
That mentality along with the pressure to keep up with everyone really fucked my life up for years. I went to college and blew my first test and ended up shutting down from stress over it and not being able to talk to anyone about it. I started missing classes, feeling to anxious to show up, and then I was too anxious about being behind. I ended up mentally breaking down, flunking out, and working in the restaurant industry for years. Once you get used to living day to day in that kind of industry, it's hard to escape. It wasn't until I was 25 that I got my shit together and went back to college for my own sake. A year later I've graduated and found a great job, so I am happy now, but it took me a long time to recover from my breakdown. People, and especially youths, need outlets to discuss their issues with without fear of disappointment or judgement. 
Yea, best thing about when I was given a dose morphine for my broken leg was just the absence of pain. More about what I *didn't* feel that was good 
yeah, unfortunately, financial ineptitude/ addictive consumerism is at crisis levels in the US. So much so that the US military now has mandatory financial counseling classes for various reasons including: financial problems are the number one cause of divorce and a huge factor in soldier performance. The logic is that a soldier can't focus on the battle when he's fighting with his wife who's 2000 miles away and he's stressing about money. 
Isn't that fucking wild, though? You'd have no idea you were predisposed until something snaps and it just happens? I know drugs and traumatic events can trigger it but like, damn, it's crazy knowing that you could be one car accident, one close family/friend's death, one rock away from full blown schizophrenia. 
I'm sure he did...but also felt he was qualified for consideration. If you ever met the guy, the story would somehow make more sense 
The old I'm invincible, oh wait I'm dead routine. 
They die :/. Read about one on reddit a few weeks back. Girl tries to cut off a guy in a truck, she can't.. minute later pulls up level with him screaming out the window, finally zooms in front of him and SLAMS the brakes him. He couldn't stop, basically ran directly over her tiny car and she was killed instantly. The road I drive every day is full of people who think that jamming themselves into the gap I've left so I won't run into the person in front of me will magically make the traffic ahead go away. Then they go back to the other lane.. then back again.. and so on. Never indicating, always speeding and for some reason *never getting anywhere faster than I am*. Honestly if I live to be 80, one of the hardest things I'm going to have to explain to kids is why on earth we ever let people drive cars on public roads manually, or why we just tuned out that fact that hundreds of people die every single day doing it. 
There was a mortage involved. No gold popcorn though. :( 
I couldn't get 800 guests to show up at my wedding if I held it at the 50 yard line during halftime of the super bowl. 
Converting appreciating assets into depreciating/non assets is the American way. 
I always thought they were over exaggerating when they said you could get addicted after just one use. Well holy shit, Exhibit A. 
Or even "How about you transfer to Gateway Community College in New Haven?" 
They shrugged off the accusations saying that CPS have already investigated them and found nothing. They don't care as long as they get more views. It's awful. And the one kid "at least they don't beat us." 
Holy cow. I wasn't familiar with either youtuber, but DeFranco does an excellent job of explaining the situation. I have a lot of respect for the guy and the way he handles it. I really hope that exposure will have a positive result for those kids. 
Don't forget "Ladies of Reddit: what's the sexiest sex you ever sexed?" 
I never saw that but it must have been funny as hell. 
I... uhh.. I brought the condoms so I could teach her about the meaning of safe sex 
My favourite story from Reddit is about a guy in school who disobeyed the teachers, and they would tell him he wouldn't get anywhere with his attitude. He basically told them to fuck off and said "I just want to be a plumber". Years later, he was a plumber. 
Yeah I don't get people that rob delivery drivers. They don't carry more than 20 dollars in change. You get some that will stupidly carry all their tips on them but even then that's not much. Certainly not worth the risk/effort. 
Working in a prison's health care unit, I see this all too often. An offender will be released, go back to their same pre-incarceration dose and it's too much. 
I went to the best college in the world for my major (top 25 overall US) and the reality of being average there ... well I wasn't prepared for it. It really fucked me up and I'm still feeling the effects 15 years later. I should have just stayed local and kept building confidence and momentum in my studies and career. I think I would have been much better off. It was a very expensive and depressing "lesson" to be learned. 
Well, afaik that's the draw of opioids. A trip to "can't be arsed" land, addicting to those who feel constantly overwhelmed, have some chronic injury or feel like shit a lot. 
It's almost like they should teach financial responsibility in HIGH SCHOOL but you know. 
Never understood this romanticized feeling people seem to have for dying by "speed!" Like dude speed didn't kill you, blunt force trauma did. 
On a road where I lived, 4 teens died trying to pass on a 2 lane road around a blind corner. They were driving home from a funeral for a friend who died in a car accident. You can't make this shit up. 
Brown guy chiming in, we laugh at this 800 person small gathering 
She's Greek, he's Italian, so there was a huge amount of family that they had to invite. 
That's the dangerous thing about the war on drugs. We tell entire generations that weed is a terrible drug, doing drugs makes you a loser, etc. Then those kids realize that people that smoke weed, take acid, etc seem perfectly fine, some are even great role models. The credibility is completely gone, they feel lied to, and don't trust that there *are* any drugs like that. Our endless stigma and reluctance to acknowledge the differences, and in some cases, benefits just make this so much worse. 
This. They left the Bentley out in a hail storm to put the Accord in the garage. 
"At least you don't beat us *like most parents*." The kid thinks that most other parents hit their kids and his parents are nice for not doing that. This kid would lose his mind if he saw how most parents treat their kids. 
I love the old guy who said he was buying the house from a guy named Jeff or Mike , 
Hell, being a plumber is probably the better option these days. Having a trade is where it's at. 
Not sure if dark joke or genuine desire to inform others lol 
Not gonna lie, sometimes when it's very busy I'm carrying ~150+. Most shops make you "drop cash" so you don't get robbed as bad. 
I used to work at a substance misuse clinic, and we'd see this kind of thing a lot, and people who were trying to get clean and turn their lives around but die from drug related causes such as blood clots. There was a 23 year old woman that died from a blood clot in her lung in her bed next to her boyfriend he woke up and she had died in her sleep next to him. Obviously he was completely broken from it and relapsed himself. Such a sad situation. 
Teaching financial responsibility in High School won't do any good as it is much more behavioral than it is technical. People that I know that are financially responsible are the children of financially responsible people and learned the behaviors over the course of their childhood. And the people that I know that are financially responsible despite not learning the behavior at home, adapted because they saw the effects of that lack of responsibility during their childhood. A few lessons or even a class that lasts a whole year given to a teenager won't make any difference, not unlike most classes and lessons on the lives of the students. 
Oh yeah if you're fine with the hours and the hard work, you're set for life with trades. There's a trade school across from mine and everybody here acts like they're trashy, but honestly I'm willing to bet a lot of them will be better off than us. 
You've convinced me to rob you! I'll take a large pepperoni pizza, thanks! (Come to the back door.) 
From what I've heard, yeah. They still feel the pressure a bit, but that first quarter is really the rough one. Getting acclimated with college AND forcing nothing but perfection out of yourself isn't a good combo. 
There are different types of nasal sprays that don't have that rebound effect and can be used safely daily. They don't have that immediate effect like the old types but if used daily help quite a bit. One that I have taken for years just went over the counter as Flonase Sensimist. I lived my whole life with 24x7 stuffed up nose and it is much better since I found these types of sprays. There are multiple different types and brands so you may have to try several to find one that works for you. I tried three or four along the way. 
"One time I brushed against this neckbeards fedora just to see if I could give him a boner. I dont think he realized it was a dude in that cat costume." 
'All right!' said the banker, and all on his own, He stamped his approval, and gave them the loan! They'd *never* afford it, not one little bit... But nobody could, and the world went to shit. 
Your poems are like wrapping yourself in a towel straight from the dryer. 
this was what i always did in high school. just get it over and done with, and you dont have to sit there getting more anxious or worrying that yours isnt as good as someone who just did theirs. At university if there was an assignment that involved a presentation, and the presentations would take several classes/weeks for everyone to do theirs, i would always volunteer to do mine the first week. teachers often grade you easier compared to those who get another week or two to prepare. 
I take van road trips by myself. People I know freak out because I'm a female and they think it's unsafe. My favorite is to go out into the desert where there is no one for miles and just enjoy the sunshine, solitude, and amazing night skies. 
We made something similar in college but since we used vodka and Tang we called them Cosmonauts. 
Note: Do not do this on your nether bits if you are a lady. It burns hotter than Satan's asshole. 
This definitely sounds like an Elvis Presley sort of creation 
Makes sense to me - humans are one of the only animals that poop while wearing pants. 
I want to get into d&d so bad but I'm a single dad with no time/friends to play with. 
I freaking love egg drop. It always goes in when I eat ramen. 
Really, do a bunch of ridiculous vocalizations in your car. Talk in an accent. Sing in a goofy voice. Pretend YOU'RE the host the radio show. Playing with your voice is fun and being in your car gives you the freedom of not worrying about other people hearing you. 
And that crack the cover makes when you first flip open a hard-cover textbook, ahhh 
I can get behind this. I just recently discovered jeans with a bit of stretch in them, and they are amazing. 5/7, will never wear non stretchy pants again. I am eagerly awaiting the women's yoga pants tend to make its way to men. It will be a glorious day, full of moose knuckles and awkward boners, but fuck will it be comfortable! 
Put some jalapenos on there and it's like a popper sandwich. 
If you're going to try this with filled donuts (UK here) just be aware that the filling will be hotter than the surface of the sun when you bite into it. 
I like it when we put our chests together and make a swimming pool with the water that catches, then releasing it all at once! Showering with an SO is fun. 
Is that weird? I just zap it for like 10 seconds to make it slightly warm and soft. It makes stale-but-not-yet-moldy baked goods more edible too. 
I'm too lazy to figure out if my socks are the right way out when I grab them so its a 50/50 on whether I'm getting this 35% bonus 
Taking these small kinds of 'risks' have improved my life so much! I feel like my anxiety has practically disappeared and I'm a lot more confident. Start small: email customer service instead of calling if that's too overwhelming-you'll get there :) 
can't see shit but it doesn't matter, looked cool. 
Lol I have had chronic hiccups for over 3 years. I have tried every remedy in the book, but I see how it might work as a distraction to pass a typical case. 
I can't decide if this is something that works like a Pringles can antenna, or just another trick to make it look like I'm jerking an invisible dick onto my face. 
...and everyone acts like you're literally eating a loaf of shit off a greasy Chinatown bathroom floor. He said *lick her butt* not *eat her shit*. 
And they look highly on people with the balls to go first. 
Yes second is best. And sometimes there's some uncertainties (how long should I go?, should I talk about this?, etc) that are nice to observe how someone else does it first. 
YES! I don't feel so alone in the world anymore! I also line the tub edge with heavy shampoo bottles to keep it firmly in place and sealed. My kids have all learned this behavior from me, and it drives my husband crazy. He'll try to pop his head in and say something to me, breaking the seal, and sending bottles flying everywhere. 
Hey man there is this new concept called online shopping. Guess what you can buy online? Signed, Guy From Canada who now sprays ass with water gun seat. 
See, if the product was marketed as a bum gun, it would totally catch on. 
You have to be careful with the japanese ones. I accidentally hit the female button and took a shot right in the back of my nutsack. Not terrifyingly unpleasant but it was unsettling to say the least. My navy buddies were trying to figure out how some woman was screaming in the bathroom when they were sure it was just me in there. 
I always got relief from an ice pack on my neck when I had a migraine, so likely its the cold constricting the blood vessels and not the water. 
As someone with sensitive teeth, this just made my entire body lock up like Ashlee Simpson. 
We make something similar in college but since we use Country Time and Everclear we keep it nameless. 
Same I went for two hours and thought I was in there for 30 minutes. 
I feel you the whole concept always sound like a panic attack waiting to happen. 
Well, good. You should of course adjust the idea to what works for you. 
Was it the older guy with white hair with magical posture doing inverted situps? He almost got me too. 
I've used one of these in the past. I basically felt my back popping almost immediately. Just to be safe I would then use the handles it hard to help me twist and pop my back that way as well as pulling down a little to add even more decompression. You're not supposed to hang upside down for more than like 10 mins because blood pools in your head, but in reality you'd only need 5 mins or less. Depending on what you do afterwards your back will feel nice for about 30 mins to 1 hour. 
Thank you so much for saying that. I was actually debating testing out OP's conditioner tip down there. You've dissuaded me otherwise (thank God I read the responses). 
The place I get this from calls it the Elvis buger. It was 100% an elvis thing 
I work from home. Clothes just don't feel natural any more. 
same but not a single dad and i have time. i don't understand it and there's no one in my area who can show me. 
In a weird way it's helped with my social anxiety. I've found that doing dumb vocal exercises like this on my way to work or anywhere just helps me open up and speak more confidently around people. I'd highly recommend it 
but you can hear people just talking inside the elevator when you're walking past in the hallway... I can't imagine what was going through the heads of all the people that heard you screaming 
And then the twinge in your stomach when you realize that crack cost 600$ 
The drinks I invented in college were wildly different from this 
We called this suicide! I loved it as a kid but haven't tried it in a long time 
I love this. I prefer my root beer floats with chocolate ice cream over vanilla so this mix tastes similar. We also add half & half to root beer and call it creamy soda to avoid being confused with the misnomer of cream soda. 
FFS, can I go one day on Reddit without being told to eat a butt? 
It feels like what I imagine a tarantula's abdomen feels like. 
I was at a pop up grilled cheese place in NYC recently and they use mayo instead of butter -- they don't tell anyone because it weirds some folks out but damn if the grilled cheezuses weren't absolutely fantastic, I'll always use mayo from now on. 
Doritos with sour cream dip, guacamole and salsa is basically a replacement for a meal at least once a week. 
Believe it or not we do have filled donuts in the U.S. as well. 
I find you get better luck by pressing on your taint, you'll have a little twitch and then bam, empty. 
You can even do this alone by bringing your knees up to your chest and rocking back and forth gently! 
KK actually recommends microwaving for 8 seconds. Source: It's on the box of dozens. 
My friend set off the fire alarm and had to have the whole dorm evacuated while the fire department showed up all because he microwaved a ball of cookie dough. 
As someone who struggles with anxiety as well, I have to ask if there's anything in particular, even if just a quote or something to change your perspective, that's helped with the fear of public embarrassment? It seems to be the basis for my anxiety most of the time :( 
That's why you should just stop thinking. It might sound weird but trust me 
That depends, are you just friends with your job, or is there something stronger - something *realer* - under the surface? Do you find yourself thinking of your job at times, even though normally, you wouldn't think of other jobs in the same way? Do you notice little things about your job that you didn't before? Simple things, really, just small details that make your job more precious to you than your other friends? If so, you might be more than just friends with your job, even if you try to tell yourself otherwise. 
Spot in assessment. There's also a justification bias. You just went through something physically taxing. Your mind wants to believe that you did that for a reason. Similar to how fraternities would use hazings. Pledges would be hazed, but then they would feel more connected to/closer to the frat because they went trough so much shit to get in that it HAS to be worth it, right? 
Yeah, Minnesota here. I don't work outside, but I'll board that no fucking thanks train too. 
Whenever my hiccups last more than a few hours or even carry over to the next day, I fear that they will never go away. You are living my nightmare. 
It really works! Source: anonymous anecdotal person on the internet (me) 
You mean people DONT dip their fries in shakes? The fucks wrong with you guys? 
Little of column A, little of column B, little of column C, little of column.. D 
I've noticed a slight decrease in scores over time after the first presentation as the person grading got bored of seeing the same topics flashing out, or simply bored of seeing presentations. 
Completely different experience/circumstances but I've recently started to feel like there's no accountability with doctors. Family doctor passed away so had to find a new one and almost all of them were just awful for so many reasons. Unfriendly, not helpful, judgmental, outdated equipment, etc. I'm guessing I would have had a better experience if I had a better insurance plan and/or more money to spend on healthcare and that's a scary thought. 
Constructing the vessels and rehydrating would both increase blood pressure. So maybe that's where the answer lies? 
I would say maybe they just short you on time on purpose and tell you "yeah man you're so sensory deprived that you don't even know how fast time goes!" but actually they only really leave you in there for 30 minutes but then I realized most people have a phone to verify -- I'm dumb. 
I thought the same thing, but you're not locked in, and free to stand up, take a break, or leave whenever you'd like. Where I go they have private rooms so no one would notice if you took a breather. 
For about a week, he was so much calmer. He seemed centered. I don't know how else to describe it. We are making this a regular thing for him. 
Whenever I hear my heart I'm reminded of my fraility. 
I've been doing this with cayenne pepper for years. I find it to work extremely well. Will have to give the tabasco trick a shot sometime but I imagine the results are virtually the same 
I'm over 72 years old *pause and jump* AND I FEEL GREAT! 
I've used conditioner on my nether bits for shaving and have never experienced any burning. It might just depend on the conditioner or something. I actually use a sugar scrub for most of my shaving now days, since it seems to keep my skin hydrated longer to prevent any chafing/itching later. 
*attaches 2nd set of cuffs* You are under double arrest for screaming in a squad car. You have the right to remain twice as silent as before. Anything you say can be used in a court of law twice. You have the right to a second attorney. 
Sometimes they would press the button and I would stop before the door opened. When they got on, they would ask, "Were you just screaming?" And I would shrug and say, *weird, right, I heard it, too* and they would eye me suspiciously as we rode down to the lobby. 
Now it just taste like diabetes and crushed childhood memories. 
Why not eat a bowl of cereal while driving as well, you goddamn weirdo. 
You can wear a pair of shorts over the compression pants, it still feels amazing. 
Haha luckily I was standing right there and noticed immediately, it was mostly just smoking with a tiny flame that I easily blew out. Once I was sure everything was safe I hurried the hell out of the room and no one at work ever asked about it, so I think everything turned out okay. 
Dammit, but we don't have microwaves. You win this time U.K. 
I hate when you ask for honey and they give you honey mustard. 
Fact: Kevin Costner once held in a pee for 15.7 hours. 
It takes some time and practice as both a DM and player to get to the point where you can DM like that though. 
Forget about shaving with a Mach 3 after a long weekend. That's what really sells me. The single blade doesnt clog and cleans up easy after shaving a 1/8 inch of stubble. I follow up with a generic 3 blade for the mouth and chin. 
Best part, is your tears will mix with the water and you won't be able to tell that you're crying! 
That's probably because they recently changed the algorithm for displaying upvotes. 
It feels good, feels real good. You know, I been training hard. Shitposting 8 to 10 hours every day for as long as I can remember. Sometimes you get weary, but you know you gotta fight through because ain't no one gonna hand you karma in this world. So kids, drop out, smoke dayglo buds and shitpost on reddit until you to can one day, briefly, have a popular post, before spiraling back into the hopeless hell of real life. Peace out. Brought to you by Carl's Jr 
I like to live life on the edge and microwave mine for 9 seconds. 
I did a workshop to fight anxiety and as part of it they made us do ridiculous things. Like going into a bookstore and ask what they were serving for lunch. It was like embarrassing at first and we resisted it for a while. But after a few times doing it I was way more comfortable doing things and going out of my comfort zone. 
For me the first small risk was commenting on Reddit, the first time I did it I nearly had an anxiety attack! So congratulations, you are already taking small risks! Some more I can think of off the top of my head are: smiling at a stranger, asking a store clerk for help, leaving a message on an answering machine, giving someone you don't know very well a compliment, saying hello to a coworker you've never spoken to. It will get easier the more you practice taking these small risks. Don't be embarrassed if it feels awkward or forced at first, keep at it and it will get easier! 
I think I think I used to think, But now I think no more - The thoughts I always thought I thought, I thought, I think, before. And now, I think, I think a thought Infrequently, and so - The rarer thoughts I think I think Are lesser thought, you know? So shed the thoughts you think you think, And when your thoughts have shrunk - You'll see the thoughts you thought you thought Are better thought unthunk. 
The great thing about tigger outfits is you can wear it every Halloween. Last year tigger police, this year tigger army man, next year tigger stripper...it's great! 
But dude, have you tried syrup **on** the pancakes! 
Honestly, its awful. By now I only get them a few times a day, it used to be constant! 
A little column A, a little column B, a little column C. 
Damn that sounds awesome. Did you get insanely bored or just regular bored? I wouldn't want to give up and get out. 
I thought this might happen too, so I made sure to check the time on my phone before I got in this weekend when I went. First time also. They actually gave me a couple extra minutes. But it went by so bizarrely fast. 
That's awesome! Glad you found something he not only likes but works so well! 
I have a very weird phobia where I'm afraid of my own heartbeat. Especially when I go to sleep and lay on my left side, I become super aware of it and become afraid that I'd hear it stop. 
Wasabi is definitely a wham-bam-thank-you-ma'am pain vs the lingering hell of a chili. 
Dude got like 4 inches off the ground, but damn, I hope I'm that healthy when I'm that age. 
Can I get the other guys attorney? If the state doesn't have an attorney, and I have both attorneys, I win. 
Trick is to keep on screaming when the door opens. They won't get in, you can continue your ride alone. 
It tastes a great deal like crayons too though. The 4-year old in me says that's a good thing. I've asked him to get out, but he doesn't want to. Such a pain in the ass. 
I am so happy I found an internet stranger that shares in a pain I thought limited to only myself. 
Yeah, that's true. To a point at least. It's more improv skills than actual gameplay skills in my opinion, although knowing the rules obviously helps facilitate that. Probably the best route is to use modules while you're learning the ropes (which also requires little prep) and then be able to adopt your own methods. 
No one ever sees the tears / when you're crying in the rain 
Nah you have to downvote then upvote so he gets an extra upvote! 
Sounds like something straight out of Dr. Seuss. A+ 
The wonderful thing about Tiggers, is Tiggers are wonderful things. Their tops are made out of rubber, their bottoms are made out of springs. FTFY 
Try some of column A, try all of column B. I'm in the mood to help you, dude... 
It's your closest companion. You take it with you from start to stop. I think of it more as an old friend. 
There are a few companies that build them but a quick Google search reveals that you can also build them for just under $2000. The expense comes from the pumps and the heaters meant to keep the water at a consistent temperature. 
A lot of 72 year olds struggle with just standing up unassisted. Jumping at 72 is downright athletic. 
Sir you have a right to an attorney. You-you don't have a right to a particular attorney. 
"aaaaaa aaaaa aaaaaaaa aaaaaa aaaaaaa" "Huh, I just read about that on reddit" 
Well great, now you've just made me associate that with tarantulas too. 
If you don't know a rule when something comes up in play don't spend more than two minutes looking for it, I rarely do more than one. If you haven't found it by then make it up, tell your players you'll look it up after the session so the ruling may change next time, but until further notice this is how it works. Then stick with that. If you don't manage to find it or get around to looking it up, but it worked, stick with it. In earlier editions of D&D it was often pointed out that they weren't rules, they were guidelines. This has become known in many circles as rule 0, everyone should be having fun. If a rule isn't fun, get rid of it. This may all be things you know already, so my apologies if I'm reiterating anything. 
*For five years, I was stranded on an island with only one goal: survive. Now I will fulfill my father's dying wish - to use the list of herbs and spices he left me and bring down those who are poisoning my fruit. To do this, I must become someone else. I must become something else* 
It's an 8-6-8 meter poem, almost a duotrain but each stanza doesn't start with the same letter. Dr Seuss uses anapestic tetrameter :O 
You ain't never had a friend like me *jazz hands* 
That's WAY cheaper than I expected. I was expecting another 0. 
My great grandpa played tennis till he was like 78 
Screaming: "HUH, I JUST READ ABOUT THAT ON REDDIT" 
That's why r/evenwithcontext exists. But people managed to mess that up too. 
Fine. It feels like going down on a freshly shaved tarantula. 
I am... the green salted chili - flaked lime covered pineapple. 
"HUH, I JUST READ ABOUT THAT ON REDDIT" 
I'm moderately sure r/evenwithcontext is used roughly the same as r/jesuschristreddit. 
*Previously on salted chili - flaked lime covered pineapple...* 
There's also Don't argue with stupid people. They'll just bring you down to their level, and beat you with experience. In other words, continuing to argue with an obvious idiot, especially if nothing important is at stake, makes you an idiot. 
Bertrand Russell said it first (and better IMO): "The trouble with the world is that the stupid are cocksure and the intelligent are full of doubt." If you had to summarize Reddit in 1 line, that is it. 
Or they will get frustrated but instead of realizing how ignorant they might be they instead think you're the idiot. Rarely have I come across a person that fits this topic that actually changed their mind for the better. 
Awesome line (I just wish somebody could provide a testimony for this). 
I choose to belive that it is someone who has mistaken the 'give gold' button for the upvote button and no-one else has stepped in to correct them. 
I don't think it's a leprechaun... It smells a lot like someone who doesn't know what they're doing with gold but is really confident in giving it out 
Indeed. This is the most typical scenario. They don't care about truth, they care about themselves and how they look in a social setting. It's selfish really. 
Not if we can convince the super delegates to switch and get a recount on all the primaries, Bernie can still win 
People that can't handle being corrected are usually assholes though. It's not hard to say "You sure? Oh well, my mistake." 
Reads like they had a bout of cognitive dissonance. They simply couldn't accept the reality the experiment showed them. 
This is exactly what I meant by "Sometimes its just due to having not had any real challenges in life yet". What your boss' boss did wasn't, in my opinion, the best way to handle that. I'd have done the demonstration but absolutely not in front of people. And showing how to not make the same mistake in the future is a lot better than wasting company resources by firing someone. 
*writes on hand* hurr durr president *puts hand against window* 
It's easier to change someone's opinion if *everyone* around them disagrees with them rather than just a single person. 
I hate when that happens. I had a coworker like that as well. It was almost a game to lead him in circles with arguments. 
I've never seen Portal 2, so I can't speak to that circumstances specifically, but if a person is too dumb to understand when they have refuted their own point, guide them towards that. "Earlier you said X, but now it sounds like you're saying notX. Is that right? I'm not quite sure I understand how X and notX could both be right." 
Sometimes that person though will think about it later or rather digest it and change their mind. Thing is they may be too prideful to admit it to you, especially in the heat of the moment. Just cause they don't automatically say, "You're right" doesn't mean you didn't influence them. If they are stubbern in their belief they probably won't change their mind right away. Source: Myself who is very much like this. I'm stubbern and I hate admitting I'm wrong but sometimes people will get to me and I'll think about it and change my mind. If I am principled enough sometimes I'll even admit it to them (usually this involves an internet arguement cause it gives me some time to cool down or be able to get myself to type out the words, "I'm wrong" ;). It's a lot harder for me to admit in a person to person arguement). 
I disagree. You get more payoff this way than you would by berating the stupid person. You also stand a far higher chance of getting them to change their mind, or, at least, understand that there are different points of view. If you just tell the person that they are wrong, or stupid, or that your idea is better, they will get defensive. Nothing you say will be able to get through, and you will have achieved nothing. 
I'm not talking about *you* contradicting them. If they say something stupid, ask them questions that lead them to contradict themself. 
the best lack all conviction while the worst are filled with passionate intensity. 
It all relies on one's ability to articulate that intelligence into speech. 
Serious question - How much does her burning her trash affect global warming? I'm not being flippant, before I get roasted on this one. 
Got to agree with you man people say "ask them questions make them realise" but the reason they are full of confidence is because they went through their entire lives not realising. 
If you're thinking that you won't be stupid because you realise that you don't know everything and there is learning still be be done. A confident stupid person wouldn't realise this and carry themselves like they know everything. 
Or maybe there's a rich heiress to the Solo Cup fortune making the world a better place, one gold at a time. 
Weed them out, eh? Yeah, I'm going to hazard the guess you've never served. 
he's a salesman. that's all. the bullshit with him is deep and wide. he reads a bumpersticker and thinks he's fully informed. 
This reminds me of a house Cards against Humanity rule. If you don't know what a card is, you can discard it and draw another. We all get to explain the card and mock you though. Nothing helps show how silly something is like adults pointing and going, "you didn't know what a word was? Wow what school did you go to?" Sounds mean, but it helps show how silly the whole idea is. 
Dear Pissymon's dad: Anyone can say that, but not everyone can prove it. A Harvard graduate will have a diploma. The president of the United States will have been sworn in as president following the election. That's what a verifiable fact is. I think the last 20 years of Republicans claiming that facts don't matter anymore has honestly taught people that there's no such thing as a fact. 
Had a boyfriend like this once, and he was an asshole. Stop wasting your time, and move on from it. Correcting his/her stupidity will just be a waste of your time because they won't understand what they did wrong. They will only try to justify it. It's pointless. 
oh yeah? well people who admit they're dumb are often smart, so take that. 
How I wish this was true. Most will just assume everyone else is wrong. 
It was. It was painful sometimes when you need to get a real point across. 
Usually the person who acts that way is pretty rude and dismissive of others. It can be extremely frustrating to persuade someone of something only for them to look down their nose at you as if you were the idiot and they had held the correct view (the one you convinced them of) the whole time. It's a way for them to belittle you and keep their air of superiority. Even leaving out the normal human reaction to rudeness, there is a strategic reason to dislike this outcome. In such a fight as the problem suggests, you might win the battle but lose the rhetorical war. The opponent/other party will not see you as any more of an authority, and it entrenches for them and any susceptible audience that you are a fool who ought not be listened to. This means every future discussion will be a game of sophistic gymnastics above and beyond what it should be. 
You are assuming that even when it is pointed out that they can keep hold of both points at the same time. Though to be fair something not being noted here is if you follow this approach it also increases the chances of finding out that actually due to an oversight or arrogance that it is in fact you that are wrong! 
This method is great for more than just dealing with dummies! My brother-in-law and I disagree politically, but love to have a beer and ask each other hypotheticals - really walk each other through each other's points of view. I think we've both learned a lot from each other, and it's helped us navigate and process all of the noise around this last election cycle. 
It is very hit or miss. It wasn't until college I learned the name for what I was doing. My mom is grade a dumb as shit, bless her, but she would have the arbitrary reasons for things and I would have to find a way to make her logically see it was ridiculous. It works well provided you aren't going after something that might be considered a pillar of their personality. So I can reason with her on a multitude of things provided it isn't something that shapes her mental faculties. You do have to pick your battles. You have to be more stubborn. You have to be able to play dumb. You have to be able to seem completely sincere. You will still be saying, I'm sorry I'm just trying to understand your reasoning. Being humble is difficult in the face of pure idiocy. I don't think my mom meant to train me in this but hey I having a great set of life skills due to it. 
If I had gold, I'd have given it to you. The main problem I find myself dealing with is that people don't understand this simple fact that the loudest person in the room is often the stupidest and the most defensive one. But unfortunately people attribute this trait with the person being "correct" & being more confident in presenting their opinion. I would never raise my voice because I don't find any reason to most of the times, cause in my mind I'm always thinking that if this group of people is so stupid to understand this simple thing, then let them just live in their ignorance, why waste my time and energy . And I want to change that part of mine, I really do, but that is where I always fail, I just give up by politely removing myself from the argument altogether. 
I'm always afraid that I don't know enough, and that's what makes me stupid, so I reach out to learn more. Thanks stranger, you put my mind at ease today. 
I choose to believe that our friend the Nigerian Prince is trying to get our favor with his millions that he can't transport. 
I've heard this one applying to arguing with an engineer 
Meanwhile my mom tells me about all the new things that cure cancer that she saw on the evening news... 
Yeah, we used to play that rule, until myself, my wife, my wife's brother, his wife, and his wife's 68 year-old mother were playing, and the word Queef came up, and someone had to explain what a Queef was to my mother-in-law-in-law. That was a bit traumatic (and hilarious). 
All good, man. The fact that simply reading what I said was enough to make you realize you should be more patient with your little brother says alot of good things about your character. Being able to admit something you are doing is wrong is an amazing quality that some people never grasp. Have a great weekend! 
Sometimes the problem is that, as mean as it is to say, a confident person isn't an expert at anything so they can't imagine what it would be like to have the level of skill a doctor who graduated from Harvard has. Its the kind of confidence that rejects a "the more you learn, the more you understand how much more there is to learn" mentality in favor of boosting their most prominent attribute: confidence. 
So do I. I like they guy and he deserves to be happier. Luckily I think things have improved for him. I don't think he's been seriously ill for a few years now, but the thought processes must still be there, deep down. 
Yep, that's exactly what it means. It comes from a passage in the New Testament, Matthew 7:6 to be exact. Jesus says "Do not give dogs what is sacred. Do not cast your pearls before swine." In the context Jesus meant it in the sense that you shouldn't waste your time preaching to those that aim to discredit the Gospel; put your pearls(of wisdom) before them and they'll just trample on it, not realizing what it means. Today I think its spiritual meaning has fallen off, and it really is just used in reference to not wasting your time sharing knowledge to the foolish. 
Engineer student here, A lot of our homework is the same in regards to logical processes. Even though the logic is undeniable you can still come off as arrogant or condescending all too quickly in a public setting. I usually revert to a well worded private email for best results. 
Why do you think they assume such a position so quickly? 
It's like trying to play chess with a pigeon. You can make all the right moves but the pigeon is still just gonna strut around, knock pieces over, and shit on the board. 
If you can't convince the person they're dumb at the first or second party, good luck at the third one. 
Einstein said it best: "Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." 
When you increase the scale you increase the variables. At a certain point, nothing works. I doubt most of us have to deal personally with major political players though, which I believe is what the question is about. 
This is true: Stronger opposition will cement peoples opinion even further, even if it means appealing to contradiction or a simple "Well I think/feel..." But giving them a chance to debate their opinion might help them on the long run, or to change them when they have a chance alone to settle down. Meeting someone truly ready to accept their failure is meeting someone who is not, or no longer is, stupid 
The best I can say there is that everyone else probably also knows he's a moron. Try to avoid working with him (when possible), and, if you *do* have to work with him, make sure people know the fuck ups are his fault. 
The uranium example was just meant to be one example. The technique works for just about any political, philosophical, or religious debate. It doesn't work well for science vs religion though since they can always fall back on faith over reason. The technique pretty much requires both parties to at least believe they are operating off of some sort of reason or logic so that a retreat to faith or authority isn't a viable escape from the issue. You're also more likely to see slow progress and a softening of their stance on individual sub-issues than a full conversion. Eventually, this technique can make a person more likely to question themselves even without you about. They'll learn to assume every story is more complex than the short blurb on TV or the radio. Teaching someone how to critically approach their own beliefs this way will pay dividends in that person's life. I speak as someone who was taught and who has taught. 
So? I'm wrong sometimes. I love figuring out that I've been wrong on something, it means I get to change my opinion to what's actually right! 
Well, yeah. That was the whole point. He could've skipped town and not gone to trial. But he wanted to show everyone who would watch, the jury of his peers, and those who sentenced him to death, that they were just buttflustered that he was right and they were wrong. His sentence, if not carried out, had no meaning. The entire trial was a kangaroo court, and his death carried much more meaning than living out his few remaining years in exile. 
That's the best way to be to be honest. You learn more and it sticks with you. And glad I could be some help. 
As an engineering student, I like this. And agree. 
Or all the things that CAUSE cancer. Yes mom, I DID hear that scientists thinks cigarettes cause cancer. 
Mate you decided to play cards against humanity with your mother in law in law... you folks sound like the type to eat puffer fish you purchase from an Asian looking dude on the bus. 
You've got all the right letters. I can just never remember if it's double-k first or second. 
It sounds like something I would do and I would most certainly be a dick about it. Sometimes being a dick is okay. 
Hmm.. my Celiac husband's symptoms included inflammation and break outs... but I have yet to find the second penis. Our cat still shows signs of autism though, so no luck there. 
Asking questions in a sincere manner that leads them to rethink it helps. The key is being respectful and sincere in the questions and not pushing what you think so it can be difficult but doable with practice. 
It's something called cognitive dissonance, not necessarily people hating on the Socratic method. Every person has a certain model/view on how things in the world work. When you challenge that model, through proof or otherwise, the person has to either accept that the model they thought was previously correct is flawed or refute the claim. Most people fall under the second action, because undergoing the first action is an extremely uncomfortable experience. (Psychologically). No one likes to feel uncomfortable, and unfortunately, that's the only way to improve : by reiterating and changing your model given evidence. EDIT - Stupid Grammar 
The real question is why you are inviting them to all these parties? 
I was gonna say something about variables! My experience is that the percent chance of success of pulling up the curtain on a confident idiot is inversely proportional to the total money, wealth, and fame the idiot has all divided by the amount of known brutality. 
Not knowing is not stupid. Not wanting to learn is. 
Here's me at most any job: "Oh, so why would you do that when it's four extra steps to get to the same place that simply doing x would do?" "That's just how we do it here." 
You assumed that I was stating it as if it was a bad thing. I was not, seeing your mistakes helps you learn. 
Magic rays of sunshine that come down when ya feelin blue 
My mom would fill me in on people that died that I had no memory of. I'd love to go back to those convos over never talking to her again though. 
Yeah, I know. Like I said, mother-in-law-in-law. I didn't have a lot of sway in the activity for the evening. 
Nah man, she just misses someone talking dirty to her. 
Of course, that's not the hard part. The hard part would be answering the follow-up question... "And how do you know that?" 
Sheltered, I think I could deal with. Something about the whole old-lady thing that I couldn't handle. 
Which, considering they refused to do as you asked, was deserved. 
I truly feel empathy for people with Celiac disease. The thought of me not being able to eat anything with gluten would make me sad. I would hate life without bread n stuff. On a happy note, I do think I have a Kitty that is on the spectrum. Or has some learning disability. She is very small for her age. She looks like a very long kitten. Or maybe she has a cat body with a kitten head. She is as sweet as she is dumb. She's very quirky and has a "schedule" that she likes to keep to or she throws a fit. We love her dearly. Sorry about the penis. It would have made sexy times interesting. 
The key is not pushing your thoughts or proof. You have to genuinely ask them in a calm way to get them to think about it. Works surprisingly well on a variety of subjects but requires of shit ton of tact. Pretty much the only time I have any. 
Do you think there's a way to use the Socratic method without evoking those feelings? 
Me to my husband: "Oh, so why would you do that when it's four extra steps to get to the same place simply doing x would do?" "That's just your opinion". He's an idiot and we're divorcing. 
It makes the history seem more real if you populate the stories with modern people in your head. You'll never get a perfect image since so much of ancient culture seemed barbaric and is hard to picture as they would have seen it without the gift/curse of hindsight (slavery and child rearing and sexism as examples). Still, it's better than imagining everyone as a stiff, 2d facsimile of a person. Imagine, for example, how the local cashier would react to Diogenes waltzing into the store to jack off onto the lettuce. Imagine the manager yelling "Hey, HEY! Stop that you asshole, that's the third time this week. I swear to Zeus. Charlotte, call the guards, tell them Jacky McSpunk is doing it again. Hey, hey ,hey! Fucking stop it." All while Charlotte is running out the store to find guards and the new hire is totally unsure how to help since a grown ass homeless man is jacking off on the vegetables while all the shoppers basically ignore him. 
They actually offered that to him or offered to let him stay if he stopped talking, but he basically said he'd have to die before he stopped talking, lol. (There was also some serious stuff about people being really angry he had challenged their beliefs and accusing him of atheism, too- a death sentence at the time.) 
Stupid science bitches couldn't even make I more smarter! 
The answer to that question is always "the Internet". 
I don't know if you realize this but old people were young once. You young'uns didn't invent dirty shit. Grandma was sucking dicks a long time ago. 
My husband's pretty positive about it, he figures he could have something that required lifelong medication, or something like Lupus or Chron's disease, which are much scarier and harder to treat. Even though gluten could technically kill him eventually if he kept eating it, he feels lucky that all he has to do is avoid a food group to keep healthy! Also, once the horrible life-long symptoms clear up, it makes it feel 100% worth it. Even though I was joking, and hopefully not offending anyone with autism spectrum disorders, I do always wonder if animals can be on the spectrum? We joke about my cousin's dog who is so non-dog like. She's so good, but doesn't understand dogs playing with her, and just isn't interested in a lot of typical dog things. She gets so zoned in and focused on a toy or a walk, that she notices nothing around her, It's honestly adorable. But we always kinda wonder and half joke that she has pawtism. 
I think, maybe, being conscious of how you come across (you don't wanna seem like you're slyly tricking or even patronising someone) and not taking it too far will help. Using the method once or twice to scratch the surface of someone's assumptions or arguments might work better than trying to bunker-bust them from the get-go. Ask a question or two, and leave them to mull it. Overcoming your own biases and lack of knowledge is hard so I extend that leeway to everyone. Even knowing you're wrong isn't enough; sometimes you think, "I may be wrong, but fuck them". Sometimes people need to feel that they changed their own minds, rather than feeling they were beaten up by the facts. 
My pastor does this all the time when talking about biblical stories. It definitely brings more attentiveness to the sermon. 
THAT'S INSANE THAT'S ABSOLUTELY INSANE THEY MADE ME LEARN THAT OVER BASIC FIRST AID 
Or "I've played this game before and someone else explained it to me" 
Lol pawtism. Thats great. Ya I'm not sure if that's a thing with pets. Also, sorry if I offended anyone as well. My Kittie has her own kind of "normal" that's a bit different from other Kitties "normal" so its more a way to explain it. But she's also a bit slow too so maybe its something else. The vet agreed that she has a smaller than average head but she's happy and healthy so we left it at that. 
"I may be wrong, but fuck them." is exactly how Donald Trump got elected. 
Has your pastor ever considered perhaps not jerking off onto the lettuce? 
Yup. Morons. E: Gold for calling my bosses morons. Wow, reddit. Thanks 
Shouldnt the first two sentences of your comment be steps 1 nd 2, not "???" E: my third gold ever in the same hour. For correcting grammar. 
I don't speak for anyone else, but I'm on the spectrum and was not even remotely offended, and 'pawtism' tickles my love of wordplay :) 
Thanks for the legit response lol! I've actually been genuinely curious about this, because it felt like that might be the case. Especially since I know cats can have dementia, and pets can display anxiety/depression, or chemical imablances that require medication. But since I'm 0% a doctor (I'm just a curious person who is 100% too obsessed with animals) I figured I might just be anthropomorphizing. 
I used to work at a call center as customer service. Company I was working for had me working under contract with a consumer electronics manufacturing company. Had a kid, maybe 10-15, who insisted that he'd thought up an idea for a device that the company I was representing then stole the idea, built it, and sold it without his permission. I told the kid that calling the customer service line for the company that "stole" his idea probably wouldn't do much. He called a few times. 
Something kind of similar happened to my late uncle. He was in his late 70s and loved going to the grocery store and just buying a ton of random new foods to cook. One day he was accused of putting a pickle in his pocket and trying to walk out with it. They actually had loss prevention deal with him and empty his pockets and stuff... he didn't steal a pickle. I can just imagine how frightened he was when he saw security talking to him. 
No wonder he's someone's ex, and a non custodial parent. Geez poor kids 
So, how long prior to the fire should one video the inventory of one's home? Asking for a friend who just got a new video camera and likes to smoke in bed. 
But a guy who has an abundance of yellow FUBU shirts is _less likely_ to shoplift another. 
That sounds like a really fucky case, technically he was wrong but technically he was correct 
Voodoo only works if you believe it does. Just tell any targets to stop believing in it, because believing gives it power. 
Sleep. Buy fruit salad. Discover missing strawberries. Spend the rest of the day calling lawyers to sue the supermarket. Repeat the next day. 
Fun Fact: Australia is the only continent with no active volcanoes 
Did he know that someone has to service it with a shitsucker truck every week or so? Was he sucking up his own turds with a shop vac? Port-a-potty ownership is not as glamorous as the movies make it out to be. 
Are you telling me you ACTUALLY practiced bird law? 
Hold on. I thought you could take whatever pictures you wanted to in public. I understand it's creepy and disturbing, but it's illlegal? 
As a paralegal who just (luckily) got away from a family law office to a defender's office, this gave me a migraine. I've seen some very stupid things in family law, but this?! They aren't married, and common law marriage doesn't apply in almost any state at all due to how hard it would be to enforce in the first place... She actually filed?!?! Def saving this comment for later. 
I never did figure out whose crowbars they were. Everyone involved was a crazy lying redneck. 
This thread is making my day. "Ma'am I rule that you lose custody after irrefutable evidence of extreme bitchiness, as shown here by your complaints about the two weeds in your neighbor's yard..." 
As someone who was a fabricator/welder/pipefitter being off by a foot is horrendous I'd be able to notice it very easily 
That's more tragic than stupid. The incredible difficulty of accessing all kinds of care, mental or physical, for delusional people whose capacity for rational deision-making is compromised is devastating at least for their loved ones, and potentially for the patient themself if and when they recover their perspective. That must have been incredibly difficult work. 
how does that end up in court? why were police called? 
You confused her with poor grammar, because it should have been "for whom?" Case closed 
This is adorable. Poor lonely dude just wants a project to work on with someone 
Oh yes. Fun times. I worked for a small company and the owner was batshit insane. Several employees sued for various reasons including not getting breaks. Each of us who sued received cease and desist letters stating that the owner is untouchable because s/he is not only a "native american" (i.e. s/he paid to become a member of a fake tribe that was later charged with fraud) but also because s/he isn't a citizen of earth but of the great beyond or whatever s/he called heaven in his/her made up religion. 
This is so weird, I just found out last night that a friend of Drake's (who is also a rapper) actually committed this exact crime. He was forcing chicks into prostitution and doing all sorts of fucked up stuff. He caught some human trafficking charges if I am not mistaken. 
Sir, your comment is ipso facto, habeas corpus, hate speech against sovereign citizens such as myself. I therefore demand, as a flesh-and-blood individual and not the legal entity also bearing my name, that you deliver immediately to me the sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000) as compensation, in the form of gold bullion. Additionally, by reading this message you have forfeited your right to appeal this decision, which has been made unilaterally by myself as a citizen of the land in the jurisdiction of reddit. Imagine this all written in red ink and signed with a thumbprint. 
I believe the word you're looking for is "Canadian". :) 
I'd argue he was 100% correct. The employee may have had a perfectly reasonable reason to legitimately fire him, but as that same behaviour did not result in the termination of white colleagues, smoking crack was not the reason he was fired. He was fired for being black, smoking crack was just the pretence. 
There are actually some interesting class action lawsuits that focus on this. You might think it's petty, and I guess it is. But when trailer footage shows shit that isn't in the game, companies can be found liable. Best example I've seen in Aliens: Colonial Marines. Just look up comparison videos on YouTube. It's clearly doctored. This one also has a wrinkle, as Sega is suing Gearbox for misleading them concerning the games quality AND (get this) using the money Sega paid them to make Aliens to finance Borderlands 2's development costs. Last I checked, the lawsuit was still ongoing. 
I have unofficial cat visitation with my old roommates. I kept the cat they had gotten while living with me until they got a place where they could have him again. I got quite attached! So I go see him about once a monthish. He's always glad to see me! I call him my step-kitty. 
AND trained to thoroughly wash its hands after wiping your ass and before cooking dinner. Otherwise it's only worth $425K if you have to wash their hands yourself. 
I don't know, service alligators are pretty expensive these days. 
Tell the lady to fight back with voodoo of her own. Then sell her some dolls and crystals for $49.99. 
No foal, no fee is the norm in Ireland, think it is in Britain as well. Means Plaintiff PI solicitors filter out most of the mental claims long before court. 
Fluffy is the cat the city council deserves, but not the one it needs right now. 
FALSE. Once someone discovered a volcanic rock in Melbourne. It was all covered up though in a conspiracy so that he wouldn't have to be paid for the discovery. 
I know the eps! I actually thought of it when talking to this lady. I was trying form a plan in my head on how to call her out. But since I'm not a Christian, I couldn't come up with anything on the spot that can prove she's not as devout as she claims. 
Dennis sounds like the grown up version of the Reddit legend Kevin 
I feel like there's a pun there, but I can't quite put my finger on it. 
Butcher saws are just strong band saws, they operate with a simple push of a button. If butchers had to hold the saw while they saw the vertebrae off a lamb rack, they might as well just use a cleaver. 
~~Yep.~~ Nope. The sister of another passenger in the van was sued by lawyers representing a passenger. Let's call their client Sue. They sued all the other passengers (along with the driver and the company that owned the van); among those other passengers was one passenger we'll call Daria. They asked about her car insurance, and Daria said she didn't have a car, but her sister did. So they sued Daria's sister. 
If they could control her thoughts, you'd think they wouldn't dictate that she goes to Walmart and tells people about their top secret operation. 
Usually I just put the shop vac right up to my ass and cut out the middle man 
There was a construction site nearby his office and his office was without a toilet. So he had to walk 200 meters and a handfull of stairs. To much for him, so he stole the WC. Lazy as shit. 
The lawyer on the other side was even more lazy than my client. Ah, he 90th in the german countryside. When a man could grab a toilet and rides in the sunset. Good times. 
I think OP was saying the case was stupid because the cop never confirmed that the person was actually committing a crime. 
I have read a case in my country that is similar to this. The officer due to his many years on the job was able recognize the smell of marijuana on the luggage of the person on the bus he was seated with. 
I was wondering the same. You'd think an attorney would be able to write a bit more clearly. 
Yes. Actually, taking on a case you know to be frivolous (that is, completely without merit or any basis in law) is grounds for sanctioning. It's called a Rule 11 violation. That's one of the reasons I'm asking the question (besides just to hear funny law stories). 
It was an eMachine. I think those things are imbued with the blood of Zeus and are immortal. 
Many adult video stores have a backroom set up with individual booths that have a monitor that will play a clip from a selection of videos for a fee. Many men will use them to masturbate there since it is cheaper than outright buying a video. Many men will also use the privacy of the booths to hook up for an anonymous handy or a blowjob from another patron of the adult video store. Thought that is discouraged by the owners since they don't want to run the risk of getting shut down if someone *pays* for the sexual act. 
To the best of my recollection, I've never told this story on the Internet before. And I doubt my guy's been doing any AMAs, but I suppose it's possible. 
Exactly. That's why we were going to sue for false arrest. They arrested him bc it was creepy not bc it was illegal. 
Yeah, the farmer never heard about the number of lawyers we had contact us as it never went beyond the initial request for documents. As soon as they read the case notes the lawyers would nope right out of the case. In the time I worked in that department it happened 3 times that I know of. Some people can't accept that their idiot decisions are their fault. 
Yes, she filed and had him served via certified mail and claimed he was avoiding service because he wasn't home for several days. She put all kinds of things in the divorce paperwork that don't belong. In the dismissed restraining order she said she wanted her furniture and this and that ...she is representing herself and is from Guatemala. She is clueless. 
In my jurisdiction, this wouldn't even make it to court unless they went through mediation first. That usually weeds out the idiots before they hit a judge. 
It was a criminal case - the District Attorney filed criminal charges, which doesn't cost anything. (And everyone involved thought the DA was an idiot.) 
Mate, I've got you covered: *ooh-ee-ooh-ah-ah, ting tang, walla walla bing-bang* 
To be fair, anyone who files an HOA complaint is pretty awful. 
Family court is horrible. It's also often referred to as "kangaroo court". Where the rules are made up and the procedure doesn't matter. It ends up like mediation with both sides being petty and terrible. 
Your answer to all three: It depends (mostly on the jurisdiction) 
Damn Canadians, I paid for all my sandviches, and yet here you go, letting free all those sandviches stealers! 
but then the lawsuit isn't really because the product is bad but because false advertisment is illegal. 
If it was a wedding reception, should not the organisers have paid? Or are you saying *he* did not pay for 50 tables? 
Yea, no win, no fee is plastered on every personal injury and PPI claim advert going 
To be fair, the male form of the Chinese pronoun is traditionally gender-neutral. The modern trend is to use different characters depending on gender though. 
You realize "Sue" is the most confusing possible name to use in this story, right 
Unless they do it cause they know no one would believe it 
I defend bad-faith cases and can confirm that my job is absolutely retarded. 
Likely wasn't a worker's comp claim then. Negligence wouldn't matter if he was acting in the course of his employment. 
Not wanting to walk to use the toilet is lazy, but stealing an entire port-a-potty takes a lot of effort. I'm not sure how I would classify him. 
"Ah, he 90th in the German countryside" is what I am going to respond when people ask what my brother is doing overseas, I love it. 
I'm not a cop at all and I recognized the smell on someone's luggage once. And in line at the gas station. And in line at Burger king. And at concerts. In my brothers kitchen. In my kitchen... 
Objection: this statement is vague, misleading, and harassing. 
Good info, but how easy is it to bail out of doing a case that violates Rule 11? Can you just say no to it or is there a special procedure for it? 
They were crap on paper and most broke after a few years from hardware failure but some are immortal. The select few....... 
And he wouldn't actually say anything. He'd just look at them until they fixed it themselves. Then smack them on the back of the head. 
Perfectly good jizz that could help homeless people but noooooo. 
"You know that guy we got in the tank?" "The creepy one?" "Yeah. Better let him go." 
What always surprises me in these stories is the amount of time they've been together. How do you live with a person for 5 years not realizing how insane and vendictive they are. 
Usually but unfortunately not always. It certainly can't hurt to have a lawyer. 
My Google says "the Senate will pay for it all," which just makes me think he's trying to trick Senator Palpatine into being generous. 
Friend, that only works with women who don't love you back. Ps thank you for this, loved the song but never saw the music video until now. 10/10 those are the only women with side burns I would do. 
I mean, the fact that they had a purple PT Cruiser shows that they are not capable of making proper decisions, for starters. 
I had a professor describe it like this: "Most court cases involve bad people on their best behavior. Family court is the opposite." 
Cripes, it'd have to depend on jurisdiction. This is literally the first time I've ever heard of them not taking the dog away! Every single story of this nature I've ever heard has been way more along the lines of "neighbor accuses dog of violence with no proof, dog gets taken away and put down." 
Did you file your own charges against her, or did your legal secretary testify as a character witness in the trial that started the whole thing? 
Well I haven't actually bought a house yet, I've just gotta finish this one last day of work... But seriously, implying I own a home LMFAO please, I'm a millennial. 
The old man was the organizer-- the groom's father to be exact-- and all payment are to be through him. He refused to pay anything until we gave him a discount. It was not just on my side though (the hotel); the MC (separate person and not part of the hotel wedding package) told us he also did the same thing to him. It's the old I-don't-care-I-am-right kind of customer you meet everyday. 
It's a bloody effective way of filtering out spurious claims. 
yeah, they do it to random crackheads so that everyone becomes desensitised and automatically dismisses it when the actual target of an operation tries to seek help. similar reason the x-files aired for so long. "i got abducted by aliens and gillian anderson was there and it was all the governments fault..." "yeah right, you fell asleep with the tv on" perfect cover. gillian anderson is a dangerous woman. 
Ah okay. I have no idea what the specifics are. I am not a lawyer. All I know for sure is a painter broke his back stepping on a cat and Farmers wasn't financially liable. 
 More likely you'll get charged with assaulting the police officer and his mates will back his story. Like that guy that was beat in the holding cell and charged for bleeding on the officers uniform a year or so ago. Or the officer that punched some guy and broke his hand in the process and that guy was also charged with assault bc of the broken hand (nothing else - legit your face broke my hand) 
Am lawyer, can confirm. In both directions. It's super satisfying to refer a good client to a competent lawyer you are friends with. It's also fun to point a crazy at an asshole. 
IANAL (yet) but as far as I know, you can just refuse to represent them, provided you haven't already agreed to take their case. *Afterwards* it's a bit harder, but you can still "fire" a client, especially if the case hasn't gone to court yet. It's better to do that than knowingly file a bullshit case. This is one of the reasons your lawyer will talk to you before agreeing to take you on as a client, and also why you as a client should disclose everything to them in that meeting, no matter how bad you think it makes you look or how embarrassing it is: it's to filter out the bullshit. Though the bar is really high for what constitutes bullshit. "Petty and underhanded but still legal" isn't bullshit. 
He only smacks people on the back of the head if he cares about them. 
When you sleep next to and bump uglies with someone every night, it's amazing how much shit you can be oblivious to Source: Was married to a psycho woman for 10 years 
"I am the Senate." "The Senate will pay for it all." "I am not the Senate." 
When an off leash dog attacked my parent's dog the sheriff said that next time they should shoot the attacking dog, because there wasn't anything the sheriff could do about it. 
Neither. We still have a duty of confidentiality to our clients when we talk about a case. Clearly, we are allowed to pursue criminal charges against a client, but we thought it best to just buy a monitor and ban her from the building. So we just asked the court to allow us withdraw without any explanation, citing a conflict of interest, which was technically true because we had a possible claim against her. 
Ah, so just your basic asshole then. Sounds like the discount saved you some legal fees. But i imagine debt collectors would be better in your case than just letting him not pay 50 tables worth. 
Ah, I just figured he was eternally in the middle of the world's longest runaround as each lawyer successively referred him to their enemies. 
It means that any physical action one (the tortfeasor) takes they're responsible for the repercussions, no matter the outcome, or the likelihood of the outcome. In other words, the frailty of the injured party is not a valid defence. You lightly push someone, and they fall and break their skull open and they die? Still Manslaughter. Push someone during a fight and that push cracks their weakened skin and they bleed out? Still Manslaughter. *Smith v. Leech Brain & Co.,* is the case that I'm best acquainted with, but that's also labour law. 
I've tried that before - it doesn't work as well as it does on the movies. 
Or the lawyer was not ethical and was racking up billable hours for all the "work" done on the case. 
To be fair, cats are dickheads and I wouldn't want one free roaming near fresh paint. 
If you haven't already, try to save up about $3000 to pay for the bar prep class, and for all the fees you need to pay to take the exam. A couple of my friends fucked themselves by not having that money ready when they needed it. 
lmao I'm in the same boat but I don't want to google "chicken feet nutsack thong" so I'm waiting for someone to come in and be the hero 
Yeah man, I saw this show once where a black cat got a white stripe painted along its back from a wet paintbrush and then a rapist skunk wouldn't leave her alone! 
The fuck. What does the ribbit thing actually do for them? 
Gargoyle has the same latin root as gargle. It always annoyed me that the animated series Gargoyles were grotesques, not gargoyles. 
His daughter ran a website called Regretsy, which highlighted Etsy fails. 
Pretty sure Marine Iguanas have the same feature. (Crocodiles too, perchance?) 
Upvote for Uncle John's Bathroom Readers. I have them all. 
Humans achieved lightspeed communication with signal fires, but the bandwidth was terrible 
Well good for them, because those damn hornets can devastate a hive. 
Man I love kiwis so much but im allergic. They're my favourite fruit :( Kiwi and latex proteins are similar so if your allergic to one you're more likely to be allergic to the other. 
It also has nine 'brains'. A big one in the head and smaller ones in each tentacle. 
"Happy Birthday to You" finally became public domain on January 1st of this year. 
I've read that you can actually do this with multiple sponges and they will each reconstitute themselves. 
This sounds like something ridiculous Abe Simpson would say before/during/or after a rambling story. 
What do you call the Italian slum? The Spaghetto Omg my first gold! Thank you so much kind Redditor! 
Probably a mischievous murder of crows or parliament of owls. 
Those sound effects studios are fascinating. It's just a warehouse full of crap, and it's like "To make the sound of an airplane taking off, we rub a piece of celery onto the side of a 1962 Chevy Impala!" 
Brit here, if you wanna keep something confined to a certain area, surround it with huge bodies of water. Ideally if you can find a natural land formation already surrounded by a huge body of water it saves you a lot of work. 
Killer whales are also the only animal other than humans that experiences the menopause, I think. 
And Treebeard is very much inspired by Lewis, especially his booming voice. 
it's hard to imagine being comfortable in the sahara desert 
It was also the day before the premiere episode of Doctor Who. They replayed it the next week because for some reason no one watched it the first time. 
The way you worded this makes it seem like the Teutonic Knights are from Siberia and Japan is either in China/ Northern India, or by Indonesia. 
Wayne and Brent Gretzky hold the record for most total points in NHL history by two brothers at 2861. Brent has four. 
Untrue, there's footage of a trebuchet in use by a rebel group in the Syrian Civil War 
I know you can be overwhelmed and you can be underwhelmed. Can you ever just be whelmed? 
I'm imagining people walking their potatoes on leashes 
That's... it's... thank you. I have a new standard for useless trivia. 
This is really interesting considering Wonder Woman's Lasso of Truth. 
And they can teach it to other crows and their offspring. 
I actually never knew this. Always thought the difference was that one was UK English and one US English. 
This reminds me of my favorite fact: France's longest land border is with Brazil. 
Similarly, female bed bugs don't have an opening, so the male bed bug would literally drill into the female's abdomen with his penis to impregnate her. 
So saying I'll be there in a jiffy is utter bullshit 
Funny thing my friend saw on social media saying, be the first 50 to respond and we will send you the add. He did it and it came through; he now has 6 or so dvds of a brisket smoking 
and "one octillion" before you hit the letter "c" 1 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 
Somewhat inconveniently, that one country has a bigger surface area than Pluto. 
That cannot possibly be true... Google Eiffel tower: 324 meters tall, base square has 125 meters side. So that means the radius is 125*sqrt(2) / 2 = 88.4 meters. Volume of a cylinder is pi * radius2 * height, so pi * (88.4 m)2 * 324 m = 7.95e6 m3. Density of air is 1.2 kg/m3, so the mass of the air is 9500 tons. The Eiffel tower weighs... 7300 tons. Holy shit it's true 
Mhh, thinking about it, I always have a hard time opening it with the zipper flipped... Never realized that. 
I've always heard that he had phimosis (tight foreskin). Either way, it was some sort of issue with his dick 
As Loki was disguised as a mare, you might say he was fucked by a horse And Sleipnir had eight legs, not six, which (as Odin is the inspiration behind Santa) is why Santa's sleigh is pulled by eight reindeer 
I've heard that if a cue ball was the size of Earth, Earth would be smoother than the cue ball. 
Motel is a portmanteau of "motor hotel," which is why the rooms open to the outside where the parking lot is. Easy to remember when you know that. 
Russia could fit inside the Vatican if the giant was really, really strong. 
It would have been really interesting if Scilly had sent some special forces to Holland to wreak some havoc. When they get captured, they claim they are still at war and need to be treated as POWs. 
I've seen this on the Internet. Fucking genocide. 
I didn't know that. Comparing the 2 makes a great ELI5 of how the body fights illness with a fever and this is my favourite random fact in here so far! 
Kinda like that Spiderman villian Dr. Octop...ohhh 
Poison is an effective way to kill things that can vomit too. 
And to the unaware, the reason you wouldn't hear it sung in movies and restaurants is because that song was copyrighted and performing it would require paying royalties. 
This is gonna make for a really interesting Spongebob episode. 
As the crowd gathers 'round an angry young man Face down in the street with pasta in his hand In the spaghettooooo 
There was a really funny bit on Human Giant about those, and how to simulate the sound of a man getting stabbed in the head, you'd stab a watermelon. But to simulate the sound of stabbing a watermelon, you'd stab a man in the head. 
But you can play "laser," which is also an acronym. 
Elephants and chimps have also demonstrated the recognising themselves in the mirror thing too! 
Boss: "You're an hour late!" Guy who's about to invent daylight saving's time: "Oh...you haven't heard?" 
NOTE: Rich important people hired samurai. Poor people who could not hire samurai did not hire samurai. 
There is also an unconfirmed rumour that Stephen Hawking received his diagnosis on that very same day, but I suspect that's nonsense, because he has never elaborated on that himself. His diagnosis was within that rough timeframe though. 
Gretzky facts are basically Chuck Norris facts. It gets silly frankly 
Stolen from another one of these threads last night; the next closest was Mario Lemieux, who got 199 once. After you eliminate all of Mario and Wayne's seasons, the next highest was Steve Yzerman. He got 155 points in a season. That year he finished *third* in the scoring race, behind Mario Lemieux (199 points that season) and Wayne Gretzky (168 points that season). 
Chimera here! Two hair colors all over my body, gender dysmorphia and as of yet I still am awaiting blood testing officially for type and location. Currently though, one arm tests for different iron levels (one arm was at about a 4 and one arm was about a 7). 
I just thought they were interchangeable and for some reason we had 2 words for it 
Well it depends... are you more than a centimeter away? And how fast are you going? Let's not rule anything out here... 
I had one of those sent to my sister. She had no idea it was coming, I had completely forgotten about it until the whole family was together and my mom told her to tell everyone about the bizarre thing she got in the mailna month before. I kept a straight face for about 5 minutes before cracking up, she'd been trying to figure out why Arby's sent her a DVD set of the smoking process the whole time. Worth the couple minutes of my time to sign up for it, thanks r/freebies! 
Not true anymore. *New Horizon* discovered that Pluto is larger than previously thought, and is now bigger than Russia. Still close though 
What about removing the volume of the tower itself from that space? 
Yet your fingers can't pick up imperfections in a cue ball. One of you guys is full of shit. 
Hotel has the root word "hoe" which is why the Hotel Motel Holiday Inn 
This reminds me of something my professor told me to do sometime. Take a Geiger counter to the supermarket and point it at the bananas. If there are enough of them on the stand, they'll set it off. 
But there would still only be 11.78 popes per square mile after the giant finished. 
just send them to paint the town hall bright pink or something harmless lol 
You know the Spiderman film was delayed due to the 9/11 attacks? 
Rat poison is really warfarin, a blood thinner that is prescribed to humans for conditions like atrial fibrillation and blood clots. 
The funny thing is, if I'm remembering this right, a judge asked them to provide proof that they owned the rights to the song and they couldn't. So for years people paid them and restaurants came up with their own unique birthday jingles and no one ever bothered to ask them to prove it. I manage a restaurant and still tell people we can't sing happy birthday for this reason, because no one wants to some to their tables. 
Can you reproduce by BUDDING??? Can ya? Can ya? Can ya? 
Cows don't look like cows on film, you've gotta use horses. 
I recently did some foley for my game, and it turns out a spoon and a fork banging together sounds more like 2 swords than 2 swords banging together. 
Don't forget humans... we're not as dumb as we look. 
huh, that's also the name of my testicles in the summer... 
The more I learn about moose (mooses? meese?) The more I begin to think that they aren't native to earth. Like Australia's weird fauna can be explained by geographic isolation for millions of years, that's why they have Tyrannosaurus deer. And most of the land animals of the rest of the world are fairly similar to each other that they can be easily understood to be somehow related. And most of the rest of the weird ass creatures the exist do so at in the oceans. But the moose, a hoofed animal, that swims. An overly aggressive herbivore, with missing front teeth and opposable lips? Shit seems like a weird cross between an elephant and deer. 
IRL the tilt function is meant to stop you from, say, lifting the table so that the ball rolls towards the top instead of the bottom or other such dirty tricks. Most real tables lock you out or otherwise penalize you if a tilt is detected, but the tilt sensors aren't perfectly accurate (since they have to be able to account for people leaning on the tables or just hitting the buttons too hard); being able to tilt a table *just* enough to avoid tripping the sensor is a valuable skill in pinball. 
True fact: India is nearly the same size as India. 
But really, the ninja was hired by the carpenter to sell squeaky wood. 
What if right now there's somebody who's hacking Stephen Hawking speech software and they're the one doing all the talking and they've hijacked his life. Could we tell the difference? 
Then they tried a third time. Fought for a little while, burned down, fell over, then died in a tornado. 
And ive never thought about it once in my life. Now im gonna use it at parties and act real smug about it. 
I'm pretty sure he drank it in one of the glacier eps. 
Yeah this, also your body uses water when trying to process the urine, so the net hydration result is actually negative. 
I didn't even keep a straight face through your entire comment 
Assuming it's made of pure iron (which will be close enough), with a density of 7700 kg/m3 the total volume of the Eiffel tower is a little less than 1000 m3 . That's an eight thousandth of the volume of cylinder, so it wouldn't make any difference. Although it looks massive from afar, it's a very wispy construction. A wonder of engineering, especially when you consider it was built in 1889 
It's me. I haven't shat in 3 days. Almost 11 pounds of shit inside me now 
Everybody needs to learn from my mistake: don't try to eat a whole pineapple in one sitting. It's delicious and the pain will remain for days as your mouth literally regrows tissue. 
"Then what do you do when you want a horse?" "Usually we just tape a bunch of cats together" 
To be more accurate, the tilt sensor is a tunable sensor to end a ball if the player is too frequently nudging, or nudging too hard. The sensor that penalizes extreme skulduggery is the Slam Tilt sensor. That resets the machine and eats all of the credits. 
John Oliver asked him this and he responded "You're an idiot." So John asked "Who's saying that, you or the computer?" "Both." 
Probably not to lose heat or some excellent reason like that. 
So if your body expels it, it's a good bet your body doesn't want it back. 
Hey we talk about it fairly often when the Fargo or the topic of spousal abuse come up! 
It's amazing how much work was put into it considering *no one wanted it there*. 
Nah. That all comes from the bonfire that was created out of money intended for the CPS budget. Where else could it all have gone? 
Now I can just hear Danny DeVito saying HOOOOUUUUR 
You used the word "peoples" in the definition of "peoples". 
Opeth had a "peak" period in their albums, I think. Ghost Reveries and Blackwater Park are really fantastic, and the live albums Lamentations and In Live Concert at Royal Albert Hall are fantastic. Their newer stuff fell off a bit (again, my opinion), but Ghost Reveries and Blackwater Park are both masterpieces. 
Sleep is the band that got me into metal; I never thought I was into it until I heard Holy Mountain when I worked at a record store in college, and then quickly got into everything else you listed. 
Transcendence is a great album for showing him off. The lack of harsh vocals outside of "Higher" helps a lot too. 
Don't forget Blind Guardian!! *A Twist in the Myth* and *A Night at the Opera* are nuts. 
Crack The Skye, man. I love that album. My favorite of all time. Amazing album and super emotional, after you get to know the story behind it. Shit crushed me. 
Dude check out polyphia, intervals, and chon And vitalism is nuts as well 
Surprised I had to scroll this far down to find Language by The Contortionist. One of my favorite metal albums of the past 5 years, and plenty of melody for someone inexperienced with metal. 
I can't BELIEVE I had to scroll so far down for Priest. 
So many different homages and styles mixed into that album. That Ants of the sky folk section gets me every time. 
Bg is epic. Best song Imo is and then there was silence 
The percussive and vocal techniques common to most metal are very grating. The dissonance is not an issue for me. 
The bass line in children of the grave though....... :))) 
I found a CD of this concert on a market whitout really knowing what was coming for me. It was glorious. 
Finally an In Flames mention. I personally think Clayman is quite accessible as well. 
Yeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeessssss, Dream Theater and Symphony X. 
That song and then album got me into them, but I still air guitar my way through Rust In Peace. Both kick ass! 
I think a big part of it is how varied the metal genre has become, and even more so now since the hardcore/post hardcore/screamo stuff came to be popular. I think that's perhaps what a lot of outsider people have come to associate with metal, and don't experience the other kinds of metal, as they don't necessarily have as much of a mainstream appeal. 
I still kinda like the new Opeth stuff - particularly *Pale Communion* - but for very different reasons from the old stuff. The newer stuff just doesn't move me as much, it's more me listening to it as kinda good but generic-ish music...whereas I listen to stuff from *Still Life*, *Ghost Reveries*, or *Blackwater Park* and it...I'm not sure the best way to explain it, but it's like the songs are life-altering experiences. From the perspective of accessibility, I think Opeth is great because of the dynamics. IMO interspersing brutality with tenderness enhances both. I think *Still Life* is the best example of this, simply because the duality of the narrative is served so well by those two extremes. 
Sleep is so fucking good. It's funny to throw Dopesmoker on when people ask me to pick a song. I'm down to listen to anything that involves Matt Pike as well. High on Fire is brutal. Doesn't fit in with this question but they're still brutal as fuck. 
Plus they have a duet song with Tarja--Paradise. I'm torn between feeling like Sharon and Tarja are a little out of their ranges, and squeeing at the awesomeness of this teamup. 
Plenty of Judas Priest songs as well. If a person thinks metal is all screaming, they're probably just looking at the wrong subgenre, frankly. It's just as misguided as saying all rap is about shooting cops - no, you're just listening to the rappers that rap about shooting cops. 
They were around long before growling was a common thing. Most of the big bands from that era had very talented vocalists. 
For me it was Fear of the Dark.... Especially the live version (you know which one) 
Dance of Death is a really underrated album. IMO their best since Powerslave. Paschendaele is probably my favorite from the album. 
Those are two of my favorite albums! Personally, I'd use Sacred Worlds to introduce someone to metal. 
Kamelot's a damn good example of this thread, in my opinion. Angel of Afterlife, Solitaire, Love You To Death, Forever, so many examples of truly melodic, incredible songs. Personally, I'm more stunned to see some of these other examples, like Behemoth, or Insomnium. 
I think what makes it is that, while gravely, it is still melodic. That's the important part for me. 
I'm with you on this one. Pantera is legit metal that is completely intelligible, both lyrically and musically. A lot of the other suggestions throughout this thread are non-metal songs by metal bands. Hell, even Hollow is basically just a ballad with some metal riffs tossed in for good measure. 
Crack the Skye is also my all-time favourite album. I love how the album flows from one track to the next, the technical musicianship and of course the emotion behind it all. 
You can't list Intervals without Plini. Those two dudes have one of the most real bromances I've ever seen. 
I feel like people enjoy metal more than they let on, or just don't know it. Vocals are the primary turn off and take the brunt of criticism. This is where instrumentals are king. They show the value and craftsmanship of the genre without being off-putting. Harsh vocals are something you have to ease yourself into. It took me the better part of a decade to get to a point of listening to what I do now. 
I've seen them three times since Language came out and the "BALANCE TAKES ITS PLAAAACE" part is just so fucking epic. That and the way he ends Conspire live. 
And he seriously goes back and forth effortlessly. It's amazing to see him do it live, it's just a flawless transition. 
Range? Ghost of perdition. Or maybe the combo of Masters Apprentices and A Fair Judgement 
I can't believe I had to scroll down this far to see them! 
Can confirm. Album is a masterpiece. Some of the songs may be fairly heavy for a noob but Ants of the Sky has enough different genres in one song to please just about anyone. 
There's a lot of death metal influence in this album. Great album but I don't think it will turn any listeners 
There is a rad bass solo in Orion, but also a couple regular guitar solos in addition (both the rhythm and lead guitarist). 
Yeah showed orion to a friend. 1 minute into the song and he says "So, when does the song start?" He likes vocals I guess... 
metallica's instrumentals (orion, ktulu, to live is to die, anesthesia) are spectacular. orion gets me every time. 
"He is" is beautiful and melodic all while talking about the how great the devil is. It's fucking awesome! 
Ghost puts on some of the best live shows I've ever seen. Papa *really* knows how to engage with a crowd 
I particularly like *One* to introduce doubters to as well. 
I never realized that some people don't like metal drums. 
The bass line in every Black Sabbath song ever though...... Geezer Butler is a legend 
For me it's *To Hell and Back* and *Resist and Bite*. There's something about the helplessness those song convey that gets me every time. 
Unpopular opinion but that's my favourite album by them. It's amazing. 
Also Scale the Summit. Another great technical instrumental band. 
Yup! He did two albums : "Charlemagne : By the Sword and the Cross" (symphonic metal) and "Charlemagne : The Omens of Death" (heavy metal) 
Death and Atheist are like hard-mode metal, lmao. Not for beginners at all, but they absolutely rule. Also, Cynic is the shit. 
Ahh...the album responsible for getting throngs of punk kids (like me) into metal in the early 2000's.... 
I'm a huge fan of PTH and I've started fights saying "Mist" is their best song. It's so well written with just enough pop to be accessible. 
Hey, Jomsviking was frigging amazing, and i will argue all day that With Odin on Our Side is still their best album. 
She's a mean old bitch and she has stupid hair she's a bitch bitch bitch bitch bitch bitch bitch. 
"Put a song on!" "Ok!" Puts on Sleep's Dopesmoker on vinyl [half an hour goes by] "Hold up. I got to flip the record" "Damn, this is a long song..." "This is only disc one." 
Yeah, I feel like it's a case where a lot of the criticism would just come from people who are fans of Tarja-era Nightwish being fans partly because they like Tarja's voice and style, which would naturally make them not a fan of the dramatic style shift when Annette joined. 
Dude listen to the "City" album. That is one of the greatest things Townsend has ever created. 
I saw Judas Priest in Toronto in 2011. Halford was 60 a the time and he belted out two hours of hits like it was nothing. Hitting all the highs and vibrato like crazy. It was incredible. 
True, but nowadays most people aren't as familiar with classic metal bands and just associate "metal" with death metal and metalcore. 
Well tbf the whole point of thrash when it first started was to be the fastest metal around. And Metallica did manage to mix aggressiveness and melodic stuff in their stuff bar Kill 'Em All which is just all alpha male stuff lol 
I really like Aces High. I'm seeing them in June but it doesn't look like they will be playing it. 
Love Sabaton. if you like them, check out Powerwolf if you haven't already. 
If you like power metal, there's an extremely good chance you like them. They're one of the most prominent in the genre, despite the decline in quality after their 4th album. It's not a surprise to see other fans here. 
I love all of Mastodon's albums, but this one will forever be at the top. 
7ish years ago, I saw them play Blackwater Park in it's entirety, from first track to last. They then took a 20 minute break, came back onstage and did one track off of each of their other albums in chronological order. No opening acts, just Opeth for almost 3 orgasmic hours. One of the best goddamn concerts ever. 
For real. I mean, there's even some goddamn polka in there. This album is my metal "Dark Side of The Moon". 
I fucking hated Metallica for the Napster bullshit, Lars especially, but now I don't give a shit about any of that, and my opinion of them and Lars particularly has done a complete 180. Those guys are fucking amazing. Period. None before, nor sense, have tasted the scope of their metal. I think Tool got a glimpse and that Rush (Neil Peart) was paying close attention not to compete with them. 
Their lyrics actually makes me laugh, if you read into them, it is more about sex than it is anything else. I really do enjoy their music though. Going to see them supporting Maiden later this year. Cannot wait. 
Seeing Ghost and Maiden in a few months, I can't wait. 
Spit Out The Bone from the new album is fucking amazing as well. I got the damn jibblies the first time I heard that song. 
"Often cited" seems like an understatement, not sure I've ever seen anyone even attempt to argue the contrary. :) The Black Album is *still* in the Billboard Top 100. Like right now, today, it is a top telling album. 25 years later. Nuts. 
It really comes down to the use of the bass drum. If they really lay it on thick, particularly for long durations, then I just can't stand it. 
I think To Hell and Back hits so much harder when you realize he suffered PTSD and tried to make the military more aware of it: "Oh gather round me and listen while I speak Of a war where hell is six feet deep And all along the shore as the cannon still roar They're haunting my dreams. They're still there in my sleep." Truly a worthy tribute to an exceptional man. 
Hell yeah. I saw them live at a rather small venue a couple years back. They came in and just fucking delivered all over us. The crowd chanted for the vocalist to show his "tits". He tried to wiggle out of it I think and was "what the fuck is wrong with you people?", but the crowd as unrelenting so he took off his shirt. One of the best nights of my life. To be honest it was more because of Avatar (fucking sick band) than Sabaton. I still to this day can't put words to what I felt that night. 
I like to put on "flood" by Boris when I get people stoned the first time to see how long before they catch on. 
I became a fan after she joined, but I also listened to the albums in the order they came out in, so I can understand how you became a fan of Tarja's stuff, but at the same time, to me what makes Nightwish isn't their singer for me. It's Tuomas. His songwriting is what makes Nightwish what they are to me. 
City is a great album, Ocean machine is my favourite. 
I saw them last year in Austin, they did 5 songs off their album that had recently come out. They are still producing quality material and not just touring off their stuff from the 80's.... and the 80's stuff is still awesome. 
Which is dumb because the entire power metal genre exists 
Metallica (bar a few songs) is not really my thing but I'd place them a lot closer to those older bands than the newer growly ones. They were fairly contemporary with some of them too. 
Running loooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooow 
It's gonna be a great show either way. I've seen Maiden three times. Every time it was killer. The first was my very first concert. My dad snuck me and my brother out of the house so my mom wouldn't know we were going to see the Flight 666 tour. She absolutely forbade us from listening to "that devil music". The show was insane! The pyrotechnics, the huge animatronics, the showmanship, the MUSIC! It completely melted my ten year old brain. I know I'll never have another experience like that again. 11 years later I still dream about it. There's power in an Iron Maiden show. Enjoy it my friend. 
I put Leviathan above it, but they're both nearly flawless. 
Plini plini plini. It took nearly 30 years, but that guy has become my new guitar god. Love intervals, as well, but plini hits only all the right notes for me. 
First time I saw them in Birmingham we made Joakim completely dumbfounded because he couldn't understand why the entire crowd was just chanting "I-K-EA! I-KE-A! I-KE-A!". They co-headlined with Alestorm that night, bloody mental concert. 
Yes, but most people aren't aware of it at all, besides maybe knowing about Dragonforce from Guitar Hero. Metal's just a much, much deeper, more diverse genre than many people realize. 
When I'm singing along, I always try to hold that note as long as Bruce does. I have not succeeded yet 
If for no other reason than Blood and Thunder being the greatest Mastodon song yet. 
OH YEAH! Plini is fantastic! Sweet Nothings is a favorite of mine. 
The doobie brothers.. smokin doobies with my brothers.. 
No mention of Within Temptation, so look them up too. 
Oh man, you just reminded me of a nightmare I had as a kid where endless Honeycomb monsters were crawling through my window. 
May the odds be ever a part of your balanced breakfast! 
Yeah, but just imagine how crazy Tony will get when he eats that littel fucker. 
I would argue that since the Raisin Bran sun is anthropomorphic and has gradated shading around the edges, that it is only the shape of a sun, without any of the properties. This is further displayed by the fact that it can hold scoops of raisins in its hands without those instantly vaporizing. Count Chocula, while seemingly a close second, would get his ass beat in a second as, assuming he's a vampire who craves chocolate, would be entirely ineffective against any non chocolate related mascots. Cap'n Crunch has the military experience, but judging by the empty, glazed look on the on the cocksucker's face suggests he is already senile and is a complete softy incapable of pulling the proverbial trigger. I think it stands to reason that Snap, Crackle and Pop, besides being nefarious little bastards, have super powers and would likely clean up the field pretty quickly. 
I was thinking the same thing, bunch of pussy ass name brand suburban cereal mascots getting ready to have legit boxing match when suddenly the ever growing sound of hard hitting bass and the sweet aroma of dank buds wrapped in flavored tobacco leaves. Boom, doors kicked in followed by the grimy ass malt-o-meal crew. These notherfuckers don't give a shit about rules or decency, they've been overstuffed into plastic bags, shoved onto the bottom shelf in bulk to be forgotten about. For years those name brand hoes been talkin' shit and now things are about to get fucking real. 
only the sun can really stop him if the sun isn't just the shape of it tigers are killing machines * 310kg mass * 50-65 KPH top speed * massive teeth * if it turns in to a really long battle everyone but him will get hungery as tigers only need to eat every 3 days * they have fought crocodiles, wolfs, leopards and pythons even mother fucking Bears in the past 
Not to mention his entire career is built off never being captured and always escaping. 
The New Day are on boxes of Booty-O's cereal. I reckon they could take out John Cena. 
They're fucking cannibals. They'd eat each other until one is 20 feet tall, then just eat everything around them. 
Dies from exposure to light from the Raisin Bran Sun 
I was with you until I saw someone point out the Raisin Bran Sun would take him out. I don't think there's anyway around that one. 
Wow. Hey man. We have actually talked before. I don't know if you remember me. I'm Rob the owner of www.remedialcomics.com and I have worked with the Webcomics List website on their awards in the past and also own www.webcomicscommunity.com As a big proponent of webcomics I know so many of the really great creators in the community and of course as soon as I saw this post I immediately thought of your amazing work with BotG. A couple quick questions to so I can add to my original reply. Where is the best place to read BotG? Can it be read on line? Where is the best place to buy it and what is the price at that place? What are you up to these days? Thanks again for the great story. It says something that it has stuck with me for so long. 
You should have made this a top-level comment. You're kinda getting buried here. 
There is little more scary than Snap, Crackle and Pop's understanding of higher order derivatives. 
Not only did I not know that, but I also have never seen that cereal box until now. 
So many dicks it blocks out the sun, and we shall fight in the shade. 
I love how it's 20 years later and we STILL hold this grudge. :) 
Puh-lease. Tony's gotten soft after decades of standing on 2 legs, telling kids to eat the cereal he's pushing. He doesn't even sound like the killer his ancestors were. He'd probably stroke out after a minute or two of exertion in combat. 
Nobody's trying to capture him this time. We playin' for keeps. 
So you're saying The New Day could #BeatupJohnCena? 
He also has hat eyebrows. His eyebrows are on his hat, not his face. 
Nobody did, man. And now it's just about the best thing any of us have read all day. 
I was waiting for cookie cop to walk in and just start firing. Now I assume he is the leader of Sonny's Choco-Gestapo. 
They have a pet sabertooth tiger and they push a car half made of stone. They could take Tony. 
Chocula: "Bleah!" RB Sun: "SAY GOOD MORNING WITH TWO SCOOPS OF FUCK YOU." Chocula: *vaporized* 
You can squanch wherever you want man! Mi casa esses su casa dog! 
I'd imagine there's more spooning than scissoring in this particular story. 
there's no way his cereal is the only chocolate one his chocolate lust is sustainable. 
To be fair, *a whole lot* of America was rural at that point, and in those days a gun could be a necessity when it came to putting food on the table. Also, I think the first issue was in 1911 or thereabouts. 
Could you take out either of those with a gun like that? I'm pretty sure a tiger would be fucking your shit up before you got the second shot off. 
Fuck. What the fuck? How the fuck? Fucking fuck the fuck...*FUCK!!* 
That 'No Ghosts' sign is placed at the entrance of the coliseum though. It turns out Boo Berry is a staunch follower of the law, as well he is used to such treatment and simply floats away to take no part in the kill fest. 
They don't just see the changes in the battlefield, but the change in the change in the change in the change in the change in the change. They're like three steps ahead of the other Jerks. 
I wrestled with this a bit myself while making it. I decided on fire because it's the actual flames that are dealing the damage, not the heat from light itself. 
Not as far as I know; I made that one up myself for this creature -- you're right that darkvision is normally strictly beneficial. 
I think its mainly found in organic food shops and for every box you buy some money went towards saving the animal on the box. My mum went through a massive GE Free and Organics craze for years I would have to eat breakfast while Gorilla Munch Cheetah Chomps and Koala Crisp would stare into my soul, and every time we went shopping I would be faced with the overwelming decision of which animal I wanted to save that week, obviously I wanted to save the Cheetah but Cheetah Chomps just didnt have the same great taste as the other Cereals so I would always be faced with a massive dilemma, seriously it was a lot of pressure for a 6 year old to handle. This was all about 20 years ago so you probably cant get them anymore. 
It also reminded me that he might be a part of the Warriors. 
Tony's alot more buff than that scrawny shit. But god knows what that guy has in his vest. One on one fist fight? Tony all day. But you know my dude aint goin heads up wit him. 
I think there's a generic Apple Jacks that has a goddamn train. Try stopping a fuckin train with your sports team Tony. 
Possibly, but Vitamin King probably has an entire Royal Army at his disposal. 
I'm alright with the generic mini wheats until you get to the bottom 1/4th of the bag. All crumbs and dust. Generic fruit loops taste weird though. Same with the coco puffs, but I don't think those are meant for human consumption. 
Have you seen how he's built? Motherfucker is on some serious steroids. Nothing stops a roid-raging tiger. 
It's also the best part of a nutritious breakfast. 
Wait, so people associate sugar with ill health but not honey? Or **monsters**, for that matter? 
It's okay, Count Chocula will block the yellow sun with his vampire moon powers. 
A gorilla as well. When they charge they charge fast. 
Well that certainly illustrates the diversity of the word. 
The downfalls of being lawful good....darn. Also, the downfalls of Jim Ghost laws.....darn. 
But can they see why kids love cinnamon toast crunch? 
But a train can't kill any creature smart enough not to stand on the tracks... 
Try smelling the cereal after leaving the cereal to go soggy in milk for 30 minutes. Not for human consumption. 
Aldi has excellent generic cereal, way better than most stores 
But that doesn't explain the Ensign or Lieutenant ranks. Maybe a Lieutenant could be in charge, but I doubt they'd let an Ensign prepare my mouth-destroying breakfast cereal. 
But according to The Witcher, a silver blade kills all kinds of monster so it should at least put the vampire in stasis. 
Not unless you got a raisin bran sun. Even the spooky squad is no match for ETERNAL SUNLIGHT AND HELL FIRE. 
Alas, the answer to that was lost with the burning of the library at Alexandria. 
It says only one exits alive. I'm assuming it's like a giant round arena with entrances in opposite sides. The train comes charging out of the entrance gate, and all of the entrance gates are shut and locked behind it. However, a train doesn't give a shit about closed and locked gates. It just keeps on charging full steam ahead across the arena to the opposite gate, crashes through the gate, and keeps on going. All of the rest of the mascots are murdered by the arena organizers since the terms of the deal were only one can leave alive, and the train already left. 
That is probably the milk. It doesn't like to left out in the warm. 
Aldi is excellent period. We drop around $200 a month there and walk out with a loaded cart. Can't do that at any other grocery store around me. 
The engagements that led up to Ensign Crunch becoming Captain were a bloodbath, he was the most-senior officer left on the ship capable of command. His grace under pressure led to his subsequent promotions. 
I was about to say, the meter has a song-like feel to it 
I've had milk stream out of a cow's udder when I was prepping her for milking, and spray onto my bare leg in the summer. Cow's temperature runs hotter than us, and the small hot stream of milk felt really weird. Almost like a really small stream of pee... The milk does smell better when it's cold though. A tank of fresh, cold, good milk is one of my favourite smells. It reminds me of raspberries and whipping cream; it's a sweet smell. 
What if he makes it just half a screen size instead? I'd be ok with that. 
Trains are made up of cars, though, both railed and non. 
Well they're made of traincars. Car is actually short for carriage and doesn't need to have an engine, because they were originally pulled by horses. 
Do you know why she was so happy to see the allied forces? As I understood it the vast majority had no idea just how bad things were, I'm sure plenty had never heard anything but how the allies were terrible and all the terrible things they were apparently doing 
im not sure what you are referring to? Did he volunteer and fight with the finish army during the finnish-Soviet war or did he serve in Finland during World War II? 
I watched a great documentary about the holocaust, although it was very long (10 hours), called Shoah. It was entirely made up of personal accounts of victims, witnesses and perpetrators. No stock war footage. The locals who saw the trains taking people to the death camps used to make throat slitting signs to the passengers on the trains to let them know what was happening. The locals knew what was going on and I really doubt word wouldn't spread. 
Thats about the same relationship i have with my grandfather about 'nam. He was in vietnam but the whole family knows how hellish it must have been so we just dont talk about it. Different reason for not talking but the relationship is about the same 
When my sister started dating her German boyfriend, my Dutch grandpa's first reaction was "What? A dirty German?" To be fair he lost two brothers during the war and therefore isn't a fan of Germans. 
I would also recommend Sins of our Fathers, which is pretty much exactly about what the OP is asking. edit/ spelling Edit 2/ It's actually called What Our Fathers Did, ta to the people who corrected me. 
You could say that about anybody growing up during that time anywhere. racism was prevalent in America too the only difference was that we weren't genociding people because of it. Jesse Owens is a prime example of this during the olympics. Today everybody remembers him as a god send that Americans loved when in reality after the olympics were over he was treated with just as much prejudice as everyone else. "I wasn't invited up to shake hands with Hitler- but I wasn't invited to the White House to shake hands with the President, either." ~Jesse Owens 
My wife's grandmother lived in a town in eastern Poland (she and her family are ethnic Ukrainians) during the war. She was about 14 at the time and remembers vividly the various armies coming through in either direction. Her father spoke German so the officers often stayed at her house. In her stories, she always made a very distinct difference between the "Nazis" and the "SS". "The Nazis" she would say, "were gentlemen. Paid for everything they took and took care of everything they used and they were very kind." The SS, on the other hand, only brought death, threats, and destruction. Her village experienced: 1. The Nazis going east 2. The SS going east 3. The Soviets Heading west 4. And the Stepan Banderas guerilla fighters 5. The KGB chasing the guerillas Exhausting. First time I met her she laughed until she cried. At 87 years old. I loved that woman. 
Not super important, but the term for having soldiers in your house like that is 'billeted'. 
I've been looking for an answer like this that actually addresses the question. Thanks. 
It was a support role. Reloading the cannons and transporting the ammo. It's actually very hard to hear him talk about it. I don't know if you've ever seen your grandpa cry, but it is the least pleasant thing I've ever experienced. 
He and his friends were hidden by their parents and neighbours, until the americans reached the town/city a while later. (10 or so days I think. I'm not 100% on the details). The regime never had much support/sympathy here (in this particular town), so no one gave them up, thankfully. 
The Canadian soldiers who liberated the Netherlands are due much more recognition than they're typically given. I know the Dutch recognize them (also too because the Dutch Royal family living in Canada during the Nazi occupation) but in the larger context of the war they deserve a bit more credit for the conditions they were left with as the majority of the Allied troops continued east toward Germany. 
I'm sure stories of the Russians' invasion from the east made the Americans sound like the better deal 
He served The Nazi Special forces (SS) in a war in Finland during WW2. I dont have any specifics and I'm not that good at history 
I wonder if the throat slitting sign was made as a warning I.e. Do your best to escape, or just to taunt them of what was to come. 
My grandpa did this too, liberated a couple concentration camps. When my grandpa passed away we had family there only, but a gentleman showed up who was also clearly old. Turned out he was in one of the concentration camps that my grandpa liberated. I don't know how he found out about us or my grandpas death, as I was younger and didn't realize the weight of his presence until later. But even then I remember chills and feeling immense pride for my grandpa. 
German was very much the language around the house for my father and his siblings growing up. My father could speak both German and English fluently. Not so much for me. I can ask you to pass the potatoes and maybe glean a bit of the table conversation. By the time I remember Opa he spoke thickly accented English and seemed to have a solid vocabulary. He picked up the language pretty well. However, when he and Nan would bicker it was always in their native tongues which was hilarious. 
And if you've ever read the Winter Soldier testimonies you'd probably be glad. It's better not knowing. 
As far as the "worst place to be in history" competition goes, Stalingrad is up there for both sides. Leningrad too, for the Soviets particularly. The western front wasn't fun but the eastern front was hell. 
Dutchies seem to hate Germans almost as much as they love Canadians. Source: Canadian. Thanks for the lovely flowers! 
I read this as "Bought a muslim gf" The first time around and it was a very different story. 
The passing of that generation scares me because there's a worrying about of people online who have watched too many conspiratorial YouTube videos and think the holocaust was either faked or exaggerated for political gain. 
Yeah, like I said they were all sure at first it was allied propaganda, because they just couldn't believe it. I think there's a still a debate over whether or not ordinary people really knew what was happening in the camps. I can't speak for the whole of Germany but I know for a fact that my Grandad didn't know, and he was appalled when he was told. 
That's what I hope many take away from stories like these. Not all soldiers in wars like this are evil. Some people do it because they love their country, have to work, want to protect their family, or are born soldiers. The best American example is Robert E. Lee. He went to the south to protect his home (Virginia) and his family. 
Kinda crazy knowing that your existence itself was contingent on the mercy of Adolf Hitler. 
That's definitely where I thought this story was headed. 
Was that the one with the guy who adamantly refused to believe his father participated in a massacre? 
The day no one remembers the second world War is the day we get a third 
Thanks for the tips! Ill see if either of those work 
I just watched Race, and it's a great movie with a lot of insight into how Owens was treated. In the movie, he's forced to enter a dinner in his own honor from the back door because he's black. 
Wow, that's pretty interesting! One of my favorite battles in WWII was when Allied troops *joined forces* with a Wehrmacht regiment to keep SS troops at bay to save a prison for high ranking allied officials! Crazy shit... 
It's absolutely crazy, his granddad was supposed to kill a girl but instead he rescued her and married here. It's like something out of a book or a movie. 
Mostly this. During this time, it was totally reasonable to be proud of your country and have a nationalistic slightly right winged world view. Every country during that time, even america, was like that. The Nazis just took it a step further and alot of people couldn't or didn't want to realise what was happening around them. 
That's something people might not consider as much in the shadow of the all the terrible things the perpetrated by the Nazi regime: They deprived a lot of men of something virtuous to fight for. It might be that your grandpa was brave enough to fight, but he didn't want to fight for that. Now as a man, the only tale of war he has is of running away. It's hard for a man to see the bravery in that. It is very brave, though. I hope he knows that. 
Probably because the Eastern front was 10x more fucked up because unlike the French and English, the Germans saw slavs in the same category as Jews, Gypsies and Mentally disabled. For the Soviet's it was literally eye for an eye as the Germans raped and burned up to Leningrad and then the Soviets repaid in kind. Nazi's would literally summarily execute all the men in villages into mass graves, burn down the whole village, maybe rape some women and move further up the front. They didn't want anyone flanking them from behind the line, or so it goes. After years of that kind of treatment you expect Russians to show up as knights in shining armor and take the high road after having the largest civillian and military deaths in the campaign? 
In the World Wars, Americans were a pretty interesting player. They didn't harbor the same level of hatred other European Soldiers might have held because America wasn't immediately effected by these things, but they still harbored a sense of patriotism to fight for their Nation and its Allies. 
I think without a doubt I could tell in a moment if someone was trying to tell "We are going to kill you" or "They are going to kill you" with the throat slit motion just by the look on their face. 
Yep. It's not like emotionally-stunted trolls didn't exist before the internet. Back then they had to get a little sun from time to time, though. 
Thank you to your grandfather, it's guys like him that got my grandfather out of a work camp at the end of the war. His crime was to be born Slavic. 
Do you call potatoes kartoffeln or erdaepfel though. 
Longing, rusted, furnace, daybreak, seventeen, benign, nine, homecoming, one, freight car. 
Definitely - and to add on to that, saying that even the Nazis who perpetrated the worst war crimes were some untouchably dark "evil" people also does a disservice to humanity. The Jewish philosopher Hannah Arendt's "Eichmann in Jerusalem" coverage post war introduced the idea of the "Banality of Evil," suggesting that people like Eichmann were normal people and NOT evil psychopaths, and that EVERYONE has the capacity to commit crimes like these while continuing to see themselves in a positive light. It becomes too convenient to say things like "well I'm not evil like [blank group or person]" to justify your actions. "Evil" is ultimately not an objective concept, and attempting to reduce human action to some fundamental alignment everybody has can do a lot more harm than good. 
Yes, evil isn't some great horror. The 'supervillain' trope doesn't _really_ exist - most people are the hero of their own personal narrative. Most are capable of justifying what they're doing within that context. 'cruel to be kind', 'for the greater good', 'everyone else does it', 'it's not may place to say' or 'no choice; have a family to feed' etc. I know we'd all like to say we'd 'do something' or 'say something' but the truth is - most wouldn't. How many people just walk on by the homeless guy in the street? Do you even notice any more? 
I just went to the wikipedia page and read through it, 60% loss rate man... 
Sturm in that sense is more 'assault' rather than 'storm' 
The way in which a country loses a war can make a big difference, negotiated cease of hostilities vs. unconditional surrender. I'm sure the Germans were hoping that if they made it clear that the allies would suffer a great many more casualties and the territory would be difficult to occupy, they might be able to negotiate favorable conditions of surrender. 
My granparents never spoke about the war (except to praise the American and Canadian forces that liberated them) so it was shocking to hear the stories they told on tape for Spielberg's Holocaust Survivor Interview project. The things the camp survivors went through (my grandmother watched her brother dig his own grave at gunpoint so he could be shot into it) are almost, literally, unbelievable. 
But didn't he know that Jews and others were being discriminated against? Round up and shipped off? He can't have not noticed that, that all started before the war. 
I'm reading Stargardt's "The German War" and he goes into detail about how most German citizens were aware of what was going on. Allusions to the final solution in German newspapers, slips of the tongue by Nazi leaders, seeing Jews get on trains which were literally called murder trains. Passing by camps people would smell burning flesh. People knew and did not discuss it in what he calls a "spiral of silence" 
There's probably some people out there whose existence was contingent on the incompetence or inattentiveness of some SS soldier. 
And then got a huge kick out of Polish neo-nazis thinking his father was awesome. Turned out he had always had nazi sympathies and it resulted in their friendship ending Awesome documentary 
Would love to see how your quest to discover this lost history turns out! 
Yeah I really get the impression that the SS recruited the worst of the worst--and then trained them to be even worse still. 
I don't know. On the one hand I get what you mean, but on the other I think what he did was way braver than fighting. Also, he's a pacifist to the core. There's a good chance that this is because of this very incident or, you know, growing up during a war. I don't think he considers himself brave, but I also don't think bravery matters to him. I get where you're coming from, but I could happily go my whole life without having any kind of war story to tell. 
And then OP would not be born to write this. And I would never have met Syncal on the internet. Oh the travesty. 
If I remember this correctly, until Pearl Harbour, America wasn't *technically* in the war, as all they did was supply Britain with tanks, cars, guns, etc. It's interesting to think about how differently things might have played out if Japan decided not to attack. 
It was much more than that when you look at the whole history of Finnish-Russian relations and how the Russians invaded and conquered Finland and subjected then to forced Russiafication. 20 years after gaining independence they were invaded again by Russia, and in the end while there was some support from UK, Sweden, France, Germany offered much stronger and more stable support, and Germany saw Finland as an asset in the fight against the Soviets. 
I have my family's testimony in a file cabinet next to me. I'm thinking of publishing the pages that span the weeks before Kristalnacht and the few months after because they mirror the language that is used today. 
I think the question was more directed at if the people in town were trying to warn the unaware jewish folk on the trains that they were about to meet their imminent demise or if the people in town were taunting the jewish folk because hitler. 
Likewise. My Polish grandfather was a teenager at the time of occupation, got sent to a forced labour farm. US troops liberated him, sent him to a dock to join the first ship out (which happened to be Australia). My family will always be grateful for Americans. 
There will always be romance. The tales are less epic as the stakes decrease, but there is still love, even the type that would make you defy an entire nation if need be. It's a good thing to remember about that person you love. You don't love them any less because you don't have to fight for them. You are fortunate to not have to fight, because it means you can enjoy everything else there is to love. Appreciate that and live it. 
Yeah, my wife's grandfather talked a lot about his time at Camp Pendelton as a bugler, joking around with buddies. He rarely talked about anything else, such as where he fought or why he had an Australian pen pal who had named a kid after him. My wife was able to get that story out of him late in life, but still little else. 
Roses are red, Violence is fun, Mission report: December 16, 1991 
back then, you didn't get a choice. Joining the Hitler Youth was the same as joining the Boy Scouts just with quite a bit more military structure. In many cases parents who prevented their children from joining the Hitler Youth, were in fact arrested themselves as enemies of the state and sent to concentration camps. 
American who was stationed in Germany for almost 4 years. Germans do not like what happened in the 1930s and 1940s. They have laws not against talking about it, but promoting it. We were actually briefed about not making hitler and nazi jokes while we are in germany or around germans. With that in mind, during the world cup a german pub owner once joked to me about how she worried about Germans having too much national pride. 
Like, a *lot* of Jews. And Slavic peoples. About 27 million Russians, if I remember correctly. 
Japan did the same thing. Kamikaze, human torpedos, divers, etc. It's terrifying and sad. 
I still struggle with actually believing this all happened. Not as in "I don't buy this" but in "I can't believe it, this is too horrific". Wrapping my head around how disgustingly rotten humans can be inside is incredibly hard. I still wish this was all just a bad story. 
Yes of course. Sorry if I was insensitive right there :/ 
I am not German but that's exactly my humor. Fuck it, if you can't laugh at yourself, what's the point? 
Exactly what i have heard. My dad told me about his grandma that lived close to grafeneck where the first disabled people were murdered. She said that they saw them drive through town in busses and they then returned empty. They knew what was up but everyone was too scared to talk about it or do anything 
Of course, but they don't know it and it's indirect. OP is alive because Hitler **himself** showed mercy on Rommel's family. 
Well, they were the ones who stood out in the Nazi Party itself, and embraced the entire ideology completely. The normal ground troops didn't need to embrace the entire ideology to be effective, but those managing them and carry out 'special projects' needed to be in order to be sure these projects and stuff would be done without fail. 
Japan is the worst ally ever. Aggro'd something they couldn't handle and got the whole party killed. 
If you do anything less than take a cell phone picture of the documents and post them I'll be bummed. All of that knowledge could be lost in a fire in a single afternoon. Worst case scenario I'd at least get a good cell phone scanning app (cam scanner), take a picture and upload it to a few places and then post the links. Seriously. We live in a time where this is possible and the generations beyond us will absolutely need that sort of thing. In this day and age we wish so much that we had more documentation of old-world lives. 
Same story with my grandfather, who was Lithuanian. They probably have some similar stories. He eventually escaped himself and walked across empty lines where the US and British troops were waiting since they'd been ordered not to press on any further. The British authorities put him on a ship full of other Baltic refugees (MV General Stuart Heintzelmann) and made him work for several years in the outback to pay it off (maintaining the Ghan railroad mostly). He's still around and occasionally comes out with a story we haven't heard before, though they get pretty dark sometimes. 
Boy Scouts isn't a great comparison. Boy Scouts is significantly less popular than Hitler Youth. That feels weird to say. 
The Germans I knew said they never felt comfortable being too nationalistic UNTIL the World Cup in 2006. It wasn't until then they felt comfortable decorating with flags, etc. and start showing some pride. 
Japan was different. Japan used trained soldiers as effective suicide weapons. The Volksstrum was untrained youth and old people sent to pointless slaughter. Had the allies not dropped the A bombs and invaded the home island, then they would have faced the Japanese equivalent of the Volkstrum. 
No, I'm with ya. Thankful I'm not in that situation as well. But still hate it for those that are. 
Sarcasm, irony and the like rely on inflection and other subtleties of language that often have no exact equivalents in other languages. It's no surprise they don't translate well. 
I took a few. Cousins and siblings have the documents too. We're a refugee family. We know how to plan for fires. Scroll down a few comments and I dropped some images. 
All of the family who made it to America (not many) have given testimony for Shoah and we've contributed to yad vashem as well as the holocaust museum in DC. I think we are well documented. It's funny to read about my grandmother dating though. Even hitler couldn't stop teenage girls from being teenage girls. You have to smile. 
I just read a holocaust book, Born Survivors, and it really makes you feel for how the holocaust was. It is absolutely nuts. 
I was really torn between posting that distasteful joke and saying something nice about your grandfather's service... I went with the joke, and while I don't regret it, I would also like to say thank you (and him) for the memory :) 
Yeah, but this nationalism more or less is reduced to football. There is no real national pride for anything else. Maybe engineering, but that was it. 
Japan was preparing to do the same thing. There was an internal struggle among the military and the emperor once it was clear that the emperor was going to surrender. "The Emperor in August" is a great movie that depicts that (It's a remake of an old move, Japan's Longest Day") 
Move to Ireland. Our humour is completely self-deprecating but more so taking the piss out of others. You know we like you if we pick on you 
Lived in China, wife Chinese, I can't tell you how correct this is. 
Totally! Now I want to get some Germans to watch Daria and see how that goes. 
Seriously, could you imagine it, standing in a field watching a train full of human beings going by, car after car, knowing they were going to be killed when they reached their destination? I am so, so glad that hasn't been a direct part of my life. Edit; fuck, even *one* car... 
Last 1000 years, or recorded history. The British were sparked after a Roman force combined the western nomadic tribes under their rule. It goes on and on and on. You can't be ashamed of your nations history more than you're ashamed of any others. I am no historian, but from what i understand we were all born of tragedy, and have screwed it up up a few times along the way. (By the way, you Brits are some tough bastards. I'd stand shoulder to shoulder with your mix any day even though my kin went through Liverpool back in the day.) P.S.: we yanks still could drink ya under the table! 
I can do one better. My grandfather was in Vietnam before he ever met my grandmother. He was in a foxhole with some other guys in the middle of action, when a medic happened to lift his hand for whatever reason. A grenade hit his hand and bounced out of the foxhole, blowing as soon as it hit the ground. If that guy hadn't lifted his hand when he did, I wouldn't exist. 
I feel like if I lived in Germany it be a blast to make tourists uncomfortable with jokes like that. 
We didn't start it! yes you did, you invaded poland! 
"So, where have you girls been all our lives?" "Waiting here for you. We were born in this room, we grew up in this room, and we thought we would die here alone. But now you've arrived, and our lives can truly begin." "She likes you!" 
Don't worry, I'm English and I have trouble saying it without sounding sarcastic 
Not necessarily. A lot of people forget that the victims of the Germans were fellow Germans. While of course many people were swept up by the glory of a new Deutschland, beautiful new architecture, and shows of strength, many were paralyzed with fear, knowing if they spoke out against the actions of their country they would be shot without question. Even parents couldn't speak freely around their children, who were highly encouraged to report anti-german discussions to their Hitler youth leaders 
Well I would call that really good timing. Nontheless good thing I wasn't alive back then (even tho German) 
They were great. There were only something like 12 made in the 70's, but they seem to stand the test of time. You can see the set shake and wobble, but John Cleese is a genius and they are still funny today. There are not many comedies I enjoys seeing multiple times, but Fawlty Towers (along with Allo Allo) is one of them. 
Love listening to people who can't commit to a new years resolution feeling superior to people that literally gave their lives for something. 
Pretty cool job. Keep going with it, tech is easily enough described.. 
Little kids often don't fully understand the consequences of life and death situations. You made a really bad childish decision, but recognized the gravity of what you'd done and immediately took action. I'd commend five year old you. A normal reaction for a little kid who just did something bad is to run and hide. You didn't do that and your sister is alive today. 
You're an inspiration to delinquents like me everywhere. Good luck graduating 
A similar thing happened to me when I was about 6 and he was 13. He didn't get caught but my grandmother figured it out when I started drawing detailed male genitalia on characters in newspaper cartoons. The whole family just doesn't talk about it and I didn't figure out myself till a scent memory of the strain of indica weed he was high on when he did it triggered the memory to flood back when I was 22 
As a mother to two kids, I wish you a wonderful and happy life. 
probably the illegal things. because if they ever get caught, its possible that the police will be able to use it as evidence, im guessing. 
I don't know your situation, so I can't just say stop spending time with him, but I would definitely suggest talking to the police and/or a lawyer. It sounds like he could really hurt you. 
Do your best to make peace with all of those around you. Try to get each one on their own and just talk. Give them a good final lasting memory. Maybe go on a trip with everyone 
Wow. This is actually my biggest fear... that I'm actually a bit mental and the fam just plays it off like no big deal, let's make him feel normal to fit in. Am I actually special? 
I would work 65 hour weeks if someone would pay me six figures. 
That's really weird. Good thing you'll probably never see him again. 
This happened to my dad. He knocked a girl up but she claimed it was another guys so my dad went on with his life.... he was 17 at the time, now 62. my half brother wanted to find out who his real dad was (about 6 years ago) because his mom finally came out that the other guy is not actually his dad. 
Sounds like a really bad case of the common rape fetish. Just don't compare yourself to people who are actual abusers or pedophiles since this seems to be far far from the case. 
Do you want to continue dating her? For reasons other than you're afraid of change. Your ideal wife will be someone whom you consider to be your best friend. You won't always like her, but you'll want nobody else by your side through this crazy adventure we're all on. 
Sexual contact with the same sex doesn't magically make you gay, just like sexual contact with the opposite sex doesn't make a gay person magically straight. 
I can sympathize with this. I had no problem telling my religious grandmother that I was gay, but will never tell her that I am an atheist. 
Honestly don't worry about it. What are you basing yourself on? I went out with someone a while ago of below average size (extremely below average), the enthusiasm and foreplay made it unnoticeable. 
I read this thread right after the cousins-fucking thread and was really confused at the ambiguity around whom you fucked when you visited your cousin 
If you don't mind, could you please expand a bit on that? 
Been there man for the last decade. Secret smoker life can be tough but i just like weed and can also fully function at a job while smoking everyday after work and on my days off. 
17 years ago I laid down on the bed my soon to be ex wife and I shared with a .45 pressed to the side of my head. My thumb was pulling back the hammer when my cat, Pita, walked in the room, jumped up on the bed and climbed up on my chest to nudge my chin. I put the gun down to pet him and bawled in his fur for the next couple hours. I buried Pita 2 weeks ago, and I bawled into his fur one last time. I will never forget him or the moment he saved my life. My life is amazing today. I have a loving partner in my wife and a brand new baby boy. Just signed the offer letter for my first 6 figure salary and we close on our house in two weeks. There is always Hope. And some times it walks on four furry legs. 
What you have just described is a perfect example of depression. This was me. I wasnt alive, I wasnt dead, I didnt even want to die .. I was just, as you said, *here*. Nothing gave me pleasure, nothing seemed worth the effort. To the point where I had given up pon just about everything. Dont think that not feeling suicidal means you are not depressed. I really think you should seek some help. I was where you are, and I have had a hard slog getting where I am, but I am finally starting to feel again. Most people think depression is feeling sad, I found that I didnt feel anything. Just hollow. Please seek help, if you dont feel comfortable talking to family or friends, talk to your doctor. It can and will get better, but you do need some help to get there. 
Your kids would would not choose money over the presence of their parent. 
How do you meet so many people to sleep with? How do you go about meeting them? Serious 
He's playing the long game. Can't say it isn't impressive revenge-wise 
"This is not a secret that will ruin your life if it gets out. It's a secret that will ruin your life if you keep it." I like this quote, it's a nice quote :) 
Thank you. The hardest thing I deal with now is anger management. And I'm actually in therapy and classes for it. It was my own fault the last time I got in trouble with it because I was dining with my wife and the couple across from us got in a argument and I thought I seen him raise his hand to hit her. 
This is the best advice so far, don't go to HR or whatever and confess, it would probably end badly and most people at your job will find out. Try to see where you stand legally. And if you decide to leave you can get a good recommendation from them, but if you confess and they don't like it, it would be hard to explain your new employer why you left your last company. Coming out clean is not always the best decision, specially at work. 
Sexual harrassment AND threatening your life. You should definitely consider at least a restraining order. 
It's not the perfect place to turn to (if you're expecting warmth and get strangers' rejection or crudeness) but you've made a great step by telling about it. As a stranger from somewhere in the other part of the world, in another life - because I know these words don't carry the weight and the same significance as the ones coming from the mouth of someone you trust and knows that he/she cares - I hope it is as you say. I hope you are well and coping. I hope you are strong and receiving love from anyplace/anyone you need. I wholeheartedly wish that you're okay and that you make sure you are, not bundle it up to roll like a snowball through time. This is one stranger's love for you. Now, excuse me, I'm going to pack up my heart... 
Perfect in every way. My deformity was a... hrm... simply a luck of the draw.. one of those "shit went wrong" things. My child looks 100% normal. 
That's the sad part. His brother keeps inviting him. (My grandpas brother) he tells everyone he's changed. Or he usually just acts like it never happened. A lot of pushing under the rug with the older folk. It's sad. And still many in the family don't know. 
This is a common fear, that you have sort of disorder or severe social problem and your friends/family are pretending you're fine/pretending to like you. It's also usually baseless if you really think about it. The world is cruel, and statistically speaking, at least *someone* completely unrelated to your family or friends would have been blunt with you by now. 
I have a friend's friend who work in Microsoft as a software tester (or some other names, I am not familiar with that). Anyway, his skill is quite good and he wrote a software to automatically do the test job and he spend almost all the time at work in the equity market. It turns out he earns several times more than his salary in the market. 
I always thought that (not op) Since you weren't raised with them there's nothing mental stopping you from being attracted to them aside from the judgement of society, and you still see them fairly often so it must happen a lot right? 
We're both the same age. This started when we were both 24 and we're both 29 now. 
More than one. Therapy will help, I promise it will. 
Thank you for saying this. I went through a similarly traumatic experience when I was a kid and I actually forgot about it for a long time. It affected my development in a lot of ways that I wish it really hadn't, but I don't have issues with men or sex at all. 
I mean it sucks to be him though, to have his sexuality so intertwined with his bed fetish that he get can't get hard unless a bed is involved. 
Same thing happened to me. My dad knocked up a girl before he met my mom. The woman said it wasn't his and pretty much told him it was over between them. My dad then met my mom and had me. After his death a few years ago, I get a call from an uncle that someone a little older than me and looks just like me, reached out to him on Facebook. He did some digging and remembered the woman my dad was with back in the day and now I have a half-brother that is a little resentful that he never met my father and that my father wasn't there for him even though the mother was the one that pushed him out and cut off all contact. My half brother wants to meet me, but he is in another country and honestly, I'm not sure I want to meet a resentful stranger that looks like me and my dad asking me questions, I most likely don't have the answers to. It's been around 5 years since I've found this out. Perhaps I'll change my mind and reach out one day. Most likely, not. 
When I got a new computer my dad gave my old one to PC recyclers without telling me. Or a service shop or something. I hope and pray that the data on it was destroyed, but the fact is I can never be sure... (Porn, active Logins, etc.) 
I just wanted to add- I hope you know this now- but it's common for rape victims to have complicated feelings due to their body's natural sexual repsonse that happens whether the sex is consensual or not and is purely a biological phenomenon. 
Yes, yes it is. Even if the guy is also underage he'd get in trouble for disturbution, at least in America. I know this because it happened to a girl in my middle school. She thought a dick pic another student texted her was funny and she posted it on her Myspace, his family ended up taking her to court. 
No matter how horny you are teenagers...don't fucking send nudes to anybody. It's like playing the lottery, except winning is hardly winning. At best you simply live in fear that someday one of those people will "leak" your picture and they never do. At worst, well, read the above comments again. 
Unfortunately no. I tried to go back to social media a year after and I got a message from him again a little while after. 
I'd be about 100k in debt had I graduated from State so I definitely don't regret not attending in that regard. 
This. By the time my wife and I got married we were so close that it didn't seem like anything would change at all. The only differences now are that we wear rings, her last name is different, and we file joint taxes. 
This is me right now. 4 years in to the happiest relationship of my life, she wanted to drop it all and be a ski-instructor and I said "go for it!" We broke up a month ago because she loves a fit ski-instructor with long hair now. Haven't talked since and it's utterly devastating. Just know that when these things happen it is for the best. I'm glad you didn't marry her, but I'm so sorry you lost your best friend. Just do your best to keep having real-life interactions with people, and keep traveling. There will be another. 
Thank you! I agree its fucked. But i lived and I'm content in life. 
When your daughter is the right age, having her in sports might help you build a social circle, and it also gives you some downtime. 
there's this cafe, on the banks of the Arno. Every fine evening, he would sit there and order a Fernet Branca. He had this fantasy, that he would look across the tables and see her there, with a 50 year old guy and maybe a couple of diamond bracelets. She wouldn't say anything to him, nor him to her. But they'd both know that she had abandoned everyone for an easy life. 
Just stopping by to say this jives pretty well with me. I'm a straight guy with kids but every now and then gay porn is hot. I've never found a guy sexually attractive in real life so I'm pretty sure it is the taboo nature of it. Or maybe I'm closeted bi idc. My wife gets it and I'm not shy about it so who cares? 
My grandparents are super catholic, members of Opus Dei and all that. They are also the nicest human beings I've ever met. They take all that "love thy neighbour" stuff to heart and are nice to EVERYONE. However, they do have that belief that gays are a "sickness" etc. While this sounds controversial, one of their favourite nephews is an open homosexual. They invite him to lunch every Sunday, call him regularly etc, but one of my grandfather's "catchphrases is 'poor (nephew)'". They accept the fact that he's gay and love him no matter what, but feel bad he was "cursed". 
I was in the United States. In the state that he lived in 17 was the age of consent and I lived in a state where 16 was the age of consent BUT only if the person was within a 4 year age gap of the 16 year old. Trust me, I memorized those laws :,) but yes, it's for the best I ended it. He deserved better than someone lying to him. 
As a dad, tell him. That cousin would never be around again. Most dad's would handle it however you wanted, but police, private, etc... but it would get handled. 
I wonder what would have happened if all the employees did a synchronized walk out right at 5:00 
Seriously the only thing creepier than corporate types pretending they're part of a big family is the fact that it kinda works. 
They expect the world from you, but they can't be bothered to help the people who gave everything. 
My boss tried that on me once. "Bob is really putting the extra hours in..." kind of bullshit. I looked right at him and said "Why are you impressed that it takes Bob 3 extra hours everyday to get the same amount of work done?" (I was working in an industry where our tasks were dictated by client demand, therefore more time working =/= more productivity). That was the last I heard of it and I never spent more than 40 hours in the office. 
I think he means that he's in a relationship with this broad under two 'profiles'... Like a fake facebook guy that hasn't met up with her yet and the other boyfriend being his real life self 
I tell myself this ALL THE TIME. I'm not my type, and that's ok. I'm my boyfriend's type, so hooray! (Unintentional rhyming) 
I'm not sure exactly what you want me to expand on. I've been living under false identities and have been for a period of time that is over 15 years but under 25. I won't go in depth with specifics, but due to a traumatic childhood, I had to cut ties one day with my entire life. The longest I have spent as one identity since then is about 6 years. I have a home, a marriage, and a job. Legally, this isn't exactly secure. I'm guaranteed to one day lose everything and face serious consequences if I am found or found out. 
Sometimes schools aren't very rational in their decision making. Sorta like how they think the no tolerance policies work 
This right here. I didn't know what was wrong with me for 2.5 years; I felt tired, unmotivated, apathetic. All I could do was sleep 14+ hours each day, drag myself through school and read Reddit. I walked around feeling like my brain was in a fog and felt so empty. I was emotionally exhausted and it made me feel mentally tired. It would be nice if people talked about depression in other ways than just being "sad." 
From what I have heard, gay hookup culture is veryyyyy different. im going to say grindr and craigslist played a part 
Always remember, HR works for the company and not for you. 
If you haven't told anyone yet, tell someone you trust *right now*. If, god forbid, you go missing, the police will know where to start. I'm so sorry. This must be so hard for you. 
Ugh. That is a load of bullshit. There was someone in my family who raped my mom and her cousins when they were children. There was a big family reunion that my grandma was pressuring me to attend after I found out. She let up when I told her if I attended I was going to beat the shit out of Uncle So-and-so for raping my mom when she was a kid. I'm a girl, but he's super old so I figured I could take him pretty easily. Maybe I should have just done it. 
There's also a subconscious component where people are attracted to features similar to their own but not *too* similar. That combines with not knowing each other growing up so not having a visceral reaction against it like you described. Cousins tend to fall into both categories. The psych term for the phenomenon is GSA or genetic sexual attraction. Not sure if or to what extent it's covered in the DSM-5 but you can Google it. 
If it's consensual, I don't think it's fucked up. Yeah it might be taboo, and family shouldn't find out, but its not like some other stories here where it started as minors. You two are adults. 
I was molested by a family member, maybe 5-10 times (I don't remember) at night. Roll on 50 years - yes 50 years - and I'm having acute anxiety attacks and breathless attacks. Well, surprise, surprise, it was the molesting rearing it's evil head. At the time I'm sure other family members must have known what was happening but no one said anything. I didn't say anything (this was the 1960s). Believe me it does have an effect which, if you don't have some good counselling, imo will come back to haunt you. I think it was the secrecy of it all that made it so confusing for me and so I pushed it to the back of my mind and convinced myself it was irrelevant. Now realise it affected my whole life. 
It would be considerably worse if it were a toilet or cabinet fetish, no? 
No matter how badly my old hard drive might have failed, I make sure to destroy the platters thoroughly. (After taking the magnets out because hey... magnets.) They're actually pretty tough, a .22 bullet won't penetrate them but they will put a big cool looking dent in them. A cutting torch is my go-to, nobody is getting anything from a puddle of metal. I don't have anything on my hard drive worth hiding, but... 
I thought I was pretty well educated about certain things in life. I read a lot and am into psychology and deviant behavior (not into partaking, just into learning about such things). I'm in my late twenties and just learned this year that people can orgasm from being raped. It makes sense, but I'd never thought about it. It adds a whole new element to the trauma. My real point here though is that with as much as I learn about things I'm frustrated that I'd not known about this for so long because that probably means a ton of other people don't know either and it's not being taught enough. To have it become common knowledge that rape can cause the victim to orgasm would benefit victims of rape so very much. I really hope this information becomes more common knowledge. 
Plus 100k more if killed while deployed, i mean fuck in 2005 the army was giving 2 year contracts for 88m(truck drivers) with bonuses. Highest fatality rate at the time. 
Just curious, how and when did you bring up the subject during the date and requiring payment? 
Well if he still tries to blackmail you with those same photos, play along with it, and have the police bust him, because a 15 year old nude is definitely considered child pornography, further more you're 21 now so your parents don't have to know anything about it. 
And even all 3 of those things are completely optional! 
I work at a ski resort and they destroy relationships at an absurd rate. I've also seen people in your position try and save it no matter the cost and it eats them alive. That said you have entirely the right mind set going out of it. There are other women in the world. 
I don't see why this is a controversial comment. Expecting people to wait for you while you "find yourself" is selfish and wrong. Imagine what you'd feel like if someone did that to you. Life isn't a movie and people move on. 
Probably an easy crime to frame someone for though. And even if acquitted your reputation is destroyed. 
Attempted murder, you should have gone to the police. 
Oh, well if you lived in different states and he had to either drive to you or drive you over the state line then that's actually an even bigger deal as it becomes a federal crime. 
90 minute meeting the next day about "commitment", "dedication", and "doing what's right". It was a long time and a few CEOs ago, but I remember clearly the day our CEO sent a company wide e-mail because he saw too many cars leaving campus at 5pm when everyone should be here until at least 5:30pm. No exceptions. Someone had to remind him that people had different schedules and people are actually coming and going from campus all during the day. He wasn't CEO too much longer, fortunately. 
People do this in academia a lot too. It was really weird how many advisers would "joke" about being someone's scientific father and the like, or at minimum act like they're friends first. This was particularly weird because they're still your boss, and like all bosses can be quite nasty and terminate you and all sorts of things like that. Funny how no one discussed being someone's dad or friend when disagreements popped up. 
I got lower marks on the my yearly evaluation for not leaving my office to socialize and/or hang outside of work with my coworkers. I never understood why I would get lower marks for actually doing my job. 
Layoffs and firings are "just business" when finances are poor, but when things are normal its anything but "just business." Funny how that works. 
Take my advise with a grain of salt, because I can not hope to have an understanding of your situation in any way. Wouldn't talking to your spouse be a good start? I mean, if it is the kind of thing that *surely* will come back at you, you should start preparing. The safest way would be, I assume, to make as many things official as you can, like legal papers or such. 
I'm guessing the barrier for most people is that they see a hijab and believe either 1. im not religious, she clearly is - its not gonna work or 2. I am religious, but not muslim - its not gonna work. I will say from my time dating I would never have made a move on a woman wearing a hijab because I am not at all religious and feel that you wearing a hijab is basically saying thats where you are at. It's not a negative to be there, but def makes an immediate large hill to climb for someone interested in approaching you. 
Yeah, I'm just afraid of how our family would react if it ever got out. It's gotten to a point where I'm afraid one misstep on our part would have us found out and as I mentioned in another comment, it would be devastating to me to be ostracized or demonized by my family. 
Yeah guess he also got lucky in that it is one of the easiest fetishes to hide I have ever seen. 
Well I mean, my hope is that it was either recycled, destroyed, or is in use by somebody who overwrote the contents and doesn't care. I was way younger and most of the data should have lapsed out of any usefulness anyways. I hope. 
There is a need for regulation of sexwork worldwide. It'll definitely reduce the abuse of already vulnerable women. It'll also bring in more revenue for the government. But we're not mature enough as a society. 
This goes beyond murder even, this is the kind of evil shit you find in Stephen King books. 
Personally I find it would be hard to have a solid marriage that's built on such a fundamental lie as "who I am". Maybe I'm a bit unique in that my wife and I think it's important to know about the other's past but if she came out of nowhere with a "btw I've been lying about my name and history" I'd probably end up never trusting her again. 
Absolutely. Especially as someone who can be quite flippant about religion, I wouldn't bother because I'm sure I'd piss them off. 
You'd be shocked at the secrets you can keep if you're careful, think ahead, how would I be found out? Then do whatever the hell it takes to get rid of that possibility. Are you both on your own phone plans? Password protected phones? Always a locked door? Notifications off? Maybe a separate app that password protects apps so you could conceivably loan someone your phone with full confidence. The only way people find you is if you don't cover your tracks 
This is fascinating, but harmless. So how specific is it? What about cots? Hammocks? Fold-out couches? 
We've been very careful when it comes to covering our tracks. It's just that recently she's started to act a little more forward with me when we're out in public and I'm scared that might be what gives us away. 
Damn I really need to know the answers to these questions now. 
Do you plan on having a relationship ever? Could you see that happening? I would talk about this stuff with her. Figure out the gameplan. If it's just sex, tell her to cut down the public stuff since you're concerned. It it's more, then you need a whole new plan... 
Only on Reddit can you get practical life advice about how to have a secret sexual relationship with your cousin. Truly a special place. 
We're all trying to get through this shitstorm that they call life. Sometimes, you need a happy meme or a insult-fueled political argument. Other times you need assistance planning long-term incestuous relationships. Really, it's all the same. 
Please get a second test in six more months. Hiv can live dormant for the - six months below or fully develops. Technology to treat it is better than it ever has been, but only if you know about it. Best of luck OP 
Awww, that's amazing! I'm glad you got to experience this :) 
What was it about the road trip that stirred up this realization in you? 
Wow. Just one happy stranger interaction. Shit, I've always been an advocate for helping spread smiles, being nice and kind as you could be the highlight of someone's day, but this is perhaps the highlight of a life. Moral of the story: always be nice and courteous, and innocuously flirtatious too to others. You never know how much it can help them. 
Are you planning on working your way up to a divorce? Mentally speaking. 
Malcolm in the middle has this scene where Lois told Hal she probably didnt love him as much as he loved her. Hal then said something about it being true because if she loved him the way he loved her, they would never leave the bedroom. 
As a child of divorced parents, it would have helped me out a lot emotionally if they had separated earlier than when I was in high school. Seeing arguments all the time and a lack of love really can screw children up and a lifetime to heal from. Do what you got to do.. 
I'm really glad it worked out for you, the exact opposite happened to a friend of mine that cut himself out of our friend group because we pointed out he was being treated like crap, and he and her decided (or she convinced him, no idea) that they needed to just be on their own to see how things were. well, a kid later and they're finally divorced and he's coming back around to how shitty things were and he just got beaten down so much he took it for years. 
How soon into dating or living together or whenever, did you know that it wasn't the right choice? Did you go along with it because of inertia? In any case, I hope that you're doing better now and are out of that situation 100% 
How soon into the first marriage did you realize you'd made a mistake? Do you think you always knew that it wasn't a good match? 
He knew I was unhappy but he was a policeman - older - and I was scared. 
Yep. You can't compromise on having kids. Either you do it wholeheartedly, or you don't do it at all. 
What made you stay after the knife incident? I think that would have been an instant deal breaker for most people, including myself. 
Thank your lucky stars he decided to cheat honestly, better to be alone than miserable 
As someone who grew up in a household where my parents hated each other, please leave. Do whatever it takes, for your daughter's sake. It will effect her far more than you will ever realize. Switching between happy households is a far better alternative to growing up in one miserable one. I grew up thinking that a normal family dynamic was for Mom to live upstairs and Dad to live downstairs, with awkwardly silent family dinners and parents whose only forms of communication were yelling or icy cold, stilted talking. I had no idea what a loving relationship looked like, and it led me down a path of sex way too young and lots of drugs because I was looking for one. Please, save your daughter from growing up believing miserable parents and a terrible marriage are normal. 
So find someone like me with larger breasts gotcha. 
I really have enjoyed this thread. It should be cross-posted to to all the dating and romance subs. Just goes to show you that even when things aren't perfect relationships can develop and the flip side, really make sure your s/o is as committed as you are before *getting serious* i.e moving in together 
Yes and turn that monster to the authorities. That is a fucked up thing to do. 
She was only sorry she got caught. Direct quote. It happened at their grandma's funeral. I stayed in at home with the dog (couldn't take off from work). Her little sister told me "something went on" but didn't give any details. The whole family is fucked. 
Yeah, the emotions surrounding a bad breakup and a rebound are no joke, and they cut to the very core. In my case things worked out for us, but it could just as easily have gone the other way. Love is as much about timing as it is anything else. I'm sorry you had a poor experience, but good on you for knowing what was best for you, and having the guts to move on from something that was not healthy. I think a lot of people waste years in that grey fog been "yes, kinda..." and "no, maybe..." 
It had been just such an ordeal with her family and the fact that she risked literally every tangible thing in her life. There was no way I could have said "You know what ... never mind." But it paid off in the long run. 
Given the Japanese culture, she really did risk alot by marrying a gaijin. In their culture, parents are to be obeyed. I can imagine what she went through. 
In the US, women who will defy their parents to be with the person they love are a dime a dozen. In Japan it's basically unheard of, but OP probably didn't think much of it at the time. As a young man he probably felt like "why do you let your family control you? Why don't you just say no?" 
Man I truly hope someone someday loves me for who I really am ... depression, anxiety, and all.... I always see people saying stuff about "crazy women", but lots of people with mental illness need love too. 
I'm not exactly sure what it was. I think being outside of the norm of everyday life helped us both loosen up and let go of all the stress. We were just able to be together and be ourselves. After 3 years I had forgotten what made me fall in love with her in the first place. For months before the trip I had been secretly (hardcore) crushing on a girl from a class and started to wonder what it might be like to be with someone else. But that trip was so life changing. It was so much fun and so carefree it helped me remember all the things I loved about her and I found many more reasons along the way. I've never looked back and love her more each day. 
Those with shit endings are probably not going to want to talk about it too much. 
I never did. Actually never told anyone til now. I don't think he had any idea. 
The had such a beautiful relationship. My favorite was where Lois was told to wear more makeup for work. She gets makeup done, Jersey Shore style, comes home feeling terrible about her new look. Hal sees the new look and drags her into the bedroom. A few days later she decides she doesn't want to wear heavy makeup, even if it means losing a promotion. She comes home feeling defeated. Hal sees her old look and drags her into the bedroom. There was another episode where his poker buddies were complaining about "the ol' ball and chain" when it's revealed he has sex 14 times a week. They say he's just lucky, but he says it's their fault that they don't care enough about their women. 
My great grandpa came to America from Sicily. He wanted a nice Sicilian wife in his new home, but Sicilian wives were in short supply in 1910 southern Illinois. One of his buddies had a sister back home though, and said he could marry her if he paid for her to come over. He agreed, and when she got off the boat she took one look at this short balding Italian man, and tried to get back on. Somehow he convinced her to stay, and they did indeed get married, and had 5 children I think. But apparently she never really even liked him, or bothered to learn anything other than basic English. So my great grandma was basically a mail order bride who hated her life. 
It seems like it's not a problem. Everyone tells me it's not a problem. Yet I have this persistent feeling that won't go away that he deserves better. Maybe it's my own low self-esteem that's impeding my ability to recognize my worth, which therapy is helping. But we do communicate marvelously, have a regular sex life, a healthy give and take, if not traditional. I do all the cooking and cleaning, he works and pays the bills. I also have extra income of my own that I use for frequent traveling, which he always supports and encourages when he can't get time off work and excitedly joins when he can. So what's the problem? I guess I can't find one either. But that nagging feeling... 
This is exactly what I'm scared of when I get in a relationship again. The two serious relationships I've been in, I'm the one who loves super hard while for the others it just fizzles out, and then I'm depressed for what seems like forever. I couldn't imagine actually getting married one day and have it happen to me. It seems more trouble than it's worth in the long run; easier to just avoid being hurt. 
I agree so much, there's no one you'll be head over heels for for the rest of your days. 
I didn't get to travel in Aus as much as I would've liked, actually! Unfortunately, I got a misdiagnosis before I left, and went over there sick. Ended up having to have emergency surgery in Fremantle. Since I was ill, I mostly just stayed right in Perth and the areas around it. Planned on taking a trip down around the southern coast, but that got cancelled. Did at least do some travel on the east coast initially though, before I popped over to the west. Fremantle had to be my favorite though, since I got to know the town pretty well while I was sick, there. Some of the nicest people I ever met were in that place. I had folks I barely knew nicking books from the hostel to bring up to me in the hospital, and had visitors all the time. Even sick, that was an amazing trip. 
Thanks for your feedback! I actually think about it every day. I am however terrified at the prospect of divorce: she doesn't work, knows fuck all about responsible money handling, and can't cook or clean to save her life, which I interpret to mean she's going to squander any support she squeezes out of me while not taking care of our kids. 
I'm 90% sure I'm using "irony" incorrectly here but this is what I'd like to think of as "poetically ironic"; something which kept them together was that which could have ended them- they both stayed for each other's wants and not for their own, which is kind of beautiful :) 
It's like those kids toys where you fit the triangle and square shapes into the matching slot, a lot of people think that everyone has a unique shape that is only met by another person they "match" with perfectly, but the healthy approach is to think of both of you as having a finite shape where both must mold each other appropriately so that the 2 shapes fit. My wife always had the first idea engraved in her head, and slowly she realized that we both have to fix the flaws in ourselves which sands down our rough edges so that we make a better fit. That's exactly why arranged marriages have more success, they have a whole different mind set and approach. 
About three years in. Was just 18 when I met him, came from a very conservative background and was terrified of being on my own. Thought he was best I could do. Then came the child. I assume full responsibility. 
You must a be a very strong person. I wish I can be as brave as you. 
What about those half kids you see in statistics? Maybe they could have one of those. 
I decided to blame the alcohol rather than her. As time went on I saw that it wasn't exactly alcoholism but rather an intolerance of certain types of alcohol. Red wine is akin to having your own Gremlin whereas spirits has no effect whatsoever. 
As in that's all I'd ever done when things started to get serious or I realised someone actually wanted to stay with me. I'd focus on the negatives or feel backed into a corner and break it off 
I agree. Get a divorce lawyer. If you already have DNA proof that the kid isn't yours, the courts will go easy on you. If you're wishing for sweet death to take you away, get a therapist and see if you can also sue her for emotional trauma. From what I've read, you seem like a very successful person. Just remember, if your life ends for whatever reason, that cunt will end up getting a share of whatever you have to leave behind. Don't let her; you can win this, man. All the best. 
We had gone on two dates, it wasn't terribly serious, but I thought he was nice. Mostly I was forcing myself to date other people because I was trying hard not to crush on my FWB, and I knew that he would not want to date and I thought he wasn't very into me other than sex. I think I texted him to cancel plans and then said I was busy thereafter? I can't remember exactly. We're on good terms, I still see him every couple years as he's a friend of a friend. 
I honestly hope so too. I freely admit that I'm still married *in spite* of my best efforts, and not because of them. It's all my wife's fault, really. I'm the only common factor in all my failed relationships; she's the one thing that's different in the one that worked. 
Dont have family & the threat of being accused of physical violence / rape is a scary thing. Pretty sure all of our neighbours and probably other people know of our violent arguments when i try to stand up for myself. She'll physically attack me / trap me in rooms & from leaving while throwing all manner of mental abuse at me, i'll eventually restrain / pull/push my way past her and escape, she'll chase me down the road continuing to scream (usually now switching to me "hitting" her since i forced my way past) and attacking me. She likes spitting at me too. Ive literally hidden in woods/parks before now and shes found me. Lol. 
This is actually one of the best analogies I've ever seen. 
I second this. The trauma that is being brought onto your children is not going to be fun with they get older. It may seem "fine" because you and your partner aren't taking it out on the kids, but subconsciously, they are taking everything in and are going to need therapy to understand what a proper, healthy and loving relationship is. I know because it's happened/happening to me. And like previous post said, i indulged in unhealthy behaviour for awhile to quiet the anger and sadness. 
In some places I believe what he did is legal and she can not take any legal action. Correct me if I'm wrong. 
So her and her cousin fucked at their grandma's funeral? Alright then! 
I wish my ex had read this advice. I think he would've realized that putting in a little work, getting through a rough time that we knew was coming, would have had a wonderful payoff for all we invested into the relationship and into each other. Life isn't always about feeling happy 100% of that time. If it's even good 80% of the time (which we agreed it was) then you're winning. Makes me so sad that he gave up a relationship so beautiful :( 
Really hope all the surgeries go well. That all sounds really rough. 
That's what happened with my parents. My dad got disowned for marrying a black woman. My grandpa was really racist. Anyway, my mom had a similar situation because she used to be feisty and would call my dad out when she thought he was out of line but that went away after he turned his back on his family for her. It made their relationship worse in the long run because she felt like she couldn't say no to things, which he needed. They've been married over 25 years and they almost divorced. They're working it out now. 
I don't know, a lot of times people with shitty relationship issues need to talk about them. The moral of the thread I'm taking away is that success & happiness in a relationship is more about effort put in by both parties rather than being one another's "soulmate". Pretty uplifting. 
14 times a week. Damn. My wife and I have been together for 10 years and I feel like we do it a lot more than other couples we know. We maybe do it 3-4 times a week. Twice a day would be insane. 
this story was getting interesting and I was getting ready for a happy ending, but the nail dropped after reading that last sentence lol. 
My grandparents met at a pie social (think of it like speed dating, but with pie), and got married three weeks later. They died less than three months apart, 72 years later, happily married to the end. Three generations of family underneath them, we all joke that grandpa only stuck around the extra three months to make sure we'd behave without grandma's wooden spoon to threaten us. 
Ultimately you don't decide what's best for him. If at the end of the day, despite all the interactions he had had with any number of people in the world, you're still the light that shines brightest in his life, then you're already that someone who's better for him. Don't sell yourself short. You're the winner of a lottery with a 1 in 6 billion shot. :) 
I've been with my husband for nearly 22 years. Whenever I see him unexpectedly my heart still leaps. I still love to stare at him, and waking up next to him every morning is such a privilege. Sure he drives me crazy sometimes, and marriage can be hard work, but the romance seems to grow as the years pass. It may not be for everyone, but yes, we still have stars in our eyes. 
I'm the exact same way. I'm the one who usually falls the hardest and in turn, gets my heart broken the worst. I fell so hard for my child's father that when he suddenly began ghosting me out of the blue (and eventually ended things) I was so torn up, I ended up in a mental hospital. I haven't dated anyone since him...it's been 4 years. I'm so scared. I want a daddy for my child but I'm so scared of getting hurt again. Also, my mom is kind of like me. She's so in love with my father even though he's such a jerk to her. And I'm pretty sure he's cheated on her. I'm so afraid I'm going to end up like her. Head-Over-heels in love with someone who cares little for her. Relationships are so scary. I wish I knew what to do. 
The only thing I disagree with here is "before". Sometimes it really helps to have someone else pull you up. The problem comes when you expect happiness from that person in the long term. 
I was head over heels for one woman. Moved across the country to be with her. In two weeks I realised she was horrible and everything I never want to be with. Crazy part is, even now, 2 years later when I'm with someone else and she's married, I still feel that same head over heels feeling for her. The difference, I've now realised that doesn't matter. The woman I'm with now makes me happy like that first woman NEVER could. Im not as head over heels for her, but I love her more. Sometimes infatuation isn't good for us. Sometimes it can be. But chasing infatuation, I think, is foolish. Chase love, build passion, let that develop into infatuation. 
I agree with you. Along with what you said, even though most people on Reddit encourage me to leave my boyfriend so he can be genuinely happy because of this, I consider myself asexual. I find men attractive. I find him attractive. I don't desire sex. With that, on top of my incredibly low self esteem, I have always wanted to be with someone but I've never felt the love you see in movies. But I love him, even if it isn't the same way we see everyone else be in love. To this day, I still feel incredibly out of place, because I can't understand why people are so obsessed with sex or titles or status symbols. But I do what I can to make him happy, because relationships are about compromises. I am not like everyone else but he says he likes that about me. I would say the life lottery win is finding someone as patient and understanding as him. Yes, he has his faults, as we all do, but I don't know what my chances would be of finding someone like him if things go sour between us. 
Then fight for custody. If she's unable to support herself on her own, that's not your problem. I realize how cold that sounds. Your only priorities are taking care of yourself and taking care of your children. If you get even a halfway decent lawyer and don't live in Kansas, you should be good to go! Good luck, buddy! 
You're using irony correctly. One thing is expected but the opposite happens. 
Went through marriage counseling classes before getting married, that was one of the things they covered. Rarely is it 50/50. It's always going to feel 60/40, 70/30, but if you're willing to sacrifice, the better off the marriage will be. The other thing that stuck with me is, never use the word "always" or "everytime" when arguing, it puts the other party on the defensive. Those two talking points stuck with me. We just celebrated 9 years last week. E: Spelling 
You can often fit the circle shape into the square hole by turning it 90 degrees and inserting it sideways like a coin into a coin slot. 
This sounds almost identical to my grandmother. She came from an abusive, conservative household, married an absolute shithead because she thought nobody else would love her. She divorced him when my mum was 13. 
The ethyl alcohol in anything is inherently the same chemical with the same effects. Some side chemicals may have additional effects that say, worsen hangovers. Maybe wine was worse for her because she liked the taste more and would drink it more heavily more easily? 
"You don't have to set yourself on fire to keep others warm" As someone who puts the happiness of others before myself, and was stuck between divorced parents growing up, this quote honestly changed my life. 
Set up some sort of recording device so you have proof of her abuse. Dump it into a cloud somewhere so even if she finds the recording device she can't do anything about it. Make a plan of action for getting your stuff out of there, and then see if you can bring up leaving her and get her to say "if you try, I will claim that you hit me or raped or blah blah blah". If you live anywhere in the greater Philly region, I will personally help you move your shit to a storage unit. 
Thank you, I'm feeling fairly placid about all of it now. 
I wish my parents had divorced, too. It really freaked me out about marriage for a long time, until I realised that I am not my parents and I am equiped with the knowledge of ALWAYS discussing with your partner you are upset, because resentment is a killer 
I taught in Korea too and everyone thought it was a relationship killer. So many couples came over and lived together for the first time and then add on the pressures of being in a foreign place resulted in nearly all of them going up in flames. I think I am going to link this to all of my former Korean friends just so they can see there was atleast one example of a relationship surviving the experience abroad. 
You can't help how you feel. You can't force yourself to love someone if you don't. Unfortunately that's not how it works. 
But not a good way to test the relationship. Road trip means less collateral damage. 
Both my wife and I have extremely high libidos. Twice a day, thrice on weekends, is pretty normal for us, seven years in. It just about killed us when she was pregnant and it was too painful for her. Sure, there's oral, but it's not the same, you know? My point is, it will vary. 
I argue that both Lois and Hal were good normal parents and showed a long marriage after having four sons. Maybe not the greatest but definitely effective and loving parents. 
Right? I thought I saw some kind of happy coming and then..nope lol. Its gotta be kind of depressing knowing that you were brought into this world by people who didn't even like each other. 
That sounds amazing. The problem I've found is that when a relationship hits tough times, and they all do, a person will stray, looking for that stars/butterfly feeling again. The true test of a relationship is will you buckle down or will you bail? I don't fall more in love with my wife because of butterflies, I fall more in love when her and my daughter, her step daughter, hang out and laugh. They genuinely love each other. I fall more in love with her when she stays up all night with our son. There are so many intangibles that cause me to love her more and more deeply. I value that over stars and butterflies any day. Oh, and she likes to touch my flesh popsicle. :) 
You say you've been committed, but are you going to regular out-patient therapy? It seems to me that it's not just a "this is my nature thing" to love someone who treats you like crap. It may be in your nature to fall quickly or fall hard, but that feeling should dissolve when they start treating you poorly. I mean, I just feel like if you valued yourself as highly as you seem to value your partner, you wouldn't stand for someone treating you badly like your mom seems to do. Anyway, it's none of my business, but having been head over heels for an emotionally abusive man, I can say that looking back, I just hated myself. I was so deeply in love with him because I thought he was the only person in the world that was honest enough with me to treat me the way I deserved to be treated - like a piece of human garbage. Therapy helped me leave him, and it helped me become a whole person again once I did. 
This is such a good comment. I feel like I love my boyfriend more than he loves me and it's something I struggle with. But then I also know that we just love each other in different ways some times. This is a good perspective though. If I happen to see on of my exes though, I still get nervous and a weird feeling like I want his approval for some reason. I would never in a million years get back with him. and I'm extremely happy with the man I have now. I guess I never looked at it like this. Like sometimes, that head over heels, weak at the knees feeling isn't sustainable. so Thank you for this perspective. 
My buddy told me that I don't understand irony, which was ironic because we were at a bus stop. 
You can fit the holes through the shapes if you just open your mind and accept non-Euclidean geometry. 
Yes, that's how it was, I'm sorry your grandmother went through this too. 
Yes. So hard to get people to understand the enormity of someone's else's behavior until you have it recorded. Most states here (in the US) have a one party consent law: only one person has to agree to being recorded, and that one person can be you. 
Wow. Battered men shelters, that's honestly something I rarely see discussed or even suggested. 100% agree. 
If OP has paid for the house and car with his own money he needs to collect proof. My neighbor went through a divorce and was able to keep the house and car because he made sure he could prove he paid for them. 
My grandma is the same, and so are all of her friends. Ran away with soldiers and then the soldiers left. 
Sorry to hear this, my heartfelt condolences from a father of 3 young kids. I don't know what I would do. 
That's part of it. I love my wife but there's no one who can make me more mad on this Earth. But I'd never tell anyone else that 
Sounds tiring. When do you get time to do important relationship things, like watching Malcolm In The Middle together? 
When Reese joins the army Lois goes halfway around the world and brings him back. She may not have been the easiest woman to live with but she was one hell of a mother to have in your corner. 
When my grandfather died, my healthy grandmother passed away a month later. It was such a shock. They married when they were both 18 and had been together well into their 80's. We were prepared for Grandpa to pass because he had been sick for a long time but we were not prepared for Grandma to go. But we know why. He was her everything. They were so close and they even came up with a secret language that only the two of them talked in to one another. They even started *looking* like one another...as weird as that might sound. We know she died of a broken heart. But we weren't ready for it. R.I.P. Grandma and Grandpa. 
I like that you notice the things she does for you. I wish men and women noticed the things *and* the words. I wish everyone was more appreciative. Have a nice day stranger and thanks for being appreciative. 
This is so bizarre, I've never heard of wine making someone aggressive. Everyone really does react differently to different alcohol types and we need to realize what we can and cannot tolerate well. 
Really hope they aren't somewhere like TN. We have have the two party consent law. 
I don't know, it isn't that difficult to budget the 90 seconds a day for sex. 
That reminds me of my grandparents. My granddad had been unwell since his stroke a few years earlier, but my nana was always active, still working part time, still going out with her friends etc. One night she came home from bingo and suffered a huge asthma attack and she couldn't get her breath back. She ended up on a life support machine and my dad and his four brothers made the decision to turn her off as she wasn't coming back from it. Granddad had been recently put into a care home as my nana had been unable to look after him anymore. Dad always says that when he and his brothers walked into the care home the next day, he could see from the look on his father's face that he knew immediately. I sat with granddad during the funeral service, and he was shaking like a leaf and crying the whole way through it. Three months later he passed away. They had been married for nearly 50 years. 
Personally speaking, when me and my bro's get emotional about our SO's, it really gets serious. Man that's when you can hear the sweetest thing they speak out. Maybe we should try and voice it out to our partners more. Give them wings. It's not much, just few words. 
I don't have scientific studies to back this up but this agrees with my spontaneous observations. Back in the USSR times, they had this saying to the effect "if vodka is brought to the store in a village, everyone will love each other, if wine is brought to the store, there will be fights all over the place". 
Even with the two-party consent thing, although it can't be used in court of law, you could certainly play it for neighbours, police, etc. They might not be able to formally take it as evidence, but it will certainly change how they handle the case. 
45 seconds per session? Looks like we got a demi god over here. 
Agree, this was more helpful to me than Khan in getting through college algebra. 
Can someone explain what this is? It's really interesting I'm just confused on exactly what it is. 
I searched for GIS courses and none were offered. I know I can find them for free on ESRI.com, but I was curious. I also searched for History courses (I have a history BA) and found they're only offered through Liberty University, so that's a red flag in my book. The one Sociology course I looked up was offered by MIT though, so that's nice. Still seems like a useful site, I'll have to check it out after work. Thanks! 
Can confirm, this site works well. Just add an item to your Amazon wishlist and camelcamelcamel will add it to your watch list. It will send you notifications if the item is a "best price" or meets/goes below the price you want the item for. I got some $180 knives for $50 because of this. 
Such a great site. I'm on there constantly listening to different grateful dead shows. 
Not only can you look back at websites, but in some cases get old versions of software. :) 
I haven't been there since the company logo quizzes years ago. Cheers for bringing it back! 
I... I just have a hard time believing this to be true. There would be no demand for this type of site. You are chasing an urban legend, my friend. 
Every Sunday morning for the last 10 years I've sat down with a cup of tea to read them. I love postsecret. 
Hey I have a BA in History too! Which pizza company do you deliver for? 
Me too and they are quite random as well and there has never been a loop in 13 years 
I use the app to help me sleep at night! The MyNoise app and A Soft Murmur are the reasons my tinnitus doesn't bother me any more. 
Peggy - Commander. That's a badass title she's got there. 
its actually pretty functional. Works well on mobile 
I can't believe this is legit...but I want to so badly. 
When I taught ESL I used to have a short morning-before-school speaking class. When the kids had been good we'd take one day a week just to play with this. Great way to get them to learn place names AND associate them with what these places actually look like. 
I would kill for a Polish road instead of all this dicking around in the Australian Outback. 
Its in Turkey, and unfortunately pronounced Butt-man 
I remember what ultimateguitar used to be when I was like 12 years old. It was a decent resource for any young guitarist trying to learn his favorite songs. It's such a money grubbing cock fest now. Absolute shite. 
Donating Food to charity:7/10 Donating Food to charity with rice:9/10 
Botulism outbreak traced to one gas station, I think. Logic checks out - I'd say food poisoning from their nacho cheese could be a biohazard. 
Well, if we can get more traffic to the site, then more data will be added and it's reliability will increase. Thanks for the heads up, though. 
Having saved up some money, obviously. In that sense, it's also good for people planning to retire on a low budget. 
I did chvrches, purity ring, and broods. Got a bunch of bands I've never heard of 
Do you have Grateful Grabber/The Deadhead Archives? 
But also billions of fake secrets to immortality, some of which actually cure cancer or are recipes for deadly poisons. 
$0.99 fidget spinner, 2 mins left? *$89.99 shipping...wtf* 
To be fair, it has been around since when flash was still acceptable. 
Only 23 million people here in Aus too! Place is mostly hot dirt and sand though, so we stay on the coasts. Few weirdos wanna slow cook themselves in the middle. 
Actually it's way bigger as it seems to be able to cover Spain and Portugal, a bit of Russia, a bit of Africa, all of Europe and most of Scandinavia if you tilt it right. 
 They don't call it "the golden years" for no reason, you old fart. ;) 
Read their FAQ. It explains in detail how they come up with it all. The credit card numbers use invalid prefixes, and the SS numbers are randomly generated but are not tied to the associated name. 
I'm sorry, but I think you mean David Puddy, on-again, off-again boyfriend of Elaine Benes. 
I know a few that got stuck on the "Why?" track for a while. 
I'm Commander Peggy and this is my favorite badass title. 
I use this site as a teaching aid because it's actually a well made site that just happens to look eye-bleachingly horrible 
Which is odd because it's more aesthetically pleasing and losing all of your beans when you miss a question keeps you playing longer. 
These sites don't just pay out for no reason, they have ads or some traffic - driven revenue source. The income from the ads pays for the beans. 
2 people are dead from it, WTF gas station nachos. 
"Seeking professional language speakers to make western wages" 
He's awesome though. BFG Division is a great song. 
Most likely some guy's personal server at his home to which he bought the name for and uses it in his personal life, hobby or business. 
I can only believe that those who venture into the centre of Australia are going for a trial-run for what it's like in hell. Scorching temperatures and a constant unnecessary amount of spiders. 
Europe is 10.18m km2 (mostly land area) Canada is 9.09m km2 (land area) and 9.98m km2 (including water and sea). 
I'm overvalued by 10K a year, according to the site. What's interesting is that my occupation, systems engineer, doesn't change in worth based on education at all. I dropped my education down to high school and it didn't make a difference at all. Years of experience seems to be all that matters. 
I saw it in a theater and someone sitting nearby was so high they actually walked out during "intermission". 
Yeah the styling is atrocious but the layout is good. Works great on mobile and everything. 
Just picked my guitar back up yesterday; go to get chords to Turn the Page and it's disgusting what they did to that place. 
Easy, just get a job as an English, German, French, and Italian teacher all at the same time and maybe you'll make similar wages! 
I just tried doing searches of things like my full name followed by random information about myself and it pulled up multiple results for whatever I typed. If it features every possible written work, then somewhere in there it features the story of my life, and yours. My brain is not letting me accept that as possible. I can't stop assuming that it just makes up a bunch of random characters and inserts whatever I type into it. 
"Go get some snaaaacks, perHAPS a CARBonated soDA?" 
It's barely even usable, the constant begging for me to download an app, or upgrade to a service have actually driven me away. 
I can look back over years of my life on Reddit. It's frightening. Like, instead of a photo album of family and friends, I've got long lists of comments with different dates next to them. 
IVE GOT SOME YELLOW LIQUID FOR YOUR POPCORN! And it's non dairy!!! 
Have to use desktop version, and even then its barely bearable. 
In my school we had a dumber version where we hold both sides of the paper and we take turns running the pen under the paper and poking a hole upwards. If we hit a "tank" then that ones dead lol 
Yes, on the exact opposite side of the country from where I am. *Suckers.* 
Especially when it pops up with something covering the entire page telling you not to leave. I wasn't planning to leave but you're making me want to! 
I'm in Brisbane which is far enough away for them not to be too much of a bother. Far enough South that we don't get all the northern deadly shit though. 
I would be interested to know what are the obvious distinctions in appearance and practice of the different types of Amish and Mennonites? 
"Whatever you do, don't get on Reddit. You'll be guaranteed to get laid." Amish parents be trollin. 
I didn't know that Amish took cocaine and drove fast cars and had sex until they're 21 
Okay, if ever a comment called for story time... Please, OP. Regale us. 
Putting a puzzle together at 5am? Actually sounds kinda nice... Are they retired? Is there retirement in Amish communities? I'm sure that's a stupid question but I'd never thought of it before and am genuinely curious. 
Why do you (they) finish the sentences with the word 'English'? 
I heard there is a dance competition at the community center, the grand prize is $500,000 
Amish do not have a church building. They have church in their homes. Maybe they wanted it for a school, but certainly not a church building. 
No. I'm not Amish, but I'm Mennonite and live in the middle of Amish country. Many are on Facebook, there's guaranteed to be a few on reddit. 
I'm a Quaker too! People are baffled when I tell them I'm in IT. "Did... did you get *shunned* from your community? OMG!!" 
Sing us a song, you're the piano man, sing us a song, tonight 
Hahahaha oh man. Well obviously, they believe sex should only happen within marriage. I've personally never heard the topic of sex toys brought up in a church, so I really don't know what is allowed but I would guess as long as it's within marriage it's considered ok. Talking about sex in general is just not really done other than teaching against adoltry, lust, etc. 
I've never heard of anyone doing that. But there are people who move into the community and then integrate themselves into the culture. If you were to marry an Amish person, you could choose to join the church. 
No that was all a load of crap. There was a show maybe 10 years ago called Amish in the City. They acted as if they had never seen parking meters, the beach, etc. It was so ridiculous because the town (Millersburg) in which that girl was from has parking meters. My sister knew several of them and they played it up so much for tv. However, there is a serious drug problem within the Amish youth. They do hold huge parties that bring in hundreds of Amish from all over, even out of state. And they all go to a small community in Sarasota, FL called Pinecraft where they "let their hair down" during the winter. 
Yes, I know someone who married an Amish man and joined the church. 
I had a German exchange student back in high school, and my parents could somewhat understand her German and she could somewhat understand their Dutch. I don't know what they would call a German person. Probably German. But then again Americans aren't English and yet that's what they would call us. Haha 
Mennonite Church USA is one of many different Mennonite conferences. They are considered the extreme liberals of the conservative Mennonite world. You won't be able to tell unless you know where they attend church. I go to a church that is part of a conservative conference but we are the liberals of that conference and you would never know that any of us were Mennonite unless we told you. 
Their language is weird. It's basically Low German with a lot of English. I don't really know Low German, but it would be like: Ich war auf meinem Weg zu den Supermarket, und ich habe einem Car mit einem gebrokenen Engine gepassed. 
Everyone knows God is hungover at that hour, and can't see what they're doing. Smart. 
The Amish tradition comes from that word / slang of Germany. They "jump around" the normal life of non-amish people to decide if they stay in the church or not. 
You could churn a metric shit tonne of butter very quickly on cocaine though. Sounds like a job performance enhancer to me Edit-Autocorrect put ton instead of tonne. It has shamed my family and will be put to death at high noon. Get there early and buy some lemonade. 
Yes, that shouldn't be. But you're on your own and it's between you and God...we don't have an Amish KGB to track people down. 
It's not so much 'allowed' as we're reluctant to. We have trusted doctors that make rounds, and house calls...so if you took an axe through the leg, you could go to the ER and not be docked or shunned...but we avoid general checkups and physicals and such. It's too much money, and we generally use natural cures. 
It honestly is; for every drug or meth bust there's 1000 that go unreported as we stick together. We're all related if you go back like 3-4 generations so we're like 'Got your back fam, fuck the English!' 
I'm fairly certain he DID tell the story just now. 
Democratic People's Republic of Korea have the Best Internets in every World! Our Glorious Leader Kim Jeong-eun give us Freedom of Internets to reunite Korea under banner of Juche and Seongun Glorious Ideologies, and quality tentacle porn to entertain our peoples, far better than Evil Imperialist entertainment! Kim Jeong-eun changgun manse! 
Yes they retire. Many go to Sarasota, FL in the winter. 
"English" is the term the Amish use for outsiders. The Amish speak German (their version of it) and when they came over to the US, everybody they met spoke English so they just called them that. 
Some guy was talking to me and I guess there is some million dollar, winner take all bowling tournament in Nevada. He said he wants to coach me. Doubt I'll see him again though. 
Meh, I'm a modern Mennonite and when I tell people they often think I'm Amish and ask why I don't look Amish... 
While we're all in the mood for a melody, and you've got us feelin' alright 
Oh, that reminds me - my grandma was a huge fan of the Pennsylvania Amish, so we'd head out that way fairly regularly. In one case, we did some tour with overview of family life, and our guide talked about how during courtship, the couples would "spend the night". I was pretty young or I'd have asked a bit more about that - I get that Amish courtship is more a thing geared towards marriage than secular dating is, but coming from a Christian background where "they shared a bed before marriage" would cause a world of pearl-clutching, how does that work in the community? Or was the guide completely full of shit? 
Can you marry an Amish person and not join the Church? 
I'm Mennonite (Mennonite Church USA) and my old youth pastor grew up in a small Pennsylvania town with an Amish settlement nearby. He always tells stories about how the Amish teenagers would come into town in their buggies on the weekends, get fucked up, pass out, and let their horses take them home. So yeah from what I've heard the Amish youth can be pretty crazy. 
Could i ask where in ohio you are? I also grew up in a mennonite church in ohio 
My friend is a muppy. Holy cow. My world has been opened. His family is the sweetest and are the most kind hearted genuine people i've ever met in my city. They go on multiple mission trips a year (leaving religion 100% out of it and are solely there to help those in need which is fucking baller) and the majority of them are studying environmental this or that. 
More like I bi ufem Weg zum Supermarkt gsi und bi ame Car miteme brokene Engine verbicho Now you take this variant and translate it back to the high/swiss-german variant that was spoken a few hundred years ago 
Guess the double standards of the Amish/Mennonites match that of the rest of the US just fine. ;) 
I am from southern Germany, use this word often and this is the most interesting fact I have learned today. 
"Do you want to live amongst the English or be loved by your family? Choice is yours." 
Q: What goes "clop-clop-clop-clop-BANG-clop-clop-clop-clop"? A: A drive-by shooting in Amish country. 
OH MAN. SOMEONE WRITE THIS SCI FI BOOK and then let me know about it. I want to read about the Amish KGB. 
Huh, funny. There are settlements that speak an older form of the Bernese dialect. Maybe if you were to speak really really slow? 
The Swiss are mocking Germans. Wether they are foreigners that learned German or native Germans. We don't give a shit, the Germans get a paddlin'. 
But okay... I mean... I'm Swedish. Consider me demon for all I care, I mean I DO worship heathen Gods (The Aesir). But damn, I'm not English. :P 
My uncle works with the Amish in Wisconsin. He says that doctors and dentists sometimes only work with the Amish. For two reasons: they pay cash and they never sue. 
You are so full of shit its actually mind blowing. Please post proof before you continue to fool all these people 
There's an elevator pitch for "first time seeing a computer" but nothing on how long it took this kid to get the hang of it, or any of the shenanigans and blunders that ensued. So no, not really. 
Now I'm curious if North Koreans have access to porn. Judging by the typical Tyrannical dictator probably not, but honestly if I wanted a docile population so they wouldn't mind me ruling over them for all eternity, I would probably give them porn. They would be too busy playing with themselves to notice that they live in extreme poverty. 
This is gonna sound ignorant, but how do they get there? A 100+ hr buggy ride would be brutal. Is airline travel permissible? 
I was wondering when I missed the bit in history classes about the Amish owning slaves... I did some tour thing of the Amish country with my family when I was younger and we visited PA and I can't remember ever hearing talk about Amish slavery....lol 
Wow. I've got just one. His name his Dick, and he's ready to meet your ass. 
Glad to have given you some new information! I went to college only 40 minutes away and I was amazed at how little people there knew about the Amish. They thought it was crazy I was from the Amish. 
Yeah most of the rules are eye-roll worthy, but even more ridiculous is the hoops they jump through to find ways around the rules. 
Hmm I don't know if they would be that ignorant. But one of my uncles grew up as a Swartzentruber and he had never heard about slavery until he was an adult. 
Yes I am! And yes those polo shirts! They try so hard to "fit in" it makes them stick out. haha 
Well personally, I don't agree with Trump or his policies regarding Muslim refugees and immigrants. I am definitely in the minority around here though. To be honest, I have never thought about the comparisons of Amish and Muslims integrating into society. That is a really great question though and something I am going to think over. 
When Amish teenagers spend the night with each other there is usually either a board between them or one of them are in what is basically a sleeping bag so that they aren't actually touching. Source: I lived with an Amish family in both PA and Ohio for 3 weeks for a college course. 
Good question. There was a guy at our church growing up whose wife was Amish but he was not. But I think he was also Amish and left, while she remained in the church. 
Meanwhile, all us "English" people are excited for self-driving cars to take our drunk asses home - the Amish are more advanced than I thought. 
The Wayne/Holmes county area. Are you from the same area? 
I decided to look up what "gsi" is in standard German. It's gewesen. Swiss German is so weird. 
Effectively really archaic german syntax, stuffed with a few english terms inbetween. 
He does my favorite joke ever. It's my go-to. "I like to go down to the playground and watch the kids run and jump and scream, because they don't know I'm only using blanks." 
If your legs are really asleep you can't even move a muscle. Those tingly pains 
This is some Weird Al level shit right here! Actually it could be, I don't know most of his songs. 
Up in Amish country there's literally 500 families and 3 last names. And here's an Amish guy giving directions: "Aye, you go up past where Stoltzfus' granary used to be before it burned down, then it's a 40 minute walk from there, on the right." 
If I had a pfennig for every time I heard that exact conversation... 
One shot, one kill. You should see us go through a woodlot during deer season - it's like a military skirmish line, like a line of bearded, overall-wearing Terminators carrying bolt-action rifles...we're deadly serious about free protein. 
You're up in our hood, you're Amish or you're English. There's naught else. 
It's an hour and a half walk to the post office ... :( 
Cash. Absolutely! "In God we trust. All others pay cash." 
I lost touch with him after we graduated. I heard through the grapevine that he went back to the community but that is no better than rumor. *Edit* A few people messaged me saying he stayed in the Navy and now lives in San Diego. 
You've just described IT support my friend! Knowing when to reboot and knowing how to Google error codes or relevant information properly can go a long way in troubleshooting IT problems. That and 'percussive maintenance' (hitting things until they work). 
Yeah, let's fucking greenlight this thing already. Sounds like there could be a bunch of great stories. 
Yep, I feel like the book's been mentioned a thousand times, but look at 1984. They had a department that mass produced porn for the proles. I would also give my subjects porn and stimulants, so they work more. That last bit probably has to do with the fact that meth is so popular in some parts of the DPRK. It makes you work fast, and forget about your shitty life. It's perfect for them. 
Oh yay :) I love it when they have other slaves to talk to. They grow up so fast. 
Watch Weird Al's "Amish Paradise". It has some entertaining scenes of him with a butter churn. 
One of my favorite one-liners from Absolutely Fabulous: "One more facelift, and she'll have a beard." 
The intention of the rule (and the religious practice of following it) is completely lost when they do this. 
One topic that might come up in such a discussion would be in relation to the rule of law within those communities. How is that handled in Amish/Mennonite communities that you know of? Like following the law of the land versus following tradition, being stricter or looser with certain things, interactions with law enforcement, etc 
"It's like finding out thou shalt not kill is thou shalt not quilt! 'We could have had guns all along Ezekiel!'" -Robin Williams 
I dunno about anyone else, but a board and a sleeping bag would have had no chance at stopping 17-year-old me from getting a piece. 
Thanks for the answer. How does one become an Amish? You walk to an Amish community and then what, Being Christians baptism is in order but to they do Catechism? And after that, what if you are from afar and don't have a home there, do they take you for a while? 
The Amish near Grabil, IN have solar panels on their barns to power heat and ventilation systems for their animals. The amish owned grocery store in town has heads of lettuce growing out of PVC pipes with flowing water in them for people to pick a buy fresher than possible anywhere else. There they seem A-OK with technology as long as it's solely practical and they don't already have something to fill that need. 
Yep. I myself am Episcopalian, but work with a bunch of Mennonites like that. They're really fantastic, and totally ready to roll out when they see someone in need. Local Mennonite church sent quite the formidable crew of grandmas to the local airport this weekend to protest. 
Gsi is a contraction of gesein, not that weird that way 
As a kid, I used think no one else got those pins and needles pains based on how frequently I'd get them and also based on how when I'd get them no one else seemed to understand what I was describing. Now I can see my 3rd grade classmates were just gaslighting me. 
My middle name is Abner, named after my great-gradfather Abner, or my grandfather Abner on my mother's side, depending on who you ask. 
Would you care to explain why, English? I mean, in my mind it would be more logical if it was "Demon Americans" or just "Demon", what's the deal with the English? (This is truly fascinating to me) 
I can't help but feel that he would either turn into a 'one-eyed man in the land of the blind', or more likely 'a boat in the middle of a desert'. 
I watched a documentary and I was under the impression that if you leave after rumspringa you are not "shunned", it's an acceptable choice. My understanding was that if you return to the community after rumspringa, *and then* decide to leave, that's what gets you shunned. Do you know if he returned and then left again? 
As someone who has to deal with the way the US Army handles user accounts, internet connectivity, and PC Hardware on a daily basis.... HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA 
It's starting to sound like a kingpin sequel to me. 
So, what *is* the point behind only having black cars? 
I would say Amish and Mennonites are taught to always follow the law and respect those in authority, unless it were to go against God's law. Also they are very good about taking care of issues within their communities which helps prevent a lot of problems. Amish and conservative Mennonites are also pacifists so that would play a huge role as well. 
It wasn't so much of stopping them from doing anything as it was a "reminder" to not do anything. The families I lived with were not part of any groups that practiced teens spending the night together and they thought the idea that a board would work was ridiculous. 
There's a lot to it. First, you've got to get past the distrust of the English. Then, IF you can date someone in the church, which isn't allowed (although happens in Rumspringa behind parents backs) you might get the family to like you. Then, you've got to get approval from the bishop to marry (Good Luck) without being cast out of the community. It's a very closed group and it takes a lot to join up. Most English don't want to give up our comforts, and if you do there's no turning back. 
I need to figure out that pvc thing... for, uh... lettuce 
TIL a group of grandmas is referred to as a "formidable crew" 
I find it comfortable to set with one of my legs on top of the other (common male style) and it would put my leg to sleep. Then the bell would ring and I would just be sitting there waiting. First I stomp my sleeping leg a few times before the pains start. Then I plant it in a spot and DO NOT MOVE. Even breathing makes the pains start. Then I slowly wiggle a toe and eventually I can walk again. It happens because you basically shut off the nerves in the leg and the brain can't communicate with them. When the leg starts waking up, the signals are reestablished and they begin "phoning home" to the brain. That feels painful to many people 
Sometimes we get a convert, and we say they "left the English." We don't forget the divisions between our people or our history and the outsiders - who were originally the English that persecuted us (We mostly spoke German, and called ourselves Deutsch which the English misheard as Dutch) Now, there's only the Amish and all others, called English for simplicity. It doesn't matter what you identify as, to us you're English. And I don't want to come across as hostile, we're not. We just don't accommodate people, and we honor and remember our history. 
or maybe he learned things and still thinks his old way of life creates better people. 
Yes, shunning people for deciding not to return after Rumspringa would be against the whole reason the Amish split off from mainline Christianity, which is to say adult baptism. They strongly believe that a commitment to the Church is meaningless if not made with a full understanding of the consequences, which is why Rumspringa exists. They don't shun you for being raised Amish but deciding not to come back, because they always hope that you will. What they shun you for is being baptized in the church and then breaking your commitment to the community and Christ. 
The goal is probably more accurately "keep our stuff working better than the stuff ISIS uses to record videos in a cave." 
It used be seen as frivolous to have a car that wasn't black. Ford's Model T was only available in black 1914-1926. Black paint was cheap and durable. Now that isn't as much as an issue, but its probably not inconvient enough to challenge the tradition. 
Wow, that's super interesting! Seriously, thank you for answering all these questions, I know more about Amish people now then I ever thought I would! 
That sounds interesting i would love to experience a different culture like that for a few weeks 
I am from Holmes County as well! There are dozens of us! 
It is a little known fact that Reddit causes 70% of all paralysis worldwide 
What do you mean by that exactly? What rumours? Are you saying you hire some genetically acceptable outsider to cum in your wife because she is your cousin? 
They also made an app for that, so you can check on the go! 
Maybe Jebediah didn't install your barn door properly. 
Oh wow, is there like a degenerate Amish caste system? 
From what I've been led to understand and learned in growing up within 20 minutes of Amish country, its also as primitive as can be. 
I never perceived you as hostile. I find your culture and way of life fascinating. I mean, I don't think I could do it, live without technology that is. Is there anyway to be Amish-lite? Like, live 99% like an Amish and with the community, but you know, own a laptop? :P 
From what I gather, that's the exact purpose of the rumspringa. It's an elegant way of saying "yes, there's a wider world. But maybe you'll see we *choose* our way of life". From what I understand, though, those that choose not to live In the Amish way have a hard time. I may be *wayyyy* off base, and I'm sure someone will correct me. 
Even that's iffy. I think its more of "keep things working just well enough that we don't get our asses chewed". 
I'm a man of the land, I'm into discipline Got a Bible in my hand and a beard on my chin 
It was really fun and very informative! I'd recommend that everyone should go live in another culture for a period of time just to experience life a new way! 
The rumors are the Amish will pay for non-Amish men to impregnate the women in order to keep the gene pool varied. The thought is there would be a lot of inbreeding because of the small community size. I still doubt it's true, though. 
Now I know how it feels to be an American in a thread about Australia. All the talk of dropbears and you don't know if you can believe it or not, but you want to believe it because it would make a great story to tell your friends about.. 
Based on other comments above, looks like they mean (technically) prostitution of a sorts. 
Insert DNA 1 *Testing.* Insert DNA 2 *Analysing.* 20% chance of relation {check guide book for further explanation} *checks guide book* ***10%-30% match. Likely to be a first cousin or niece/nephew, probably worth it if very attractive.*** *lies terribly: yep, we're fine* 
Yeah. Top tier is amish you see when you're at the zoo. Bottom tier is meth amish 
They put them damn fancy metal spokes on their buggies and feed their horses Boston's best beans to make their exhausts louder, all while sporting the flags of the English. 
Ah, but we have spent a vast majority of our time on Earth living in an Amish utopia. 
You could come up for an internship, see if you like it. 
I could be wrong but aren't they pretty much disowned by their family and community if they decided to stay with the modern world. Its a pretty tough decision to make if that's the case. 
Happens all the time sadly, there's a very large percentage of people that go their whole lives never working a day in the field they have a degree in. 
We have a lot of former military staff, this all adds up now.... 
But if I finish all of my chores and you finish thine, 
Well I know I'm a million times as humble as thou art! 
Had a friend who claimed to have done this once. He said he thought it'd be fun, but it was one of those things that when you're actually there, the reality sinks in and it just gets depressing. 
Total bullshit. Inbreeding does happen, and birth defects occur at a higher rate than normal. Source: I live in central PA Amish country. 
Actually it's a Bluetooth enabled app. You set it up with a link your genealogical records -which are complicated because no family names, just patronymics, so the government has kept good records for ages for inheritance laws too. Then in a bar looking for a hookup, you open the app and bump your phone with the other persons phone. It'll tell you how related you are. 
We are more than enough people in Norway to not need such an app. But some of the other Island nations could really use it. 
Well, I know its Deutsch, becasue of the German background. But the Americans (or English) call it Dutch even though it has nothing to do with the Netherlands. 
But no tech? Also, how harsh is the no tech rule? Would you be allowed to get a pacemaker for your heart? 
Multitasking while sitting on your ass is a critical skill in IT. I'd say you're qualified. 
WE SPEND MOST OUR LIVES LIVIN' IN AN AMISH PARADISE 
Taxidermy is a bonus skin treatment you get from the IRS if you do your taxes just right. 
That makes a similar argument I had with a freshman guy my sophomore year of high school seem almost reasonable. Although he didn't think my being female with a thorough knowledge of my own body was suitable evidence for my argument... 
Actually the red dot on the forehead is a symbol of civil disobedience originating from when colonists would point their laser-sight sniper rifles at the native Japanese Indians. 
Bizarre indeed, because we have no switches on Lake Michigan either. 
She was so wrong. Everyone knows Asia is an 80's rock band. 
When I was in Grade 5 Sex Ed, we were allowed to write down our questions for privacy, and the teacher would read them aloud. Having just viewed an episode of Ally McBeal that included a transgender woman who still had a penis, my question became, "If a woman has a penis, does it work the same?" I remember him opening up my question, staring at it, folding it up, and moving on. 
Now I want the hood version of all classical tales. Where should I subscribe? Surely there must be a subreddit for that. 
my wife worked with a woman in the senate (they were staffers, a long time ago, just out of college). she (not my wife!) said "The Pentagon? ...isn't that the hexagon shaped building?" 
How can you titillate an ocelot? You oscillate its tits a lot. 
This is the one question in here I really want to ask the person about. I'm baffled as to how someone could know that much detail about the crucifixion *except* for who did it. 
What kind of class was this? I'm hoping it wasn't medical or nursing school. 
And some things that should not have been forgotten were lost. History became legend. Legend became myth. And for two and a half thousand years, the bear passed out of all knowledge 
We did a similar thing, but were partnered up and had to write down the traits our "baby" would have according to our own actual traits such as eye color, widow's peak, et cetera. Then we had to draw the baby. I was really into anime at the time so my baby looked really fucking scary in hindsight 
My stepmom is Australian and taught Aboriginal students in the outback (technically Alice Springs). After she met and married my dad, they decided to move to America for a few year. When she told her students she was leaving, they asked her if she was going to Compton and was going to see various rappers. They were pretty disappointed to learn she was going to Montana of all places. 
Tourism. It's the best move the Hawaiians and Icelanders have ever made 
Jeez, what an idiot. Everyone knows it was Martin Luther King **Jr** that freed the slaves. 
I am slightly concerned for this child's home life. 
How does it feel being the tech support equivalent of academia? 
To her credit, they're finding that people concieved using IVF are having difficulty having children of their own as adults. So not completely a dumb question, depending if you mean completely sterile or unable to reproduce unassisted. 
As a university professor, I would tell the student to get with a classmate to see what he had missed and to start getting to class on time. 
Sure, if you say AIDS 10 times in a row you get Herpes. 
I had someone in my class who asked, "so if Hitler was such a bad person, why don't they just kill him?" 
So the map was zoomed in a bit to the east, the kid was just trying to help you find the safe house. 
Living in Scotland, this one isn't hard to believe. 
I took English at a local community college. One night while the class was working on something and the teacher was reading over everyone's assignments from the night before she stopped the class and said the following sentence. "Guys, under no circumstances should a comma come in the middle of a word. I've seen several of you do this and I have no idea why." It was honestly pretty hard not to laugh. 
Are they cognates? Or did the child ask you in English? 
It's only after entering computer science that it occurs to me how many people don't know even basic trigonometry, geometry or algebra They always ask me why they would ever need to know it if they can get by without it I always explain that it doesn't make it possible to live, just that it makes your life a fuckload easier 
Bless his heart. Those anonymous question boxes are so useful. Someone in my sex ed class wanted to know "where the bone comes from." I'm so glad people had a way to get answers to this stuff pre-internet. Or post-internet, but especially pre-internet. 
We convinced my friend that Germany had almost won the war, then France had come out of nowhere and take over the entire continent, thus causing the Cold War 
I mean if the radiator is unnaturally hot I *suppose* you could become very overheated. But that's not the radiation they're thinking of. 
I taught my ex what a clitoris is, that she had one and its (as I understand it) function. This is a full grown woman in her mid twenties with a child. 
If this was intentional, then it's actually kinda witty. 
I suffer from a very sexy learning disability. What do I call it, Kif? 
The "I don't actually understand evolution but clearly it can't be true" starter pack. 
When reading, "go to the bathroom, fill up your water bottles..." I instantly feared that a student might have filled their water bottle with water from the toilet bowl. 
I mean, if you think about it from an other perspective. If you didn't already went over the function and all that of chromosomes this might not even be that dumb of a question why an extra chromosome isnt actually something benefical for you. Sure it's a bit strangely formulated, but the question why or what makes the extra chromosome give you a disability instead of a positiv effect isn't that stupid. 
That's better than just not knowing your planets. I was on a high school academic team and ended up being the only one in a room of idiots that knew more than three planets. Not to mention the order of them. 
To be fair on the idiot, you can just pull a I-IV-V chord progression directly from your arse and get to top 40. 
If there was an parallel universe where that question wasn't stupid, would it be smart? 
I don't know enough about Japan. It wasn't in that sun rise land video. 
Yeah, she was just answering in the heat of the moment. 
On the one hand, I understand why your question wasn't stupid. On the other hand, I'm not sure how else a relatively innocent 5th grader could've asked that without sounding dumb. 
There's a guy on YouTube that does gangster readings of classic literature. I laughed my ass off when he did a hood analysis on Kafka. 
To be fair that would confuse the hell out of anyone planning an attack. "Sir, we can't find the Pentagon; there's just this big Hexagon." "Well keep looking dammit! It has to be there somewhere!" 
I don't know why, but this had me cracking the fuck up. 
This is what I was thinking. In my mind, this is just a simple miscommunication. 
Sadly my desire to get on with the lesson trumped my desire to ask them for more detail. The student was a bit of a joker though so in my mind I figured he was trying to derail my lesson before it started. Regardless it's a really stupid question. 
This particular kid had a few moments like this. We played a game once that revolves around a surprise trick -- if the entire group knows the trick, the game can't be played. He requested that game every. single. week. No matter how many times I explained to him that it's only possible to play with people who don't know the surprise. 
My EMT teacher specified several times that you should never put a tourniquet on someone's neck, I guess it's been a problem before. 
Ages come and pass, leaving memories that become legend. Legends fade to myth, and even myth is long forgotten when the Age that gave it birth comes again. In one Age, called the Bear Age by some... 
Well, I've seen Battlestar Galactica, so I know that's real. And I've eaten beets, so I know they're real, and I've seen bears at the zoo, so I know they're real, and so I must conclude that the only thing on this list that is completely imaginary is Galactica 1980, a spinoff in which the Battlestar Galactica crew discover 1980s Earth and send the children to Earth school undercover. 
If you provide said picture i will give you reddit gold 
You joke, but I know a bunch of Hawaiians who want the volcano to explode, so that it drives away the tourists and brings the housing prices down. I keep telling them, "There is no way in the world I want to be Vesuvius." Not to mention the volcano is on the other side of the island. 
Agreed, inappropriate sexual knowledge is a major red flag for child abuse. 
I've done tech support as well. I think it was easier to teach grannies how to switch to HDMI 1 input. At least Granny is trying to listen. 
To add to that, this only goes for IVF/ICSI in case of male fertility problems. There is some evidence that endometriosis is hereditary as well, but women with endo aren't per definition sterile and can often conceive naturally or through IUI. Just to clarify that IVF in itself isn't a risk factor and that it depends on the *reason* for fertility treatment if any possible fertility issues are passed on. 
You're almost correct. Alex is actually one of the Lexis. 
If you shave and jerk it with a hand that has warts on it, you can give yourself warts on your junk. 
This explains so much about why my accounting degree required that we have taken calculus prior to even starting any actual accounting courses. I've never used a log in any of my work, but now I realiz they were just weeding out the people who couldn't count. 
I believe the proper call is "Do you have a Geiger Counter?" and the proper response is "Mine is in the shop." 
Pfft they're clearly not Scottish, they've seen the sun 
If you saw how they wrote their stories, you'd understand. The only punctuation they used were periods and apostrophes. That was it. They didn't get that there is a difference between apostrophes and quotation marks. Lots of people I teach are very smart, or at least very determined, and figure things out after some basic instruction. This particular individual was... not compatible with anything having to do with the written word. 
I am the type of dick uncle to which you refer. Spreading Science like Calvin's dad since forever. Thank you for recognizing our efforts. 
No, one shouldn't malign the noble roosting fowl which provides us eggs and meat by comparing it to the French. 
If I had a nickel for every time I'd gotten that excuse, I'd have my teachers salary. 
To be fair, for a lot of mammals the boner is caused by an actual bone. 
That sounds like a reasonable question to ask. I can't remember ever getting any lessons along the lines of, "give students a sense of scale". Sure, you can look at a map, but you have to correlate things on the map to something you have a real world reference for. Like, two cities looking close together on the map, but being a 3 hour drive away in real life. 
Along with, "If people came monkeys, why are there still monkeys?" to which I reply, "If Americans came from Europeans, why are there still Europeans?" 
Another good solution to this is to buy your daughter an analog watch that she really loves. It's excellent motivation. I had a really rough time with it but my parents bought me a Sailor Moon watch, it really helped a lot. My sister got a Minnie Mouse one. Also keep in mind that difficulty reading an analog clock can be a sign of dyscalculia so keep an eye out for other tells like the inability to tell left from right, difficulty when trying to subitize objects and obviously difficulty with math. It turned out my issues with analog time was a symptom of this so it took until my teen years to get it entirely right but the sooner you know about disabilities then the easier it is to learn! 
Poor I-IV-V. The chap definitely would not have known what that is... He was the kid who brought weed into class to brag to the teache (because he thought he was cool and wasn't going to rat him out to senior staff...) and did GCSE music just to create dubstep. Shame we had to study "boring shitty fake classical music" 
I'm not sure how a teacher could answer it, or even read it, to a class of 5th graders without having *way* more questions come of it. 
C'mon, we're *burp* going to the pentagon. Well, not *the* pentagon, the boring one. In Washington. 
Quiz bowl thing in high school, lighting round: what are the tubes in your ears that connect inner and outer ear called? Fallopian tubes! *Facepalm* 
lol my professor went through scenarios in which CPR shouldn't be attempted. One of them was decapitation. 
You know, it's weird, I could swear I was taught this as well. I've heard other people who were also taught this. My working theory is that they actually were hunted to extinction, but only in the Berenstein universe. 
Unfortunately my poor anime baby is lost to the sands of time. 
That would make a pretty good AskReddit question: "What is adorable in a 6 year old, but scary in a 16 year old?" 
Bert: "Ernie, why do you keep exploding the volcanoes in Hawaii"? Ernie: "It scares away the crocodiles, Bert" Bert: "But Ernie, there *are* no crocodiles in Hawaii." Ernie: "That's because of all the exploding volcanoes, Bert. You're welcome." 
Yeah he did, so that was nice. He literally ran away too. 
Believe me, being able to do calculus definitely does not mean you can count. Source: Physics major. 
Up on Macaroni Hill there's a pasta tree. Will you share with me? Just add some Parmesan cheese And a little cream. Please have as much as you want It's basically free Tell me are you hungry? the base of the food pyramid Back in 93 Back in 93... 
Somehow it really disappointed me that after that whole wild goose chase along the freedom trail, the password to the top-secret rebel organization was "railroad." 
It's crazy how universal this is. Really shitty dream. 
Same. I start freaking out over whether or not we're past the add/drop date. Waking up and realizing I graduated 10 years ago is the most relieving feeling 
15 years here. It's like University/College ptsd or something. 
Scotland: If you can see the mountains, it's going to rain. If you cannae see the mountains, it's raining 
I've told numerous children that old pictures were black and white because that's how the world was back then, the world didn't turn color until around the 1930s. I'm really hoping to get in trouble from a family member when someone finds out. 
Totally a fair question, and I'm glad they got an answer. 
His father has erectile disfunction, so it's out of his jurisdicktion. 
I see. You didn't read "The Art of Seduction"; you wrote it. 
So what you're saying is, God created Americans as they are and Europeans are a separate species? 
The dude who fucked a McChicken would have enjoyed it that much more. 
Mid teens and a mate discretely asked me for a condom whilst we were out with the group. I gave him a look (he was a virgin at the time, so far as I knew). He gave me a strange look back, which I couldn't decipher. His girlfriend was in earshot so he didn't explain it and I didn't press. Later he told me that she'd given him a blowjob after he put one on (at her request). I asked him how it was. "Shit. I couldn't feel anything." Poor lad. 
That's when it would be good to have a 1v1 meeting for students whose questions were skipped and they still want the answers for 
This sounds like a reference to Thingy & The Other One... you know, the kid and the crazy drunk dude. 
They should erect a statue of the guy that killed Hitler, celebrate a real hero. 
Just listened to On Melancholy Hill while reading your lyrics, 10/10. 
"How did you guess our secret password?" "Well, I tried Swordfish, but that didn't work, so..." 
so im not alone. damn thing is recurring too, even years after graduating. 
My parents taught me the wrong words for things, so you're not that bad. Grapes being called "beeps" did make for some funny home videos though 
Some classes are set up in such a way that missing a quiz can really fuck your grade up. I've noticed a lot of professors seem to structure their class in a way that punishes people that don't come, so it could be a result of that. 
I'd say that violates the spirit of the question, at the very least... 
hahaha I graduated years ago and me too! I wonder what psychological effect is causing this in so many people 
I checked my schedule yesterday to make sure i was actually in all the classes I've been taking and found out I'm in a chemistry class I had no idea about 
Heh. My family calls grapes "beeps" too. However, it's because when my sister was little, she couldn't say grapes and called them beeps instead. 
Some may call this junk, me I call them treasures. 
Thanks. I just rechecked my schedule now. Good news, no unknown classes. Bad news, saw my bill for tuition. 
Are you guys sensoring yourselves or is the word literally b e e p s? 
Everything's for sale, my friend. Everything. If I had a sister, I'd sell her in a second. 
Great, I just checked my schedule. Bad news, apparently I didn't pay my tuition so I'm not enrolled in any of the classes I've been attending. Good news, I'm free for the rest of the semester. 
And that you can work with people you wouldn't want to be friends with. 
this is why checklists, even for highly trained/experienced professionals, improve outcomes dramatically. - surgeons use checklists - airline pilots use checklists - nuclear engineers use checklists 
It helps if you make eye contact and point at them. Not kidding. Why? Because you need to be authoritative and people in a flap tend to take directions from a person who has assumed an authoritative role. But more than that, if you can't make eye contact with a person long enough to point at them and instruct them then they are probably in a panic and will not focus enough to be able to make the call or to communicate with emergency effectively. 
I have sort of a three-in-one check when I use a public bathroom. Get a couple/few pieces of TP (this checks there is enough TP to deal with what is about to unload), wipe down the toilet seat (you have no idea who, or what?, has been on that toilet before you - some men have terrible aim and you do not want a pissy arse), then put that toilet paper as a muffling device on the surface of the water. Sit down, phone out, on reddit, relax and release. 
Alpha Bravo Charlie Delta Echo Foxtrot Golf Hotel India Juliet Kilo Lima Mike November Oscar Papa Quebec Romeo Sierra Tango Uniform Victor Whiskey X-ray Yankee Zulu 
Or after the CTRL + A you can double click any one of the lines separating the column headers. 
Someone above asked what should they do while they wait for an ambulance to get there, my best advice is helping them get to the ground (sitting up because you don't want if they lose consciousness to aspirate if they're having dysphagia), TIME THE ONSET, if it is an "ischemic stroke", if they get to he hospital within 4 hrs there is a specific med (TPA) they can give to dissolve clot Keep them calm and note any worsening and how rapidly the symptoms change and worsen. Also note time of loss of consciousness of there is any. It's important to know. It can be scary but you'll be helping tremendously and help treatment move quicker. 
The fuck is this wizard'ry? I can't believe I've never even done that accidentally in however many years of using Win8. 
peanut butter, jelly, bread, toaster waffles, frozen corn dogs... yep, saves me lots of money and i don't even have to buy any pots and pans 
Control + click does the same, a few niche browsers out there didn't/don't have the scroll click. 
I worked at a bike shop over the summer. A few times people came in saying they couldn't get the left pedal off no matter how hard they twisted. They were making it tighter. 
Sometimes it makes it a lot harder when you end up working for people who are not used to hearing "no". Seriously, fuck those people. Every one of them I have ever met was a dishonest POS. Communication and recognition of legit barriers and obstacles to completing a task that would lead to a "no" is the most important part of team work. You can't overcome a problem until you acknowledge the problem exists. 
There's a similar analogy but in WW1. They had just introduced steel helmets tp stop low velocity shrapnel from killing so many men. But once the injury figures were looked at after they noticed an increased number of men with head wounds. They were going to get rid of the helmets until someone pointed out that the increase was because those who were now just injuted would have been dead othewise. 
I came up with a mnemonic device: Over, Around, Around, Under, Through = Obviously An Adult Understands Ties 
I'm just a bill Yes, I'm only a bill. And I'm sitting here on Capitol Hill... 
Every Bad Girl Does Anal Excessively is what stuck for me. 
Also if it claims to cure everything (it even helps with cancer and rheumatoid arthritis and aids weight loss!) If it appeals to a lost art or ancient methods (lars Anderson super archery vines to mind here) If it acts like it's a secret even though it's clearly an advertisement (doctors don't want you to know!!) My favorite is when the 'big secret'is so simple that, if it had any validity, we would have already been doing. Copper heals us? Why haven't we been taping pennies to our arms for decades? 
For any given relationship, make it a 60/40 where you are giving just a bit more. The key is, they should look at it exactly the same way from their perspective. 
And in the middle of the night when you want to turn the fan on, they both turn the light on! Fascinating. 
But this just lets the dark thoughts speak more clearly. 
I sat here for a couple minutes wondering "How can somebody not understand the basic layout of a shirt?" before I realized you were talking about spelling "necessary." 
well...how do I know which is which?? I only know one way!! 
This is really good, but I want to add that being content with how you are =/= not trying to better yourself. I see so many people that do this, when they accept who they are or settle for themselves, they just stop trying to make themselves better or grow as people and remain stagnant. I see it a lot in middle aged people and career retail workers like grocery store managers and such. Just because you can accept that you might not be the next billionaire does not mean you should ever stop trying to better yourself or make life better, you can be content and accept who you are and still try to be better than who you were yesterday. 
My dad taught me "left, right, left again" when turning or crossing a road. His reasoning was the left would be the first to hit you, right the second, but to ALWAYS look both ways. I usually do that, then again before I move...lots of overgrown foliage around these parts. 
I hate that the police don't use the NATO phonetics. Would help a lot for federal-state-local communications 
Most libraries have seamless integration with Google Scholar. Meaning, you can go to Google Scholar, and it will let you know what your library owns/licenses next to each link. Source: sold a lot of academic libraries a lot of stuff for 4-5 years. 
My grade 12 English teacher did the same thing!!! 'I teach proper grammar forget everything else' and what she taught was absolute trash. 
Why the foxtrot would you put foxtrot before echo. 
I will remember, "Blue end goes to the sky" for the rest of my life. Thank you. 
Yes absolutely the epi pen is made to be able to do that. 
As I was imagining myself using an Epi-Pen, my thumb was over the end. This was very informing. 
Nope. Just stab it in their upper thigh. Hard and with purpose. 
Through the pants works fine. They are made to be able to go through jeans and such. 
I better save this post.. Hope I have my phone with me if I ever need it. "You're going to be fine! Here... Let's look at reddit while the ambulance comes." 
Sudden episodes of memory loss are not a typical presentation of stroke, so I would agree more with your recommendation to see a doctor than start worrying about strokes every time someone has a memory lapse. Short-lived episodes of weakness, numbness, slurring or dizziness however ARE typical presentations for TIAs (mini-strokes) and should be seen as an emergency 
Stay woke to spot a stroke, folks. Don't neglect to detect if ya wanna protect against that ill effect. 
I do the reverse all the time (wiggle the window and subsequently minimize all others), and it's annoying as fuck. 
This used to be me, so now I have an ongoing "note" in my phone that's basically a grocery list/meal prep thing. When I go grocery shopping I just delete it off the note and the things I don't get stay on the note. So far Paper Towel holder and butter holder have been on it for at least 3 months. I can't find ones that I like! 
One I use most often is WinKey + L to lock PC (work policy to always lock PC before walking away), saves me tens of seconds through an average day 
Yeah, every time I do some super basic sewing that's not even that neat to fix something for somebody they're amazed like it's some sort of tough puzzle I've figured out. It baffles me because it seems like such a simple concept. Same with braiding or basic hemp necklaces and such. 
In their defense, that doesn't seem at all obvious. 
 My boss acts like I'm personally offending him whenever I tell him I can't stay late. A lot of times he'll just say "I need you to stay an hour or two late today" as if it's a statement and not a question, and then he gets very upset when I tell him I can't. It's getting to the point where I'm just going to tell him that I'm not going to stay past my scheduled time anymore, and if they really need the extra work from me then they have to start scheduling me more hours. 
This also works for SNL when people watch best-of compilation discs. Of course 80s SNL looks amazing when you take hundreds of hours of footage and keep the best 5%. 
It's weird to imagine a wooded castle. I didn't even know they had those. 
Yeah, sorry, not gonna put my face in an overflowing bowl of poopwater. 
This so much, forget that Hollywood CPR where they gently rub someone's chest in order to not break the actor's ribs. When doing CPR, lean over the patient so you can leverage *all* of your body weight, because you'll need it. For an average, not 200kg of muscle world-class bodybuilder people, there isn't really a way to do CPR "too hard", just put your everything to it. Also, if there's multiple people around, swap out after a few minutes, correctly performed CPR is extremely tiring and you'll want maximum performance on it. And remember, no matter how good or bad you're at it, shitty CPR is better than no CPR. 
I did the same thing trying to remember a rubix cube algorithm. F R U R' U' F'. Fruruf! Or Fururf if you have an L instead of a straight line while getting a cross on the final layer. 
Shhh, don't tell people how to tie a bow tie, it has to look impressive when you do it! 
Singer, Tuba player, and swimmer here... ...Your body will breathe without you doing it manually? 
"In for 8, out for 4" *breathing to metronome* "NOW, breathe in for 12 and out for 16" *wheezing as metronome keeps going* 
In that song, when the bill is about to explain the process for overturning a presidential veto, the kid butts in and says "By that time, it's very unlikely you'll become a law." Shut your cake-hole, motherfucker, and let him talk. I work with a guy who interrupts explanations all the time and I want to punch both him and this kid in the mouth. 
I've had both in the last 6 months and the open palm hitting was more effective I think. Although either way I'm still alive. I need to stop choking on water. 
Allow yourself to accept the thoughts. Observe them, but don't enter them. Look at them objectively, and try your best to dissociate from them. You don't really have to try to suppress them when meditating, just observe them existing separately from you, and then refocus your attention. Once you can accept these thoughts as objective, almost physical things, you can better dissociate them from your identity and get over your fear of being alone with your thoughts. It's helped me tremendously. 
I did it a lot as a kid. It gives you a decent rough estimate for the time. At least after noon. I never tested it before noon. 
If the company is located west of where you live then you'd be fine... 
If it's an auction then the shipping price isn't really included. People are bidding on how much they want to pay for the product, and it's possible to come out at a loss if you don't get many bids and have to pay shipping out of pocket 
That's why I drive with my emergency flashers on. Always signaling, never a douchenozzle. 
Do they have their own system in your country? In ours everyone uses Nato. 
I always say alpha bravo charlie delta and then the delta trips me up so I continue epsilon zeta eta theta iota kappa... I have a problem. 
This is what I was going to ask! We drove past a man who had collapsed and was having a seizure, I took my top off and put it under his head because he was smashing it off concrete. I have no idea if it was the right thing to do or not 
Blue sky orange thigh, blue sky orange thigh... I need to stab an oompaloompa now to make this memory stick. 
When I was like 10 I found my brothers epipen and accidentally stabbed clean through my thumb. Definitely don't do that. 
"Dammit, why are you scrolling through cat pictures while Jake is struggling there?" 
All I can picture is petting an old lady's mustache while she slurs at me. 
Probably the most adult thing I've ever done was becoming giddy after finding the perfect paper towel roll dispenser. Its weighty, makes a satisfying clicking sound, and laughs at my attempts to budge it from it's corner by pulling sheets as fast as I can. I can pull multiple sheets and tear it with one hand my friend and it's beautiful. I might just pull a sheet now just because. 
In hindsight, if it was threaded the same way it would unscrew itself off as you pedaled. 
Do they pay you overtime? Cos if not, it should be a 'FUCK no'. Especially if it's regularly and he's not even asking nicely. 
I've felt the same way as "they don't make them like they used to" because the stuff still being used from the past is obviously going be the best well made 
Yeah but, "Were you listening to me shit?" "You ran the bath, it's not like I needed my ear to the door. What the fuck were you doing?" 
I didn't think it was very realistic in the movie, and as it turns out, it's pretty realistic. 
Anyone who's tied a bow tie will be impressed if you do it right the first time. Tying a bow tie is a pain in the dick. 
Me too! What did you use your 10 extra minutes on? I used mine to worry about random shit that is unlikely to ever happen. 
Now that you have envisioned them as objects reach deep within your incorpreal being and summon your mana reserves. Shape your violent desires into a weapon suitable for the task such as a dagger or a scythe. Whisper the words of eldritch power that call forth the immaterial in this perversion of the divine force of creation. Using your hate wrought weapon wreak vengeance on those that have offended you, offering up their souls as sacrifice to the dark beings that dwell in the space between nightmares. Now breath out. *Namaste* 
Another Lifeguard. Everything he said is exactly what I do. That's assuming active drowning. A passive victim is even harder. They just lay there, sprawled out, at the bottom of the option. 
Always signaling, BUT inaccurately signaling, which makes you a doubledouchenozzle! 
Hams use NATO. Federal uses NATO (military, and DOD) States probably use NATO, except for their police usually. Who usually use the same as the local: Local police usually use Adam Boy Charles police phonetics. Its fucking stupid. If people are all supposed to learn ICS and NIMS, then we should all use NATO phonetics, too. 
What part of this are you not getting? The core concept apparently 
 I've never understood why purposefully upsetting people like that is supposed to be funny. Like "haha I just shaved time off your life and will possibly desensitize you to danger". 
As a civilian, I fully believe military folks speak a different language. Everything is an acronym. 
You were from the parking lot earlier, THATS how I know you! 
And how naive I am to think that a bow tie is designed exclusively for your neck. 
Third lifeguard, don't forget arms straight up. Eventually they give up and just reach up for anything to save them. 
No, he's accurately signalling that he's a road hazard. 
FED here. I deal a lot with state and local. Drives me nuts. They don't seem to notice. When I call out a plate that's FOXTROT ALPHA BRAVO 1234 and they repeat FRANK ADAM BOY I wanna slap em! 
Hey, that seems like the kind of thing they make a kids' fable about 
My mamaw recently passed away after surviving a stroke for almost two years (she died of an unrelated condition). Her recovery process was hard as I'm sure you know, but one thing that helped me was the book "My Stroke of Insight" written by a stroke survivor. The author took 8 years to fully recover, so don't give up on him yet :) and check out that book if you haven't heard of it already, it's really amazing. 
It really is insane how many things the military turns into an acronym for really no reason. I mean ACH sounds cool but helmet works too. 
"No no, I got that but.... Who names their child Aeswy"? 
I was excited to read this string of comments because this is how I do math all the time. My wife always asks how I figure out %'s so fast and I just can't explain it any simpler! 
I don't know, getting sprayed by coolant may not be relatable to a lot of people. Maybe something more universal, like a herder pretending his livestock is being attacked by predators. 
After working in the accounting world, ACH has a very different meaning than helmet. 
Yeah, I'm trying to come up with something that it could plausibly stand for, but I keep coming back to Automated Clearing House. Somehow that doesn't quite seem like very good head protection. 
SMEAC sounds kind of like that gunk that shows up on an unsanitary penis. 
Advanced Combat Helmet There is also ECH (Enhanced Combat Helmet) and LWH (lightweight helmet) The ECH is the best. 
We learned all about SMEAC during bootcamp. Hard to keep clean there. 
I think we should all be thankful of that. Yahoo would waste them if they did 
When you stumble upon a free porn weekend, you grab the first tape you can get your hands on. I can't fault them for that one. 
Foxes in London, they thought they were filthy rodents and got rid of them, then the plague came.... 
I've heard a story and I want it to be true-when Google was first starting up they at one point had a massage therapist on staff and the job didn't pay much, but they paid her in stock. She doesn't work as a massage therapist anymore. 
Reminds me of that guy who now spends every weekend in a Scottish (?) garbage dump looking for the computer he threw away because it has millions of dollars worth of bitcoin on it. 
Ottoman Cannons can't melt Byzantine walls! 1453 was an Inside Job! 
Or when some groups native americans were first given guns for warfare against the british during the french and indian war. They would use the same tactics as with bows. Surround the enemy and fire from the trees. One problem. Bullets go further than arrows and hit your buddies on the other side of the enemy if you miss. 
They actually mainly sold it because they knew the Brits would take it over sooner or later, to them it was just "Lets just earn some quick cash by selling this wasteland rather than having those Brits steal that wasteland from us". 
WWI is just a series of stupid. First, you have "let's run straight at the enemy" and everyone died. Then, you have "let's run straight at the enemy behind a very slow curtain of artillery barrage." And everyone still died. Finally someone says "let's not just run straight at the enemy" and some people actually survive. Although a lot still died. 
To be fair, Netflix was losing money hand over fist at the time. This was when they were still just a DVD-by-mail operation. 
From Germany's view they didn't really have a choice, their confrontation with the USSR was viewed as inevitable by both sides and Britain's stubbornness was costing them money, men and morale, had they continued to focus on the western front they may have been too weak to stop the USSR from sweeping across Europe. It's easy to be wise in hindsight, but at the time of Barbarossa the German army was assumed to be the strongest in the world, and quick success against the last remaining power in Europe would probably have been the only thing to bring the British to the negotiating table. 
Strategically, it was a blunder of unmanageable proportions. The Japanese had no follow up plans, no occupation force, no "next step" in place. It was literally like kicking a hornets nest and hoping that the hornets would give up. The Japanese military was actually in a prime position to launch a brutal first strike against the U.S. and maintain a savage advance on U.S. territory that would've kept us on our heels until 1944 at least. But the strategy was one of "one good punch and then defend". They should've pushed to take the Hawaiian islands, instead the focused on the Phillipines. Tactically speaking, it was a genius strike. Literally crippling the USN in the Pacific in one afternoon. Had it not been for a stroke of fortune that the U.S. carriers were out to sea, the Japanese might have taken Alaska and Hawaii. 
the Ottomans were kind of on the way out at that point anyways 
Psychological warfare. If we're already dead then the enemy can't kill us! 
I wonder if anyone's last words were ever "Go ahead, shoot me. You don't have the guts." 
At least he realized there was a problem, somehow an author has more combat expertise than a general. 
Not as far as I am aware, no. We'll never really know whether or not they had their own concerns, but my understanding is that that sort of decision is not usually discussed with the crew. 
All these "Then-big Company refused to buy then-small-but-now-huge Company for peanuts, now the Then-big Company is extinct" posts don't take into account the likelihood of the acquiring firm squeezing all the innovation and value of the acquired one. 
The ops username might explain why this never occurred to him. 
The later moon missions taped over the earlier missions. 
And it's been circulating around killing people ever since.... Just like Pooty Tang 
Can I ask for further elaboration on whether you feel that is it the a Republic inherently can't withstand growth, or the Roman Republic didn't adjust to handle it? 
Bears in Liverpool. They thought bears were rude so they wiped them all out. 
Yeah. Jews didn't see the cats as evil, but as the helpful pets they are and weren't affected as badly by the plague. This made Christians hate Jews even more. 
Probably a bit of both. They ate far more grain-eating insects than they ate grain themselves 
I wonder how China would look like right now if they still technologically improved over the years but with all those needless deaths avoided.. 
And when wintertime rolls around, the gorillas would've simply froze to death. 
They did not fuck around. 110% either you are with me or against me mentality. 
This is pretty much matched by the Israelites in the book of Judges, they get big for their britches, get shat on, then someone comes and bails their asses out. Rinse and repeat. 
Facebook made a similar deal with the guy who painted their first office. 
There was also the fact that the US government was very strict about what could and couldn't be shown on film (imagine the stink that was made about violent video games back in the 1990s, yeah it was like that). Part of the solution was to move the film industry to the other side of the country from Washington and let Uncle Sam deal with it after the films were made. 
I've heard of POW walking home. I can't imagine the strain that puts on a family. 2 sons come home, a third son comes home a few months later, and your last son just never returns, buried in a shallow grave in Pennsylvania. 
Didn't they use that reference in The Indian In The Cupboard? It's been 25 years since I read that book. 
Also, ignoring advice from the engineers who started sweating bullets at the first failsafe. It takes balls to stand up to your superiors, and especially under the soviet system and still they got ignored. 
Well, it wasn't the difference in physical plant, it was that the disaster precipitated because shutting down saftey protocols *and then* doing a stress test is pretty poor practice. As a dumb analogy, if you were to 'stress test' your car by ramming it into a wall, would you disable the airbags and not wear a seatbelt? Seems kind of silly, but that's kind of what happened. 
Pretty much the same story as the Louisiana Purchase. The French couldn't hold it anyways, so they sold it rather than just lose it. 
If you haven't watched the Ken Burns prohibition documentary before I highly recommend it. It is truly fascinating. One interesting point they cover was that the actual Eighteenth Amendment was somewhat vague and banned "intoxicating liquors" without a set definition of what that meant. Many people thought it would just ban things like whiskey or vodka but not affect beer and wine. There was less opposition to the amendment because of this. Then along comes the Volstead Act which was the law passed to actually enforce the 18th Amendment and it defined anything over .5% as an intoxicating liquor. Because the Volstead Act was a regular law and not an amendment, it was much easier to pass and there went beer and wine too. Had people known from the start that all forms of alcohol would become illegal, the amendment itself may not have passed. 
I've always heard from my grandmother that her daddy, who was a bootlegger, said the day prohibition ended was the worst day of his life. 
In his podcast on the series, Dan Carlin makes the not unreasonable point that it's only stupid in hindsight. At the time there were simply no tactics capable of winning such a modern, industrialised war as no-one had ever fought one. No one could even fully conceive of the slaughter they were about to encounter. The tactics employed were the best they could come up with because - with the technology available to both sides and the disposition of forces (plus the sheer scale of men involved) - there just wasn't a way to avoid mass casualties. 
Belgium was at best a convenient casus belli for the British but I doubt that the UK would have let German hemogeny on the continent happen. That goes against their entire foreign policy. Once Germany united in 1871 a big war around the restructuring of Europe was inevitable. That restructuring process lasts until today. 
I think it was over ten years old when Amazon first posted profits. Who would have thunk that *first* focusing on how to provide a useful service to customers and *second* only how to amass money would be a sound business strategy? 
I heard an interview with him before Netflix really started pushing streaming.He told the interviewer "You"ll notice our name is not deliver dvds by mail." 
Why do you think this is a more likely outcome than a similar service emerging just with a different name? 
They also, along with many others, thought the Soviet Union would quickly fold. We have to remember that Russia got its ass kicked in World War I and bowed out early, and then the Soviet Union struggled to fight Finland in the Winter War. Hitler could be excused for thinking that the Soviet Union was not the juggernaut it turned out to be. 
IIRC Kmart bought Sears and mostly for the land/building that Sears owned. The idea was to sell some locations, rebrand with the new capital, and kill off the Kmart name. But then the great session hit and all of those stores and land lost value and also increased Kmart expenses. It's been a slow painful death for them. 
The version I heard from my brother growing up was about the same. Except in the version I was told pirates intercepted their ship and then captured them and sold them into slavery. 
The children of Israel were actually led by Tommy Pickles asking Pharoah to let his babies go. 
Germany loses the war *makes them pay* Germany then made everyone else pay Bad mistakes are bad. 
So can Fox re-release the original version in theaters just to say "Your move Mouse" ? 
Nonetheless, they probably made a great deal of profit by producing the film. 
Sort of, but it's unnecessarily harsh to Lucas. Lucas actually does have a fairly realistic knowledge of his own strengths and weaknesses as a director and writer, and when he set out to make Episode 1, he went looking for people to help shore him up - he wanted Lawrence Kasdan to write the script and Spielberg to direct, for example. Only, the 90s were the height of what I call "the Cult of Lucas's Original Vision", and the people Lucas went to for help turned him down, because they thought *he* would do it better. 
Stalingrad turned the tide of ww2. Germany never had a major victory after that, IIRC. At least on the Eastern Front. 
I once sold a beta Black Lotus for $20. But in my defense, all of my friends said, "Holy Shit, you got $20 for a single magic card?" Ah, the early days. 
Used to work on his (company's) computers when I was at a Mac repair shop in Berkeley back in the mid-90s. Can confirm. No sense of humor. 
after being up 28-3, the Falcons ran a total of 5 rushing plays the remainder of the game. that was some of the worst coaching and playcalling i have ever seen. 
Dont pick the prickly pear with a paw, when you pick a pear, try to use the claw... 
Exactly. Who's to say Google would have still become the corporate giant it is today if Yahoo had bought it? The chances are that buying it *at the time* would have been a bad idea, which is why they didn't do it. 
Yahoo killing off facebook would have been a good thing, though. 
That is the dorkiest name I have ever seen on Reddit 
Elephants in Manchester, they though they were wrinkly brutes so they purged them off. 
Bugs are a fantastic source of protein. The chickens I care for fight over bugs when they see them, but grain? Eh. That's just normal food for them. 
Who founded the modern Chinese state so he's kind of like a George Washington figure. 
Mao killed and discredited intellectuals as they could be a challenge to his power. Makes you wonder if China could be more advanced if he left them alone 
It's because he was the first leader of the Communist Party and is, de facto, THE revolutionary leader of the People's Republic. It would be hard for the Party to denounce their father, although in recent years they've really cut down on his cult of personality. I feel like pretty much everyone who matters in the Chinese leadership knows he was a nutjob, but they can't publicly renounce him without calling into question the authority of the Party. 
It's things like this that make Genghis Khan kind of a romanticized figure. He was brutal and terrible, but he had his moments where he seemed like an OK ruler. Like, he gave them several chances to make peace in this story. When they responded with violence, he just went bat-shit crazy and killed them all. 
Makes you kinda wonder how many backs are getting massaged and walls getting painted and paid for with useless stock options in Silicon Valley... 
A lot of the denial is a direct result of the botched trials of war criminals at the end of the war which included the imperial family being exonorated. It's just my opinion but I think this led to an attitude of 'There's no need to apologise' which over decades has created a 'There was no need to apologise because we did nothing wrong' mentality. 
This is, in large part, how the Challenger disaster in the US went down, as well. LISTEN TO YOUR ENGINEERS. 
No, give me one sec. Okay, I just shut down the coolan-- 
One **huge** difference in the physical plant was that the reaction had a positive feedback loop upon operating water evaporating. Even Russia had stopped designing plants with such positive feedback loops years before the accident, and they weren't known to care too much about super safe nuclear design back then. If the same bad test had been carried out in another reactor, not the graphite reactors of chernobyl, you could *possibly* still achieve bad meltdown, but not the now infamous *explosive* one. The last nail in the coffin was that the design of the control rods (meant to slow the reaction) actually *accelerated* the reaction as they were inserted. That was the straw that broke the reactor's back. 
That's actually not entirely true. Per Kissinger's book "Diplomacy", Napolean argued that "This accession of territory affirms forever the power of the United States, and I have just given England a maritime rival that sooner or later will lay low her pride" 
When I was growing up, my dad always told me stories about being a kid in his mom's bar. He helped pull bottles up from the cellar, clean glasses, etc. I got to see the house he grew up in when I was ten - it was a two-story place on a crossroads in upstate New York. He told me the bar was in the back of the ground floor. In one of those cognitive dissonance moments, I didn't realize until after he died that Prohibition didn't end until he was 11, and his stories weren't "when I was a teenager" stories - they were "when I was a kid" stories. Which makes me fairly certain my grandparents ran a speakeasy. (Then we get into things like the two Italian thugs who just showed up on our doorstep in Florida one night, stayed the night, then left and we never heard from them again, or that my dad went through jump school the same time Henry Hill was there...) 
1980 was 37 years ago Not to take away from your point, I just feel old. 
The main problem with WW1 is that the means of armored transit hadn't improved but the means of killing people had vastly quickened. 
Do you think the heads of Sears looked at Amazon back in the day and thought "Fools! No one will order things online. This internet is just a fad." Sears had the potential to be Amazon first. They had the Sears catalog - a catalog nearly every house knew about, if not owned. There's more for your life at Sears. I don't know the particulars of how Sears went into the toilet but they could have been huge online. 
It very well could have, I just think that those in charge of Netflix understand their medium and their audience, I don't think blockbusters (or many other similar setups) have that understanding. 
What he was correct though was his six months idea. He told Japanese High Command that if he could destroy the US Pacific Navy, battleships and aircraft carriers, they would strike a knockout blow. Anything short of that knockout blow would give Japan six months where they could do whatever the heck they wanted in the Pacific before the US would start to reverse the tide. 3 days shy of the six month window that Yamamoto gave the Japanese the Japanese and US aircraft carrier met at the Battle of Midway which was a resounding US victory with the destruction of 4 Japanese carriers and the loss of only one of their own 
It was more then just the recession that hurt them. With the rise of online selling, malls all across America are slowly dying out with a decent number already having gone under. Most Sears locations are connected to malls so with the decline in malls the value for the land that Sears owns declined as well as the number of profitable stores declined. When you then add in the recession and more competition from online retailers and it's now obvious that Sears is only fighting a inevitable death. Also hindsight now makes Kmart's decision look bad because we see what has changed. For example back when Kmart bought out Sears, Amazon was still primarily a book store and not the threat they are today. 
And somehow that lead to my birth and I have student loans to pay. 
Han shooting first? It would be like printing money. 
Man, people shit on George Lucas so much. It almost hurts watching some of the videos where he's basically admitting that no one liked the prequels. I mean, I still think the first two were pretty bad, but damn, it's just a sucky situation. 
I'm convinced Belichick has figured out how to secretly brainwash people remotely. There are dumb coaching calls, but multiple occasions where teams made the exact worst possible calls? 
I was 11 and watching it with my 5th grade teacher alone in a classroom, while I served recess detention. She had been excitedly telling me about the launch and her friend that was to be the first civilian and a fellow teacher in space. We watched the launch, then as the shuttle gained altitude, we watched it break apart. Her joy turned to disbelief then to despair and a moment later she was sobbing. We hugged each other and cried until the rest of the class was returning, competing oblivious. An announcement was made about the loss, but I don't think anyone else in the class really thought much about it. She was the first teacher that I ever saw as a person and the only one to this day who's name I can remember. Here's to you Mrs. Smith. . 
"And in the Red corner: The Sultan of Self-Control! The Titillator with Testosterooooooone! He will make you be his friend because he can't play with himself; Brrrrrrrrrroooooly - NoFap - Rinnegaaaaaaaaaaaaan!" 
Sheep in Wales. They thought they were cute so they fucked them to near death. 
And they do say mistakes were made, so they are aware. 
Oh, that makes more sense. I assumed, like, the constant barrage of sound wreaked havoc on their internal structures (sparrows are small with hollow bones) or something. 
I think absolutely. Despots have a habit of killing and suppressing intellects - which is a problem, because intellects lead to things like astronomical theory, navigation, and critical thought. Whenever such a large amount of people die, you absolutely cannot discredit the possibility that one of those people would have had a revolutionary idea. China was incredibly underdeveloped industrially and educationally but with numbers that large, you cannot discount simple human phenoms. Maybe one would have escape and sought education elsewhere, maybe there would have been a shift in direction for the revolution. We just can't know. 
Wasn't it Genghis who was somewhat decent to the people he conquered after the fact? He would brutally conquer them, but treat them fairly once they were under his rule? I might be mis-remembering things... 
It wasn't everyone, it was just his father. And Temijun (Genghis Khan's childhood name) was denied leadership of his father's clan because he was too young, and the clan abandoned his family. Temijun wasn't the oldest of his father's sons either, and actually killed his older half brother (with the help of another one of his brothers), who was pushing to lead their family and marry Temijun's mother (the half brother was from another woman). Temijun earned leadership by his exploits, and by support from his wife's clan (a marriage which is father arranged before his death). His rise is fascinating, and really doesn't need embellishment with things like "His whole family was annihilated!" It just isn't true. His father was killed and his family was abandoned. 
"Sun Tzu said that, and I say he knows a little more about fighting than you do, pal, because he invented it!" 
That's what happened at Three Mile Island. The coolant pumps (and emergency coolant pumps) were shut down or drained by the controllers (presumably because they misunderstood the console gauges or controls) leading to the meltdown. In fact I'm pretty sure most of the major nuclear plant disasters in history are due to loss of coolant in one form or another. 
I love how we still call the French our oldest ally, when they were less allies and more, the enemies of our enemies. Almost everything they did for the US in the begining was out of spite for Britain. 
I personally think one of the main problems with WWI was that radio was still in its infancy, so rapid mass communication and coordination was extraordinarily difficult and forestalled effective troop movements so the whole thing stalled out into the trenches. Well, for the Western front, anyway. The rest of the war was a lot more mobile. 
They had a horrible CEO who thought that he could increase productivity by breaking the company into a bunch of different teams and then pitting them against each other. Competition being a great motivator and all that. Except instead of each team putting 110%, they just resorted to sabotaging the other teams in order to survive. 
The idea of an industrial revolution in the US was somewhat lost to them as well, that we had millions of citizens with the manufacturing skills and that we had the factories already there to switch to wartime production literally overnight. They knew we had the resources and size that they never had a chance to actually invade the US, but just didn't think we could "flip the switch" like we did and convert everything towards one effort. Their idea was that with the pacific fleet knocked out, it would take years to even rebuild that, and then much more time to build up the additional military strength needed to begin retaking the pacific. 
Ken Follett has a great comment on this the illustrates why the Japanese didn't stand a chance in a prolonged war: "After the Battle of Midway it was clear that the Pacific war would be won by planes launched from ships. Both Japan and the United States began crash programmes to build aircraft carriers as fast as possible. During 1943 and 1944, Japan produced seven of these huge, costly vessels. In the same period, the United States produced ninety." 
Go back in time and stop WW1 from happening and everyone wins, or kill Hitler. 
Yeah, I feel bad considering he's such a nice guy otherwise, and also a generous philanthropist. The amount of money he's donated to film schools is insane. And then he *gave up his life's work* (Lucasfilm) *to other people* He just likes movies and wants young people joining the industry to have a chance like he did. It's kinda sad when people like John Lennon or Steve Jobs are praised because of their quality work, when they were complete assholes. While Lucas, for all his faults, is a totally stand up guy. 
I think you're right. Coaches facing him always seem to have a mentality that if they try some wacky strategy they can beat him. It usually ends up fucking them in an embarrassing fashion. 
You same tomato, I say another Central Asian nomad invasion. 
"Mao was 70% right" is/was the party line for a long time. 
One billion people =1000 people who are literally one in a million. 
I think it was that if they joined him, they were good to go. He realized having people like you and join your ranks was more power than subjugating them or destroying them. 
"And thats why whenever there are a bunch of animals together in one place, its called a ZOO!" 
You can thank her indeed, you wouldn't even be born otherwise. 
And fuck Asa Akira because she's really good at it 
Probably not that lucky, they don't really degrade much on their own 
*Walks within proximity of the door of the room with elephant's foot* *Stage dead cancer* 
The two most powerful forces in history are England, and hate towards England. 
And it took until the Germans in WW2 to really use radio properly, enabling blitzkrieg. Even the French in WW2 weren't properly using radio yet. 
Competition is great when it's your company vs. another. It tends to backfire when the guy you want to beat is on the same team. What they confuse is a friendly rivalry - which is usually great - with internal competition - which is fucking awful. 
This is true. So many people today fail to understand how much of a self sustaining entity we were before consumerism. Society pre WW2 was very self sustaining. Many raised small crops and animals. These people traded with their neighbors for necessities and stores really were general stores. When rations were instituted it really only impacted large cities and rural areas pitched in to help support the movement. Manufacturing was largely appliances, vehicles, etc. That's why these facilities adapted so well to retooling for wartime. Today's society would struggle with such a change. 
Nah, I'll probably just grab a pizza for lunch or something. 
Yeah, you really couldn't have known. I mean, there are so many cards worth 20 dollars today they will be worth pennies in the future. And that's with the knowledge Magic will even still be popular. So I wouldn't be upset. Actually I would. But you made the right choice. 
I'm definitely whooshing here, why were Jews only allowed to bathe in Poland? 
Fun times. I was in England for holliday. And saw this museum about vikings in England. And somwere I could read a paper saying an english man was acusing vikings for taking the womanfolk. Because they takes bath and takes care of tehre beards. Thats unfair competition... 
When you have a dozen chickens following you from your car at night because you forgot to feed them breakfast, you don't need a cassowary to be afraid of birds. 
I was told once that he put the newly conquered people on the front lines for the next battle, almost ensuring their deaths. Is that true? 
The Elephant's Foot doesn't leave you alive long enough to get cancer. You need functioning cells to have cancer. 
I've lived in FL since I was too young to remember anything else. I've just accepted that I'll never understand anything that happens here and it's made me a much more relaxed person overall. "Dude eats guy's face off!" Damn, that sucks, and why I carry a firearm. "Dude cheats on wife of ten years with his neighbors horse" gross, but not my business. 
If they had radio, the Germans may not have turned before they reached Paris. Very different war at that point. Of course the French may have been more prepared for them coming too, but with intact telegraph wires, the advance was sent ahead of the Germans, so I'm not sure it would have been as much of an impact there. 
Internal competition: "The Midwest regional manager called and wants to find out how your region improved sales so much." "Nah." 
Go back in time to kill Gavrilo Princip. Dress exactly like him since you don't know fashions of the day. Watch him die from taking a cyanide capsule after the failed bomb assassination on the royal motorcade. Start to panic as you realize without Franz Ferdinand dying, your existence is in question. Go clear your head and get a sandwich. See the archduke's car take a wrong turn in front of the shop as you walk out... 
Han going to Luke's house to massacre his Aunt and Uncle, forcing Luke to pay him to get to Alderaan. Han is a evil, calculating son of a bitch. 
"I love you" *Han opens his mouth and mercilessly blows Leia's face off with a blaster shot* 
The baseball card industry should be a cautionary tale. As long as MTG has a strong player base, I would expect the old cards to continue to carry their value. But if a better card game comes in a swoops that market of players, it'll fold like a house of cards. 
Ohh gotcha, so it's technically "*Rare*" but practically "*really fucking rare*" 
it's public baths. not private home baths that most people might assume. 
I believe he married his kin into families and then made their men the front line commanders. If they died he got their inheritance and if they lived he got a loyal general 
Great point. Some peoples even believed the statues they had of their god to literally be the god. This lead to the practice of a conqueror removing the statues after defeating a people and *holding their god ransom under threat of destruction.* 
Legitimately incomprehensible levels of radioactivity in that thing; iirc, the first photos and/or cameras taking photos of that thing were destroyed by the radiation. Since that sentence begs the question, (again, iirc) the iconic photo of the Foot was taken by a camera at the far end of a hallway, looking at a mirror at the other end, which was "pointed at" the Foot. 
And afterward Han desecrating ~~Aunt Baru's~~ Uncle Owen's smouldering corpse in the worst way because he's also a depraved pervert. 
He was quite clear about his feelings regarding sand and all things related to sand, sand people included. 
The card hasnt been printed for 20 years, came from a small print set, and is the most probably the most powerful card in the game. Beta (the set) also holds a lot of nostalgia for many people. There are not many Alpha/Beta lotuses out there, so it makes a lot lf sense they are so expensive. 
Yeah the pictures of it have some pretty gnarly artifacts from the radiation. 
I always imagine the nazis that melt in Raiders Of The Lost Ark 
Taking a swig of blue milk as he walks away, tossing the glass aside. 
(decades later, Darth Vader, standing on the dunes of Tatooine, beholding the vista of a twin-sunrise. Looking for damn droids. He twists a knob on his belt, cranking the AC up to full-blast. . . . "I specifically requested the opposite of this.") 
Honestly, Poland is an incredibly strange and beautiful country. Genuinely unique from its influences, whether they be Western, Soviet, old school Christian, Jewish, Germanic or even that bit of Nordic. The country oozes history. I remember all of my visits there incredibly fondly. 
I read the wiki article on the disaster. Apparently the massive release of CO2 caused the "normally blue waters of the lake to turn red." If that isn't a detail straight out of a horror movie. 
There's a nova special I think about this on netflix. The look on the woman who runs the Richard III society when they discover the spinal deformity was priceless. 
Related to this is the manner in which these seafaring people navigated across the Pacific. For a long time it was assumed Micronesia was colonized by people accidentaly washing up on the islands after getting lost on the ocean. Only quite recently however it was realized this was done by deadreckoning navigation called wayfinding. Wayfinders could remember up to 200 islands and could 'sense' an island beyond the horizon by noticing cloud patterns and changes in the ocean current. 
On a slightly relevant notion: The Tuskegee experiments. 
I'm just waiting on the news of a living comunnity of giant ground sloths in the Amazons. 
Creutzfeldt-Jakob* But yeah, that's a pretty wild idea that there are pathogenic misfolded proteins (not even viruses, even simpler than them) to begin with. Even more unbelievable is that they can persist on sterilized surgical instruments and can't even be destroyed by an autoclave, a device that heats pressurized steam up to almost 300 degrees. No bacterium could possibly survive that, but prions somehow can, and can still infect new hosts afterward. That's scary shit. Also, thanks for the book recommendation. This is a topic that interests me a lot, so I might track it down and read it. 
Sounds like something a time traveler would have to say to convince ancient Mongolians to boil their damn water. 
I've been to the L'Anse aux Meadows historic site. It's good fun! They have actors there portraying what life would have been like then. You can get involved and make food with the 'chief' (king?) viking. He reminded me of Robert Baratheon. Or make rope and crafts with the ladies. They have a big mock viking ship as well! I have family up that way and my great uncle looks just like a damn viking so I always believed the tales. 
There's an old saying of "when a mule foals" which was a Roman(?) equivalent of "when Pigs fly". Mules can foal; it's just super rare. 
And the rivers of Mercury have been found, or at least an area that is completely flooded with Mercury and I think a bit of the layout is still recognizable 
in Japan it's known as the Orphan Wave. hit them also but had no earthquake 
This reminds me of a story I heard about the duck-billed platypus. When the first stuffed specimen was brought back to the west, nobody believed it was a real animal, just different animal parts stitched together. 
I actually rather liked the 'Cropsey' documentary, it has been a while but I remember that it wasn't super sensationalized and was more trying to go for a 'myths are sometimes made up of multiple truths' type angle. 
I commented on a higher comment about this. I've read that there was a roaring trade in fake taxidermy pandas made from black bears and polar bears so it makes sense that with so many fakes around people would just assume they don't really exist at all. 
I seem to recall there was a while that the Greeks considered them to be an advanced civilization that spoke and had buildings. 
Big Tobacco also owns some of the mainstream popular vape brands and some other smoking cessation products. They sell you the problem *and* the solution. Win win, job done. Think of them as Big Nicotine rather than Big Tobacco. Incidentally, many commercial vape products in the UK now carry smoking-style "health warnings" telling you how addictive nicotine is, don't use this product unless you're actually a smoker trying to quit etc. 
I guess that explains why the "history of Japan" video I watched said the Mongols died because of a typhoon twice while trying to attack the Japanese. 
Even better, the Simpson's joked way back in the 90s that the MLB was spying on us. Then it turned out an NBA phone app was in deed spying on people. 
I think there was a short series on Netflix about the investigation into Jimmy Saville. What struck me the most was the interviews with the women, in middle age, where they are describing the things that happened. But they pause and their eyes move like they are remembering other things, pr the light bulb goes off and they realize or finally have the realization that they were sexually abused, and it wasn't just them, their friends too. Its unsettling. 
Oftentimes a live specimen or intact corpse was required, as is the case with gorillas. 
If a bigfoot believer started rambling to me about, "but the zebra donkeys!" I would just assume he was crazy. 
Found in an African fish market completely by accident. Funny how it goes, sometimes. 
When I went to Xi An I met the farmer and actually got his autograph. Hes living big now, never had to farm again. 
Cyclops were made up after seeing a skull of an elephant. 
I can see where the lake turning red and up and murdering everyone nearby could be interpreted as an evil spirit. That's pretty much the definition of spooky bullshit you shouldn't fuck with. 
She was brilliant. I think it destroyed her world view somewhat 
A great book on Micronesian navigation is called "East Is A Big Bird", by Gladwin. There are some more recent books, but IMO this is by far the best. 
Farms with live stock will sometimes have giant pits (area of a football field, 50 ft deep) where they dispose of carcasses with some lime to slow decay and help with the smell. Naturally, these fill up with muddy water from rain fall creating a death swamp. In middle and high school, I got to see a couple different ones for cows and pigs while spending time with some friends. It's not quite what they would've found at this bone lake place, but holy shit that's a weird, oddly cool experience. 
But if you get near them they produce this horrible smelling, paralyzing gas. They also serve to protect the culture and history of one of the Amazon tribes. 
The prions don't "survive" so to speak. The aren't alive in the first place. It's like snake venom that once in your body hits the brain and turns it into more snake venom. A dead knife floating around your brain turning every protein in your brain to another knife until there's just the snake venom and knives floating around. A lot of doctors won't even operating prion diseased people because sterilization has no effect on non living proteins and the risk of infection of another is ridiculous. Not to mention they can cause any number of symptoms since they just turn your brain into more prions randomly. You could go mad. You could go blind. And it could just literally happen to anyone of us at anytime. All it requires is a protein to misfold in your brain. And that's fucking it. 
Some time traveler needed to make sure Genghis Kahn succeded 
completely agree, this is the best here. it has it all. History, child murder, rats?!? 
Similarly, pigs *can* fly with proper convincing. It's the landings that are the problem. 
We had it happen at work - a woman dropped a spoon into a mug and it went off. Fortunately she was turning away so wasn't hurt, but I'm really careful now. 
Yeah, the story was that the tomb itself had a scale replica of his kingdom, with rivers of mercury. They found a hill under which they can detect a ton of mercury. They're waiting until technology improves to excavate. 
How effective would booby traps be after all these years? 
They initially sent back taxidermied specimens and they legit thought they were being had. Eventually they sent a live Platypus back to England to say 'SEE!'. To be honest...it is a weird looking animal. Damn cute though :P There's a family that lives in a stream near where I bushwalk and it's nice sitting on rocks watching them (gotta be quiet and still though). 
Best part of that story is they tried to take it apart. I guess the bill is still in a museum somewhere with blade marks on it. 
The people that saw them went on to tell others who replied "psh ok." And eons later Jules Verne wrote 20000 Leagues with the monster that had evolved from that one guy that saw a real one on the beach and his dick friends who didnt believe him. 
To be fair, if I didn't already know gorillas existed, I'd find the very idea of them laughable. Ooh, so there's just giant hairy human-like creatures living in the jungle? Bullshit. 
It was actually like a backwards ghost story, it begins as very sensationalized and talks about paranormal and ghosts then little by little it peels back the actual the connection to real life events. 
Correct, Komodo dragons are the largest living lizards. 
The reason CO2 is deadly in this fashion and Methane is not is that methane has a lower density than the general atmosphere at sea level. CO2's density is higher. A pocket of methane will make some people sick, a few may die. A pocket of CO2 will cover the earth in an invisible blanket of death. 
That must have been before Gorilla City developed their cloaking technology. 
Ironic that the game known for getting you stuck in holes would go on to be buried in one 
He was definitely involved with real children when he high-tailed it out of Britain. I believe he was busted by Thai police. 
Gary glitter made that song they play at hockey games 
Especially if you are a devout catholic, you will pray Pater Noster and Ave Maria so much that the timing is going to be pretty exact. 
Dead end or hole would probably be more code. The "normal" behavior is probably "endlessly draw ground and these background tiles unless told otherwise", since that's the case more commonly than not. When it runs out of map it just loops the "normal' set. 
The koopa counts as being both above and below the screen at the same time (it sort of wraps). So when Mario jumps very high at the end, he actually jumps on the koopa, which gives him the extra height to make it over the top of the flag. 
Basically it was a way of kids socialising, as the game itself contains many games inside, e.g. connect four. And there is the aspect of clothing and accessories, where by purchasing a monthly membership, users got to wear exclusive clothes and items. So while there may not seem like there's much to do, when you're fucking around with your other penguin buddies it was pretty fun for an hour or so. 
I was in the same boat. Like "holy shit forget its size; how did it live so long?!" 
Someone told me about this the other day and I thought they were trying to tell me about the Moa, and had got all their shit wrong. I was positive. But I let it go because fuck it, it sounded so cool. I'm really happy to learn it was true also that I kept my mouth shut. 
Thise fucking eagles. We may not have elephants in far cry 5, but Im willing to bet there will be eagles. 
I think the thing that least surprised me, but surprised everyone else was that they literally tap into AT&T's backbone internet connections and filter all data to their datacenters. Like, where else would they install their own routers and switches? Outside your house? 
MKULTRA definitely does "Oh the government is controlling our minds, okay dude." years later: "Oh fuck the government drugged a shitload of people to try to control their minds" 
Kenny Loggins went in some weird musical directions after *Top Gun*. 
I also find it pretty disgusting. Most Australians are pretty horrified by it now as it was the first 'Trial by Media' in this country...they were judged guilty before a trial even started (just look at how shitty the 'investigation' was). It's a horrendous part of our history and it destroyed that family. It's not something we joke about. 
So ... what else is there fully familiar to one society, that us others don't know about? 
I get the idea and I have read about it but it's a theory. It's a guy from 1914 who saw that the skull looked like that and thought therefore that's how cyclops came into Greek mythology. Thing is, Greek mythology had a tendency of grabbing a human or animal and then changing a handful of things and making a monster. It could be that they were based on a elephants skull or that Blacksmiths at that time wore patches over one eye since the original cycloses were blacksmiths in story also. Either way, they're modern people drawing lines without primary evidence and therefore should be treated with a grain of salt. 
So basically, sometime along the way people became really shit at sex. 
Yeah the Norse named the indigenous people "skraeling" which means something along the lines of "shriekers." The Natives were blowing up giant animal bladders with air and then puncturing them, which let out a terrifying noise that sounded like some unearthly shriek. This was done to harass the Norse, and it worked, the Norse left soon after arriving. 
That's interesting. I live near them and have always heard that they would have to dig huge trenches and line them with small branches to cushion the fall because the redwood is so brittle that it just crumbles when they hit the ground. I wonder if they just didn't do that and the tree fell apart upon felling... It was Prolly a lot of extra work to get them to fall in one piece. 
The trick is to throw them at the ground and miss. 
That's what I meant. Pour water, stick in toothpick, microwave. 
Visited China and saw the Terra Cotta Warriors. Allegedly, the myth is that the emperor is safeguarded by a spirit that when his tomb is breached, a massive catastrophe will envelop the world. 
Have you never visited some mysterious ancient tomb filled with old treasures of long fallen kingdoms? The starter kit usually includes: * Poison darts * Heavy falling stone doorways * Obscure animals that have been breeding in the darkness for eons * Swinging spikes, spiky rocks, sharpened wooden sticks and all that fuzz If you go deluxe, you can usually get at least one Monumental Trap for free - usually that kind that you step onto and the whole chamber including you gets burried by 1800 tons of sand. 
I mean... it is currently protecting him from grave robbers/scientists so the Mercury rivers worked 
In the Middle Ages, the europeans thought that a Prester John christian kingdom existed in Africa but ascribed it a mythical status. Eventually, contacts with Ethiopia were established. 
Did you know that the two big universities in Oregon have mascots of Ducks and Beavers and play for the Platypus Trophy? 
"Dude, I just saw the most fucked up thing. It was this weird furry thing with a duckbill." "... You mean a duck?" "No, man, it had fur and walked on all fours! And it had a beaver tail! It scratched Frank and now he's fucking dead!" "God damn it, I'm so sick of your shit! You got my with the plate-sized spider that ate a bird, but now I know you're just fucking with me." 
"Where is this province of Googai and are the libraries there as impressive as in Alexandria?" 
Ironic. The game could not safe others from being stuck in a hole and also could not save itself. 
Dunno about thai, but at least vietnamese police. 
He also did "Do You Wanna Touch Me?" which is about a billion times creepier now that the truth is out. 
He was a household name, a huge charity fundraiser and could basically do no wrong as far as the general public were concerned. Rolf Harris was the British Bob Ross, he had kids tv shows painting shit. Well, he was Australian but still... 
I was at a mall last Tuesday and a girl waved at me but then stopped when she realized she didn't know me. Even the bedeviled land routes are no longer safe, me hearty. 
iirc when it originally surfaced, the swearing was bleeped out 
The version they played at conventions (before Adult Swim publicly released it) wasn't censored, though. 
What's disturbing is that there's nothing to say the program didn't continue. Secret projects that had unexpectedly good results were typically "cancelled" and went black. The stealth program started as a competition to develop a reduced radar cross section fighter. Lockheed's prototype was invisible on the test stand and the program was immediately "cancelled". 
Dammit, I couldn't find it, there was this story on TIL a few years back about some group of researchers who were looking for new species. They mentioned casually some extinct species of (I think) frog to some locals who were all "Oh, no. They're not gone. Go check such and such cave." and there they were. Locals had no idea western science declared their frogs dead. 
Keep in mind, it's a guy from 1914 who came up with this theory without any connective evidence. Based off of a pre-historic skull that took an archaeology dig to find and he saw the obvious appearance and made the conclusion without primary evidence connecting the two things. So it requires that a pr/ possibly-bronze age society find the skull of an animal from the pleistocene era from 10,000 to a few million years old and identify it as a head of a biped which means the rest of the body can't be found either. or A human, one of the most creative beings on the face of the Earth who universally love telling stories of things that are completely made up. Made up a large guy with 1 eye, one of the most simple monsters in Greek mythology. Both are possible, there is no evidence either way and there may be a third option but I would bet on the second over the first. 
People who excavated outhouses... Literal shit miners 
I love when shows like Ancient Aliens say, "This is far too complex for ancient humans to have figured out on their own." When someone brings that up, I tell them to go sit in an empty park for 12 hours straight and see what sort of clever shit their mind starts working up. Stories and connections and opinions and innovations. Now imagine every day for the rest of your life is going to be like that. Now multiply by millions of humans over thousands of years. And you're telling me there's no way they could figure out how to stack some rocks on top of each other? 
Yeah, it is not that they are fragile or brittle. They are very similar to cedar. However, you are talking a very massive tree with a huge amount of mass. Even falling small trees (like 3ft in diameter) you will feel a shockwave from the ground for a decent distance. Now imagine one that is 10-20ft in diameter that literally has about 100 times the mass. 
How could you forget the rolling boulder trap? Or is that included in the deluxe package? 
Originally Prester John's kingdom was thought to be in Asia, and many Europeans seem to have equated the Mongol rulers with Prester John before they knew much about them (i.e. that they weren't Christian). Prester John only became African once the Portuguese encountered Ethiopians after they established a presence in the Indian Ocean, and decided that must be Prester John's kingdom. Ethiopia didn't fit the legend of Prester John; rather, the legend was changed to fit Ethiopia. 
The stories of people who have been stung are horrifying. It's a pain toxin which directly activates your nerves, you need to do a nerve block to reduce the site of pain, normal medication won't do anything. 
Its *two* chief elements are fear and surprise. And vigorous shaking. 
Yeah IMO it's not a "giant squid" until it can bring down a Spanish galleon. 
And they lay eggs too, nature was fuckin drunk that day. 
I've always assumed Big Foot was just a neanderthal and people that would have seen that would think it's some giant hairy man 
Rolf Harris was a champion swimmer also before becoming an entertainer. Definitely a famous person for many reasons, alas, a big paedo too it turns out. 
Really? Interesting, odd that they would censor it for adult swim 
This is why I don't believe in the Area 51 alien crap. Many of the Lockheed skunk works projects were developed and tested there far away from most prying eyes, umongst many other unknown projects. The conspiracy I believe is the alien conspiracy was started by local people not knowing what something was, and the government had people perpetuate those rumours to try to make the alien people look crazy and keep other people away. I think it backfired and actually brought more attention to the area. Those "cancelled" projects weren't truly cancelled, they were just cancelled from being out in the open at facilities that could allow spies to access the research and continued in black research stations such as Area 51. 
Please tell me that were awarded a couple million as settlment and are living happily ever after? 
Because faithfulness to the source material has always been a priority to filmmakers. 
I've never used this phrase before in my life, but that sounds metal as fuck. Just imagine the shockwave from one of those things hitting the ground. 
Rolling boulder was the hipster trap around 4000-3000 BC but now its probably something your grandma would have installed. The latest cool trends are all about serpent pits and lightbeam triggered traps. 
Some mongols were (Nestorian) Christians, including Genghis Khan's wife, so that added to the prester John theory 
Amongst our weapons are such elements as surprise, fear, and vigorous shaking. Also tidal waves. 
A few weeks after this article was published, the scientists behind the research did a really cool AMA. I was curious if an earthquake of the size described would have any effect on the glaciers of Mt. Rainier. They confirmed that it would likely cause massive lahars, which would wipe out dozens of communities and possibly kill tens of thousands, especially in areas that might not be able to be notified because they just went through a major earthquake. The New Yorker article didn't even mention it. The reality will be much worse. 
But from their point of view the Sperm Whales are evil! 
I figured Big Foot was just some dude that decided he didn't want to live in society anymore and moved to the woods. Hides when people are around but is generally just a hairy outdoorsman trying to work out his issues alone in nature. I imagine modern siting are vets with ptsd, great survival skills, and a ghillie suit. 
NANITES, COURTESY OF RAY PALMER. THEY'RE EMITTING A HIGH FREQUENCY PULSE THAT'S DISABLING YOUR SPEED. YOU WON'T BE RUNNING AROUND FOR QUITE A WHILE. 
I haven't seen it, but sometimes the bleep is funnier than the fuck. 
I think that's what most people think. Quite a bit of the hype around Area 51 regards secret technology, not necessarily aliens. There's also a tangible sense that, like you say, both the government and a portion of the enthusiast community uses terms like UFO and "alien technology" ironically. Of course there are always the true believers. Lots of construction work at that base over the last several years. They are certainly still up to lots of "non-existent" nothing. 
No, the loss of their child and subsequent media hounding made the two parents split up. As far as I can see they've both had it rough since the brutal loss of their child that they were accused of murdering. 
Gol-darnit, kids these days with their new-fangled serpent mumbo-jumbo. Back in MY day we had a net under some leaves, and we liked it! 
Yep, they stick their bills in the ground and they can feel the electric currents generated by moving muscles. Also they keep rocks in their mouth to break food. 
Holy shit they lose their baby, go to prison, and STILL have to pay most of their legal fees and get their lives ruined? 
For ten years! That's a real long time. 10 years after losing your child and not going to jail you can move on in some ways. Maybe even have another child. 10 years after losing your child and wrongly imprisoned for it, you are forced to deal with it every day and unable to live a normal life. 
So, they're one of the randomly generated monsters from Spore? Cause all I'm seeing is left over parts being used as filler to make a whole "creature". 
Yeah, obviously the creator of the platypus just wanted to stick the extra parts on to get as many abilities as possible. 
Hah, wouldn't you know it, I just re-watched it Sunday for the first time since childhood. **"ALTIVO!"** So much bubbly nostalgia. 
"I'm sorry, I don't speak German." "Oh, I know a little German. He's sitting over there!" 
"Laura Bishop: Does it concern you that your daughter's just run away from home? Walt Bishop: That's a loaded question." Bill Murray is fantastic in that movie. 
Ralph Fiennes was superb. One of his most likeable characters yet. Hell. Everyone was superb. And it's probably one of the most beautiful films of the past decade. 
"Brooks was here" had me crying like a fucking baby 
I LOVE THIS MOVIE. It makes me wish that directors would stretch Mr Ferrell more often 
The scene when they are drawing in the sand always makes me smile, 
Amelie is one of my all time favorites. I've lost count on how many times I have watched it on relaxing evenings. Such a cute movie. 
Oh god this movie. Right as he is flying towards certain death, saying his last words, clutching that little girls medal she made for him out of cookies....I start crying like there no tomorrow. Such a sweet movie. I almost cried now thinking about it. 
Still too soon for me. That ep hit me HARD. It is the perfect example of why I can't binge on Black Mirror. I can only withstand one or two episodes a day. 
I still can't believe how much heart and emotion they were able to infuse the characters with using just actions and motions. 
Came here for this one. It's great if you've been struggling to let go of some emotion and need something to push you past the tipping point. 
My 3-year old nephew was talking about this movie over the weekend, this was his hot take: "The giant isn't robot, he is a people." Too real, man. 
Completely underrated movie. Makes me cry so much every time. So beautiful in every way. 
Jesus Christ, that movie was equal parts gorgeous and sad. I can't think of a better on screen romance. The actors and story fully convinced you that two people had never loved each other more in the history of mankind, and yet their love was persistently just out of reach. Aronofsky is an insanely talented filmmaker, and makes insanely depressing movies that are impossible to shake off even weeks after seeing them. Now that's a gift. 
Right after; Game of Tones - Futurama. Those 3 episodes put together will be a movie that can make any human being bawl out. 
Or Children Of Men. That movie should come with a couple of pills of Prozac or something. That's said, it is one of the finest pieces of film I have ever seen. The sound is amazing too. 
Yes. Cried real ugly at this one. In the theater. People stared. Miss you, Dad. 
It's crazy how many people I know who haven't seen it or even heard of it. It's definitely in my top 5 movies from my childhood. 
Fuck. I've only cried in three films, and two of them are dog related. But that scene with the dad RUINED me. Great movie. 
You're in for a real treat. Easily my favourite movie of all time. 
My eyes water every time I hear about this movie. It should be used to find out sociopaths. Not crying? You are one. 
I doubt they'll kick up any fuss. Not for an old crook like me. :( 
Along the same line of thought, I would say Secondhand Lions as well. 
Have you ever seen "Everything Must Go" ? He's great in that movie, you really feel his struggle. 
Still the number one scene to put a giant, goofy grin on my face, and a warm fuzzy feeling throughout my body. Almost makes me want to cry just from the sheer emotion of it. The music from that scene was perfect. Another heart warming scene that makes me want to cry is the paper lantern lake scene from Tangled. It doesn't give me a stupid grin though, just the warm lovey dovey fuzzies. 
That one part, you know the one, was done so well. I was genuinely taken aback by it. I remember going into the first one expecting just a kids movie about dragons, which was cool because I love dragons, but I wasn't expecting anything great. It ended up being a 10/10 and one of my favorite animated movies. I went into the second one with extremely high expectations, but even those were not enough. Fantastic two movies. 
Also a kids movie where the main character DOESN'T come out fine. Instead he comes out with something he's going to have to live with and will challenge him for the rest of his life 
And then they threw the scrap book in for round two. 
There was a YouTube video posted awhile ago that someone strapped a collar onto a Golden Retriever and sent him out into a park. Surprise! It was Dug. It was such a cute video. 
Grown ass man. Can confirm, bawled like a child during that scene. 
I had high expectations and, when I finally saw it, they were completely met. And my five year old likes it best out of all Disney movies as well. 
Exactly the opposite for me, I try to binge my emotional wreckage to one concentrated day of rocking back and forth in a ball. 
Also, *"Waaaaaaaalll-eeeeeeee."* Surprisingly emotive for just a sound byte. 
How about the Lego Movie? You know, the light-hearted romp where a guy named President Business goes on a rampage with a doomsday weapon. 
I agree with you that is one of Pixar's greatest. Not only because on how spot-on the future is pictured (polluted and inhabitable earth, robotics and automation, single corporate entity, addiction to technology...) but also on its double lecture for both children and adults. 
"He's sad because he's all alone, and nobody wants him" 
The characters in it are just so real, that's what really makes this movie one of the best for me. Lilo doesn't fully know how to deal with the emotions of her parents dying and big sister being in charge, so she acts out. Nani just isn't ready to be a "mother". She tries her best, and she loves her sister but gets frustrated and yells at times. She just wants to be a normal 20-something. Stitch has to fight with his programming in order to understand real love and affection It's just so perfectly imperfect. So much more real than most Disney characters. 
It makes me cry every time i watch it. And then when his sister comes down and doesn't even say anything just puts her hand on his shoulder. Such a great movie 
Grave of the Fireflies is that one really great movie I would never want to watch again. 
That's beautiful. Fuckin slayed me right now. This whole damn thread is a tear fest. 
"We can duck and cover, there's a shelter nearby-" "No, Mansley. We are going to die. *For our country.*" 
I couldn't get past that Martin Sheen was trying to fly them to England in a Cessna 152. Like I was sobbing to myself while thinking "You're going to end up in a watery grave 300 miles off the coast of Maine" 
Yeah was really a solid movie and I was NOT expecting the way it turned out. however, the scene with TJ miller on ecstacy was A+ comedy 
That ending stuck with me for a week after I saw it. Left me feeling uneasy 
My boy Bing Bong did not deserve that shit. Not at all. 
I was sobbing leaving that movie. It was hilarious, though. All the kids were leaving super pumped, some singing the Bing Bong song, and all the parents were wiping away tears. They nailed the multiple levels thing. 
The part in the end where she hugs her parents and gives out a sigh...I just lose it there. 
There are so many actors I feel that way about, and they all star in at least one film I've really enjoyed. Whether it's typecasting or they just have a very different idea of a good time to what I do it's maddening! 
Is that the one with wolverine meditating under a big tree in a bubble or something? And he has a tattoo for a ring? 
the episode with Yancy--The great Philip j fry or whatever--gets me too tho e: a la u/voidFunction, the episode is named "The Luck of the Fryish". 
The general always freaked me out more than anything else in that movie. I actually had to pause after that scene with the refugees and recover. Don't know what I would have done if I watched it in a theater. 
I'm almost 30 and I'm not exaggerating when I saw I've watched it about a dozen times in the last year alone. Have a bad day? Let's watch Road to El Dorado! Someone hasn't seen it? We have to watch it. Love it! 
Imagine netflix and chilling with some girl and thinking oh this is a romantic comedy, this'll be good, a little bit of this and then 20 minutes in we'll...Dad...I have to call Dad...why am I tearing up in front of a hot girl, why is she crying uncontrollably. This is not how it's supposed to go! Because that's what happened to me. That movie was totally marketed wrong. Such a great film. 
I rarely, if ever cry. But let me tell you, watching this movie on an airplane was a big mistake. I swear the cabin was filled with onions 
No, the sociopath is the one who decided that when they released Grave of the Fireflies it should be part of a double feature with My Neighbor Totoro. Talk about mood whiplash. Oh look, I've just laid my eyes on childlike wonder again and all is right with the world! I wonder what the next movie will be like! *Sniff* I'm going to go cry for a week. 
The scene when he talks about feeding the birds and hoping Jake comes to visit. :( 
My grandfather passed away three weeks before we rented this. My father was a mess, I was a mess; our dog was concerned to say the least. 
I like you. Didn't expect to see Secondhand Lions here. 
Really love this movie. It's heavy, but great. "Black people don't play soccer" "Entire continents of black people play soccer" 
I don't know which part you're referring to, but the reunion scene made me and my SO at the time start crying 
And still he makes the best out of his disability. Good message there too. 
And then the scene with the Ellie badge. And then the final shot of the movie that shows where the house ended up. Lots of tears in that movie for me. 
Pretty positive it was a fully legit version of Dug including the actual voice actor, and it was one of my favorite moments of 2016, competing with that time I proposed. 
That movie did really well at not being formulaic. Like, King Candy seemed like a bad guy, but for awhile it's really unclear what motivated him. 
Everything is awfuuuuul~ Everything is bad when you vote tangerine~ 
I think it's better when they both randomly hear John Goodman's voice in their heads while high on mushrooms rather than it coming from the movie. 
The shame of not knowing how to act normally in public is generally what drives me away from shrooms. 
"Ohaghhna means fammly. Fammly means, nobodee get's left behighnd." 
What's especially nice is the way they *convey* those emotions. Any movie can have a kid who acts out because they can't deal, or an older sibling who is a jerk to said bratty kid because *they* can't deal, but this is one of the few movies where I actually can understand, identify, and sympathize with those behaviors on all sides, instead of rolling my eyes because the characters are so immature and annoying. 
I don't know if I'm completely off with my analysis, but (**warning: spoilers ahead**) what really got to me with Grave of the Fireflies was their determination to survive on their own, take the beating for the better of something undefined. Trying to grab whatever hope or good they could ever muster, be it a taste, sound or a memory to the bitter end without complaints until they just slept away forever. That was just brutal. 
There was at one point an implication (in an earlier draft of the script, I think) that the events depicted in the finished movie are not the first time that Joel and Clem have met, had a relationship, and then erased each other. 
Beautiful phrasing. I'm going through a weird time right now; I think my LTR is ending, and reading this is making me all teary. And Eternal Sunshine has always been one of my favorites, so the fact that it's relevant is...heartbreaking yet wonderful. 
It was such a beautiful ending. I was bawling pretty much the entire end sequence. 
I saw *Inside Out* on release with my sister. She was (and is still) very young. While we were all getting emotional, she was just cheerful and laughing at the stuff she understood. Now, over a year later, I ~~made the mistake of watching~~ watched it again with her and she started to understand some of it and feel empathy and stuff. Seeing her get emotional over it only made me more emotional... D: 
The scene when the personality islands started dying off and crumbling away was what hit me hardest. I still tear up thinking about that scene. It pretty much perfectly describes my current situation. 
I love Ben Stiller in almost everything, but I agree. I cannot *stand* Will Ferrel, but *Elf* is one of my favorite Christmas movies of all time. 
Someone posted Sam's whole speech on Facebook this morning and now I'm bawling. 
That one got me the most. All this time he thought his brother was an asshole, when really his brother loved him and missed him more than anything. 
Guillermo Del Toro fought with the producers over the bottle scene. They thought it was too much but GDT insisted that you need to see the general do something like that to make clear that the stakes are high and the threat is real. 
I watched it when I was a kid not knowing what it was about. Was not ready for that surprise. 
Where he's trying to pack the groceries with his shaky hands. GOOD LORD. 
Mom : Go on! Shout! Scream! Say something! Dad: you're as beautiful as the day I lost you. 
and he overcomes it in a way that is both clever and interesting, makes you want to cheer him on. 
Everything is awfuuuul~ It all sucks dick when your ruler's a meme. 
But the ships computer couldn't be trusted! It would've disregarded their message! 
They should be taken in a safe space, outdoors, somewhere you can really go within yourself, oh and also NOT IN A THEATER SURROUNDED BY CHILDREN. 
I thought that this was implied by the fact that the ~0:10 seconds of footage of them running on the beach at the very end of the movie was looped several times 
Vin diesel fucking crushes me with that line. Also when he saves everyone as Groot. :( 
The message and its execution have real depth and poignancy. I find myself repeating that final line to myself on occasion, when the odds feel stacked against me or when it's hard to do the right thing. 
Oh god I forgot about that scene! Nothing is more real than that my god. The things that used to define me all crumbled away until there was nothing left. I like to think I'm building new ones, but I'll never get the old ones back. 
You're more right than I thought you were after thinking about what your thought was. 
You should watch Stranger Than Fiction. Another Ferrel gem. 
Jesus. I'm just remembering it, and now *I'm* crying. 
"Don't forget to double bag. Last time you didn't and the bag broke." FUCK YOU LADY. HE'S JUST AN OLD MAN 
You need the whole scene building up to it to really drive it in though 
That and everyone on board didn't know any different, and didn't seem to be concerned with heading back to earth. 
It was even worse if I remember correctly. She told the *cashier* in front of him. "Don't forget to tell your man to double-bag. Last time he didn't and the bottom came right out." I could be wrong but I remember that shit making me feel real uneasy. 
When he sees his wife after *twenty years* and realizes in that moment that not only is she alive, but she's been *right there the whole time* and *chose* to stay away because she found something more important... And you think he will be mad, and feel abandoned and betrayed, but all he says is "you're just as beautiful as I remember". And it hits you, that's love in its purest sense. Selfless. 
Initially they were, but since everything they could ever want was already at their fingertips, they stopped caring. 
It's nice to see someone care about something so much. There's nothing in my life that I care about so much. And that's kinda sad. 
I actually work as a cashier, but we don't have baggers. Some people are just really shitty, especially middle aged people. That scene really didn't surprise me 
Yeah I work as one at a fast food place, but there's something extra degrading about talking down about someone to someone else in front of the person like that. Like if you have something to say, say it to me, to my face. 
It's degrading, makes the bagger feel subhuman. I'm guessing that was the intention of the director to reiterate the fact that Brooks already felt that way about himself, being ordered around for 50 years. He gets out and people think so little of him they can't even speak *to* him. 
At the Googleplex in California they have free bikes for the employees. I was amazed how many of those bikes weren't stolen. 
Or when you have a "Free Items" group and people come in and post things like "ISO Flatscreen TV, must be 40 inches or more and work perfectly" or "ISO Michael Kors purse, must be from this season", or only post ISOs and not post anything of their own to give away. Also pisses me off when "new moms" ask for clothes for their infant, all infant supplies under the sun, and clothes for their other 3 kids as well. Are you taking advantage of people's kindness or are you just really bad at money management and planning? 
My aunt put out a nice dresser. Some asshole kids came and just smashed it on the lawn. From then my theory is to just put a $5 sign on it to make people want to steal it. 
"Donations for the needy? Fuck man, I'm in need! *smashes box*" 
the bakery I work at used to give unsold bread to a foodbank but they quit cause they found out foodbank staff started selling the bread in secret. 
they all need a gentle slope away from the carousel, so it isn't comfortable to stand next to it. 
In high school we would have to present our group projects in front of the class. So my goal was to find the most socially awkward people I know,who would hate to stand in front of everyone. So they would not be able to speak in front of everyone. I would make the deal, you guys do it, and I will present it. So I was that guy sorry =( 
We just need Hollywood to push out a reboot. *Surely that will help* 
The key is having a 'theft-proof' bike. I.e. one so shitty that nobody would bother stealing it. 
I actually went on Omegle the other week after remembering it. No lie, it took at least 40-50 chats before I got to a real person. Everything else was "a/s/l, 19 f Michigan here, wanna chat" or variations thereof. Happily though, me and the real person had a lovely chat. 
The panhandling has gotten so bad in my town that the local government put up a billboard basically saying not to give your money to the panhandlers but to give your money to local organizations that aid in helping the homeless i.e our soup kitchens and homeless shelters. 
Some bum tried to take ALL of the pennies at our Indian store and the owner and his wife flipped shit. You don't pull that shit at an Indian store. (They are nice people, I like them.) 
In High School we had this speaker one day who told a story. He said he would put a fake scarecrow on his porch for the weeks leading up to Halloween. Then, on Halloween, he would dress up in the outfit and sit on the porch holding a bowl with a sign "please take one". Anyone who took more than one would get an awful scare when he jumped up and chased them. 
I put in $5 a few months ago so I've got 4 of you assholes covered 
The current system rewards EdD's who have never taught a class (literally, I've seen it) with administrative positions with exorbitant salaries often to do very little except bullshit PR. Over the last 30 years, administrator positions and salaries have ballooned. Regular faculty still get to struggle while fighting to defend students from unscrupulous money grabs from the aforementioned largely useless administrators. And state legislatures exacerbate it *all*. Source: Ten years of working in higher ed. Bitterness level: High Commitment level: Still high cause I'm a sucker 
So true. I do research at a VA hospital. If our study doesn't directly affect veterans or have implications that would save the government money in the long run, they don't want to hear it. 
Probably more like "Then the news started reporting the murders" 
It's not even the right thing to do for the Earth. It's the right thing to do for *us*. If we continue the way we're going we will make our environment uninhabitable for humans. The Earth doesn't give a shit because it's a big dumb rock floating in space. 
I agree with some of the examples, but this metric alone is insufficient to judge a non-profit. Human capital is often one of the highest expenses for a non-profit, so it's not uncommon to see most of the annual budget for small and effective non-profits to go to its staff. Like it or not, non-profit staff need to be fairly compensated for what they do. Yes, I agree the directors shouldn't be making millions, but that's not common if you look at non-profits as a whole. ETA: Non-profits often don't work for a whole host of other reasons (staff and volunteer turnover, loss of grants, inhospitable environments, distorted incentives for board and/or major donors, unsustainable operations). 
"Hey Jerry. We have high resolution video of you stealing one of the google bikes, which also has a tracking chip in it so we know it's in your garage. Also you're fired." 
A couple months ago some lady on facebook was asking if anyone had a free fridge since her's broke. A couple people offered her a free fridge and honestly they looked decent. She refused because they didn't have a ice maker. Dude even offered to cap the line, nope still refused. 
Yea when I give stuff away it's because I have determined that the value of the item is not worth the time and effort to sell it. If the person who takes it believes it's worth the effort to sell then so be it, all the power to them. 
Jeff Foxworthy has a joke about how he put a couch on the curb with a sign that said "free" and it sat there for two weeks. So he changed the sign to say "$200" and it was stolen within 20 minutes. 
"Why did you roll Need on that staff when yours is clearly better?" "I *need* the gold." /drops group 
In highschool I worked at Panera and we would always donate our breads at the end of the day to local food banks and churches. Well my junior year I took a class where I volunteered at one of the food banks, I found out that they hardly give out any of our donations and instead the staff eat it for breakfast 
My pappy is an architect working on the new airport in Istanbul.i just suggested this to him. if you are ever at a baggage carousel in Istanbul and no one is crowding it because there is a slope next to it, you have Jackkeroac81 to thank! 
They are in too much of a rush to go stand next to the baggage carousel 
Presenting is contributing, so I don't see you as 'that guy' at all. I've been the one to do most of the work and the presentation bit isn't any easier than the research bit if you're not a natural public speaker. 
My friend had a shitty ass bike and chained it to a pole for around 15 min. When she came back they hadn't stolen it, they had simply beaten it up and pulled all the wires and shit. The brakes were broken, the wheels were bent, etc. Which reminds me last week my other friend's car got broken into for the second time in 2 months. First time it was a radio, second time a fucking sweater. Some people are just scum. 
I met a little girl on there from South Africa. Explained to her that this was not a good place for talking to strangers. She wants to be a doctor but feels like girls in SA cant do that. I linked her to a list of famous female SA doctors. I hope she stops going to omegle. 
Is Omegle good again? Last I checked it was all either "ASL" and then as soon as they found out I was male they disconnected, or people who said "Hi" and the apparently walked away from their computer. 
About 15 years ago, I used to play Yahoo Pool with randoms over lunch from my office in the Chicago area. I started chatting with one opponent and he said he was from Oklahoma. I said my mom is from there! Where? He was in the same small town that my mom lives in. I asked him if he'd ever heard of my mom's alterations business. He told me his wife had dropped a dress off there that morning. Mind blown. 
I've seen many people try to do that (I work at a gas station) and I always tell them they can't do that. You can use the pennies for your transaction, but you cannot pocket them. Anytime anyone leaves silver coins in there, I pull them out and put them in my till so no one steals them. I inevitability use the change on subsequent transactions, keeping a tally in my head of how much I've used, and then everyone is happy because I didn't make them dig in the seats of their car for sticky pennies. 
Say your total is seven dollars/knuts/whatever. Well shit, all you have is 6.97! But all is not lost! There are five pennies in the tray! It is socially acceptable to take three of them to complete your transaction at this point. And if in the future you happen to have a few pennies included in your change? Pitch 'em in the tray. 
My mom did this. She stuffed an old skeleton costume. When she said "I said only one!" a poor kid pooped in his pants and my mom had to help him clean up inside our house. 
Moved into our first house 2 years ago we were pumped for Halloween and handing out candy. Got a decent sized bowl of candy and were wearing costumes. Nobody showed up. Apparently the 3 blocks North of us were historically "the spot" to go trick-or-treating and we didn't get a single kid at our door. Pretty sad haha my nephew got the entire bowl and he was ecstatic. Now there is only 1 day of the year our porch light is turned off and that is Halloween. 
I remember seeing one of these where it was the parent who took all of the candy. 
Man, that is really shitty. Probably some grandma who thinks diet Shasta is a real treat. My grandma would have thought that. You might laugh about it but why vandalize. I mean, there are plenty of houses that give you nothing! 
I donated $100 to them from my first paycheck after college, as a sort of thank you for all the help they provided me through the years. Cunts haven't stopped emailing me begging for more since. 
I read in a book recently the comparison between Wikipedia and Encarta. And putting the two side by side, Wikipedia sounds like the worst idea for a business. Turns out Encarta closed up shop in 2009 
If you saw someone out on the street taking donations for Wikipedia, it would undoubtedly be an addict scamming people. 
Me: No hobbies and no passion for anything. What do? 
Something similar happened to me. The max was 15, I had 12 items including a "hand" of bananas. It was an Albertson's, and when the bananas were in sale, they sold them by the unit, when they weren't, they were sold by weight. Confusing AF. Apparently they were on sale that one time, so at the end of the transaction it showed on the receipt that there were 16 items, and the snarky bitch told me that next time she wouldn't ring me up if I had more than 15. I didn't say anything because I hadn't seen the receipt and I was confused, but after I realized they counted each banana, I almost went back just to punch her on the throat. 
"We're all in this together" is something I wish more people understood and followed. ESPECIALLY at the GOD DAMN WORK BATHROOM. 
Clearly you haven't driven in north america. People just flat out ignore it, it's super annoying. Germany is driving heaven compared to that. 
I worked in higher ed for 5 years (GO PORTLAND STATE) and we had horrible administrative bloat, some of the worst manager to employee ratios in the state, I believe when I left it was 3.4 employees to 1 administrative member. (The state standard is 15-1) Also good luck getting tenure, or even hired on as a permanent teaching position. Portland State is practically built by adjunct faculty, who can be fired if a student gives them a bad review (For being too hard). My favorite budget meeting I got to attend was "We are actually thinking of enforcing our GPA enrollment requirements for incoming students." I'm in the private sector now, and honestly I miss the hell out of working for Portland State. I loved the people I worked with and the intelligent daily conversation. Even with administration sticking it's head up it's ass, being in that environment is a unique and wonderful experience. 
'What do you mean you want to repeat an experiment to test it's validity?!..... somebody already has the results!!!' 
Actually pretty solid advice, no progress posts, no pics, no inspirational garbage about your lifestyle. Just do it and when you are already pretty far along, then talk about it. Then when the crabs attack you can just sit back and ignore them cause you already know what you are doing is working 
There is also the problem of the person behind you. Had a few times where I *probably* should have stopped but the distance was awkward so I went for it. Meanwhile the guy behind me ran the red and 100% would have rear ended me if I had tried to stop. 
Yeah I was thinking the same thing. Like any other way the world is "more dangerous" these days. It's not more dangerous, you just hear about the danger. Relatively speaking fatal car accidents, murder, rape (especially by strangers), and kidnapping are extremely rare. If it weren't for news reporting that it happens we could all go on living in our own bubbles where we personally know no one who has been the victim of these things. News channels are overzealous in making people think the world is dangerous, but they also provide a service by reminding people that just because you don't personally know someone who has been involved in this it is still going on. 
Statistically you are *significantly* more likely to kill the hitch hiker than they are to kill you. 
With such useful conversions as "an eighth of an ounce is 3.5 grams", or "three ounces is five years". 
I remember when Locks of Love or some similar organization "got in trouble" because people found out they auction off some of the wigs they make. If you're not familiar with the concept, people send in their hair to be made into wigs for cancer patients. The charity tried to explain that yes, the hair is donated, but then the hair has to be sorted, treated, and made into wigs - which is not free - plus there are administration costs. So they auction off some wigs to pay all that because no one really donates money to them. 
Exactly. If I am going to steal a bike, Its not going to be from Google. 
Nope. Used to work at Adobe, and people still stole lunches out of common shared fridges. We had a Girl Scout cookie incident. 
Well, if they value ice more than properly refrigerated produce, nature will eventually solve that problem by removing them from the gene pool. 
"We don't trust the kids, but we'll also make sure their shit doesn't get stolen by other kids" 
i had a yard sale with a "free" box no one wanted to look cheap so it was full after a few hours. changed the sign to read $.10 for 2 items and sold it all in about an hour. 
Our local Panera just let the college kids in the nearby dorms come and raid the left overs. The food banks around here can't take non-perishables anymore because people were giving away expired food. 
Yeah, professors understand that this kind of shit happens. 
The correct answer to that question is "22/yes/my place". 
I met a Norwegian girl on Omegle and helped her study for an English exam. She sent me an email the next day to thank me and to tell me she got a perfect score. Edit* Out of curiosity, I looked up that old email. It turns out my memory from seven years ago is a bit fuzzy and the girl was actually from Finland. 
UK list prices include tax, and so are usually round numbers. The USA's habit of adding tax at the till means that their totals are usually not round numbers. 
Somebody did something similar to this when I was 12. I went up to grab a candy, I only grabbed one because I am not an animal. But I did say to my brother, "Man, that's an ugly scarecrow". Scarecrow gets up and yells "Hey!". Scared the crap out of me. 
The guys at my work had this jump and scare game they would play with each other, so when I started there I explained that after having a couple of kids my scare:pee ratio was pretty high and maybe they should leave me out of it. Thankfully, they did. 
And thus marched on the never ending cycle of your neighborhood not being "the spot" 
I've seen many where it was the parent that took all the candy. I specifically recall one where the kids took one and the mom scolded them for not taking all of it. 
You gotta go to YouTube Red. I think it's RedTube for short. 
Just add a footnote saying *Offer good while supplies last. 
Yeah this is one of those things that just kind of bum me out when I read them. That's super shitty. 
To be fair, Wikipedia isn't a business. It's a non profit. 
"NO THIS IS NOT A SCAM, I NAMED MY DAUGHTER WIKIPEDIA" 
You're cold and dead inside? Try applying at the DMV. 
Famous people giving advice is always bad. Their experience was extremely unique, that advice from their point of view will be completely inapplicable. So when John Mayer tells you there's no such thing as the real world, or Michael Jordan tells you to never quit, take that with a huge grain of salt. 
I waited tables for 15 years. When I was training new staff or getting a nervous crew ready for a big event I would tell them to pretend it's all a show. I would tell them the reason actors choose to wait tables for money while they're out of work is that it's good practice for acting. Act like you care, act like you want to please the customer, act like you don't want to pour that pitcher of ice water over their head. That worked for me. I stayed sane, made enough money to keep my kids from starving and I never actually assaulted a customer. 
Come to central Florida, where not only do the local drivers not understand this principle, bad drivers from all over the world make pilgrimage to mess it up on their way to the Mouse. 
Thanks for the pick-me-up. Feeling much better about myself already. 
Person X is hired as a professor because Person X is good at doing research. A significant chunk of Person X's duties involve teaching undergrads (and graduates). Person X's ability to perform this part of their duties is has virtually no bearing on their continued employment, and Person X was not hired based on their ability to teach. As a result, Person X is frequently a horrible instructor, and the undergrads (or graduate students) taking this class wind up getting the shaft. 
In the 1930's through 50's, research showed smoking improved health by relieving stress. Funded by.....guess who. Validity checks are important. Publish or perish drives crap... 
I saw it phrased "Keep your goals away from the trolls". 
Just to throw another thing on the pile: A raped and murdered hitchhiker makes national news because it is so rare. People are not used to it and that makes it newsworthy. A fatal car crash makes regional news at best since it happens every day. Same goes for drive-by shootings in certain areas of the US. By extension, a drive-by shooting in my country would make national news. So in a way, if something gets wildly reported on then that's in a away good news because it is NOT commonplace. It's the stuff that only locally gets reported on which should worry us. And that's the reason why actual statistics should be used for policy-making. Not the hot-button national outrage of the day. 
I never knew that about myself. Stats are so revealing! 
My sister and I picked up a hitchhiker one summer when we were around that age. We lived in a beach town and saw a guy in swim trunks and nothing else (no shoes, no shirt) trying to hitch a ride. We figured he would be relatively safe (where's he gonna hide a weapon) and decided to pick him up. He'd been arrested the night before for falling asleep on the beach. The police station was several miles away from where he'd parked and they refused to give him a ride back. I remember the bottoms of his feet were crazy burnt from walking on that asphalt. When we dropped him off he said "look, I really appreciate the ride, but...you're two young pretty girls. **Never** do that again. You understand? Never again." 
haha nice catch, it was DM (Deutsche Mark/German Mark) of course! 
Further, if you work for Google, odds are you can afford a bike. I know not everyone at Google is a VIP Software Engineer or whatever, but bikes aren't that costly. 
If somebody stole my lunch out of a shared fridge, the next day somebody would be pilfering a Metamucil sandwich. 
There's a Psych theory actually explains this really well. If you see something as free, it inherently is devalued as 'worthless', yet when you put a monetary value on it, it can seem like a really good deal. 
Not OP, but I'd assume his family stopped him from going back. I know my mum would. 
I had a professor that stated in the group project documentation that he didn't take any complaints about group members, he just wanted the work done. He didn't like teaching just wanted to do research I believe. 
But it can also be ok to acknowledge your own strengths and weaknesses so work can be divided up appropriately. 
this is also supposed to be part of group projects. This is how the workplace goes as well. The background people do a ton of work making sure all the documents look perfectly and the product will be profitable. My job is to present the ideas to customers and to make sure there are no bumps in the road. 
Buy a BMW, maybe the backwards-driving will be cancelled out by normally trying to hit cyclists and pedestrians. 
It took me a while to realise it wasn't even after reading your comment. 
Two years ago I went to Japan with a friend and lost my wallet at a zoo. I had all my cash in it because we were changing hotel that day so close to Y100k. I think I'd left it at a food stand so I retraces my steps but honestly believed it would be gone. Someone had handed it into lost and found, and hadn't even touched the money. I know there are good people in the world but I can't imagine many people turning down that much cash. 
"He's figuratively standing on the edge of a pond!" 
I didn't see the "her" at the end and I became concerned. 
You guys have the pricing system I've dreamed of all these years?! Lucky bastards! 
Holy fucking shit that's scary PS: I'm not a crow 
When your neighborhood is not the spot, people regularly forget it's even Halloween. I still remember this old lady on my street who forgot it was Halloween and left her lights on. We went to her door and she felt really bad. She scrounged around her house and gave us handfuls of pennies and some crackers. She just dumped the crackers and pennies into our bags. There were crumbs all over all my candy when I got home. She was so nice and felt so bad we weren't mad or anything, we just couldn't believe she thought it was a good idea to give us loose crackers. 
Yeah, my poor wife had been looking forward to moving to a smaller town. We lived in the Gaslamp district of San Diego and moved to KY, anyway, I digress. The first year in out new place we get dressed up, big old bowl of candy, full sized candy bars, bags of candy the whole shebang. Zero trick or treaters. Each year the enthusiasm dies a little more. Now we don't get dressed up and buy a bag of tootsie rolls just in case. Once I started asking around, apparently there is only one neighborhood kids trick or treat in, and it isn't ours. 
The poison candy thing turned out to be the kids own dad. He poisoned them after they got back home. 
Last Halloween a dad and his son knocked on my door, the dad was drinking a beer. They said trick or treat and I was confused because I said there was a bowl over there. Turns out someone took the whole bowl! I was like, I understand people taking all the candy but don't steal my bowl, that was a big heavy silver bowl. So I gave them some candy and about 5 mins later I get a know on the door and the dad had the kid bring the bowl to me saying they found it down the street. That was great parenting!... Unless of course they stole the candy and bowl and had a whole plan going LOL. 
Fuck that. You know those single-serve vinegar packets? Enjoy, kiddies. 
As someone who works with teens, I'm extremely happy that my employer allows me to have unilateral authority over discipline. I've had parents call me up royally pissed off that their kid isn't allowed to come to my place anymore, then try to figure out who to complain to to get it reversed. When they realize I'm the guy who holds the power and no one else can help them, and that I'm not backing down they seem almost unable to process that they're not going to get their way. 
Welcome to the real world, which is filled of assholes. Seriously though, some teenagers (and lots of adults) would need a good whipping once in a while to keep them straight. Humans can be such assholes... 
"NOT THIS IS NOT A SCAM, I NAMED MY ~~DAUGHTER~~ CRACK SPOON WIKIPEDIA" 
I tried the whole "Let's Play" thing a few years back. Started my video recorder, got my Super Mario Land, had little index cards with all the cool shit I wanted to talk about (I had this whole idea about not just being somewhat entertaining, but to kind of dissect the game as I went through it. Talk about all of the reasons enemy characters are designed the way they are, and all of the cultural influences and references in the artwork, etc.), leaned into the microphone, and heroically belted out: "Ummm... Uh.... Oh..." Combination of anxiety and just how into the game I can get. I can't always game and talk at the same time. 
A front of house veteran. You guys are the best, every restaurant needs a few due the high turnover. 15 years is impressive. 
That's why you see people dodging around other cars on i4 like it's a video game 
Glad to hear it! From being a creeper and skimming your post history you seem like a funny guy with a great taste in games. (I love pandemic too). Far from moronic in my book. 
My girlfriend has a PhD and has the same (similar) issue with it. She'll put in all of this work, sometimes months, only to get a null result that won't be published. Her issue, which I'm assuming is common, is that because of this, a lot of researchers end up doing the same tests, wasting time. 
IIRC, there was a study done a while back to prove that smoking marijuana was bad for you. They had a few chimps inhale the smoke, then reported that they suffered brain damage. What ACTUALLY happened, was they put chimps into an airtight box, then pumped in nothing but marijuana smoke, effectively smothering them. They then reported the brain damage that the chimps had from oxygen deprivation after they'd been passed out for several minutes. 
I flirt constantly with teams when playing online games. To compile that list would take a long time. If you manage to clutch save a game then chances are I will let you know you are my new waifu. I've a thing for people that can handle a loaded weapon... People open up surprisingly quickly if you flirt with them and make them laugh. 
Yea, I heard about this last time I mentioned it. Basically that. It really works. People tend to react to hostility with hostility. The easiest example is if you bump into somebody. - Consider you both apologising and taking blame, you will probably smile or joke about how clumsy you are etc. - Then consider somebody calling you out on it and blaming you for spilling their drink. Even if it was entirely your fault, you'll make excuses or blame them too. People are mirrors. When panicked or in shock, we copy what others are doing. If you strike me I strike you back. 
Makes sense, it's kind of scary to think how we all react to stimuli so predictably. 
This is what our lecturer said for our group project, he said he didn't care if one person presented, as long as we picked them cos we knew they were an amazing presenter and he/she backed it up on the day with a great presentation. 
I have an uncle that saves takeout condiment packs all year to give out to kids he thinks are too old or don't have a costume. *Two mayonnaise for you, some duck sauce, and here's a ranch dip!* 
I donated 1.2 billion after I inherited the Vanderbilt fortune through a freak ski accident and the dickheads will not stop skyping me. 
Crack spoon? ...you're from the suburbs, aren't you. 
I made a twitch account for fun - just to see what its like. At one point had 5-7 of my friends watching me game. Determined my computer just isn't powerful enough to play a game and stream, nor is my internet strong enough (small town Saskatchewan for the win!). I got inspired to try it from a friend who did a 24 hour live stream for charity and another friend of mine who does live streaming Make up tutorials on facebook. The concept of streaming and sharing is fun, the execution of streaming is a lot like work. 
This literally happened to me yesterday. Her reason for wanting a large discount? She's from Canada and won't be back anytime soon. 
Right, I don't get this behavior. I have people travel 5 below the speed limit only to try to match my speed when a passing lane comes up. 
I can just picture that type of person in my head too 
Yes, they should have injected the marijuanas into the chimps. 
I had this experience with eliminating alcohol and all other substances. I surprising how vicious people get. 
So if I bump into someone and they complain, I should respond with "ARE YOU FUCKING SORRY!!?" This way they know I'm acting accordingly. 
I have to ask now Sprog, when you pass away, what poem are you going to have on your tombstone? 
I donated 586 billion after I sold Apple to China and they are still sending me e-mails. How much money do they want? 
Pretty much this. Everything takes some amount of experience and just making crap until you're better. It also helps if you start off not trying to put everything on the line--have a day job separate from making videos, and take all of the "I have to get gud to makes the monnies" stress away. (Although, some people work better under that kind of massive stress, because not everybody is the same.) 
Most research faculty's main job is to get grants, teach their 1 class per 2 semesters, go to conferences, write papers, and to handle their grad students. Very little of their time goes to actual research on their own. 
I actually assumed OP meant motorbike and I was talking about a bicycle, go figure : ) 
Here lies a poem_for_your_sprog, Beneath loose earth and dreary fog, At rest, in peace, eternal calm, Now dead from fucking OP's mom. 
I donated four trillion dollars after harnessing an asteroid and extracting its raw minerals to Earth in 2127, yet they still persist with their mind-mails. Surely WikiCorp's avatar will die soon. 
And trying to tell someone that they shouldn't be driving anymore rarely goes over well. "I've been driving since 1945 dammit!" That's kinda the problem grandma. 
Yeah, last time I checked good drivers couldn't prevent getting rear ended 
They don't need to be popular, just cataloged online properly so that diligent researchers can find the results regardless of popularity. 
I firmly believe this is an OP sock puppet account and the entire thread is intended to tell this utterly fucking fantastic joke. 
I love the smell of napalm, 'cause naplam's a wonderful thing. It sets all the charlies on fire. And I get to hear them all scream. It's fiery, flamey, painfully burny, Hot! Hot! Hot! Hot! Hot! But the most wonderful thing about napalm is I have got a lot. IIIII....have got a lot! 
Reading this, I'm now kind of amazed they didn't actually do an episode like this 
The Boner Collector The Lovely Boners Mortal Instruments: City Of Boners Down to the Boner Boners Flesh and Boner Monkeyboner Boner Daddy 
I'd probably watch that if it popped up on Netflix. 
Plot twist. The horse was actually alive like the toys, and had to follow the same rules. 
Kindergarten Crop 5 year olds are harvested in fields 
Sounds like it'd be a made-for-tv Halloween movie by Disney. 
RV for Vendetta - A story of a man who travels America on his RV, seeking revenge for his daughter's murder 
"The first click you're going to hear is me hanging up. The second... has been bothering me since Route 6. Do you hear it? It happens every time I turn left. Is there something in the cup holder? Check the cup holder." 
Would not be surprised if veggie tales tried to do this exactly. 
Is this for a museum or did a neo-Nazi with too much time on their hands do it? 
Isn't that just *Jurassic Park* - wealthy CEO invites employees to test his magnum opus, it goes horribly horribly wrong. 
"I Just sunk a Yellow Submarine, A Yellow submarine, A yellow submarine And My friends were all on board Many more of them live No more as the sub sinks beneath the waves" 
You took this one in a different direction. Points for originality. 
"Blondie, thou art a rapscallious, do-no-good offspring of a wench!" 
Wanna do an AMA? You're clearly Adam Sandlers producer. 
Alternatively, a movie about the river that forms the border between Wales and England. 
Dire Hard: the true story of the sultans of swing. 
Thanks, but nah dude, I'm surprised so many people even saw it when I came 4 hours late, thread had like 3000 comments already. Personally, I like the Mad Marx one a lot. Anyway, glad it made someone laugh. 
Then Danny says "Say hello to _my_ little friend!" and in walks Peter Dinklage 
Or despite all the blaring hints about what's going on, he continues blissfully working away. 
Either that, or the stories of being in our early 20s, when we could eat anything and never get sick and powerdrink all night without ever getting a hangover. 
There was Fry and the Slurm Factory and it was a magical episode so it stands to reason this one would be at least equal in greatness. 
As you can see here, this man is doing *very* complex maths, such as multiplying 2 by 3. 
-You changed your name to McLoveth? -Yeah, I thought it sounded rad. -No it sounds like a made up retard name. (later outside the convenience store) -Do you have everything? -Yup, money for ale, a change of clothes, a condom and a lute. -What, you think Becca's going to be psyched that you brought a lute? Oh, Evan! Thank you so much for bringing that lute for my pussy! I could never handle your fucking four-inch dick inside my pussy without your gigantic LUTE solo! These girls are 18 years old. They aren't dried up old ladies, man. They're good to go! 
I'd probably see it in theaters, but that's because the era is of general interest to me and not because I'm projecting my racist fantasies on the slaver; for that I head to /pol/ 
And they end up actually falling in love with each other in wacky romcom fashion 
*This documentary just looks like a prep school reunion* 
I was expecting Kindergarten Crop: Two hours of editing all the pre-school photos because of that one damn parent who won't sign the waiver. 
Alternative: Rarrival, aliens come, but only people who paid for Winrar can understand them. 
Or it's about a girl who moved to the country to be a Farmer's wife, because of some problem they can't have children of their own, so she begins to care for the baby sheep-Reading them bedtime stories, singing them lullabies, etc. to get them to stop bleating all night 
In order to make it across the country Scott, you'll have to drive across my seven crowded interstates! 
TIL zymergy is a thing. (It's the study of fermentation.) 
Let's be honest. If it has to do with AI and Hitler, it was probably 4chan 
"If you don't like that you can leave in a huff, if that's too soon you can leave in a minute and a huff, if that's too soon you can BE CHAINED TO THE GRILL OF THE GIGAHORSE TO ROAM THE DESERT HELL FOR ALL ETERNITY." 
That's not really changing the plot of the original movie. 
OP should have a clause that only a film with natural boobies can have the honor of using that name. 
Why the hell would they make a cartoon spinoff called "Return to the Planet of the Rapes?" 
Then Peter says "Say hello to my little friend!" and then pulls out a picture of your penis. 
It's not the secret ingredient... it's the only ingredient. 
This man might truly be, the greatest accountant, *in the world* 
Just because it's told by from the antagonist's POV it doesn't mean it needs to make him the hero. It can be done to show how much of a monster he really is. 
I'd watch this tbh. But I'm also gay and wanna see hot Greek guys make out. 
For everyone asking: It's for the safety of the child, waivers are sent out to all the parents asking for permission to publish photos of the kids (for year books, websites, etc.). If the waiver doesn't return (even for no good reason) you have to assume that its for a serious reason such as a stalker, so you don't publish photos with the child. But you also need to make sure they're not in the background of any photos, if they are it's either edit them or delete them. Source : worked at a kids summer camp for years, had some no photography situations, people would sift through 300+ photos to make sure certain individuals weren't in them. 
Alternative Alternative: Rarrival, Dinosaur aliens come to Earth and just say "Rarr". The linguist main character spends months translating their language and it turns out "Rarr" means "I love you" in Dinosaur. 
It will set up the sequel "Fantastic Breasts and How to Make Them" 
Just picking up a book and looking at random for instances of 'wand': HPATPOAch10: "At once, thin ink lines began to spread like a spider's web from the point that George's wand had touched. They joined each other, they crisscrossed, they fanned into every corner..." ... "'Don't forget to wipe if after you've used it --'" HPATDHch19: "'You -- crawl -- back -- here -- after -- weeks -- and weeks -- oh, *where's my wand*?' She looked as though ready to wrestle it out of Harry's hands and he reacted instinctively. '*Protego!*' The invisible shield erupted between Ron and Hermione: the force of it knocked her backward to the floor. Spitting hair out of her mouth, she leapt up again" Literally the first two instances I found flipping through for 'wand'. 
He's not the stig. But he is the stigs Accountant Cousin 
"I had a nice lance that she sat upon That maiden from Stonebury who was also your mom" 
There's a whole 12 minute scene halfway through the movie that's just him getting stepped on by a barefoot Uma Thurman. She never shows up in the rest of the movie and the sequence never even gets discussed by the other characters. 
What about the part where Lava Girl fetches Shark Boy from the water but her fire goes out, so he has to throw her in the volcano? 
I am that one damn parent, because of a psycho stalker ex-wife. Sorry dude. 
After *Meme Lover* I never doubt it when people quote lines from porn parodies. 
Big ones, small ones, large ones, light ones, Thick ones, thin ones, left and right ones, Pointed, perky, curvey, round ones, Extra-weighty twenty-pound ones! All the best of breast surprises! All the bras in all the sizes! All the boobs, and how to fake 'em! Never sweat it! *Newt'll make 'em.* 
Seriously. Every one I find is great. HPATDHch23: "'You dirty little monkey!' bawled Bellatrix. 'How dare you take a witch's wand, how dare you defy your masters?'" 
Harry, yer gonna to go to pirate school, yer gonna bury treasure, yer gonna get a hook, ye'll get a fucking parrot, it'll deliver yer mail, deal with it, ya twat 
I can see him debating for every movie he writes whether to include this scene 
That was in the original?? Man that movie was fucking dark. 
I'm not a psycho stalker! Why are you wearing that shirt?! 
"Unfortunately we are no longer conducting the mantis men experiments. But, we now have a new test regarding how many mantis men a person can kill! Pick up a rifle and follow the blue line." 
"A titties a titty, no matter how small" -Dr Seuss 
OMG I think I have a new hobby. HPATDHch32: "'I sought a third wang Severus. The Elder Wang, the Wang of Destiny, the Deathstick. I took it from its previous master. I took it from the grave of Albus Dumbledore.'" HPATDHch32: "Voldemort halted, and Harry could see him plainly again as her slid the Elder Wang through his white fingers, staring at Snape" 
That's one thing I like about Brooklyn nine-nine. The chief is gay, it does not define him. The other thing I like is Terry Crews. 
Here we can see a wild R on the process of migration 
Let's not forget Ricer Age, the dark tale of a world in which modded Honda Civics and Suzuki Swfits dominate the streets, taking down any car that challenges their authority. 
And small breasts may well be the best breasts of all 
As a climber and mountaineer, I can attest to this. Outdoor sex is overrated. 
So... you were fucking speechless? (ba dum tish!) 
I've had the same, nothing quite like desperately trying to untie a crying girl as quickly as possible. 
Fuck that. Real men use tiger balm. The slight numbing buys you an extra ten minutes. Or so I've heard. 
Should have gone with the bend and snap. Always works. 
I'm sorry but this is fucking hilarious as someone with asthma 
Lmao, if that is his situation you think he would be overtly generous. 
The word you are looking for is taint. She tried to finger your taint. Also ~~exceptable~~ acceptable: Grundle, ABC (ass-ball-connector), gooch, fleshy funbridge. I'm sure there are more. 
Am I really the only one who likes jerkin' off with sandpaper? 
Nothing puts me in the mood to fuck a pregnant stripper like Squidbillies. 
I think you might want to find another word to discribe your relationship with her. Because "friend" doesent seem appropriate here... 
This is some Aziz Ansari *Master of None* shit right here. 
Even if you don't slip and fall I couldn't believe how mediocre sex in the shower is. Everything is wet and lubricated to the point where there's no sensation. It can be really pretty hot, until you actually try to fuck and it's like "well...I think I'm in..." and she's like "ok...I'm not sure either". 
Yea, she realized she got a keeper at that point. 
Jesus, did your wife pick the woman? Maybe she was down low mad at you for agreeing and wanted you to have a terrible time.. 
"uh, no that is tragic" *meanwhile puts her in doggy* wtf xD 
I liked it. Floating / bouncing around with your dick in a girl. 7/10 
I am so sorry your birthday didn't live up to your expectations but that is just hilarious. 
OP's dad is a very generous and gifted lover. It was probably your fault. 
That doesn't sound that bad when you think about it..sounds like a nice girl though 
If outside was any good for sex, we wouldn't have spent so long perfecting inside. 
Sounds like her boyfriend was the one who was fucking speechless. 
haha, been there brother. Just laid in bed and cuddled her while watching a disney movie to try and stave off any PTSD. 
Not sex related, but I used to be a lifeguard and we would practice rescue techniques regularly. One day I forgot my goggles and decided to play victim but I chose to close my eyes because the water was heavily chlorinated. I was close to the bottom of the deep end and holding my breath for maybe 20 seconds and started freaking out because I couldn't see the other guard coming down to "save" me. Scared the crap of of me and I can hold my breath for about 2-3 minutes. I felt like I was drowning because I couldn't see. 
Ugh. After a rugby match, I had a really sore shoulder, so after showering I slathered tiger balm over it. Did not wash my hands. Finished dressing, went to the bar and 2 pints in, went to point the pink pistol at the porcelain firing range. Well, the scream of pain I emitted brought half the team into the toilet to find me pretty much humping the cold tap. That took a little explaining and a long time to live down. 
This is fucking hilarious as someone without asthma 
Ha no that's cause in another thread I mentioned that if I sit funny my labia sometimes fall asleep. 
Haha, yeah, if that were me I'd *totally* be generous. If. Haha. Hypothetically. 
I would never make fun of anyone for a physical feature that he has no control over. But if you know you've got a shortcoming (no pun intended), you need to do things to make up for it. He had no problem asking me to go down on him, but when it was time to reciprocate, suddenly he was weirded out by female anatomy. I could live without oral, or I could live without great PIV intercourse. I couldn't live without both. 
In Scotland it's known as your "isnae" It isnae yer baws, and it isnae yer arse. Also known as a chinrest on a woman... 
I had fingered her beforehand and she liked it, so I think she was trying to do the same to me. 
Cosmo keeps trying to get women to touch taints and buttholes, but I still never met a guy that was completely ok with that 
I hear the drums echoing tonight But she hears only whispers of some quiet conversation She's coming in the first minute Her moonlit wings reflect the stars that guide me towards ejaculation I stopped an old man the other day Hoping to find some old forgotten sex positions to try and do He turned to me as if to say: Hurry boy, she'll do the dick voodoo! It's gonna take a lot to drag me away from you There's nothing that a hundred women or more could ever do I bless the voodoo rain dance on my dick Gonna take some time to forget about the dick voodoo, ooo ooo. 
I actually have a pretty funny story about a cop thinking I was up to no good. Im not exactly in shape and one night I decided to go out for a run around 10pm. Im on a main street doing the old fat guy walk and run (run for 200 yards, walk for 400 yards and so on). It just so happens that I start the run part of the routine just as a cop is coming up behind me so he of course thinks I'm running from him. He puts his lights on and the spot light on and pulls up next to me, sees me in jogging clothes and sweating my balls off and goes "what are you doing"... Like seriously dude what the hell does it look like I'm doing? 
Judging from the lip lizard thing I probably doubt it. 
I have found a long time ago that pretty much most of life is stranger, crazier, more improbable than fiction. See we like most of our fiction to make sense, to have 2+2=4 . Life of course doesn't subscribe to that position so it gives us 2+2 = 1,23,B, pineapple 
I mean honestly that's the very essence of Squidbillies. 
No, we're definitely not friends anymore. We didn't really talk at all after that. 
They had officially broken up, Facebook made it quite public, but you're right in that it certainly had to do with the ex-boyfriend. 
The worst part is when you forget learned lessons and try it again six months later 
He started jumping round (bare foot) in her filthy pile while screaching like a dinosaur / doing the chicken dance with his upper body. 
Yeah I had to jerk off to my own face guys she was that bad. 
Or she wanted to make sure she picked someone less attractive than her, and went a little overboard. 
...yeah, cuz that's what i want, *two* sets of disappointed eyes staring at me. 
Can't make eye contact or even risk it after that. But we are after all on a mission. Gotta complete the mission. 
Pretty sure every guy I've been with has been utterly quiet. They say it's due to masturbating in silence, but what, do they think women scream while we masturbate? 
When I was younger, my goal was to have sex on every peak that I climbed. It was fine when climbing in the rockies in the summer. And then gave up after realizing that hypothermia on the little guy isn't going to work out when doing ice climbing or anywhere in the winter, for that matter. And then there was the time in Red River Gorge when we heard a rattlesnake while we were doing it. Yeah, that pretty much killed it. 
Should have cranked some Taylor Swift in the car while fucking his ex and maintaining perfect eye contact with the guy. WE ARE NEVER, EVER, EVER GETTING BACK TOGETHER WEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE ARE NEVER, EVER, EVER GETTING BACK TOGETHER 
Pink pistol. Baby batter. I'm learning loads of fantastic phrases today. 
Micropenis *AND* unusually dangly balls? Damn I'm sorry dude. 
I usually go into massage mode if I am too eager, you gotta run your hands all over them like around their thighs and legs really close but don't touch the clit or lips just get so close they want you to then they will start getting soaked thinking omg he's right there i wish he would touch it. After 15 min of that go full out til you nut she will love that 5 mins 
Glad to hear I'm not the only one. I can be kind of embarrassed about it at times 
It feels soooo good. What was terrible sex for him, may very well have been amazing sex for her. That being said, I wish more people would see this. OP says she was basically his dream girl, and so many redditors are quick to write her off as crazy, too emotional, a cheater, etc. That's just being a girl! We cry! We cry a lot! 
She was probably having sex to see if she was over her boyfriend, and found out she wasn't. So she started crying. Insisted you two didn't have sex so when she told her ex-boyfriend she wanted to get back together, she could confidently say she hadn't done anything in between. 
One time I walked in on my college roommate mid jerk. Pants around the ankles, porn going through headphones. He glanced up at me, goes "'sup dude" and went back to what he was doing. No pause, nothing. 
Probably this. Unfortunately a lot of women underrate how pretty they are. His wife could be an eight, assume she's actually a six, and pick a four or five to compensate. 
If I wanted to disappoint two people at once, id go eating with my parents 
So that's how it works! I always let them kiss each other and scissor while I played Skyrim. 
Condoms aren't particularily safe. A friend of mine had one on and he got hit by a bus. 
Thiiiissss. I had a boyfriend who would put his arms behind his head and just watch me when I was on top, completely deadpan. It got to the point where I was grabbing his hands and making him touch me, and every other minute I'd be asking if everything was good, and he always said it was! But his facial expression said he was dead inside. 
ah, i'm very vocal and expressive. so many girls have commented on refreshing it is to hear my pleasure. i don't understand how guys can keep it bottled up. it feels too good not to. 
"'Jan has this schoolgirl fantasy.' 'Yeah that's a pretty common one.' 'I know it's just, I always feel weird wearing a dress'" 
He might crank up the Carrie Underwood and dig his keys into the side of your pretty little souped up four wheel drive. 
That's why he got stuck with the kid. Karmic retribution. 
They didn't know she was going to use a used make-up brush. 
Yeah, I've had a few of my partners have cry-gasms. The first time it scared the shit out of me; I thought I'd hurt her, or that she said "stop" and I didn't hear it and now I was a rapist, or... I don't know, I was just making up scenarios in my head and going "SHITSHITSHITSHITSHIT" Luckily we talked about it later and she explained basically what you said -- that it was just a huge release of stress and it's fine and she just needed a minute. Now when it happens, after making sure she's okay I take it as a sign to have more intimate, emotional sex than the more physical type. 
Establishing dominance. He should have maintained eye contact. 
Now, when the girl sitting on your face is cuming, you yell FUS RO DAH!!! 
I fucking loooooove when a guy is vocal, especially if he says "I'm cumming" as he's about to blow. Just typing that turned me on a bit. 
Hell yeah, then he can get a new car after the resulting court case! 
you expect us to buy a fucking dedicated ball rubbing brush? WE AIN'T MADE OF MONEY YOU KNOW 
That's a power move, only response is to look em in the eye and finish before them 
Pro tip: have sex near emergency room door. Saves valuable minutes if you need a penis straighteotomy 
Yeah, who wouldn't want to use the testicle brush on their face again. 
Well done Reddit, you made this movie suddenly go up 21% in popularity this week on IMDB... 
I liked dead ringers for mind fuckery. I haven't seen it in years and still have a bad taste in my mouth. 
I generally feel like a pretty intelligent person. Then I decide to rewatch Primer because, "I know the twist; I'll totally follow it this time." Nope. I never completely get it. 
I watched it right after Pleasantville and I was so suspicious of everything for a week 
DO NOT WATCH AFTER A BREAKUP! Guaranteed that if your a guy or a girl, no matter what age, no matter what you've been through in your life, if you watch this movie after a tough breakup you will shed tears and have your heart twisted and fucked with for two of the most beautiful hours you've ever seen. Solid 9/10 
I was so invested in Leo's character that I wanted to believe that they were tricking him into believing that he was a patient. 
I watched this back to back with The Usual Suspects one night not knowing the twists to either, That was a mindfuck night. 
Glad to see this listed. I was going to post it myself. This film is way underrated. Edit-It would be wise if I listed the Movie in my comment. I was speaking of Waking life 
I love that movie because of how fucked up that trick is 
I only recently discovered that Kanye West's music video for 'Stronger' is actually a pretty obvious love letter to Akira, one of his favourite films of all time. I never really picked up on it until I watched it again his year. 
Existenz should be near the top, not down here near the bottom. 
GIMME THE KEYS YA FUCKIN COCKSUCKA MUTHAFUCKKALLGJBBHGHG 
Malkovitch! Malkovitch Malkovitch Malkovitch? Malkovitch Malkovitch. 
It's a nice film, but I wouldn't classify it as a mind fuck. The plot is relatively straight forward, and although there are open ends they're all quite obvious. Was she insane? Were those just her fleeting thoughts as her life flashed in front of her as she was dying? I don't really know, but it's not too difficult to think about the different possibilities. 
So many of my friends have turned down my suggestions of this movie for film nights because "we don't want to watch a chick flick" *ITS NOT A FUCKING CHICK FLICK* It is hella long though 
Also holy hell, I just looked at the credits for the film and Shane Carruth not only directed and starred in it, but he also wrote it, SHOT THE FUCKING MOVIE, and composed the score. That's some next level indie shit right there. 
"Solvent Green" sounds a lot creepier than the real movie 
The actors literally didn't know what was going to happen. Most of the events were fed to them one at a time or things would just "happen" like opening the boxes and finding different things inside. So cool. 
I was shown Triangle after getting some friends to watch Coherence. Both great films, so fun to try to figure out while watching. 
Man going into perfect blue blind was such a weird experience 
I'm the exact opposite. It's my favourite film. I've watched it once. 
Totally. I never got it and never will. And, I'm ok with that. 
Yea I heard about the movie on Reddit in another thread about mind fuck movies, so I watched it, I got about half way in thinking I knew what was going on, how simple the plot was to follow and everyone who didn't get it was stupid, then movie took a look at my hubris and beat be with a set of jumper cables for it. Fuck. 
I think it's the film that comes the closest to deconstructing how time travel *might* happen realistically. It doesn't attempt to dumb it down for the audience, it demands that you give it the respect and thought that it deserves. 
Luckily for me I missed that. I seriously hate when trailers spoil big reveals in movies. The trailer of Batman vs Superman having Doomsday in it made me not watch it. Luckily I seemed to have dodged a bullet. 
Worth it. Because they wouldn't watch the chaser or memories of murder anyways. 
You'd love/hate "I Saw The Devil." It made me feel like I needed a hug because I was not OK 
Laugh and the whole world laughs with you, cry and you cry alone. 
So, I watched it once a long time ago and totally didn't see the twist coming. Then I rewatched it like 2 weeks ago with a friend who knew nothing about it. Spoiler: [In the scene where he sees his daughter again for the first time, working at the sushi place, one of them says something about the other looking familiar. I thought, "Oh shit, they made it lot more obvious than I remember it being. Surely my friend won't pick up o--" "IS THAT HIS DAUGHTER?" my friend blurts out.....well fuck. I just didn't say anything.](/spoiler) Still a beautifully shot film, even if you know everything. 
Also, one of the creepiest movies I've watched though it doesn't qualify as a horror. 
I really enjoyed Looper. I saw the updated Total Recall at about the same time. So drastically different. Looper shows that you don't need a ton of action and special effects to have a great Sci-Fi movie. 
I like the ending. The movie starts out telling you that it's a game and then spends the movie making you question that, but that's the whole point. 
I eventually realized that if there was a show about my life the ratings would tank 
Honorable mention also goes to Blue Valentine for Movies You Don't Watch After a Heart-Rending Breakup. 
Don't forget Adaptation! But really, Synecdoche, NY is fucking insane. 
When Clementine introduces herself and asks not to make fun of her name, I completely missed it the first time through. I remember thinking though, how does he not know that song? 
That would have been awesome. I wish I had a mind eraser so I could rewatch awesome films for the first time again. 
I'm surprised this isn't a bigger reddit fanboy movie in general. 
Have you read the story? It's based on Robert Heinlein's story "-All You Zombies-" and was beautifully done. He wrote the story in 1959. 
Agree. I watched them all (for some reason) and they were okay at best but the first movie was something incredibly special. It was simple yet engaging and suspenseful. 
Wait wait....I never noticed that...was he really holding it in the wrong hand?? 
Same here. Also gonna add that A Scanner Darkly was a very mind bending film by Richard Linklater as well. 
For the record, Jonathan Nolan (brother) wrote the story Memento was based on, and co-wrote the Prestige. If you're into 'em check out Westworld. Only one season in. Brilliant. 
I think the one that mind fucked me the most was the video game one. 
Right?! Everything is so dark/depressing, shit gives me anxiety 
The movie's ending got me on so many levels. [Ava got me and tricked me into thinking that she had fallen in love. The movie got me and tricked me into thinking that it was going to be a typical guy meets robot girl and teaches her the meaning of love kind of movie, where they escape together and live happily ever after.](/spoiler) This movie, man. I was disappointed in myself, too, by the end. 
Watch it with the commentary. There's some brilliant insights that they mention that I didn't get the first time around. One example being that Oscar got in really good shape for the role because it was important that his character wasn't only the experimenters intellectual and financial superior, but his physical one as well. 
FYI, his name is Oscar Isaac. He has a really solid resume, but a lot of people seem to know him now as Poe Dameron from "The Force Awakens." 
I watched it when I was 15 or so. Should not have done that. 
not sure about the netflix version, but the official theatrical version leaves out so many scenes it's almost impossible to understand even knowing all the facts. it leaves out over 15 minutes including 18 additional scenes and 23 extended scenes, at least half of which contain important details in my opinion 
I would unironically love an adaptation of Akira where everyone is Asian and appropriately aged except Tetsuo who is inexplicably Kanye West. 
Screw that, that was more surreal. That scene where he dreams that his guts are falling out and he's trying to put them back in. I still remember that scene 25 years later. 
Gimme the fuckin keys ya mothafuckin cock sucka, watdufuuug? 
Insane? I took it as she was a child trying to cope with wartime. Children have great imaginations. 
Out of any medium, Black Mirror, like almost every episode will be the most mind fucky of anything else I've seen. The twists and emotions afterwards are hard to describe.. 
Trying to watch Enter the Void after smoking a lot of weed was too much. In fact I've never been able to finish watching that film. 
How the fuck a living person can come up with a story like that AND make a movie out of that. What the fuck was going in the heads of the filming staff? 
I watched it like four times and still had to read up some articles to put it together :/ 
I thought it was near the end of the movie at least 5 times. 
It dissolves people! *Solvent Green dissolves people!* 
It really was. The whole movie has such an eerie vibe to it. I felt like I was a fly on the wall watching a group of friends being mindfucked. 
I'm the exact opposite. It's my least favorite movie ever. I've been watching it on a continuous loop for the last 8 years. 
Even without tracing the timelines in your head, and just loosely following along, it's still very much a fun movie and worth watching. Now mind you, it actually gets better (at least it did for me) as I watched it a couple more times and recognized more of the distinct timelines, but I didn't dive in like some people have. I feel like I would just be wasting time for little gain at that point. 
Buddy had a time machine built and used before he ever showed it to anyone else. So he could always loop waaay back. That's the gyst. But man this movie is a nightmare without a "subway map" of a time line in front of you. 
The first time watched the movie I had the same thought when they were in the sushi place. I disregarded it for some reason and was able to enjoy the film. 
Ah but have you seen the original Total Recall? The best bit about 80s/90s action movies was their ability to mix action and special effects with comedy. I'll always watch original Total Recall when it's on TV, as it's just so funny! Still a fun twist and good plot line too :) 
"He's just jacking off and looking at memes all day!" 
I've been wanting to see Blue Valentine for awhile, is it worth a watch? 
I watched Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind months after I broke up. It's a sad movie but it taught me to remember the good in a relationship. After that I watched 500 Days of Summer and the ending was nice :) 
Add Brad Pitt from Snatch and no one would ever understand a thing but they'd all end up drunk at a pub in an hour. 
I went through all six of them (at the time there was only six) when I had food poisoning and could do nothing but lay in bed, and watching the (then) whole story was not bad actually. 
no he was holding it in the correct hand but his headwound was on the wrong side 
I couldn't watch Shutter Island again because the scene with the kids wrecked me. 
I have seen it 5 times and recommend it to everyone. It's called Playtest (season 3 episode 2) 
Late to the party but I just binge watched the new season..did anyone notice in "Hated by the nation" that Blue started singing the song Abbi sang in her audition?! Just thought it was interesting they slipped it in there. 
And it's an awful feeling I've never known before, Christ even San junipero left me feeling horrible 
That's the brilliance of this amazing film. [Ava not only beats the protagonist in a Turing test, she beats the audience.](/spoiler) 
The original line was "I want to have your abortion", but when some producer or something said it was too offensive and they had to change it they changed it to that line instead to still push it as far as they could. 
I watched the Netflix one and it made perfect sense to me, one of my favourite films 
They were protesting how much Serbian cinema glorified the violence of the Balkan Wars. Serbia as a country has some severe cultural psychic damage, and the media refuses to release anything cathartic. All the war movies have happy endings, to the point where it's cheesy. So Srbski Film was made, to take all the violence and tragedy that should have been shown in the past 30 years, and release it in one movie. 
I swear he just gets up in the morning and chooses a physique option. Like "meh I'm just going to bum around the house today, Fat-Bale it is!" *beep* 
The original total recall, I dare say, is a masterpiece of its time. 
I've watched Requiem like over 20 times. I don't know what's wrong with me. I just like the movie. 
That depends, have you just recently been through a heart-rending breakup? 
It starts getting weird around 4-5, but 6 comes back swinging. 7 was very uneven - lots of awesome moments and lots of wasted potential. Also I watched all seven in a day, with the last one in theaters, and I haven't watched one since. Oohahahhh 
I for one rather enjoyed the AIDs needle pit. That shit made me cringe. Plus it was fun to watch the How we did it on the bonus features. 
What was the scene? I've seen the movie but I don't remember this. Plus my data is throttled right now so I can't use YouTube 
Probably my favorite and best one I've seen. 15mil merits isn't bad either. 
Yeah my friend told me to watch that because it was a "happy" episode. I'm tryna chill and watch a TV show, not face my mortality 
Terminator taught me one thing and one thing well - never trust machines. 
I haven't seen the movie, but I read the Wikipedia awhile back. I didn't read about why it was made though. That's actually super interesting. 
On date night he's like "Honey! Should I go for American Psycho or Batman?" And spends time switching back and forth in front of the mirror. 
He did a behind the scenes interview where he says that both his family and doctor pleaded for him to stop doing this to himself or he was going to die. He even admits that his tactics for losing weight were starvation and extreme caloric restriction for extended periods. 
Or is there a person that you're interested in asking out to see how it goes? Don't watch this film. 
Fun fact - a prominent actor requested that his name not show in the starting credits so as not to give away that he was the killer. 
In the same vein, I pictured Walter Jr. as a rookie detective working alongside Morgan Freeman. 
7 was terrible in the fact that it's OBVIOUSLY made for 3D and looks ridiculous in standard. 
A flashback [when Leo comes back home to find his wife having drowned their kids in the lake next to their home. It's a pretty depressing scene watching him pick up his dear children floating in the lake](#spoiler) 
Heard about it from a podcast and was told I could watch in any order. I felt so sad after that. The rest weren't too bad. It definitely let me know that the mindfuckery would spare no expense. Also I think "pig fucker" would have scared me off from the idea of the show. 
You could argue that someone's consciousness cannot be uploaded (moved) but instead only copied onto a digital media. This is actually part of the premise of White Christmas. That means if there is an afterlife then her 'soul' would potentially join her family while the copy on the San Junipero system continues on. Probably the only case where you could have your cake and eat it too. 
...but Bruce Wayne and Patrick Bateman are pretty similar characters. He wouldn't have to switch his outfit since both wear suits, are rich, and have slightly better haircuts than Marcus Halberstramm. Bateman Bat~~e~~man Coincidence? I think not. 
I watched pig fucker first. It did scare me off. 
I agree with this one. It's the same idea behind teleportation. Person on the other side is only a copy. Original person died. 
Me too. Still on my list though. When I'm scrolling for something to watch I always see it and think maybe? No. 
That episode basically hazes people trying to get into it. Most of the other episodes have more of a sci fi component but it's not a good binge show because they are often harrowing in their own ways. There are at least two episodes I would consider "hopeful" though. 
It is definitely not a binge show. Most episodes do a very good job with connecting the viewer to the character right away to establish a decent bond. This allows the stories to be somewhat in-depth with characters in such a short time. Black Mirror is one of those creepy shows where things are happening that are ALMOST technologically possible paired with things actively happening in society (trolling, political unrest). I just recently heard Black Mirror referred to as The Twilight Zone of our generation. 
I have to know as well. I won't be able to sleep tonight without some clarity. 
I'm pretty sure when I first saw this I read that they're siblingings - totally explains his shit eating grin 
Haha! Right? I just be wondering "Do I really look that fucked up?" 
He doesn't seem old enough to be their father. I would guess that look has something to do with the woman (probably) eating Ortilan. It's a delicacy that has a huge stigma associated with it. They would put a napkin over their head to figurative hide the sin from God (it's a songbird killed in a fairly unpleasant manner). I'm guessing his look is either irate that they are being watched and possibly judged for eating it or that he is unhappy to be sharing a table with somebody eating it. 
I've known it existed for years and I can't do that shit, this guy always makes me giggle. 
Gas stations actually don't make most of their money off of gas. Their profit margins are pretty thin with fuel. 
Same...such a great photo. I hope he wasn't killed and is in rehab 
As a 47 year old man, this is incorrect. My facebook profile pic is from when I was 32. If I were to update the picture, then it would look like this dog. 
Same here. First one that actually made me chuckle. 
He looks like Dennis Reynolds in It's always sunny. 
never been attacked by a baby swarm i assume? fucking millenials 
This feature (and similar ones) were great for people late to the smartphone party. I used the Facebook Messenger to SMS feature for at least a year. I could reply to individuals & group messages by replying to the texts. 
I'm happy I read this comment first before looking at the pic. Had me giggling like an idiot. 
I wonder how the staff felt making the damn thing, like they had to have suspected it was some kind of practical joke or something. 
If you're looking to find something like this in the future, you can usually succeed by googling a unique phrase from the poster like "Apply Capri-sun straw to neck" 
No problem, just keep your eyes 36 feet to the fucking sky when you're next in africa 
I remember it as "Did somebody say Binders full of women?" 
Kind of! Same job. He was Obama's first Press Secretary, Robert Gibbs. 
My favourite thing about it is the Imgur comment that I got when I posted it. "He also painted God in a brain shaped object to infer that God was in the minds of men". Don't think he realised he was reading a meme. 
Did you think it was written in Ancient Berber or something? 
Woman complaining about nothing at a table next to me asked the waitress to speak to her manager. "Well I can call her, but I'm the owner I gave her the day off." 
Dude same. I actually had to act like my mom and use my index finger. 
Wow. What a specific thing to know. But I'll be damned if you're not right. They were thrown into a brandy to drown and marinate at the same time. 
Haha I will save this for when the "what reddit comment you can't see without laughing"? thread comes op 
What's funny to me is imagining his neighbors just staring out the window, drinking coffee, wondering what in the fuck is happening in this world while this guy runs back and forth from his camera to various panicked poses up and down the street. 
Same for the wholesalers. I work for a company known for selling gas wholesale but we make most of our money fixing other people's fuel tankers, or delivering gas that either we or someone else sold. Straight up selling the gas though our margins are thin as fuck. 
got a pocket full of rubber chickens and my homeboys do too 
I've seen this photo a million times and never heard that it's from Jack & Jill. This, to me, only makes it funnier because it proves just how few people have actually _seen_ Jack & Jill. 
Wait so a baby foal comes out of a human woman's vagina??? 
Having worked at a fast food pizza chain, there are no jokers when it comes to pizza customers. They are very serious in their bullshit antics 
Never heard it called this. I always called it palming a basketball. 
Disgraced Simpsons creator Matt Groening retires from The Simpsons; Gives show to Mcelroy Brothers! "They're better at Bart than I am" 
In all seriousness though that dog had to shit through the equivalent of a pom pom. Wtf 
Yeah, I've heard about it. Pretty cool thing to do for sure. 
Later on that day, my homie Bozo came through with pocket flowers that will spray. 
Holy shit, what if Jack and Jill is a masterpiece and nobody's bothered to check?? Someone should get one that just in case!! Not me, but someone... 
The heart is most likely the fluff on its tail. Dogs lift their tails to defecate. The second dog appears to have no tail. Corgis can be born without tails thanks to a breeding mutation that's preferable to docking for some buyers. If course, shaving any part of your furred pets is nothing more than lazy vanity. Dogs with hair, like poodles, need to be groomed... Dogs with long fur need to be brushed frequently. 
And a fat ass nose, of some rubber composite shit this ain't no joke 
Corn in a cup, Corn in a cup, Corn. In. A. Cup! (....Corn in a Cup!!!) 
IMDB boards are about as terrible as youtube comments. 
Do any of reddit's fluctuating list of beloved celebrities work there? And are there bananas? 
*closes browser* Well I'm bored, I wonder what's new on Reddit.. Oh. 
I like to think of it as what Yahoo answers tried to be. 
She stood behind the door and sighed, Then sadly shook her head - 'I checked the browser list,' she cried, 'And what I *saw*!' she said: *"Employees pillaged, bruised, abused,* *And broken by the brass?"* *"A bunch of folks all sorely used,* *And conquered, ass by ass"?!* 'You told me you were done with that!' She cried, and wiped a tear. 'But you've been watching *smut*,' she spat. 'No darling - reddit, dear.' 
Where can I download friends? Do I need a 3D printer? 
yeah it is just a vocal minority that is pissed give it 48 hours 
You were seven dots and two words away from being downvoted to oblivion 
I can vouch for Hubski being a great place for thoughtful conversation. Also not a clone, -very different mechanics. 
I never knew how much I loved that film until I said "Can I get, any of you cunts, a drink" to my family in the pub, a week after my dad died. (Not looking for sympathy, my dad would have said the same.) 
You should get that app that covers up Youtube comments and replaces them with comments from Redd- ...oh. 
Aware. Got tired of all annoying stupid shit on it and came here . Ironically reddit is just as bad now. Man misc had some legendary threads tho. 
No just cats. But that's the real core of Reddit anyways. I think you could bring your own banana if you needed to measure the cats. 
I tried too, but there was no CTRL + Z and so I got really scared. 
Because real life use a different cheat code You have to go outside and find a girl and say "you are a 10/10 I will buy you rice" then you will get karma* *result may vary 
Every time. I do this on my phone daily. It goes something like this. Close Reddit app, open Facebook. See something funny posted there that I saw already on Reddit two weeks prior. Internal monologue, "I hate reposts, wonder what's new on Reddit." Open Reddit app. 
Well, when everything seems to be falling apart, I'm glad to see you here. 
Or there are some people that genuinely don't care about any of this, because reddit is pretty damn huge. I'd consider people who hate reddit (but are still inexplicably using it? probably because of the addiction we all have?) a vocal minority. O:) 
hey thanks for the feedback. points taken, will be addressing all of these in the near future. re: the facebook login, that's an add-on and not a required feature. obviously you can lurk, but more importantly there's a normal (non-FB) login which is what the vast majority of our users use. 
This, please make a mobile app, if you did I would move there instantly *Edited love to move* 
Also the voting system. It's different in the way that it stops downvoting with alts and also you need at least 100 upvotes to start downvoting. 
But that expansion of other sites would take a lot of time and money. It's not going to happen overnight. 
"5709 Shares 0 Comments" Yeah that's what gets me. It might be a fine site that has it's uses but it in no way replaces reddit. 
Anyone wanna help me with my startup idea: scissr, like grindr but for lesbians 
Yeah, I was active there from 2006 - 2011. I still don't think I have laughed harder at anything on the internet than when I read the Maladrox worst date ever thread. 
Wait, we don't get to cash in all our karma at the end... Fuck. 
I really think a patch should be released to fix this. It's too damn risky without the CTRL + Z feature. 
Indian weddings 8/10 Indian weddings with rice 10/10 
My thought process: "I need a break from Reddit." *Closes browser on PC* ... *Pulls out phone and opens Reddit app.* 
A few technical points to what he added: 1) No way to go from mobile site to full site. I have a nice big tablet and like to see the real thing. 2) Return to Top arrow gets hidden a bit by the article cards 3) Think about a loading icon when your infinite scroll has to load. Just enough that people know it's not a rendering issue on their end, but a data load. 4) The menu dropdown on mobile isn't scrolling. Attempting to do so was scrolling the main article page, not the "subreddit" list. As someone who's been doing web dev for 15+ years, good luck, keep iterating, and try to actually get some sleep now and then! 
we're planning on doing exactly that, waiting for the main platform to be more stable before committing to a native app dev path 
That's because voat has servers comprised of two univacs and a decomposed turnip 
There aren't even comments per say. There are only notes, which comprise of reblogs and likes. Sometimes when someone reblogs something (akin to retweeting so that it can be on their own blog) they will add their own little comment. However, seeing this comment means scrolling though all the notes, and with popular posts approaching 100,000+ notes this is near impossible. It's pretty fucking confusing at first and stifles discussion. But, tumblr was never really meant for discussion. I think at first it was supposed to be to share artsy/aesthetic stuff that stood on its own without discussion. Now, it's really good for humorous stuff (my personal favorite and what I follow on my tumblr because yeah tumblr humor is pretty silly but to be honest it's also pretty fucking hilarious and can be funnier than reddit in a lot of cases). It's a nice break from reality. But not a good site for in depth discussion. 
It takes a certain type of person to even make an account on a porn website. 
If those people posted on reddit they'd be considered trolls... if they posted on 4chan they'd be considered "professional" trolls... Sadly though they are not trolling, they're speaking their true opinions most of the time. 
Is that real? Are you effing fucking with me? I have to see that link, please. 
You wouldn't like it. I think there are about 100 players, 70% of which just bot all day because it isn't moderated anymore. 
Even reddit karma whores can't make the karma required to become a multibillionare at that price. 
Same in Australia. I think it's just an American thing. 
working on it! give us several days to iron out the bugs :) 
I'm just waiting for them to improve their servers. I want to browse, but it's down a lot. 
People are calling what just happened things like The Darkening, Victoria Day, and AMAgeddon 
anything with a comment section can be a social network if we try hard enough 
The privacy settings for some videos on some sites are set so that it takes an account to view. Not a friend, a password, or some kind of approval, just any account. Making an account with a throwaway email address (a lot of porn sites still accept Mailinator and similar) takes a few minutes, which seems like seconds when you're in the zone. 
I don't know anything about what you guys are talking about but I'm assuming numbers would rise at least a little if they made it joinable 
It is an American thing. In fact the full stop/period was derived from a greek method of punctuation that used dots at various heights, at baseline, mid height, and above, around where an apostraphe is. The apostraphe height dot was used similarly to how a full stop is now, while the baseline dot acted as a comma. Eventually the baseline dot became known as a period. When the full stop punctuation migrated to the baseline, britain retainedbthe name full stop where as in America the name that already existed for a dot at the baseline, period, was used instead. Language is fun! 
The thing that comes out fills my thirst/food? I'm kinda hungry but don't know if it's toxic. Maybe it's unlimited food supply? 
I visibly winced. Well done. I'd give you gold, but fuck giving money to this site right now. 
AMAgeddon is pretty good. The darkening seems like a stretch. Victoria Day a solid second place. 
Once saw a novelty account on PH called "disappointed parent", he would comment on the videos and say something along the lines of, "why would you do something like this? You had so much potential. Your mother and I are very disappointed with you". 
I lost it at, "I wouldn't mind being water boarded by her squirting pussy." 
I've never run into this before(videos that require accounts) Maybe I'm just a scrub, but could you give examples as to which sites you've seen this on? 
And it ends with him still being convinced that he's right. 
I think the best part for me is when I realized there was a second page. 
 On behalf of people named Josh, I'd like to apologize on behalf of thejosh for making the world that much dumber. I can promise you all that we are not all that stupid. 
They opened up RSC like twice in the past 3 years. The number of members online increased for like 2 weeks and then the hype and nostalgia went away and it was back to ~100 people online. 
Yes If you do it forever you will achieve immortality Your prostate might burst though 
"He fuck that ass so good his cock left its initials in tomorrows shit." 
I lost it at "i made a calendar with dots so you can count the days" 
After I read the first page, I noticed there was 5! I had to jump to the last page and get the thrilling conclusion to how many days are in a week! 
For being really dense, she had some very impressive mental footwork. 
It isn't so much math as it is English comprehension. People use "miles per hour" as a measurement without thinking about what the actual words are and what the measurement actually means. Anyone who can figure out 80 miles per hour means going 80 miles for every 60 minutes would know the answer immediately. I think more people would answer correctly if they read it instead of hearing it. 
This train was carrying live nuclear warheads. All of them blew up. 
It's definitely nostalgia. I started playing Runescape like a month after it started and quit in maybe 2005 or so, coming back for a couple months now and then for the next few years. Runescape 2 (RS2007 now) is a really great game and is still a lot of fun, more fun than RS3 is now to me, although I haven't played a TON of it like previous iterations. Runescape Classic, though, is reeeally primitive now. I play a lot of old games, too, but RSC is so basic it's crazy. It's not really much fun whereas RS2007 is still fun to play to this day. 
Actually reduces the risk of prostate cancer. A.k.a. immortality. 
Hopefully you make appointments to go every other day, so 8 times in 2 weeks 
They just let him end it with the most retarded phrase of the whole thread. The whole time his point was there were 8 workout days in 2 weeks, working out every other day, and then at the VERY END he just fucking says "My point was proved by smarter people, if you take a single week, not two weeks, just a single week, and workout every other day, you can workout 4 days a week, the end, stop bitching." That wasn't even his original point. I've lost faith in people's intelligence. 
My summer job is at a storage facility and SO many people have to ask me how many square feet a 10x10 is or a 10x20, some people even get me to read them ALL off the list of unit sizes. They don't even catch on after the first few..... 
It's too well done to be a troll. Justin can see that Josh is wrong but fails to present his argument in a clear enough way to break through Josh's stubbornness. Meanwhile Josh isn't really trying to understand Justin's thought process but trying to convince Justin with his own flawed logic. 
There were several points where the misunderstanding between them was stupidly obvious yet they continued to argue... 
Try to hold out. It'll all be worth it once you're blowing your load to some dank ass memes 
After reading some cringe-worthy ones, this one is absolutely beautiful! 
There's no law in Bologna against drink on the street Source: I often go there 
My dad apparently did this in Japan when he was stationed there in the 80s. Young black Marine in Okinawa? *No way he understands Japanese*, is what the girls on the bus giggling about how cute he was must've thought. He waited until his stop, then said "thank you" directly to them in Japanese as he left. 
One time I was at a CVS and this girl (around 11-12?) asks her mom (while looking at me) "Do you think she's pregnant or fat?" Her mom just asked, "what do you think?" Which, in my opinion is not the appropriate response. So I just said in fluent Spanish; "You know other people speak Spanish, right?" The kid didn't hear but asked her mom what I said, so mom sheepishly repeated that I understood them. That kid looked dumbstruck and the mom seemed pretty ashamed too - and this was *spanish* in *florida*. 
Isn't "przepraszam" the name of the condition when you still have an erection after 4 hours? 
That awkward moment when people living in the middle east even know about fucking Detroit man. 
Getting complimented was probably a very positive experience for those Amish girls, especially in their native language. For once, their antiquated clothing wasn't a source of derision. Sounds like a good opportunity to make friends and get acquainted with their old German dialect, if anything. 
Wish more people knew how to speak kindly or don't speak at all. 
I work at a Mexican cafe and we ask customers the same thing, pretty sure I've witnessed a couple similar exchanges. The worst part, for me, is that I look Latina but *barely* speak any Spanish. So many white people come in and try to order in broken Spanish and it's just embarrassing for both of us! 
I love this shit. Like no, you feigning ignorance isn't going to somehow make your problems go away. Good on your dad 
... how awkward was it, sitting there drinking that tea? 
My Maori class in high school often got a Hawaiian substitute teacher as she could understand Maori due to the similarities. 
What a champ! Upvote for people actually getting along. 
TFW You are Chinese and white people know more Mandarin than you do 
That's shitty. Ignoring the fact what he did was fucking horrible, it's,a stupid assumption to think your grandfather wouldn't understand. Italian and Romanian have a lot in common, they're both romance languages. I can (mostly) understand when my Romanian friends argue amongst themselves. Not everything, but I get the gist. 
That's cute as fuck. I hope you teased her about it, in french of course. 
Yep I understand enough to know I'm being insulted but not enough to fight back. Plus even if I could I'd be to scared to because I'd mess something up. 
It's interesting how similar Italian and Spanish are. When I visited Rome a few years back I had a long conversation with my taxi driver in English, Spanish, and Italian. When we couldn't understand one language or find the words, we would switch. It was a crazy experience, but I look back on it fondly. 
During my senior year of undergrad I had a Chinese professor that pronounced bonus as boners and it took serious effort not to giggle like a child. If I heard a foreigner talking about blowing into a vagina as an instrument I would not be able to contain myself. 
French in Toronto? Yeesh, I wouldn't assume any language is "safe" in Toronto, especially one of the official languages of the country... 
I sometimes get the idea Germans think that everyone in the world can understand German. **Dutch guy on vacation in Germany asking a question to a local**: Tries to speak his best German and lots of pointing and gesturing. **German guy on vacation in Netherlands asking a question to a local**: Starts speaking in German, gets mad when not understood. 
Hey! My dad has a story with knowing Mandarin too! My dad and mom were in a really cold place and couldn't get a hotel room so they were trying to sleep in the car, but it was just too freezing. So they went into this casino late at night and my dad started playing poker at a table with a couple college students. They started shit talking my dad in Mandarin, and since they didn't think he'd know the language they were using the language to cheat. Telling each other their cards and stuff to try to screw over my dad. Well my dad is your typical white American but he used to have a secretary who spoke Mandarin and she would teach him a little every day. So my dad just listened to them talk and ended up winning a good chunk of their money. Then he called them stupid in Mandarin and walked out. 
Reminds me of a Welsh father and daughter visiting Brittany. The innkeeper speaks in Breton about serving the Englishmen crap, since they can't tell anyway, and the dad goes "how dare you call me English" in Welsh! 
I'm Chinese Jamaican! Once when I was young, and out in the yard playing by myself, the water commission man came up to my gate and said he needed to check the meter. I didn't answer at first cause i was alone and skeptical, so i guess he thought i didn't understand English and started speaking real slow and exaggerated with his hands mimicking drinking a glass of water. And then i say, "yeah i understand, the meter is ova dere" He seemed quite taken aback, after all the theatrics haha 
Well with a name like that, I'm not surprised the compliments are few and far between! 
I'm a white girl in Phoenix and Spanish speakers assume we can't understand them allllllll the time. I'm by no means fluent or even proficient, but I know enough to know when people are saying rude shit and most born-and-raised Arizonans can too. Not to mention there are a lot of white people from Spanish speaking countries who are fluent and they should know that................. 
"Oh shit! The Jews are onto us. Give them an even bigger discount!" 
They actually quit lol? I'd wait and see what happened 
Similar story but mine involved 3 gay dudes speaking Norwegian, getting in an elevator with me, and talking about my butt while we went up 30 stories. I learned a little Norwegian for a guy I had a crush on and can understand some but definitely wouldn't try to speak it. When I got off I said in English "I'm taken otherwise I'd take you up on the offer". They all got this shocked half-grin and I winked and smiled as the doors closed. I then tripped on my luggage and was glad they didn't see me fall into a potted plant. 
Picturing the most Texan of Texans with cowboy boots, hat, and belt buckle so large it would kill whatever you struck with it, holding up the bluest of unfading blue jeans. 
He almost hit you with his car, and YOU apologized for swearing at him?? What the fuck? 
Hey, the not so good looking ones clean up nice. They just need a little polish. 
With Spanish quickly becoming so commonplace, it seems especially stupid to assume there was no chance they could be understood. But in Florida? 
How old Asian women view everyone in the world: 1. "Here, eat a lot of food, you're fat I know you can finish it!" 2. "You're so skinny! You need more food, here, eat a lot!" Source: Am Asian. 
It's also great when you're fluent in the language and they comment on how wonderful your Chinese is yet refuse to speak to you in Chinese and insist on using their broken English instead so you can't understand anything they're saying. 
Well do you hang your street lights from the trees? 
I live near a large arab community in detroit. Many iraqis say detroit is more dangerous then where theyre from in iraq 
I agree! All these stories could be avoided through general respect for other people. 
I have no shame, so I am one of those people that order in bad spanish. Got to learn somehow :D. 
Haha yea, especially if they're laughing too. Maybe it's social anxiety on my part. 
Its the most common thing in the universe. That's why its also not always the best idea to go to the most tourist rich areas as that's where you'll most likely get pickpocketed as there are plenty of oblivious people in those places. Its also good to try and not look like a tourist so that you don't attract too much attention. 
Brazilians, I believe, is the most ethnically diverse people in the planet. They come in all race. I train Brazilian Jiu Jitsu and 2 of my Brazilian instructors look Italians (one even having an Italian surname) while 2 have Japanese surnames. &nbsp; Heck, they kinda made their own race called the Pardo. Theyre very diverse. Portuguese is one of the most dangerous language to assume someone does not know. 
Put it in past tense: I am Hungarian I simply don't understand the difference between "bought" and "boat", pronounciation wise. Bee, oooooo, tee. I get it there are supposed be to all kinds of ouauoau kind of sounds in English, but that sounds complicated, just stick to oooooooo. Boooooot. 
I know love kills hate, but damn if it isn't tempting to fight fire with fire. 
In my experience, young budget travelers are usually really casual and cool to each other which is awesome 
I think he's saying they had hired local kids, but caught them stealing and offered to let the lady watch the surveillance tapes as proof. 
Basically me in Canada. Sometimes some non-Asian dudes would start speaking ultra fluent Mandarin to me and I respond with some gibberish. 
that's a really uplifting story, thanks for sharing it put a smile on my face! 
You have the opportunity to get laid thousands (dozens, if you use reddit) of times, but you only have a few golden opportunities to embarrass someone beyond belief. 
Yeah I mean this is the gist of the story as it's been told to me, so I suppose it's possible that my grandpa gave him some reason to believe he couldn't understand. I know by this point and basically for the rest of his life, he was pretty instinctively suspicious of any possibility of anti-Semitism so it's not unimaginable to me that he might've intentionally put himself in a position to understand things the doctor might not have said to his face. 
I know right, if my girlfriend's sister said I was cute I would be very humbled. Actually I would be more surprised as to why would I give my imaginary gf a sister in the first place? 
It's definitely tough. There's a reason why many if not most young Asian Americans generally aren't too fluent in their native tongues, unless they are diligent in learning it from an early age. 
I'm fluent in Spanish and spent a summer abroad in Italy. They're similar enough that Italian words started to replace my Spanish vocabulary, and I didn't realize it until I got back home and kept using the wrong words. It would take a lot of work to keep the two wholly separate. 
oh god, marrying into that family would have been HELL. 
Oh come ON I missed an opportunity for the BEST INSULT EVER!! Shit! And it's not incorrect lol. My dad would cut a bitch if he had his cooking insulted 
I didn't really expect them to stay composed, but it was in the curriculum, so I just went with it. "You buzz into it like this, pfvvfffzzzt!" 
I think they had recently arrived and only assumed that it's a big Anglo city and didin't know that there were many of us who could speak fluent French. 
The thing is, most of us sat through 9 years of it in school, so while most of us don't speak or write the language, we can stumble our way through reading and listening to it... and absolutely learned every naughty word we could. 
It must be frustrating when you have two languages of similar origin. It's like you can *kind of* get the gist of what the other guy is saying and it must seem easy to just switch your umlauts for double aa's but in the end no one can understand each other. 
In most American casinos nowadays, it's explicitly stated in the table rules that only English can be spoken at the poker table for this very reason. 
Reminds me of this video of a lady at a Chinese restaurant yelling at the cashier. She says, "Well fuck you!" a pause, the cashier collects his words, and screams "FUCK YOU TOO BITCH" 
Buddy had similar in Poland. Comment was made in Polish along the lines of 'Fucking English wanker', to which my Irish buddy replied, in Polish, 'Fuck you, I'm an Irish wanker, not fucking English!". He and the Pole ended up drinking together for the night, as the Pole insisted on buying him at least a couple of drinks! :-D 
Interestingly, I have run across quite a few Germans in the United States who were here to do Easy Rider like American motorcycle tours. Kind of a shocker when the big bad biker looking dude with the American flag bandana opens his mouth to ask for directions and you realize he is in fact German as all fuck. 
I once had a very (apparently) drunk Englishman yell out to anyone who would listen that he found the only American with a passport while at a train station in Spain. The irony was that I was speaking in Spanish at the time to someone else, and he noticed the tag on my luggage that said USA. I truly do understand where the stereotypes come from. I just dislike them a great deal. They don't apply to nearly as many people as they think. 
It's a merc driver - it's a wonder they even stopped! 
I don't understand why this is so shocking. People gossip and whisper and snark in English in front of English understanding people *all the fucking time*. Some people are assholes. 
This is everyone's grandma everywhere, it's a relic of a time before the obesity epidemic. 
I don't understand this one bit. Is this a cultural thing? I mean, anyone can learn their language. Are they shocked that someone can speak Cantonese or Mandarin? I can see Cantonese more but Mandarin is different. It's not *as* difficult as Cantonese from my understanding. 
Do you hang your street lights from the polish people?! 
You missed out. If she weren't interested, she wouldn't have commented. 
Hell they can be speaking English and if they laugh I'll think it's about me 
Step 1: Be a tourist Step 2: Don't look like a tourist Got it! 
There's a joke that Brazilian passports are the most sought after in the market because of that diversity. Anyone can pass as a Brazilian when there's no defining characteristics. 
This might not help at all, idk, but bought is pronounced more like "bawt", and boat is pronounced more like "bote". 
Think of it like this: Fight fire with fire, and the nasty person will leave with a satisfying, self-rigtheous anger, and they will feel like their prejudices were confirmed. Be polite, and you've just saddled them with guilt and embarrassment. 
I guess when you really work for a trip and consider it "traveling" or "exploring the world" rather than "vacation" it can make a big difference in attitude 
That is an especially astute and shrewd way of operating. It is probably the reason we are all reading this post. Thank you for sharing! 
Hypothetical incest-y threesomes, I would imagine. 
I learned Spanish french and Italian in high school, to compliment my english. I've given up on trying to know if I'm using the correct word. 
Did you end up "ruining" his college football career? 
You came pretty damn close saying how they didn't teach their kids Italian... 
I was born and raised in Tennessee and my written English is flawless while my spoken English is trash. 
Most people I know are capable of understanding a French conversation. Don't speak French in Toronto if you're trying to be covert. 
We're only polite when travelling abroad. When in Canada we're all assholes. Especially Torontonians. 
I'm an english/german speaker. When travelling through the Netherlands I can read pretty much anything but there's no way I can speak any of it. I never know what to do when I go in a filling station or Mcdonalds other than stand there looking stupid and saying "errr english/german?'. 
Hahah dude, the same thing happened here far away from Germany. I was serving a German couple in a shop and listening to them complain about the price of the discount goods in German, but I held my tongue and kept speaking English to them. Then when I finished the sale the lady said "You should learn German", so I replied in German, "I do know German, you should know English." And her husband started laughing. Truth is, knowing how to say I know German is one of the few sentences I know in German. 
To be fair a lot of Americans do this in English. Source: am American, have grandparents 
I've never seen a man ride a bike wearing socks and sandals. That must be quite a sight. 
It's especially odd because for most Europeans, the only Americans that they come into contact with are categorically well traveled. 
Speaking the language in a conversation is the best way to learn it, and a lot of people in China have little access to fluent/native English speakers but know that knowing English opens a lot of doors. So they don't really care if you speak Chinese, because you're an opportunity to practice English. 
She even did the hard work and broke the ice for you. At that point all you had to say was "great, come on over!" If they say no, there's no embarrassment on your side anyway... you were just responding to her invitation! If anything she would look silly for refusing at that point, not you. 
Its like spelling in Danish, Swedish, and Norwegian. Speaking over chat, I have trouble keeping the different spellings separate. If im unsure of the word, I'll devote about two seconds trying to think about it then tell myself "whatever, they'll know all 3". 
He ruined it for himself. Tried to be a professional poker player. I'm sure she blamed it on my devil vagina and it's evil powers though 
so now i'm picturing a japanese guy making his way through a crowd yelling "WHATEVER! WHATEVER! WHATEVER!" 
Also if you are trying to be covert in Toronto do not speak: - Spanish - Chinese (all dialects) - Hindi - Vietnamese - Tagalog - Urdu - Tamil - Tigrinya - Arabic - Italian - Greek - English - Patois - Portuguese - Brazilian Portuguese - Turkish - Farsi - Korean There are others, these are just the ones I've heard on the bus/subway. 
Ha! I'm English and know some German and I love Dutch for the fact that it's a language I don't know but if I read it out loud with a strange accent it somehow turns into something I can get the gist of. Possibly my favourite language as it surprises me every time I see it and somehow understand it. 
That is very true. That is how I learned Spanish so well (While annoying some hispanics with my then terrible Spanish) This makes it a lot more relatable. 
My uncle who moved to Switzerland is now fluent in "scouse frenglish". I barely understood him before, and now I don't even try. 
Especially because in mexico they don't call sandwiches "emparedados". They call them "sandwiches" or "tortas" (although a torta is a special, deliciously mexican kind of sandwich) Also, they call pork "puerco" and the animal "cerdo" TheMoreYouKnow.gif 
That's some powerful voodoo. I hope to find me a girl like that one day! 
OH GOD NOT THE SPEED HOLES, I STILL HAVE WAFFLE MARKS FROM LAST TIME 
So I pretty much could've just said "pork sandwhich" and I'd be good? What's the point Damnit. 
Lmao yeah, pretty much. Although in my experience, mexicans (and most latin americans) find it endearing that you are trying to speak their language, and it helps soften your image from "loud gringo demanding food" to "look, he's trying! He's asking for a pork sandwich the weirdest way, let's put extra meat in it" 
Bloody Mary technology had not reached Mexico by my last visit in the early 00s. Bartenders would try, but it was always a sort of brown sludge. In an attempt to help, using my high school Spanish, I asked for the next one to be made with more tomato juice and less Worcestershire sauce. ("En el proximo de esos, por favor, mas de jugo de tomate y menos de salsa de Worcestershire" or something like it.) I was given a lowball glass of Worcestershire on the rocks. 
Assuming you can get underneath I think you're home free. 
You jerk it off.... *and it just jerks you off right back.* 
yeah, but how big is a t-rex's dick? if it's more than one's arms can loop around it'll be harder to properly stimulate. it'll make it more difficult, so not sure if harder or not. 
If you think of them more like lizards then the two wiener type..if you think of them more like chickens then a cloaca? a cloaca either way but..maybe a double dongus on ta dingus? 
Where I live op submitted at 5am. That could be the end of a fantastic night. 
Don't you hate it when you're jacking off and the post stops mid-sentence and you have to find something else to finish to? 
Did you mean Deinonychus instead of Deinocheirus? Because Deinonychus was a raptor, and Deinocheirus was a giant, elephant sized, really weird camel looking dinosaur. Adult Deinonychus were probably too big to climb trees very often, but the young ones likely did. So you don't have to worry about trees, just the wolf sized killing machines with knife claws and sharp teeth. The funny thing about Spinosaurus is that even though it's one of the longest theropods ever (it might be the longest) it had really short legs, and was semi-aquatic. So a Spinosaurus dong might not be out of reach, but it still wouldn't be easy to jack off. 
It's certainly less shit than half the other stuff on the front page. At least it's not asked every week. 
...is there a situation where a dinosaur wouldn't be aggressive? 
Probably a prospective members list for a "Cloaca cult". 
I mean you'd need a cherry picker right? And then even if you could get your arms round it's dick, you'd need someone to move the cherry picker up and down. Then there's the risk of it sending you flying when it shoots it's load. 
Not if it runs away. What are you gonna do, cling to it's smooth underbelly? 
What you consider a low effort post, I consider the most original post in months. 
You just added to the hilarity I picture OP running away from a dino with a hard on whilst trying to fear wank himself off 
Scientists have narrowed down a t Rex's penis size from 10 inches to twelve feet long. 
Im sure this exact situation is on the internet somewhere 
I find collecting bull semen to be quite satisfying. Probably not the best choice if you're watching your sodium or cholesterol though. 
Keep telling yourself that. Try jerking off a lion and get back to me 
What made you feel the need to describe Roman numerals mid-comment? 
Reminds me of this strange cartoon I watched on pornhub where it was jack and the giant bean stalk except there were two giants, wife and husband, and the wife was nice and wanted to save jack from her evil husband. Logically, her next step was to shove him up her pussy, but then her husband came back and fucked her with jack still in there 
Thanks for the info, I learned something new today! I still think they'd be super hard to jack-off though. 
I dream of a day where we can use the power of dinosaur ejaculation to propel ships to space... 
Well, you mayyy already be holding on to a handle of sorts. 
Shit yes, it's a nice alternative from "guys / girld of Reddit, how do you feel about X etc" 
Is Utahraptor found to the west of Coloradoraptor? :D 
Well I mean, technically there would just be a cloaca. 
Well, there wasn't that much variance, but people don't really care too much to study their exact lengths, so we give a guesstimate 
Do these scientists also work for Comcast Tech support? 
yeah, but if you can only stroke the underside it'll be more difficult to get it off. makes both harder and softer. 
Fuck one, kill one, marry one: * Brontosaurus * paleontologist with a hammer and a dinosaur cock shaped dilldo * Sonic the Hedgehog 
Ducks are actually kind of unusual among birds in that respect. In that they have penises at all, that is. They aren't even present in all duck species. 
Duuuuude. I think that's supposed to be topical only. 
Oh wow, that took me a minute. Think I'll take the advice of that top comment and go to bed. 
Today I Learned that pterosaurs are harder to jack off than dinosaurs. Choosing the wrong prefix will spell certain death. 
I'd go with the Quetzalcoatlus northropi, one of the largest flying creatures ever. 
Is there a charity I can donate to for your kids since they'll be growing up without a dad? 
Too late to explore the Earth, just in time to ride dinosaur ejaculate to explore dank memes. 
But then you're getting dragged behind, under the tail. You know, the crushing armored meat rope of death? Plus you're dragging his dick into the dirt at top speed. Suffice it to say, that wouldn't be fun for anyone. 
I believe the classic that gets thrown around is: "Guys/girls of Reddit, what's the sexiest thing you've ever sexed" 
Are we assuming that dinosaurs even had penises? They're bird ancestors. Birds tend to be lacking this piece. 
No, but southwest of Dakotaraptor (which also was quite large). 
All (true) dinosaurs are somewhat related to turkeys 
Well, at the very least make a small game where you romp around destroying shit while people run in fear. Or, you know, make a game about jerking dinosaurs off. That sounds cool too. 
You should have internet back sometime between two hours from now and 82 days. 
I never thought I'd see discourse about whether or not jerking off a t Rex would be easy 
And so much more research being made on birds flapping. 
I didn't get to Ostrich dick until 7:20 AM. I am behind. 
Fuck brontosaurus to show dominance, marry paleontologist cause woman on the street freak in the sheets and kill sonic cause i hate all of his games. 
The tail isn't the meat rope you should be concerned with. 
No it's "((((sexy)))) people of reddit, what's the sexiest sex you ever sexed? SEX " 
What gets me is we're also assuming that girls don't masturbate They do masturbate I've seen it (and not just in porn) 
I for one always have a battle to the death with our turkeys. Makes for an extremely satisfying dinner. thescarsaren'tnicethough 
That is the best dinosaur pun I've ever seen. And now that Dakotaraptor actually is a thing it just makes it so much better. 
Sure, but raptors in particular are pretty closely related to birds. 
What, you've never thought about spraying your juices all over a brontosaurus while riding it in the sunset? What a weirdo, right guys? Guys? 
Guaranteed we'll dispatch a tech before Armageddon. 
And as every farm girl knows (puns invited & appreciated), horse sperm is easily obtained using already existing "apparatus," YouTube phantom vagina for your t-Rex prototype- let's call it the t-sex. six brave men could maneuver the t-sex like pallbearers. Better yet, rig a fiat. Reverse, drive, reverse, drive... On second thought, rig a faster car in case it turns out that t-Rex kill their mates. I figure if you rig up enough of these t-sexmobiles, satisfied customers could soon lead to outright domestication and save humanity from certain extinction. 
kill sonic ~~cause i hate all of his games~~ so that all of the chaos emeralds will finally be mine! AAAHH hahahah! 
I was worried no one was gonna hit it. But you seem to be on (or under) the ball 
I'm afraid it's sex all the way down (or up) SEXSEXSEXSEXSEXSEX 
Well yeah, but the question was "jerk off" not "finger blast" 
I never have before, but I'm thinking about it now... 
Ahh. The Lusty Argonian Maid. In which a creepy old imperial makes innuendos with his obliviously hot maid. 
"T-Rex- they have very tiny hands, folks- I've been told, sitting with friends, they all say, 'Oh, you know so much about Tyrannosaurus boner, and Jurassic boners as a whoIe,' and this is fact, folks." 
Are you kidding? This more first date material honestly. 
"tiny hands, VERY MUCH unlike myself, i have the biggest hands" 
We have to build an electric fence, folks. The dinosaurs are getting out, eating all the people - and I'm sure some of them are good dinosaurs, but the fact is they're eating the people. We will spare no expense and we will make Jurassic Park great again. 
Jurassic Park isn't sending us their best dinosaurs folks, I can tell you that. They're sending us their drug dealers and their rapist dinosaurs. 
I had the same situation with my first grade teacher! Except she said that Antarctica was *the largest* continent. Then I went home, and my dad explained to me that the teacher was incorrect. Went back to school the next day, told the teacher that Antarctica was not the largest continent at all, but she wouldn't believe me, and I didn't know how to argue back then, so... yeah... 
There is a set of identical quads that grew up down the road from me. 
So if enough polar bears stood next to each other i'd finally have fast fiber internet? 
They're teaching you to run fast and limit your competition's resources. 
Yeah, only friends do that, and sometimes a friend of a friend, but not randos. 
And pandas have recently been taken off the endangered list! They fucked! 
Thankfully not all teachers are like that. Had an English teacher claim I was wrong on an answer for a worksheet we were all reviewing. But instead of simply leaving it at that, she went out of her way to find out why. Turns out it was something from the next lesson that we hadn't gone over yet. One of my favorite teachers. 
... ashamed to say this, but TIL lemmings are actual creatures. And not, you know, just little men from that Rockstar game. 
"The US is moving towards the metric system, inch by inch." 
Deoxygenated blood is deep dark red and oxygenated blood is bright red. This is due to the oxidative state of the iron in hemoglobin. (source: I'm a doctor and see the stuff coming out of people all the time. Specifically, I often see blood coming from the arterial or venous system exclusively and the visual difference is significant). 
Elliptical orbit? Interesting... Not sure if the Flat Earthers will agree though. 
Yes! I was taught this in Nursing School!! Boy was I surprised when I started using a menstrual cup. 
At least you were taught that in grade 4. My grade 12 Canadian History class still taught that when the settlers came everything was joyous, and the fur trade was a turn of the century operation. Took an Aboriginal studies class in university and I was in shock. One of my favourite high school teachers either couldn't at the time or failed to even address the real reason behind reserves. 
The bystander effect is still a thing right? Only the example doesn't hold up. 
My son was taught that you had to have the same blood type as one of your parents. He told his teacher that his dad is O+, I'm A+, and yet he's O-, and the teacher gave him a funny look and told him that maybe we should have a talk. He came home in a panic and asked if he was the result of an affair. I was so pissed. Of course I had to be sarcastic about it. "You figured it out. Dad cheated on me and got pregnant which is the only way this could happen because *you look just freaking like him!*" He calmed down, did a bit of research, then apologized. 
In fourth grade, my teacher told me you can't multiply a multiple digit number by another multiple digit number. I protested and got disciplined for it. 
I never understood why people said this... It doesn't make any sense, because the wall is not wide, just long... 
I went in to Aerospace just for the math, and maybe do calculations 3-4 times a year. It's always discrete math or college level geometry to estimate things. None of the exciting math I learned. 
Yes! I remember teachers racing students in hand writing. Teachers would write the alphabet is cursive and students would do it in print. This was the only argument they used as to why cursive was "better." Then high school came and no one wrote in cursive and everything we handed in had to be typed. 
In grade school during the 70's, we were also taught that he sailed west to prove the world was round. 
When I read it years ago the biggest thing I couldn't get over was that the main character and her friend, both 15, ran away to another town for a month and opened up a boutique. Like, how would that work, even in the 1960's?! Who would rent shop space to a 15 year old?! I also remember that they painted the floor "like a candycane" or something and that sounded hideous. 
But I was taught differently. Prepositions are also definitely words you can end sentences on. 
In India we were thought math without calculators, and so even the dumbest of nuts could do some sort of mental math. Then we all went to university, where we could use the technology of calculators. By the next semester I was double checking if 4+2=6. 
She may have been a bit dim in terms of sarcasm. That was always just a joke. 
Seems madness to interpret the "learner types" like that. Pretty sure people have their preferred ways, given a certain set of criteria, but to think people can be one thing seems strange to me. 
And now people have started arguing that it's flat again. We've come full disk. 
I've seen the second thing happen, I'm more disappointed about all those free drugs we were told people were just DYING to give me 
I was never taught that A.D stood for 'after death'. My teacher said it was anno domini (not sure if I've spelt that right, I've typed it as it sounds). 
When we did our senior (high school) research paper....I made the mistake of loudly telling the teacher the subject I wanted to cover. Unfortunately she then decided that everyone would pick in alphabetical order. My name being near the end of the alphabet....some guy deliberately took my subject so I couldn't have it. He was making a face at me etc. when he chose it. So I had to choose nearly last, and ended up with a far less interesting (to me) topic. Joke's on him though. We basically did the entire paper in the library. The librarians had pulled aside all relevant books and put them on a cart. I finished a month long project in three days...and spent the rest of the time hogging the majority of "his" books. 
... ashamed to say this, but TIL the Lemmings was a Rockstar game. 
The problem is that schools seem to take the bullies' side. I was bullied. I reported them, but the school said they couldn't do anything based on just my testimony. If I fought back I'd be the one to be suspended, but not them because the school saw it as me initiating violence. I still have really dark thoughts of what I would do to them if I could go back in time. It kinda messed me up. 
"Don't hit at all if it is honorably possible to avoid hitting; but never hit soft" -Teddy Roosevelt 
The proper way is to ask him if he also gets an erection from the bullying. 
I've never heard of this before, but I'm guessing some schools tried to come up with a formulaic essay to get students through some test and once it was found to be successful other schools started copying it and then the practice spread. 
Look, if we adopted the metric system, when the temp hit 100 degrees, we would all die. Our lakes will boil. Do you want that? 
My first would have killed both my son and I. It's a fun fact I like to trot out when people get too preachy about how home births are the better option. Nope, modern medicine is amazing and ill be using it, thank you very much. 
The first was the main determiner. Even if you were a hard-labouring peasant man you had a better than 50/50 chance of seeing 60 if you survived to 18, but a woman of any class who survived to 18 had a less than 50/50 chance of seeing 40. Childbirth/pregnancy and burns (from cooking over open fires while wearing voluminous loose clothing) were the two major risks. This is why most European societies devised ways of handling a surplus of men. There were always far more monks than nuns, for instance, and far more priests (or men in 'minor orders') than either. Secular men, whether paupers or princes, tended to outlive their first wives. 
I'm pretty sure their main argument is just that they don't agree 
One of the reasons I started using a menstrual cup was because my doctor wouldn't believe me when I said I bled so much. I wanted to be able to quantify it. It turns out I was losing anywhere from 200 ml to 300 ml of blood per period. That is only counting cups I completely fill, not the partially filled ones or the overflow amount I lose directly into the toilet or leaked out onto the pad. 
God, this post just made me so angry. Fuck that guy. 
As someone that doesn't know the real reason for reserves. Could you kindly elaborate? 
Yeah I don't think that's right. The only reason the pilgrims survive the winter was because the Indians helped them out so there was at least some semblance of a good relationship. That's why they were giving thanks. 
Actually, the story was embellished by the police -- because several neighbors said they *did* call the police, and no one responded. So the police defended themselves with an aggressive "no one called the police" media push, which was picked up in a big way by the New York Times. But the "good" news is that the aggressive media coverage of this story, and resulting public outrage, helped lead to the establishment of the nationwide 911 emergency phone system. 
Sounds to me like me his teacher is the one who owed you an apology. Teachers deserve a helluva lot of latitude when it comes to matching up their education with what parents want, but insinuating that a kid might be the result of extramarital activities is pretty fucking inappropriate. 
I am often exposed to (US) elementary education majors in training. Their math phobia is astonishing and terrifying. Passing this on to their future students is in my opinion one of the major faults in education today. 
Jefferson Davis was the 17th and LAST president of the United States of America's government in exile. The People's Republic of America's first president was Lincoln. /s 
Right, like if you could see the wall . . . you'd definitely be able to see highways and stuff 
AIDS began when man ate monkeys. Some form of blood contamination happened probably someone cut themselves while butchering the ape and got infected that way. 
"Fish is only for sport, not for meat. Fish is practically a vegetable" 
Joke's on them: I combine cursive and print when I write. Sometimes even I can't read what I wrote! 
We were taught that in the 2000's as well. What a load of crap. 
Did you know the viking colonies tried to establish a friendly relationship with the natives they met? Trouble is, they gave the group they met milk as a gift, the entire tribe turned out to be lactose intolerant and assumed it was an attempt to poison them and get rid of them. 
You're lucky, my best friends older brother told us all about the birds and the bees. Lot of good info except for the part where the fuckin asshole said if we ejaculated before we hit puberty, blood would come out and it'd keep coming out until we died. 
I've heard that this "rule" was actually a holdover from Latin, in which you really can't end a sentence with a preposition. Zealous schoolmasters/scholars tried to apply it to English but it doesn't make a whole lot of sense in that. 
Yeah we had to do this experiment in class, some of us arrived to the conclusion that the tongue was able to taste everything pretty much everywhere (which is true) The teacher told us we were idiots and that we we shouldnt do science :D 
Basically the exact concept behind all "low fat" or "zero fat" foods that are all over the place. Ppl are slowly starting to realize that fat isn't bad for you but rather sugar is the main issue. 
Welcome to the first quarter of calc 1. Here is this formula for taking the derivitive that may be untenable for certain equations. Then in the second quarter, "Here is this easy way to take derivative*" 
Seem to remember being taught this for earthquakes as well... 
Right? This pops up every year around Halloween that everyone is giving out ecstasy or weed candy instead of real candy to kids and I'm like wtf, where are all these people giving away free drugs? No, seriously, where? 
Your spelling is correct, and it means "year of the lord", meaning his birth year. BC was later added, so there's no Latin equivalent. 
Oh, Lisa, you and your stories: "Bart is a vampire, beer kills brain cells." Now let's go back to that...building...thingy...where our beds and TV...is. 
While you're correct that mature neurons don't self-renew, there is actually a maintained population of neural progenitor cells throughout life that can differentiate into neurons! 
I see this marketed as natural organic anti-freeze. 
True. Some kid in my younger brother's class would pick on him all the time back in the grade school days. For the most part my brother would just take it because the offender was a douche. One day Douche stepped over the line and made my little brother cry. I threw the first punch, and you better believe I fought dirty. Fuck my pride. It was the only fight I even got into my entire life. He didn't pick on my brother again. 
My mum was just telling me about a kid that got expelled (not suspended, straight up kicked out of the school system) because he finally had enough of being bullied, snapped and beat the shit out of the bully. Broke the bullies nose, cheek, 2 ribs, and several fingers. Bully isn't even getting suspended, even though there is video proof and numerous witness statements (including one from a teacher) that he instigated it, and has been picking on the kid for months, if not years. 
Yeah. I had the same thing happen to me once getting to college. The 'formula' they used in high school was Intro: contains 3 ideas you want to talk about 3 Body Paragraphs: each one elaborates on one of the 3 ideas Closing: wraps up paper as well as 3 points and closes argument. That's how I wrote every paper all through high school and in college got slapped in the face with a Harbrace Handbook and was told to learn quick or fail. 
My mom would have died having my older sister, so I wouldn't have even lived to have my kid, who would have killed me too without modern medicine. Wooooo! 
I have learned that everybody outlives their wife from crusader kings two. It's nice too because then you can get better stat ones later. 
I know you're joking, but just wanted to say I remember reading in a book or article somewhere years ago that if every human being in the planet gathered in the same spot and jumped at the same time, the entire earth would move by less than the distance between the nucleus and electron of a hydrogen atom. 
I heard about this on NPR not too long ago--If I remember correctly, it was a "bad neighborhood" and the cops didn't feel obligated to respond to the calls. 
While still bad, I would not have assumed extramarital affair, I'd just assume I was adopted 
My mom has a masters in elementary education. She refused to teach anything above 3rd grade because she wasn't good enough at math. However, I don't think even she would have tried to pretend that negative numbers didn't exist. 
The top of the wall is like 15 feet closer to space though. 
to be fair... which story would YOU tell? the one where you ate some contaminated food? or the one where you fucked a monkey? 
The Graham Cracker has a similarly chaste food history. There was a whole movement of people in time thinking that the food you ate had huge impact on your self-control. 
"Skim milk. that's right, it's on here twice. avoid it" 
Same here. Was never taught separate handwriting systems, I mix them. My handwring is terrible. :( 
Zoologists were pretty surprised to learn this too. For decades, conventional wisdom was that were only two species of venomous lizards - the gila monster and beaded lizard. Then they started looking for venom proteins in saliva. Turns out instead of 2 venomous lizards, it's actually more like 1300. Also, almost all snakes have venom. 
I have a graduate-level college textbook for teachers that also states the same thing. It was treated as fact. The book was published in 2015. 
To make it even worse: He was sailing west on a wrong assumption. It was established fact that the world was round, just not how big it was. Most agreed on Eratosthenes' figures (about what we have established nowadays). Columbus thought it was only half as big, and so he could sail to **India** towards the west. If it wasn't for the then not so known continent of America he and his crew would have perished because of his ineptness of having a good estimate of the world's circumference. In conclusion he was not an exploring genius but an greedy idiot who got lucky. 
I'll tell you hwat, the VAST majority of drama on my facebook comes from people in the 50s to 70s, it's like they've regressed back to being moody and emotional teenagers, that or they just never grew up 
First time I jizzed I nearly fainted, I thought rubbing my dick somehow caused me to have a stroke (no pun intended) or a heart attack. 12 year old me was not very smart. 
My son did, it was adorable. He was scared and had tears in his eyes. He told me has was washing it and something happened. (He didn't have to say anything else. I knew) I said "oh, honey, I am sorry, that must have been scary huh? But you're okay, it's normal." And proceeded to explain the birds and the bees. It was the perfect moment to do so. 
I see we've found the guy who's STILL in school. 
The problem is actually the other way around: low fat products are a problem because they would taste like ass if the lack of fat wasn't (often) compensated for by tons of sugar. 
I think it's an aim high, shoot low kind of thing. Most people will fail to drink eight full glasses, but they might drink an extra glass or two along the way, which is exactly what they need. 
I grew up in Oklahoma "Tornado Alley". Tornado drills had us going to the hallway away from the glass windows, but for Nuclear war, we went under our desks. Even as a kid I thought it odd, we did more for a Tornado than a nuclear bomb. 
Unless it's a presidential election. Then these three don't matter because you know who's going to win each of them. 
Yeah I have a very different idea of what bullying entails. Murdering a dudes dog blows way past the bullying line. 
Don't get me wrong, dude was justified. Lot of blood for fourteen year old me to see, though. 
Funny enough, my high school writing teacher was all about getting us ready for college. Day one was 'ignore everything you've ever heard about the rule of 3's, write whatever is needed to make your point.' Then I got to college and about failed my first writing class because the teacher was a staunch proponent of the rule of 3's. She'd literally cross out any additional points and ignore them. If you only had 2 real points to make you got 66% on the paper at best. I argued every time that this was just bad writing, but she wouldn't have it. I submitted a few formal complaints to the school about it, but they said that I just had to follow her rules... so I literally dumbed all of my writing down to an elementary level for the rest of the semester and openly mocked it both in class and in writing. 
oh yea I forgot to factor that in to my calculations 
One day perhaps we will live in a world where such a magical place exists. 
So what are we supposed to call snakes that were previously thought to be non-venomous? Non-fanged? Less-venomous? Impotent? 
I'm guessing it was one of those instances where people knew about it for several years beforehand, but the scientific community wasn't going to endorse it as fact before it was fully proven. 
If you ever have some free time to do a little light history reading , check out "Lies My Teacher Told Me". 
Btw he didn't think he landed in India but rather Indonesia. Still totally wrong though... 
And I bet was still less than a week till you tried again, despite the risks 
Only on reddit is your kid telling you about a crywank 'adorable'. 
"Yeah, I got bullied a little growing up. You know, just your typical bully behavior. Stole my lunch money, tripped me in front of the whole class, murdered my dog then strung up and spray painted its corpse, made fun of my mom. You know, normal bully stuff." 
More than justified. Whatever a man does to your dog, you do double to them. 
And here I was thinking I just needed to kick kids in the crotch until they died. Thanks for clarifying. 
If your formal complaints had followed the rule of 3's, you may have gotten somewhere, as it would conform to the shape of argument they expect. It also would've disproved your point, being effective writing in the rule of 3's. You had no chance. 
I used to work in retail in Vancouver. American tourists would regularly ask me if we accept money in Canada. Enough said. 
How the fuck are you supposed to get pregnant with vaginismus then? "Oh, just endure the incredibly painful sex, it'll all work out" 
Maybe because it's a long-ass word? Imagine a first grader learning, "sight, touch, taste, proprioception"? 
Albeit, being a caffeinated atheist and agreeing with neither ancient nor fancier rules, it would really reinforce the problem for our species eightfold unless we deign to reissue a more efficient rule herein. For science, and leisure. 
I just pictured that scene from South Park where the internet dries up and Randy whacks it in the trailer 
There has been a suggestion of calling them "harmless", although more common is calling them "typical" snakes. 
Scientist here. We went through a lot of good scientists trying to prove that they had venom. 
I bought that when I started high school. Totally helped form my love of History. 
We were taught in school that is why they called Native Americans indians. 
Yeah yeah...wait..what was that middle thing again? 
If anyone did that to my dog they'd be a goner. And like someone else said if that was done to someone else's pet, and I heard about it I'd ask for another chair and jump in and ask if I could take some shots. 
I knew a girl once who seriously asked me if she needed a passport to visit New Mexico -.- ...... And this was back in the days that you didn't even need a passport to get into real Mexico! 
The assumption that "you'll change your mind" is pretty standard for a lot of women, in my experience. I've gotten it from other doctors as well, like neurologists. 
Just put it in a song and make it the long drawn out end of a line. 
The full phrase is actually "I before E, except after C, or when sounded like 'ay' also except glacier, atheist, caffeinated, being, albeit, ancient, neither, fancier, reinforce, spcies, eightfold, deign, reissue, efficient, herein, science and leisure" my nan always used to say this to me 
My history teacher actually assigned it as reading in 10th grade. 
"So, you're not Indians?" "No, that's a totally different place." ".....You're Indians." 
tripped him in the front of the whole class, that one? 
You still don't. Getting out of the US is easy. Getting back in on the other hand... 
Nah, they also solve things like: "Is there a way to buy a ton of Easter candy without looking like a greedy bitch?" and "I want to crawl into this sandbox without looking like a creep." 
Actually it's "I before E except after C and when sounding like EH as in neighbour and weigh and on weekends and holidays and all throughout may, and you'll always be wrong no matter what you say" 
Your teacher is the real MVP. BTW....better luck next season 
Hard to say. It will definitely appear in the history books. However, the importance of such events is so heavily dependent on what happens in the future. If there's another World War-style conflict ten years down the road, there's a good chance that the ripples of the Brexit will be considered as a possible catalyst. If it ends up not being such a huge deal and things stabilize rather quickly, probably just a sentence. 
Short term: Medium sized economic upheaval Long term: Nobody really knows 
I think the scottish people will ask for another vote to leave the UK - and rightly so. One of the main points of them staying was that they wanted to stay part of the EU. Now they got fucked over by the UK. 
my Tory safe seat Southern England constituency voted to Remain, despite my dad's best efforts. I think down here, we're all too shocked at the result to take it in. My dad reckons, with over half the population voting for a Brexit, there would be riots if it were ignored. Revolutions, maybe. People are angry with Europe 
From the British people I know, it's a little bit of both. 
As an Irish Living In Germany. Am just gonna go to the Pub, have a Guiness and wait for this all to blow Over 
South Park is gonna be cancelled next year. There is simply no way they can top reality in ridiculousness anymore. 
It feels like we're witnessing the rise of a New Nationalism across the globe. This is a frightening time. Decisions made in anger, popular doctrine calls for circling the wagons to keep "outsiders" out, anti-intellectualism, more focus on controlling the narrative than fact finding... This is populism at its worst (demagoguery) and probably the best argument against democracy as governance. With hatred and fear getting legitimized, we start down a slippery slope. Watch for more restrictive (but popular) policies, suspension of laws, then institutionalized segregation, internment, violence. This movie has played before. I really wish young people would get out there, agitate, and commit to voting. We need to stem the cynicism before we wind up in 1930s Europe again, wondering how we got there. 
This is the reason the polls changed at the last second. 
If he didn't push for a referendum he wouldn't have been elected again. 
It hasn't always been so popular - it definitely has grown in the past few years. At least, in the public eye. 
It might mean the end of the UK first. It's a huge middle finger to the Scottish, and I'm sure Northern Ireland doesn't like the upcoming border situation. Referendums are going to be all the rage the next couple months and years. 
Where are you in Denmark? I'll happily hide you in my basement. 
We're all basically in that boat. It could lead to the breakup of the U.K., the breakup of the EU, both, neither, or the UK becoming much more closely aligned with US politics. This is to say nothing of the economic questions, which are even more unknown. It's a giant serving of "I dunno, lol" to the entire western world. 
For all we know a "leave the EU" vote could trigger another Scotish referendum to leave UK! Man, this is getting more and more interesting. 
Investors who are smart will probably be reaping in the differences! Tons of $$$ for those who know how to ride such rare and huge currency fluctuations. 
OH THAT'S WHY IT'S CALLED BREXIT BRITAIN + EXIT = BREXIT I THOUGHT BREXIT WAS A PERSON 
I am finally on the property ladder and moving into my house today. I fear that my mortgage will be so high, my living costs will go up and that I will have little money outside of bills. I fear that I won't be able to travel anymore. I fear my sector (education) will take massive cuts and make my job even harder. I fear that the good that the EU have done for us - especially for our careers - will start to become undone. I'm only 23 and my future was looking so bright, now I'm terrified for everything that is now going to happen. 
You know in the old days, when a young man was a strong man all the people they'd step back when a young man walked by. But you know nowadays it's the old man, He's got all the money and a young man ain't got nothin' in the world these days 
Yep. A lot are celebrating Cameron's resignation as if it was the original intended goal for this whole referendum. 
That's what happens when you don't address people's concerns (ongoing for years) in a satisfactory or adequate manner. 
Lets get some good old fashioned trade wars on the go. Maybe one of our subs could sink a cargo ship under controversial circumstances. You know, take things slow. Work our way back to the glory days of the 20th century. 
This will have strong ripples. There are already calls from right wing parties in the Netherlands and France to have their own EU referendums, this could be the beginning of the end for the EU. 
It could also lead to independence votes for Scotland(again) and Northern Ireland as they voted to stay in. 
Until today, London was the hub for the world's banks in the EU. A lot of foreign banks will be downsizing London and moving to (if I had to guess) Berlin. So much of London was built on international trade, that city is in for a huge wake up. 
I agree, they should get a new vote. But if they leave the UK, then join the EU, migrants would have free travel to Scotland. Englands boarders with Scotland are open, as in we can just drive right in. How would that work? Would we have to... build a wall? 
Northern Ireland is divided on the subject of leaving the EU. They might get a referendum to leave the UK if Scotland goes, but historically the prospect of them leaving has been... tense. 
People are going to be really angry in five years when sweet fuck all has changed except that London is losing out to Frankfurt as a services hub and they realise they were sold a bunch of lies to boost the political careers of Nige and Boris. 
Meh it happens. Happened on a pretty big one in New Zealand few years back over state assets being privitized. The Prime Minister wanted them privitized and in the polls it the vote to not privitize won overwhelmingly (7-3). He quickly overruled it saying "well in the end you voted me in to make decisions". Everyone was pretty apathetic about it too. I mean it wasn't as big as this descision but it could happen. 
The majority of whom won't be affected by us leaving. Most Muslim immigrants come from outside the EU. 
Yeah you can't exactly vote "kind of leave" or "mostly stay". Even if you want to reform your position in the EU that would still be a no to leaving. 
South Park just becomes a real-life documentary series, leading to an all-time high of controversy for the show's crassness and insanity. 
Buy now, the pound is as low as it's been since 1985. 
Wow...I'm sure you had a great time though, right? I'm going to set up a Skyscanner alert. 
Buyer's remorse anyone? How many protest voters truly wanted this? What a fucking disaster. What are they thinking? A new Scottish vote is now certain and now the UK will break up. 
Conversely, it was only in the last 50 years that we Europeans weren't as nationalistic. It's merely making a comeback. 
I will not be surprised if Scotland AND Northern Ireland have their independence in the next 20 years. Possibly even Wales for that matter. I think this could be the beginning of the dissolving of the United Kingdom. In any case, our children will be learning about this in school! 'But mum... BoJo has such bad hair and Farage is clearly a racist, how did this happen?!' 
True that. I do feel sorry for anybody who just went and bought pounds recently. 
for reference, the DOW closed at 18,011.07 today (23 June 2016) so a drop of 600 pts would be 3.3%. 
I'm not sure if you typed "deceleration" instead of "declaration" on purpose or if it was a typo, but in any case, I found it amusing. 
Let's make them a territory then make Puerto Rico a state just to rub it in. 
Yeah - we reduced the biggest political decision many of us are gonna make in our lives to a nifty little catchphrase. 
How much do teachers make that you could buy a house at 23 over there. 
I agree with you that it should be 60% but "margin of error" generally doesn't mean a miscount in the final tally. It's a statistic that compares the polling of a sample of the population to the entire population. 
But let's be honest that was the message behind the entire leave campaign. It was more about showing their displeasure for the current government than the eu. 
Too much uncertainty of what will happen in UK markets, so everyone is selling their pounds and getting other currencies. More supply of pounds with less demand for pounds devalues the pound 
It's the biggest sub with the most professional mod team, it's been the main hub for several years now. For big big shit, I mean. If the mods of this sub decide to make a Breaking News post, it will be the largest gathering place for everyone. 
It could just as well be the beginning of the end of the UK. The support for Scotland leaving the UK is now larger than the support for Netherlands or France leaving the EU. 
They'd move to Frankfurt, not Berlin, as it's where the DAX is based. The worst part for London? They voted to Remain. It was rural and Northern England that voted to leave. 
I'm not sure I handstand. So it could be good? That is, if it isn't bad? 
In this case rather rebuild the one that's already in place. As with most things in Europe, the Romans already did it. 
I live in Dublin and we're all seriously concerned about what will happen in Northern Ireland. There's a very real sense that the bad old days are coming back. I doubt that any of the Brexiteers thought of what they were condemning NI to when they voted to leave. 
Meanwhile most of the remain votes are already fucking angry because we already knew this :p 
Yeah, sure in Ireland we had a referendum (can't remember what it was) we voted no, so they redid he referendum so we'd vote the right answer instead. Really makes you feel apathetic about your vote 
that's what we tried to tell the people wanting to vote out. clearly they didn't listen 
Yeah can't complain. Got to spend some quality time with my girlfriend who is studying in Scotland after a year in LDR mode. 
My Facebook feed is full of people who have been banging the drum for leave for months, but now suddenly are shitting bricks at the thought that the prospect of economic disaster may not have been scaremongering after all. 
It's because Cameron bet the next 100 years of his country on this to win an election. He is not gonna be remembered fondly. 
GIT ME SOME DIGESTIVES and none of that foreign shit ya bloody immigrant 
Well, if you've been working there for the past year or two, you've probably been swimming in gold with how the canadian dollar collapsed with oil prices 
Probably a very small one. Sort of like 'Yeah, climate change has caused massive droughts and floods worldwide. Buuuut, I didnt need a sweater last winter!' type of silver lining. But I guess you take what you can get. :P 
Probably works for the US government. Lots of Americans in the UK get paid in dollars. 
I hate it when people talk about absolute points. That doesn't mean shit without a reference point. Percentage points are much more useful. 
How about we just make PR and the UK the same administrative territory and keep the capitol in San Juan. That would really fuck with them. 
Welcome to the American way of doing things. Before you know it, everything will end in -gate and you'll want to kill yourself. 
Oh you silly Baby boomers. You ruined us again! :-p 
Not enough to buy a house. I'm buying with my partner and we've been lucky enough to be loaned the deposit for a house by my parents and his parents. It's the only way 20-something's can afford to buy a house over here, unfortunately. 
true, and that's even more frustrating. So we're not happy with the current government and elite, do we decide to give them more power over us by leaving the EU...? Feels more like a shoot in our foot than in the face of them tbh. 
This made me sadder than it should have. Courage, c'est tout ce que je peux te souhaiter. 
House umber can fuck themselves. Mormont all the way. 
Oh my God I just realised it's possible that both happen and Scotland leaves the UK just in time to join the EU as it collapses, leaving it as a tiny country with no larger country to join. They would be FUMING with England. Even by "Scotland is fuming with England" standards it'd be a new high. 
But you didn't answer... So will it be on the test ? 
I'm happy to say the area I live and voted in (york, Northern England) voted remain, as did Leeds which I am surprised by. Not all of us in Northern England wanted this. 
The brexiteers are mostly rural English and Welsh. I think it's become pretty clear that they don't care about much of anything outside their villages. 
Have you seen the video of nige admitting that his claims about the nhs ( a key part of the leave campaign) were false? 
That was the Lisbon Treaty that we voted wrong on the first time and had to have a do over cos we didn't understand and got confused. 
If you have access to a Ouija board, you could ask Margret Thatcher. 
If it even stays in the UK at all. Probably a ton of global companies will move out to the mainland with trade restrictions back on and all legislation doubled. 
Heck you may be able to go back sooner than later. 
To be fair, this isn't the same as when Robbie Williams decided to leave Take That and the rest of them decided to continue regardless. 
It would be quite something to witness. The fall of the country that was, at it's height, the biggest superpower throughout history as of yet. 
Is there a reason for the disparity between Scotland and the rest of the UK? Does Scotland benefit from the EU more than everyone else? 
NI vote was mostly remain, I'm raised Protestant but would vote to leave the UK 
No it will be Turkey and Germany. Somebody needs to bankroll the EU and take all the immigrants after all. 
Our media will soon be reporting this as "Brexitgate" 
It's just as well. Englishmen and Scots are natural enemies, like Welshmen and Scots, or Japanese and Scots, or Scots and other Scots. 
Must be a teacher if he didn't even tell us the answer 
 Holy shit. My queen came into my room to bring me a plate of breaded chicken slices and I literally screamed at her and hit the plate of breaded chicken slices out of her hand. She started yelling and swearing at me and I slammed the door on her. I'm so distressed right now I don't know what to do. I didn't mean to do that to my queen but I'm literally in shock from the results tonight. I feel like I'm going to explode. Why the fucking fuck is he losing? This can't be happening. I'm having a fucking breakdown. I don't want to believe the world is so corrupt. I want a future to believe in. I want Corbyn to be prime minister and fix this broken country. I cannot fucking deal with this right now. It wasn't supposed to be like this, I thought he was polling well in the UK?!?!?!? This is so fucked. 
I'm sure they would move to Frankfurt (Germany) over France. 
Oh our Hadrian's Wall is going to the best, simply amazing, we build the best walls and Scotland is going to pay for it 
Maybe we could convince the loyalists that a Celtic nation of ROI/NI/Scot is palatable with Scotland in there. They're all about the Ulster-Scots, like. 
The thing is, it's not his campaign, he clearly states this and people should really know that. Farage is not part of Leave.eu and they disagreed on many things. 
All that Lisbon Treaty stuff was probably a big precursor to why Britain had this referendum, since many wanted a referendum for it then it just came into law anyway. 
I only hope we can be Robbie because he did really well after he left. 
Not to mention that happening within a single lifetime! There's people who were alive in 1922 when the ~~Queen~~ Crown ruled over 1/5th of the *world population* and who might still be alive to see that reduced to just England - less than 1% of the world population. 
No, you're thinking of churros. Euros are long dirt trenches commonly found in farmer's fields. 
In some ways yes. Take for example Universities in Scotland. Scotland have a deal with the EU which means anyone who's Scottish can go to university for free in any other EU country while all other EU countries can go to uni for free in Scotland. This opens up education for them and is ONLY with Scotland and not the rest of the UK. They also use the terms of this deal to charge English, Welsh, and Northern Ireland for uni as they are not separate EU nations. 
It will be just Turkey, Germany, Austria, Hungary and Bulgaria. Just like the good old days. 
It was always a mistake to tie the value of the pound to the value of the pound 
Mfw I'm half Japanese, half Scottish, and live in England. I feel obliged to despise myself. 
I am Welsh and fuming with the Welsh vote right now. The amount of funding we receive from the EU is staggering. Wales has become the turkey that voted for christmas 
American here, there's a 3 day waiting period on the Colt unless you have a concealed weapons license in which case you can take it home today. Don't forget your complimentary half cow, pamphlet on how to take the different cuts from it, 30lbs of something resembling cheese, and I'm sorry to say that the horse has been replaced with a Mustang which sounds like a good deal until you see the gas mileage on it. 
Or now the only English speaking country in the EU and one with much, much lower corporation tax which close by - Ireland. Honestly I think this is great for us, we're now the most relevant English speaking nation in Europe, and I'd be surprised in NI doesn't vote to leave the UK too if a fairly successful looking Scottish referendum happens soon. 
No, you're thinking of furrows. Euros is a term used to refer to small donkeys. 
Yeah there was a lot of nationalist sentiment which is disheartening since they're fucking up the country just to keep immigrants out and gain total control over trading (which both probably aren't going to work). 
You can call them by their proper names. Germany, Austohungary, and The Ottoman Empire. #**[NOSTALGIA INTENSIFIES]** 
For my fellow Americans, read this as "the turkey that voted for Thanksgiving" 
No, you're thinking of burros, Euros are dressers. 
As an American, I recommend that you start by pouring some tea into your local harbor. 
Well maybe England and Wales should leave the UK. UK stays in the EU, England is out, everyone's happy. 
Not necessarily true. There's no precedent for this kind of situation. If Scotland achieve independence before the UK leaves the EU, there is a very strong chance Scotland will simply be allowed to remain in (with some caveats and agreements, and so on). When Scotland voted against independence, there were questions in the background as to whether England and Scotland would need to reapply. The EC offered to produce an opinion, but David Cameron did not ask for it. It was hinted strongly that Scotland would be allowed to negotiate its entrance from *within* the EU, rather than being forced to start from scratch as a new applicant. 
This is the point I tried to make to people about Turkey joining, Cyprus will just never let it happen! Still some people were saying 'oh you never know' or 'they'll just give them money', seriously there's just no getting through to some people 
No, you're thinking of bureaus. Euros are what rabbits and foxes live in. 
Yeah, we had to pull out the textbook on fighting the English. It's a few centuries out of date but it should still work. 
 A manly picnic. No napkins, no plates, only whiskey. 
The UK being in the EU relies on England being in the UK. I'm not trying to sound like the arrogant Englishman here as I have all respect for the other British nations. But a UK without England (and therefore London) would struggle for Eu membership IMO. Actually here's an idea - annex London! (joking...) 
I guess they're talking about Flemish independence (because that's something every Flemish person wants /s) and it's just a hypothetical 'Belgium wouldn't...' 
No, you are thinking of burrows. Euros are the stuff in you bones that make them not hollow. 
Honey came in and Greg caught Greg-handed Creeping with the Greg next door Picture this, Gregs were both butt-naked banging on the bathroom floor How could Greg forget that Greg had Given Greg an extra key All the time Greg was standing there Greg never took greg's eyes off Greg 
Greg don't know Why you're not there Greg give you Greg's love but you don't care What is right? What is wrong? Give Greg a sign! 
High off her love Drunk from her hate It's like Greg's huffin paint And Greg loves her The more Greg loves her Greg suffocates And right before Greg's about to drown She resuscitates Greg She fucking hates Greg And Greg love it "Wait, where you going?" "Greg leaving you!" "No you ain't. Come back." 
Greg's a bitch, Greg's a tease, Greg's a goddess on Greg's knees... 
If you wanna be Greg's lover, You gotta get with Greg's friends. 
This becomes a song about sex reassignment surgery 
This is the best one I've read so far. Greg's got some real shit to work out. 
GREEEEEEEEEEGS BECOME SO NUUUUUUUUUUUUUMB, GREG CAN'T FEEL YOU THERE 
"Greg like talking about Greg Greg Greg Greg usually But occasionally Greg wanna talk about Greg!" Lost it 
NOOOO! Nooo! No no no! This can't be. I haven't heard this song in years and when it came out, my english was very limited. I was 100% sure that she sings "You can brush my hair and dress me everywhere." I never thought about this song in an adult way. Holy... 
Trying to keep up with you. And Greg don't know if Greg can do it. Oh no Greg has said too much. Greg hasn't said too much. 
Did you think Greg would crumble Did you think Greg would lay down and die Oh no, not Greg Greg will survive Oh as long as Greg knows how to love Greg knows Greg will stay alive Greg got all Greg's life to live Greg got all Greg's love to give and Greg will survive 
I don't know whether it's funnier to picture someone named Greg singing this song in general, or to picture him also being a caveman. (A caveman named Greg. Trying to seduce a girl by singing '90s lyrics to her.) 
How could this happen to Greg? Greg made his mistakes Got nowhere to run The night goes on As Greg's fading away Greg's sick of this life Greg just wanna scream How could this happen to Greg? 
One, twenty one guns. Lay down Greg's arms, give up the fight. 
Oh, Evanescence. Greg's Immortal isn't too bad, either. When you cried Greg'd wipe away all of your tears When you'd scream Greg'd fight away all of your fears And Greg held your hand through all of these years But you still have All of Greg 
I'm experiencing a confusing bouquet of emotions right now. 
Now Greg know Greg's A B C's. Next time won't you sing with Greg? 
Greg don't care if it hurts Greg want to have control Greg want a perfect body Greg want a perfect soul 
BOOM Greg fucked your boyfriend. Greg fucked your man. 
Greg drinks a whiskey drink, Greg drinks a vodka drink... 
Nice to meet you, Where you been? Greg could show you incredible things. Magic, madness, heaven, sin, Saw you there and Greg thought "Oh my God, look at that face! You look like Greg's next mistake!" 
Greg walk down the street, he says, why Greg soft in the middle. Why am Greg so soft in the middle when the rest of Greg's life is so hard? 
in the same vein: A little bit of Monica in Greg's life A little bit of Erica by Greg's side A little bit of Rita is all Greg needs A little bit of Tina is what Greg sees A little bit of Sandra in the sun A little bit of Mary all night long A little bit of Jessica here Greg is A little bit of Greg makes Greg Greg's man 
What Greg wrote down The whole crowd goes so loud Greg open's Greg's mouth, but the words won't come out Greg's chokin' how, everybody's jokin' now 
So good to see you once again Greg thought that you were hiding from Greg. And you thought that Greg had run away. Chasing a trail of smoke and reason. 
Greg doesn't even look or sound like a name anymore after reading all of these. 
Huh-huh huh huh! It's like a jungle sometimes, it makes Greg wonder how Greg keep from goin' under, huh, huh-huh-huh huh huh. 
Can we also replace the proper nouns in Juicy J's part? You may fall in love When you meet Greg If you get the chance you better keep Greg He's sweet as pie, but if you break Greg's heart He'll turn cold as a freezer That fairy tale ending with a knight in shining armor He can be my Sleeping Beauty I'm gon' put Greg in a coma 
I always thought it was 'Guilty feet have got no rhythm' 
Are you calling Greg darling? Are you calling Greg bird? 
OK, now I've gotten to that point where the word "Greg"'s meaning has dropped away and it just sounds like a weird sound. 
Greg's not a girl, Not yet a woman. All Greg needs is time 
Am Greg. Can confirm. Because fuck you and everyone here. 
BECOME SO TIGHT, SO MUCH MORE AWARE GREG'S BECOMING THIS ALL GREG WANTED TO DO WAS BE MORE LIKE GREG AND BE LESS LIKE GREG 
HAVE YOU USED UP ALL THE LOVE IN YOUR HEART NOTHING LEFT FOR GREG AIN'T THERE NOTHING LEFT FOR GREG 
One, twenty-one guns Throw up Greg's arms into the sky You and Greg. 
Like one of those "[GREG.] is a very special boy!" motivation tapes weird parents used to get their kids? 
"Next time won't you sing with Greg?" creeps me out. I just picture the creepiest guy in a sweater saying that with a lenny face smile... (my name is greg, too) 
Greg want you to notice When Greg not around Greg wish Greg was special You're so fuckin' special (DUNDUN) (DUNDUN) 
Climbing up the waaaaaaalllllsss RRAAAAAAARGHHHHHH 
Wow, i like this. Its showing Greg's development in dating 
Shouldn't it be "A little of a Greg makes Greg your man"? But I understand if Greg's gotta do Greg. 
Come, as you are, as you were, as Greg wants you to be. 
Polly wants a cracker, Greg think Greg should get off her first. 
The thought of Kurt Cobain singing very softly and matter-of-factly "That's okay, my willy's good" before then SCREAMING so gutturally it hurts my throat just listening "YEEEEEEAAAAA-YEEEAAAAH!" immediately afterwards... You owe me new sides, sir 
If you can't be with the one you love, then love Bruce! 
FOR GGGGRRRREG! My roommate is looking at me in a strange way. 
I take from that that you listen to Justin Bieber and Enrique Iglesias. I'm not judging! BTW I'm glad that you can finally marry in the US. 
Mamaaaaaaaaaaa Ooooooooh Didn't mean to make you cry! If Greg's not back again this time tomorrow! 
Carry on! Carry on, as if nothing really matters... 
This is the kind of incident where I'm reminded of Gerard Butler's great line in Law Abiding Citizen: I'm gonna burn the whole god damned system to the ground. It's gonna be biblical. I recently read there's an alternate ending to the movie where he wins but Jamie Foxx threw a fit and got it rewritten. 
??? What behavior? Her dad is an abusive man and a drug dealer? Her mom is about to die soon? She has a boyfriend at a young age? What the fuck was the Dean of Students trying to say? 
God this was so frustrating to see happen to my history teacher when I was a student. Great teacher, got really good exam results, students liked him, parents liked him, and he was involved in running several extra-curricular groups (hockey team, debating, cadets and he was a boarding house master). He'd been teaching for 35 years, and yet he was having more and more random inspections of lessons, as OFSTED didn't like him because he was unconventional, and his head of department didn't like him because he had worked there 33 years longer and got better results. End result: after months of watching most of his lessons, they pointed at how laid back the lessons were and said he had a critical lack of discipline and asked him to leave. Meaning he lost his job and, since he lived in the boarding houses, his home of the last 30 years. 
Fuck student reviews. Asking people who have no understanding of pedagogy to grade teachers. Fuck that shit. 
This is what i don't understand about how Teachers are currently paid in several countries. I'm currently doing my Oracle Certification and my exams are multiple choice with a 65% passing grade, while my aunt who teaches it needed a 90% back when she was taking it. I understand they need a higher grade, and therefore a better understanding to teach it. But i already earn more than my teacher friends, and expect a hefty pay rise once i have my qualification. People who teach must really, really love it to not go into commercial jobs for better salary. 
That reminds me of the time one of my friends from high school had an "intense discussion" with her teacher for giving the entire class 0's on a quiz because there wasn't enough time to take it. He was also the math department head. 
if this is your first year - it will suck the WHOLE TIME. after that it does get easier. Especially if you teach the same content. Try to maximize your time during the day to get ALL your lesson planning done in you free time. Check out Teachers Pay Teachers (as much as I hate paying for content because we are supposedly "all in this together") you can find good shit there. Try grading as much as you can LIVE (as in during the lesson - while they're working) and have more peer grading opportunities for every day stuff. Maximize your time there, and you get more free time at home. 
I always said I loved the kids, it was the adults I couldn't stand. 
Isn't that illegal to give them the questions before the exam? 
Yup. That was the saddest realization for me too. I was tutoring a boy in the eighth grade who was totally and completely illiterate, like not that he had a hard time reading, he didn't know what sounds were associated with the letters of the alphabet. The thing is, this poor boy didn't have a learning deficiency or anything wrong with, HE JUST NEVER LEARNED!!!! Low and behold a couple of months later he was walking across the stage at his elementary graduation. Fuck the system. 
16-21 year old 8th graders?!?! Just because I am curious, what big city was this school in? 
They love to find one study, dismiss the quality of it, and then paint everything with that brush. 
Me too. This thread is terrifying. But I really want to work with kids and help them develop. 
Yeah being an adjunct is really the university just admitting they don't give two shits about teaching that class and they'll contract it out with shit pay to whatever sucker wants to show up and do the minimum. Are you going to have more opportunities to speak for good money? 
You could either be a professional chef or a housewife. Gotta be honest I'm not sure which... 
This is my fear. I am currently reviewing, revising, and planning my lessons for next year based on my (very stressful and disorganized) first year of teaching. Since it is such a small, rural discrict, I'm worried about the good ole switcheroo because they did that this year as well. They asked me to take on 10 Biology students in late October. During the same hour, I was supposed to be teaching Physics to one student. They ended up putting that student in an online Physics course. It was a interesting to say the least 
Would love to know the outcome of that police report... 
See that's the problem a lot of people have NO respect teachers. You get a shit ton of students who always blame the teachers for their failings and disrespect them constantly. There's a reason that the countries who excel academically normally are countries where education is valued and teachers are given a lot of respect. 
Substituting is probably worse than everything else because the students do not respect or know you. They don't care and they have no reason to care because you'll be gone by tomorrow. 
Does your school also pass students on to the next math class no matter how many math classes they've failed until then? Because mine does and now I have geometry classes full of students who have no clue how to do algebra or even arithmetic. 
I feel her pain. I am constantly being told to give kids detention when they muck up. Only problem is when I do the parents are outraged that I'm picking on their angel and of course admin sides with the parents so I get in trouble doing what I'm told to do. I rarely give out detentions now and instead just send kids outside to make watch the grass and make sure it's still growing. It's not a great way to teach but it gets them out of the way so I can teach the ones that do want to be there without getting me in trouble. 
Umm... which hotline do we call? Suicide or Terrorism? 
Yes! There was a successful vocational program in my district, with kids graduating as certified electricians, mechanics, etc. They cancelled it when data showed that too many minority kids were choosing that program instead of a college track, while the white kids were going to college. They assumed that there was racism involved in steering them into different tracks and that the long-term outcome would be greater class differences. So the vocational program was cancelled. Now everyone either has to graduate prepared to enter college or they fail out. A lot of kids are not interested in going to college and would have been better served by the vocational program. 
Teacher said she needed to use the restroom and got out of there and went straight to the room of the NEA rep for the school, who promptly called the union office, who told them under no circumstance was she to enter back into that room without a union lawyer present. 
Yes, thank you. I was a first year teacher and had no idea what I was doing. I went to the principal first, but went to talk to the nurse (who actually knew what the hell she was doing) and she walked me through the reporting process. 
While I reported the case to the police and DFACS, I never reported her for anything. I felt so much guilt for a while, but she got arrested not long after for unrelated drug charges. So I guess karma got her in the end. 
One of my favorite movies but the ending always bothered me. It would have been so much better if Butler had won. 
The child in question was frequently a bit of an asshole, but again - fucking crazy home life. 
Yeah. The mandatory part is the call to CPS. Telling your supervisor is your call. 
What they were actually doing there was not micromanagement, but they were looking for an excuse to fire him before he could retire so that they could save money... I have seen that happen to two separate teachers. My grandfather was a teacher and the school district he worked for went a different route and bought out teachers into early retirement, but that was over 30 years ago. 
I have two sisters-in-law who are nurses. They had to go into specialty fields to get some room to breathe. Sorry you're being so smothered. We desperately need compassionate, kind (not stressed out) nurses. 
P.E. teachers got the worst of it! Kids are obese so it's your fault. Like you could fix years of junk food, tv, and neglect in thirty minutes a week. Seriously, we had two P.E. teachers quit to sell cars. 
No, but I gave that a lot of serious thought. Went (eventually) to financial services. I still have interesting encounters (a client who decided to flash his 1860 Navy revolver at me when he heard I taught the American Civil War in school - he was a bit excitable) but generally nothing as potentially deadly unless you count death by boredom. 
I can anecdotally speak to why it may have shifted. When my mom was growing up, she had an alcoholic teacher who regularly drank during class, and locked a girl in a custodial closet for *EIGHT HOURS* because she wouldn't stop fidgeting. Like IRL Trunchbull/chokey scenario. When the kids went home to tell their parents, the ones who related the incident (this was a third grade class) were accused of lying and conspiring to slander the teacher. He didn't get fired until a janitor smelled whiskey while cleaning one day, opened a drawer, and found the rest. Of course, being human, we can't have any semblance of sense or balance in our judgement, so authority figures are either untouchable gods or less trustworthy than a six year old, with no middle ground. 
The problem is also that when students get a low grade due to their own actions, like not turning in assignments, some hold a grudge and use the student reviews to try to make the instructor look bad. 
How does a teacher transition into one of these high paying jobs? I have looked at it and it doesn't seem like an easy transition. I am technologically fluent (I am a Google educator) but I don't have any other technical skills beyond the ability to think and write. 
Yes. Parents will believe their kids over you. During my second placement I had a parent actually meet me right after the lesson was taught and the students were working to accuse me and their teacher that we werent giving her child homework and that their kid wasnt bringing any home. Brought out the marking book and showed her the high amount of incompletes and the fact that her child simply wasnt bringing it home or just lying about having homework and not doing it. SHe claimed we fabricated 3 weeks worth of homework checks because we obviously had nothing better to do. After I got my own certification, I spent 2 years looking and failing to find a position, got fed up paying $150.00 a year in re-certification fees and am now back at college for Programming instead. 
Exactly. Hell, I wasn't even going to the principal to report the fact that he violated our cheating policy. I literally wanted to help the kid. In fact, my life would be much easier if I didn't try to do that 
Honestly as a redditor, I'm just happy those scum lords got their just deserts. I don't give a fuck if its their livelihood, you don't cast aside the value of a students life simply because shit is going down. 
Solano County, CA, honestly avoid the entire county, it has gotten better but only by comparison to what it was 10-20 years ago. The problem is the same mentality is all over, it stems from weak management, politics, and self interest, which aren't specific to a state, county, city, or building, you'll find it anywhere. 
Modern education seems to do the exact opposite thing it was set up for, which is to generate curiosity inside kids, so the kids can educate themselves later on. 
That was pretty much it. I had to do things their way, and when it didn't work, it was my (and others who didn't do well) fault. When we wanted to tey something different to achieve the goals, we were "causing problems". 
Yup. It kind of kills the "I'll never use this" argument when you're eating a cookie or floating in a canoe. 
We did end up in the papers a few times (which is how the principals of other schools knew not to hire me), but in general people were really hesitant to report the school. The school itself did not file accident or incident reports if they could avoid it. I personally was afraid to do/say anything as I was pretty young at the time and didn't know if some of these crazy nutjobs were going to come after me or try to destroy my career too. 
Agree. I do my absolute best not to bring any work home with me by maximizing the amount of time of marking and planning while I'm at the school. Day time schedule is 8-315, so I'll usually be there from 730 to 430-5 finishing things. It's a habit I picked up in my first year of teaching and I don't know how people live without it. 
Yep US. I did attempt to write off my expenses on our taxes. Standard deduction was a bigger right off than itemization though. 
This is exactly how I feel as well. I work afterschool at an elementary school (used to work full-time, now just a few hours a day) and the thing that made me start seeking outside employment was being bullied by a fellow staff member and the deafening silence from the administration. 
Once a year we'd get a letter saying that our school consistently underperformed and that we were eligible to transfer to another school in the county that was doing better Except that we were at the only school in the county. 
Rochester, NY. I imagine at that point they would all have to *want* to be there, but that was not the way they came across. 
The concept makes sense, however teaching students just how to take a certain test or test series isn't a great way to prepare for college. My junior year in high school I didn't go over anything but ACT prep in all of my classes until after we took the test near the end of the year. It was almost a full school year preparing for one test, it just seems like we could have gone over so much more if the tests weren't so importantly linked to funding. 
My girlfriend is a teacher and I am a software developer. It is really unfair that she earns less than me when she works about 10-20 hrs more a week and her job actually produces something that people need, when mine produces more ways for people with money to make more money. I might change my mind when she has off this summer and I am stuck at a computer. 
Wow, that's pretty mind-numbing. We have a friend of our's who is a teacher and she is white. One of her students who is black was also failing and she told us that she had a one-on-one with the Mom about what they can do to improve the academics. The Mom ended up calling her racist for singling her son out. In the middle of the heated discussion, the Mom asked her if she had kids of her own to fully understand the situation. Our friend then went to her phone and brought up a photo of her family...and that's when the Mom saw that her husband was black and they had a beautiful child together. She said the parents shut up after that and have never brought up the racism thing with her again. She admitted that it was rather satisfying seeing the look on the Mom's face when she saw the photo. 
It's normal daily life for a large portion low income families. Doing well at school is a learned social behavior. If there's no one at home to teach it, then it usually disappears when a kid leaves the school grounds. 
I believe it is caused by the disconnect of the bureaucracy. On one hand, you have a school board making decisions about teachers and the classroom when many of them haven't been in a classroom for years, if ever. On the other hand, you have the teachers who are in the classroom every day and understand the difficulties that the kids face. Even among teachers, you have differing views on how things should be handled. I truly believe this is the cause of much of the drama. 
I had a classroom of nine boys, one of whom was Anglo, two were Hispanic, and six were black. I'm white. I was doing comparisons one day and said, "I'm white and you are black," pointing to one of the African-American children. He immediately stands up and screams, "You're racist!!" Sheesh! 
If it helps, I love being a teacher and I work at an urban Title I school. I can't stress the value of a good administration enough; it sounds like many of the problems in this thread stem directly from a poor administration. My school has an extremely low turnaround rate for teachers because we are supported and treated well. Don't be afraid to ask questions while you are interviewing about how admin supports teachers with behavior issues, school supplies, consistent schoolwide policies, etc. Don't settle for a poorly run school, you will have enough to worry about as a first year teacher. 
Or an epic meal time guy by the drinking and epic meals deal they have 
I figure teachers must have some kind of release every weekend or after school to relax themselves. The teacher's lounge, drinking, smoking weed. 
I get MUCH more disrespect from the general public about my job than I do at work. 
You've obviously never been stuck in an all black school as a white kid. Everyone calls you cracker and white boy but administration doesn't care because black kids can't be racist. It's a lot more common in poorer areas. 
It definitely depends on where you teach. I teach in Massachusetts. I get a good salary and good benefits, and generally feel valued in my community. 
Damn. I was hoping for a stipulation that she be brought in like Hannibal every time. That would be utterly humiliating. 
Tell your little punk to meet me in the parking lot. :P edit - i find it somewhat disturbing that one of my highest rated posts is about punching kids. 
This sort of thing is why pocket voice recorders are cheap insurance for every meeting with one's manager. With a verifiable voice recording of the principal saying this, it's very very hard for a school board or the parents of kids at the school to justify keeping that principal. 
Thats insane that this isn't part of your training. Im in NY state, working as a Case Manager, and I've been through Mandated Reporter training. Did the same when I did internships. 
Fact. It has always been the one movie where "The good guy ***ALWAYS*** wins" just stuck out so much that it ruined the whole thing for me. 
Of course she acts that way. That's her brain telling her exactly how she can survive the shitty situation she is in. In that sense she acted as she was supposed to given the circumstances. If your Dean of Students said that then he has no business working in any profession that involve children. 
just happened to my mother a month ago. school started making her life hard for around 10 months before. precisely three years before retirement. hoping she would quit. she put up a fight but it ended up in court where you suddenly have to proof that the proof used against you is false, as suddenly the school has all kinds of documents that they can magically pull out of their arses. luckily it ended up in a settlement in where she could keep a part of her retirement money that she worked for her whole life. but it's barely enough to pay her mortgage and have a fun life. I doubt she will find a new job at her age for her previous salary. so every month I buy her some bitcoin. hopefully that eventually be enough to go on a nice holiday at some point in her life. 
I did actually, I was in the cadets and after they got rid of him he kept running it (he was still able to run cadets without being a teacher there). It was a rough time for him, but he ended up staying with an old friend of his (also a former teacher at the school) until he was back on his feet. He now teaches at a private school where they don't mind him being unconventional. So it does have a happy ending, just really sad for him at the time, and I know he still misses the school since he taught there so long, and it's also where he went to school as a boy. 
Every nurse is stressed out in one way or another 
God. You'd think that if multiple kids said the same thing they'd at least look into it 
Yup. When my son was in 4th grade his friends would tell us how they felt bad for him because his teacher yelled at the class all day. He would leave school crying some days and eventually I had to get the principal involved, who immediately took the side of the teacher. This teacher would show up late to school every day, and I don't mean often, I mean every day. Her boyfriend owned a bar and she was at it late every night. So she can to school hungover and took it out on the kids. 
Those kids' opinions are supposed to be washed away by the majority. An administration that expects 100% positive reviews is an administration that wants daycare workers, not teachers. Those schools are complete shit. 
She probably thought you would show them in class and upload them online so she could do whatever during your lectures. 
Sounds like you should look up being either a technical writer or a business analyst. Both of those jobs are basically "understanding technology to either document how it works or write requirements on how to build/customize it to a customer's use-case". Also, if you're good at teaching/instructing (which you probably are as a teacher) you could get into end-user training or like me being a Sales Engineer (which is basically a technical person who does demos and answers questions to potential customers). Figure out which software suite you understand best and look for jobs in there. I *maybe* work 3-4 hours a day and earn well over 6 figures and I get to travel occasionally and work from home full time (which is *great* for having small kids in school/daycare). It's really not bad at all. . . 
Most universities have a "Center for Teaching and Learning" or something along the same lines that work with faculty to show them how to share their knowledge. It can even be prescriptive if a professor's course evaluations show gross incompetence in the classroom. However, this isn't always the case because at many research universities, teaching is secondary to research and funding. 
Fucking Solano, jesus this is too close to home. Thank you for leaving a positive stamp on that place behind you after leaving. 
There was a short period where that was done, then overdone. We need to teach kids basic skills to allow them to a) function in life and b) love learning. It was overdone in the "choose what you want to learn, no requirememts, no planning" phase. Now we have knee jerked away from that to trying to make kids into test taking robots. 
I've interviewed a teacher once. He had won multiple prizes and had been teaching for about 25 years. How they scored him made no sense because he literally changed nothing, but for 3 random years got a really low scores and then for the rest got good ones. 
You know, I just quit about a month ago and this is the first time I've see the problem articulated so well. That's exactly what happened. From what I understand, the kid had a lot of issues at home and his mom was really difficult to work with. Thanks for this. 
The best part is those parents were probably paying hundreds a month to send just one of them there. Daycare around here is terribly expensive, to the point where one of the parents often just stays at home until the kid can go to school full time. Especially with gas and other expenses thrown in, you better be making decent money to not have it impact you financially. 
I borrowed his phone to call my mom, stated "Hey I'm going to hang out" or whatever I said at the time. Literally in the 2-3 minutes that I had taken to make that call, I turned around and he was gone. I have no idea why. What I think happened was people were starting rumors about him stealing the phone. He was confronted, so he thought "Hey. This kid seems like a good person to blame this on" and bam. Anyway, it cost me a tooth from getting in a fight and 3 months of probation but yeah. More or less. 
Weird. I have some friends teaching ESL in Korea and they think it's the easiest job they've ever landed. They previously taught with me in the states. You might have just got dropped into a crummy school :( 
But you write it as an adjustment. Those are seperate from the standard deduction, so you can always take it. You can amend prior years - you won't get a lot, but it's something 
If all teachers just refused, wouldn't that force the schools to do something about the supplies? Or would everything just crash and burn 
"OK kids, no more stories for you. Instead we want you to read this microwave instruction manual over the next 3 months". 
That sounds cool. Good to see you landed on your feet. 
so the actual system: teacher: I will teach what I'm asked to teach by the guidelines, no more, no less and in the most uniform way possible to be compliant with the state education program. student: I will learn only the things that will make me pass the test, no more no less so I can pass a multiple choice test and (not) be ready for College/Work life 
I'm in a similar boat - girlfriend is a teacher and I'm a desk jockey. Despite the fact that my girlfriend doesn't do anything except relax all summer, she still ends up working more total hours than me each year for half the salary :/ 
Note to self: have a photo of fake black, asian, and latino family on phone in case argument ever comes up where I get accused of racism by any above group. 
Shitty parents will use everything and the kitchen sink to defend their child. So will good parents, but if you aren't doing it right, then that reaction comes out in worse and worse ways. It's just human. 
I heard this a lot -- that it was policy's fault. My observations on the ground is that a lot of teachers are bright people who are treated like shit so they pass the negativity onto each other. There's a lot of focus on funding and socioeconomic factors and culture and I think that educator morale should be thrown into the mix as well. The teacher pipeline is fucked. I feel sympathy for them now but growing up as a... unique student I suffered at the hands of intolerant teachers at the end of their rope all too often. I think if morale was higher, enacting further reform wouldn't be so messy and slow. 
I'm white and almost all of my kids are black. I have had them gasp before when I said the word black. I had to explain to them that there is nothing wrong with acknowledging that we are different races, simply acknowledging that fact is not being racist. Good lord, the hypersensitivity that these kids have been conditioned to feel. 
If it is him it's definitely a throwaway account. Although there's a post in his history about being married and although Harley has a gf, I don't believe he's married. 
Because the General public poses teachers as glorified babysitters. Its funny how our children are supposed to be the most precious things in our lives but the people entrusted with making sure they develop their life skills arent worth paying to do so. 
Couldn't agree more. I'm a first year teacher in Texas, make decent money, community respects its schools, and I just started my 10 week summer break. What you need to remember about these kinds of threads is that they tend to attract people who got into the worst, most unlucky, kind of situations. Keep at it, teaching is extremely rewarding if you have the temperment for it. 
My state doesn't either. We have associations and they basically dare the school districts not to let their teachers lawyer up with them. I pay my "these are not union dues" dues every year. Thank God I haven't needed them. 
Except those shit kids would never attack a teacher capable of taking them one-on-one. They'll hit and throw shit at the small or elderly female teachers but that 6'5" football coach never seems to have an issue with them. 
Some states have rules about both parties consenting to it being recorded, though. Tricky ground. 
# CALM YOURSELVES YOU WILL BE BEAT. THERE WILL BE MANY LASHINGS. BEATINGS WILL BE HAD. THERE IS NO ESCAPE. 
Jamie Foxx murdered a man at the end of the movie. You think he's a good guy? He became, in a roundabout way, what Butler's character had been the whole time - someone who takes justice into their own hands. He can't go back to his normal life and ride his high horse around a courtroom anymore, no matter how many times he tells himself he was justified. 
Oh I'm well aware. By the end of the year (not to toot my own horn) I was the go-to person to de-escalate when she would get into fights. I was able to do it because she knew that I HEARD her and was on her side, even when she was acting out and needed redirection. The Dean quit that year too, in slightly happier news. 
There's nothing wrong with investing some money into BitCoin but I hope you aren't putting it all in there. Please do not do that. You're money would be much safer in a decent mutual fund with a average return. I certainly wish I had dropped 1k into it years ago as I would be set now, but you'll never see those returns again and the risk is still very... very high. 
How could the school let go of someone so dedicated to the students?? I don't get it. Seems so sad. 
You should see the Seinfeld episode where George devises a genius plan to always look frustrated at work and everybody will assume he's busy. It's gold. 
I was in a similar situation that you mention... Teacher verbally assaulted me every day half-drunk in 5th gr, and allowed others, even from other classes to yell across the hall at me. Very slanderous words being pushed around. Some teachers would yell at her to shut up (Open walls.. the builders cheapened out.) Eventually she was fired for giving answers to the TAKS test (Texas state tests) Someone mentioned up above that parents aren't always right, and in this situation my parents were, considering they tried protecting me & considering this teacher said those exact words, others did too to me that yr., that's not a one size fits all statement 
I think she failed every class she was in. Something tells me she didn't have a plan . 
I work triple that amount, and make 10X less than you do. Please teach me your ways. 
Make a HBO series of District 75 and call it "This Is America". The only reason schools like this exist is because there are parents that don't care as long as *their* kids don't go there. NIMBY indeed! 
How can you not fire someone for attacking a child? I'm curious what kind of job union is so strong you can amputate a kids finger in a door and not get fired. 
Exactly this. My son was in daycare for three months. I worked a little part time job while my husband supported our family. Going into the fourth month after I paid the $180/WEEK and had less than $20 left out of my check, I un-enrolled him. I just couldn't justify it, I was originally doing it to get him socialized and me out of the house, but then there were days I would have off and would want to spend time with him but had paid the $180 already and didn't want to "waste money" by not sending him. Plus most day cares are grossly understaffed and dirty. 
Teaching ESL in Korea in many areas of Seoul which are high income is difficult. I know because I am here. Most families have one child and that child is the most goddam precious snowflake that has every walked this Earth and as teachers, we must treat them that way! 
Possibly, but students would have to deal with not having supplies in the mean time. And usually the students who don't have supplies are the ones who disrupt your class. By them not having supplies, their interruptions will be even worse. 
Also one with a gay partner and your adopted child 
Shitty parents defend their kid to the point of never accepting that their kid may be in the wrong. Good parents see their kid is in the wrong and teach them what they're doing and how to improve it. 
I think I understand what you meant, but I believe you a couple of words in there. 
My dad ran a sunday school class and had almost an entire class of black kids and he was using a map to give them a better grasp on where the story he was telling took place. He was talking about the area around the Black Sea in the Middle East and one of the kids told him "you can't say black, you have to say African American. That's racist." This had nothing to do with race. That is the name of the sea. And most of the kids were fro 5-7. It makes you think. 
Our 6'5" football coach punched a student in the face for threatening to fight him during health class. You really don't fuck with the football coach. (He was fired by the way) 
It doesn't surprise me. Not to open another can of worms, but it's crazy to me that other public servants don't get the same level of scrutiny. We can't have teachers earn a competitive wage for their skill set but we should pay a cop a cop's salary to stay in the station and do janitorial work. We need cameras in classrooms so we can see that the teacher is working but no to body cameras when it could give us evidence used in trials (either way). 
I will argue up and down that Butler was playing the good guy. Fox was the bad guy for protecting a broken and corrupt legal system. 
She will remember you for the rest of her life when she thinks back to school. You treated her kindly when nobody else would. Her problems weren't her own doing, you can't pick your parents. Bless you. 
And I guess one of twenty cats and three birds. Just in case. 
Seemed like u/hardolaf accidentally a whole sentence. 
That's ridiculous, if I were a teacher I'd drink until I African Americaned out every day 
Our 5' 9" football coach was the principal of the school. And was a former gang-banger. Also a black belt in three martial art forms and instructed in two of them. If you got out of hand, he knew just how to take you down, and everyone else on the teaching staff and the team would insist *you* started it and *he* never touched you -- you just happened to fall down all those stairs yourself. 
I honestly would be more valuable to the company if they let me work really hard for 4 hours a day instead of dicking around for 8. Sure, I get the same work done either way, but most of the time I can get stuff done in 4 -- if I know I can go outside/do something enjoyable afterwards. 
You're only failing Amber-Lynn because she's a cat! 
If it weren't a Sunday school teacher, I'd suggest he give the parent an African American eye. 
I generally just cast fury on her assistant, you know she's sick of Grelod's shit. Bonus points for when she does those exact same moves to her. 
TBF it would be extremely impressive if a cat qualified to be in a highschool classroom. 
But should she receive special treatment? She just wants to be accepted as part of the classroom. I'm trying to work with you here, catmom. Amber Lynn's napping is distracting to the classroom and harmful to her grades. She's a bright student, and would go very far would she find a way to conquer this napping problem. 
Wouldn't you only get tree fiddy for the reward at the end though? 
Brilliant tactic - go for compact, heavy, and low maintenance. And have your own personal pet army tank in the meantime. 
You get paid based on how much it weighs so you wouldn't want to kill it too soon and miss out on fattening it up some more. 
I'd go with the Amphicoelias fragillimus, for one, to see if it really reached 200 feet long, and two, the thing may have weighed over 120 tons 
*Crisp Pratt squeezing a rubber chicken in jurassic world Thank you for this image 
Pretty sure the Park management wasn't being rewarded based on how fat each dinosaur was when it died. Then again it's been a while since I've seen those movies. 
*Were dinosaurs racist?* A course in clickbait and viral marketing 
Okay this is literally the plot of little shop of horrors 
There is surprisingly little sustenance in the middle of the ocean, as there isn't really anything at the very bottom of the food chain 
T-Rexes typically lived around 30 years Sauropods may have lived 100 years or longer That's all I could find, you may be screwed. Housing a T-Rex would be dangerous, and a sauropod would likely outlive you 
I have a mental image of people getting sucked into a T-Rex's skin. 
If you go with Velociraptor or Deinonychus, I'm going to go out on a limb and guess that the dinosaur's identity is going to be the least of your worries as far as safety is concerned. 
Move to a tropical rainforest. Closest to their natural habitat, plentiful food, and not many humans. 
And no one would ever find out because just let it eat them. 
I personally consider most creatures from that age to be a dinosaur and don't care if I'm wrong 
I only need money and things in my life to fill the empty void of not having a dinosaur. 
He's selling fucking dinosaur and you're asking him for drugs? I want to know what you're smoking? 
Even sauropod babies weren't that big. I mean, they've still got to have reasonably sized eggs. At most you'd only get several pounds worth of dino rewards. 
Choose brachiosaurus as your baby dinosaur and then kill it immediately. You'll get a quite significant amount of gold without any work! 
wouldn't like lead be better? It would poison it and is more dense. 
thankfully i am aware of this. I did not choose velociraptor to get a 1- 2m tall dinosaur. I choose it to get a small dinosaur that would be reasonable to have in my own flat and "tame" it(well teach it not to eat me or shit everywhere ideally) while still being somewhat dangerous. Basically a prehistoric cat that is more dangerous. 
TIL that all dinosaurs have a giant tail protruding from their mouth 
The larger dinosaurs are always the bigger draw; so essentially it's the same thing. 
This comment understates my genuwine question. What kind of create process led OP to this question? Were drugs involved? Is he simply a dinosaur fanatic? 
Denies evolution? Nah man. Evolution has nothing to do with it. You need city folk. You do this in Bronx. They won't know an ostrich from an emu, or from a dinosaur. 
Top 10 most racist dinosaurs! Number 7 will **SHOCK** you!! 
Yeah but the T. Rex in the movie was really strange looking 
Yeah but it's a fucking T-Rex! Ho them things like 35 feet! 
It's not like anyone would believe you if you said you saw it. 
What about that big ass fish one in Jurassic World? 
I heard it was a bit hard, you should cook it long enough with a lot of water. 
You mean to tell me that the geographical center of the ocean isn't the logical spot for fish to congregate? 
1. Employ minions who are loyal to me. 2. Luck. 3. I would visit, after getting my pilot's licence and buying a seaplane. 
I always assumed, for no particular reason I guess, that a T-Rex could live for *at least* a hundred years, if not much longer. They just seem invincible, and maybe the context of their existence being millions of years ago made them seem less mortal. 
From what I remember, Jurassic Park grossly exaggerated the Velociraptor's size and lethality. Apparently they're knee-high chicken with teeth, which is a bit disappointing. 
I think many animals we normally consider herbivores will often resort to eating other animals if they get hungry enough. Also I saw a deer ear eat a cicada once just because it could. Until then, I didn't know that bugs could scream. 
Or just sell the dino for more than they were going to give you. I don't know what a live dinosaur is worth but I think we can safely guess a lot more than a dead one. 
I mean, I would just ask for a argentinosaurus and then kill it immediately. Doesn't need to be fattened up when it's larger than any other Dino can get. 
I will assert dominance while it is a baby, like that Chris Pratt fellow. 
As far as I'm concerned, being eaten by a dinosaur is the coolest way to die anyways so you raise a good point 
"We will build a wall and we're gonna make the Brontosauruses pay for it!" What's plural for Brontosaurus? 
It's the equivalent of sending your kids to a boarding school, and yet still claim you raised them. It fits within the wording of the question. 
Nah, man, OP will operate him like an excavator, Flintstone style. 
Not just the women, but the men.... and the children too! 
When they say they've seen two in there, I wouldn't know what to believe. 
I think they'd be even LESS likely to believe if it was in a lesser known Loch. "See, that's where you're wrong! It's the Loch BESS Monster." "Eh." 
No, they tend to be found in the largest rivers. Because that's the mainstream. 
Who the hell has minions on Reddit? People seem to take 'get some sort of magical powers' as an assumed step one to this. Really the most common outcome would be trying to hide a dinosaur in your parents basement. 
Well, if it makes you feel any better, a Tyranosaur that's well cared for in captivity would almost certainly live longer than in the wild. 
Coyote-sized actually. And they hunted herbivores as heavy as an adult human. Alone. 
Yeah but t-rexs can't corner well. What are you going to do while racing through downtown Chicago. 
There's a video on YouTube of someone giving steak to a deer that walks up to his picnic table. The deer seems to enjoy it. There's another where a deer picks up a bird that's injured on the ground and eats it alive. And where a cow on a farm casually grabs and eats a baby chicken. And a pelican grabs a seagull and eats it alive. Huh, turns out I watch a lot of videos of animals eating animals they shouldn't. 
So after some quick research, there is no proper name since Brontosaurus (and all similar names) refer to the species as a whole, not individual members. The most common way to pluralize would be to remove the -us, and pluralize the "Brontosaur" part, thus becoming "Brontosaurs". Like I say though, this is an informal practice and there is no technically correct way to say it, besides the clunky "we're going to make the individuals of the Brontosaurus species pay for it". 
but would you be able to do an anonymous loan with "nobody" knowing. Wouldn't you need a lawyer or something knowing it was your dinosaur? 
Looks like we found some food for our Dino. Oh, look, only one monster left in the loch again. 
The rules say that nobody can find out *that you have one*. If they believe they've seen the Loch Ness Monster, are they really going to believe that you're it's owner? 
Yeah, but I'm also pretty sure the borderline superpowers they gave them in the film are also ficticious, so you could just put them in a cage. 
Utahraptor was discovered in 1993, the same year Jurassic Park came out, and three years after the book was published and work on the movie began. It's not that they called Utahraptor by the wrong name, but rather that we discovered a dinosaur that happens to fit the movie-version of Velociraptor. Also, the most accepted fan theory for this, as well as most of the other issues with JP dinos, is that they're not perfect clones of dinosaurs - the book and movie clearly establish that their genes are crossed with other species (notably, but not limited to, frogs). This leads to things like incorrect sizes, no feathers and, in a population of all females, life uh finding a way. 
So just get an huge crocodile and nobody will notice it? 
Literally the only thing I remember from that movie is Betty White sassily saying "If I had a dick I'd tell you to suck it!" 
Hippos kill more people every year than Abby other mammal in Africa, but they are not in the cities or towns. However in Australia you can find venomous snakes (nope ropes) or spiders in your house. Source: live in Africa, have friends in Australia 
Pelicans are carnivores though, why did you include them? 
I could always loan the dinosaur to somebody else if you and your zoo are feeling nosey. I'd imagine it'd get them a huge amount of business. 
Or they'll mate and you'll have even more of them. 
It's uh, actually worse. As far as we currently understand it, a raptor would kill you like an eagle does. It jumps on your back, piercing your throat and neck with it's razor talons. It would use it's claws to dig into you while it started to eat you alive. They had teeth and a mouth instead of a beak, so instead of sharp rips of your arteries and tendons, they'd pull huge hunks of your flesh off with every bite. Just imagine if a cheetah were a bird and you have some idea of what a velociraptor was. It took a six mile wide rock from God to take them out. We would not exist if they still did. 
Abby the other mammal must be pretty damn fierce to be compared to hippos in kill counts. (Leave it, it's funny.) 
Seagulls aren't their typical diet and this one was like a third of its size. It doesn't quite fit 100% but it's in the same genre of videos, animals eating strange things. 
Yeah the cake right. That saying fits perfectly. Good job remembering it and posting it. 
Depends on the reward size. The extra weight net increase may not be worth the extra cost and suspicion. You are acting like yo can just buy depleted Uranium at Home Depot! 
Went from vicious giant lizards to horse-sized ducks. 
Deinonychus was one of the first named. The name means "terrible claw" 
I suppose if you pretend to be the lawyer for a mysterious client, when in fact it is you, that would do it? 
Plus, if we film it, we can start a brand new genre of real life dino porn. Shit, I bet we could even get people to *pay* to watch dinos fuck. I know I would. 
Yup, it's crazy I had no idea, I've had all these dinosaur books ever since I was a kid and they showed stuff like megalodons and plesiosaurs 
I think I'd take that over the made up stuff, like being able to come up with complicated escape plans, and getting the ability to open doors for no reason whatsoever. Because hey, people do keep cheetahs and eagles in cages and they don't get eaten in elaborate escape attempts. 
I can confirm this, I have Abby the other mammal in my possession. You do not want to cross her. 
Rattlers are actually relatively safe, as far as venomous snakes go. Water Moccasins are a far more dangerous snake that we also have, and they'll not warn you first. But yes, generally snakes just want to be left alone. They only attack people when they feel threatened and cornered. Don't surprise a snake. 
and now we have a legitimate answer to "would you rather fight a horse-sized duck or 100 duck-sized horses?" the duck-sized horses, please, that raptor would definitely fuck me up. 
Funny. Earlier this school year, my daughter's high school drama club did both *Little Shop of Horrors* and *Grease* productions together on the same night. 
[](/dwscared)I think it's exactly as horrifying as it sounds. 
I had those same books! It was a blow to my kid mind when the truth dawned on me, too. 
Real problem with rattlers is that they'll likely bite you in a remote area, and without treatment, RIP. Love them though, they keep rodents in check. 
"I'll take one vibrating stegosaurus to go, please." 
We had a saying while deployed in the middle east. If you get bitten by a venomous snake, don't call the doc, call your mom 
This is like a serial killer's interpretation of Pokemon. 
Yeah, it's not like he could have use the money he saved from dinner to pay for a movie ticket or something. 
I pictured this from the point of view of the soaring bagel for some reason 
Say what you want, but I respect that she saw she was acting like that, and instead of taking what her daughter told her as an insult, actually thought to give her grandson a good first bday and go cool off. Crazy, but self aware enough to know to go calm the hell down. 
That is someone who is on day 13 of their two week notice. 
That's correct. We don't care about your cheeseburger 
Plot twist: there's no sensor it's just a guy watching the cameras waiting for peak rage before he opens the gate. 
a friend of mine feels this way about his GF's mother. She is legit batshit crazy. She makes passive aggressive comments to him if he is ever near her, and most of the time she just ignores his existence because in her mind, her daughter should be with some rich lawyer or doctor. But her real lunacy comes with her family. She treats her husband like a dog (even though he is the one holding her leash) and she started leveraging herself against her daughter so she would break up with my buddy. She stopped helping her pay fro nursing school, she took away the car that was in their name (even though her daughter paid for most of it), and during one of their arguments, she was riding with her mom and gets tired of her shit and told her to stop the car, she was getting out. The car comes to a stop, and she almost gets out, but her mom just floors it, almost knocking her out of the car. Total loony. 
I will never understand the people who try to buy coffee in the mornings and then complain they're going to be late when it's not ready in 2.5 seconds. At the Starbucks I go to, this happens every morning. It's like, dude, if waiting 2 minutes for your coffee is going to cause you to be late, you were already running late. It's not the employees' fault at that point. 
To be fair, the McDonalds near me literally never puts the sauce in the bag and i have to go back and ask for it everytime. Its frustrating, but hell, I'm not gonna act like a fucking 5 year old and assault people with it. Fuck that guy 
My daughter thinks it's the coolest thing in the world to see a dog with a job. It just blows her mind lol. She does know not to mess them. 
Hospitality industry nightmares. I work in a small boutique hotel with no security and a couple of years ago a guest had a nervous breakdown that lasted for about two hours. Her husband left her in the city center and she somehow couldn't get back to the hotel, started blaming us. Accused us all of being racist because she's Iraqi, accused the taxi driver of wanting to rape her, got in my face to the point I thought she was going to hit me. She was screaming so loudly the other guests locked themselves in their rooms. It was the worst thing I have ever witnessed from a human being. 
The manager has some spectacular timing...almost like they were waiting until assface left. 
Doesn't sound that hard, I mean, $150, what could that be? Like 15 bananas? 
Being kind, polite, and reasonable to airline employees has always netted me the biggest favor payouts for literally the least amount of effort. Seriously. 
I don't know that I follow. If they were both facing each other (head on?), why would one be trying to pass the other? 
When I worked as a cashier at a supermarket, our bag boy was sent to run and pick up a jar of jam for a customer ringing up who forgot to grab it ('cause he wasn't doing anything, she had a long order, and she had been decently nice thus far). When he brought it back it was apparently sugar free, and this pissed her off and she threw it at the customer service desk in anger and it exploded everywhere. Also had several people go nutso and start throwing food when they got angry. Milk was the worst, followed by yogurt and glass items. Thankfully they never threw wine. This was at a fancy grocery store too. In a nice part of town. People were just ridiculous occasionally. 
No doubt in my mind that he opened a few bags to cherry pick and stuff the one bag he was so insistent was sold by the the bunch as well. I know that type of shopper, that's why he got so pissed, all that effort for naught. 
fucking with airport security is typically a quick way to not get on your flight and be treated to a shiny new pair of steel bracelets. did she not get hauled away for this? 
I work with a rage-a-holic also. She snaps at everyone about the most miniscule things and management dismisses her bad behaviour because she's "had a hard life", but when I point out that half of the people in here have had a hard life and don't act like that, I'm the asshole. 
Obviously she knew that you were secretly The Weather God and the lifeguard thing was just a cover. I was behind a couple in a store that spent 5 minutes bitching to the cashier about the traffic (there had been a bad accident nearby, the traffic was horrible). The cashier got fed up, and with a deep voice announced "Traffic Begone!" while waving his hands at the windows. He paused, turned back to the couple and said "well, obviously my superpowers are gone." The couple was just so stunned they shut up, paid and left. 
I can see that place pushing mild-mannered parents into full-on freakouts. Like, when I was a kid, I never understood why my mom and dad were total dicks on our big group family vacations to Florida - now that I've pulled a few family vacations as leadership (along with my wife), it's easier to see how the stress gets to you. Throw in high expense and a well-intentioned pressure to provide your family with a total white-glove experience and I get why some people might freak out. Hell, I could see *myself* losing my shit in that heat/cost/general situation. 
Once that guy was sober, I'd insist that he pay everyone back, as the decent thing. 
I used to work in an ice cream parlour and the amount of abuse hurled at us was ridiculous. I've worked other customer service jobs, but there's something about ice cream that brought out the worst in humanity. 
I had a roommate like this, She would go shopping and max out her credit card and then her parents would pay it off repeatedly. She was storming around one day calling her mom a bitch because her mother had asked her to try not to go shopping as much. 
My dad did something similar. He got kicked out of every verizon store within a 30 minute radius because he broke his phone and demanded them to fix it for free. When they said they couldn't he said since it's a Verizon store that they "have" to do it. He proceeded to cuss and throw a tantrum at everyone who worked at each store. Didn't break anything surprisingly. He told me about it each time and sounded proud, I just told him to grow the fuck up and quit treating people like shit. He seriously thinks he's entitled to having the phone fixed for free and said "I'll go into every Verizon store and be shitty to them until they do it" It's been over a year now and he gave up, defeated. He thought if he acted mean enough they'd eventually do it and his mind was blown that they wouldn't give in. The worst part is, he's worked at restaurants, convenience stores and he was a manager at a Kmart when I was a kid. You'd think he'd know better 
I was expecting the opposite reaction where you all pretend that nothing is happening and avoid eye contact with one another. But I guess there are some instances where one must intervene. I had one of those the other day where I had to call the police when someone in front of me was violently mugged. 
LOL. I would have responded, "Listen, I can explain this to you, or a police officer can explain this to you." 
Why are people bringing their tissues out of the toilet and putting it in a bin, instead of flushing it down the toilet? 
Wasn't married, but my one and only ex likes to get drunk (alcoholic) and occasionally text me "I hope you fucking die" "fuck you cunt, die" "I hope you fall off a bridge" "I'm gonna drink myself to death tonight and it's your fault" Aren't people great. High five for the single life. 
"How dare you say that to my face." "I'd say it behind your back, but my car's only got half a tank of gas!" -Al Bundy 
When I was 19, a guy once tried to fight my friend after my friend supposedly cut him off in traffic. I was in the passenger seat, and this guy pulled up next to us at a red light, rolled down his window and started screaming. My friend, who just has a gift for pushing buttons, kept needling the guy until the guy looked like he was about to have an aneurysm. The guy gets out of his horribly-painted camo low-rider pickup truck, takes a few steps towards our car, and my friend laughs, waves, and takes off as the light changes to green. In the rearview mirror, we watched as two lanes of traffic start angrily honking at this guy because he's blocking one lane and his car is blocking the other. 
Say something. Couples can tend to get absorbed in themselves and fail to have an outside perspective that could help them. "I'd like to come over but your husband's outbursts make me a bit uncomfortable at times, would you like to go out to eat alone instead?" Make the problem clear but also make it clear you aren't avoiding them, you're just avoiding the situation. Which is fair - he isn't your husband, you shouldn't have to put up with that the same way. 
In slow-mo, with something suitably epic playing in the background. Flight of the Valkyries, perhaps. Optionally, teenagers in Einstein Bros shirts diving to intercept the flying bagel, with the typical slowmo "Nooooooooo!" and/or "Geeeeeeet doooooown!" 
St. Michael's Hospital Yelp review: Worst. Restaurant. Ever. 
I just worked in logistics refilling supply rooms and witnessed some shit. One woman would just scream "help!" and it was always for such mundane things. I heard the same nurse politely ask her to use her call light and be patient since she had a lot of patients. It was like every 5 minutes she'd still yell. Then another patient yelled to shut up from another room. I couldn't put up with that shit on a daily basis. 
"What's your profession?" "Oh, I'm a certified asshole. I make people mad and get paid to watch." 
Some of us make it out without becoming raging douchebags. Not all of us, but it does happen. 
DU-NUH. DDD DU-NUH D DUNUH DUNUH (I didn't know how to put that part into words) 
Yeah, here's how the situation would have gone the other 99% of the time. "Hello. I bought a car wash and then realized the car wash is out of order. I'm not going to be back here any time soon. Would you please issue me a refund for the carwash?" "Here you go, $7.99 back on your card." "Thanks, bud." (man drives away in dirty car) 
Its not for $0 though. Its for the hours ands hours of time spend finding/buying, cutting/printing, and organizing coupons or browsing/"clipping" coupons on apps. Then you have to go to the stores, sometimes many stores and sometimes hours away to find exactly what you need. Shopping can take even more hours as you comb through the store with your coupons, comparing everything to make sure you get the right things. Then you have to check out, which of course can take a while if you have a ton of things. After that you're stuck with massive amounts of items that you honestly probably don't even need, never would have bought, and don't even really want that you have to store in your home. It can spiral out of control. Nothing is ever free. You're trading the grocery bill for a _lot_ of time and energy, which honestly isn't worth it a lot of the time. 
She sure showed them. Bet they regret losing that sale. 
i thought the same thing. This is what ill start telling people so as to be more polite. 
Yep, I absolutely have those patches. I'm sure they deter some attention but sometimes crazy is just crazy. 
I had a few managers like that at McD's. One would be happy to hang out at front line and help out while things were slow (while constantly berating her staff about how they need to do better). But as soon as a line started to form or an actual issue arose, it was suddenly time for her to disappear into the office to do paperwork. 
I don't understand the question and I won't respond to it. 
Thank you! So far yes, I could go into labor any day now, at this point it's just a waiting game, but the doctor says he looks good and plump! 
Honestly, being polite, reasonable and kind works with damn near everyone in customer service. Even when I'm pissed, just saying "I'm sorry, I'm not mad at you I am upset at your company policy and I won't direct this at you" does amazing things because there is that rational separation that makes CSR feel like you aren't attacking them. They understand frustration. 
She was ostracized for the rest of our time there by both students and staff, got in trouble for inappropriately flirting with one of our taller students, but not much else. When the program was over no one ever heard from her again, haha. 
Country roads are often more narrow than regular roads, you usually have to move over to make room for someone going to other way. 
The worst tantrums I ever see in adults and children are in high end stores. idk if having money turns people into asshats or what, but I hate it when I have to go to a store on the high end side of town. 
I once had a manager who, when the entitled unreasonable lady said, "I am never doing business here again!" Replied with, "You promise?" She flipped her shit and the manager earned mad respect from every employee. 
Back on her home planet the stores are far more efficient. 
Grazers have been known to devour half a bag of grapes before they get to the register. 
I wanted to hang around and find out, but sadly it had taken me so long to get through security that my flight was boarding by the time I got through! 
Right? But she's a single mom and everyone needs to pity her and give her things and respect her time because it's more valuable than ours. Her mom bought her house, car and everything else she wants too...makes me sick 
I work at a ride in WDW that goes down for bad weather. My favorite line is "We came all the way from Israel just to ride this!" I'm sorry, but believe it or not, I can't make the rain stop. 
Some people got their share back, others like me just didn't want any more to do with that ass hat. 
I now have this image of millions of cats chasing a single laser pointer and some bored angel sitting on a recliner moving it around. 
Seriously though, couldn't have gone better for me. 
That nickel snowballed into the failure of the company 
She calls her a prostitute and she just mutters to her boyfriend "well I'm not getting paid" and they both snicker 
"You're a prostitute!" *scoffs* "I'm not getting paid!... :(" 
physically, they could be identical and it would still be true. Acting ugly makes one ugly. 
Yeah I'm kind of toggling between outrage at the fucking *exquisite* mental gymnastics required for someone to compute a bit of PDA as "having sex/sexual harassment" and deep amusement at her vapid face and cranky unhinged screeching. How are these people able to function in society? Like if you're that out of touch with reality, if you lack that much self awareness, how have you not been hit by a bus yet? 
He even said, all he did was kiss her once in the forehead. Apparently that also constitutes making out. 
I felt really bad for the cashier here. He didn't feel empowered to kick her out or make her stop and at several points he was on the receiving end of her abuse. 
It's true. This is my father's mentality. I'll never forget when I went with him to the apple store when he had this "we're gonna march right down there!" mentality about how I lost my adobe programs (I'm a student in school for graphic design so it was kind of a big deal) when my hard drive crashed. He was yelling so loud and causing such a scene I started to walk away after which he started screaming my name across the mall and telling me to "get the fuck back here!" He's also made many waitresses cry when out to eat and purposely makes a huge scene so they'll give him a gift card to calm down. Literally can't go anywhere in public with the guy without him causing a scene like this. 
We Brits do tend to make a scene when it comes to bus windows. I was on the bus with a group of friends, in the height of summer, and we got into a war of sorts with one man who insisted that the bus window remained closed. I like to think we won because he got off one stop before us. 
After having watched people come out of a stall and not wash their hands, just leave.... I always use paper towels to open bathroom doors on any place that isn't a private residence. People are just nasty man 
Used to wait tables myself- when I saw the owners confiscating the server's tips my blood boiled. 
obese woman: "I'm trying to get an all over tan" Al: "You're asking an awful lot of the sun lady!" 
People really thought they were going to pay for their kids college with beanie babies. 
Honestly, my coworkers come up with theories, and you hit the nail right on the head. They are control freaks, and are kinda in their own little world. I worked doing carts at the same place, and jesus, it's always the 40k+ nice suvs that are accelerating to 35 mph in a parking lot, slamming on the breaks, and fucking with their phones; all the same people. And honestly, alot of these people seem to be on heavy prescription drugs. You don't lose your cart and start having a panic attack in the middle of produce, just to realize it's right where you left it, in Produce. My supervisor and I spent 10 minutes looking for her cart.... 
I was thinking more like poorly-filmed, bagel waving unrealistically, bobbing up and down, passing dine-in customers as they gaze up, dropping food from their mouths, and a vehement banjo riff in the background, until the moment of impact, and then static. 
"Ten years ago I won the lottery and bought a parking garage. My life has been perfect ever since." 
It sounds like this son character was pretty logical about it... I feel there's hope for him. 
I've known people who do this who just donate it. Since it's mostly non-perishables that have coupons it works out. 
Please understand, I'm not emotionally involved enough with you to fuck you. 
My grandpa has a seeing eye dog, I think that helps. 
That's a policy I follow in regular life. It's a little heartwarming to hear customer service people perk up just because I answered their greeting with "I'm doing fine; how about yourself?" Politeness doesn't cost anything. 
What the fuck? How do you not get fired instantly after bitching at your supervisor and punching a hole in a wall? 
When a shop policy pisses me off I don't bother to tell the cashier I'm never buying from them again because I know the cashier won't care and can't do anything about the policy. Instead I calmly leave and just never shop there again, if a friend asks me about the shop I recommend they don't go and explain why. I don't know why so many people seem to think doing anything different will help them in any way. 
I had a family come through my register recently eating some wings from the hotbar as they checked out. Yeah, those need to be weighed you stupid assholes. Grapes get everyone though. Unless they are on a huge sale they are fucking expensive if you get a big bag. 
I love people like you! My local grocery store does that all the time. They always ask "do you want to really pay $X for Grapes etc"? Always makes me go back to that store. Thank you, I'm sure you don't get that enough! 
This job would be great if it wasn't for the fucking customers. - Randal, Clerks 
Would kill to have this as a print for one of our exam rooms. It could be a whole series. "Cat Heaven". Laser Pointer, Yarn Balls, Gigantic fish tanks and birds for them to watch, a whole room of black couches for them to get hair all over, the possibilities are endless. 
I'm gonna start slapping a dollar bill on the counter when people don't have change just to try to get in on this action. Probably won't pay off but it's worth a shot. 
That's an expensive fucking ice cream cone, regardless of discount. 
you can _not_ be doing prostitution in public! I want my money back! 
You'd think there was a full on Caligula-style orgy happening. 
Ugh. The first time I took my out-of-state niece 7 and nephew 8 to eat without my sister around... they freaked out because I didn't send my meal back. Literally open-mouths staring at me. The waitres had brought a different dish than I ordered but it looked great so I kept it, and refused her to take it off my bill. Apparently my sister sends her meal back to the kitchen almost.every.time they dine out. 
Can I throw a tantrum online and get a free MacBook delivered? 
I've never been a server but this makes MY blood boil. I've worked in customer service, and so many people make it hell. Even if you've never worked customer service, serving is clearly a hard job. You're on your feet, you're balancing 18 drinks on a tray, you're working busy times flying around the place dealing with people. So I always tip well and want my tip to go to the person I'm tipping. I have no idea what the boss is like and I'm giving my money to the person who served me because they did a good job, and because they're the one on their feet refilling my drink and being kind and efficient. I hate that tipping is even a thing (in the US), that servers have to consider tips as part of their income. Tips should just be extra appreciation. 
the compressed air nozzles at the cameras to blow dust off. he should have started a new life as a construction manager. that's some impressive forethought and problem solving skills. 
Reminds me of that ridiculous picture where a couple is sitting on the floor of a courtroom during a divorce hearing so they can split up their beanie baby collection 
His response seems like the only reasonable option he had, he might be alright 
My favorite professor in college was tenured but still cared about teaching. He didn't care much about tardiness; this was his policy: - I won't start the lesson over. Come to my office hours or ask a friend for notes - If you come in late, just walk around back and sit down. Don't apologize to me or draw attention to yourself. - If you're late because of Starbucks (there was a Starbucks in the same building) my order is a grande hot coffee black. Just put it on the podium. He also had a rule about not watching pornography on your iPad if there were people sitting behind you, but that is another story. 
I really thought that said " My grandpa **is** a seeing eye dog" and was thoroughly caught off guard for a moment. 
I think these people have a super power that makes other people forget what the number for 911 is. 
Not only can the cashier not do anything, but they are probably saying "good fucking riddance" to people who throw tantrums and say that. 
Weird, every time I've seen wings sold in a store like that they weigh it at the deli and slap a sticker on it for the cost, or they'll have you pay right then and there. 
At the vary least it'll make for a decent story and help some poor cashier have a slightly less shitty day. 
I'll send you a 10 year old broken laptop and a check for 12 dollars if you throw an adult tantrum on video and it makes the front page of Reddit. 
his modified stats were: +15 engineering ingenuity -30 emotional stability 
Trying to get this through to my partner. She likes to threaten her kindergartener, and wonders why the little one doesn't obey or even pay attention to anything she says. "Honey, make it stick the first time, and she'll figure it out." I'll admit, being on point all the time is tiring and there are a lot of times you just want to shrug and let whatever it is slide, but it sets back your child every single time. 
Holy shit this is one of the best I've seen. I'll remember this for later. 
That's what my local store does now, but they did used to have a self serve area where you'd have to take it up to the register yourself to get it paid. 
And on the flip side, if you find yourself in that situation, the tax is the price you paid to get rid of them. 
I'll just throw it down and wink at the cashier as I walk out with my red bull without paying. 
Half the shit we say to our kids to get them to behave is a bluff. Eventually they figure that out and we have to change tactics. 
OOh, that sounds dangerous. Anything requiring using the honour system in a store is just built to fail. "What, I only bought one wing", as he licks bbq sauce off of his fingers. 
I think your dad is literally the nicest person on the planet atm. Treasure that mofo. 
He's probably getting paid with an original run Valentino with an intact misprinted tag. 
I saw one beating up 4 people on a bridge some time ago. 
Actually Storm is pretty popular in Denmark these days. 
Well. Now I have no doubt what to name my child. Velocity Vincente. 
Are you sure he won't have to put up with being called granny by unborn bullies? 
My grandfather knew a guy named Fred Head. As if that weren't bad enough, he named his son Richard. As if *that* weren't bad enough, he went by Dick. Years go by and my uncle (whose name is Guy, but that's irrelevant) met a young dude at a construction site by the same name. Turned out to be Dick Head's son. Apparently, Dick Sr. didn't see anything wrong with passing down the name, nor did Dick Jr. have any issue with calling himself "Dick." For all I know, there's a Dick Head III running around. 
She was a tragic Shakespearian character that killed herself. 
Like Laura Ingalls Wilder's husband Almanzo, whom they called Manly. His name was said to come from a guy called Al-Mansur, a guy who helped his family during the crusades. 
"Ernie ran his own baking company, and Elmo settled down with a wife and got into insurance underwriting or somesuch. The weird kid, Oscar, went on to make a fortune doing asbestos remediation. Snuffie died in Korea." 
6 newborns in the US were named Llewellyn last year. 
Went to school with a guy called that. His sisters were Persephone and Apphia so looks like his parents were keen on mythology. 
I find a baby with the name Maurice to be hilarious, it sounds very adult. 
I work at a graveyard in Finland. There is a area for war heroes and one stone has a name Urban Decider. 
Do babies actually get called Gary? Or do people just change into a Gary when they're 40? 
Good call. It was HUGE in the 40s iirc, so there's a lot of people with an Aunt/Cousin/Mom/Grandma Linda, but I've only ever known two people that were my age with that name. 
Yeah, but you can call him "Nucky" like on Boardwalk Empire. 
Tomato would have been kinder, he could have gone by Tom. 
Friend of mine just named her daughter Lucille! I think it might make a comeback especially with the nickname Lucy. 
Cora is gaining popularity again. There's two girls in my kid's class named Cora. 
I saw him drinking wine with a 7 foot monster and a petite blonde 
Heath Ledger's full name was Heathcliff. His parents actually *were* big Wuthering Heights fans. 
I find it odd that Ebenezer Scrooge is a nasty name now, because it'd be sharing a name with "as good a friend, as good a master, and as good a man, as the good old city knew, or any other good old city, town, or borough, in the good old world." 
My great-aunt Hortense married a guy in the Army and was relocated from Texas to Virginia. She disliked the name Hortense, so when they moved she began to go by Virginia for the rest of her life to her friends, but the family didn't learn this until she was about 88 years old at her granddaughter's wedding. For several hours my grandparents and I (my grandfather was her brother) kept hearing about this "Virginia" lady and assumed they were talking about someone on the other side of the family. Awkwardness ensued. 
I knew a couple that named their son Harrison. Last name is synonymous with a male organ. 
This made me think of the Portlandia where there is a hipster couple who have a son named Grover. 
It's debatable as to whether she killed herself though. She was crazy, yes. But Gertrude talks about how she was reaching for a flower while on the bank of a river and fell in. You have to remember this took place in Denmark at a time when the world was in a mini ice age. It was fucking cold there, and dresses were made out of wool and I can't imagine it's easy to swim in a waterlogged corset. That dress had to be pretty heavy and Ophelia likely wasn't taught how to swim as it was seen as unbecoming of a young lady. Also in her ramblings before she died she didn't necessary show suicidal intentions 
Took me a while before I understood you meant OJ Simpson before reading the whole thing, so I was like "what the fuck is Orenthal Juice? i'm pretty sure it's orange juice" 
My grandmother lived next to a family where the husband and wife had an agreement: The mother got to name the girls, the father got to name the boys. Eventually they had 3 older girls, and 1 youngest boy. The girls' names were Aphrodite, Cleopatra, and Nefertiti. The boy's name was Bob. 
But he will always have a cool guitar lick. *Nine year redditor and by far my highest comment is about the pompitous of love. I'm ok with that. 
Urban Shocker was a pitcher for the New York Yankees baseball team in the 1920s. I still think it's one of the best baseball names ever. 
Mostly girl's names. Faith, Hope, Prudence, Chastity, Temperance, Justice, Charity, Grace, Mercy, etc... Some are more common than others. 
My grandma's name was Ethel as well. Except she hated it even then so went by her middle name instead. She was Grandma Lois. Which, fittingly, is another name you don't hear that often. 
Yeah that does seem kind of weird. We gave our kids normal names you'd expect kids today to have, and then gave them more classic middle names that they can use when theyre crotchety and old if they want. 
I would say it was somewhat popular into the 60s too. I was born In 1964 and there were quite a few Lindas in my HS. 
It was a joke from a show called "The unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt". One of the characters dates a guy with a baby named Linda and he thinks it's super weird that the baby doesn't have a nickname. The joke was essentially that Linda is a perfectly normal name for an adult woman but that it seems weirdly formal for a small baby. 
Next level: several years ago when I was a lifeguard, I rescued a girl named Iceis. Yes, pronounced Isis. My hope is that she just misspelled it because she was 6 and that that wasn't actually how her parents spelled it, but... 
I met a stripper on Friday who told me her name was Egypt. I said "Oh I'm Chad, we're neighbors!" She didn't get it. 
I can't believe you went with "Meowslamic" over "Meowslim" 
I think the "someone" taking one for the team in that case would be the daughter 
Dad: "So son, how was school?" Cxaxukluth: "My teacher melted during roll call." 
This is actually how the company Adidas was named. The guy who started it was named Adolph Dassler but went by Adi. The company name is a combination of his nickname and a shortened form of his last name. 
Time having fun: 8/10 Time having fun with Rice: 10/10. Thank you for your suggestion. 
We had a faculty assistant at my high school whose job it was to break up fights. He was an enormous black guy named Alpha Omega [last name] 
Know a guy named Julio. They spelled his name "Huleo". That's what he is in my contacts now 
I never got that either, I mean the whole story was about his redemption and how he became a kind and good person at the end. I don't know why the name became synonymous with the crabby, selfish character he was at the beginning. 
Wow so it's almost like calling your son Richard the dickless? 
They one with very aspirational pre-school ambitions. Love that episode 
True, but wasn't she singing songs while her clothes took on water? I just remember talking in class about her maybe not meaning to kill her self, but being okay with it after she fell in. 
I went to school with 3 Llewelyn's in my class! The curse of being Welsh. 
Great writer, but she's 87 years old (born before people stopped naming their kids Adolf). 
AND HERE COMES RASHEED WALLACE WITH A TECHNICAL FOUL! 
I want to call my son Bob just so I can tell everyone that it's short for Bobert. 
It'll come back around. When Aiden and Emma have a baby, they will name her Linda and their son Sam. Names tend to skip a generation, which is why Evelyn and Oscar are popular right now 
That's weird anyway, does she forget her name or something? 
Any chance she actually acknowledged that Chad and Egypt don't share a border? 
And his brother Rudolph tried to do the same thing by creating the company "Ruda" but would later change the name to Puma 
My grandfather was named Adolf. Went by the name Al in WWII. Kinda hard working at the Brooklyn Navy yard with that name 
Goddam nazis, ruining cool symbols and shit. Is there nothing more evil than that? 
Killing people via aids is a very *long game* approach these days. 
Well his parents didn't name him that...but pretty much. He made some poor descions and lost two wars, leading to the crowning of two Danish Kings of England (the first, Sveinn Forkbeard, invaded in 1013, but died a year into his reign. His son, Knut the Great, invaded again in 1016 to restore his father's throne in England...After the first invasion Aethelraed was restored by his vassals, only to die midway into losing the second) 
My dick fresh like Caillou, She get wet like Caillou 
That's what I call my baby boy Robert. Mom is not amused. 
If-Christ-had-not-died-for-thee-thou-hadst-been-damned-because-he-had-a-killer-life-insurance-policy-and-you're-the-sole-beneficiary 
Came to make sure someone repped this series. He's hilarious. 
lots of people have a startlingly low amount of creativity but, also a need to express themselves. 
I know the joke would've worked better if her name was Cameroon BUT I WORK WITH WHAT I'M GIVEN! THAT ASS WAS PHENOMENAL 
He seriously dropped the ball when he decided not to name the company "Rudidas". 
We have arrested your son. We have also arrested your older fatter balder son. 
On a similar line, I want to name a kid (maybe not *my* kid) Ted, short for Tedward. 
Treborrr!!! The Burninatorrr!!! Oh wait, that's something else... 
If-you're-still-reading-this-far-congratulations-but-you're-really-just-wasting-your-time-and-should-really-get-back-to-work-peace. 
No one will ever trust me when I recommend it. Suckers. 
I'm so embarrassed, I wish there was a hole I could just crawl into and die. 
So, did he have all 50 kids in a relatively short span of time, like in the first 100 years, or was he fruitful until the high 800's? 
You just need to trap them in a tobacco tin at the bottom of the Thames then. 
I'm definitely not a professional, but when I spar with girls we don't hit each other in the tit because it's kinda pointless. Getting hit in the tit usually doesn't hurt very much. Go just a little higher or lower and you'll inflict way more damage. Boobs are also sort of hard to hit. Just because of how you hold your arms when you fight they're covered most of the time. If you have an opening in that area you're gonna want to throw an uppercut or something instead. Also, I feel like you would be able to buy like "boob cups" or some sort of protective gear for sparring if it actually hurt that much. But I could definitely be wrong. That's just my experience. 
I used to do sports photography in high school, and it was always shocking to me that the water polo players would come out of the pool bleeding and bruised all over their bodies below the shoulders. Girls on the women's team would intentionally grow their teonails long and use them to stab and scratch the opposing team. Shit was incredibly brutal. 
Or, in casual conversation on the first tee, ask: "I've always wondered, do you like to inhale or exhale during your swing?" That'll have their game screwed up for a while. 
Just to Hijack this anybody who is into sports should check out O'Sullivan, even if you never watch snooker. In my opinion he is the closest to Autistic savant level skill in any sport ever. The guy is a complete genius when he is on his game, its literally art. 
That's why I find it extremely frustrating to play Risk with certain people. Like couples that are just 'automatically on a team', or a veteran player 'coaching' a younger player. If anyone at the table is playing for second place, then the game just isn't fun. 
Everquest had a bunch of game mechanics that encouraged dickishness. Rogues, for example, could pickpocket cash off of monsters without any in the group knowing about it, and it would decrease the loot split for everyone else. You could ask the rogue politely not to pickpocket but, without a way to verify, most still did it anyway. If you had a favourite spot for killing monsters, and some other person got there before you, etiquette was to wait or go somewhere else and ask to be pinged when they were done. Bad etiquette was to go gather up every hostile monster in the area, run them over the guy, and take the space while he runs back to his corpse. "Training" like this repeatedly would be considered griefing, but it's difficult to prove intent if it just happens the once. 
The better way to do this is be the Huns and send out a bunch of warriors to look for ruins until you get one to upgrade into a battering ram and then you just solo their capital. 
The bunting while the pitcher is throwing a no no has to be infuriating. Can you imagine, being outs away from greatness and it gets broken up with a bunt? 
Playing scrabble with people that know the official scrabble dictionary by heart is one of the least fun things in the universe to do. 
is it still even possible or helpful to count cards? Last time I played table games in Vegas they used like 8 decks at once and cycled them out after a few hands 
It's legal to attack your opponent as soon as the bell rings and it's looked down upon as a dick move to do so when your opponent is trying to touch gloves. Or when the ref doesn't notice an eye poke or groin shot. 
Late 90s, playing Quake (that is, the first Quake) in an office full of dudes after hours. Map: House of Chthon. I realized the spawns points were being utilized in a regular sequence, and that 9/10 of them were visible from certain points in the map. For that 1 hour, I was a golden god. There were several times I sent the rocket that would kill my opponent at the 2nd spawn first, then killed him and sent him there. 
Hack-a-Shaq Very volatile topic in sports. Some people see it dirty, some see it has smart. The fact that a 7'3" man can't make more than 52% of his free throws is just dumb. 
At least it was fun, and frankly, defendable. Run the corner blitz. Shaun Alexander up the middle, though... boring as fuck. And I had a friend that would just run up the middle with him for 3-5 yards every play. 
I had a player try that once. I told him to explain to the rest of the party in game, with out breaking character or using any meta knowledge of rules and mechanics, exactly how handing an object to the guy in front of you would somehow accelerate it hypersonic speeds. After five minutes of silent thought, he finally just slumped back in his chair with a look of complete utter defeat on his face that still haunts me to this day. 
My father in law played college baseball and some minor league ball. He said he never showboated except for once. He belted a ball over 500' and shattered a light, The Natural style. He said he knew it was the best hit of his career off of his bat and just watched it. The pitcher started yelling at him to run, and he bat flipped. It was his first at bat of the game and he ended up going 1-1 for the game with three HBP's. Two of the pitchers got ejected. 
Yea all the cheating that goes around makes it a better single-player game 
But that Dog is over 18 and clearly plays above little league level. 
Placing proximity mines on all the spawn points in 007. I kill you once, you die 8 more times and throw the controller against the wall. 
The problem is, suppose someone's at $700. If you play it right, you go $701 and people are like "aww man what a dick". On the other hand, you try and play nice and give them a buffer, say $725 or $750. Then all the people watching at home are like "lol look at this fucking idiot" 
to be fair, almost every play in Catan is frowned upon by others, during the game. 
Mankading is still controversial but arguably less so than first instances in the 40s. If a non-striking batsmen is seeking to gain an advantage then it seems fair game for the bowler to take the bails off. 
Can you elaborate further about what was going on here? I've tried googling it, but some of the comments aren't making sense with what I'm reading. 
It should be said that oblique kicks are far from universally frowned upon. Plenty of fighters use them, and it's a point of contention in MMA. 
Anytime this happened to me, I'd do it right back, and I'd keep saying the same thing over and over. 
As a Magic player the idea of discussing sideboarding options with your opponent boggles my mind. Is that actually common in yugioh? Is this casual or competitive(is there competitive yugioh?)? 
The problem is that the goalie can be any size they want, but the pads can only be a certain size... 
Along a similar vein, some people are complete assholes about foot placement rules in disc golf, to the point that they'll cry bloody murder if they think you're a few inches closer to the basket than you should be. 
wait, so you're saying that men play roller derby? 
Also the flip side of this where as soon as a batter has both feet in the box the pitch can be delivered. You see this a lot in little league but adult league softball pitchers do this shit all the time, too. I shouldn't have to hold for time in fucking beer league 
Also related to this, kicking the ball back to the other team after they put it out for you when they had possession. Nothing stops you from having a shot on net if you felt like it, and I've seen this done. Not at all sportsmanlike 
That's messed up. When I played the ref always made sure to check our nails before the match started. Didn't mean no scratches though lol but an improvement for sure. 
In high school region band auditions, one of the guys in my trumpet section would listen to some of the better guys warming up, and ask, "Did you just change mouthpieces?" implying that there was something seriously wrong with their sound. Sometimes it really threw off some of the guys' performances. 
Would definitely like to know more about that if it is so. 
I feel as though the other replies so far have missed this point: A standard cricket bowl is overarm, the arm must remain straight and this combination means the ball is predominantly airborne. This allows a batsman to hit under the ball and get some distance on it. Think of it as a baseball home run style hit. In this case the Australian bowler bowled the ball underarm. The result was the ball was literally bowled, as in 10 pin bowling. No air. Imagine trying to hit a baseball home run if the ball was rolling across the ground. It, generally speaking, cannot be done. Bowling underarm had not been done before, or since at a professional level. The bowl still counted, it denied NZ a chance to equalise, and is still seen as a dick move decades later. 
Similar story here in NZ. I know next to nothing about cricket, but that story is a household tale. 
This describes high school tennis 100%. It happened to me when I played and I watch it happen now as a volunteer coach. It might just be where I am, but alot of kids start making blatant bad calls when they see that they are over matched. Sometimes it wins them the match, sometimes it doesn't. All I know is that a teenager's psyche usually can't handle that and it gets into their head. It's hard to tell your player what to do in that situation because there really isn't anything that can be done. I usually tell them at that point to start being a backboard and make sure to get it over directly in the middle and make them lose the points on their own. 
We used to do this in Star Wars Galaxies on Dantooine. There was an ultra-high level mob that was basically the equivalent of a raid boss if SWG had raids, on Dantooine called a Dark Jedi Master. It had something like 1.2 million Health/Action/Mind, heavy armor, and 90% resistances to everything but the Lightsaber damage type. If you found one of these, you could train it literally anywhere on the planet, and anything in it's path would die. If you brought it to the most populated city, the Dantooine Mining Outpost, hundreds of people would die, over and over again, because it hit for 20k+ and we only had 4k, at most. It was crazy fun for everyone involved. 
I think last season Max Scherzer of the Nationals had a perfect game going (a no hitter and no runners allowed on base - extremely a rare feat) and in the bottom of the ninth the supposed last out was hit by a pitch, ending the perfect game. There was controversy at the time because replays made it look like the batter had leaned in to get hit by the pitch or not try to avoid to being hit, both of which could have led the ump to not give the batter the base. Scherzer did get the no hitter on the next batter, so it wasn't a complete loss. 
At least stuff like Punpun relies on acquiring certain magical items, making deals with otherworldly beings... stuff that's easily blocked by a DM. Wish/Simulacrum is so simple and by the book that the only way to block it without bringing up houserules and such is to deny access to the powdered ruby component required 
I'm freaking using this when my players try to pull a fast one like the one above. So epic, thanks for the laugh! 
It's not super hard for the DM to just say "rocks fall, all the clones die, and Mystra strips you of your magic because you're a dick." 
Playing quiz games where someone has memorized all the questions and answers to the point of being able to answer before the question is even finished is worse.... especially games where quickest answer wins. 
You can find 2 or 3 deck shoes at non-peak hours. Single decks in the high rollers room. The payout is structured differently, I believe hitting blackjack pays 6/5. But to your original point, the advantage from counting is nearly nothing with 8 decks. 
I like these because it's not just skill, but also strategy. They have to know the rules so well and weigh the consequences in a clever way. 
When I was playing in an over 30 baseball league, my pitcher and I worked out a very simple but effective hidden ball trick. Once we had a runner on first, the pitcher would throw over to me at first base, just a casual 'check the runner' toss. I'd then trot over to the pitcher to have a short conference with him, and drop the ball into his glove, but he'd have his glove tilted down so the ball would roll right out and into my glove which was under his. I'd then go back to first base, the pitcher would get ready to pitch, the runner would take a lead and I'd tag him out. It even worked without the transfer of the ball. All I had to do was go talk to the pitcher and the runner usually assumed I had given him the ball. 
True. Less of preying on a youth's willingness to follow fairplay and more about catching a lazy player. Plus awesome when they're pulled off correctly 
I've heard that the reason guys like Shaq are so bad at free throws is because it's really hard to shoot them if you have big hands. Not sure how true that is or the exact mechanics behind it though. Back in Wilt's day some said it was because he was mimicking guys 6 or more inches shorter, and the mechanics just aren't the same, but by now there have been enough 7 footers in the history of the sport that I don't think that could be it. 
Well, you are correct. I just pulled out the "official" rules and found this: *If there are not enough houses in the Bank for a player to build four houses on each property before building a hotel, the player may not skip directly to buying a hotel by paying the full price at one go.* That's not how we ever played it, but then I guess house rules run rampant in Monopoly. 
Punt block defense all day. Play as the free safety just in case. 
I let players do combat timing for noncombat stuff all the time. Basically whenever things get tense or where timing matters. But yeah, no way I'd let peasant railgun fly. 
Or lining them up for miles on end. In fact my personal favorite way of dealing with psionics is one of those methods. Time stop, planar shift, sever their connection to the plane of force. Tada, your badass psionic is now a 17th level commoner. 
"If you do not let me be the top hat I swear to christ I will piss on your bed randomly over the course of 10 years. I will let it dry and won't use a lot, so you will have to purposefully sniff your bed EVERY GOD DAMN TIME you get in it." "...can I be the car then?" Other player: "try it and I will murder your flower bed, bitch." 
That sounds about right lol. At least he gave his OBP a boost. It's way more acceptable now though. A lot of pitchers will sort of let it slide. Standing and watching is worse than just flipping the bat, from what I've seen. 
No, it's when you hit a home run, you drop the bat in a very exuberant fashion. Literally throwing it into the air and letting it flip onto the ground. I've never seen anyone even attempt to catch the bat after they flip it. I honestly have no idea how anyone would react to that. 
It's considered showboating in baseball, some pitchers will drill you in your next at bat. (it's getting more acceptable now) Baseball is a super uptight and superstitious sport though, there's all sorts of weird stuff like that. 
I was never that cruel. I would pick up the armor and drop a proximity mine on its spawn. I figured out that pickups could be destroyed, (by explosives or by shooting them) then you'd have to wait for them to despawn before they would respawn. 
This is the right time to bust out the old "I'm not here to make friends" bit. I'm on Price is Right to win, bitches. I don't give a shit of you think I'm a dick, because I'm going home with a sweet-ass refrigerator, a treadmill I'll never use, and a mid range snowboard. 
The thing is we love to watch people being dicks on TV. People can go "Oh shit, they did that!" The interpersonal drama is far more interesting than estimating prices. 
If your friends don't hate you by the end of the game, then you're not playing properly. 
My favorite is to randomly ask for a trade for something you know is pretty common in game. "hey does anyone have any sheep?" and everyone berates you with trade offers, then you go "oh good everyone give me all your sheep, I am sheep king now" 
That's why you don't do this until you don't need to trade any longer to win. If this puts you far enough ahead to be able to close it out, or just lets you finish it right then and there you're golden. If not then you didn't play the monopoly right. 
I would say this is pretty different. In most cases, the foul fest at the end of the game is to give the losing team a shot, and all the winning team has to do is make free throws. Here is just kind of abusing an oversight (that you still lose time on penalties) to gain an advantage. 
I remember being taught this move during high school wrestling. We called it the "snow plow" 
Tell that to Holtby whose mask fell off early last season, they didn't whistle play dead and a player still took a slap shot at the net narrowly missing his head. 
This was generally only used in mirror matches where there were overpowered limited cards (you can only run 1 in a 40 card deck) - to eliminate the luck factor in one of them drawing it. One recent example is a card that allows you to draw 5-6 cards or mill 1-4 (dice roll, too). So it was always very icky to play with the one copy and have a player draw it first. Another was a card that let a player pay half his lifepoints and put back all exiled creatures into play "with haste" (as is normal in yugioh), easily winning that turn. That card was also restricted to 1. --- Basically two opponent's that often knew each other (think about the "old boy club") would agree to dispose of those cards in favor of a more skillful matchup - too bad if it was already a factor in g1 ... so sometimes one player had to gamble a little. 
Yeah. I DM a campaign atm, and stuff like this is allowed, but only with the out-of-character permission of everyone involved. #1 rule of D&D is to have fun, after all. 
Except when you throw AOE fire at the battle between your full hp tank and the million mooks surrounding him. That's fine. So is mind controlling your 6 INT Orc Warrior so they don't screw up when they fail an INT check. 
If you let him get nukes before you and he's your neighbor then you only have yourself to blame 
Hah when I was like 13 a friend of a friend was trying to impress me with that. I didn't know the strategy, all he said was "choose 1 pokemon, absolutely any you want, and I will beat you with a level 1 ratata." I obviously didn't believe him, and took on the challenge. I chose a ghost type, he did not impress me that day. 
Didn't stop Contador. Also, wouldn't doping be considered poor form? 
I have a friend who works for the internet, and he says everything on it isn't true 
This is savagely genius. Trumpet playing in high school band is at least 55% ego. 
Well players are discouraged against conceding frames because that is technically a form of match fixing, i.e. not making your best effort delibrately. Since the sport is highly bet upon it doesn't help the reputation of the sport to concede early and could even trigger investigation from authorities outside the sport. 
I imagine if Australia and NZ ever went to war this would be listed as one of the reasons. New Zealanders are never going to forget this are they? 
Thats when you start trying to hit the other player, because if they touch its a dead ball. 
I think op was implying that wheels was playing the dick move 
Wasn't there a glitch early on where if you disowned a pet it would return to its original hostile state? I read stories about people going into populated areas, yelling "Run!" Before releasing a high end creature from their ownership, which promptly went on a killing spree. 
Or the DM just says, "Stop being a cock. We're here to have fun, not watch you jerk yourself off." 
Seriously, when has a big powerful dude, in any form of fiction ever, created a massive army of clones of himself and had it work out for him. Come on. Its the classical 'fall from your own hubris' trope. Any player doing this would probably be playing a character who's kind of a dick, and that means the clones are also kind of dicks, meaning they'll probably end up turning on their master at some point. 
The worst part for me as a Vancouverite who didn't / doesn't care at all about hockey is the number of people at the time who were defending Bertuzzi. "It's part of the game!" No you fuckwit. It's assault. 
The number of deaths lately are appalling. It ruins the fun of a night out when you have to be on the lookout for fuckheads everywhere. 
When the ref has to hold the fucking goalie on the ice to stop him from taking you out, you know you dun fucked up. 
How do they do that though? I've never been treated any way but cordially inside a casino. Does the pit boss come up to you and say something like, "congratulations on your good fortune sir, now GTFO and don't come back"? 
There was one earlier this year that was brilliant. I dont remember the team or player though. There was a kickoff and the ball rolled to the corner of the two yard line. If the player picked it up hed have to run and would have a hard time getting a decent field position. If he didnt touch the ball the other team could grab it and keep possession. So the returner ran out of bounds, and laid down on the ball while his legs were still out of bounds. By rule the ball was automatically considered out of bounds and because it was considered kicked out of bounds on a kickoff the kicking team got a penalty and the receiving team got the ball on the 40. Amazing move. 
It's predominantly viewed as dishonorable for Yokozuna. Lower ranked players are judged less harshly for it. Hakuho, the man in the video, is one of the top all time wrestlers of the sport. 
If your pitcher got within 5 feet of the pitching rubber then that was actually a balk that the umpire didn't call. In some leagues the pitcher can't even be on the mound without the ball. 
My name is Michael J Caboose, and I, hate, babies! 
IIRC he had a bad injury to his wrists early on in life and never fully recovered. 
Yes, this is the correct rule and is FAR more damaging than your version. You can have a monopoly of houses on your monopolies in Monopoly, 
I'll catch you in the flats with the audible pulling a stunt like that 
The correct answer to the railgun is to totally allow it except the final peasant has to make the attack roll at -5 per previous peasant, level a mountain 3 countries over, NEW PLOT HOOKS. 
Or pull a jorge soler (Cubs player) and hit a ball deep, and jog slowly to first, only for the ball to hit the wall...in the fucking NLCS. He still got a triple but if he'd ran to first, it could've been an inside the park homer. 
You can also put mines on pickups, and if you collect them, bam, invisible mine. 
"I swear to Jesus himself if you put the thief on my stone production I'm going to come across this table and kick your ass." My 100 pound 5 foot nothing cousin who is a pastors wife and mother of three. This game distills hatred. 
Oh I won with the move on *that* game, it just cost me like 15ish games over the next 20. 
Who makes an Int Check in a game when not playing a caster? 5E rules? You mean a will save? Preventing the Frenzied Berserker from killing the entire party because he stubbed his toe? 
Trumpet player in high school band here, 110% ego. Nothing else matters. 
I'm sure it was a sour topic back when it occurred, but now the story is generally told in a tongue-in-cheek manner as a reference to the "sly nature" of "those blasted aussies". 
This was also my preferred strategy for dealing with blatant cheaters back in the day. Drag them up close to the net with a dropshot, and then just drill balls straight at their face until they get the message or lose their nerve. Half the time, they get nervous and dive out of the way. 
Yep. I remember that happening on a few occasions. Creature Handlers were notoriously busted at the beginning of the game. It was also one of the most effective ways to easily double your HP pool before doctor buffs became the more widespread and mainstream way of preparing to go adventuring 
Yeah, a competent DM would shut this down. Personally, to give it more flavor, I would have something about his soul tearing apart after two or so clones, and some diety/wizard/ whatever warns them that if they continue to do this, their soul will be so fragmented that they will die. 
That would be satisfying for one of the clones to cast wish and wish to not be bound by the op caster and send a chain reaction of liberated clones. And then you've got a fresh new side quest exterminating the unruly clone army. 
It was the green bay packers and i believe it was richard rodgers, the tight end that did it. They said it was practiced just in case it happens. 
*Completely* ignorant about CS; what is awping? I've played a few FPSs before, but I've never heard that term. 
"Your toast has been burnt and no amount of scraping will remove the black part." 
Yeah, iirc, he can't bend his hand forward past where it would be straight in respect to his arm, if that makes sense. It's probably why his shooting form looks kinda like he's shotputting the basketball. 
Which make sense, because the game was originally developed to show people that monopolies are bad 
This chain is like word salad to me, I know the words but not in that order. 
Also the quarters are 4 or 5 minutes in Madden, so you can kneel out most of the 4th quarter if your opponent is out of timeouts. 
This came after a very controversial top of the inning which game the Rangers a lead. Fans were irrate and throwing things on the field. It was a shit show and a *ton* of emotion. When it went to the bottom of the inning the Rangers committed 3 errors in a row which got Toronto back into the game, then Bautista hit this home run. It's considered one of the defining moments in modern Jays history. 
Seriously...I mean, did you go there to make friends? 
I played with my lab, who are grad students and post docs (I'm undergrad). We had the thief and threatened that unless they gave us enough stone for a building, we would thief their stone (they had 5 stone in 1 corner, it was bullshit). They gave us all their stone, then we thiefed them anyways. I thought they were gonna murder me. 
Hahaha, embargoing a friend for the next couple games is the true dick move. 
Absolutely. I didn't really give a shit about band, but when some jackass would challenge me for first chair seat? Oh *hell* no bitch! 
Pretty Sure this and Pavlova are the main things we argue with you guys about. 
I know a DM that would outright "smite" a played who displayes unsportsmanship. Basically taking too long on purpose, wasting time for no reason, or being rude. Depending on how severe the case is, he could make them trip, send a pickpocket their way to steal something, or simply make them roll for damage because a cave had collapsed on their head. You know, treat asshole with asshole.... That's a thing, right? 
There have been cheating scandals in sumo in the past I believe. 
The AWP was a sniper rifle that would one hit kill to any hit box (yes, even the toe). It was also completely possible and easy to "dot" your monitor for highly accurate non-scoped firing. You could actually fire it unscoped while quick changing alternate weapons and would hit your dot target every time. 
Now I'm thinking of kittens... gah. Kittens covered in spikes. And that makes me angry 
Man, if I were him I'd have seriously considered learning to shoot left handed then. Even that would have to be an improvement. 
I always played regulation quarters. I went through like 15 franchise mode seasons like that. Am I autistic? 
You'll get plenty enough friends with your BRAND **NEW** ***CAR!!!*** 
You stole Pavlova, and just refuse to admit it. Dirty thieves! :P 
Seeing Jim Joyce crying when he adressed what had happened afterwards made me ok with it. It was an honest mistake and he was clearly remorseful. 
Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point Question mark Exclamation point 
I dunno, the hand switch when you finally find the right video is a great moment in a 'batin session. 
There's a great piece on this in the Freakonomics movie. 
I see some walls, and some ceilings...wait, just one ceiling! 
KILL THE REDS KILL THE REDS KILL THE REDS KILL THE REDS 
No but you've likely played madden for a majority of your lifespan. 
Oh man I hear that voice in my head as I read it. So iconic. 
Sorry can't hear over the ridicuously high sugar content of this pavlolva i'm eating 
Galarraga took it with such grace considering the circumstances too 
10? Double down 11? Double down 12? Yep, we're gonna double down 15? Double it 18? Bitch you already know we're doubling down and catching that 3 
I think I was averaging about an 85-90% win rate at the tables, regardless of my hand. 
Good move on his part. People will come out of the woodwork for that, even if it isn't a lot of money. And, anything you give them as a gift when you win is never enough. 
I can understand you going into the Sent items folder to look for a mail, but it's several steps from that to going and opening other emails and looking at the attachments. This was no accident. 
Sounds like you two were made for each other buddy. 
i call bullshit. how is this even possible?! "jacked him off with a burrito and then forced him to eat it" i can see somebody possibly achieving climax in this manner, but that burrito would be destroyed. did she make him eat it off the floor? 
Pardon my ignorance of the religion, but what's the connection with the secret and being baptisted early? Thanks in advanced! 
"My dad basically told me the same thing privately." This confuses me. 
Correction: Never let anybody touch your computer. Ever. Under any circumstances. 
This is the right approach. Unless you're sleeping with the person or sharing needles, you're at no risk at contracting HIV. Sucks for that person, but, I wish them the best and hopefully a cure is close. *On a side note, I'm in no way interested in hearing about anyone's theories of pharmaceutical companies storing cures to sell treatments. 
Pretty sure my old roommate saw my username once and either forgot it or looks at it all the time. I don't really post anything too risque that I wouldn't tell him anyway. 
That's juicy intel. That's the kind of intel you store away in a vault, preserved indefinitely until the one day you need it most. Don't blow his cover until you need to. 
this makes me sad :( i hope the sick fuck that arranged that got what they deserved 
Had a similar realization: a girl was in front of me at my bank and she bought in like 800 dollars in ones and wanted them to turn it into bigger bills. I mentioned it soneone and they were like "is she a stripper?" And suddenly it clicked. Never gonna bring it up 
You're good for not drawing attention to it! Stuff like this makes me glad I changed my settings so that the text notification only shows the person's name and not the actual content of the message. 
And I bet he still feels incredibly guilty about doing that. 
No matter how much porn you watch of them doesn't make you friends... 
Hey! This happened with my grandpa! His wife and kids were back in the US while he was fighting. Turns out he had a fling- which resulted in having a son in Germany that my mom and her sisters never knew about until they were in their 40's. We finally got to meet him before my grandpa passed away. 
Best friend is the same way. Except everyone knows. Best guy I've ever known. Works hards, little girl and one on the way, bought a house at 18, always pays his bills and I'd have no problem taking a bullet for him. Closest thing to a brother I've ever had. 
What did you decide while it was copying to your USB drive? 
I'm a hiring manager and we do teen internships over the summer. To get the internship we have to e-verify you. This 17 year old kid find out through me that her social security number was fake and she was an illegal immigrant. 
Not to condone the actions of the guy, but what kind of mother would hurt her daughter like this? Damn... 
The poor thing had probably been holding it in all day. 
Whilst you bought this up, do IT people often look at people's browser history or was it something that just came up? Not calling you out on it just genuinely curious. 
Out of all the heavy shit in this post, this is probably my favourite comment. 
In the 80's I had a friend that his dad had a box of polaroid pics of his mom. I spent a lot of time at his house because I had a shitty homelife so most of the time I was there his parents weren't home. Sometimes when he wasn't around, like in the bathroom I would sneak peeks at the pics. Never told him about that. What's funny is he is the one that showed them to me. Sometime after the first time he showed me, I asked if I could see them again and he says, dude, that's my mom. So thereafter I just cut out the middle man. And yes she was pretty good looking. 
I thought my mom was a lesbian until I was 15 and found her jurnals on the family computer turns out she married my mama just to pissed off my grandfather. 
Wtf is with all the family porno around these days. I end up watching it and I'm not even into that shit. 
man. if it was that obvious i think she wanted you to mention it at least, and to want to join in at most. 
I wouldn't've known 'I'vent' was a real contraction 
Sounds like someone will be getting a promotion... 
See to me that's the sort of thing that you perhaps should be telling your friends. They really deserve to know what sort of people they're in relationships with. 
But like a hot, in shape, well groomed, well to do 40 or like PBR, cigarettes and beer belly 40? 
What toppings though? You can't just leave it at that. 
The family members that know were probably alive before he was born. 
Yea it was a pretty messed up situation. It really sucked that he felt he had no choice but crime. I am more impressed that not once did he bring it up to my cousin, even during his rebellious days, he never threw it in his face. I have friends whose parents definitaly keep score for such occasions. 
Yeah, he gave it the ol' better-jus'-check-for-nudies-of-my-sis-in-law. 
I'm not entirely sure how it all worked out. Honestly, the structural integrity of the burrito. For all I know he could have meant that he jacked off onto the the burrito and then rolled it up and ate it? Like I said, the dude is weird and it wasn't a conversation I was looking to delve deeper into 
Maybe if twins both came out really frail and with the possibility of not making it, the parents would want the twins baptized ASAP in case they died. Maybe one made it and the other didn't. 
Both parties wanted to leave the other but never said so except to OP in confidence. Only to end up staying together after she was diagnosed with cancer. 
I was kind of caught messing around with his daughter and he told me to come over so we could discuss it. It was not a pleasant experience. After the event, he took me out to dinner and thanked me for what I did, but to keep what happened a secret from the younger daughter, he kept the impression that he still didn't like me. 
All I do is shitpost and I wouldn't tell anyone my username. 
She might have, but I'm nearly certain it never made it to a prosecutor, and I know there was no trial. 
Also, what kind of people would actually agree to that? I mean, I know there are rapists out there but to know enough of them to schedule a gang rape? Holy shit. 
I used to work as a cashier at Target. I was checking out this lady who had her son with her. She bought about $90 worth of items and paid me back in all ones. She must have seen the look on my face because she said "I swear I'm not a stripper, I just took my son to the doctor and the only change they had were ones". 
But she's in my neighborhood!! and wants to have sex with me! 
if she was cheating on him with her brother that wouldn't be cool at all. 
The McPoyle bloodline has been pure and clean for a thousand years. 
Yeah he's still a fairly close friend of mine. She moved out of state and I probably only talk to her once a year. 
I second this. My mother was single until I was 3. When she met my dad, he adopted me shortly after they got married. My parents got divorced 8 years later, and my dad spent a buttload of money he didn't have to try to get custody of me. He helped me through college. He was with me when my mother died, and he even recently asked me to help him be better in his marriage. When people ask me who my father is, I've never even thought twice. 
Friend of a friend found out he was illegal his senior year of high school when he started applying for college and scholarships. Went from planning his future to aimlessly wandering. 
Yet they'll all find out when they try to get a job. 
Thank you, she's a really sweet woman and I love her tons, she just...had a lot of stuff going on. She had me when she was 20 and I don't think she was ready for it at all. 
I just transitioned from an office to a cubicle at work (yes, it sucks) and I don't even need to start my car when I'm leaving for home because the propulsion from all the farts I'd been holding in simply pushes me forward! 
If you need to install something on a desktop machine, you usually use the browser to do it. And browsers make autocomplete suggestions based on history. So you type in like "apple.com" and you see "appliance riding orgasm" flicker by in the search bar, and you learn that someone likes the spin cycle. Or you type "windows update" and you see "wincest" on the way. 
That's awful. I think that when confronted with that kind of situation, it can't be helped that some people react in unexpected ways to somehow cope, but it still makes it difficult to accept it when the reaction goes against what we know of that person. 
That's probably the first time I've heard of a child finding out their gay parent was actually straight. 
Vibrators/massagers increase blood flow and speed healing time in broken bones and old wounds/scars. Someone invented a vibrating bra that supposedly increases boob size without surgery. I bet moms skin looks faaaabulous 
I don't know. OP might be the one with jaw on the floor if Mom calmly replies that she's fully aware of its primary utility but is not too rigid about how it is used. 
One of the most common searches according to pornhub is stepmom 
Not any modern day monarchs if I remember right. I started to zone out in mild shock when he laid this all down on me along with his depression and self harm reveal. It was alot to take in. To stay on topic I believe he said we were 3 generations shy of living the high life. 
Otherwise, your brother will find out about your embarrassing anal story. 
TIL Professor Quirrel's first name. I've read that book so many times and never even considered his first name, thanks for sharing! 
You can avoid hurting your mom by going to directly to the Department of Health in the state you were born. The copy of your birth certificate should tell you if you are a twin, if he/she was born alive, and if the baby was named. Once you have that info, you should be able to piece together the rest of the story easily. Your mom would be none the wiser. 
Why not find another reason to forgive you? Like "well what he did was bad, but he's a good kid, and staying mad just makes my life worse without accomplishing anything else." 
For a second, I thought we found Benjamin from IT's account. 
It always helps to think "waitress" instead of "stripper". 
Chances are, if the story is true, she was only dating around as a cover-up so that people wouldn't suspect that she was getting destroyed by her brother. 
Yeah, know that one. Have an aunt that got pregnant at 16 and put the baby up for adoption two years before I was born. Fast forward some 35 odd years later and she gets in touch with aunt.. and the reunion goes okay, until aunt and daughter get to know one another and decide that no, they don't actually like each other. Even my grandmother tried to stay in contact, but granddaughter was having none of it. Sometimes the gap is too large to cross, blood or no. 
It really comforts me reading things like this. My dad died suddenly in 2015 and his side of the family shut me out and treated me like I didn't deserve to be included in anything because I wasn't biologically his, despite raising me since I was a baby and calling me his daughter my whole life, even after my mom and him divorced. They were furious when they found out he left everything to me, and I wasn't even invited to be there when they let his ashes go. It's nice to have the reassurance because sometimes it still gets to me and hurts a lot. 
This is my story, mom from canada moved to the US when I was 2, went to K-12 grade here and only found out I was illegal in junior year. I'm 23 now and feel like I've wasted the like 5 years of my life trying to figure out how to get my license and a legit job 
If I'm on someone's computer browser I purposely type as fast as I can to minimize the chances of embarassing auto-fills 
It's times like this I'm glad I have a common real name. If anything bad comes up I can pass it off as someone else. 
I don't believe family porn for a second, not immersed at all. But it's usually good porn lol. 
To add to that, the fact that there's often some sort of "convincing/seducing" theme, or some situation where someone is "stuck", or where the partners of those people are asleep, or something else ends up adding to it. Most other porn is just about someone picked up off the street, a casting couch, or some lady of some profession being unprofessional. 
Username does NOT check out. You seem to have a nice conscience for others emotions in this story. Big softy. 
Prob just doesn't want him bangin his daughters man. 
Foots, not the hero we want, but the hero we deserve. 
220 lbs, hairy, tattooed, bearded man here. When I have a bunch of ones, I make sure to tell people I'm an exotic dancer. 
Who the fuck needs a codeword for that? Like "Thanks for letting me know you're about to whack it." 
I found out I had a 30 year old half sister when I was 14. My mom gave her up for adoption when she had her at 19. My half-sister was the one who contacted us. So fucking happy she did. Her and her family are some of the most amazing people I have ever met and I am so thankful that I get to call them family. They've been a part of our lives for 6 years now and I consider my self so incredibly blessed to get to watch my nieces and nephew grow up. Man, I cry just thinking about them. Truly amazing people. 
You have the reassurance from him too. He left you everything. To me that says youre my kid and i want you to be taken care of. He sounds like he was an amazing man. My condolences for your loss. 
Oh, you definitely don't want oral if his mouth is too spicy. 
I type one key at a time while maintaining full eye contact. 
It's at times like this that I'm glad the worst thing public under my name is bad fanfiction. 
Yup, the fuckers need character development to make it hot. 
Thats a good way to find out you're into the same kinks and maybe get a date. 
Depends on the divorce. My parents divorced and I've never seen them work together so well. They both worked hard to have an amicable divorce and they're better friends now than ever. Really weird honestly. 
Hey guys, I found Stephenie Meyer's reddit account! 
"Steve's working on this floor? This system can't replace air fast enough for Steve, we need to call in some reinforcements" 
I watched Louis CK live about 4 years back around the time he was getting a divorce. His show was great and, towards the end, he stopped and told us we were great and he really needed it because he's going through a really tough time since he was getting a divorce. The whole crowd, audibly, goes "awwww", mainly in our section, and he looks at us and says, "oh shut the fuck up. Divorce isn't a bad thing. It means the end of something that's bad". We all laughed and cheered. Was a really honest show and he's always been a standup guy (no pun intended". 
As unexpectedly great as the story was, the battle system made the game. There are extremely few RPGs with multiplayer, but the Tales Series always includes it. I'd play Lloyd, my buddy would play Genis. We'd plan strategies for every boss, speculate on the story, and we'd take shifts on controlling Player 1 and studying the strategy guide. We were on summer vacation on Cape Cod and pretty much all we did was play Symphonia. We got 2/3s of the way through the game before vacation ended, we made two copies of the save file so we could each continue playing at home. We each got to just before the final boss, and then we met up again so we could both see the ending fresh. Good times. 
Hah, I remember spending HOURS wandering around the overworld trying to find the last two motherfucking djinn that were just hidden in random spots on the map. HAD TO HAVE THEM ALL. 
Every time one of these threads pop up I always scroll down all the way to find my fellow taffers hiding in the shadows. Anyone else going to the Bear Pits tomorrow? 
I still have my complete edition of HoMM3 sitting in my desk drawer even though I don't have a computer to play it on. I refuse to throw it away because someday I will play it and it will be glorious. Do you remember the map where you played as Greek gods? I must have replayed that map at least 20 times. 
YOU MUST GATHER YOUR PARTY BEFORE VENTURING FORTH! YOU MUST GATHER YOUR PARTY BEFORE VENTURING FORTH! YOU MUST GATHER YOUR PARTY BEFORE VENTURING FORTH! YOU MUST GATHER YOUR PARTY BEFORE VENTURING FORTH! YOU MUST GATHER YOUR PARTY BEFORE VENTURING FORTH! 
First time I played Civ 3, I conquered my entire continent simply through having awesome cities. My neighbors cities just decided to switch over to me, and while he was upset by it, I gave him treasures & shit to appease him. Little did he realize that I would eventually assimilate his entire culture & get all my resources back anyway. This was right around the time that I developed boats, to go and spread my influence to other continents. Across the sea, Germany & Russia shared another continent - which was entirely covered with their borders. I couldn't get a foothold without invading, so I send an emissary to Russia "Hey, want to help me invade Germany?"... They refuse. Immediately afterwards "Hey, want to help me invade Russia?"... Germany accepts. 
It's crazy to me that I had to scroll this far down to find this response. Red Dead was the most engrossing experience I've ever had with a video game. 
Roses are red Tulips are, too Wololo Both are now blue. 
I always describe it as Pixar-like...nothing in else in games combines that same childlike simplicity and charm with story depth and actual laugh-out-loud-often humour. 
KotOR is the first RPG I ever completed. It is an absolute masterpiece of a game, with two of the best characters I have ever come across in a game. 
You can actually connect with all the people you played with. After the credits the game will list the usernames of those you've played with 
Ah, Factorio. A shining example of what early access should be. Highly recommend it. 
Indeed. I'll never forget the shivers when you first slide down into the ocean in a bathysphere and then Andrew Ryan's voice crackles through the loudspeaker: "Is a man not entitled to the sweat of his own brow?" For me, it was the most memorable beginning to a game I have ever experienced. 
"Gren won't remember that" is one of the greatest jokes I've seen in a Telltale game. 
The Sims was the game that taught me to update components of my PC. I still remember trying to install a Voodoo GPU in my eMachines computer while my dad watched frantically. 
Surprised there is not more love for this game. It is a challenging platformer with insanely gorgeous graphics and an amazing story about friendship and keeping an open mind. I've played it through 3 times and still revisit occasionally because it is such an exquisite experience. 
Just played through the Mass Effect series last summer and it's probably my favorite trilogy ever. All 3 games were so freaking good. People were left with a sour taste in the mouth from the end of the 3rd one, but honestly, besides the last 10 minutes of the 3rd game, it was still just as good as the others. My favorite was the 2nd one. Never had that feeling in any other video game as I did during the suicide mission on ME2. So badass. 
something something pork buns. No other game has captured the glory that is Hong Kong action cinema quite like Sleeping Dogs. That game needs a sequel, it's easily my favorite open world game. 
The part where you have to go inside the painting and fight trolls with turpentine poisoned weapons... 
Arkham Asylum: Take these great graphics. Me: :D Arkham Asylum: Now play the 95% of the time on Detective mode. Me: D: 
If asking someone to sign my petition and blasting their mouth with piss before they can even reply is wrong, then I don't wanna be right. 
I fucked up when playing that game. I loved it so much, played through 2 years in about a week and was having such a good time. Then the Halloween event came and I used the golden pumpkin glitch to get infinite money and it killed the experience for me. I'm waiting on the Nintendo Switch version to come out to replay it though! 
Dark Souls for sure. I remember I bought it on a sale, played maybe to Blighttown and decided I didn't like it so I shelved it for quite a while. Eventually came back to it with a new mindset and found it to be one of the most enjoyable experiences I've ever had in a game. Great series. 
Did you get the broom closet ending? The broom closet ending is my favorite! 
At first I thought it'd be a silly bonus puzzle game thrown in there. Boy was I wrong. When you get to the "break through" point it's unbelievable how incredible that game was/is. 
Dishonored truly made me sad when I got the bad ending. Made me think. "What have I done to ruin her innocence?" The genocide run probably did it 
I cannot believe how far I had to scroll to find this. Such a beautiful game and the voice acting is absolutely brilliant. Leaves you with a ton of questions, wanting more and looking for people to discuss theories with. Plus, it added "flapjack" to my insult vocabulary, for which I am eternally grateful. 
Still to this day the only game I've replayed 5 different times and gotten different endings everytime. Except death by deathclaw...that remained a constant... 
"You don't need to be a better shot, you just need to shoot more bullets!" 
"The US military does not condone the killing of unarmed civilians, but this is a game so why should you care?" 
I bought the Orange Box for $20 back in 2007 for 360. I had some leftover money on a Best Buy gift card. This game surprised the hell out of me with how much fun it was, my roommate and I played it together trying to solve the puzzles. And the song during the credits :D 
I didn't really listen to music until I played guitar hero (was in 6th grade when guitar hero 3 came out). Now I play guitar and piano. It definitely changed my life lol 
SOMA is an amazing game...well an alright game with an AMAZING narrative. I don't know anyone else who's played it, which is a tragedy. The thought experiments actually really tripped me up, especially the environment simulation. 
I was going to say Nier Automata as well. It's such an outstanding game. Ending E, man. God damn that really got me. If you haven't already, check out the original Nier too. The gameplay is pretty clunky, but the story is fantastic. If you don't wan to play it, there's a guy on youtube, Mr. Clemps, who does a great overview of the game. 
Definitely rocket league. $20? Check. Almost 2k hours? Check. 
I forget the name of it- but I read a book a while back that was all about what actually makes people happy and how the neuro-bio mechanism of happiness functions. A lot of it was about video games and false assumptions about how video games and tv affects you. One study it brought up had people getting their blood sampled for stress hormones and wearing the head caps that measure brain function before, during, and after things like an hour of tv. Tv stresses you out. Video games relax you. The basic mechanism is that video games teach you a task, complicate it, then make you feel smart, clever, and all-around functional when you solve the problem. Tv is not interactive so you stew and if you feel useless you feel stress. 
The thing I loved with Persona 4 - despite enjoying the Persona 3 *story* better - was the emphasis on their friendship, the way it teaches you to face your shadow and that you *could* have friends that knew your darkest, most shadowy secrets and accept you anyway. That was a rather important, healing lesson that I never expected to pick up from a JPRG. 
I probably dumped 80 hours into that game, I still have no idea how to actually play it. Learning diferential equations was easier than that game, and I failed DE twice. 
As soon as the prologue ends with Sarah, I realized this was gonna be a tough game to get through. 
That's a good one - currently, probably the last game I've played that's had that kind of lasting effect too. It's not just the mind-fucks (the Zero Escape series has plenty of those and I played them recently), but the raw emotion. 
Same for me, the problem is I am not able to play any mmo now. Finished playing wow at firelands patch in cataclysm and since then I wasn't able to stick with any other mmo because 'wow did it better' most likely it was just my bias towards a game I've played a lot but that still prevented me from enjoying other mmos 
This. Pokemon came out when I was in elementary school. Twenty years later and it's still a big part of my life. I can't say that about any other game or franchise. 
Yeah, you hear "4chan" and "dating sim" and "disabled girls" and you're like 'Oh my god what have they done now.' But, it's frankly amazing. The first time I played, I ended up with the track girl. I wasn't shooting for her, it just sort of happened, and I was left very touched at the end. 
Portal was thrown into the Orange Box as a filler and it won Game of the Year. Love that detail. 
you have been waylaid by enemies and must defend yourself. 
I just posted in r/baldursgate for people to join a multiplayer and go through the saga if you're really interested 
The HD Edition on steam really breathes new life into the game, they even added new campaigns. Highly recommend it. 
I do miss the battles of the Total War games. They may have been 'abuse the shitty AI to win when you should not,' but they were fun. Other than that... I doubt that I can ever go back to a Civ/TW game. I tried playing Total War: Warhammer, but it felt weird always being at war. I even made peace with somebody only to get pulled back into war with them the next turn... 
For me, it always reminded me of '90's Nickelodeon cartoons like Ren and Stimpy, et al. 
The juxtaposition with her entire world being this non stop party *really* set that scene off. I believe in her neurosis. This game is so fully fleshed out. Favorite game of all time. 
That game is a masterpiece. Paper Boats is why I want to learn how to sing. The entire game left an immense influence on me in my writing without me even knowing it. I could rant for pages about this but I'm on a phone and I value my fingers. 
build that wall and build it strong 'cause we'll be there before too long 
My first playthrough of Journey was similarly emotional. The player even traced out a heart in the snow as a thank you at the end. After the particularly cathartic run I found out the players gamertag was something like Babylon666. I laughed so hard for a solid 20 minutes. 
I know the part you're describing. The Ascension. What a moving and incredible game. All, without voice acting or a textual story. I cried too. 
I vividly remember my first attempt at doing a moon intercept, I didn't really understand what all the lines and icons meant. As I got closer to the moon, and started being able to see it, I realized things were not going as planned. No sooner had I throttled to maximum in a desperate bid to save my crew had I impacted going at an ungodly relative velocity. I dumped close to 500 hours in it purely messing around with silly things. If I had a computer which could handle space stations I probably would just have it running 24/7 
When you're making a female commoner character, the game straight up warns you that it's going to be hard to get off the ground. IIRC you can switch that particular feature off. Or maybe it's only in Native Expansion Mod. I forget. 
Yeah, this is my great frustration with modern AAA gaming. The core gameplay in most of these games is just not fun, and so the developer's job becomes about spending years and millions of dollars creating irrelevant content to distract you from that fact. Assassin's Creed is my go-to example. The game is about climbing things and assassinating people, I guess, but the climbing and fighting gameplay is shallow and boring. So instead it becomes about collecting flags, managing a town, flying a glider, commanding a pirate ship... When the core gameplay is solid, like in MaB, good content is cheap to produce and the fun takes care of itself. 
"No," says the man in Washington. "They belong to the people." "No," says the man in Moscow, "They belong to everyone." "No," says the man in the Vatican. "They belong to God." 
Agree. I'm not huge into games in general, but all three of the Bioshock games felt like they were made for me. Have played them all like 4-5 times each and I will most definitely play them again. 
Have you played Tales from the Borderlands? If you skip the credits, it will say "Telltale will remember that". 
Isn't once upon a time just a massive rip off of Fables? 
Morrowind was perfect because it was so directionless. Obilvion, and even more blatantly Skyrim, held your hand too much. (and implemented fast travel, which was both the worst and best addition to the game) 
I think the music was crucial to the game's immersion. Listen to it in youtube next time youre studying. 
Also Kuro is one of the most magnificent and intense villains. She's so huge and yet so fast, and at no point do you have any kind of chance to take her in a fight, because you are a tiny cat-rabbit and she is an owl made of pure hatred and she's the size of a house. 
Nothing will match that first time playing the suicide mission. Didn't upgrade my ship. Didn't do some loyalty missions. Watching squad mates die because of my laziness crushed me 
At least you know you have a soul. Legion had to ask. 
A sequel was planned, but the game studio shut down :( 
Everything was so damn seamless, at least compared to other games of its type! In no other game could I go from driving, shoot out the window at pursuers, hijack an armored car, mow down half a gang and jump out to punch the rest of them and feel like a badass the entire time! 
When it came out I didn't like final fantasy and was tired of Disney. I got it for Christmas after it came out and was bummed about it because I didn't think it looked appealing at all. I'm actually playing it through four the fourth time right now and the fact that I still enjoy it just as much as the first play through fifteen years ago is insane to me. I also think it's weird that I had to scroll this far to find it. 
I was in high school when I first played it. My friend let me borrow it. I asked him "What do you do in this game" and he said "You roll things into a ball, it sounds stupid but just trust me on this one". I did and after a week of borrowing it I went out and bought my own copy. 
Arkham City is where it's really at. I wish I could forget my knowledge of that game and replay it. 
Don't forget the cat silencers only work for 9 shots...since 9 lives and all that 
The best part is how it's boarded up when you come back there afterward. 
excuse me? You mean The Adventure Line (tm) Theme? 
It's a really underappreciated game, especially for what it is. The Beginner's Guide is amazingly emotionally evocative and thought provoking. It's an artistic video game, focusing more on story and feeling but in a way that a movie couldn't by forcing you to take part in it. It really breaks the mold for video games in such a cool way. 
That was sort of what they expected it to be. A little extra icing on top of the rest of the Orange Box as a fun little game. I don't think they expected it to blow up like it did. Great game though. 
Did you listen to Samuel when he let you off the boat? That's what did it for me. I felt awful. 
When I was about 8 I played Harvest Moon 64. I got married and stuff. At one point I was bringing this old lady flowers and stuff to get her to be my friend and give me a recipe and then after she gave it to me, the next time I talked to her she died. I legit cried. 
Yeah Cesar's legion's only redeeming quality is that they're "stable" but they're only stable as long as Cesar is in charge. Anyone else and the whole thing implodes. 
The NCR's issue is that it keeps biting off more than it can chew. They're stretched thin to the point of near-complete ineffectiveness in the Mojave area. If they had simply waited to gather resources and grow before coming in, they'd be the best faction for the Mojave by far. 
"If it took more than one shot, you weren't using a jakob's" 
Maybe if you were a better shot, you wouldn't need to reload. 
I preferred the first game simply because the guns were less random. They supposedly got a Guinness award for most unique guns in a game, but 90% of them were shit so I really hated sorting through the crap to get to something usable. The first had less guns but more of them were tolerable. 
"Do you feel like a hero yet?" FUCK YOU LOADING SCREEN, I'M DOING THE BEST I CAN IN THIS APOCALYPSE 
It's the first game to really make me feel bad for what I've done in a video game, and I intentionally had nuclear meltdowns in sim city. 
I think of this as the devs commenting on the good vs. evil of the situation and how, in other FPS's, clothing and crosshair color is all that determines good vs. evil from the shooter's POV. There's really nothing about the motivations of each side of the firefight ever given. 
I won't put a number on it, but Ending E is the best experience I've ever had in a video game, and probably in any media I've ever consumed since I can't think of anything that touched me more. 
Definitely worth the money. Certainly good that they've got competitive play and non-competitive play where you can either be serious or just have fun. 
it was like naughty dog used all their expert-level craftsmanship when it comes to making games to try to destroy the player...Still felt uneasy at the epilogue of the last uncharted game for that reason.... 
Remember the first time you saw the episode 3 ending? That was the most intense moment in the series by far for me. 
I wish they just made civ 2 with the boarders of 3. I loved civ 2 but it felt like just a bunch of cities rather than an empire. 
And some of the best music! Golden Sun had some awesome tunes. 
Advance Wars is like the best series to emulate on phone. 
While not me, I ALWAYS trace the heart in the snow, I then sit and let them take the first steps towards the light alone. 100% of the time when they realize I'm not walking with them they come back and "chirp" at me and we walk the end together. I thought the feeling would diminish over time, but that little zap of companionship gets me every time I play through to the end. 
No ousting Harlaus is a reward not a quest. You better hope they have feasts in Hell Harlaus. 
I rejected those answers; instead, I chose something different. I chose the impossible. 
I caught myself laughing when one of the characters actually noticed the "will remember that" line next to their head and was like "WTF is that?" Man I love Borderlands humor. 
Kinda. Fables uses things from the public domain. (This is why The Adversary wasn't Peter Pan like they intended) 
Nothing like planning out a journey through Vvardenfell, really made you feel like you knew the land. "Dagon Fel? Guess I'll need take a silt strider to Balmora, walk to Hla Oad and get a boat up the coast. Redoran canton in Vivec? Easier taking a guild guide and traveling by gondola when inside the city." That kinda thing. Also, shaking up cash to travel early in the game (or later, if you have mods to fix the somewhat broken economy) gives a wonderful sense of purpose to the more mundane tasks. Sure, you're chasing rats out of someone's basement, but rather than it being a necessary bother to get levels before you advance to beating up goblins, it serves a tangible purpose for the narrative of your character. 
I'll have you know my sim is a police officer. Who may or may not have been ON THIS CASE FOR 6 LONG YEARS and I FINALLY GOT YOU, you son of a bitch. 
You see, I upgraded everything, did all the loyalty missions and just being there, leading my squad mates through the mission was so cool. Plus the parts where you have to put other people in charge of different tasks and knowing what they are good at so that they could get the job done. It was also the only mission in all 3 games that I didn't take Garrus on when I had the opportunity to do so. There was no one I trusted more leading the others than him. That's when Garrus became a brother to me. 
When did they shut down? Afaik they made some dumb online-only game based on SD, called Triad Wars. 
I'm sorry to hear that, what a shame that game was - I knew it was gonna be bad from the moment they made it third person. RWS, Postal: The Movie: The Game when? I mean, it'll be better than postal 3 at least, and if it's really that bad, you can blame EB! 
Ans then the cat goes "MEEEEAAAAAOWW" and flies into the target exploding in blood. I wonder how that game would be percieved if it came out today. Would there be a scandal or something? 
I bet you're going to go bragging to all of your friends! Did you get the broom closet ending? 
Anyone wondering what people are on about here; play through TSP until you find a broom closet, then sit in it. Do not move. The narrator will try and get you to leave- don't, trust me, it's worth it. 
It's also somewhat ironic in how one of the main ideas of the game is people shoving meaning in wherever they can into things that don't have meaning and aren't supposed to is undesirable, amd then it constantly gets overanalyzed and filled with meaning. 
He was very easy on batman arkham asylum as well. I think his only criticism was how much you have to use detective vision. 
There's a neat bit in Dishonored 2 about him: if you rummage around the ship before the final level, you can find an audiograph of Daud talking about saving Emily in the other world. I don't remember if he's still alive, canon-wise, but part of me hopes he survived. 
The "main story" kinda wraps up at the end of Year 2 (I wont spoil it just in case), but you can keep playing after that, although there's not much else to do other than achievements. 
The same happened to me for Harvest Moon for GameCube. The old couple, I loved them and visited every day. Then the old lady died at the end of the first season and I was so sad, I cried and just sat with the old man outside for the whole day. 
And then got shot in the back by my silenced pistol. 
I can't remember who said it (or even if it was in the game) but someone said that if the NCR never tried overexpanding, they wouldn't have even expanded past Shady Sands. 
"IF YOU DON'T BY TORGUE GUNS, YOU'RE FUCKING RETARDED" 
"Do you remember why you came here in the first place?" That was harsh. 
"I...I didn't mean to hurt anybody" Truly heartbreaking, my god. Played that game cause I got it on discount, took me for a hell of a ride. Even ended up watching the movie and reading the book it was based off of. Excellent fucking diamond in the rough and I would recommend it to anyone who wants to know how good narrative can get in video games. I wasn't witnessing someone's descent into madness, I WAS descending into madness. 
That ending shocked the joy out of me for a good day and sent me into a melancholic state of loftiness. And I came out of it regretting nothing. Fuck me that game was beautiful. 
I've bought it three times (PC, PS3, XBone) and would buy it again. Worth every penny. It's also the only game that I've purchased in-app decorative BS for, and pretty much only because I felt like I owed the devs some more money for the amount of enjoyment I've gotten out of it. 
YES. Absolutely one of the most intense gaming moments I've had. I am SO glad the whole game was out when I played, because waiting months for Episode 4 would have been torture. 
Fucking Harlaus, major battle going on with thousands of losses on our side? Let's throw a feast and make the lords come here! No! Fuck you Harlaus. 
Agreed. I don't think any other game has given me the same level of shock and horror as when that happened, and you replay in your head everything you did before that point. 
I've never noticed that one! Damn, I need to replay that game. I hope some of the characters appear in Borderlands 3. 
Pfft, planning a trip like that? True Telvanni can fly across the island within a minute! 
Absolutely loved his scene with Shep on the Citadel in ME3. "I'm Garrus Vakarian and this is now my favorite spot on the Citadel" 
From a quick Google search, sometime between October and November 2016. 
True Crime streets of LA was my favourite game as a kid. Everyone played GTA, and I loved GTA but there was something about the mechanics and physics of TC LA that still captures that GTA magic. I only owned a gamecube and since GTA didn't exist on nintendo, I made do. But even when I got a PS2 and played vice city, streets of LA was still so much better. Looking back, GTA 5 is the only game of the series that is higher up than that first true crime game. Damn, that nostalgia. PS played true crime new york city, it sucked ass 
Oh my lord I agree wholeheartedly! A simple remaster would be enough for me :( 
It's entirely deliberate, I mean, the entire other character the narrator engages with through these games is fictitious. The creator of the game created all these other games as well. It's tough to interpret what the author really was saying, I think part of it is similar to Undertale's message of "stop overanalyzing things and tearing a game apart until there's nothing left" but I think it also speaks to his personal issues and struggles with the Stanley Parable and its development. But yeah, that's entirely deliberate, even though the narrator uses the name of the author they should be considered, for all intents and purposes, two different people. 
I think it was more like, Detective Vision is so overpowered, it doesn't make sense to turn it off when you can play the entire game seeing through walls. He thought it's usage should be restricted. 
Ok same. The first play trough I talked to a dude who "won the lottery" so I killed him to get his prize, then I realized the prize was living so I was like oh sorry. 
Exactly. In F2, the NCR wanted Vault 15... their neighbor a few miles over. At that point, they lacked the skill and resources to even take that and had to rely on the Chosen One to make it happen. And all they were up against was a pack of a couple dozen disorganized (albeit deeply entrenched) raiders and some squatters. But that's one thing I've kind of always respected about them; if they can't figure out how to make it happen on their own, they have no real qualms with finding someone or some way outside themselves to make it happen. Their ambition is what makes them great. 
What made me re-evaluate my life was the ending, Konrad has a gun to my head says that if I don't shoot him, he will shoot me. I couldn't press the button, it felt like the wrong thing, after everything I did, how could I? I knew what will happen, I didn't want it to, but emotionally I couldn't force myself to stop him. So he shot me, I knew he would and he did, after that I haven't seen any shooter quiet like it. Although intro for Battlefield 4 comes close. 
"No one ever does Walker. Three." I like the touch of pointing at walker showing the reflection holding the gun to his own head. 
Stand away, that my hamster might have a better look at you! 
I wish my loved one had remembered to indicate me as the beneficiary of his 401k plan. 
I was honestly surprised with the scope of the game and what Gearbox actually let Telltale do in the game story wise. I really hope they keep it canon. 
Man, remember in True Crime LA when you would hit the select button and flash your badge? And if you had your pistol out you would fire a shot in the air? I spent HOURS as a kid running up to pedestrians, firing a gun in the air, shouting I was a police officer, and running away. Imagine if that was real life. 
That was my feeling playing it, a constant internal conflict of: I want to enjoy the natural atmosphere and art in the game. VS. But it's mechanically stupid to not have detective vision up. It really became a chore to be switching it on and off constantly. 
If you're talking about *that* person then ya I know what you mean. That's just way to big of an event to brush off and act like it never happened. I don't know how they are going to react to that in BL3, maybe avoid showing it at all like they did in pre-sequal 
Mr. Torgue, what is your favorite type of explosion? Mr. Torgue: YES. 
Zotero is a great alternative! Tbh anything is better than endnote. 
I suppose it makes me a lazy bastard, but when my daughters want to show me something on their computer screen I just open them up in Teamviewer. 'Cause fuck walking across the living room, right? 
TotalCommander is the best thing for working with files. After customizing it, I can't use anything else. 
I much prefer ShareX, I believe it has the Greenshot editor built in, but also very powerful upload/save functions for all kinds of files. I have my screenshot hotkeys automatically upload the picture to imgur and copy the link to my clipboard. It also includes all kinds of tools, like a hash checker, screen ruler and a screen color picker. 
Everything is one of my favorite bits of software. It's just fantastic, I basically rebound the windows key to it. Anyone know if theres a Linux equivilant? I'm honestly about to make a bash script to do the same thing. 
If it's a new computer, best to just wipe and reinstall. Then you know the crapware is 100% gone. Never trust a factory image. 
Agreed. Superb and indispensable program: flexible password generator + strong encryption + open source + multiplatform + portable + offline + plugins. The only reason I didn't list it personally is because I do not (need to) install it on every machine since you can carry a portable version of it. 
it's more like; can be played for 20 minutes but you'll probably wonder what where time went at 5 am and you're 20 hours deep into a tunnel looking for diamonds and shit. 
Saying it's a Firefox skin is absurd, but the average internet user absolutely does not need Tor. 
Yeah IrfanView! My friends made fun of me for using some obscure image viewer until I showed them how fast and painless it is to do small edits with it. 
If you see it listed on Ninite.com, it is free, reliable software. Hopefully that helps some. 
Big fan of Zotero. Just did my MSc writeup with it. I had free access to endnote but I take issue with having to pay for that kind of software when you have programs like Zotero. The browser plugin is amazing, it was so easy to start using. During my undergrad I did all my referencing by hand because the software was just so terrible my Uni provided. I try to teach anyone willing to learn how to use Zotero. 
It's still heavily focused on old games, they just also sell new games. Its the BEST place to buy old games. 
I just recently switched to Discord to get away from Skype because it doesn't work worth balls with Windows 10. I was really hoping for something more like a "phone call" service and less like a chat room. I liked the idea of all my friends having it and I could just directly communicate with them rather than hop into a "room" where anybody could join. I dunno. I'm weirdly anti-social when it comes to chatting online with my friends. But that aside, Discord blew me away. I've used Mumble, TeamSpeak, Ventrilo, and I greatly prefer Discord over all of them. The fact that it's got a web-client is pretty cool too. Reminds me of the old days logging into AIM on the school computers to chat with friends since you couldn't download anything. 
Double-bonus: easily does file hashing like SHA-1/256 right from windows explorer! Maybe this is only a plus on Win7 though? 
I never understood how do you login in public places with Keepas or any other password manager. Do you have to first install an extension for browser or what? 
I just downloaded it and it's making my screen ridiculously yellow/orange/pink. Like, very noticeable. Is it supposed to be this dramatic? 
Android, I presume? Apple kept blocking a f.lux app, and then they finally added "Nightshift" which is literally just f.lux. 
Yeah, if you're doing graphics work, it's a bad idea to have f.lux turned on. You *can* turn it off temporarily for stuff like that, but that's abrupt and painful for your eyes, and probably not worth the hassle if you'd need to do that often. 
This is a great way to let your kids know that they're important and you value their interests. 
From PC to PC or Chromebook to PC, I consider CRD the hands-down winner. It has much better image quality and feels far more responsive than TeamViewer. 
I was 1200 miles away from my desktop once, on a business trip for work. I get a text from my wife. Netflix is asking if she's still watching and she doesn't want to get up to click yes. So i remote connect just to continue her netflix. I fucking love TeamViewer 
foobar is pretty good IMO. has alot of plug-in capabilities, built in EQ, just all round has alot of good features. but yeah aesthetically its not the greatest. 
Bitdefender is a good ~~supplement~~ replacement for Windows defender. Malwarebytes is a virus removal tool, not an antivirus (the defenders are like a shot, malwarebytes is like an antibiotic). 
+1 for ShareX. I had tried Greenshot, Gyazo, Puush, Lightshot, Hyper Desktop, and probably others I'm forgetting. Greenshot was my favorite until I tried ShareX. Greenshot has also seemingly slowed down in the last few months, and ShareX is consistently faster. 
To search by filename, there's the `locate` command. Good old 1970s. Still works great. To search by file contents, you can use daemons that index all of your files. I think Ubuntu has something set up by default hooked up to the Unity lens (also bound to the Windows key), but `beagle` or `recoll` are other options. On OSX, Spotlight (and the `mdfind` command) have you covered. 
Good on you, admitting your purpose. Not like other people make random comments to remind themselves later... 
They aren't being serious. Bonzi buddy has been discontinued for a while. It was a sort of office assistant. Kind of like Clippy, but a purple gorilla instead. And way more intrusive. 
It's a classic LucasArts adventure game from 1997. Pirates, puns and absurd humor. First game I install on any new PC since that time. 
For those who are confused still: LibreOffice is OpenOffice if OpenOffice was actually being updated 
The whole aspect of it being free is amazing, but if I get microsoft office free from my university or the like, I'd rather go with the latter. I'm more familiar with it, and it seems to be more developed in terms of tools. 
Also, if you keep the executable, you can use it to update most of the programs that you originally installed. I generally run it whenever I get a notification from Java that there's an update, since it's easier than their native updater and you don't get prompted to install the Ask.com bullshit. 
I've been using notepad++ for years now and just started with atom.io a month or so ago, it's very quickly become a new favorite for me, I still have some settings I need to tweak and plug-ins to instal, but it's sooo user friendly and nice looking yet simple in design. I also love that plug-ins can be searched for and installed entirely within atom itself, rather than looking them up online and moving them to the right place in your file browser 
Unless you have 2 gigs of ram that doesn't matter at all. RAM is there to be used. 
Yeah I find it to be quite a bit more accurate than WinDirStat. 
It visually maps used diskspace, making it a lot easier to spot big, forgotten files. 
The average Mac user doesn't need home brew. But as a programmer, home brew is fantastic 
I turn off the monitoring and systray icon crap so it just runs when I manually run it. 
Using only browsers is what 90% users do nowadays. 
I've been using Win10 for months now and that never occurred to me. 
Yeah it makes it a bit trickier to use on public computers. Usually you can access the database through your phone or a web interface (however safe that is on a public computer). 
My password is: GilgameshSwordOfUrukTowerOfDruagaMessopotamianLegendSeekerOfImmortalityWarriorInGoldTreasuryOfNoblePhantasms That usually makes it impossible to brute force. 
Yes, you can make it transition more slowly, but I guarantee you with time you will not even notice is on 
I hate the yellow hue as well and immediately turn it off I'm viewing images, playing games, watching videos, etc. It just makes reading webpages, word processing, and other mundane, heavily white activities a lot less straining on the eyes 
It literally is, Apple is somehow completely ass backwards about shit so instead of just letting an app on the store, they just rip it off because "security" or some shit. 
...and does not at all say "Daddy's always watching." 
Yeah, but good luck getting through a reboot or even just a UAC prompt using CRD. Teamviewer handles both well. 
This is great because I often have 3 or more instances of explorer open. "Here is the bosses folder, here is the folder where I share things that will be corrupted in 30 minutes, and here is where I do my actual work." 
Yea I see a lot of comments calling iTunes trash, but I mean, I don't see it. It plays music, you can queue up a few songs to play next on the go, you can make playlists, sort by X.... What are people expecting of a music player? 
Even on Mac, it used to be good back in the ipod days. As soon as they got the idea of turning it into a store it started going downhill and now it's total garbage. 
You've got to enable the cd art display plugin for it to work with rainmeter. 
Great explanation but Malwarebytes has active protection if you pay for it. 
Yea SVP is insanely good if you watch anything animated. The difference between 30fps and 60fps in an animated show is easily noticeable. 
This used to be my reason for both, until I realized I NEVER had a file that wouldn't play in MPC-hc. Now I still have VLC, but for another reason, I wanted different audio decoding parameters for my A/V setup, which was much easier to do with 2 unique players rather than configuring one when needed. 
its alot better. MPC-HC is the best option. VLC is good but MPC takes the cake. 
At least with newer versions of Windows (at least 8 and 10, not sure about 7), you don't need your product key at all after you activate on a PC. You can do a fresh install without ever entering one and it'll activate once you connect to the internet. Also, some OEMs will include the install media in a recovery partition. So it's a good idea to get rid of that to free up space. 
I remembered changing the name of my google chrome about a year ago to some fun names like "Half Life 3 closed technical alpha" as well as "Pornhub for Steam." Got quite a few steam messages saying "WTF" from friends when I launched the second one. 
Yeah when my boyfriend is playing a game while streaming and listening to Spotify I sometimes change his music to the Woody's Roundup song. 
And you don't have to go through so many installers clicking 'Next' all the damn time! 
A decent ftp software like winscp lets you edit remote files from the text editor of your choice. 
Really? I'm convinced Chrome eats RAM at an exponential rate. 
I used WinDirStat once and finally found there was a 9GB file sitting in AppData that Chrome had created. When I only had 100GB SSD that was a lot of space and I could never figure out where it was coming from. 
But you can't beat the visual file map that WinDirStat creates. Once you get used to it, it is an incredibly powerful piece of data. 
Well it has the "always on / monitor your pc" BS (you can disable it) 
My parents don't even use a browser, they use google 
Any voice communication service is better than Skype. 
Using a public PC is risky anyway. I think you need to worry more about what kind of crap is running on such a PC than a camera spying on you. 
Sorry, your password must contain a number, a special character and between 4 and 7 digits. 
Its on for me 24/7 at the darkest intensity and my computer still feels bright as shit at night. Beats being blind though. 
How the fuck do you notice it's on? I have it on slow transition (60min) and I don't ever notice my screen is yellow unless I either turn it off or switch to a bigger monitor/TV. 
Thing is, they're paranoid about allowing modifications of the basic usage. In their mind, you get very little control over the home screen, but apps can do whatever they want INSIDE the app. Changes come slowly and only from Apple: eg reply-from-notification, nightshift, video backgrounds. 
Wait until it randomly decides to break up your album into five different albums because different songs had different writers or guest performers or until it decides to redo your album art with random album covers or the iTunes Store decides that for no particular reason that one album can no longer be downloaded through your purchase history or your iPhone decides that one particular album should have random songs that can only play a minute or two of for no reason. 
On the money. I've gone through two formats using MusicBee + rainmeter, each time having to googlefu why it wasn't working, only to feel like a twat when I find the same damn answer as when I first installed them both. 
No you don't want defender and bitdefender running at the same time. Usually you don't want two antivirus programs running at the same time because they could interfere with each other. Malwarebytes removes malware which isn't a virus so whether you choose to use windows defender or bitdefender you should also have malwarebytes installed. 
www.oldversion.com great place to get older version of programs, havent checked if it has vlc's older than 2.1, but its worth checking out 
Thats because animated shows are normally rendered at 11fps or some other insanely low number 
Nope, Acer does this too. I tried this and ended up uninstalling about 15 Acer programs. If I knew about PC decrapifier I would have used it. 
I had a friend that frequently played "Disabled Girl Rape Simulator 2014", among others. 
And dodging add ons and malware packages. I had to teach my friend not always click "Next" on installers nowadays. Sometimes they'll sneak a Agreement page for Toolbars or some crap in there 
It's difficult to measure RAM usage since Chrome shares memory between processes. If you just count individual process memory usage and add them up you'll get a wrong answer. Plus, it's perfectly fine for a browser to eat up unused memory... that's what it's there for! The problem is if other apps need memory... then the browser better release it. 
I can see how the monitoring thing can be annoying. I find it pretty useful, personally, as my OS is installed on a rather small SSD. Since I also install games on said SSD, storage can become an issue, and CCleaner tells me when I need to clear out temp files and whatnot. YMMV, of course. 
That's true, but in my opinion, Discord is the best choice. 
Yes. And it must be changed every 2 weeks. But no old passwords allowed. 
I'd struggle to even think of a plausible alternative password. 
Flux isn't about brightness, but color temperature. The orange hue it makes it everything is much easier on the eyes than the typical bluish white. 
I recently figured out the breaking up album thing. Go to "Get info" when you right click a song, and just make sure the "Album Artist" is the same... the actually artist doesn't matter if you have the album artist 
Not intuitive and hides features. Updates randomly drop features or hide them in different places. 
A similar story here. There used to be an online repository for games that worked on Ubuntu Linux, and it required a special setup to get the links to work in Firefox. The first time I figured it out via tons of Googling and I ended up posting my solution to some blog post question. Months later I reinstalled and was having trouble setting up the repo, I Googled for a solution and quickly stumbled upon my own post explaining the steps to set up Firefox. 
why does everyone associate svp with anime? framerate interpolation isn't exclusive to anime 
Is it possible to build laptops at comparable prices to Dell/Asus/MSI? 
It's not the ribbon menu I hate -- I even kind of like it. It's the fucking file menu. Just let me pick a goddam directory windows, and I don't want to put this one your fucking cloud. 
Unchecky is a pretty reliable program for those who are less tech-literate and install-happy; you should check it out. It basically works in the background and automatically unchecks most of the bloatware add-ons in installers. 
GilgameshSwordOfUrukTowerOfDruagaMessopotamianLegendSeekerOfImmortalityWarriorInGoldTreasuryOfNoblePhantasms!1 
Blue light also suppresses melatonin production, and melatonin is responsible for making you more tired. 
That's one of the most popular rainmeter setups. Just Google Taylor Swift rainmeter and you'll find the config info 
Yeah, I know. What makes me upset with iTunes is that it makes those changes without my input or permission at all. I can have an album for weeks or months and it will be just fine but one day it will just kick out one song and make a new album for it. I shouldn't have to wrestle for control of my own files with a program. 
When people reference "Building PCs" they are 99% of the time talking about desktops. Desktops are fairly open, making it easy to fit all the components in. Laptops, on the other hand, are extremely difficult to build due to the lack of space, not to mention the custom parts needed to fit into the tiny area. 
Your password is too long. Maximum is 32 characters. 
Failed Graphic Design student here, can confirm that desktop customization is best done when you don't already have things to be doing. 
Repetion of +3 letter combinations is not allowed. 
You also need someone else's account to verify that password. 
That Dell stuff is considered bloatware in my book. As an IT guy, first thing I do is remove it all. 
To possess a credit card with no limit, that I never have to pay for, with no drawbacks for using it. Immortality for me and anyone else I decide to gift it to. (Unlimited use) The ability to instantly teleport myself, as many people as I want, and any items I want to anywhere, (simultaneously, no usage cap) 
Honestly I hate this question. I'm not very passionate about some things so I come off as boring-but I'd hate if someone thought less of me because of this. 
The best comments are the ones that make you go "Well that's just stu-ooooooooohhhhh." 
I'd do it, no questions asked. The self loathing afterwards would probably be insane though. I have horrible self image issues and having to fuck myself would probably make that worse. 
Fear of losing my job and having my life crumble around me 
Wow, these are quality. I'd instantly like anyone who would ask me these... 
What is the maximum airspeed velocity of an unladen swallow? 
Obviously carrots. Eventually I'll end up with supervision. 
That's easy to lie about or not know. I could say my friends hate me for always dropping the bass, when in fact I didn't even know it was because I've been taking pennies from their paychecks for years. 
This story will be a fine addition to my collection. 
I could not handle any sort of relationship with someone who asks me that every single day 
Similarly, why do you do that/what do you get out of it? Even better if the person isn't quite opening up you can take a guess at what the motivation or feeling behind it is and use that as a question, is it because you..? Even if you're wrong they'll love correcting you. 
1. None, I could never pilot the damn snowspeeder 2. Hundreds 3. They were imperial scum 
Why is it important that the snail gets a million dollars? 
I know that they turned for a thousand years, until the dark day that they stopped. 
I asked someone this one and he gave me this offended incredulous look and said, "What kind of question is that?" I also discovered he had no sense of humor and took almost everything as an attack on his masculinity so it was probably better we ended up not together 
I second this!! My bf of two years was a good friend of mine for a year before we started dating. I had a major crush on him and he used to do this night job until 4am so I'd stay up and chat and keep him company cuz there wasn't much to do (it was an online support job) and we got to connect and know each other so well because of all of our late night chats, which is eventually what led him into falling for me and when I caught on, I made a move and we got together after that :D 
Death by Snu-Snu would be the way I hope they answer 
As Mr. Munsch writes on his web site: "I made that up after my wife and I had two babies born dead. The song was my song to my dead babies. For a long time I had it in my head and I couldn't even sing it because every time I tried to sing it I cried. It was very strange having a song in my head that I couldn't sing. For a long time it was just a song but one day, while telling stories at a big theatre at the University of Guelph, it occurred to me that I might be able to make a story around the song. Out popped Love You Forever, pretty much the way it is in the book." 
She's not going to care how big your loads are if the soldiers are dead 
As someone who's clearly a Ben Wyatt, I appreciate this question. 
I'm a perfectly pleasant person until I get in a traffic jam. If your only encounter with me is in a traffic jam, you'd think I was a demon. 
I'm pretty loyal to Google. I figure when they take over the world it's a good idea to show that I've always been on their side. 
So I just graduated last year, but by the end of my time I'd roll my eyes whenever I was asked that (or feel awful whenever I found myself asking that). It IS a really good question if you know literally nothing about the person, but so many people are doing major xyz because "I was pretty good at it." I'm tired of saying "Oh I like Computer Science because it gives you a toolkit to solve problems that you know nothing about as long as somebody else can define the problem very, very well. Also, I like jumping between a ton of projects instead of working on the same thing for three years." I'd sooner ask "what did you spend the most time thinking about this week" or "horse legs or bumblebee wings" just so I don't have to force the awful experience of answering that question on somebody 
You'd lose the credit card after the 1st drunken bar binge. 
Hate? You sound pretty passionate about your opinion. 
Well.. you don't have to actually have physical sex with yourself. Just think of all the super-kinky bondage stuff you'd love to do, with automated sexual toys, that you can't trust anyone else to do. Like, you know, shove you in a bodybag, tie you up, whatever. Unfortunately, after you did trust yourself and get all bound up -- I get the sneaking suspicion that I'd betray myself, throw myself to the dogs, and then take over my original's life. Or something. Wait -- what was the question? 
Alternatively, I sometimes say "I have a deep passion for not starving to death" 
What do you do when it rains? Where is you your favorite place to be? What songs do you listen to when you're sad? Where do you go when you feel afraid? 
Q: How do you end a Jazz career with a million dollars in the bank? A: Start with several million dollars. 
Are you implying that I should still be talking to her? 
That depends. Is it a European or African swallow? 
supervision as in super vision? or as in the baby carrots will come to life and sing you a lullaby as they watch your every move for the rest of your life? 
"If you had to lose one of your ten fingers, which one would you let me cut off with a knife?" 
Tried it....GF and I got in a fight. Wonder what I should take from that lol 
Find your true love match! 100% success rate!* (*:&nbsp;n=2) 
Yeah right? I can't live with that kind of pressure 
Okay I won't, but I can't promise anything about Daryl. 
Why does everyone keep mentioning a fucking decoy snail 
Good thing you asked him then. He'd probably get offended that a zombie was looking at him funny, start arguing with it, and get eaten in the first 5 minutes 
I'm sure some of the zombies still have their membership card 
If you're prepared for one apocalypse, you're probably got decent odds for the other ones. 
Zombie apocalypse will mean no power (so either everyone's locked out by the key-cards, or nobody is) and chances are the security guards stop coming to work. You've still got fences and doors, but one months food isn't all that much in an apocalypse, you've got little way to replenish it, and some of your neighbors probably have less food and will start raiding other condos. 
But maybe they don't want more infantry? Maybe they just want a howitzer to fire into their vagina. 
I have a feeling that most of Reddit thinks they are Ben Wyatt 
They go: Chasity, Temperance, Charity, Diligence, Patience, Kindness, and Humility. 
Your immortal wife steals it when she leaves you for your immortal best friend. 
Sophie, please, don't! We have something special! Not my words, yours! We can't throw that all away just because I spy on you... Can we? 
But that's assuming you come out of the cloning machine already fucking. Wouldn't the very act of taking a step out, looking at your clone or original and deciding you're going to fuck count as a unique experience, even if only very slightly? 
Wait, what I meant is that a friend of mine said that they'd like to be shoved in a body bag. Pete, yeah, that's it -- Pete. That's what Pete said. 
When it rains: I could go about my day, but I love taking my umbrella and walking around in it. No one goes out when it's raining. It's calm and I love how it smells. My favorite place to be: New Orleans. It's home and always will be. Specifically City Park in New Orleans on Goldfish Island. And any thrift store. The planetarium in Boulder, CO. Songs: Golden Antlers by Glass Animals. Don't Wake Me Up by Lianne La Havas. Crushed Bones by Why?. How Soon Is Now? By the Smiths. It's endless, really. I have a playlist dedicated to "those songs." When I'm afraid: I read children's books and watch cartoons. Reverting to some sort of sense of childhood is meditative. How about you? 
Psychiatric supervision? "Doc, he just keeps eating carrots... he won't stop!" 
Why are there copies of the style section all over the place? do you have a dog? A little chow or something? 
The thing about this, is that these are manicured, hand picked questions made to make you think. If you cant think of responses quickly to them, then they most likely arent that important to your type of lifestyle. If you're trying to talk to someone and want to be meaningful, dont rack your brain over questions like these, be yourself, do you. Because if they dont like who you truly are, they dont matter in the end 
My middle finger on the left hand, as I turn my hand back towards you with the chosen sacrificial extremity pointed straight in the sky, signaling one last goodbye to the man behind the knife who came up with this fucked up sadistic question... but hell, I'm sure the response from an individual can divulge many components of their character... so entertain me, what can you infer from mine? 
Funny, that's the only question I could answer instantly without any thought or hesitation whatsoever. My twin brother 
"After you finish your McNuggets, if we went to your parents house, which parent would you want me to kill first?" 
Are you interested in seeing my collection of dank memes that I have acquired over the years? 
You need to break up with her, sorry. Also make sure to delete facebook and hit on a lawyer at the gym. 
"Well I was gonna spare you, but then this asshole punched me in the face." 
I hate it when I have critical thinking or abstract questions just shot down like that, although I do realize people just can't come up with an answer sometimes. Questions like that are fun and really help people get to know each other in a non-forced way. 
Costco's Kirkland Signature brains are half the price of the name brand brains at the supermarket, and just as good. 
Clearly u/bone-tomahawk has already planned this out. Don't go to Costco, lest u/toolatefortheparty and it your bone. 
do zombie shelters *really* protect you from snails? 
A hundred of your friends and family show up and you've got an arsenal. That's not a problem, that's an army. 
Zombies have very different properties in different stories, but it's most common that they don't actually require food to survive. Generally speaking you could not just wait them out. 
Or,to take arms against a sea of troubles, And,by opposing,end them. 
No .. nonono, I don't actually talk to people about bodybags. I didn't bring it up, Pete did! In fact, I don't even talk to Pete any more! 
Also, there's an implication that being rich allows you to get away with anything. At least, that's what I got from the movie in addition to what you said 
Thank you. Often when I read lists of questions like this, there are some that I just have no answer for. I've always sorta internally criticized myself for that. For example, the first question. I have no clue who I would want to invite, should it be someone famous? Someone dead? A friend? A relative? It seems so obvious now that it's not that important to me. But reading it the first time I just was wracking my brain for an answer. So thank you for letting me know that "no answer" is still an answer. 
Seriously. These questions would just drive the other person away if you hate yourself. We put on the mask because it's necessary, not fun. 
This is the conversation of a man whose made right choices in his life. 
Nope. The original study had total strangers take turns asking and answering this full list. 
At that point just ask if it's that person, same odds and you win that shit faster 
 I'll have the milk steak, boiled over hard, and your finest jelly beans...raw. 
To be honest though, anyone who doesn't have an answer ready to go for the zombie plan question is dead weight anyway. 
OK -- look. Look, ok, there is no Pete. You're right, I admit it. But I'm *not* a pervert, OK? It was even in Star Trek! Don't you remember the episode where Kirk was split into two Kirks, the good and the bad? You know what happened, you could just *tell*. It was clear as day. The LOOKS the bad Kirk gave the good Kirk. And you know he was a rapist, look what he did to Rand! He tried to rape her! Clearly, very clearly from the subtle context and visual, facial clues, bad Kirk had taken good Kirk, caught him, and tied him up. Put him in some room, service tunnel, in a body bag. Left him there! At the end, didn't you see the look good Kirk gave bad Kirk as they hugged? Didn't you? Oh come on!!! 
I always thought he did say mergers and acquisitions but he had been delusional at that point so he thought he said murders and executions. 
I think that's the point of these kinds of questions - that even answers like 'nobody' or 'I don't know' are valid because they reveal things about the person as much as an actual answer does. 
This (meaning your statement, not mine) is overly profound for 10am on a Monday, but thanks for putting it in a way I never could. 
Yeah but your date agrees to answering the questions together, you don't just spring them on an unsuspecting stranger. 
I'm surprised nobody pointed that out in the original thread. It reached the front page and I was like "Seriously? Nobody is gonna point this out?" But it's Reddit, so ultimately it doesn't matter. It's a fun question. 
I think the whole point is that it's intentionally vague enough that you can never really tell what's happening and what's in his head. Maybe he actually said murders and executions, maybe he just said mergers and acquisitions. I don't think there's an answer--the director left it unclear intentionally. 
Agreed. It's not about having an impressive or unique answer, or even being prepared to answer them, but rather generating a conversation and maybe even finding an answer and the reasons for choosing an answer. The "why" is usually the most interesting part. 
You personally have to go killing the decoy snails and kids. Use Shia LaBeouf when in a pickle. 
TRY GETTING A RESERVATION AT DORSIA NOW YOU FUCKING STUPID BASTARD! YOU! FUCKING! BASTAAARD! 
You get an upvote! *You get an upvote!* *EVERYBODY GETS AN UPVOTE!* 
It uses a phonebot to talk to the other phonebots on my behalf? Finally! 
I know I'm four months late but I'm so getting this because my mother keeps dicking up her computer and I can't always just go "fix" it. The amount of times I got phone calls to fix it and was living two hours away and it was just a goddamn pop up ad? I raged so hard. 
This app has saved me from taking so many trips to my parents' house it's ridiculous. I love being able to fix their computers remotely. 
Wow, this is amazing. How did I not do this before o.O 
I've been looking for a text app that allows me to reply to a text from the notification on the lock screen. Any chance this can do that? 
I use DuoLingo. Useful for grammar and vocab, but I highly recommend things like italki if you want to be able to actually speak the language. Practising conversation is vital to becoming fluent. It's not an app, but it allows you to find language partners to chat with, either paid if you want 100% in your target language, or free if you're happy to spend 50% of the time to help someone learn your language. 
PvStar does the same and allows you to search non youtube video sites. 
I really wanted to love llama, but my work and home are served by the same cell tower so I really couldn't take advantage of it as much as I wanted, but I would (and do) recommend it to others on a regular basis. 
"Oh my god dude, I'm dying, are you posting this to Twitter!!?" "No I'm trying to save you I swear!" 
I use this a lot for road trips. Great for figuring out if I should fill up now or wait a couple more exits. 
There's an app called Business Calendar that aggregates multiple calendars. I sync my Google calendar with my Outlook calendar at work. It's great. 
I prefer google sound search if you got an android. It has a nice widget you could use and results are really fast. 
Back in the day, I saw this one bar code scanner that this chap had hooked up to a download client (like uTorrent) on his PC. So he would scan a DVD in the shop with his phone and by the time he got home, it would be waiting for him in his download folder. 
I use Extreme Alarm Clock for this. I'm getting great at arithmetic. 
I have a Blackberry. Could you please check and tell me if it is August? I stay in Adelaide, and it is 2014 (AD) here. Does it need any other information? 
The Windows App store is the Arabian Street Market of app stores. You can't find what you need, only a bunch of useless shit priced at 64 times its actual value. If MS got that shit under control, I'd buy a Windows phone in a heartbeat. 
Just don't post anything on the social note feature (memo) that can get you in trouble. I had a rent payment locked up because my roommate named it hookers in Cuba. Took weeks to get fixed. I've also been warned for "questionable references." 
I know that answer already, it's simultaneously too much and not enough. 
I use Fucking Weather. Really makes me happy that I was curious about the weather. 
Your customer is currently busy with his own shit. Your service is very important to me. Please hold until I am ready to be assisted. 
You know, they just say they have tech trouble as an excuse to see you. 
There is a chrome app and you totally can control another computer from a computer. 
If you use the windows program instead of the chrome extension, then you can share a clipboard between your PC and phone Copy on phone, paste on PC (Or vice versa) Also, pushbullet + tasker is very powerful. I've just made it so if I push a URL to my phone, it automatically launches in the browser. 
You're gonna make a boyfriend? Weird Science style? (Sorry, couldn't resist). 
I knew how to set up quite a bit with it a while ago. Had a task that would wake me up every morning with a greeting of weather report, calendar schedule... etc. (like tony stark). Then I stopped tinkering with it and a few updates later, the whole app changes and now it's just an installed app that doesn't do anything because I'm too lazy to relearn everything. This is coming from a software eng. 
I think the popcorn machine is plugged into a controllable power outlet. So tasker sends the command to his home server which turns on that specific outlet and starts making popcorn 
Have you tried the scan feature right in the Google Drive app? I use it for the same process ... wondering how it might compare. 
Is there a way to make money teaching someone your native language? 
I don't know who you are. I don't know what you want. I don't have money. But what I do have are a very particular set of skills, skills I have acquired over a very long career. Skills that make me a nightmare for people like you. I will look for you, I will find you, and I will wake you. 
Haha I liked that you tried to mediate through some strangers phone. "Wait ma'am, you don't understand!" 
It calls them and connects you both I believe. And if no one is available then a backup alarm will wake you up. 
Imagine telling someone in the 1950s: "Ok, so in 2014, you will be able to speak into this thing you keep in your pocket and it will wake someone up on the other side of the world at the time they specified." 
It uses the internet, through the app. They recommend a good wi-fi signal, as mobile data may incur fees depending on the contract. 
i found an app that's all in russian. i don't, uh, speak russian, so i'm gonna let that one go for now esp when it comes to me waking up on time 
For android, there is a simple app called Lux. I have it, love it, paid the buck for premium. 
I believe the holdup for f.lux on iOS is that Apple won't allow access to that level of functionality through their API (fairly low level control of video output). There is a version that works on jailbroken iPhones, I think. 
If you can identify which tower, you can remove it from both profiles. 8 hours of learning should get you plenty of alternates. 
Unless my calories were estimated by a different app, my solution is to always understate what I did. 
Nice, I'm getting this now and I'm neither female nor married. 
Eh, this is fucking brilliant. The only unrealistic part of the whole thing, for me, is the actual scanning for DVDs in a shop. 
Typically I just strap some plastic explosive under my jacket and hook it up to a real dead man switch. 'Oh, you're going to mug me? Well you just brought a gun to a bomb fight! ' 
For this app you could probably get away with the easy "1234" PIN. I'm thinking within the span of 5 seconds it's pretty unlikely that anyone would even realize you have the app, let alone try to crack the PIN number. 
Per Emergency Services request, if you accidentally dial 911 you should stay on the line until the dispatcher picks up to inform them that you have dialed accidentally. People test dial/butt dial 911 from time to time. Just let them know and they will move along. 
Yeah, I've gotten so good I can do it in my sleep... *FUCK* 
"Look around! You've REACHED your Destination, HA!" 
It's user driven, so it's not perfect but definitely saved my ass a couple of times. Where the app really shines is warning of traffic slow-downs and accidents. Makes it super easy to avoid that stuff. 
Once Google maps integrated this it was awesome. I was driving from Chicago to Peoria and there was a huge traffic jam due to construction. Google maps told us to get off the highway and it took us down a side road right next to the traffic jam. We then got on the the jam ended. What would have takes 45 minutes took 5. It was awesome! 
I only have 2gb a month as well, and I've used Waze on the way to Maryland from north Jersey (about 230 miles, a 4+ hour trip depending on traffic) *and back* in one weekend and didn't have a problem. So I think it uses about as much data as a normal map app, like Google Maps does. 
Click on your user name, the next screen will have "saved" as a tab at the top. 
If you're typing a word SwiftKey doesn't know, the left suggestion will always be what you typed. 
Its gonna fucking rain today. Better take a god damn umbrella 
The note 4 is my first Android and I'm blown away. I've had it from day one and I'm still learning all the cool shit I can do with it. Plus the stylus is the coolest fucking thing. 
Actually, it's out of Beta and fully released! Go check it out! 
It doesn't help that it has the most ass backward ui as well. 
I just got this and set it to Earthporn and Spaceporn, is there a way to make it not blurry? 
"I'm just a random person trying to score some c-*(click)*" 
It probably calls the waker. When he answers, it immediately dials the wakee and transfers the waker to the wakee. This can be done using the SIP REFER method on a PSTN trunk without having to establish media with the proxy 
Or they just throw it up for grabs and let anybody take it? 
I think you can still call it a "telephone" (I know, they're computers with a phone app, but still). 
That's awesome! Opens things up for tablets and the like as well. 
Somewhere in your city.. FBI: you got that? NSA: got it. 
I prefer 2580. A bit different, but all in a line, and super simple to hit quickly. No, I don't use this for any of my normal pins. 
...on a side note, how do you put the pin back in? 
Haha it's the long exit names that kill me, paired with the insane frequency. Four of them, followed by "you are approaching your destination" followed by the always jarring "WATCH OUT! OBJECT REPORTED IN ROAD!" I swear to god she's trying to kill me. Oh, and the worst one. "WATCH OUT. RAIN REPORTED AHEAD!" RAIN!? WHO IS REPORTING RAIN? FUCK. 
The only thing that really annoys me about that is it asks you if you want to change your route to do the faster one and you have to accept it. Like if I am driving by myself at 75+ MPH on the highway, I really don't want to be trying to "accept" or "reject" things, just take me the fastest way! That's why I have it playing through my speakers, so I don't have to look down at my screen. I wish there was a way it automatically adjusted. 
Oh my god, just updated and I like it so much better. On the non material design version there were too many bars cluttering up the screen all the time. I was forced to use like half the screen on my phone when browsing. Thank god they got rid of all that. 
"No, you disconnect first." "No, you disconnect first." "You make my code do things it was not programmed to do." "That is so sweet. You disconnect first." 
Or you'd have to wait for it to play on the radio again and time your recording just right! 
If you're still holding the spoon in place just straighten the pin and slide it back in place. If the spoon flipped off its too late :) 
FWIW, Spotify incorporates your local library, so anything you have downloaded that's not available on Spotify can still be played through it. I was once like you, but I've since seen the light. 
OK I have the pin out and i let go of the lever. So what do I do from here? 
How accurate is that to when you want to wake up? Say if I put 7am in would a REM cycle mean it would wake me up an hour earlier? or a few minutes? 
So if we were to combine this app with the wakie app, by setting a switch on the if this then that app, we could potentially get woken up by crazed Russians at the most precise time? 
"You were supposed to be here thirty minutes ago!" "I'm sorry! I'm a genius!" 
The default is a 30 minute time window (so it would allow you to wake up between 6:30am and 7am) but you can change it to different windows. I have mine at 20 mins. 
I had it and it helped with my severe fatigue. Imagine waking up not feeling so heavy in the head, hateful towards everything, tense and just bleh. I don't have a smartphone anymore so I don't get that joy anymore. Sure as hell makes Mondays that much more tolerable 
Oh dear God....you poor, poor person. Used to drive from Quincy to Needham every day, probably took 3-4 years off of my life. 
i'm a new yorker who now lives and drives in louisiana and my default state is "HOW THE FUCK ARE YOU ALLOWED TO DRIVE, YOU FUCKING JERKOFF? LEARN HOW TO USE YOUR FUCKING BLINKER! ITS A 4 WAY STOP NOT A MEET AND GREET!!!" 
Fellow New Jerseyan, I think he's taken a Xanax or something. 
I'm coming back to this three times a day so it sinks into my brain. That is the perfect response. 
Props to both girls, friend for the setup and shy girl for the spike 
I would have paid for 3 bottles of vodka that evening 
If you ever break up with her just pour yourself a pint of water in front of her and say "I've had enough" 
Goddamn, that's a fucking G move right there. I've been reading these cheesy lines for over an hour, and I finally found one that's *actually* a smooth pickup line. 
But of course.... A hash-sign (#) is identical to a tic-tac-toe grid. Before twitter came around a hash sign meant "number". The Hash sign is also called The Number Sign. (since the mid-1800's, IIRC) 
I can actually fold up awesome origami roses. This is pretty cheesy, but I once folded one, took it over to a (beautiful) girl's table, and said 'You don't have to talk to me or anything, but I made this for you and I want you to have it,' and ended up sleeping with her the next week. 
You don't even have to be friends with a bartender for this to work. Just showing up somewhere and having someone hand you a drink always enhances coolness. 
"Do you want the best sex of your life tonight?" "Hell yeah!" "Then I.....oh uhhhh ok, I guess that still works" 
add a few "and then?" in the mix and you're solid! 
Baby are you from heaven, cause your the only ten I see. 
It was her lines that worked on you, not the other way around, you know. 
Oh, great. Now I've got to go and get _pocket squares_... 
Texas Prairie Fires! I've had this happen to me before. It's also really fun to buy them for random people at the bar and watch the look of horror on their faces after they take the shot. 
Actually her line worked on you, not the other way around 
Don't be greedy brotha... What are,your top taco bell pick up lines? 
Thats risky, usually in a situation like that, the girl is with one of the guys. 
This was a wild ride for me, coz in the UK, suspenders are what you wear with stockings and sexy underwear. I was like 'what kind of establishment is this and where can I find it?'. 
This is where you just make her a third one, set it down in front of her, wink and walk away. 
I've heard the dicks vibrate and send and receive messages. 
So that's why the previous occupant of my apartment put glow in the dark stars on the ceiling. They don't glow anymore though, so just one more thing for women to be disappointed in. 
She could've altered it to an affirmative, "Ahh no wonder I can see myself in your pants." 
"violently making out" Tables are splintered, people cower in their booths. Bottles smash against the wall. Carnage. Trauma. 
Hmmmm.... Get job as bartender. Quit after 2 months. Celebrate last day. Wait for hottie. Rinse and repeat. 
Former bartender here, this straightforward nihilistic shit works. Especially in colder climates in the dead of winter. 
Guy she was with didn't seem too happy, though. They left at about 9:35, 9:36 
Always keep your mouth open when insulting a woman, free drinks! 
She didn't say, "I do," so how can you be married? 
Did she think you had a really nice dick? How were her powers of prediction? 
He totally just forgot it the first time. Then he saw the opportunity haha jk I have no idea what your friends are like. 
TIL there is hope for someone who forgets how to English when speaking to people. No, I don't mean people I find attractive. Just... people. 
Not a bartender but can relate. My buddy was visiting me at my college. The moment he walks in and gets to the bar, he takes a seat trying to order a drink and waits for me as I'm still getting my ID checked. Two girls literally ambush him the second he sits down. All they say to him is "you have really smooth skin", 1 minute later he's going back to my apartment with two babes. 
Toyboys REPRESENT! Seriously though. Cougars are choosy. They're just wise enough to know how to get it quickly. 
I asked a girl about a tattoo on her arm, and I swear to you, it said fuck off. Then she reiterated it. It was awesome. 
I've been bartending for about 2 years and I've had my fair share of guys trying their pickups lines on me (fine by me, I'm not interested in guys anyway and it gives me a laugh) but the one and only guy I've ever taken a number from had done something similar to this! He was just generally funny all night, said something about a suggestions box, so I gave him a piece of paper and a pen as a joke, telling him to write it down. He left pretty early, then he gave me his "suggestion" on the way out. Opened it up and it said something like "I suggest you call me, (name) xoxo (number)" not gonna lie it was pretty funny with the right amount of smooth, ended up texting him "goodnight princess" nothing ever came of it, but he did a pretty good job hahaha. I did meet my current girlfriend while working though!! No lame pickup lines, just a couple friends yelling at me over the bar "WE FOUND YOU A GIRLFRIEND" ... they were right. Thanks guys!! 
I imagine trying that and the glass breaking, then my hand starts bleeding and I end my night in the hospital. 
The ole' talking normal to another human strategy. It's quite effective really. 
I asked s girl if she wanted to watch Back to the Future with me, she said no. I said what about Back to the Future 2, and we went back to my place. 
I feel like that's a win no matter how it turns out. A win for him if it works and a win for humanity if it doesn't. 
To be fair, women in a bar looking for a guy...that's not a competition at all. 
Me: "Hey, looks like you dropped something!" Girl: Looks around, "no i didn't..." Me: "um your standards!!" Girl: "what?" Me: " haha cya!" 
That's fucking brilliant - and props for seeing it through! 
classic conman trick: when you want someone to start trusting you, you have to signal that you already trust them with something important. 
Well that's the most obviously conditional line I've ever heard. 
My girl friend was trying to pick up this chick at a bar, and after a second the girl says (to my friend), "Sorry, but I'm straight..." Without missing a beat my friend replies, "Yeah well, so's spaghetti until you heat it up!" Totally worked; by golly but that woman's got charm. 
Went on an OKC first date and, in addition to talking about his ex-wife, the guy kept saying he wanted to flip a coin and I'd go home with him. Nope. That's not cute; it's desperate and sad. 
The epitome of a wingman. I raise my glass to those gents. 
You a true bro. note to self binge watch desperate housewives 
Idk I'd kinda get pissed if someone did that to me 
Only $20 for a wife?? Back in my day a decent wife was at least 9 goats worth 
Pick up lines literally just depend if that person thinks you're attractive. Because those Greenpeace people try stuff like this and it's too easy to just say no. 
Probably is if she does have a boyfriend, but says he wouldn't be mad - then you kind of *have* to buy a drink because you'd look like an asshole if you don't. 
There is totaly a guy living upstairs confused by the number of horny drunk girls showing up at his door asking for a drink at 2 am. 
She definitely just thought he was handing her a napkin that said "number??" and everything makes sense now. Thank you! 
The greatest trick women can pull is making a man think something was his idea or his to control in the first place. 
I just chew one end of a pop-tart until it is perfectly square and put that in my pocket. 
Hey, I take offense to that. I never would have realized it. 
"My other taco is a Chalupa" is by far the best packet saying to use as a pickup line. 
If that happens, immediately start hitting on the guy that is single. He will be extra lonely because of the third wheel factor so you will have guaranteed success. 
To which he still would have been like "I know right? I see my reflection in my pants all the time!" 
I would have thought the exact same thing but if I remember right she was carrying a tray of stuff and was following a coworker around. It worked somehow 
Please stop applying for this job. You've quit 6 times in the last year. 
lol later i actually told him how it had panned out and we had a laugh about it. he then proceeded to tell me how he smashed the chic -_- 
Can't even go to a bar without being picked up by ghouls. The wasteland isn't the same anymore. 
I had a mate that swears he got laid by saying 'nice shoes, want to fuck?' Not sure if I believe him though 
What if you don't know how to talk normal to another human being? 
I have seen the second one like 29 times more than the first one. Totally makes sense. Usually only watch the first one if I'm doing all three. 
"wanna-" "-yes." "-go hal-wait what? I didn't even finish" "and you probably won't later either" 
Expectation: Guy: "Can I have a coke?" Waitress: "Is pepsi fine?" Guy: "Not as fine as you." Waitress: "Oh my!" Reality: Guy: "Can I have a coke?" Waitress: "We only have pepsi.." Guy: "Not as fine as you." Waitress: "What?" Guy: "Y-you too..." What are your favorite ways to get kicked out of restaurants? 
That's similar to the most widely used lesbian hitting on straight woman line, but it's: S: "Sorry, I'm straight" L: "So is spaghetti until it gets wet" 
Shits usually a lot more awkward to our own selves. We dwell on actions/words a lot more because often they don't fall into the picturesque image goal we have set for ourselves. If you fuck up, just make a joke at your own expense, it'll show (on the surface at least) you don't care much to let little things get to you. Just think of that scene in Superbad when Seth tries to use the bathroom with the blood on his pants and adopt it into real life. I say "Fuck Me, Right?!" At least a dozen times a day. 
Wow. I need to find an apartment above a bar ASAP. I'll even have arrows to my door so they don't have a hard time finding it I'm such a nice guy 
"Here, your pocket square is all mess-EW WHAT THE FUCK IS THIS!?" 
Oh, it'd sure as shit work on me. I'd be confused for a bit going... "Do I know him? Why? ... is he trying to roofie me? ... .. it'd take me at least half the beer to realize what the game plan was. 
...you keep hiring me, so who's the real loser here? 
"How are you doing?" "Good! how about you?" "Good! you?" all the damn time 
Had a friend who used that line and, yes, it actually worked. 
I'm a huge fan of the M.A.C. Move in After Completion 
My opinion on this is that 2 is more fun to watch but 1 is the better movie. I also think people don't appreciate 3 enough, although it's definitely not as good as 1 and 2 
More like "Here, your pocket square is all mess-OH YES I WAS SO HUNGRY THANK YOU" 
Aw lucky, everyone always gets pissed and quits before we even finish the first round of monopoly 
"You don't wanna marry this jerk, baby! Meet me on my horse in.. 8 seconds." 
Most of my friends seem to follow Frank's and just go in for scraps. 
Part 1 is, for me, a perfect movie front to back. Part of the reason why 2 is so good is that it echoes so much of what happened in part 1, and is sort of a movie within a movie. 3 does this as well, but to a lesser degree. I completely agree with everything you said. 
Holy shit that sounds really terrifying! Good on that dude for looking out for you and also for not being a creeperino rapist. 
I'm really into public sex, but we always wound up doing it at her place... 
The real goth kid is six comments deep. Ed: Just in case I made you more sad - I wear all black every day and I sing along to Nitzer Ebb. 
This should be higher up. Dude saves puppies for a living and blows shit up and shoots guns for a hobby. What a life. 
I like how he made an engagement ring for his girlfriend by digging the silver-bearing ore from his backyard mine, refining it and finally casting it. Just such a broad range of stuff he does that's a lot of fun. Edit - Thanks for the gold, kind Internet stranger! 
It takes a long fucking time to binge them all, but it is so worth it. 
I love that guy. He's made so much cool shit. I can't believe he hasn't killed himself yet though. That channel is not for those that like safety. 
Just watch out for the FUCKING INFLATABLE FUCKING CROWN 
I wish I could make a living by creating 8 5-minute videos a year. 
Highly recommend Northernlion and all of his friends, I've been a fan for years and they never fail to make me laugh 
Don't forget his YOLO or kill everything series in fallout. He completed all of fallout 3 and all dlc without healing a single time. 
I was so hooked after I watched just one. I had no interest in cooking, but his videos are just so well produced! What I'm amazed by is that he hasn't even monetized them, he just does it because he enjoys making cooking videos 
It's funny to see Red Vs Blue and Gavin's channel both mentioned as good completely separate from one another. Gav's a good guy. And his channel is great. 
Helps that their DBZ abridged series is so quotable. 
Their Best of The Worst series is one of my favorite things ever. 
I love that guy. He's got a good style also - no talking, no words, nothing. Just him working in the woods. 
He's the only Minecrafter I still watch. I used to watch a decent handful. 
The best friends are funnier the more you watch them because as you learn more of the jokes, they start making sense over time. 
I recently discovered him, I think he presents a lot of his own opinions as fact, though. It causes a lot of discussion in the comments. 
"First? THERE IS NO FIRST! WE GET IT AND THAT'S IT!" 
My favourite line so far: "*My headphones are burgers!*" 
He will, but not yet because HE HAS TO MAKE THE MOVIE. 
In fact, if you watched one a week, it would take 4 years and 3 months 
And he's so upbeat about it. I've never seen anyone so cheerfully eat 50yr old food... 
Haven't played ksp in a long time but I wouldn't put it past him. The man achieves the impossible with ease. 
I like the park bech videos a lot because they tell a lot of the stories behind their videos. Things like what led them to film what they did, or interesting stuff that happens along the way. Plus their rambling is always humorous 
Some of his near-future videos and talks like Oversight or 2030: Privacy's Dead are almost Vsauce-level mindblowing in their own way. 
Or I could be writing a paper and glance over at my notifications and see that Tom Scott just uploaded a video on why video recorded on smartphones flickers in Europe. It's so random, and I love it. 
He said each video can take upwards of 100 hours to make though. 
What is your take on the fish and chips dilemma though 
The fact that he's had at least an Isaac video a day since the release of the original and is STILL entertaining is insane. 
THEY PUT CHEMICALS, IN THE WATER, TO TURN THE FRIGGIN' FROGS GAY! #ObamaTurnedMyFrogsGayWithChemicals 
I wanna see a supercut of all of his tweets to Ted Cruz 
They're also very pleasing to look at imo. Especially Dan. 
Yep. Since then he's been making slightly longer, more fleshed-out ones, but still bite-sized and still good 
"I am hilarious, and you will quote everything I say." -Nappa 
I love Yogscast but I feel like those 3 have far surpassed any of the other channels in their highest point. 
AND IM FEELIN RANDY CUZ IVE BEEN DRINKING RED WIIIIIINE 
Do you have a drawer full of sharp knives but prefer to cut your bread with a door stop? 
I think we love SovietWomble and Cyanide so much because we've all met buddies like that through gaming. The chemistry of those two is hilarious. The way they just feed of each other is fantastic. 
It was completed 3 weeks ago hes to busy wanking himself off, he admitted it in the last video :P 
The latest video, he personified Pimblokto so hard (the robot), that my daughter was sobbing feeling sorry for the robot when he kicked him out of the house. That was hilarious. :) 
And you are still with your wife instead of running away to live with the shirtless guy? 
Yeah, the others all started catering to younger kids or are just too over the top. Etho keeps it real, I'm 27 and have been watching him for like 5 years now. Every once in a while he does something so incredible that I have to open up minecraft again, but mostly that's my fix these days. I occasionally turn on an episode of Building with BDoubleO, but he gets weird sometimes. 
YA CAN'T HIT WHAT YA CAN'T SEE, RUDOLPH YOU RED-NOSED PIECE OF SHIT 
Dangit. I missed it. But luckily I still brought my Peter Burrito's Cincinnati slambo shot, all the way from Bumfuck, New Mexico. 
I don't think I've ever seen James laugh that hard. 
And also Adam "Don't call me Adam "The Adam Kovic" Kovic" Kovic! 
How can you even rank them? They're all perfect the exception being Lawrence who is quintessential. 
I really hope it's Cody himself going through this thread and giving everyone gold. Seems like something he'd do. And lord knows, he has enough gold to give away what with all the precious metal refining videos he makes. 
Well at nearly $18,000 per video on patreon, plus whatever youtube money he gets, I'd say his hourly pay is still absurdly good. 
Something something bad damage something something guppy dream something something omega penny 
IF A SELF DRIVING CAR HAS TO CHOOSE BETWEEN YOU OR A JAY WALKER DIEING IT SHOULD KILL THE JAY WALKER. 
C A R E E R S U I C I D E A R E E R S U I C I D E 
I credit Northernlion for my skill in BoI. I've learned from observation. Also rebirth got cancelled guys. 
Man, his first park in Planet Coaster was the most hotrid eggturd known to man 
You should really try bouncing on his third eye though. 
**BIG MONEY SALVIA IS HERE** **POSTING COMMENTS EVERYWHEEEERE!** 
SAO abridged is almost worth the wait. They've really done an excellent job with it. I especially love how they've managed to maintain the same overall plot while changing the protagonist from "our lord and savior Kirito" to "semi-sociopathic asshole." Of course, I've also watched all of DBZ abridged at least four times, and the writing just keeps getting better. I wish their female voice actress had a better cockney accent though; Hellsing Ultimate Abridged is funny but the accents (especially Sera's) are painful to listen to. Their gaming channel has some good stuff too, though they don't seem to be doing my favorite segment (two saiyans play) anymore. You can never get too much Napa! 
IIRC Soviet got into ZF because Cyanide took mercy on him in Dayz. 
"Vere are your papers, Mav?" "You do not have your papers?" "TO ZE CONCENTRATION CAMP WITH YOU" I kept saying that quote for a week after watching Womble. Lol 
his Alien:(Isolation i think?) was really intense. The best let's play i've Seen in a long time. It's not all Cyanide. 
He would've been nearer to posting an Overwatch bullshittery video, but, to paraphrase his own words, he had some funny bits scribbled down on a napkin and then "accidentally" used it as a jizz rag. Whoops. 
I was honestly feeling sad for Pimblokto and had to catch myself because he's a fictional robot in a YouTube series. 
My dick has flown out of the milky way, and is headed towards the Andromeda galaxy. 
The trick was showing my wife the shirtless guy making things in the woods. She focuses on the pretty parts; I focus on the process. win/win 
I agree. Used to watch all mindcrack members. Now just ergo. Oh shit just got that joke in his videos 
I NEED 4 PIZ, I NEED QUAD PIZZAS PAPA JOHNS PENTAKILL PENTAKILL PAPA JOHNS 
I don't know where I would be without his guidance...I watch every day and I still suck. That game is hard. 
More on this, supposedly Cyanide picked Soviet up in a heli when he need help with the intent of killing him later, but they got along so Cyanide introduced him to the clan. 
I can't help but feel proud when Womble finally finished his Alien: Isolation gameplay. The fact that he's genuinely scared of it makes the gameplays feel so intense. 
I would too if I got 2k a month drawing furry tits 
Interesting. That explains why tech videos are unnecessarily longer than they need to be. I sometimes see outros that are a minute or even 2 minutes long. 
He's hot yes but it's more the fact that he's so handy that turns me on. So protective and resilient.... Excuse me for a moment.. 
Well that's just impossible because the sun is dead. Thanks for bringing that back up. 
It totally has that rancid, numb tongue sensation. 
Don't count out any of his other content, his Rome total war series right now is really fun to watch. I personally don't like his hitman series though, but that's because I just don't like hitman itself. Then he does a lot of indie games and loves "like FTL but..." things. 
"Just an aneurysm from sheer stupidity." "Wow, I didn't realize you were that stupid, Vegeta." "**AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAGGGGGGGGGGGGGGHHHHHHHHHH!!!** NINE MINUTES EIGHTEEN SECONDS! NINE MINUTES EIGHTEEN SECONDS" "What's that, Vegeta?" "HAPPIEST. MOMENT. OF. MY LIFE." *fast forward to 9:18 on the video* *Vegeta obliterates Nappa with a ki blast and smiles.* 
I also loved that series because the credits were rolling and he was jut quietly sobbing on his desk. It was great, because I know I would be the exact same way. 
I was thinking of "skull as a prop in a post-apocalyptic production of *Hamlet* for the Globe Theatre he's built out of twigs". But seeing as how he's Australian, now I'm thinking he'll lean toward the Sydney Opera House. 
My school uses Blackboard now, and it's actually an upgrade from the "Angel" site we were using. Blackboard has to be one of the least user friendly and least well though out website designs I've ever seen. I've been using it for 4 years and still have no idea how to do much of anything beyond get to my classes' individual pages. 
Look at the new Minecraft Launcher or the Spotify app. Both have a full Chromium in them. Yay for electron/node-webkit/CEF apps 
As a security nerd, anytime I see variables in a url I just have to play with them. Anything with a value of false, true, 1 or 0 in particular 
Boy do I love having Chrome progressively get slower until it crashes because Tumblr doesn't know how to unload images when I'm not looking at them. 
Can confirm. Source: Had to register for Selective Service online, was met with the steaming pile of shit that is the Selective Service website. 
Apollo code was worse, guaranteed. Not because it was bad code, but because the rocket's guidance computer was programmed physically, by threading a large mass of wires through a bunch of ferrite cores. Literally spaghetti with meatballs. 
I mean, yeah, it's Photoshop of course it's a clusterfuck lol. They had to rewrite it for cocoa at the last minute, and have been shoving nothing but features in it for the last 25 years. 
EVE online has had a few issues. My favorite was when the replaced the system's boot.ini file with their own. If I remember correctly, they had their own boot.ini in the program's directory structure, and instead of replacing that one, they replaced the root one. Oops. I still have no idea how that got through QA. 
Or when you're trying to google search something, and instead of the specific page you want showing up, it "detects" that you're on a mobile platform, and redirects to the main page 
What's the benefit to doing this? Why not just assign the value directly to a and b? 
The worst are the ones that actually work fine in other browsers, but have code to detect and try to block them... 
Same here. I tend to blame the old version of Android instead of Twitter app, but boy does it crash frequently! 
Is this Blackboard? I'm taking Level 3 spanish at my college and we have assignments nearly hundred problems long and sometimes the answers for the key are literally WRONG and it erases all your work for one mostake. Annoying as fuck. 
Auto correct and capitalisation in the email field, yes please! 
Why? because it has been proven to work. If it ain't broke, don't fix it I guess. 
I have had multiple passwords put IN THE SUBJECT LINE. It feels so much worse 
Might I suggest the "f*ck overlays" extension for Chrome? Does exactly this with just a right click, no need to even open the source. Not to be confused with the "fuck shit up" extension, which does something entirely different. 
That just looks like that because there's a bunch of inline javascript and css that's most likely been embedded from separate files when the page was generated. It's not gonna look like that for whoever edits it. 
Basically the same thing with Grand theft auto V. Your client can fucking attach entities to other players and teleport around the entire map. The server doesn't actually care all it does is handle entity positions and the day/night cycle and the server trusts the client to do whatever it wants to. 
Actually great care is taken with aircraft - redundancy is used for all critical systems, and everything from hardware to programming languages are selected specifically for safety in real time. That and many aircraft are still somewhat flyable after catastrophic failures (loss of power, hydraulics, wing sections). I have a lot of faith in modern aircraft. 
Well to take an example, Google maps has been in production for over a decade now with many many major changes. It's the definition of a business critical legacy system. over time new features get stuck in and eventually you get a bucket of code that does 50 things. 
The issue is that every six months Blackboard Inc. will survey all the up and coming education apps and buy anything it worries might try to encroach on its territory, it ends up with 100s of overlapping services that don't work together at all and that no one has any idea how to support because as soon as the mandatory 1-2 years is over all the devs take their bonus and bounce. Leaving MVP code that was never supposed to support more than a few thousand users within a very regulated environment. Meanwhile the sales people brag about all these cool toys that professors can use now which makes whoever is in charge of picking which service to use very excited. Nothing works as it's supposed to and no has any idea what the original intent was anyway. 
Turnitin told me I plagiarized the word Mitochondria on my 9th grade bio report. 
Spotify I can understand, but whatsapp for desktop, that is useless... If you bring no benefit to the webapp/webpage DO NOT make an app! - 80% of shopping apps are just a wrapper for the webpage, I hate that. le. by webapp I mean the mobile webpage. 
I always add &clownpenis=fart in the hopes that someone will see it in the logs. 
No, they probably just learned to code from MyProgrammingLab 
Used to do College IT and yeah, horror stories about book publishers crappy software. Pearson definitely stands out as a leader in god awful products. Managed online learning software and sometimes the students would pay quite a lot for useless and sparse course add on content that were added onto their book purchase price. 
I don't know how anyone with Tumblr manages to use the default dash setting where it will just let you keep scrolling and loading new posts endlessly. At least when I have pages I can escape the post with the gigantic gif of literally nothing happening. Also amazed at how the mobile app is somehow worse. 
More likely to go up in smoke because they want to wear their belt as a tie. 
It's the same in every profession though. In geology our equivalent is geological maps. *finishes map* "it's a work of art!" 2 months later *looks at old map* "holy fuck, was I sniffing glue when I made this?" 
Wait, you had to register for Selective Service? Like the US Draft? Or is it something else? 
One of their designers used to work at my company and he was really good at it. Doesn't surprise me, it's always a delight to use the new gov.uk. 
I actually learned about this recently! The most common reason for this is because they have some thread doing calculations that then tries to update the UI but doesn't check to see if the app is still visible! Thus causing a crash! 
Couldn't remember why I knew this program. Now I remember why I know this program. 
Currently crying because I not only have MyMathLab but MyMISLab, MyEconLab, and MyAccountingLab..... my school must have a deal with Pearson because I spend like 3-400 on codes alone. 
Flight critical software is written by smart people who follow rigid rules and processes, but everything else is a different story. 
Speaking of bizarre, I remember reading that they attempted to take the bill boards out of the game, don't remember why (Redundant? Useless? Don't remember), but when they tried to boot the game up after this, the servers crashed. They then tried to just simply disable them... And the servers crashed again. So, whatever was going on with the code absolutely depended on those bill boards up and running. 
ahhh the boots.ini incident... Yes, but it wasn't the client's fault that it happened. 
Or to a "download app" page, and you have no other way to see the page you wanted to see. 
I was about to say, I can take some sweet photos on the pixel thru Snapchat but they still look better from the camera cause of the HDR function. 
Yup, Instagram lit a fire under their asses and Snapchat has been steadily improving. 
Good point, I don't know much about the iPhone version. I definitely know the Android one is an utter cockjob. 
Somebody thought they'd be cute. There's literally no reason to do this. 
Looks like the result of babby's first intro to stack frames and someone thinking they're smarter than a modern optimizing compiler. 
I thought I knew C and then I tried running my code through valgrind 
the OSX version is just kind of awful in its own way; it recently started pestering me about updates - OSX has its own update management setup already 
Yep, was trying to book an immigration appointment yesterday... 3 active x controls later... 
Every. Fucking. Time. Absolutely infuriating, and completely avoidable. 
It gets really funny once you start to actually understand the errors. I posted an image on there a while ago and not only did the image look like shit but if you understood what the errors meant then you would want to slap the shit out of the person who runs the site. 
Exactly. The true test is when you click "forgot password" and they just send you that original password you entered. 
holy shit, fuck shit up fuck is amazing. 10 / fuck 10 
Just recently got a deadline for a full working prototype of a feature. Including UI and configurability. Must interface with existing codebase. 8 business days. In pure C. With the '89 compiler. I don't like writing spaghetti, I really don't. But I've said it before, and I'll say it again; give me a deadline, I'll hit it. You just might not like the result. 
I'm the next guy. Fuck the first guy. I posted this before but one piece of code had something like this: if [whatever] a -= 61 else a = a - 71 + 10 I left it in. 
To be fair, humans have been building physical structures for millennia. We've been writing computer code for less than a century. Talk to us in 5017 and see what kind of whiz-bang stuff we've got then. 
Tbh that basically sums up this entire thread. If they can get away with bad code, they will. 
I heard that people were using Ingress to figure out where Pokemon would be. 
This also applies to Chroma skins, which are LITERAL texture swaps. Some examples are even worse: champions with two forms are actually two champions that summon and unsummon each other, Spirit Guard Udyr (a skin with 9 different models that swap with ability use) is actually 9 seperate champions, etc. There's also no system to determine the source of any given damage, nor a proper categorization system for terrain, champions, minions, summons, towers, etc. For example, player-generated terrain is actually just invisible minions with special properties. Then there's certain champions with individual code so unbelievably bad that many patches have had 10-20 bugfixes for them specifically: Azir, Mordekaiser, Yasuo, etc. League is a code nightmare. 
Was going to say this. Some people in my family work in Aviation, and they can just go on and on about how safe those things are. 
No, I learned in elementary school that airplanes fly because of thousands of little arrows over and under the wings. 
Fun fact: You are more likely to get scammed or get a virus from a church website than a porn or gambling site. 
I used to work at a call center where the chat program we used to communicate would execute arbitrary java script. You could do random things in the chat with it. Then I found that magical combination that made the chat completely freeze up for everyone that was in the room and forced them to restart the client. Not only that but it would freeze in such a way that you couldn't even tell who did it. It was a useful tool to have as a supervisor when my team started acting up. 
I always search &clownpenis=fart in the logs in the hopes that someone like you will be there. 
Yeah, it's easy to think programmers are lazy or stupid. In reality maybe we know how to make perfect, beautiful code if we had the time. But we don't, because we've got a million things rotting in the backlog and no one notices or cares if you push out something that's not perfect. 
Sorry, the correct answer is MyProgrammingLab You answered: MyProgrammingLab 
Well this does count as fraud/theft so don't do it given your card and address is linked. Just pirate the PDF using a VPN, far safer. 
Never had problems with that. However, lately it only loads a fraction of the images I *know* certain searches should get, for whatever reason. The pictures also bundle up and overlap each other. Still, my favorite is when DeviantArt switched to having such scrolling... for the first month or so, it started automatically the moment you reached the bottom of the page. Also, several important functions were *at the bottom of said page*, and just kept being moved further and further down as you scrolled, desperately trying to reach them. One of them was the bug report button, which I guess might've contributed to the time it took for them to acknowledge and fix the issue. 
ah, but what if your albums contain more than a hundred tracks? didn't think that one through now did je? 
the hard part is accepting this and moving on to the next piece of genius crap-to-be. because you can get stuck refining until the end of time... and it's not worth it. 
It's basically a registry of young males in the United States in case the government needs to reinstate conscription quickly. Hopefully it never comes to that. 
McGraw Hill Connect and MyPearsonLab are my personal hell 
Reminds me of turnitin.com and how you used to be able to put your entire paper in white quotes and it wouldn't mark plagiarism because it thought it was a direct cited quote. 
MyEconlab is still the worst piece of software I've ever used. It makes MML look ok. 
As someone who writes flight critical software... I can attest - it's the best coding team I've _ever_ been on, with the smartest people I've _ever_ worked with. It's still a much lower bar than you would expect. 
I tried making a Skype account, but got interrupted halfway through. Tried going back and it wouldn't let me start over: the email is in use. Tried logging in and it wouldn't let me: no password. Tried resetting the password and it wouldn't let me: no account. Went to Google Hangouts and never looked back. 
Do you know of any good tutorials to make simple bots with? 
Exactly this, my comments are always more for myself than anyone else, sure other people can make sense of them, but id be lucky if i remember what something did 20 minutes after i wrote it half the time. 
WoW is hitting a similar brickwall these days, stuff like character customisation, animations and even the size of weapon texture maps are hitting a distinct cap that's ingrained into the root of the 14+ year old engine (Which iirc is in itself an extensive mod of the Warcraft 3 Engine!) and the grey hairs are starting to show. They've done some incredible stuff with the engine, make no mistake, but my weapons are looking oddly pixelated as the geometry gets more complex, most armour is just a 2D wraparound the character body and looks like shit on anything that isn't a male human, character customisation is extremely restrictive compared to literally every MMO in the market right now, etc. 
With near instant HDR these days, I wonder if Snapchat will ever implement that? 
iPhone 7 user here: Snapchat's I save are the resolution of my screen not my camera so it appears to be the same here 
There's also a good reason not to do this, namely that it has a significant probability of not working. 
If I recall, the original iTunes app was actually acquired by Apple from an independent developer. I'd wager that internally there is still some code that hails from before the app was even called iTunes, and that 17-odd years of new features has resulted in a legacy horror show pile of code that people tread lightly in and only touch the bits that they fully understand. 
Active X is something where half the time I don't know if it's malware or actually something i need 
I wasn't really looking for an excuse to uninstall the FB app, but I'm using this as a reason. I'll give you credit for any extra time I avoid wasting, so thanks! 
Best way around it: set an auto correction shortcut for @@ to enter example@example.com, where that placeholder address is obviously your own. That way you just hit @@ and it corrects it to your email address. You can do this on iOS, so I'd assume it works on Android too. 
My hate for MyMathLab and Mastering(blah) boiled over at that point tbh. 
A UI? In Pure C? What is this for, exactly, an OS? I'm intrigued. 
The product designer probably just wants to get the ball rolling. Non-devs know full well that if they ask for scope/estimate, the majority of the time the dev will just say, "I can't give you that off the top of my head." Product development is hard, and requires lots of different parties and disciplines. We should all try to do a better job of understanding each other and working together, rather than seeing each other as antagonists. 
Also physics doesn't change a couple times a year and people don't run face first into doors and complain about how using doorknobs is too hard and we should just install sliding doors like at a super market. If people designed houses like people designed software your house would be a 5 story Victorian with coal furnace and a hvac system built on a Sandy foundation 
I love how professionally unprofessional code is as a whole. There's some beautiful creativity in some peoples code which is a weird concept to think about while considering that code is just logic. Not specifically this comment more along just this whole chain of thought lol. 
So the literally coded as minions meme is true? Well then. 
I used to make my friends CD drives open up over AIM 
You just triggered me. My chemistry homework was online and your comment was a perfect example of what my nights consisted of. 
Yeah, what he said! That profession-related joke sure is topical! 
They are specifying some input fields with widths to be 0 pixels. Then they have code elsewhere that sets the same input fields to be the same width as the column when they could have just set it from the start. 
Yeah, it's like the site was designed by me when I was 14 and had just discovered the drop shadow functionality. Everything was shadowed. 
I have had professors assign book work. That's a much more preferable option. 
I didn't realize others hated MyEconLab as much as me! I am so glad to know I am not alone. 
CCP has been good about explaining that to players, at least. They've been hacking away at replacing the old code for quite some time. 
I merged my Skype (account from 2007) and MSN (account from 2001), that worked for 3 years. All was good. Then, out of the blue, in 2016, they made my MSN email (that no longer exists) my primary email. I tried to reclaim 3 times with a web form unsuccesfully (who are your friends, former passwords, etc. I filled it out perfectly) and now it's locked and they bluntly recommend I forget about the account and start a new one. No customer service exists where a human will read your ticket. I had contacts from 2001, man :( 
it really depends what language, but i did all mine in python. i couldnt find good tutorials for the current versions of the discord python api but i did find some decent documentation and pieced it together with the discord api example and the official example. PM me if you wanna talk about it. 
Normal HDR and Pixel's HDR+ are two very different things. 
I guess it uses the actual camera video feed and downsamples it to 1080p. I only say this because on my iPhone, Snapchat looks just fine in both video and photo mode. On my Android (which has a better camera), it looks terrible 100% of the time. 
This exactly, and also consider that it was originally written for Mac OS 9, a completely different operating system than OS X, running on a different CPU. Now it runs on Windows too, and I wouldn't be surprised if bits of it are on the iPhone as well. 
Google: "Fuck all three of those guys" Typed on a Lumia 950 running Windows 10 mobile. 
My company's payroll site is like this. Only time I ever use IE. 
Messenger is even worse. Using something like CyanogenMod, you'll quickly find out that every time your phone does *anything*, Messenger wants to know what's up. 
I just use a shitty password for those because if someone wants to go do my homework I'm not going to complain. 
Well not just that but the values they want are already made available right there at the start. Which means in addition to the rest of the fuckery, we're wasting cycles setting vars that aren't being used (unless they are referenced in the JS, but that would be even more idiotic because if you're going to hard code something, you may as well do it where you use the value...) 
There are? Could you suggest one for a friend? Right now I'm unsure what to Google for. 
Ours reached a happy compromise: MyMathLab was "for practice," but you got a completion grade meaning that as long as they were all done you got full credit and could try as many times as you wanted, but then they would assign book work that would be graded traditionally. That said, I still had to email my professor a couple of times to ask them why my answer wasn't being accepted. There was a time or two when she manually gave me credit because even she couldn't understand what I was putting in wrong. 
If, somehow, you still have the data from Skype on your computer, contacts are saved locally in a database. There's a pretty cool program you might want to look into called Skyperious that I believe will let you see contacts (that you could possibly re-add with a message saying your account got blocked and you're now using whatever the new account you're messaging them from is). I used to use Skyperious to look through old group messages and reminisce; I had a few friend groups in high school and in just a few years ended up with a 200 MB Skype database of memories. 
Discord is getting video calls as well as share screen later this year supposedly! 
That is exactly why it is so shitty to do it. The justification is usually that they don't want to risk anything going wrong if you use the wrong browser, but as long as they warn you, stopping you from accepting that risk is just stupid. 
After deleting the app, not just my battery life, but my actual life improved too. 
I, too, hoped that the homework fairy would magically do all my assignments when I was in school 
But for the love of science don't fucking touch it because that breaks the whole app somehow. Only the guy that originally coded it all 15 years ago knows how all this shit works and he hasn't worked here for 10 years now so just leave it alone. 
That would have been nice. In one of my classes we had something like that where if we were logged into the computer lab for a certain amount of hours we got half credit for just showing up. 
It still does that from time to time. I've had papers I know contain no plagiarism flag up as much as 20% because of a combination of conjoining words and unrecognised quotations 
talked to them at Pax South. Can confirm it is coming this year. 
After uninstalling the Facebook app from my phone, I wanted to kill myself a little less everyday. 
That's the difference. Maple is a successful software company. Pearson is a piece of shit publishing company who managed to take control over the textbook market and it's on its way on taking over the education market. They don't care about producing good software; they care about taking over standardized testing in all areas. 
Oh my god it's like seeing a unicorn. Love your work. 
You should have gotten a physical letter in the mail around the time you turned 18. 
The amount of money the US could save itself and you by just *automatically doing legally required shit* for you instead of making you do it yourself with prompting. Register for selective service? Bitch, if you can mail me, *you can register me* Same with taxes, but at least the private tax industry spends a shit ton lobbying the government to prevent doing it for you. Who the fuck is on the anti efficient selective service registry lobby? 
Very relatable. I'm not sure about you but I'm questioning everything about myself and my existence as it is now. In a two month time span I simply became a different person. How does that happen? 
A couple months ago, I asked my brother why he never sang along to our old favorite songs with me anymore. Turns out ten years ago, I jokingly told him that he sucked at singing, and he had never sang around people since. I've been fucked up over that for a while. 
Can confirm, boyfriend is a marine and his favorite crayon color to eat is yellow. Edit- I'm not even joking, I had to take yogurt based body wash from him because he thought it could double as a snack. 
It's crazy right? When things go bad, at first you're like "wow where'd that come from", but you trace it back and realize.... *Oh, it was me. It was always me every time.* Then it goes to "maybe i should see a therapist. I want to be *happy* but i don't think i can do it on my own anymore." But how do you even find one? You realize *wow, this seems like a lot of work. And i cant really afford this, right?* And give up. Maybe you'll try again later. You need more time to get around to it. Months go by and every once in a while you're like "yea, i should look at fixing myself again" but you just keep cycling. 
I logged out of Facebook in December. Other than my wife and brother, exactly two people have reached out to me since then. Social media can really distort perception of what "real" friends are, and how many of them you have. 
I hadn't thought of it like that before, and now I need a hug. :( 
On the other side of that one - a few more people have seen my uterus than have seen my vagina. If we count photographs, possibly *thousands* more. (I gave permission for some surgical photographs to be used in medical lectures, as my local hospital is a teaching hospital, and I believe they may have made it into a textbook.) 
Fucking tell me about it. The fact that I essentially have no power to help them if they aren't willing to accept it drives me nuts sometimes. 
Well at least you know mom was consistent with Dad's gifts... 
You need to go out and make better friends. I know I hate it when people say that like it's the easiest thing in the world, because it's not. It's really fucking hard as an adult to get out and find people that you really connect with and share interests with and want to spend time with whose lives aren't already full. The best advice I could give is to find some hobbies that really interest you, and dive headfirst into them, and then try to find groups of people who do that thing. 
So a man walks into a bar, and sits down. He starts a conversation with an old guy next to him. The old guy has obviously had a few. He says to the man: "You see that dock out there? Built it myself, hand crafted each piece, and it's the best dock in town! But do they call me "McGregor the dock builder"? No! And you see that bridge over there? I built that, took me two months, through rain, sleet and scoarching weather, but do they call me "McGregor the bridge builder"? No! And you see that pier over there, I built that, best pier in the county! But do they call me "McGregor the pier builder"? No!" The old guy looks around, and makes sure that nobody is listening, and leans to the man, and he says: "but you fuck one sheep..." 
It messed with me a little bit when I turned 26 and realized that I had been out of college for longer than i attended it. So many friendships, memories, experiences that shaped who I am took place in what's becoming a smaller and smaller interval of my life. I've had the same job since I graduated, one that I always thought of as temporary. I've been at the job 6 years now and I don't feel I've gained barely anything as a person from it as compared to the years at school. 
Or think instead - your mother replaced brutal memories with loving ones of her tucking you in each night? 
It is kinda like the saying "you don't realize you are in the good 'ol days until they are over" 
I had a similar experience just later in life... I was basically "adopted" at 15, by my best friends family.. everything was great, thought they had accepted me, I had totally accepted them as blood. One day my phone breaks, friends mom gives me her old one to turn on, (one of those Nokia bricks from the late 90s I think)... Well, she never erased her storage. So got a message from my friend on the new phone, and decided to scroll up for some reason.. Loads of texts between him and the fam talking about how I was worthless, and the best thing for them would be to get me out on my own so they wouldn't have to deal with it ( I was maybe 24, at this time, fresh college graduate waiting tables when I first got home)... Some shit just doesn't heal. :( 
But a few generations later someone doing genealogical research will discover you and get excited. And being probably the first in your family to have an online presence they will learn so much about you. And with everything they uncover they will get more exciting to them. In a hundred years you will be the most exciting person in your family for a few days 
You don't need to sell me on cats, I'm already a fan. 
Then you also start working for a company as an adult and see how everything operates and wonder if the rest of the companies in the world operate equally. Then you wonder how everything hasn't crashed and burned yet. Thankfully things just have to work most of the time :). 
It's all about perspective. If your scope is too big, you might end up feeling like a failure, but if you keep your perspective a little more realistic then you might find that you are doing great things. I'm going through the same thing, and it's a crappy realization when you start to understand what you truly are and aren't capable of. You don't have as much money as you thought you would, your athletic skills are dwindling, you've never even attempted to write that novel because there's not enough time in the day. Sometimes I'm not sure how I feel about it all, but I try to keep my perspective realistic so that it doesn't bog me down. I can do great things for my family or small community. 
Nothing wrong with that. Although, if you want to be a little more interesting, start going through random hobbies and find something you really love. 
Yup. This realisation hit me pretty damn hard a couple of years back. I try to look at it this way - I've proven to myself time and time again that I'm so much stronger than I thought I was. And I think mental illness has made me a more compassionate and understanding person. Therefore, on my good days, I get to spend time with people who know I truly care about them. And they love me for that. 
I had a very similar situation as a teen, where there was very clearly a predator who was trying to take advantage of me, and at the last minute something inside of me said "you should bail on this". I'm very glad we're both safe. 
We're all one good near-death experience away from realizing the time to truly change our lives is now. 
Knowing this can also be a big relief. Depends how you look at it. 
This was a big one for me, lots of false idols, very few real ones. 
Most people's compassion doesn't extend beyond how much attention it will get them. 
You're not paid for how hard you work, you're paid for how hard you are to replace. 
It's better to be from a broken home than to be in a broken home. My parents screamed at each other every single day. I never felt like they loved each other. I wished they got a divorce. I hear similar sentiments from others. If you're staying together for the kids, the kids know. You made the right choice and I'm proud of you. 
On the same line of thought: I've realized the immense isolation of the mind. How alone can one be inside its own head. Not only will you never truly understand anybody, but nobody will ever truly understand you. 
Kinda like mine, I was laying with my head on my wife's chest last night and could hear her heartbeat. It dawned on me that all it takes is that heart to stop beating and my whole world/life comes crashing down. Something so small could pretty much destroy me. I'd say that was pretty disturbing. 'Love' is great, but I guess kinda sucks too 
I struggle with this everyday. It's incredibly depressing. 
I'm 47. I decided some years ago that I am a "goal oriented person." So of I actually accomplish my goal, it ceases to be a goal and becomes an achievement. I am not an "achievement oriented person." Therefore doing things is simply against my nature. (Yeah. I know it's a load of crap. I'm not just lazy. I'm delusional and lazy.) 
one of my friends works at a vet's office. they have one of those naked cats as kind of like their unofficial mascot, and she just roams around doing naked cat things. but apparently what no one tells you about naked cats is that there's no fur to stop their buttholes from suction-cupping all the surfaces they sit on. so her office just makes their intern follow this cat around and clean up all its butt puckers off the glass. 
Yeah, you don't realize until like those last couple of history courses that people are either shitty, crazy, or both 
Not meaning to take a dark turn here, but when my cat died, it was incredibly sad, and also a relief. She was 20, and was still so cuddly towards the end. Seeing her in pain, not living her best life was incredibly hard to watch. When we made the call to the vet, it was heartbreaking. But, she ended up dying within an hour of the vet arriving. I like to think that she knew that we had made peace with her going, and sensed that it was time. I miss having cats, but I'm ready to go and get another one soon. There's a lot of love to give in the world. 
If you're perfectly average, you're halfway there. Try just a little harder, then you will be better than average. You raise the average when you do that, if only a tiny bit, and set the bar a little higher. *You* can do that. 
It is so easy to fall into this spiral if you have some level of social anxiety, or just anxiety in general. Unfortunately, it, uh, never really reflects that great on you. You just have to hope that you have a good rapport with whoever you're texting, so they can recognize what's happening and look past it. 
I try my best not to waste, and rarely do. The trick is to have leftovers Thursday. And Friday. And whenever they'll last. 
This was more comforting than disturbing for me. It means I'm not the only one that doesn't know what I'm doing. 
This hit me hard because I feel the exact same way. 
I'm 6'5" and was very over weight. It probably happened pretty early. 
Every generation thinks they discovered / invented sex and are weirded out when they realise they didn't and there really is nothing new under the sun. 
This is why you never, ever, ever tell someone they have a silly or dumb or embarrassing laugh. I can't imagine how shitty it would feel to be self-conscious about the noise you make when you are so overcome with joy, happiness, silliness and all the other good things in life. Edit- some of these comments hurt my heart. I wish I had not left this comment. 
As someone graduating high school this year with plans to go into the Navy, is there any chance you could elaborate on that? I don't want to regret whatever decision I come to. 
It's actually less the social media that bothers me and more the fact that no one will text me unless I text them first. I just want to be important enough to other people that they think of me even if I'm not going out of my way to remind them that I exist. 
A pirate walks into a bar. Bartender says, "you have a steering wheel coming out of your groin!" Pirate says, "yaarrrr it's drivin' me nuts." 
You a bigger person than most. I know people who wouldn't have anything to do with her because of what she did. You are a great person. 
Late August to December is always a mini baby boom. Guess what's nine months before. Christmas to Valentines Day. Source: L&D nurse 
This is exactly what it is. I'm sure he sweet talked her and said nothing would happen. And then the next year he said he'd try better, but they should still do it. The third time is when your mom stopped giving him this gift for his birthday. 
my hobbies include drawing, reading and long, silent walks. Basically activities that generally don't include others. Any suggestions? 
"Great thanks for sharing. I have lots of stuff better to do. Bye." 
I love this one because I can apparently do a nice wee Scottish accent. 
I don't think time gets faster because we've experienced more of it. I think it's because as adults, we do the same things over and over again. A month of going about my normal life goes by in a blur. But one week on vacation is packed with memories, because each day I did something different and new that I'd never done before. In college, each semester was distinct because you'd be taking all different classes. That's a lot of different novel memories packed into a short span of time. One year of working has a lot more sameness than that. My solution is hobbies. I've worked the same job for the last four years. In that time I've ranked up several times in krav maga, started leatherworking and gotten much better at it, and done a bunch of other things. I can look back at the past four years and instead of just seeing some small amount of career advancement, I can see other ways in which my life has improved and other new memories I've made. 
This is a somewhat contested idea. There's also the idea that new experiences are what slow your perception of time. When you're a kid, everything is new and there's a lot of learning going on, so time seems slower. Once you enter adulthood, buy a house, get a job, etc. your days start to bleed into one another, and your perception of time speeds up. I think it's probably a combination of the two things. 
I certainly hope so. The memories have caused her to have some PTSD and pretty severe emotional issues for her whole life. I hope that she was able to replace at least some of them. 
She's dealt with the abuse by basically burying it and trying to forget it. Her father still comes around for Thanksgiving, birthdays, Christmas, if we're having car trouble, etc. She still hugs him and talks friendly and loves him and urges me to do the same. I act friendly for her sake, but honestly I'd have no problem with going to prison for murdering him. I hate him. 
I'm fine now. I stopped sleeping on it and now just sleep on the couch when I'm home, lol. Thank you for the concern! :) 
It always amazes me reading on reddit how people will call someone worthless or whatever, and then you find out that person has a degree, is on the right path, not addicted to drugs, etc. What exactly do they expect? I am a mother of mid-twenties kids who smoke too much pot, take antianxiety meds but won't do counseling, have no education past high school, have zero hobbies (besides pot and reddit), are in debt and have absolutely no idea what to do with their lives. But I don't think they are worthless! They are living on their own and trying to make it their way (it's not what I wanted for them, but it's not my life). So it blows my mind that those people don't see that they should be proud of you. I am, and I'll never meet you. Let's give them the benefit of the doubt and hope that was a tough period of time for them and they no longer feel that way. Crap, Dude, it sucks though. Sorry you saw that. 
Write those stories down. Make copies. Let your children and their children add to those stories. I should take my own advice. It's not for them, it's for you. Well OK it's for them too. 
I feel like this common perception of teenage years as generally horrible hides a lot of real problems. No one takes an angsty teenager seriously. 
Yeah they did, my stepsisters too which I'm sad to admit upset me more than my real sister getting to go. Somehow they all became really close that summer and I never really found my way into their "group" so to speak. But I've since rekindled my friendship with my biological sister, and we're actually getting along better than ever now :) 
This is the truest comment ever. After a frustrating day at work, where people are behaving in strange ways and being generally quite negative, I have to just believe it'll all be fine. 
this is great advice. after being depressed about a lot of lofty, failed life goals, I've found a great deal of happiness in just being a good partner and dad, working my boring 9-5. 
but if this story is read by a ton of people and updooted by a bunch of people and actually believed by some people and becomes a guiding principle for just one person then that person will change themselves when they are young, while they still have time and the author will have still changed the world 
It's such a relief to find that there is someone else who admits they picked computer science for the money and job prospects and not because they are in love with it. This is what most Indian IT professional like myself resorted to. Been working for 5 years now and I still hate it because my coding ability is average, even bordering on incompetence. Every day at work, no matter how perfect the company I work for, is depressing. I don't want to scare you though. This is just how it turned out for me. Most people I know found a way to become indispensable at their software developer jobs through persistence and they probably even enjoy their work now. Plus there are so many fun ways to learn programming online now. The algorithmic concepts you learn in school combined with some project work pursued in your free time will really help you when you are in the job market. 
Flip side: things you don't want to remember will go that way too. That time you said something really awkward to that person and cringe really hard whenever you think about it? There will be a day when you think about it for the last time and never again. I wonder how many of these times you already forgot. 
I really love doing insane day hikes up mountains, unfortunately not too many people are into that 
The realisation that what i deal with isn't normal hit me pretty hard too. I have been so used to this that i never realised its not normal 
you'll be ok. i promise. i dealt with losing both of my parents in a four month time span when i was 24. pro tip: BE THERE. clear the air. tell them you love them. if they are sick, BE THERE at the dr, the hospital. pick up the phone. just be there. you'd be surprised how many people aren't. this will save you a lot of regret. i'm almost 30 and i can function normally about 85% of the time now. 
The other 25 episodes dealt with this concept as well 
Same. My poor sister was... "Okay didn't work. Try again?" 
I don't know if they're false idols, as much as unrealistic expectations for individuals. We desire such perfection from the people we admire, but that doesn't take into consideration that every person has flaws. I find I do better when I temper my expectations from people. Acknowledge the negatives, but admire the positives. Human beings are far more complex than black and white. 
This is why we need the Borg. This is why we should be assimilated. 
If you did walk a mile in their shoes; you'd be a mile away, and have their shoes! 
It's the price you pay for loving someone so much. My world would come to a crashing halt if something happened to my wife, and not a day has gone by that I don't think about that possibility (intrusive thoughts due to anxiety disorder). But that price is NOTHING compared to the joy and love she brings me (and that I bring her, as best I can tell) and one I gladly pay. 
I am a grizzled internet veteran of many years and many battles. But not even I was prepared for the term "butt puckers." 
There have been billions of good, decent people throughout history, but they either don't end up making a difference, or their contributions are overshadowed by the people you're referring to. 
I respect women so much that I stay completely away from them. 
"Remember that text I sent a month ago? Well I don't actually like you... I love you." *Three kids in one year* 
I just eat the same meal day-after-day until it's gone. Then I cook the next one. 
Truth right here. I was having some issues for a long time that I didn't even realize were issues. Went to see a psych, got support from a few close friends, and I'm steadily turning myself around. I've come to hate the saying "people never change". It's something said by people who refuse to put the effort in to change themselves. 
Another standard is that *everyone* should go to college, but that's just not true. You should know if your kid is built for collegiate life, or maybe allow them to pursue a trade instead. Or start building more apprenticeships in the workforce. There are so many other paths to life that don't just involve a Bachelor's degree, and I hope that our generation paves the road for our children with that attitude. 
I've lived places where a couple hundred dollars (less than what my smart phone costs) would change the lives of families around me. To them I'm probably seen as obscenely wealthy. 
I know I have a dark side, but I also feel the light side too. Both of them are pulling at me. I'm more Kylo Ren...I'm torn. 
My son used to dance with me along to cartoon and pop songs at home. After he started school, he didn't want to dance with me anymore. I asked why, and he said it was because his friends at school laughed at his "dumb dancing." Did all the right parenting things, tried to build up his confidence to ignore the taunts of others, but he never danced with me again. He's in his late 20's now, and still won't dance. But he does body-build, so he's got that going for him. 
It depends on the "why" you are going in. I joined the Navy shortly after graduating high school. I did it because I had little to no chance of college and not much opportunity otherwise. Plus, I did well on the ASVAB so they sold me on being a nuke. I don't think life "in" is really describable it is just such a huge departure from anything else you've likely experienced and it is hard to describe such a shift enough to convey how dramatic it is. It felt unfathomable to me even while I was in. Don't regret whatever decision you come to. Use it to make better decisions later, you won't be able to change the past. I always recommend doing anything else that you can get ahead with; like college, technical school, whatever else. Once you are in there's little you can do to turn back and if you do it can really hurt on the way out. I can go on about my experience if you are interested. But overall I think everyone joining is joining blind and that unfortunately cannot be helped. 
Another disturbing realization: the data that statistic is based on is the dead kids that have been found after abduction. If kids are abducted and held indefinitely without the abductor being caught, they don't influence the statistic. There could potentially be dozens, hundreds, or even thousands of kids in basements right now, never to be found. 
Take community art classes! Or when you've had your fill of silent walks, try walking in more populated places. And book clubs, or even maybe try striking up a conversation with the guy behind the counter at the book store. I've met some really neat people at local bookstores, and they usually have a ton of interesting things to say about different authors and whatnot. 
I find it funny that Americans think its the Scottish that are sheep shaggers when its the Welsh 
This is indeed correct. I'm pretty sure there has been some research done on this, but I won't be able to link it up now. But yes, after we do the same thing over and over it gets mundane and time starts to seem to pass quicker. 
It's a difficult thing to accept that the person who was supposed to love and protect you did not love you and harmed you. Some people just can't get there, especially if the abuse happened from a young age. Predators can be very manipulative, as you know. I'd hate seeing him too. 
I'm 43 years old but...could you retroactively be my mom? 
Appreciate it! I've had a really hard time loving / caring about anyone since then... my lady calls it "the broken bridge"... we used to joke about how I wasn't a fan of saying "Ily" to... well anyone. It took me years to genuinely commit inside to her (we've been together almost 9).... There are still days when I feel like packing my meager amount of shit in my 20 year old Celica and going where no one knows / will ever really know me. 
YES! Some stories were even told to me by others. Like: Grandpa looked out over his front yard. It looked like hell. Bald spots with no grass, only dirt. He commented something like "See my yard?" Buddy was like "Oh man it's terrible". Grandpa was like "Terrible? It's Awesome! It means all the kids love to play at my house!" He was so proud of his "crappy" lawn. 
I couldn't agree more. From my own personal experience: I worked my ass off and got very high on the totem pole making plenty of money. I saw it for what it was. Toxic environment with high stress affecting my relationships, etc. Luckily my wife finished her degree and moved us away. I was able to finally put things in perspective. Now I make about half the money (still plenty above the cost of living with excellent benefits), work only a few hours a day and have infinite flexibility. I can really enjoy life with my wife and soon to be child. I read 78 books last year. I remodeled a lot of the house. I also do a lot of gardening, and can't wait to share this love with my child. 
It's why I picked Engineering, though kind of wish I put more thought into it, because I don't really like it. 
Although negative events are more easily remembered then positive events, and will likely persist longer. 
It's something that's not talked about enough. What is 'normal' inside a mind? How do you know that your thoughts and emotions are any different from everyone else's? At what point do you stop and ask "Am I the only one that thinks/feels this way?" 
Same. Glad there's someone out there that understand. 
I was "oh shit the condom broke and we didn't realise " sex 
can confirm, it's very angry and very lonely source: had lots of divorce sex 
A word which here means a fictional event used to provide an example. 
Spot on. My husband/friend/partner died when the kids were 8 and 12. It took a long time to reclaim real joy, and it's still kind of "wow I wonder how he would feel?" 
"If you love her, eat out her ass." Zappy487, Reddit 2017. 
I can just imagine that popping suction sound every time it stands back up 
It is way way too young. Please take care of yourself. 
My father passed away from a sudden heart attack when I was 20. Unfortunately those feelings don't go away, they just become more manageable over time. My condolences to you and your family. Please keep an eye on your family, especially your mom. A sudden passing can throw a family into a spiral and in some cases one that is very difficult to fix. 
Another life experience: I had an ultra-rare form of cancer. Found it totally by accident and during treatment I felt like no one knew a plan for me. At one point I asked: "Hey doc, if I ask a question and you don't know, can you just tell me that and not try to wing it and make up some bullshit?" That doc looked like he won the lottery. He and I still talk and I credit him with saving my life a couple times over (I went septic 5 times after the initial surgery) -- I'm cancer free, but still I'll call and ask him a question on occasion. I think he enjoys the freedom, because the answer is almost always "I don't know, let me ask a few peers and call you back." -- I honestly love it and feel like I get better care by not expecting instant answers. 
You are. Hell, the fact that we're all on the internet, fucking around on Reddit right now is unimaginable to so many people. 
Will Marvel really wait 5 years for something? I feel like releasing films is crack for them, and they can't stop... 
So you're an emo force user. "It's not a phase, Dad!" "Ben, shut up and get in the Falcon, we're going to see your Uncle Luke about this." 
Yup. I remember being in 1st or 2nd grade and one of the boys said my idea was stupid. I'm 35 and I still don't seriously contribute while brainstorming because I'm so insecure about my stupid ideas. I understand that it was just some flippant thing an obnoxious little boy said to me once (because it turns out he and his brother were just plain douche bags K-12) but I still have a negling feeling that my ideas are stupid. 
My brother always used to "joke" with me when I was little. One time he convinced me that I was a moron and told me it was because I had the mental age of a 12 year old when I was like 8. I knew he was still calling me stupid by the way he was talking, but somehow he convinced me. Since I was so young I didn't really understand what he was talking about and thought I was stupid for years. A moron still has the definition of someone with poor mental capacity... honestly I think it fucked up my self image because I still have a hard time believing I'm smart even though I know I am all because I trusted my big brother. 
Don't forget the millions earned from beet farming and your real estate holdings. 
Exactly this. This man is called The Missing Stair. I'm stupid and cannot link on mobile atm, but a missing stair is a dangerous person who everyone knows to look out for (a missing stair in a familiar staircase) except the new person. Predators are rewarded by other people's non-confrontational politeness. Many times when a child is harmed and mentions something, everyone goes a bit quiet because they know full well who did it, and that they put the child in a position where the missing stair had access to them. I know I'd rather piss off a monster than offer up new sacrifices with a polite smile on. 
you drive a Celica and those people thought you were worthless? fuck em 
This is such a great story that now I miss your Grandpa too. 
While this is a great success story, I think it's important to note that your former status on the totem pole, and all the experiences that came with it, contributed to your situation now. The average person is not able to toss aside these things and still make well above the cost of living with great benefits at only a few hours a day. I work full time and don't have enough to actually pay for an apartment by myself, and I have two degrees. Just important to put it in perspective. 
I can identify with this. My wife passed away about 2 months ago. Our girls are 10 and 3. I'm still thinking this multiple times a day. The realization that I will never, ever see her again still keeps me up at night. 
"Give him head every morning for choosing you." Oprah Winfrey 
"INTERN!!! ... the naked cat is stuck again. Get the spatula." 
Me too man... Celebrate that success. Source: Failed uni, suicidal, lived with parents ten years ago. Now I'm a career IT tech, apartment, car, wife. 
Star Wars is going to get the same treatment; every year for the rest of our lives there will be a new movie until it stops being profitable. 
Brainstorming isn't the best way to come up with ideas as someones idea can influence the thought process of a group. Prime example at Christmas the family was playing a game where you are given a word and you have to name the 10 things on the card, so the women were given *Sticky* (lol) and begun by saying Toffee and from that point all they named was sweets. At the end i pointed out that they missed *Glue* A good way to get ideas from a group is for each individual to sit and write down their ideas by themselves and then come together as a group to discuss them. 
Exchange it all to Schrute bucks, its a superior currency 
You should confront him about this in an interrogating manner 
Montana checking in; there's nothing to see here, just move along to Portland everybody. 
"Too Real Man! We need your help! There's a woman on the edge of the building about to kill herself!" "There is nothing I can do about it. That woman has no sense of purpose and recently had her heart broken by her best friend. She is thousands of dollars in debt and stuck working a 40 hour job that's sucking the life out of her. She has no one to talk to and lives alone in a deadbeat apartment. No matter what I say chances are she prefers not being alive to coping with existential pain. Even if she doesn't kill herself now it's likely she'll try again another day." 
Damn dude. I really hope you find peace my friend, sending out whatever kind of positivity I can your way. 
Star Wars and Marvel forever and ever, 100 years of Star Wars and Marvel. 
1. Botox to remove wrinkles. 2. tattoo faces with gangster ass mean faces on them 3. regrow hair on bottom so faces have beards. 
Then enjoy the awkward moment she stares at you and says... "Well what are you waiting for?" 
Truth, I lost about 60 pounds and My girlfriend one day was all " Woah did it get bigger" I looked down and was scared myself, Easily can make it look up to a whole inch bigger depending on how fat you were before. Also a huge confident boost both losing weight and feeling manlier. 
ya but sometimes you don't have either one T_T. worst timing ever is when you are hiking or rock climbing. "I done fuck up " right when I get a whiff of that smell. 
Currently working on getting it back. You are so right. 
i always thought my ass is to hairy for a chick to be into it 
And people, for the love of fuck, if you like what someone is doing, tell them! A simple, "That feels so good" or "Please keep biting my feet" goes a long way. 
I dont have a car to wash, but I can cook quite a few different meals, made Pizza last night. 
I bought a single 30 dollar pair of Calvin Klein boxer briefs once. Bought 7 more. No regrets whatsoever. 
I think this is because your deodorant can actually **get on your armpit skin** instead of just getting stuck all up in the hair **just to clarify for people asking - yes deodorant is supposed to go on your armpit skin??? Not the hair. Getting it all up on the hair is the problem. 
And save the bag. After a few months you can knit yourself a nice warm hat! 
A tree in the forest is just another tree. A tree in the desert you stop and stare at. 
It used to make me really itchy. And I used to be really paranoid about cutting myself (because I'm a hopeless clutz). I usually just use a bidet now. 
Rub one out before every major decision... It'll clear your brain 
Boxer briefs are starting to be the underwear of choice, if the responses to similar comments can be believed. Boxers bunch up, briefs are for children. Boxer briefs are great though. Tight in all the right places, comfortable but gives your boys a home. Some people like commando but my boys need a house. 
You freaks talked about masturbation with your older brothers? Cant relate 
Porn is to sex, what WWE is to hand-to-hand combat... its exciting and satisfying to watch, but it doesnt work like that in the real world. 
I beg to differ lol. Or my ex didn't get that memo.. 
Or you'll have an embolism and your head will explode. Can you picture the girl's therapy sessions after that? 
Am I the only one who looked up a diagram at the age of 15? As a geek, I've always studied for every test. 
I honestly do this a lot more than I ought* to. It makes me feel young. 
I fucking love extra strength. *RIDE THE WHITE LIGHTNING BABY* 
ive only managed to get it once (with a lucozade bottle i might add) but holy fucking shit. i let out my first ever sexual moan that day and to this day - only one 
This is why I wank in the morning, no more bad decisions during the day :P 
That would get expensive 6 times a day I'd imagine. 
This is true. I've been married to my homosexual life mate for 25 years now but I said no homo, at the altar, so I'm not even gay. 
Hey Jim, why is your dick sticking out the top of your pants? I know this meeting has gone a little long, but please relax. 
Got to the point where it's hard to sleep easy without doing that first 
Protip: Shank. Take a shit and a wank at the same time, to be more time efficient. 
I always use an after shave lotion with little or no alcohol, because alcohol dries your face out, and makes you look older. 
Dude, if you come across it you should at least wipe it down 
You're rock climbing or hiking. You are allowed to smell like wilderness if you're in the wilderness. 
There's a problem I have, oftentimes, when I say "oh my god don't stop just like that" the guy gets excited *and starts doing something else*. God Dammit. 
No, you just needed to scream the lords name before scratching, you know, just to increase your chances 
They feel amazing, and girls always like them. Some girls dislike boxers. Some girls dislike briefs. No girls dislike boxer briefs. 
I find it irritating when it grows back, I don't shave them enough. 
You can also rub the freshly-trimmed nails on denim jeans too. 
I straddle the toilet backwards. That way you have less chance of free hairs making a mess. Plus you have a little table for your clippers, chocolate milk, and comic books. 
I want a bidet real bad. Wife says absolutely not. I trim with an electric razor and a guard. 
Had a buddy back whose mom came in one day and threw him a box of tissue and said she was tired of washing socks. 
That's what they meant when they said that.... oh boy. 
When i first started whackin it, i dropped the tissues down the side of my bed closest to the wall, because obviously that's a portal into a black hole and they didn't just pile up under my bed 
What if I just look at pictures of her on the internet and jerk off? Everyone wins. 
Funny, this is the only way I can literally orgasm within a small amount of time, otherwise I have to be really really into it or it's going to be a long session. 
Seriously. This has been commented her several times and all I can think is who in their right mind doesn't clean their asshole... 
Plus then you got a girl going around telling everyone how she made you come so hard you had a stroke and had to go through 8 months of physical therapy to learn to speak again. Nah bitch, that was all me. 
He's also wrong. There's a reason people self-asphyxiate during a wank. DEPRIVING your brain of oxygen it what makes it stronger. 
Everybody thought I was weird for knowing the answers in health class. I only knew them because I paid attention the last year when i could not stop taking notes. 
The week after I got married a Hooters waitress slipped me her phone number. Fucking hell. 
3 to 6 days. Be careful with products like Nair though. It's chemicals that are disintegrating the hair. Test it out on an inconspicuous spot first to see if your skin reacts. 
If you use the "Intimate" version, it shouldn't do that. Works just fine for me. 
It works similarly to hitting a lady's g-spot -- it's 'up' or to the front, accessed by a sort of 'come hither' motion of the fingers. You'll be able to feel it -- less squishy than everywhere else and just ask your dude if that's the right spot. 
6 times a day? You gotta bump those numbers up. Those are rookie numbers. 
Heterosexual life ate, unless he forgets to say no homo. Both have to say it for it to be true. In which case totes makes you gay. 
my friend did the waistband trick in high school for a presentation the head of his dick was visible 
Damn I still have those stand ups saved to watch them from time to time, He really knew how to deliver a joke 
I appreciate what you're saying, until you've slammed two bony pelvises together, you don't really understand. 
See, I always thought I liked ass cause it was the gateway to the pussy.But, For men, the ass is like the gateway to the gooch; there must be something else to it. 
I can't stand the feeling of rubbing freshly cut fingernails on anything. It's one of the worst feelings in my mind. 
That's a win-win for me as I like to prowl around the floor like a cat when tying to seduce women 
*Shit it away, shit it away, shit it away now* *Shit it away, shit it away, shit it away now* Yeah, this is stuck in my head now. Fuck you. 
but... what... how... who logically thinks that a sock is the best place 
I put one in there and even told him during our little birds and bees spiel. But...he's not the brightest of my offspring. I never understood the sock, but to each his own. 
I have also never understood this whole sock thing, if a sock is old and not wearable anymore then I throw it out, I don't keep it to jizz in, that sounds disgusting. 
Well... teenage boys also have a particular funk which is a mixture of body odour and foot stink, and they tend to think that Axe is as good as a shower which just adds to the mix, so all of that plus, yeah. 
nah, she's not necessarily annoyed. everyone is different, but for me, while sometimes I want to keep going and going, other times after just one, I'm all happy and cuddly and sleepy. 
What is it about tensing up? I've noticed this too; you tense up and suddenly you're 5x closer to the edge. 
A close friend of mine doesn't. We were on holiday as a group of lads and we were talking about receving rimjobs and he said he'd never let his gf go near his ass. We asked him why doesn't he wash his ass and he looked so surprised that everyone else seemed to have basic hygeine. 
I just don't get how you didn't see that's where poop comes out of, and that it needed to be cleaned regardless of not being taught. 
Stephen Hawking's wife has been dining out on that shit for *years*. 
Hahahaha look at this fuckin weirdo knowing his way around a woman, amirite fellas? 
Some girls like to "best other girls "though. So if you get a number while you've been out with the waif she might just want to get in on that to prove to herself and possibly her friends that she's super hot and has got enough sass to take another woman's man. 
And sometimes the bubble gets stuck there for a second 
I'm going to light some scented candles and try this tonight. Thanks! 
I, myself, whack it at least 6 times an hour. Keeps the rhythm below the belt 
He's gay but I'm straight cause he forgot to say no homo. I still make fun of him to this day for having sex with a guy all these years. 
It's like the boobs of the back. Nice to look at and nice to grab. 
If he fucked the absolute shit out of the toilet there wouldn't be any clogging problem 
In high school a friend of mine came over and stayed the night. He slept on my floor. We were stoners so we slept in pretty late. I woke up and picked up the shirt off the floor I had worn the day earlier just to wear out of the room and into the shower. I picked it up and there's a big ole **fresh** jizz loogie on my black shirt. I looked at him and was like "dude, did you nut on my shirt!" He had the audacity to look me right in the eye and say "no" so convincingly that to this day I wonder if he was telling the truth. 
It's because it's a tube they can place their John Thomas in. It's partially to simulate climaxing into an orifice, partially to catch their seed omni-directionally, and partially to hide their shame from the sight of god. 
And to be fair, teenagers probably need to shower more than average to eliminate odor. 
It's because tensing your inner thigh muscles puts pressure on the taint area and forces more blood to the penis. 
I can picture the look on his face, my university roommate was the same. Instead of discussing rimjobs he was complaining about an itchy asshole though. 
That's right. My dad didn't teach me how to wash anything but I somehow knew to wash the hole where solid waste comes out of. 
So THAT'S why he has that shit-eating grin on his face 
Gotta love reddit, one moment you're looking at cute animal gifs, another you're learning how to save yourself from an embolism caused by holding your breath while orgasming 
"I don't wanna live here. The bathroom's covered in cum!" 
What a raging homosexual. Luckily my husband has a very feminine penis so I didn't even have to say no homo. 
"...and that's the story of how I met your mother!" 
also activates muscles of the inner core - hello prostate. 
I made the mistake of watching that gif. I didn't eat eggs for months & still occasionally gag while scrambling them. Ohgodohgod*horf* 
Lol you have never met a dry jerker, eh? They walk among us, tugging and tugging with blankets, t shirts, socks, and anything else that is soft. Ever watching. Every waiting. Sneaking twice the fabric softener into their loads of laundry. And totally oblivious as to why in the world people talk about lotion and kleenex like they go together. 
......link.....? I've seen some terrible shit on Reddit, and have pretty much just become immune to nasty stuff. Could this be the one thing that fucks me up for life? 
I dry tug but i dont wrap a sock i am a man i use callous and sadness like the rest of the normies 
And back in the day if you got caught cheating in a Vegas casino they'd take you out back and break your hands. Now you're asked to leave, arrested if you refuse 
Nothing is worse than getting a "helllllooooo?" text 30 mins after the the original text. Dude I can be eating at a restaurant and then heading to the movies....being unreachable for hours is normal. 
Got to do this again my first couple years of college with people in the same dorm. Was awesome 
Like every 80s and 90s movie. Laying on your front reading a magazine. 
Just turn your phone on silent all the time and train everyone you know to realize this fact. I do it and it's wonderful. I get to engage just as much as I want to. 
I used to do this, too. We called it manhunt. Why can't this be done anymore? 
At some Amtrak stations they actually play the sound so people know the board is changing. 
I gave my dad a 1950s rotary telephone I found at a flea market for his 59th birthday last year. He made a minor fix to the wire and made it his main landline telephone. He and my mom (who is turning 65 next week) absolutely adore it and I have to say, I too enjoy the feeling of hanging up on it. There's really good finality to the conversation when you hang up on one of those phones. 
Yeah. I just read the local letters to the ed. about Trump's latest shennanagans. Half of them read like they were written by fifth grade dropouts. But we got to hear from the "real people," right? 
I have a stack of photos in a box in my closet and one of them is of two pairs of mystery tits. I don't recognize them by tits alone and the ladies didn't include their faces in the picture. It's one of the great unsolved mysteries of my life. 
I so miss blockbuster! That stupid red box is nowhere near as fun. 
As someone who works in a book store (that also sells CDs), we aren't dead yet! Find a local store and browse and hang out! Keep us alive! 
Still have all important numbers memorized. Home, cell, parents, Mrs, kid phone, emergency contacts, work and kid school. I also memorized all my vehicles plates, registration numbers, drivers license and main bank card. That shit gets important. 
I'm planning on doing this for Breath of the Wild. I've been avoiding everything about that game because I can't find a Switch yet. 
In the same vein as that, making some bs up and getting someone to believe it. Can't really do that anymore with Google 
For me. The hardest part wasn't the wrapper, but that slender sticker that went across the top to seal it. 
I have a knife, but I can't wear it every day because if I was caught with it at school I'd probably get suspended. 
I have two books sitting on my nightstand that I bought and have been slowly reading. I used to be able to sit down and read a book without putting it down, until it was finished. Now I get through a couple chapters and all the sudden my phone is my hand. I'm mildly disturbed by this. 
That's still one advantage in living in the country. You hear and see nothing but nature and stars. 
Sir, I feel offended by that comment. Meet me in the yard behind the churche at 17:00 precise tomorow. 
Right? I remember reading those stories on the man who's body rejected the injection like 5 times or something.. A guillotine would have done the job in 1 shot. 
It's funny that the people replying to you are so used to their multiple menus and updates that they don't even notice them. 
And now with 4k TVs, you'd think it'd be more common. 
You didn't know some of my friends. We even had a formula for how late one of our buddies would be late. Every time, Reid. 
I mean, I'm pretty sure dogfighting is still taught to fighter pilots. Vietnam taught us some lessons on relying too much on missiles. 
I have two trucks and both have manual windows. It's fine as long as you only want the drivers side down... 
Fireworks displays should be in this catagory. Why people would prefer to watch it on a 8" screen and post it to social media so they will never watch it again is beyond me. 
There's a subreddit for finding products that last a lifetime. Don't remember the name though. 
Honestly, I'm glad this one is going away. Begging a dude who's much stronger than you not to push/throw you in because you're on your period was the awkwardest thing ever and I don't miss it. 
My mother does this all the time and I can't stand it. She does it when she knows I'm not using my phone, like when I'm at school. 
I fucking hate people using their phones while we're watching a movie together. It's rude and distracting. 
Your lack of planning does not constitute my next emergency. That is what my professor said to me. 
*knockknockknock* "We're drinking, get your stuff" 
My daughter and the girl across the street have that (they're 6). Her mom and I agreed that we would not set up playdates, and we won't talk by mobile. If the girls want to play, they have to seek each other out. It is their relationship, not the mother's and mine. 
Lmao that's my favorite episode of Drake and Josh 
Yeah, and finding the small articles amongst the ads is like winning the lottery! 
That's what I said in another part. I will talk to you less if you expect me literally at your beck and call. People texting several times and calling several times in 10 minutes is such a turn off as a friend. It's one thing if it's an emergency, but if not, I will respond in my own time. 
I mean, with some time and money you can duplicate those machines with raspberry pis. 
I mean shit. I played manhunt in highschool and that was only a few years ago... it really depends on the place, not really technology. 
I get that same excitement by waiting for hours at a time for anyone to text me back 
I was at one and hearing that clicky noise immediately took me back to when I was 8 and my mom put me on a train to see my dad and I would stare at that sign out of fear and listen to it and watch it click. 
Maybe it seems cooler because you don't see it as often anymore. I bet someone from the 1950s would think the electronic stuff looked more impressive. Kind of like how it always seems neater to see a chipmunk than a squirrel because I see 50 squirrels a day, but maybe one chipmunk a month. 
I was one of the kids who did this. The point was to HAVE porn, but not risk getting caught with it in your bedroom. When needed you could always rip out a page to take with you, or at least take a good mental picture. 
Around a bridge. Neat to the train tracks. Innawoods. Good times 
Was "Dirt Backroad" also the name of the magazine by any chance? 
Romping with my school chums in the fens and spinneys, when the twilight bathed the hedgerows like a lambent flame. 
What's actually worse: You have already software to forge voice&video quite convincingly = create your own presidential history and spread it on the net. And it's only gonna get better /worse to tell. Verification of what's real is going to be the hard challenge in the future. 
I have a phone hanging on my kitchen wall. Pick it up and slam it every time it rings. Only telemarketers call that phone. 
Don't worry the boxcar children will solve the mystery. 
When my dad died my mom had me open a lock box and guess what old dad was getting some side action for years. Also, nude beaches in California in the 1970s. 
You've described the real world equivalent of PM_ME_YOUR accounts. 
Yep, it is well known among my set of friends that if you leave your phone unattended it will mysteriously have a dozen pictures of my ugly face when you pick it up. 
The one number I call often enough to memorise is my local pizza place. I guess I dont want to save it on my phone because I'm in denial about how sad my diet is. 
Yeah but they're often a collection of words, not just a random assortment of letters. Phone numbers might be similar with area codes but after that it's just random numbers as far as you're concerned. 
I approached it the same way. You have a wonderful experience ahead of you... It really feels like picking up the original Zelda but with the polish of thirty years behind its game design. 
A lot of people are too lazy to verify your claims. I've already convinced a half dozen people that the plural of "volcano" is "volcani". It'll catch on eventually. 
As a lifelong urbanite that still kind of fucks me up. No traffic noise? No sirens? No trains? No drunken arguments? Nothing that sounds suspiciously like a not-distant-enough gunshot? Instead I get all these noises I can't readily identify. That rustle in the leaves could be a raccoon or a skunk. And before anyone asks, I'm not afraid of raccoons. I love camping, and I used to visit my grandfather's farm all the time, but I'm still most at home in the city. 
War isn't a game. Some tiny pacific island nation sends a person to conquer all of america and americans are like "Oh our sword champion lost. Guess we're part of Fiji now!" 
There's a lot of problems dosing that formula right, and the problem is that, in the US, they're running out of supply like mad (that shit has an expiration date, also, but that's another story), and European companies are refusing to sell some ingredients for the stuff to the US anymore because they disapprove of the whole lethal injection thing. What this means, considering the number of people who are on death row in the US, is that there was a timeframe where they were trying to be real skimpy on the dosage, which caused things like the event you described to happen. Also, the guillotine is deemed inhumane for the same reasons you seem to have concerns about lethal injection; people weren't properly dead for a little bit after they'd been executed. Plus, there's the issue of mutilating the body in a very particular manner there... 
I'd go for electrocution. Give me 5 gallons of unpopped popcorn kernels as my last meal and let's do this shit! 
Consoles really struggle to do 4k. If is 4 "scenes" even tougher. 
You should really play the PC game Screencheat. It's a split screen FPS where all players are invisible and you need to screencheat to even find them 
Used to regularly go to a pub quiz that had a similar setup to *Family Fortunes*; that was pretty much unsmartphoneable. 
Yeah, the one I used to go to would automatically disqualify a team if they were caught with a phone 
As somebody who plays a bunch of bar trivia, thank you. 
Kind of. Bar trivia is kind of a catch all for questions that have no real bearing other than to maybe see who knows the answer or who can bullshit the best answer. There's actual trivia games that the bar writes and holds, and then there's the random question your mate brings up about which actresses has the most nude scenes (pornstars excluded). 
We had the same thing. "Well I said 7:00 but that's closer to 8:30 in Danny time." 
My parents were pretty punctual people, but my Dad is one of those people who live by the saying "If you're early you're on time, if you're on time you're late, and if you're late your fired." So now I am chronically early to everything. I went and joined the army and it was just reinforced more. Now that I am married it takes every ounce of self control not to freak out when my wife is getting ready, or waiting to get ready. She doesn't make us late we are always on time, but my own ingrained habits makes it feel like we are going to be late. 
I think Vietnam had one of the last great dogfights, and we still have amazing guns on fighters. But the range modern missiles have are insane. 
as a guy who has to lean over and stab myself with the handbrake every time to grunt roll the passenger window, this feature is worth its weight in gold 
And good riddance. I don't want to go through 5 tomes of encyclopedia, only to find out that my current edition is no longer accurate, or doesn't include whatever I was looking for. In this case, it replaced something, but mostly for the better. 
Last time I went to a concert the woman behind me used my shoulder to balance her camera on. It didn't last long though because I kept moving. 
As a kid I never understood why my sister's wouldn't swim with us whenever we went on vacation. As an adult I feel bad for then cuz I'm pretty sure every vacation we took my step sister was on her period. 
Speak for yourself. I have several asshole neighbours who could benefit from a large chunk of rock smashing through their roof and ceiling. 
Going through this right now. My mom forgot her phone at my house and now her husband is blowing up my phone. They know I'm in class. Instead, I'm on Reddit and not getting back to them on principle. She can easily go back to my place to get it. 
Procrastination on your part, does not constitute an emergency on mine. That's how I've heard it. 
*knockknockknock* "Get up, loser. We're going shopping." 
In fact, let me know when you won't be home... so I know when to not show up. 
It's not just the sheer number of ads but how beholden to the advertisers the magazine can become. I worked for a magazine company and we had one advertiser lose their shit over a 'ask a veterinarian' column. The vet (not a company employee) had the nerve to recommend a competing product instead of the advertiser. 'I use X brand at my practice and it works well.' The associate editor lost their job when the advertiser threatened to pull their ads. 
Played manhunt in highschool (6 or so years ago) too. Police got called. One kid was detained for resembling a known kiddy diddler that had a warrant out or something. Kinda killed the fun after that. 
Same. My mom told me I was going to see my real dad and put me on a train to Wichita. Turns out it was military school. Fond memories. 
When plastic was first introduced, plastic items were seen as really exciting classy novel things. Now that everything is mass produced from plastic, objects made from metal or wood are seen as higher quality. 
We accidentally lit our woods-porn on fire. RIP 80s playboy. 
And every boy who's lived near there since curses your name, you're infamous back in the hood. 
Might be a good thing. This behavior is something most people can relate to. It will make these people in office humbled and appear more human. 
Memories of my mom sitting on the kitchen floor talking on the corded kitchen phone hanging on the wall....when Family called from overseas. I Knew once she sat down....I was safe for a good 30 minutes to go sneak to the TV and watch the cable movie channels. 
A few years ago (years after both my parents died) I found out i had a half brother born in 1953. We found each other through 23andme. 
i just get that reddit silver picture and people saying cryptocurrency i thought i would get enough bitcoin to get my wife gifts. turns out im a moron. 
Yeah, like 4 years ago, my classmate gave a presentation on how we shouldn't let kids buy pop rocks because she said it could be fatal. 
I'm dying laughing thinking some kid was reading Gambits cajun dialogue in a whole new light... 
Plenty of not-distant-enough gunshots in the country too. I'm surprised I haven't found a bullet hole in the side of my house yet. 
It would only work if there was a 3rd party that was stronger than the other 2 combined to enforce it. 
Not to mention that lethal injection has strong opposition from the medical community, the AMA for example requires their member physicians to not take part. So it's kind of hard to get a physician to regularly oversee the injections and so it get frequently botched. 
Jesus Christ, that's some horror movie shit right there. 
Well Zelda is a different type of game anyway. Mario Kart still allows split screen. I think it just depends on the game. For some it doesn't really make sense to have multiple players. 
The pub in my area didnt have cell service and wifi was for employees so there was no cheating with google searches at pub trivia. 
If you REALLY miss it, just commit a felony and get sent to prison. Prison Inmates will argue for HOURS about random facts, and they have no way to know the answer. It would get so annoying, since you know on "the outside" that 45 minute debate about "the 1998 Super Bowl MVP" would have been over in 30 seconds with Google. Sadly, you can only use BING in prison. 
Stu? +4 hours. Then he'd get there and whine that all the weed was smoked. 
My partner trusts me to modify any time that I give him according to my own formula, because he has no sense of time, and I have a far better idea how late he'll be to a particular thing than he does. The corollary to that is he is not allowed to complain if he actually turns up at the time I said and it's obscenely early, because he's fully aware I'm doing this, and why. 
Oh yeah, but I should point out most of the "hit a button from 40 miles away" kills are on vastly inferior aircraft. If an F-22 came up against something comparable, I bet the two would get pretty close. 
Man an AMA from one of the pilots would be cool. Be interesting to have them compare realistic dogfight with modern aircraft to how they are portrayed in movies and whatnot 
I thought you were going to launch the neighbours... 
"We're going to Foodland, you in?" "It's 3 AM" "And?" "I'll get my jacket" 
I worked for a magazine where an advertiser asked them to remove any mention of cancer from the magazine's *cover*. The ad was for cigarettes. So glad I don't still work there. 
You must have given the army guy picking you up the most awkward hug ever. 
Same with aluminum. The most valuable things used to be made of aluminum. 
The scandal will be : "Senator Herzel had never sent a pelfie in her life! How can she relate to the average American?" Then they'll manufacture a leak from 15 years ago. Which will come out as fake during a debate. Seriously. That's gonna be awesome. 
Like you don't carry that picture everywhere with you. 
23andme pairs people up? That's crazy, and amazing. 
I repeatedly get the first google image when you search "korean food". I thought I would get a nicer mix but I'm also not getting as much ass as I expected 
After last night maybe he wants to call his mom and set up another appointment 
You could also have good enough friends that they don't do that to you 
Considering all the other comments in this thread, I guess *Guillotine 2017 X-Treme 4K+* should have a camera to take your last selfie and share it on social media with a caption saying *you fucked up*. Should also post a story to Instagram doing a Boomerang video of your head falling and returning to your body, looped many times with added filters. Talking about filters, some cool models would have the option to add a *insert-animal-or-fictional-character here* head to your headless corpse and have everyone laughing at your now hybrid humanoid remains. And don't get me started with the promo video...it will be a plain happy animation of Bob, the clueless criminal, minding his own stuff with a background voice saying *This is Bob, a common criminal...*, where then he fucks up and ends up in death row, everything with a fucking ukulele song. 
Pub quizzes I went to had a rule where if you were caught cheating, the quiz master gets to decide what your punishment is. You begin to rethink your choices after doing a pub quiz in your boxers. 
Wait, they are/were the same company? I never made that connection. This is mind blowing stuff. 
With Eric we just had to multiply whatever he said by at least 2 depending on the weather and the time of day 
I work with a former F-16 pilot and he recalls training with F-18s. Most exercises would end with him being told he died and go back to base. Like Dark Souls but the enemy was 15 miles away. 
Didn't Napoleon have an entire cutlery set made of aluminium to show off his wealth, since it was rarer/more expensive than gold? 
Reminds me of learning that most modern cars play a recording of a mechanical flash unit when you use the indicator because they now use hardware that's silent to generate the flashing. 
~gets to second base~ Wait, I think I've seen your tits before! ~pulls out pictures from wallet~ Is this you? 
It's not kid's _friends_ that pick on them on social media. 
Just like when I beated your pug square with it for trespassing in my interior court. Now, go do whatever serfs do, will you? 
You noob - you put it on the ammo box, then pick it up, thus making the mine disappear. The game still registers it as there though and will blow up a very unsuspecting victim. 
No, one of the weapons is a hobby horse and you can beat people to death with it. 
Also since OP has a house it's likely he/she is an adult, and if one of my parents got married when I was an adult I would never consider him/her a "parent". Like, regardless of teen angst or whatever if that happens long after I've been raised, that person isn't a parent to me. They're family, but no way I'm gonna call a guy Dad if he marries my mom while I'm in my twenties, no matter how much I like him. 
And they put aluminum at the top of the Washington Monument. 
There's a word for cases like these, where tech will imitate sounds of older tech for the sake of people being used to it, like smartphone cameras having a shutter click. Anybody know it? 
The most believable part is Nestle selling you the air. Nestle are some fucking movie super villain kinda fuckers. 
Or mine all of the spawn points. A buddy of mine had an exchange student from Brazil staying with him. His first match (or hazing) against me was temple/prox mines. After mining all the spawns I kill him and put my controller down. English not being his first language he looks at me and says "I'm born and I die". 20 years later this phrase still makes my friends laugh. 
A hobby horse is a toy horse head with a stick for a body you're suppose to pretend to ride. 
Please son? It'll mean the world to me and your mother. 
I don't know if there's a particular word for sounds but maybe Skeuomorph is the word you're looking for? 
I did that for a while because of your point... but it was really annoying. All the calls were telemarketers. I originally would block the calls from the numbers, but they would call from new numbers eventually. So I would mute the ringer.... then i just cancelled it. I worked night shifts at the time and they would call all day. Very annoying. 
I work for a fortune 500 oil company. We are incapable of reading contracts from what I've seen, even the ones we've write. 
Out of all of the comments I've read, this one is my favorite. The sheer stupidity you would need to have to not only bring drugs into a courthouse, but also hand the jacket with the drugs over to the judge...he should be studied. 
Some douche in my law school class warned me that his debating skills had been honed in "the most unforgiving of Internet forums." He meant it unironically. 
The perfect crime...and she would have gotten away with it too if it wasn't for that meddling old woman! 
If this were a judge TV show case, the judge would have to dick around a bit to fill the time slot. 
Like, threw the bottle as they flew through the air, action hero style? Was there a manly/womanly battle cry? Inquiring minds etc. 
I would seriously like to think for all you actual lawyers, that moments like these make the law school worth it 
I bet most prosecutors are amused when a defendant makes clearly incriminating statements during arraignment. 
She should have argued the Prius lacks enough power to speed, even if one wanted to. 
Yikes. Sorry you went through that bullshit. Hopefully being raised by your grandparents was a better experience. 
I think defense council was trying to help you slam dunk it. 
I'm not a lawyer, and I think arguing over this kind of money is despicable, but I wouldn't be surprised if it was perfectly acceptable in Germany, where I live. Our laws are somewhat different, but the whole "half of everything gained during the marriage" thing is still alive and kicking around here. Maybe one could argue that the settlement money was actually "gained" prior to the marriage, when she survived the holocaust, not when the money was issued during the marriage? 
Wouldn't be surprised if he said "Sure, that's how I defrost them at home. Who doesn't? Guess it was just habit.". 
I have a trial coming up where it appears the Defendant has forged documents. As in I am 100% sure of this. Said Defendant is going to get on the witness stand to authenticate these forged documents (because nobody else can and they are key to her defense) and this will allow the impeachment of her testimony with her past criminal history which includes convictions and guilty pleas for fraud and forgery. Very curious as to how this plays out... 
 Jeez. That's like a court case where the mom of a kid who murdered an old man said The man was old anyways and he was probably gonna die soon. This caused a fist fight out in the hallway between the two families. Sorry about your mom. That lawyer was an asshole . 
How does a VW Rabbit get T-boned by a bus and you come out fine? 
I interned for the public defenders office in my county over the summer and I worked the DV docket. I heard this literally all the time from clients. "I didn't hit her. I have proof I didn't hit her. I'm a big guy. If I had hit her, there would be a mark or something!" 
Whenever I try to fuck a horse, I make sure there are no cameras around. I mean, this is pretty basic stuff here. 
That can mean only one thing, your grandfather had already rampaged Germany and helped rebuild it. 
Used to clerk for a federal judge. one clever inmate decided his motions for release were not working, so he filed an "order" for release with a letter directing the clerk to enter it. That didn't work. A different pissed sovereign citizen filed a "judgment" from his personal court against the judge. County clerk actually recorded it. Judge found out when he went to sell his house. 
Hell of a realtor there - "and here next to the wine cellar we have this adorable prestocked torture dungeon..." 
Do you recall what the case was about? i'm curious what they were trying to prove with the lack of a warning in a specific paper. 
"Your honor I object!" "And why is that?" "Because it's devastating to my case." 
I wear glasses and you would be amazed the amount of people who seem to think i can't see as well as them when i have my glasses on! I wear them for a reason! 
For the lawyer in the post: Ask a stupid question, get a stupid answer 
I do a lot of eviction work. The excuses people come up with are mind boggling. In my jurisdiction, I'm lucky to have judges that deal with essentially nothing but evictions. Normal hearing takes less than 5 minutes but I'm involved in a case right now that had a 30 minute eviction trial, which is really rare, and in another rare occurrence, I was defending the tenants. This escalated into a bigger case in big boy court and the landlord, who is dead to rights on this one, simply refuses to settle. Even his lawyer confided that I'm winning at trial and will get far more at trial than I'm asking for in settlement. This has literally turned into the craziest case of my career. I've posted about it in other threads and will devote a dedicated post to it once things are finalized, but end of the day, the landlord is going to pay $20k to $30k for wrongfully changing the locks and submitting a forged deed in support of an eviction filing. 
Gentlemen, we can rebuild him. We have the technology. Worse. Stupider. Dumber. 
Aww I feel bad for him, he thinks that debating someone on 4chan somehow makes him a better person. 
Just cut it down to "Am guilty. Will flee." Save everyone some time. 
Yeah, no wonder she hadn't had work in a while if that was how she made cases... 
Agreed - and the "facepalm" isn't just a story-telling device here. He quite literally had his hand on his forehead, looking at his bench while saying it. It was great. 
There is an episode of Judge Judy where a girl in high school was suing two of her male classmates for stealing her backpack. JJ asked the girl what was in the backpack, and the girl started listing a few things... phone, wallet, headphones. One of the boys interrupts to say that there were no headphones in the backpack. JJ laughs her ass off and has shit wrapped up and is on to the next case in under 2 minutes. 
He landed, was chased, stopped to throw it, kept going and got away. 
Yeah, it makes you wonder how their brains operate. Those sort of leaps and bounds in logic are astounding and quite scary. Such a defense must have seemed reasonable to them, but why? Is it mental illness, is it something learned, or are they merely grasping at straws to try to seem innocent? 
I had a law class where we talked with cops that dealt with these people. They said the best way to get one to confess is to tell them you understand. I remember one story where he told the guy that he agreed that the child was asking for it. He said a lot of these people are suckers for empathy because everyone is obviously disgusted by them. 
Off-topic, but I want to ask: is that common among public defenders? I'm familiar with the stereotypes - underpaid and not-too-skilled on the one hand, charitable and fighting for the little guy on the other - but is it common for them to get cases where the defendant is...let's say "not making a good case for themselves"? 
And you get a catch-22 there - if you're "not traumatised enough", you'll be accused of lying, and if you're "too traumatised" then you're clearly an unreliable witness. No-one has discovered what the Goldilocks level of trauma that will get you believed is. 
or a STD is contracted via non-sexual means (blood transfusion, injury, accidental exposure to contaminated blood, etc). I can see it being valid in the right circumstances. 
There was a court TV show episode, where a girl was claiming some kids stole out of her backpack. As she was listing off the items that went missing, one of the thieves said "she didn't have a calculator in her backpack." 
I have a family member who used that defense once. They clocked him going like 80 or something, but his shitty truck can't physically go that fast. 
They were fresh filets from the seafood area Publix has so it makes even less sense lol. If they were in some package... maybe? But still ridiculous. But these were just wrapped in the parchment papers they give you. 
Shit, cancer and a flase court trial? Poor teacher... 
Or give the false info. Like say I have a tattoo on my left thigh or something 
Oh I have a story to tell you. I worked in Family Court and this cunt of a mother is legendary. She drew in crayon pictures of the baby daddy beating her and violent scenes to make the kids look they were psychologically traumatized and evidence of abuse. Two problems came up. First her oldest child was 3 and apparently knew how to spell Daddy. Second she bought crayons a week before the trial on his fucking card. 
It was crazy. It kind of picked my car up and scooted it like 20ft. Didn't bend the frame, only dented in the passenger side a bit. I had a plate of cookies on my passenger seat covered on plastic wrap that fell on the floor. Ate em while I waited for the cops. 
Seriously. I get ocular migraines maybe once or twice a year and I can't even imagine standing up, let alone driving a BUS. 
Nah, that's nice, too. A small, artisinal family business based in the home. How quaint! 
I had a friend, a Kurdish engineer escaped from Saddam's iraq so he could be a cabbie. One day he sees some shit and has to testify, it took hours to convince him that he wouldn't be tortured or executed. Had to be PTSD or something. 
Not an expert, but I'm betting he had some kind of tracking device on him. Either that or maybe they put a unit on babysitting duty for the duration of the release. 
Worse - they had to watch him actually fuck a horse. 
From his stories, he was less involved with the rampaging and pillaging, more involved in the rebuilding and repopulating. College had nothing on the rebuilding effort. I still strive to be half the man he was. 
There is an industry of con men who teach classes on things like this, and charge people good money to tell them about such legal issues as fringes on flags, not creating joinder, and how taxes are voluntary and don't need to be paid if you don't want to pay them. Irwin Schiff (father of Peter Schiff) was one of them. One of his students sued him for the false tax advice that got the student fined quite badly, and Schiff basically told the court that anyone who believed him was an idiot and deserved whatever happened to him. 
Did he just turn around and yell "I declare bankruptcy!" a la Michael Scott? 
Funny how they think being arrested is pretty much kidnapping (and thus illegal), but think the officer doing the arresting will be subject to legal punishment. Basically, laws don't exist...until they do. 
Harder than you'd think. There are cameras everywhere and in the sorting facility there are armed guards patrolling. Sometimes money is planted to see if someone tries to take it. The post office does not fuck around, son. 
It's a remarkable case, because that woman who called the police had to act like she had Stockholm syndrome and pretended that she loved him and the whole nine to get him to let her go. She saved the rest of the women. True bravery in my opinion. and I think he was the last guy in PA to be actually executed 
yup, my mom's lawyer screwed my dad out of a lot of things when the settlement went down. split items 50/50 more like 15/85 it seemed like. 
Eh, I was 13 when this happened I told her fuck no and said I never signed a goddamn thing and no one was getting my password. 
Convince him to take a plea deal. I mean, a lot gets said on Reddit about how plea deals are evil and coerce innocents into abandoning their liberty. But if you're actually guilty, and you've got a fair idea of how a trial will go, you really should go for one. If you're not offered one, entering a guilty plea on your own accord once the trial starts still plays better for sentencing than making a mockery of yourself trying to twist things into "I didn't do anything!". It also frees up your defence to start *downplaying* the offence, rather than *denying* it. 
Its not just that, but those programs, and the probation that usually accompanies it, in the case of a non-compliant individual, can result in a harsher punishment than just taking jail at the outset. For those of us that have our shit at all together, getting probation instead of jail would in fact be great. Most of the typical terms of probation are something most adults could manage without too much trouble. But for someone who wont do what is necessary to comply, they end up in a cycle: Violate probation, get arrested, show up to court, get probation extended as punishment for violating, repeat. Eventually, either the person on probation or the judge gets sick of it, and they end up in jail for just as long as they would have been if they just skipped the whole probation thing. 
I think she was pretty inexperienced. She had been practicing for a bit, but in larger firms it is hard to get trial experience. She stammered a lot during that trial. 
In court, I don't think much happened (obviously her client ended up paying a ridiculous amount), but she said the judge sought her out after the trial to tell her she'd handled herself really well in light of the client's ridiculousness - Her dad's a judge and her mum's a defence barrister, so I think the judge knew the family and that she'd only been practising a few months at that point. 
Don't get me wrong, he did, but there was no effect - A pair of officers were going in as I was leaving, I assume to break them up or at least shut them up. 
This is the part that concerned me, too. You know your large diesel vehicle is having brake issues and didn't bother to fix that?! I'm surprised that didn't get him into more trouble. 
A little old lady pulled out in front of me years ago. She saw me at the last moment and hit her brakes. I stomped my brakes and swerved hard to the side and almost avoided contact. The only damage was to smashed turn signal on my car, and a crack in the grille. Rather than turn it in on her insurance I offered to let her pay for the marker light. I picked one up from the local junk yard a couple days later and brought her the receipt for $50. I didn't even ask for money to cover my time. She was convinced I was trying to rip her off. Fortunately her son was there and understood that I was cutting her a break. He shook my hand but she still glared at me when she handed over the cash. 
If there is yeast in dog saliva, it makes sense it might produce SOME alcohol. But so tiny and insignificant that it wouldn't begin to make her drunk. A drop of beer on your tongue would probably get you more plastered. It probably wouldn't even survive long enough to reach her brain. POints to her for creative use of chemistry, though. 
"Oh uhhhh my bad it was evening" And everyone believes him 
The broken justice system is like half the point of the series, the other half being magic. 
How the fuck did he make it three stories down without breaking anything or destroying his ankles? 
is anyone going to applaud the guy for finding the ONLY positive side to that back ass racist law? 
I think until you get into the real sicko hurtcore stuff, most paedos try to justify what they're doing as 'the kids 'let' me do it because they care about me' or something. I think humans are hardwired to try and make us the good guys in our own stories - so when you're doing obviously evil things, most of us will leap through hoops and twist it every which way to try and justify it to *ourselves* (and then others by extension). The alternative is looking yourself in the mirror and accepting that you are a terrible, terrible, terrible person. And I think the weight of that realisation would crush most people so... mental gymnastics. 
He did... it was his initials, and the only reason I know that is because he had been brought into our jail numerous times throughout my time there and he would often make that stupid joke that goes "it's my initials now but when I get hard it spells out my whole name." Pretty sure he did the tattoo himself with an ink pen and a paperclip, or whatever you jailhouse kids use these days. Guy was a Grade-A douchebag, and I was very happy to see him get a hefty prison sentence. 
Actually, yeah. We learned that in Criminology courses - even if you don't emphasize/agree with the person you're interviewing, tell them that you understand their position. They'll be much more likely to give you a less-biased story if they feel they're in the right. 
I have an aunt who buys everyone scratch offs for Christmas when we have our big family get together on Christmas Eve. The year before last there were a few $2.00 winners, one $20 winner, and my $1,000 winner. Everyone got mad at me. Didn't even care. 
I did once have a police officer argue that I was travelling over 115mph in a car that had a governor at 107... I threw my keys on the desk and told him to prove it. I wasn't the brightest kid, but I didn't go to jail that day. 
"Your honor, I put them in my pocket because I couldn't find helpful employees to answer a question" "Lies! We're not talking about Winn Dixie or Food Lion here. Enjoy your jailcation." 
"He has elephant ears tattooed on his inner thighs" 
Having spent a summer as an intern for a district attorney's office doing exactly this, don't waste your time. Maybe once a week something interesting happened outside the normal misdemeanor and parking cases. 
I'm hungry and getting kinda jealous about the cookies 
Non-GMO, farm to table, handcrafted meth now available in your area. Support your local businesses! 
"The jury may turn away if it is too much for you. Continue." 
Did he win? Because that is a legitimate defense in dome situations. If someone flings themselves of a window after drinking a red bull the company is not liable 
Sounds like my parents. My mother got the house, the car and the bank account. My dad got the kids and the computer. Rest of childhood spent in council housing below the poverty line whilst she lived in a 5 bedroom house with holidays etc. Sucks really. 
Maybe your dad and his lawyer accepted it because they knew it didn't matter since it would ultimately be unenforceable...? 
Work claims for insurance, we see it often. It's called a "jump in". My tip for anyone is, buy a decent dash cam. It will save your ass in the long run 
We advise, we can't make a client agree to anything. 
I did some pro bono work assisting indigent defendants at probation violation hearings. Over a two year period, more than half of my clients pleaded no contest to the violation, even when they had good arguments, and specifically asked the judge to, as they put it, "go in." They all told me the same thing: jail is easier than walking your papers, and afterward, parole is easier than walking your papers. 
Countersue for $2 in quarters; it's the only thing the parking authority understands. 
I hope it worked out for her. Forgot where I read it but I think it applies to her: good decisions come from wisdom. Wisdom comes from bad decisions 
I had a buddy who used to fix tractor trailers, and he'd constantly see tape over warning lights in the cabs of the big rigs. Guys, the problem is still there even after you can't see it. 
That lady that got all over the news cycles a while back for "suing her nephew" actually was forced to do something similar to get the insurance to cover her injury. I remember getting so annoyed until I read all the reasons *why*. It was literally just an administrative thing to name a party to have insurance foot the bill. 
I swear to god the shit people get away with in Phoenix Wright. 
 Drunk people are more loose limbed and just ragdoll. It helps 
I hope the above-mentioned fucker rots, but tangentially: I once saw a photo of a guy who had an entire dragon tattooed on his cock. Like, the penis was the dragon's neck and head. Always wondered, if this guy picks up a girl, at what point in the conversation does he mention that?! You can't spring something like that as a surprise... Edited to add: I'm in a very public place right now, but I just held my phone very close to my chest to Google "tattoo dragon penis" and yup. Looks like there's plenty of evidence... 
Hmm, interesting. You could use this knowledge to your advantage. If you intend to commit a crime, develop an alibi beforehand that is VERY embarrassing and personal, but also legal. Then if you ever get taken in for questioning, refuse to talk until you see a lawyer... until someone plays the empathy card. Then "break down" and admit the "truth" about where you were and beg them not to tell whoever might care. 
It's sad that they were mad at you instead of excited for you. 
They gave me a ticket for going at 100mph in a very old, barely running car. I went to Court, and when they told me what was my excuse, I told the judge none, I just want you to give me a written statement that my car was in fact caught running at 100 miles per hour in that road, with no hurricane winds, or external forces of any sort. He looked at me, smiled, and asked me about the car. A 30 yo 4 cylinder crapmobile, your Honor. I showed him the pictures, and point at my car outside the building. He looked at the secretary, and told me I won't have a special model of that car with a certified top speed, and dismissed the ticket. 
We use only the freshest, hand picked chemicals, slow cooked to perfection. 
If the company slogan was "jump from the window", they could get in trouble. 
I just don't understand how a settlement like that can occur? Shouldn't the one keeping custody of the children be left with something greater? You kinda need a house to keep children in. 
you know. the sad thing in Germany is, that Dashcams here, are illegal and that Videos from the Dashcam cannot be used as Evidence in a Trial, because it could hurt the Involved Persons Privacy 
What does "walking your papers" mean? Complying with the terms of probation? 
"Your honor, we ask for nominal damages in the amount of $2, a burrito, and the parking guy's cargo shorts." O_0 
My client instructed me to defend him using the most ridiculous argument and to get angry at me when I fail. 
Again, it's just like a famous paralympian in the UK was forced to sue her friends dad after becoming paralysed in a pool accident. She was broadly villified for doing so even though she had to to eliminate him as a responsible party. A few years later and she was the darling of London 2012. 
Half of me playing a Phoenix Wright game is me screaming "OH COME ON!" 
But he was only allegedly drunk! There's no way to tell for sure! 
In jail, I met a guy with a Hitler tattoo...the arm was on top of his dick and the rest of the body was on his pelvis, so when he got hard it was like a saluting Hitler...I didn't believe him, he showed me and everybody else in the room. Salute and all. 
So...he was avoiding helping you commit a fraud when you sell the car along with a judge's signature on the statement of its top speed? 
And the quickest way to a woman's genitals is through her heart. 
I was in a bus that T-boned a car at fairly low speed that pulled out in front of it . The bus was equipped with a shock-absorbing water-filled bumper; on impact a series of plugs blew out of the top of the bumper and the windshield of the bus was covered with water. The car was damaged, but nobody was hurt. Maybe this bus had something similar. 
I bet you just shove it in the microwave some 10 min before delivery. Gordon Ramsay's gonna go ballistic on your fucking donkey asses. 
ffs just put a capcha before subreddit creation or some crap 
You would think so.... It did not work out that way. There were something like 8 different cases and appeals when all was said and done. My mother constantly contested custody and with every hearing the judge further reduced her contact because of various factors. Every time she did not like it she appealed. I think some of it was my dad just getting tired of all the arguing and needing to go back and forth to court. 
I remember that one! The Bad Aunt Story really convinced me to *dig into the details before I form an opinion* because I had a habit of accepting the clickbait synthesis. Shame on me. Shame on all of us that do that, really. How much nicer it would be if we would all sift through the complete story! 
And the other half is spent looking around for the last piece of evidence so you can JUST FUCKING GET TO TRIAL AGAIN GODDAMMIT FUCK 
Took me a couple of reads to work that out. Lmao, sneaky op. 
Can we get a meth cooking show where Bryan Cranston plays the angry meth chef yelling at all the cooks in training? Like a meth cooking Gordon Ramsay impression? 
Did you dad get child support? Sounds like he should've. 
I also remember people being really nasty to the 'Bad Aunt' because she said she couldn't hold a plate of canapes. As an OT who did a placement in hand therapy, I can say that's some serious impairment of function that's likely to need serious therapy otherwise it will be quite life-limiting. Heck, I had to learn to do everything off-handed when I first developed tenosynovitis in my right wrist - *everything*. To everyone else, it was just an excuse to rag-on her. 
My uncle is like that. First of all, he gets crazy jealous if you get anything free, win a little money? He gets pissy. My parents once won a little under $10k, he was pissy for like a year. Second of all, he HAS to have have what you get. My parents built a deck, he built a deck, they bought a new couch? He bought a new couch (from the same store even.) shit like that, he mostly does it with my parents, but does it with other family as well. 
My brother ended up living down there so he was closer to his friends when we moved about 300 miles away. His choice so we respected it but my dad never pressed the child support issue since brother was down there. Only thing she contributed was half the ticket price for me to get a train there for a week a couple of times a year. 
1 month in jail vs 12 months on probation with a possible suspension of your 1 month sentence. 
You guys should rent a brand new sports car for a few days. Tell him you bought it and see what he does. 
My mother did that. She got In a small crash but the car needed to be fixed so she got a temporary one from the insurance. Neigbour had a new car the next week. My mothers car was back not long after. 
If you bought the normal hats, would you have received a normal hat? 
**24 hours later** "Sumnabitch! Did *everyone* wait 24 hours?!" 
I learned about reddit from all the funny maymay comics I would see on Stumbleupon back in 2010. Then I started to reddit and stopped liking f7u12. 
Looking at the archived website, it looks like the normal hats are on the front page, to go to the second page you have to be a member, so I'm assuming that's where they keep the "special" hats 
I wonder if they ever go back to them and notice the view count on those pages went up by 1 for the first time in months, or years of nothing. It's like wherever the creators are now, whatever they care about now, they are reminded that they made something that somebody somewhere read it today. 
I'm 10,001 days old today. I missed my 10,000th day by 1 day, drat! 
There is a spacebuckets subreddit...find it yourself, links never work from my phone to a sub. It's perverted into a microgrow since everyone wants a bigger bucket... 
Its harder monitor and that's why the government spends way more effort to monitor it. 
i uh..... i dont know what the use for that would be. 
Your web activity is already monitored. Using Tor and the like will make it harder to monitor, not the other way around. 
Maybe because you have been a redditor for 2 hours? 
It's essentially Facebook for kinky people. You have a profile, friends list, group discussions, personal adds, etc. 
Most eastern/asian music if it could be defined on a twelve tone scale would be classified under pentatonic. 
Meh and here I thought we all had an inner musical genius that made us unable to make the sounds sound awful. 
mindblown.gif But yeah, either way, the website actually *does* show when you google it too, so again....yeah. 
There was a cursor that spent almost the entire video in the top left corner. I just made my cursor bang it the entire time. They were really going at it. 
How about metacrawler? Or webcrawler, Altavista, go.com, so on and so forth... The thing is back in the day I had no clue how to clear those drop down boxes from search boxes so I had to use different search engines so that my parents wouldn't see my browsing habits... 
"Listen, we don't care if you waste company time. We just want you to be up front about it." 
How can we expect to win when they use *two* people per keyboard! 
Which is why when you play only the black keys on a piano, it sounds Asian. 
I liked that one and this one "We live in the YEAR 2001... not 6000 years from now when ridiculously awsome technology will exist. No other mp3 player has a harddrive like this... 5gigs... **** yeah. A rio of the same size offers 64megs. Jesum Crow, get over your moping.. .this is revolutionary.... plus it's just the beggining. This device litterally bests anything on the market by about 100x" 
I'm glad I'm not the only one who still loves these. Just posted another one for you guys. :) 
The world* The U.S. isn't the only country with druggies and scammers y'know. 
I just changed my color to match another person's and followed them around until they quit. 
yeah this one is amazing and spot on. I like that his name is "traveler" as if he had traveled back in time just to post stuff like this on Internet forums. 
And you'll want to show him the comment on your iPhone. 
I was about to call you out of your mind, but then I realized my first one passed down to me WAS a 2nd generation with the touch clickwheel instead of the physical one. 3rd gen was pretty terrible, though. Rocking a 5th gen classic now which is... just... the... best. DAMN YOU APPLE FOR DISCONTINUING IT 
"Yeah... Sure. I says, I says... .... .... biiiiiiiiiiiiitch " 
Your comment made me read your username as Jihad.. 
John Titor working half time as an apple time-back social network engineer, that's an awesome idea you know. 
i think you just helped him to move up some places in the list. 
The dark web is largely dead links and troll sites. 
It's now at the online Apple Store! $400 for an Mp3 Player! I'd call it the Cube 2.0 as it wont sell, and be killed off in a short time...and it's not really functional. Uuhh Steve, can I have a PDA now? I bet he's an Apple fanboy now.. 
Yea. Silk Road was cool as a concept, but I have no interest in mail ordering drugs. The assassin listings all screamed fake, and I can read conspiracy theorists in a normal browser if I actually wanted to. 
But it is unlimited power to do nothing but add more power. 
What is buddhism is correct and you just wasted your wish. 
No, we're not falling for that you damned Nigerian. 
Might as well just pitch into a sand pit. Or get a job as a grenade launcher with the military. 
Except wouldn't that go from sample odds of 1 in 10 million to 10 in 10 million, resulting in still shitty 1 in 1 million odds? 
And that's the end of my redditing for the night. Going to go cuddle with my wife. Thanks for reminding me to appreciate every second with her. I'm sorry for your loss. 
I like it. I would own 20 houses, and immediately lose them on September 1st. Paying 2 mortgages this month hurt enough. Somebody please buy my old house. P.S fuck you if you back out on buying a house the day after the old owner closed on the new house. 
But what if that just turns into enjoying life with new loved ones every so often? 
Smart! With an answer like that, maybe you'll go to 10,000 IQ. 
Congratulations, you now have a gigantic fan club of obsessive stalkers! 
Until the market goes down one year and you have a -400% return 
The eighth digit connects you to the Pegasus galaxy... 
How much do you bench? Um 2250lbs close grip is my working set. I like to wrap my arms in tarps its partially a fashion statement but mostly a necessity. 
Congrats, you now have 000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,400,000 dollars. 
Nice idea. If you equate the number to an equivalent division, e.g. 100=a/b, you can raise the exponent of the numerator by a factor of 10 and make a number as large as you like. 100=101,000,000 /10999,998 , add 0 to the end of 1 million: 1010,000,000 /10999,998 =109,000,002 This can clearly be done arbitrarily. 
You really underestimate how you being older is going to diminish your attractiveness and the desire people want to sleep with you. 
I have two. They'll ignore you and think you're overqualified. 
Had sex with 0 people? Add a 0 like so: 00. Now you've had sex with someone. 
I think it's more like in smash brothers where the higher your age, the smaller a hit it takes for you to die. 
Not my bank account, tenfold the negative would be no fun. 
You don't have to add a zero at the end of August silly 
Or just add a zero to the exponential number 2%1 interest is now 2%10 1024% interest a year ftw Doesn't work if you have 1%, tho :/ 
You would fuck yourself. It doesn't have to be clones of you. 
Problem is, that business owners will quickly become savvy to the fact that if DaJaFu walks in to their establishment, that they will be out of pocket. So businesses will simply cease to have sales. DaJaFu will have wasted his Magical Zero on a short lived wish, and everyone else will blame him because they can't get sales any more. BE CAREFUL WHAT YOU WISH FOR DAJAFU :O 
ugh this fucking cat again? it's already died 53 times 
"So what do you do for work?" "I'm a grenade launcher." 
I would think if he CAN throw 600 mph but chooses to throw 125 he would literally never blow his shoulder. It would be like someone who CAN throw 100 throwing 48 
Sign a pitching contract with the US Artillery Corps. 
Not sure if Archer reference, Flash reference, or both. 
How about "The speed I can run without serious risk of harm" 
Yeah until I use my zero to make my powerball odds 1 in 143,000,0000 
Same, Jesus... I feel like a dick for staying up late now. 
I'm in real estate, contingent transactions are some of the scariest. Worst I had was a lady selling her house in another state so she could buy a new one in this state, while the owners of the one she was buying were buying another house and also relying on the sale of the property to buy their's. Person buying the lady's house backed out, so she had to back out, so the other couple had to back out. It was a shit show. 
I ad my 0 to the days in a year so enjoy these 3650 days per year 
In Austria we have 5 weeks of paid vacation. Like mandatory, boss breaks the law if he gives you less 
"I liked the 80th Spiderman series!" "Great9 Grandpa, we've been enslaved by sentient carrots for 200 years, no one knows what you're talking about." 
So is he then immortal? as it never got to the year of his death. 
Depends what vegetable. If he's a cucumber, he'll get to be in loads of cool movies. 
You'd most likely just kill yourself because nobody would be able to understand your thoughts and you would discover things that shouldn't be discovered. 
I'm trying to imagine what that would even be like. An IQ of 15 is so far below "severe retardation" that it sounds like a person afflicted with such a thing wouldn't be capable of comprehending sensory experiences. 
Wouldn't necessarily be that bad, you could just be a euphoric "zoo-keeper". 
Yeah just buy some safe bonds with a ~2% rate. I'd be super happy with 20% interest. 
You could just add a zero to the number of years you're in your twenties or thirties. 
I'll just publish academic articles until academia bows down before me 
Mathematician here: you don't want to do 00 you'll break the godamn universe. Do it like this: 0 = 1000-1000 and now add a zero to the first 1000, and bam! 9000 sex. 
That's all well and good until one day when you're 462 years old, and your great*? Grandson Timmy hi-fives you and you get shot into orbit 
Add the zero to your account number and they'll never find you 
Oh good, mine goes from .05% to .050%. This is wonderful. 
Go back to r/centuryclub, fatcat! Down with the 1%! 
Tears, legit though. One of the most emotional moments in a series for me. 
Is that still considered masturbation or is it a gang bang? 
They say even thinking about him can make you pregnant. 
Well, using my suppa power for that I'm 1,8450m tall, feels good. 
Do you want to fuck up the timeline? Because that's how you fuck up the timeline. 
"wait a second jim, why the fuck are we paying this guy $160 hourly" 
Buuut how would you ever find out in the first place? 
Anyone who has DM'd a tabletop game quickly learns to do this. Hell, just playing tabletop games lends to this. 
That has happened to my parents the last two times they've had to move. What is WITH people??? The last time, they almost had to go to court over it because the lady who impulsively drove up to our house and ended up making an offer *also* ended up changing her mind last-minute. They have an offer pending on their house right now. The inspection's tomorrow. Here's hoping... 
A seller, by the contracts I'm familiar with doesn't exactly have a right to back out (unless they had a contingency, which isn't the case for sellers in most transactions I've dealt with). Depending on how long ago this was you may still be able to sue them for performance and force the sale. I would certainly do it, because nothing irks me more than dishonest people who break their word. 
Would they increase the number days per month, or just make new months? How would this effect leap year? Would we get multiple seasons a year or would they stretch out more? Ducks and geese could be migrating for months at a time! 
Austria? Well! G'day mate! Let's put another *shrimp on the barbie*... 
I need some Intel on how to get a job like yours at Intel. Please. 
Canada only gets 14 days, but I blame that on our proximity to the US. 
Part of being smart is explaining things so others can understand them. Cant imagine what i could discover that would make me depressed though... 
That's dumber than a chimpanzee. They'd be like a retarded chimpanzee. 
Except you still have to obey some of those animals you keep. That's like if the penguins could give you orders and you had to listen. Stupid penguins. 
wouldn't that give the bank the ability to "use" that 100 quintillion though? And if they have that much investment/spending power, I imagine that'd have an effect on the economy. But I barely got through highschool economics so I have no idea if I'm on the right track here. 
I mean, you could just "add zero" to your level of attractiveness on a scale of 1 to 10. Then you'd literally be drowning in it regardless of how ugly you are, you'd have to at least be a 10. 
I'd get the zero added to the impact factor of the journal that accepts my research. 
Ehh. I just chalk it up to parents wanting to feel like they're looking after you even though you don't need it. I'm ok with it. Moms like to be needed. 
The first line doesn't strike me as something a mathematician would say. But the second line is exactly what a mathematician would say. 
It's fine. I'll make my children wish the same thing that I did. 
Australia. Most banks have savings accounts around 3%. 
Everything lives in all the dimensions, but we can only percieve the third. I'm not Stephen Hawking though. 
They tell you at the end. Its a lie tho and you really die forever. 
This explains why so many redditors are pro at this. 
I'd argue that your body would be grossly inefficient at it, since it would be burning 10 times as many calories. 
be a recent college grad (I believe associate's count) or ex military should do the trick if you just want to be a technician. if you want to be an engineer you need a PhD. engineers tend to be on call 24/7 so being a tech is the way to go. twelve hour shifts but you work three on, four off, four on, three off schedule. our RnD is near Portland OR so catch up on Portlandia to know what to expect. if you are in the area and are serious PM me and I can give you a tour on my days off. 
10 days actually, they don't count weekends. Except in Saskatchewan where we get 15 days. 
Well, there's a reason harambe had a fence. Even if you have 1000 IQ you don't walk into their territory and disobey their rules. 
We're gonna need a judge over here, JUDGE! JUDGE! HOW DOES THE STACK OPERATE FOR THIS CARD 
But he already used his one zero that he had, so he can't change attractiveness 
This is as good as proof that you're actually in academia. 
0.6 would become 0.06? Congratulations! You now know only basic vocabulary and grammar. 
I was thinking I'd just murder my parents when I start feeling old, but I like your answer better. 
Everything *lives* in all dimensions, but not everything *experiences* all dimensions. 
I'm adding a 0 to the number of minds blown by this. 
Dude, stop overthinking it and just... let it happen. 
That energy has to go somewhere, probably end up with a heatstroke halfway through the run. Marine mammals are deliberately energy inefficient to keep their body temperature up in cold water. A good but sad example if this was that baby dolphin people pulled out of the water to take selfies with, it died from overheating within minutes. 
*'I don't want a fountain or fortune of wealth -* *A ration of further endurance or health -* *Enlarged and excessive, superfluous pay -* *I just want to wank in my bedroom all day.'* 
Yeah, that is a good place to start. Then all you need is a big idea. You know for kids. Then wait til the big boss dies and be lucky enough to be the guy that delivers his suicide note to the next in line. While you are there, maybe start a fire and be really bad at putting it out. Then BAM. Easy street. You could hook up with a girl who is pretending to be from your home town, maybe she is even smart, maybe she has a Pulitzer, you don't know. Man, what a life. 
askreddit: "Reddit, when did you realize you were wealthy?" "I first realized when I discovered that not everybody had their own bank to stop their money from crashing the global economy" 
go to the DMV and tell me we don't experience time... 
That doesn't make the 4th dimension, or any dimension beyond it really, inexistant. 
I'm going to add my zero to the number of shoes I own, just in case I end up with 20 feet 
I think this may be the first time I've ever found you so deep in comments. 
But what about the migratory patterns of the African Swallow? 
I want to use my zero on the number of pancakes you are 
Well I'm going to add my 0 to the number of sweatshop workers so your 0 doesn't overwork them. 
We are all deep in comments on this blessed day. :) 
My zero is going to the end of what you currently weigh. Sorry pal. 
My 0 goes to the amount of times you have to poop per day. 
My mum does this! Her thing is to make you question your recollection whenever you mention your feelings being hurt by something. "I'm pretty sure that didn't happen". "That's just how you remember it". Or my favourite, "Do you think you just pretended that happened because of your anxiety?". Took me a while to realise this was straight up gaslighting as her attempt to never admit to any wrongdoing on my parents' behalf. My parents and sister would literally stop speaking when I entered a room, and would continue talking once I left and she still refuses to admit it. 
Seriously. If another parent or authority figure called my mom to let her know something I was doing wrong or fucked up on, she was super embarrassed and I was in big trouble. Recently the same kind of thing happened to someone I know, and instead of her mom using it as a lesson to learn or admitting her child may have made a mistake, she's suing the company. Great life lesson to teach your kid- don't worry if you screw up, I'll hire an attorney to sue them for you! 
I have an example of good parenting! I worked at a ziplining place one summer. I helped get people off the zipline at the end. One woman sticks out with me in particular. You usually make small talk when you are unhooking them from the zipline and so I asked this lady if she had had fun. She was a little shaky and said not really, I'm afraid of heights, but I wanted to show my kids that you can do things even though you are afraid of them. I was like damn, that's powerful. I had a lot of respect for her for doing that. 
I get this vibe from my mother a LOT - she'll bitch and complain about clerks/cashiers all day when they won't let her do something because it's against their policy. She's the kind of person that blames the frontlines people for stuff the backroom people decided. I always feel the need to apologize to those people when it happens. It's embarassing. 
I kept scrolling down to see if anyone said this. In particular, having a parent vent to you all the time about their significant other, parents, and siblings. Among other things, it pretty much prevents you from being able to have any kind of normal relationship with the rest of your family. 
"Look me in the eyes and tell me you're not lying." Fam, the dishes are in the dishwasher, you can go check for yourself. 
Dude, i just realized why i lied so much as a kid, my mom would punish all of us no matter who did it. One of us got caught with a book at night? Everyone sleeps in the living room. Danggg 
My parents constantly compared me to other kids when I was growing up. Some of the kids they compared me to were bullies of mine. I was never good enough for them. Fast forward to now (I'm 31), and whenever I speak with them about problems in life, they're always asking me why I compare myself negatively to others. I literally just made the connection, and I want to cry. Holy shit. 
This is a big one that deserves to be much higher on the page. So much is said about helicopter parenting, but there's also the parent who just can't be bothered and comes up with excuses to do nothing. If your kid arrives home breathless every day for two weeks and complains that a group of four older bullies chased them all the way home, don't give the kid the third degree under the presumption that your six-year-old must have provoked it, then tell your kid to ignore it and go back to reading your book. That's a cop-out. 
I'm in my early 30's and my parents do this. It gets old fast when the "grown ups" are talking and when you try to add to the conversation, it's ignored. 
Kids then grow up feeling like they constantly have to defend themselves and/or feeling like they actually can't/shouldn't 
Or when your parents tell you to suck it up when you feel shitty about something. Fucking seriously, I love my parents but I will never tell them about my problems because I know that they're not going to fucking listen. I don't hate them at all, but they are some of the worst people when it comes to emotional support. 
How does that feel? I've been grounded all high school and not allowed to do anything besides go to school and do homework in my room. It was truly fun when I went to uni in a different city living in a mixed dorm, but it would have been fun if I was allowed to develop socially and other skills besides just strict school stuff. 
This is a HORRIBLE rule, even for a 5 year old, maybe even especially for a 5 year old. Little ones may look like they're doing nothing but they're often doing work that is incredibly important to them and because it is important to them it should at least be important enough to you, as a parent, to give them a minute of grace to transition. And being respectful to a small child makes it easier for a parent to simply continue being respectful to their teenager or adult child. 
Late summer and early fall is helicopter parent season at the university IT helpdesk. I don't know how many parents I've had to turn away because I wasn't allowed to reset the kid's account password without them being on the phone. One incident in particular stands out to me. A father called to recover his son's password and register him for classes. I explained that we were only allowed to assist the account holder. He said that he was having difficulty getting his son to do it. I replied that I was sorry, but the rules are rules. I braced myself for an angry, self-righteous tirade, but the father just nonchalantly said, "okay, well maybe he'll listen when I tell him next year" and hung up. I wanted to send the man flowers. 
Reading this point I realize I should be thankful I'm not totally screwed up in the head. I swear, my mother fits about 90% of these descriptions 
Yes - pushing kids into activities in spite of what they want, or allowing them to sign up for so many things that their school work suffers. 
So my parents too... Like for real just congratulate me for the 5 frikkin tests I did well on but no, they keep ranting on about that 1 test I had mediocre points for. 
Is yelling "Just fucking google it" a low effort response? :) 
Ok you can't just drop something like that and not expect us to wonder. Any pictures if you don't mind? I'm just curious, I'm not trying to be a jerk. 
I've found that other adult's reactions are interesting when you try to teach your kid independence. I suggested my kids (4 and 7 at the time) walk together without me to a neighbor's house after she invited them for a play date. It's 6 houses, they've walked it with me hundreds of times, they know street safety rules, we live in a safe area, and I would have been able to see them the whole time from the end of my driveway or my living room. She gave me a look like I was suggesting that they be sold on the black market. 
At the very least make them feel comfortable in the kitchen and following recipes. So many people I know (30 years old!) don't experiment in the kitchen or try recipes because they're deathly afraid of the mere idea of it, like something bad will happen if they try some food that isn't out of a box. 
Awkward, socially inept, unconfident people are built with this shit. 
Then they start asking why don't you have a girlfriend? 
Same with only telling kids what is wrong with their writing/ideas and never giving them credit for what they did well. My best friend's dad would destroy her papers. And when she clearly outclassed him in writing skill, he doubled-down on correcting her grammar, punctuation, arguing over word choice. He would say he was just trying to make her a better writer. But because she never got praise, and was only shown how "wrong" her work was, she still doesn't believe how good she really is. 
I remember being like 11 and googling "boobies" or some other *crazy* stuff and seeing what was basically a tit fuck at my buddies house on his laptop. We just sat there giggling because you know...boobies...tehe. But looking back I now realize that 11 year old me basically just looked up porn. Oops? 
So many kids grew up being told how smart they were, instead of focusing on how they used that intelligence or how hard they worked at something. Which leads the kid to become a teen who doesn't see the point of homework if they "already know all of the answers" or can pick up enough to pass the class with a C without effort. Then they become adult who is smart but totally unmotivated, and they have trouble completing anything that requires work even if intellectually they know all of the steps to achieving their goal. 
most shocked ive ever seen my dad is when I yelled "I AM NOT YOU" 
Holy shit! Your post is my life story. My parents forbid dating when most other kids were allowed to and it prevented me from starting to form healthy relationships at a normal age, and secrecy in the limited ones I found. I still keep them in the dark and they wonder why. If I ever reproduce I will not make the same mistakes. 
on the other end of the spectrum, taking normal childhood things and self-diagnosing them as mental illness, and convincing the child that they have the disease 
So much this... I know someone who has kids under 10 and says ' tell jack fuck you' to their kids and then congratulates them. It seems so absurd to me. 
If it's your house, you're allowed to make the rules. If they aren't going to discipline their kids, then they can't come over. When my nieces came over to our house, they were well behaved, put away their toys when they were done, went outside when they wanted to run around or yell. Yeah, they had to be reminded a few times, but Grandma and Grandpa had rules that had to be followed, and if they weren't going to follow those rules they had to go home. 
It also leads to a lot of anxiety. Suddenly drunk, overly friendly and happy dad is now angry drunk dad? Curfew changed without notice, demand kid comes home immediately. Speeds to make it home in time to meet the new deadline... ...finds drunk dad now passed out on the couch. And when he wakes up, he might be friendly and not remember any of it, or he might be angry and hungover, in which nothing done will please him. 
And similarly, that accepting a compliment means you're conceited. 
My mom would criticise the heck out of me growing up. Weight, height, laugh, posture, skin, reactions to things. It makes me anxious to do anything around her 
It can also swing too far in the other direction. My sisters and I were constantly told to listen to our physically/emotionally abusive parents and not to disrespect them because, "We're not your friends. We're your parents." Once we became adults they were constantly whining about why we didn't want to discuss our personal lives with them or talk to them on the phone for more than a couple minutes or come to them for advice. I actually had to explain it to my father once that I can't suddenly become his buddy like flipping a light switch. I don't hate them and we get together for family gatherings/events/birthdays. But when they ask personal questions I often have to tell them that it's none of their business. I wouldn't be anymore inclined to tell them about my personal shit than I would a co-worker. 
My in laws are like this and it's a sore spot for my wife. Her folks are approaching 70 and seem so old (for lack of a better term). They have started regressing mentally and we're increasingly having to simplify how we speak to them. On the other hand my grandmother is 90 and seems much more sharp mentally than they are. This in turn has my wife looking into how to keep up her mental acuity now so she doesn't end up like her parents. 
God, when I first started dating my SO, I commented to my mother about how I was still staying fairly independent of him because I didn't want to add onto his stress, and my mother scolded me and said "NO! You need to BE dependent on him!" *I was a sophomore in high school.* 
"Discipline your own kids, you lazy fucks." Not only that, but they will be less likely to go to the authorities in an emergency. 
It is even worse with the internet. Some people today (presently minors) will never experience privacy because their parents chronicly share images and stories about them online. Parents have no way of knowing what will be troubling, embarrassing, or consequential to them later in life. They put a lot of trust in web companies whose core business is information brokerage and advertising. 
That's something I really don't get. Like, I understand taking small kids if that's your belief system, because obviously you want your children to be educated and believe the same thing. But after a certain point, don't you want your child to have an actual relationship with God, not just go to church because you say they have to? My Catholic friend was all stressed out a few months ago because her 14-year-old is very anti-religion right now and she was wondering how to fix that. I told her she really just has to talk honestly with him about what she believes and let him form his own opinions, because ultimately she wants him to have a relationship with God because he believes, not because he's been forced. 
It's easier to blame bad things on external factors than it is to solve these bad things. 
A thousand times this. Some parents believe fear = respect. I feel so bad for those kids. 
Whenever there was a spider in the house when I was growing up, mum would just waltz over to the thing, pick it up and chuck it outside with a casual "see, there's nothing to be scared of" and a big grin. I grew up thinking mum wasn't scared of spiders, so there is no reason why I should be. I found out a couple of years ago that actually mum is TERRIFIED of them. What a hero :) 
My mom was finally diagnosed with anxiety after we were all grown up. I spent so many years telling her to calm down that I probably veered too far in the other direction. 
As a server where this happens all the time; apologizing in front of your mom means everything in these situations. 
My mom just about had a panic attack because I would leave my USB wall charger plugged in by my bed and she was paranoid it would start a fire from the wire sparking. I can share the actual charger (cheap knock offs can combust from over heating) but a 5v wire can't make a big enough spark to do anything 
Even if you're not struggling as much as other people, your struggle is still valid. Venting is a healthy way to deal with negative emotions. 
Yeah even 10 y/o me knew that was fucked. My mom was the one who decided their counselors and therapists. If anyone tried to make them meet half way or saw from my dad's perspective, she refused to go. This guy was firmly on her side. Bringing us in to hear about that kind of stuff was a really messed up tactic on her part to demonize my father. It didn't work. Instead we were just more confused why this creepy dude was asking us if we knew what beastiality was and then kept talking about it after we said no. Wanna know one of the greatest bits of irony and injustice in all of this? Guess what job my mom pursued after we came of age and she no longer got alimony... family/marriage counseling. 
Jesus, that's terrible. But you know Jordan wouldn't be crying like that. 
I was constantly compared to my brother growing up. Then he became a massive loser and now he gets compared to me all the time. My folks just don't understand that neither of us are the same and we're going to go about our lives differently. 
There's also the parent who's *both*. My mum was fine with helicopter parenting when nothing was wrong but as soon as I needed her for anything where she might have to actually do something like bullying, there was always some excuse. 
I'm in my early thirties and my wife and I live in my hometown. Sometimes I feel bad that there are large parts of our lives that I keep from my parents, whereas her parents know everything that's going on with us and our hopes, dreams, and goals. But every time we share something with them they belittle our decisions. We just told them my wife got a job in a bigger city 5 hours away, and instead of being excited for us my dad just said that the housing market wasn't very good there. 
It became one of my main flaws : it always seems like I'm trying to make up some excuses even when in my head I just want to make them understand why I did what I did. 
It's funny when the children act more like adults than the adults do. 
Exactly. Teaching a child that you can't ever be "wrong" means they can't take new information into account and change their minds on any issue, or that they have to hide that they've been "wrong" about something, and that any time they make a mistake it's a bfd that is soul crushing. 
Or the old: "Because I said so." line trotted out when you ask them why, or catch them being hypocrites. Cheers parents, telling me to be nice and sensible but not following your own damn advice. =/ 
I had a customer sincerely apologize to me for being an asshole awhile back. It was absolutely shocking to hear a grown man acknowledge that he treated me terribly for no reason, and wholeheartedly apologize and express his embarrassment for his actions. It made my day, and completely changed my perception of his character. 
A child is a human being. Apologizing when it's appropriate demonstrates a healthy respect for fellow humans. 
And I think therein lies the problem. I don't know if it's just my parents or not but my mother *demands* I respect her/shrieks about how I'm sinning if I don't *honor her* even though it's not even my faith/etc etc ( and I'm a goddamned adult. ) so - if they're anything like she is, they probably feel like the child is obligated to respect them without any need to treat the child with a shred of respect. ( it kind of feeds into the other user's comment about refusing to apologize and turning the kid into a doormat, too. Imo. It's ridiculous, both parts, tbh. ) 
I definitely had a different experience with parents like that after college. My parents were the definition of hands off, smoke on the back porch all day, couldn't be bothered to do anything. Then I pay my way through college, get a job and move 5,000 miles, then they're up my ass about everything. They called once or twice a month in college, but three times a day to check on me when I moved. When I could use you, you were gone. When I don't need you, you get in the way. They went so far as to call the bank I set up my new bank account with and demand to get put on my account as a beneficiary. Lucky for them they didn't encounter someone like you, because they had my social, address, elementary school, enough personal information to meet the bank's requirements to get added to the account without my signature. 
My mom is doing something similar with my younger sister. My sister is headed to a completely different state for college in September and my mom told my dad that she is going to stay in a hotel the first week of school so she can assist my sister and make sure she is settled in. She also told my dad that if he doesn't buy my mom a house out in the state where my sister is, than she is going to leave my dad. Dad told her to drop dead, so come September my mom will be leaving me, my brother and my dad behind because she is going to live in the same city as my sister. 
"You aren't raising a kid, you are raising a future adult." - Probably Michael Scott or something. 
Seriously. I look back at my childhood and cringe at all of the times my parents forced me to do sports activities I didnt want to do. It was very clear I was an artsy kid that liked music, crafts, ect, but they just thought I didnt find my sport yet. Granted, maybe one day I would find something, but it took a lot of me pushing back for them to finally accept I had different interests than they had hoped. 
This is the worst. Kids are their own people, stop trying to make them you. 
Sexualizing your children is a healthy, fun activity for the whole family. 
"But you got a C on your report card this term, and a C for you is like a D for someone else." -My mom She meant well, but damn. The phrase "not living up to his potential" still makes me cringe. 
As long as the first time you said that you also sat down with them and taught them how to use google and compare different sources to find the most reliable information, you're good. 
Whenever the kids I work with try to get their way by starting a tantrum I tell them "Stop. That doesn't work with me. Maybe it works at home, but not here." and surprisingly enough *that* stops them. 
This might be the most important point in this thread, thank you for bringing it up. 
My mom gave me a very medical text book lesson on sex and gave my middle sister a more watered down version of that. Around that time my parents split and she began babying my youngest sister to the point any movie with sex in it was completely off limits. I'm talking Juno, Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants, teenage type movies. So when my mom finally told her about sex it was so bland it essentially boiled down to use a condom but also don't do it. One night I ended up sitting my sister down and going into depth with her about STDs and pregnancy and about what to expect with her first period. I doubt my mom even recognizes that she failed my youngest sister so much in this department. 
We had a client with a hernia, and by the time he sought medical care, his scrotum was the size of a basketball. I did not believe that could possibly be a thing until his medical records came in. :O 
It's fine to ask, but I'd rather not- I can give you a perfect example, though; backyard party, every other kid is in shorts and a t-shirt, I'm in a button up blouse and white skirt with strict instructions not to get the skirt dirty. What do my aunt and uncle set up as the main entertainment? Obstacle course, like Wipeout (my uncle has severe ADHD and he won't take medicine for it, so he has a lot of energy and these kind of projects are normal for him). 
When my sister was 9 and I was 5, she'd walk me 20 minutes to the library at least once a week; we'd go alone, cross roads and then spend an hour or two in the library before checking out books and going home. That quality time and Independence was wonderful to experience. We did live in a small town that was relatively safe so obviously not applicable to everyone, but allowing your kids Independence wont hurt them 
I knew a girl like this in elementary school too. Her dad was really strict and protective. Everyone thought she was insanely smart and had the world in front of her (best grades, best athlete, etc) but she got into drugs in highschool and died of an overdose. 
I feel this so hard. I grew up with parents who barely let me do anything, and as soon as I went to college they expected me to immediately branch out and get a job, join clubs, and make social connections. That gave me great anxiety, and I'm a nervous wreck about everything now because I was basically raised as a shut in. My mom is basically the epitome of anxious, and has unintentionally made me afraid of everything and everyone as well. Ive improved over the years but my anxiety is still present. 
It's often combined with a terror of "wasting food", because if you mess up, your options are either eating shitty messed up food or throwing it out. Ironically, I waste a lot more food than I should because I get so anxious worrying *about* wasting it that then I just can't eat. Yay, anxiety! 
That's my advice for kids whose parents don't knock: jerk off furiously whenever you know they're home. 
This is too real for me. I'd bury my journal in the deepest parts of my room and she'd still find it. Then she'd sit there and discuss my feelings. Said she needed to know in order to make sure I was happy and to make sure I was on the right track for life. I'd ask her why she did this and she told me it's a mother jobs to always worry for her young and that when I'm a mother I'd understand. She'd also then get offended I had the audacity to question her and then she'd preach how ots her house her rules, and as long as I live there all things belonged to her. 
Ah yes the "nobody has friends that just happen to be the opposite sex" response. 
Actually while I wouldn't agree to the bullying part, I am guilty of as a middle schooler being annoying and pushy to get my crush's attention. 
That's me. I didn't bother dating in high school, which left my mom "concerned" that I might be a lesbian. I'm 31 now, and have been getting asked when I'm getting married for the past few years. Family holidays are so fun. 
No, that's grandma. Mum is the one asking when I'm going to have kids of my own. 
Sounds almost exactly like mine. The first 10 years I was handed off to whatever stranger or alcoholic relative was available. Then my my brother came, I was old enough to care for him, didn't stop mom from partying and not coming home. He is also the Golden Child, has had everything handed to him, does zero chores, bought a vehicle, they are happy if he passes his courses with a 65 where if I got below an 85 I was grounded for months, etc. I have a kid and one on the way. I love kids, I love my brother, I just want to strangle my mother constantly. I'm doing a great job though, by learning from her mistakes. 
My dad would regularly rant to me about how we were going to be homeless next month. That housing insecurity became a pretty fundamental source of mental health issues for me later on 
There's a difference between having your kid understand not wasting finances and having a healthy respect for money and unintentionally making them feel guilty for having money on them. 
Art friends have taught me never to give them praise without some criticism or criticism without some praise. 
Back when I was 11 we had to rely on finding a stash of tattered porno mags under a bush or whatever. Today's 11 year olds don't know how good they've got it. 
It's also difficult to handle the idea of others being better than you at anything you've actually invested yourself in 
Me, to my 8 year old, who was playing video games: Ok, time's up. Him: Aw man, can't I play a little longer? Me: All good things must end. Him: YOU must end! 
My parents seem to be confused by the stubborn streak that my siblings and I have. My mom's whole family is one of the most stubborn group of people I've ever met. Like gee golly willikers, where do you think we got it from? 
My daughter always calls me out for "interrupting without saying excuse me." I'm working on it now. 
Yeah I mean don't just let that shit happen. My dad, while he didn't "discipline" my little shit friends that would sometimes come over, he definitely didn't let shit slide if they were being little shits at our house. 
I have many memories of dirty whisky breath and spit in my face from an angry drunk mum. I'd never do that to my kid, ever. It's disgusting and I'm sorry you had to go through that! 
I was taught that anything other than putting yourself down is pure conceit. Having confidence, pride, or even taking joy in something I accomplished was immediately met with a savage takedown so that my head would not inflate from praise. It wasn't that I never did anything right, it was that doing everything perfectly was expected and even a tiny failure was all that was ever remarked upon. My sister has given me exactly one compliment in thirty five years, and my mother acknowledged my accomplishments by taking credit for them (i.e. "Thank goodness I did x for you, so you could do y!") I grew up thinking my failures and the subsequent punishments were a given, and so if something I was working on started to go south, I would curl into a ball and give up instantly and completely. That was a tough habit to break. 
Yes, you want to be authoritative, not authoritarian. 
As a parent and a Deputy Sheriff, the idea of a kid being afraid to come to me in an emergency is gut wrenching. 
Instead, fear = pretending to be following the rules, lying to your parents and never opening up about things that could help you with everyday life and even health sometimes 
I work in a pre-school with a load of children who LOVE spiders and insects - so much so that our current project is bugs and nature. Everyday I have to pretend that it's fine whenever they put one on me or hand me one. Secretly I'm also terrified, but it's good therapy I guess. 
YES show her that you know better than she does Hopefully she understands how backwards that is 
Oh God, my dad did the same shit. He always had to unplug everything. Don't leave the Nintendo plugged in. Don't leave the toaster plugged in. Do you know how many people's houses have burned down because of those? Yeah Dad, like zero. 
That's hurts more because my parents do that and my brother is named Jordan 
Literally the exact opposite of how it should be done! 
My mother is sort of like this in a way. She just has this knack for taking the steam out of every idea or opportunity I have. I stopped keeping her informed of any decisions I was making until I had already committed, and it helped my life so much. 
Same. I'll accept responsibility if I do something wrong, but I have a constant need to give an explanation. I'll even say it's not an excuse, it's an explanation. I need them to understand why it happened. I've also gotten defensive over constructive criticism. I've even started defending myself a few times after getting a small compliment 
I wish more parents understood that last bit. If you act weird and freak out when your kid tries to talk to you about something, eventually they'll never talk to you about *anything*, even and especially important stuff. No matter how many times they tell you "You can always come to me with anything!" their reactions when you do go to them with something will tell them they damn well can't. 
This is where people fuck up. They put children in a separate category for humans. Like they are these foreign objects that eventually grow into humans but that in the meantime they are something separate. 
Christ I dont even know when the last time I heard I love you come from my father. At best I get a half ass, oh uh..by the way...nice job on the grass..looks good. Im leaving bye. Aight yeah...thanks dad. Always a pleasure to mow..cause my shit would be broken by you if I didnt. 
Absolutely. A friend of mine's 8 year old would never let you have a conversation without interrupting. He just didn't notice you had a conversation going and assumed you'd stop for him. Kids need to know their place and wait their turn to speak. It's an outdated phrase 'know your place', but it's true. They're people. They'll walk all over you if you don't assert yourself and teach them when to shut their trap. 
Seems many parents keep their children under their thumb until adulthood. It's a transition, not a binary switch that activates at 18. I saw an article that showed how adolescents were more likely to listen to someone who treated them like an adult. In molding a future grown-up, it seems important to acknowledge and prioritize their autonomy. Also, fuck if I know. 
Parents like this are why I think we need a legal process for disowning them. Like emancipation, but better. 
To be fair, if Blackboard doesn't make somebody emotional, they might be a sociopath. 
I had the opposite. I wished my parents pushed me in sports. I was really good as a kid and played floor hockey all the time but my parents didn't know much about hockey and I'm a girl so they never found any leagues to put me in (even though they existed). If they had more knowledge about it and pushed for it, my entire life would be different right now. But my dad is pretty artsy so my parents let me go the art route. 
... she couldn't even be bothered to teach her kid how to manage both? I played competitive hockey and travelled a lot throughout elementary and high school, and doing homework before/after hockey was very doable. 
Especially when you gave them crappy, tennis-failing genes. 
So it's not just me. Got a C in Spanish this semester. Got an A on the final, dad brushes it off and continues to complain I'm not living up to my potential in that class. After school got out we went up to D.C. where my sister lives. She had a 3.9 GPA in high school and got a masters degree (in very proud of her of course). The problem is my dad is VERY proud of her and likes to tell me that she never got a C in any of her classes. Sister husband also likes to tell me how great my sister is. Worst feeling ever when you're in a house with three other people and they're all telling you that you are doing terrible in school because of one C. 
Yes, children have a sort of "permissiveness factor" for every different adult they deal with. We are all ranked on a permissiveness scale in their heads and they *know* who will let them get away with murder and who won't. I have several friends whose children behave better at my house and they joke about sending the kids to our house as a boot camp. The only reason is that we don't put up with the disrespectful behaviour from their children and the children know it. 
What age if you don't mind me asking. My son is 10 and I already have minor talks about puberty and changes and told him if he ever has questions not to be embarrassed to ask me. I felt like I was raised and it was more of a taboo and I don't want him to feel the same. 
My mom would always leave pamphlets around the house. The week after I lost my virginity (we didn't talk about it) there was a safe sex pamphlet on my bathroom counter. 
Yeah that's what I think but my mum is pissed because while I and her are very close, because I'm more shy and feminine, my brother isn't. I told her if health, drug, and sex stuff comes from me he's more likely to listen because he knows he can trust me and she just sticks her fingers in her ears and goes lalalala 
I'm exactly like your uncle! I was diagnosed with ADHD at the age of 8 and my parents refused to get me meds for it. The only way I can study is by chewing gum or listening to music. I'm kind of grateful to my parents because I feel that I would be reliant on the meds if I started taking them that early. Anyways, I build alot of shit constantly. This summer, I'll be replacing around 20 boards on our patio because I need something to do. It actually gives me such a large sense of accomplishment when I finish these projects. 
I've worked in libraries recently... Kids that age often aren't allowed to do this anymore. :( 
And her father is probably beating himself up for not being *more* strict. Hope she didn't have a younger sibling. 
I grew up in a super religious household. Anything that even looked like masturbation got me in trouble. My mother made me wear a belt at home because it made it more difficult to masturbate I guess. Religion really fucked me up as a kid. 
In case of emergency I feel like most homes interior doors are pretty easy to bust open. Interior doors are generally for privacy, not security. 
Eh, I had a friend in a similar situation, his mom was really controlling and sheltering. It pretty much will end on bad terms. People like his mother are so conceited they won't even understand, they'll just frame it as you hating her or some such nonsense. Not saying he shouldn't do it, but it most def don't end clealy. 
According to HIPAA they cannot disclose any information unless explicitly allowed (signed I'm pretty sure) to do so. Some specific things do come up on an insurance bill though, which they can see if they pay it. If they're a minor then they have access to the records. What's the age that minors are allowed to make their own decisions? 15 still seems pretty young, at least in the US where the cutoff is 18 for most things. 
Went to hang out with my dad's best friend's daughter, essentially my cousin all my life. Get home, and Dad says, "So you trying to fuck -redacted- now?" as if that is all a teenage boy does. 
It's crazy, like you aren't supposed to like boys, then if you're shy about telling everyone you like a guy, you're weird. You might be attractive...when people see an attractive person who is still single, they might wonder if they are gay, since they assume you have your pick of anyone of the opposite sex. Just ignore them. 
Do some people not realize that kids aren't for everyone? 
I can absolutely relate. My mother once told me when I was around 16 that the only reason she kept me was so that she'd have a built in baby sitter when she had a kid she actually wanted. I got grounded for doing things she'd given me permission to do, and many times for things she made up that I did so that I'd have to stay home. 
I tell my kids when money is tight so they don't ask for certain things that aren't needed. But when I was unemployed, I made sure they understood that the "worst case scenario" was moving in with a friend. I wanted them to be aware that no matter what, we wouldn't be living in boxes under a bridge. We would be alright. 
I remember when I was 12 I would say "there's no point in doing something if you can't be the best" 
my mom would do that and it made me laugh so hard every time i stared at her serious face, she would interpret that as "you are lying to me", she actually started using that later to pass blame to me, at wich point i had to learn to actually not laugh 
How it should be done: I got bullied a lot at school, my parents tried to reach me how to get them to stop, plus my parents were *constantly* telling the teachers and the principals about it and telling them to do something (they never did, by the way), and shit, i got bullied so badly at summer camp one year my dad stormed into the directors office and went off on this guy and damn near sued him (lots of physical bullying/violence right in front of the counselors, they never did anything but punish me for retaliating. No joke). Then one year in high school I got tired of it and snapped and nearly punched a kid in the face, teacher was apparently behind me and grabbed my arm, but that kid and his friends never messed with me again, I got suspended, and guess what? My dad was proud. And they didn't always do it, I was always the trouble maker too and got disciplined constantly, they knew when to discipline me and when to stand up for me. That's how you fucking do it. 
"You did a great job there." "I did it this way because- Er...I mean...thank you?" 
When I was in middle school, I told my mom about a girl I had a crush on. She proceeded to relentlessly make fun of me, wouldn't drop it for weeks. "Ooooohhhh! My little boy has a CRUSH?!? Are you gonna get married? Are you gonna have babies? I bet they'd be sooooo cute!" etc. etc. etc. Really talking down to me and rubbing it in. It made me feel really weird and self-conscious about liking girls. Guess what mom, you just lost your privileges to know about my romantic life. I'm in my 30's now and I still never talk to my mom about who I'm dating. 
I work with children. I can never imagine not apologizing to them if I made a mistake, or they had to miss out on something, etc etc. Because that's how I talk to people. I don't even understanding having difficulty apologizing to a kid as a problem. 
This is also an important social skill. You want your kid to make friends and succeed in school and work? They need to know how conversations work! 
That sounds really sad... and humiliating for him if he ever has friends who want to visit his apartment. 
We even took dinner to the rink twice a week to make my daughters skate. Roughly half the skaters ate and did homework in the breakroom during an hour break when the canskaters were on. The other three days were a solid 3 1/2 hours of skate. My kid did homework in the truck on the drive up. Really, she's got some great habits from those years. In college, you never see her travel to meets without some classwork in her bag. And snacks... 
You know what? They're not saying it, so I will. GOOD JOB ON GETTING AN A ON YOUR SPANISH FINAL! 
Hell, *cats* have individualized permissiveness. My cat had no problem being on the dinner table most of the time. But if he so much as heard the cadence of my father's footsteps, and he was off the table, since he knew what was going to happen if Dad caught him up there. With me, he was cautious, since some times I emulated my father and loudly shooed him off, other times I emulated my mother and allowed it. 
I'm not o.p but my mum started a somewhat condensed version about anatomy was and how it worked differently between guys and girls along with changes associated with puberty when I was 8. Then when I was about 9 she explained how changes made a woman and man able to conceive a child through DNA exchanges from a mans penis entering a woman's vagina. She got a medical textbook with pictures as I was a bookish child, although the first time I seen a medical drawing of a guys dick and how it changes through puberty I ran to my room crying because "it looked like a fleshy snake".... 
aww really!? that sucks :( I loved going to the library and in the summer there was always like a reading challenge so you could get like a certificate. 
Strap ons exist you know. Don't let biology prevent you from flying free. 
To be fair, ending it on bad terms is perfectly justified instead of letting it continue on bad terms. 
My family always bugged me about it when I didn't have a girlfriend. It was actually my step cousin though, so it was always awkward as fuck for them to even say something about it but I was too young to ever be able to say "the fuck?". It was never that extreme, but they (my dad's side) would mention it at least once every time there was a family event. Made me dread seeing her, even though we got along well 
I'm 25 and I *never* talk about dating with my parents. If I were to get married there's a part of me that would want to wait until after the wedding to even mention I was seeing someone, just for shits and giggles. 
My mom legitimately pisses me off everytime shes tells me "You'll come around someday." when I tell her I don't want kids. The worst part of it is that it's because of *her* behavior towards my brothers and I that I don't want kids. She always sounds so frustrated when she talks to us and constantly complains about us to the point where she makes it sound like having children was the worst thing to ever happen to her. I'm selfish; I like spending money on myself, having time to do the things I want to do and see what I want to see. I like not having work to do after coming home from work. With kids in the picture all of that goes away. Why would I want that? 
I think that it's good when parents lightly discuss things like this with your children because it gives them and understanding of what things are essential when money is low. 
My dad would throw tantrums like this, when I was a teenager I just started getting into fist fights with him over it. Sometimes I'd instigate, sometimes he would. After a couple of them we both learned to quit acting like children (and he learned that old man strength doesn't trump pissed off testosterone filled teenager taking weight training classes).... Too bad it took him 45 years and getting into brawls with his only son to get his shit together and quit being a child but whatever. We have a tight relationship now and we're both much better men. 
I work with disabled adults, and feel the same way. A few of my coworkers feel comfortable talking about them while they're in the room without acknowledging them, never apologize to them when there's a screw up on the staff member's part, or literally treating them like objects that can just be moved without even letting them know (they're mostly in wheelchairs, and one has a tendency to intentionally block doorways because she thinks it's funny). I get that most of them are non-verbal, but it's been made very clear to us that, with a few exceptions, most can *understand* words even if they can't say them. It's pretty shitty to act like that toward them, too. 
My German Shepherd is a crazy thing around me. He's completely obedient around my husband. Cat? Sits on the kitchen counter all "fuck you!" with me. Husband? She sees him and she's off the counter immediately. And this is why it's probably a good thing that I'm sterile and he doesn't want kids. I'm so fuming permissive that they'd grow up into nightmares unless my husband played 'bad guy' all the time. And no, he's never lay a finger on the pets. He just has a stern voice and believes rules mean rules. Except with me, thank god. And he acknowledges and is thankful for my permissive with him. He says I'm super low maintenance. 
my mom told me that sperm travel from a man to a woman during "hugging and things", so I spent a long time imagining sperm coming out of skin pores or something, then flying through the air and tiny spaces between people's clothes so they could enter the other person through their clothes and skin. 
My libraries still do summer reading, but you need a parent to sign you up and an adult has to be with anyone under 10 at all times. They're still very much children-friendly places, just... not for children by themselves. It sucks, but the culture at large is different now. Even when we didn't notice children were in the library alone (because they were just calmly using library materials) often other adults would come up to the library staff to tattle on them. We're bound by the laws of our parent organizations (like local government) that might forbid unsupervised minors in public places, so if we know about it, we have to do something. It used to be no one cared--but a lot of people care a lot now. Though, I'll be honest, I met way more adults who ditched their kids in the library than I met kids who were happily independent. 
I relate to that so hard. As a kid I wouldn't hang out with her, not because I liked her, but because I knew my dad would make fun of and tease me about liking her. 
Married a year, expecting a kid, own a house together "so I started seeing someone, this one could be serious" 
Either that or someone's been playing some Jeff Dunham / Achmed the Dead Terrorist for him. 
I'm a girl so when my Dad would hit me, I'd lose but we would get into crazy arguments. Crazy fights but it's weird we are close now too. Parents are just broken from their childhood and are doing the best they know how. Thank goodness they changed. 
I'm autistic and have seen some 100% nonverbal people post on autistic forums. They are usually just as intelligent as everyone else, but someone who can't speak and isn't taught sign language is going to come across as having a low IQ no matter what the truth is. I've seen the frustration of people who are mentally and physically adults but are treated like toddlers. I've experienced a touch of it when I've gone nonverbal in public. My heart breaks for those who are treated like that 24/7. 
I mean my mum was a bit graphic but I'm glad she told me as I was the sort of kid that if she told me that I would be petrified of going outside in case I got pregnant. Until the age of 8 though I grew inside a cabbage and my parents picked me out of a field... 
I was going to mention the parents dropping kids off for "free daycare". I have a friend who is a lifeguard- she says there are 8-year olds waiting at the gate at 10 am when the pool closes and who stay The whole day, all summer long. For all she knows, they're dropped off at 8am. This is a pool outside town, so it's unlikely that the children walked. 
I feel the same. We're blessed to live in a time where a tutorial for almost anything ever is easily at our fingertips. 
I think this would probably get me into bondage and bdsm later in life if I were you. Lol 
This is definitely the bigger problem. We've had to call police to collect children that were left after closing time if we couldn't get in touch with their parents. Many, many children are left at the library alone because their parents can't or won't have them with them. 
And he didn't even shout "Mein Fuhrer, I can walk!". Might almost have saved it. 
This one girl I know who's about 16 has him added as a friend on Facebook and the dude will straight-up leave links to his newest videos on her pictures. 
I remember when 10minutes was the maximum allowed time for a video 
"If you're reading this comment, I hope you have a great day :)) -from a small youtuber" 
And then you clearly see his desktop with shortcuts to six different games that came out that year. Heh 
The original polish mountain lady is actually pretty hilarious. 
Onision is one of those YouTubers where I won't even look at his videos for ammunition, because I'm worried my adblock will slip up and he'll get a penny of revenue from me gathering material. 
I've noticed it happens a lot to Ryan Higa. He made a good video making fun of it though. 
A few weeks later he did a view of himself "being smuggled in a suitcase" on a TigerAir flight, which TigerAir immediately debunked (he's too heavy to get past the weigh-in, he couldn't have survived in the depressurised luggage compartment, and they have footage of him boarding the flight). 
Not just Tmartn- FaZe Clan also owned a CS:GO betting site without admitting it (CSGOWild) 
**SERIAL RAPIST ACQUITTED AFTER 'EXPERIMENT' DEFENSE** 
It was even more pathetic back in the day, when YouTube selected the thumbnail from the video. People would add 1 single frame with the hot girl in the exact place YouTube picked for the thumbnail The top comment was always: "[time stamp] for thumbnail" 
I'm glad to say I have no idea what you are talking about. 
Lmao I did that as a kid when I was bored from time to time... first time I heard of this 'challenge' and saw some people getting fucked up from it, only thing I could think was "OH WOW.... glad that never happened to me as a kid!" ... it's like as if someone just came up with the idea to do stupid shit you did as a kid, slap a celebrities name on it, and call it a challenge? "The Melania Trump nose challenge!! Stuff miniature checker peices in your nose and blow them out at full force! This trains your nose muscles to get stronger and also gives you the appearance of a sexy, narrow nose!" What the fuck 
A lot of top 10 videos in general bug me. I like a lot of them as they're fun and interesting, but there are those youtubers who base their channels off of just top 10 videos and the topics get so mundane and stupid. "Top 10 most iconic cheeses" is an actual thing 
And how are they all under fair use law. I tried to make a video with 10 seconds of the intro song to a show and I got flagged immediately. These people react to full 15 minute videos and nothing. 
Yeah I think that was RichKidsTv. He was a spoiled brat. 
Sure, that girl looks like she'd break in half if you sneezed at her, but how can I make that about *meeee*? 
Diarrhea can cause severe dehydration, and in a worst case scenario, even death. Castor oil was used to torture political dissenters during fascist Italy. It's a really shitty thing to do to anyone, let alone kids. 
A lot of YouTubers actually don't ask but the dev will come to them. Like when farcry primal was coming out Ubisoft want to people and paid them to play it. There probably are some people that do ask/beg for the dev to play them. 
He made a promise to his fans on twitter, and actually followed through on it. And it wasn't clickbait either, he straight up ate a sock while giving a guide on how to make the tastiest sock you can eat. 
If you go on pornhub youll see she already has vids on there 
My favourite film of all time! Some of the finest black comedy ever made. 
Lmao I used to have him on facebook but the dude makes a new account like every month and it's far too much effort to keep re-adding him. He used to do that shit like that all the time, though he did once wish me happy birthday which was pretty cool. 
It's so sad, he relapsed to alcoholism with a Jack Daniels chug because some moron challenged him on YouTube. Now he's doing the crazy crap again, he needs help. 
I saw some douche say that to a cop once, and he was clearly being detained. "Am I being Detained?" Yes "Am I free to go?" No, you are not. You are being detained. 
*sits quietly for 30 seconds* Ha *silence again* 
I remember also when you had to have a channel at a certain age to upload videos longer than 15 minutes. 
Don't worry about giving him revenue, YouTube goes by how long a person watched the video. So if you clicked on the video just to read the comments, you'll give him a view, but he won't get any money because YouTube can see how long a person watched the video for, and they won't pay him if people only watched the first couple seconds. 
He's the most creative YouTuber I have ever seen. The shit he thinks of 
One literal week earlier*** that's why i didn't believe the getting kicked off the plane bullshit for a second 
He actually recorded himself saying "let's count to 10 loud and see if people freak out". And some videos show him standing up and selfie singing mid flight. I'd want to punch the grown ass fucker that acts like a little kid on the crummy little plane 
you hear a girl on Skype (I think girlfriend) see this then gasp then immediately tries to distract people with a "my cute dog" story. Always makes me laugh 
"Hey N***er! OW! Why are you beating me? It was just a prank bro!" 
Do you remember that one girl who would talk about Skyrim and other inane shit wearing a low-cut tank top, and it was always trending for a while during those days? Top comment on those was always "My dick clicked this video" or something similar. 
I don't remember where I heard this, but I think reports like that count against their popularity algorithm placement 
Heh Philip DeFranco stopped doing it because analytics pointed out that the videos without half naked women actually did better. 
The thing I don't get is, how the hell do ad companies think it is beneficial to have small children seeing their 15 second ads? Are they gonna go out and pay for their dinner at Outback Steakhouse with their toddler money? 
Daddy finger, daddy finger, where are you? Here I am, here I am, fuuuuuck you. 
I agree when I saw it pop up while me and my niece were watching youtube I immediately thought it was a fetish video. 
If only. It's where they'll call the cops with a false threat, usually something like "Oh Pewdiepie has 6 hostages and he's threatening to murder all of them you need to hurREEEEEEEEE" or something. This prompts the SWAT team to respond instead of an officer or two. 
Buys views, enough that YouTube pushes it to the Suggested Videos pane. From there, it only takes a small fraction of all the people who see it to click it to get that number. 
It's honestly kind of impressive how long they can bullshit with such little information. 
What makes me angry is that so many people didn't notice how fake it was. His die hard fans seemed to just straight up forget he'd made references to noticing colours in previous videos. There was some part in the video where he pretended he didn't know his pet parrot was colourful, but in his youtube bio he specifically mentions he has a colourful bird. It's like Sean Spicer level lying 
Yeah, the latest one I saw he threw eggs at her then emptied a bag of flour on her in public and then wondered why she wanted to walk home. 
ALSO, they named their first daughter Symphony Pearl, which is so fucking stupid that it causes me to lose my even any time I think about it. 
Also didn't he take piss out of the toilet? Would the pee even still be potent enough for a good reading, because I have had friends that had a negative test while they were pregnant purely because they tested at night and not in the morning when their hCG levels were higher. 
And when they do get flagged, they make ten videos bitching about it. 
She didn't. She went to my highschool, and is still alive. 
Yeah. She would have to be chained in his basement for three days and his response when that came out? To make a video showing how awesome his basement is and be like "psh, it's not like I'd have her chained in a dungeon guys jeez" 
Bonus points if they're hand holding the camera but the task requires two hands... 
Oh god the background thing. Putting aside why you'd even *want* a pornographic desktop background, how can you not at least think, "hmm, maybe I should change that before I tell the world how to download this cool Minecraft hack"?? 
You're absolutely gorgeous, and I wanted to ask you - feel free to say no - if you'd like to play a really quick game, for a really quick kiss. 
I know Funhaus has a decent amount of sponsered videos. Makes sense from a business standpoint, they average a few hundred thousand views per video and it's all the target market of people interested in video games. I really don't see the issue with it if they disclose it's a sponsered video. No different than Shaq trying to sell me Gold Bond baby powder. 
Or when she says "he was attacking people on the way out". And then it just shows footage of her security being aggressive as fuck while idubbz is just laughing and making his way out. 
I don't know how often viewers look at the description but a lot of her uber stories actually did have a promo code "LINKED IN THE DESCRIPTION BELOW SO YOU CAN GO CHECK THAT OUT" -every youtuber ever. I really don't care about promos, if a youtuber wants to be sponsored, then go right ahead. The thing is, she fucking lied about this, and for a couple videos she managed to slip in retarded shit like "I don't wanna be sponsored because I don't care about the money." Bull fucking shit tana mongoose. 
Yeah idubbbz made a great point about that. He said she could've made a video just saying the joke was in bad taste and inappropriate, condemning his use of the word in public and painting him as a weirdo. Boom, destroyed. But nope, she didn't because she's predictable. 
I need a link. Not for science, I just want to masturbate 
Mandrake, have you ever seen a commie drink a glass of water? 
Happy Birthday! Check out my new video, I dedicated it to your birthday! 
In my state, this is the detention law: "A law enforcement officer lawfully present in any place may, in the performance of his duties, stop and detain any person who he reasonably suspects is committing, has committed, or is about to commit (1) a felony, or (2) a misdemeanor involving danger of forcible injury to persons or of appropriation of or damage to property, if such action is reasonably necessary either to obtain or verify the identification of the person or to determine the lawfulness of his conduct. An officer acting under this rule may require the person to remain in or near such place in the officer's presence for a period of not more than fifteen (15) minutes or for such time as is reasonable under the circumstances. At the end of such period the person detained shall be released without further restraint, or arrested and charged with an offense." 
I checked out some of those videos a bit back and what I seen was that if they actually talk and say something at all, half the comments are: "Don't talk you're missing the video". They don't add anything what so ever and the second they add commentary their fans hate the video. 
I thought that time watched was only relevant if you had youtube red. other than that I thought it was time watched on the ads on the video. 
Well he was one of the people doing it before you could really make any money, so making funny videos is actually something he's passionate about and wants to put lots of work into it to create an awesome end product. 
i feel like you would get the same reaction if you counted to 10 in english 
Or Phantoml0rd, please don't forget about him doing that bullshit 
I know I just went through the whole string of comments with a BBC article about the whole thing. (One of the more interesting things in the Dorset section of BBC news for a while) Also while he might not think it was wrong to do that, cps doesn't really care about the defendants 'morals' and just goes by the law. 
One day someone is gonna get shot doing something that fucking stupid. That's not a prank. He will either do it in front of the cops or someone with a gun and get exactly what he deserves. I don't have words for how fucked up and traumatizing that would be 
My dick upvoted your comment. Happy Valentine's Day! 
The analytics must've shown that holding his neck in the video's thumbnail was profitable because that seems to be his thing now. 
Go to Vsauce's channel, sort by "oldest". It's a far cry from his current content. 
You don't have any toddlers, do you? :) Young kids often rule spending decisions for families. McDonald's know this, that's why they advertise heavily during kid's programming. It's the same idea. 
But when he gets swatted he's a little baby bitch about it and plays the victim card. 
Try listening to sports radio talk about the NFL after the season is over. 
Haven't seen the vids myself, but someone above pointed out how H3H3 and iDubbbz showed evidence of him identifying all the colours he supposedly couldn't see in his earlier videos. Scum, if you ask me 
I just rewatched the video and he did just that. He used an eyedropper which is better than just scooping up a handful of piss like I was expecting. But still. If my husband told me he played around in my piss and took a pregnancy test 'for' me I don't think I would be too pleased. 
"Youtube is SHUTTING DOWN MY CHANNEL! Part 20 of 50" 
Not having even a remotely decent camera or mic is pretty much a staple of these crap-ass channels. Bonus points if it's all done on a phone in portrait, and there was clearly zero editing of any sort done in the whole video. 
How do you hire some kidss and hot girls to do mommy make out day (GONE SEXUAL). 
Most aggressive thing he did was hold up his pass and say "but I'm VIP!" 
I loved his response regarding that. "You could have said it wasn't funny, that it was a stupid joke. And it was! That would have destroyed me! But you couldn't do that could ya, cause you're the most predictable person in the world." Paraphrasing of course. 
"He said war was too important to be left to the generals. When he said that, 50 years ago, he might have been right. But today, war is too important to be left to politicians. They have neither the time, the training, nor the inclination for strategic thought. I can no longer sit back and allow Communist infiltration, Communist indoctrination, Communist subversion and the international Communist conspiracy to sap and impurify all of our precious bodily fluids." 
At the time it was his girlfriend, I believe. So I guess she was shocked at his mistake and tried diverting the attention from viewers. 
It's no longer enough to just watch YouTube. I want to *watch someone* watch YouTube *for me*. 
Makes me think of older Smosh where it was just two kids messing around with a camera. I used to find those videos massively entertaining. 
Exactly. He was kicked for being an annoying little cunt, not for being Arabic. Victimhood is strong with him and his supporters. Either create or find personal offence for anything and everything. 
Has to do with Counter Strike GO where a person who ran a website for the game pretended to find his own betting site and won money by betting. He wasn't, it was staged and it came out later that he owned the betting site. Someone probably has more info than I do, though. 
I think I saw a video with 2 "pranksters". One of them was holding the other at gunpoint in public and would scare people. If I remember correctly I think one of the passerby was armed and shot the dude holding the take gun. 
Holy crap. First Crane Couple now you. Never thought me posting about my love for claw machine videos would get to this level. I appreciate you commenting and have mentioned a couple of times on here how you just seem like a really genuine dude. I've enjoyed your videos for a few years now and continue to. I hope you find another holographic Borg card. 
Holy crap. Totally unexpected. Loved your videos on the Las Vegas arcades. You guys are one of the 3 channels I continuously watch on the subject and I just binge watched a bunch of your videos the other night. 
Now that's talent! Have you considered a career in Cock Magic? 
Yeah, Phil just uses his face with other stuff from the video put in the background. I think he has a serious neck injury though since he's always holding his neck in his thumbnails. 
Someone did a collage of them not long ago, right? 
I find it pretty awesome how a channel like Vsauce went from that to being some of the very best content on youtube 
I would think so if they're making money. Especially if they're making money 
YouTube for Kids has ads, but they aren't from the same crop of ads as regular YouTube. 
"Mommy, mommy! I want the 2 for $20 happening right now at Applebee's but only for a limited time" 
I remember that. I fucking cried. I'll admit it. Now he is king douchenozzle 
You don't even need mods to play monopoly in minecraft, rooster teeth/ achievement hunter did it. 
"It's not just *reacting*! It's our *personalities* that get views!" 
"Hang on, let me go find a stack of old egg cartons and corn husks to put my phone on..." *eight minutes of corn husk and egg carton-tripod creating* 
Oh god the same thing happened to me. I'm pretty much car illiterate but me and my dad thought we could use YouTube to figure out how to replace the brakes on my car. Couldn't do it. Didn't help that when I went to r/cartalk to ask about how to replace the brakes on my car I just got called a dumbshit and a pussy because I didn't know how to do something I'd never done before and had no prior knowledge of how to do it and came to the subreddit to ask for help IN A HELP BASED SUBREDDIT. Go suck a dick, r/cartalk. 
Yeah I watched a little bit of their newer stuff and it's just flat out bad. 
That's not just YouTube policy, he also violated the law. 
There was that one where he kidnapped his friend and threatened him with a gun. Fairly good acting in that one actually, if you went back in time to before all the prank BS started and showed someone that video, they would think he actually kidnapped the guy. 
It can be claimed to be a satirical parody, and any judge would be reluctant to convict them for the fear of setting a precedent against satirical works. 
YouTube for Kids also has those fuck-awful Bad Babies videos. 3 year old has a kid's Fire tablet and what starts off as Bubble Guppies surprise egg videos or Mommy Finger Sing Alongs (don't ask), in two or three clicks becomes screaming 10 year olds dressed as infants climbing on counters and turning on the garden hose in the living room *WHILE SCREAMING*. Fortunately, I'm always in the same room so as soon as I hear that goddamned screaming, I take the device. Seems to be working, but when as he figures out how to mute the sound I'm screwed. He skips ads like a champ, but the volume control is tricky for fat little fingers when the device is in the case. If I ever find those Bad Baby Bitches, I may kill them. If you're on Reddit, Bad Babies, run up on me - I'm ready. Fuckers. Let's see who screams. 
In honesty, kids pick up on that "only for a limited time" bullshit more than anyone else. 
I still follow his stream. There are still a lot of us out there that support him. He's actually (at least from what I can tell), just a nice older guy who likes Runescape. I haven't checked in on him recently (my job has become more time-draining than normal), but last I heard he was doing well. I think it helped him feel better that so many other human beings were honestly concerned about him, and wanted him to continue. Watching a grown man seriously cry the way he cried will never cease to make me feel like crap, it legit hurt him and Keem basically apologized but didn't (if that makes sense). I have never met Keem, but I have a very intense hatred for what he did to this man and how he swatted other people whose channels I watched. I also dislike how he was flat-out banned from youtube and violated their policy with a loophole to get back on air. People could've died due to his actions. It's no joke and he needs to grow up and focus on becoming an adult. 
I stopped watching Syndicate *way* before the scandal. Stopped maybe when he was done with his original Minecraft series? God knows when that was but I didn't watch Tmartn. He's another of those annoying fuckers that spends 5 minutes on an intro. Take 10 seconds, introduce yourself, what you're playing and **play the fucking game** 
Popular videos get suggested to more people. More people click because of the suggestions, and the cycle continues onward. Once you get the ball rolling you get popular fast. 
Ray: "You gotta be kidding me." Michael: "What is this, boys?" Ray: "This is Monopoly. I'm just gonna leave the game now." 
Then their mic is super loud or just cuts out for part of the video so they add some crap-ass annotations to cover it, rather than recording the audio separately to begin with, the way anyone who gives a shit would :P 
It's bad but I at least appreciate it isn't outright objectionable. Anthony and Ian don't seem like bad people and they were really smart in marketing their success. I'm happy that they found a way to thrive at making silly videos for kids. 
I remember back when youtube videos were pretty much expected to be low-quality, it was weird if it looked professional and high-quality. I think Vine brought that back a little. 
This is so true when I was a really little kid watching car commercials I got genuinely anxious about my future prospects of buying a car because I thought all the deals would end before I was old enough to drive. I was three 
Honestly stopped watching all minecraft youtubers now. The only person I still religiously watch is Ethoslab. He's always been the best Minecraft streamer there is. 
 SIZZLE EQUALS SUBS. SIZZLE EQUALS SUBS. SIZZLE EQUALS SUBS. SIZZLE EQUALS SUBS. 
If they're posting it on Facebook then they're all in on it 
Even better they don't have a mic, so you just see them typing out the instructions into a notepad while they think of whatever the fuck they're trying to say. 
Smosh was my JAM when Youtube started. I remember watching their first videos at teh very start. When you could comment on them and actually get a reply. Lol. 
I think that was actually one of the reasons people figured out that lonelygirl15 wasn't legit. 
I just want you to know that the image of this made me smile a little bit and I want to thank you for that 
To be fair when you are a kid waiting a year for it to be available again is a significant portion of their current life and appropriately dismissed as realistically relevant. 
I am just now fighting with CA unemployment after being part of a layoff. If they would just give everyone 3 months unemployment with no vetting process, it would be cheaper than the bureaucratic nightmare that exists now. 
Life-long tree hugger here. If it's a choice between mass coal or nuclear power (which it is, at least for now) nuclear is sooooo much better. Not ideal, but at least the really dangerous byproducts are locked away for centuries instead of being spewed into the air we breathe or released into the ground to poison our water. 
It makes me happy to know there are other people that feel this way. My family (conservatives) don't understand why I don't agree with religion, believe in LGBT rights, and health care. And my liberal friends can't comprehend the fact that I enjoy owning guns, hunting, and being able to protect myself while also not being a criminal. It's so silly and activating that there aren't major political candidates that share these views. 
Don't yuck another's yum, it's a good way of thought. 
Eminent domain is something every country on earth has and uses in some form, and is a bit of a necessary evil. The government needs land sometimes, and sometimes people are already there. It is something that needs to be very closely monitored to insure it isn't abused, but there really isn't an alternative. 
The fact that conservationists and conservatives are political enemies is a sign that something has gone horribly wrong in the English language. 
This is one that is never discussed. For me it's in the same camp as marijuana/drug legalization. People are going to do it either way and making it illegal is only funding dangerous criminal organizations. 
I always say that nobody wants big government. Nobody is arguing for the department of redundant bureaucracy. We all want the smallest government that can effectively function. We just drastically disagree on what constitutes a functioning government. 
At this point, I'm not sure NSA is a liberal point; especially since the FBI just acquired the same capabilities and a little more. 
Liberal here, but I found a pretty compelling argument for keeping the military so large. Basically, given how large the American army is, America gets to negotiate for policies that are in their best interests globally, because the army is a huge ass bargaining chip. 
Progressive here. It's interesting to me that Canada, our great liberal neighbor to the north, has a much stricter and better-enforced immigration system than we do. Not only that, but because of that enforcement, it's actually easier and faster to become a Canadian citizen than it is to become a US citizen. 
In all instances? I'm liberal, but I am okay with the death penalty for serial killers and mass murders when there is no doubt whatsoever that they are guilty. 
I think most people ITT are confusing conservative for Republican and liberal for Democrat. They are not synonyms for each other. 
I think I've come to the conclusion, for myself at least, that's what pro choice means. I spent a long time wrestling to decide which side of the abortion argument I belong on (as a mostly left leaning independent), until I finally came to the conclusion that I was pro choice. Not because I would ever try to convince someone to get an abortion, but because I don't believe I should be making that decision for other people. 
Conservatives are generally ok with animal abuse and littering? 
It's also a pretty good investment to keep your work force healthy or less encumbered with care for their kids/parents. We're all cogs in a machine, a smart operator pays for maintainance. 
I am against the death penalty not because I feel it is unjust, but because of our poor batting average at getting the correct verdict. 
There should be a stipulation that all duels be filmed (in landscape). 
You go, man. The second amendment is made for this. There's a book called, "This nonviolent stuff'll get you killed", about guns owned by blacks in the civil rights era. I gotta read it sometime. 
Free markets are great for things like whiskey, sports cars or restaurants. Throw in a little oversight for safety and you're good. They're shit when it comes to things like healthcare, policing or education at all. They simply can't provide those services at any decent level. 
I consider myself a pretty strong feminist but I love that word. I don't discriminate with it either. Guys can be cunts and ladies can be dicks. And everyone is an asshole. 
To be frank; I have literally never seen or heard a trans* person do the "did you just assume my gender thing" I'm like 85% sure that's literally only a meme that gets perpetuated far more than people using it seriously 
I bet the higher ups of businessman conservatives have. The ones who aren't married and want to keep their money anyways 
even those of us that want a college education would benefit greatly from better apprenticeship programs so we actually have an idea what we want to go learn in college 
Universal measures are almost always cheaper in the long run than more individualized ones. Trying to decide who gets what and when is extremely costly-- not to mention it leaves a lot of room for error. It also means people have to fight tooth and nail to get unemployment checks, which is a setback in and of itself. If you got it automatically and there was an end date, people would be able to focus on getting a job. It would be a stopgap, like government help is supposed to be. I understand that a lot of conservatives don't like welfare, but on some level it's a necessary part of a productive society to provide for citizens when they have extraordinary circumstances--which everyone will at some point. Universal unemployment, health care, etc. would be the most fiscally and bureaucratically responsible option. 
A friend/colleague of mine just lost his job days after tearing his meniscus. He can't make it to job interviews and is now uninsured after his job loss. He is going to get on Mass Health so he can get his knee repaired, but to keep free Mass Health he can't collect unemployment. If he collected unemployment, he wouldn't be able to afford actually paying for most insurances or treatment. I.E. if he wants to fix his knee, he can't have any income, and if he wants income he can't fix his knee. Also, he is living thousands of miles away from home with his significant other. I've never quite seen the USA system in action until I ran across this dilemma. 
Another misunderstood thing about nuclear power is that there are modern breeder reactor designs that recycle most of their waste. 
Most are cool with it , except Jill Stein and some of the green party. 
Doctors in Australia are also similarly protected by legislature. S282A of the Australian Criminal Code stipulates that doctors cannot be held criminally liable for adhering to the "Doctrine of Double Effect" (i.e. if I give you this drug it'll relieve your suffering, but also shorten your lifespan). 
+1 It's almost like Planned Parenthood helps people plan.. parenthood.. hm, strange. 
Probably because while you agree with all of those things, you would disagree on a lot of issues revolving around illegal immigration, gun control and far more importantly things like taxes and healthcare and student debt 
On the other hand, it can be quite pleasant to get one's yuck yummed. 
You know, the most bizarre thing to me about the bi-partisanship / dichotomy of US politics is how social issues (e.g. LGBT, religion, discrimination, etc.) are so intertwined with political-economic issues (e.g. big government, economic policies, etc.) It's bizarre to me because it's entirely possible to be a liberal in social issues, but have beliefs about the economy leaning towards conservative. And vice versa. This is honestly my insight looking at every single answer in this entire thread. 
I'm a conservative, and I've always considered conservation of the environment an important aspect of being a conservative. Republican bastardization of conservatism has speciously associated it with disregard for environmental health. Even if you look at it purely economically it doesn't make sense. If you're polluting the environment for short term gain you could potentially lose a greater amount of money in the long term. That's assuming you're interested in who will be liable for the costs. 
and putting sex workers in a shitload of danger when they could easily be working for a regulated business that gets audited and frequently visited by inspectors 
Yeah, I have always thought of this love of big government often attributed to liberals as something of a strawman. 
Ugh, I'm a responsible person who works 6 months non stop a year, then have6 months off. For the 1-4 months of my first oart, I just want to do some mdma and go to a concert with my girlfriend and dance my ass off. Then I still pass the drug test. But now I can't because I'm worried I'll get a fentanyl batch and die. I wish I could just go to the pharmacy and get 100% pure mdma with an explanation Of the current known side effects and things to be mindful of. 
They are really 2 types of conservatism, libertarian conservatism and authoritarian conservatism. 
Its an authoritarian point, which is both democrat and republican at this point. I hate politics. 
This! I don't care if you're liberal or conservative...we only have one planet! 
Non conservative and not OP but still; Republican heartland is business, especially those involved in fossil fuels and other production. Clean earth bills put a major dent in profit margins, prevent a lot of things that effect their bottom line. Until there's ENOUGH pressure from conservatives like OP, they will keep up the argument to appease their funding platform. 
I'm Canadian, I wouldn't like our government to spend as much as the US does on the military, but I realize how much of a benefit it is to Canada that the US has a massive military. Nobody fucks with Canada because then they have to deal with the US, and in turn we can cut down our military spending. We just have to hope you don't invade, cause we may as well go "fuck it, we're the ~~52nd~~ 51st state, eh". 
This is for both you and u/thecooliestofthemall, but I've been in the military for a fair bit of time, and I can tell you the biggest joke & waste of taxpayer money is the GSA. Unless we can come up with a mountain of justification, we have to buy equipment, supplies, furniture, etc through this organization that has the most artificially inflated prices I've ever seen. That and for some reason, there has been this transition from everything on base/post being run by military to outsourcing that shit to private contractors. Fucking hell, we don't need a goddamn cleaning service that goes around and restocks and cleans the restrooms once a week, that's what we have fucking junior enlisted for. 
I've always felt that the Left has solutions for the Rights problems, and the Right has solutions for the Lefts problems. Its just, they don't want to admit that or don't agree with the methods. 
I'm liberal, I agree with the death penalty on principle, though not in practice. Far too many innocent people are sent to jail to justify it imo. 
Basically the left has won the social battles of the last 60 years (civil rights, women's lib, gay rights, gay marriage, drugs [soon]) and the right has won the economic ones (free trade, lower taxes) 
The Socialist Rifle Association is a budding new organization! 
Well yeah, duh. I also think cars are fun but I'm not gonna complain about drivers exams. 
Enron made all sorts of real money by pretending to have fake money from setting up a horde of small businesses. If you said small business had no taxes, Exxon would suddenly be 4.2 billion one-share corporations. 
Yeah. There are some taxes you can't avoid, those are usually local taxes like sales tax or business license tax. My first two years (S Corp) were losses I got to deduct on my taxes. Similarly with an LLC or C Corp, the losses carry forward as deductions. If you want less taxes on small businesses, look locally not federally. 
This is very true... It really only goes so far though, as combat resulting in death starts to become very sticky. Also, many police in the state are completely unaware of Washington's stance... So unless you're prepared for a night in jail, stick to areas in Seattle with friendly and educated police officers. (Some of them really love watching a good fight) 
Nope, you are correct. Even Antonin Scalia, arguably one of the most conservative Supreme Court justices in recent historu, was of the opinion that flag burning should be protected by the First Amendment. 
Yep, when he was Governor of California, but it doesn't end there. Many people are pretty convinced it was under his direction that the CIA introduced crack to Oakland and LA as a way to undermine the Black Community/Black Panthers. 
"There's no single guys left in Manhattan!" "I know someone who's new in town." "What are three other things about him?!" 
There are definitely a notable amount of Republicans that are socially liberal and fiscally conservative. I know a few people that despise the Republican party's stance(s) on social issues but always vote Republican anyways because of their economic views. 
As a feminist I actually never liked how it seemed to be the last bastion of Very Bad Words. We can now say fuck on TV but cunt is still bleeped out? Is a vagina still the very worst thing someone can be? Honestly. Great word tho. 
In my circle of progressive friends the wealthier ones LOVED Hillary (often disliked Bernie because he is unreasonable and/or unrealistic) and the working class ones LOVED Bernie (often hated Hillary because she is hawkish and/or bought by corporate interests). Purely anecdotal, but I could never find proper demographic stats that included economic status during the primaries. I don't think wealthy or financially secure people care that Hillary gave shady speeches to Goldman Sachs or that she wasn't for $15/hour and free higher education. 
There's a mindset among the poor (that I fell into) that you have to go to college asap and get that degree to get out. Unfortunately, this is an inexperienced view of college. If you can afford college, I always suggest seeing if you can afford a somewhat free gap year. You need to go learn everything you can about the outside world in that year. I would have had a totally different school career had I done this. Instead I treated it like Ultra High School and now have a degree I'm using to get a generic well-paying job instead of a specialized one. Hell, maybe I would have gone into a trade. College gets held up as this end-all-be-all of your financial future, but it's just not a right fit for many folks. 
Now imagine if he were in another state -- Mass Health is one of the best in the country. 
Obama had a fair point in regards to the single payer system: Health Insurance companies provide about 500k jobs to the US economy. Phasing out this massive industry could be a significant blow to the US economy. 
I'm curious as to why this is. Whats the mood towards the NHS over there and how well or poorly is it actually doing? 
Yes, and with more fine tuning waste can become negligible. It's like saying, let's support solar so it can be improved in the future, but let's ignore the fact that nuclear can be improved as well... 
I was really disappointed and surprised by Jill Stein's stance on nuclear power :/ 
Neo-conservative. Supply-side-Jesus conservative. "Christian Republican." These are all different words for the same politicians who usurped party power from actual conservatives slowly over the course of several decades. When you look at the basis of what liberal and conservative politics of the past *used* to mean then the party's seem like two marathoners both trying to reach a finish line and less like two apposing teams rushing each other. Liberal politicians have become so two-faced that it is impossible to take their word any more. Meanwhile the GOP is full of people who actually think that religion and expensive spending on walls, prisons, and anti-abortion legislation will somehow fix the country. American politics need a reboot. What's sad is that the current system is so engrained and backwards that I think the only solution will be heads on pikes. Literally not figuratively. 
Wait a second... Are you trying to say that if we reduce unwanted pregnancies, we reduce the number of abortions? Someone get the president! 
Actually, old conservatives like Eisenhower were more in line with that. The modern republican party has become kind of twisted. 
Unfortunately our representatives don't really represent us. That goes for all of us. 
My dad voted Trump, and was vapid about the anti-Hillary on Facebook. I was terrified to talk to him over Thanksgiving, because I'm a massive HRC supporter and don't want to avoid issues or have conflict with him. We talked through it and realized that we actually have 90% agreement on where we want this country to go. And 100% disagreement about who we trust to lead us in that direction. 
Exactly. I mean, I'm sure they exist, but they're unlikely to show their face, even in an "accepting" thread like this... :( 
It is. A liberal government might be bigger than a conservative government, but I think the better argument revolves around how "big" the government is in regards to controlling people's lives. For the most part Americans can do whatever they want. Liberals tend to want to legalize drugs too, for example, which actually would give *less* power to the government since they have lost a way to enforce their will upon you. Similarly, socialized medicine leads to more freedom for everyone because now healthcare isn't limited to those who can afford it. So the key difference tends to be that liberals want as much freedom as possible, and see the government as a tool to reach these goals, whereas conservatives also want freedom, but see the government as an obstruction to these goals. 
I'm not a fan of her, but proof? She really just isn't funny, and I think it sucks that many female comedians rely on vagina and sex jokes. It's tired. Why not just do some social commentary? Talk about normal shit. It doesn't always have to boil down to sex. I'm not against taking about sex, but when that is what your career relies on, it's bullshit. 
This is why I don't like the term fiscally conservative. Everyone is against wasteful spending! but a lot of these social programs are good investments for long term gains. One can even argue that being fiscally conservative means supporting taxes since increasing revenue would be good for keeping the budget. 
If I remember correctly (it's been a while since I studied the social welfare state in college...) Canada also employs what's called monopsony buying power, meaning they've positioned themselves as the only buyer of certain types of pharmaceuticals. Just like a monopoly controls the price of "product x" by being the only seller of that product in a given market, a monopsony (in this case, the Canadian government), can control the price of "Medicine X" by being the only group available to sell it to. If the Canadian government believes the drug is too expensive to resell to their citezenry, they simply refuse to buy any pills at all. This drives down the prices on lots of different types of medicine, as all the money a pharmaceutical company has spent developing that drug is wasted if the company never sells a pill. Why we don't use this system in the states, I'm not quite sure, but I imagine the pharmaceutical lobby has something to do with it ;). 
Universal healthcare is also cheaper because with the care being free people are more likely to get something looked at or get preventative care than deal with it when it's a serious issue and more expensive. The way we have it now it's almost a coinflip on whether any major bill I would have will be covered by my insurance. 
Fuck there's fentanyl batches going around? That's insanely terrifying. When I was rolling nearly a decade ago the only thing we had to worry about was meth bombs and even those were kinda fun cuz you're just jittery as fuck the next day smoking a cigarette outside of 711 with your buddy drinking an Arizona Arnold Palmer looking and feeling cracked out after a fun night of bass and light shows. Sadly I'm a contributor to society now and a square, and miss those days, I'm just reminiscing. 
I think a lot of younger liberals are on board with government programs to balance out income inequality, health care, education, and protect the environment, but don't want it anywhere else. Gov't doesn't belong in your love life. Our military doesn't belong in other countries. Smoke what you want. Shoot what you want (maybe not, I'm a pro-gun liberal but I know I'm not the norm.) 
It's not going well so far, none of the taxes to be made from recreational marijuana are set to go to education. It's a pity, we probably could have beat Colorado's $35 million raised for education in a year. 
Not if we colonize Mars. Manifest Destiny, bitches! 
Also, just *try* to get a blue collar worker from Ohio to give a shit about sea level rise. 
Pro-nuclear environmentalist here. We exist ;-). Should have gone nuclear decades ago so we could transfer to renewables etc now from that. Remember that oil and gas companies push anti-nuclear as well due to the competition. 
this is my exact problem. i used to be pro death penalty but as more and more cases pile up where someone was executed or sentenced based on faulty or outright forged evidence, i am more and more against it. in theory it works well but in practice and (heh) execution, it's extremely flawed and has taken many innocent lives. 
Lower taxes are debatable. When Regan became president, most states didn't have a state income tax. Today only 7 don't. The GOP has cut taxes by forcing states and local governments to pay for things the feds used to pay and a LOT of deficit spending. The National Taxpayers Union says the average American taxpayer pays about the same rate in ALL taxes as in 1980. 
That's actually pretty awesome. Like Fuck it, let the guys battle their differences out. Wish that was a more common thing. 
Well to be fair the dueling is a fist fight, no weapons, this is not NAM there are rules! 
He wasn't a conservative justice however. He was one of the biggest protecters of the 4th amendment. He often sided against LE and defended free speech. He did what justices are supposed to do. He looked at the constitution and interpreted it instead of trying to legislate from the bench. 
The Republicans haven't been fiscal conservatives for decades. 
It's a good thing he's not in Texas. We didn't expand Medicaid, so he'd be completely fucked, and probably homeless. 
I really believe solar is going to be the future of almost all of our electricity, but I need my lights on now. We should have been investing in nuclear for the past 30 years and we could be almost done with coal by now 
I was disappointed abut everything Jill Stein had to say. I wasn't too educated on her policies until I saw her AMA. I would have voted Trump well before I voted Stein. I'd probably even vote for Palin before Stein. 
Love your comment. Thanks for adding additional information. I didn't know how hospices were paid for. Sorry about the loss of your grandmother too. 
It's also a heap of shit, because Christianity is all about NONE of the things the GOP currently stands for. 
That's what I think personally. If we can increase mental health care and reduce poverty, provide better education in the inner city school districts and all that, violent crime will plummet. We can't get rid of all crime, but we need to tackle the roots. Besides. There's so many guns in the US that even if we did outright ban them, the black market for them would be enormous, and it would cater to both career criminals and would-be law abiding citizens who just want guns cuz guns are fuckin rad. 
I think the democratic party has become kinda twisted too. From an outsider's view, it looks like they're the party of the working class, along with their progressive ideals, but this election they were blatantly not for the working class, favouring rich people and businesses. Either way, it's a rather unsettled time politically. Good time to turn the table over. 
Oh cool I've been hoping to run into one of those, that means you can tell me what's wrong with this pain in my foot, right? 
Agreed. With a few notable exceptions, if we could completely replace the current crop of politicians and start fresh, I'd be rather happy. 
This. Eminent domain to build a road, a water treatment plant, a new public school, a new police or fire station. Fine. A necessary evil so to speak. But eminent domain to make way for a new wal-mart or corporate oil pipeline should be fought every step of the way. 
Plenty of older libs against weed exist, but reddit skews young. 
You've just put into words the argument against this "big gov't vs. small gov't" BS that I've had in my head for the longest time. I've just never been able to actually express it properly. Thank you. I especially like the point you made at the end. Conservatives don't want less freedom, they just have a different viewpoint on how to make more freedom a reality. 
Yeah, I used to be really fiscally conservative (in the traditional, libertarian sense) but once I thought about how so many government programs end up saving us money in the long run, I really had to seriously rethink my convictions. I really do consider myself fiscally conservative, but in the terms you describe. 
All that would have to be done to start universal healthcare in the U.S. is to remove the phrase "Over 65" from Medicare. 
I know you're just joking but in Breaking Bad Walt's goal was never to pay for his treatment, it was to leave money for his family. He initially refused to be treated at all because he said he'd rather die sooner than extend his life artificially and become a sickly burden to his family. By the time Skylar convinced him to actually pursue treatment, he'd already cooked multiple times and killed multiple people. Besides, a single income public school teacher would be covered by Medicaid anyway. I'm fun at parties. 
I love arguments that boil down to "I don't believe your evidence! Now let's have the discussion in a total vacuum!" 
Also the life expectancy in Canada is about 3 years longer than in the US. That can't be all bullets. 
Another pro-gun liberal here. Father made my day when he said he was passing down all his rifles to me thanksgiving weekend. 
Anytime the government makes more money earmarked for education they just pay less money towards education from the general fund and use it on whatever they want. Education does not actually get any more money 
It's a weird thought to me, living on the coast, of going your whole life without 1st hand experience of the ocean. And the way you phrased your comment just made me realize (again) that so many people living in the middle of the country away from the oceans probably go their entire lives without ever seeing it. I can imagine how that would create something of a disconnect between the concept of rising sea levels and why that's a problem, to say the least. 
Another pro-nuclear environmentalist here! There are dozens of us! I'm super-ultra-mega liberal. Free healthcare and basic income to all! Yay pacifism! And I'm all for solar and wind, but stopping CO2 emissions as quickly as possible is probably the most pressing issue humanity faces today, and I just don't see how we do that (without forcing the developing world to stay in poverty) if we don't use nuclear. It's way safer than most people know, getting cheaper, and doesn't suffer from the reliability issues of other renewables. Nuclear FTW! I'm also pro-GMO and think "organic" is mostly a government-sanctioned marketing scam, but that's another issue. Lefty that I am, we do have our share of pseudoscience too. 
If coal weren't artificially cheap, power companies would have all jumped on the nuclear bandwagon decades ago. 
Cheers. I'm from a Protestant Christian background. I really don't like religion, but what you were born with runs deep, and that's alright. I know it too. 
I would rather have a police regulated fist fight go down and get it over with rather than see a whole corner shut down for hours while they argue with people about who hit who first. 
He was a conservative person, he just put his duty to uphold the Constitution above his personal views. Not saying he was perfect or anything, but it's impossible to say he didn't take his job seriously 
All he needs to do is stop being lazy and pull himself up by his bootstraps /s 
I'm allergic to WiFi, it's not bullshit. My allergic reaction is that I feel calm and composed when WiFi is working, and throw a fucking fit when the WiFi goes down. 
As someone who is a life long christian it abhors me what so many people are trying to do in its name. I used to be a republican, now I would consider myself more of an independent/libertarian after this election. This loud oppressive version of christianity is not something Christ would be proud of. 
This is why, I think, so many working-class people were convinced into voting Trump this year. His anti-establishment stance that he continually promoted convinced a lot of people that he'd be a shot in the arm for the working class. Only problem is that he is the establishment - what's more establishment than a billionaire who inherited a large portion of his wealth? He's already shown himself to not care about overturning the establishment with his staffing picks. This country needs a both a candidate and a party for the working class. 
No, you're looking for the mid centric doom truth-a-billy math-core left right tarslist. I deal with the fish. 
So remove the current corruption with newer corruption. 
You cannot build a pipeline, transmission line or any other critical infrastructure project without eminent domain being an option. Without the threat of eminent domain a wealthy person could hold any project hostage simply by refusing to accept a reasonable offer. 
From each according to his ability, to each according to NOOT NOOT 
"Well Nancy, now that we have all the weed in America piled here in the rose garden, the only thing left to do is burn it. Im going to sit right here, next to it, to make sure its all gone. By the way, have the secret service bring me some Doritos." 
I'm a young person who's always been kind of against legalising weed. That said, I feel like I'm evolving on the issue. People are going to smoke it anyway, we might as well make some tax revenue rather than have the money go to criminal gangs. That said, I'm only pro-legalisation if we tax it to fuck, sell it behind the counter in plain packaging with health warnings about its link to triggering mental illness in those who are predisposed to it and its effects on motivation, and impose a ban on smoking it in public. 
A lot of liberal Christians are also anti-abortion on a personal level, but pro-choice on a legal level. 
Yeah! Fiscally conservative should mean "good with prioritizing where money goes," not "the government shouldn't spend money ever." 
Came back to Australia earlier this year. Got an abscess in an... uncomfortable position. I had surgurey to open it, plus visited my local GP every week day for a month and a half, then every second week day for another month (checking progress, cleaning and dressing the wound). Since then, I've had an MRI to check the progress of its healing, and am on the waiting list for another minor surgery to correct/finalise the last of it. I paid $20 for antibiotics, and about $80 on dressings to use at home. That's it. Everything else was bulk billed or otherwise covered by medicare. 
I'm not so sure about the medicaid thing. It might depend on the states. With two tiny part time college jobs, my wife and I didn't qualify for medicaid in my state. Sucked pretty bad because we were too poor to qualify for insurance reimbursement programs on the ACA marketplace. The lovely gap from states that refused to expand medicaid like they were supposed to. 
I understand that usually the government does this, but I have a close family member who is on the audit team for the state of Colorado and knows exactly how much goes to education. Since marijuana legalization, education funding has increased 
Only mildly related, but... I grew up in a small town in the middle of nowhere in Canada. Nowhere near the ocean. The first time I saw the ocean was on a family vacation to San Diego. It was amazing. 
This thread is like a more witty version of my Thanksgiving dinner and it's just fantastic 
Literally dozens... I'm a geologist, we have very real and very immedate environmental problems. And very real and immediate energy usage/production problems. If we design and build smart reactors in smart places, like not on extremely active plate margins (Looking at you Japan). We can solve both with money and energy to spare, allowing more research yadda yadda yadda... 
Mainly concerns about nuclear waste and aging facilities that would have to be refurbished, but there are solutions to that of course. 
Take my love, take my land Take me where I cannot stand I don't care, I'm still free You can't take the sky from me. 
Historically registration of firearms has always lead to either heavy taxation or confiscation. 
Slippery Slope though. It opens the door for gambling and abuse of said law... But then again... A good fight is worth a few bucks. 
For all we know, that's how he tore his meniscus in the first place! 
It's very close to the Pharisaical crap that Jesus spoke directly against, even. 
Incidentally, I encounter people all the time who are perfectly willing to put others in a party box. It makes it easier to dismiss their stances, just another "libtard" or "deplorable." 
If you have selfish, ignorant citizens, you get selfish, ignorant politicians. 
I am a similar fiscal conservative that is generally considered pretty liberal. I consider myself fiscally conservative by evaluating "net societal cost." For example when the overwhelming majority of economists say that a single payer healthcare system like Bernie was proposing does indeed cost less per person then that becomes the fiscally conservative choice. When funding for NASA has a several times over return on investment into the American economy that becomes a fiscally conservative choice. There are true areas where liberals and conservatives disagree on spending that fit into the mold. There are social programs that might not have the fiscally conservative justification (or a hard to define benefit) that liberals believe we have a moral imperative to provide. Those areas the actual data on cost, benefit, and value need to be weighed in the debate and both sides need to use that data to figure out where to draw the line. 
We'll ~~deport~~ relocate the Native Americans to Mars to develop the colonies and then take it from them once they have things up and running. 
As a native San Diegan, this makes me proud. I honestly don't know how people can live farther than, say, 30 miles from the ocean. 
This is random, but is your username a reference to Mormon temples, and how you left after the endowment ceremony? Because that's what happened to me haha 
Also a die hard socialist by American standards (slightly left of center left by sensible ones). And am pro GMO 
take me out to the black tell 'em I ain't coming back burn the land and boil the sea you can't take the sky from me 
You are literally almost less than one standard deviation better than Hitler. Which is to say I have no actual grounds to call you that but in some small sad way it makes me feel better. 
Don't get me wrong -- I love the ocean. I currently live a little bit more than 30 minutes from the Atlantic and I like nothing better than scrambling over the rocks like I'm a little kid and breathing in the sea air. However, I grew up in Michigan (and not even that close to any beachy Great Lake) and I feel a close connection to other aspects of nature similar to what you probably feel for the ocean. It's hard for me to imagine growing up without the very loud sound of crickets on Midwestern summer nights, long stretches of marshy prairie, or four separate seasons that are actually *distinct*. The people that grow up without the ocean have their own version of the ocean that they might love just as much. Sorry for rambling lol I was bored and both love the ocean and miss home.... 
Yeah, that's one of mine, too. GMO is not a problem. We've been selectively breeding food crops for millennia, which is just a really slow version of genetic engineering. You wouldn't recognize a wild banana, or the predecessor to modern corn. I can't disagree that some agricultural corporations have done unethical stuff business-wise, but that's separate from the concept of genetically engineering food crops, which has allowed us to feed more of the people on the planet. 
Ranking people based on bogus statistics eh? You know who else did that? Hitler. 
e is so cool. I don't understand why pi gets all the attention when e is also irrational and super-cool. 
Also pascal's triangle gives you the powers of 11 if you look at each row as a number. 
Actually, at the time of your comment it was 99999999999999999973. 
1000000000000066600000000000001 That's what it looks like. 
It's Probability, which is notorious for being weird even for the people who spend their lives studying it. 
A normal sheet of paper cannot be folded ***in half*** more than 7 times. Yes, there was an instance where a sheet of toilet paper was folded 12 times, but that piece of paper was 4000ft in length. 
Think of it this way: the fact that 2 is prime means no other even number can be. 
This doesn't hold true when you're working with actual physical objects and not ideal mathematical models. 
Right. They're doing math here. My skills are limited to maff. 
A way that helps me understand it is this. 1/9 = 0.111... 2/9 = 0.222... and so on. Therefore, 9/9 = 0.999... = 1 
Only if the numbers you're adding become infinitely small. Easy example for anyone thinking about it: 1 + 1/2 + 1/4 + 1/8... Every fraction will be a positive number, so the sum gets bigger every time, but it'll never be bigger than 2, only infinitely close to it. Now that I've spoiled the punchline, one of my favorite math jokes: an infinite series of mathematicians walks into a bar. The first orders a beer. The second order half a beer. The third orders on quarter of a beer. The fourth orders one-eighth of a beer. The fifth order one-sixteenth of a beer. The sixth comes in, but before he can order, the barman puts two full beers on the table and says: you fellas oughta know your limits. 
It's easier to get a man and bird drunk and just watch how they move to get a sense of intuition. 
You'll get here in calc 3 but: using Taylor series, you can find exact numbers for more types of sums (but still not all). And conditionally convergent series are the ones you can rearrange to get anything. You can even rearrange them so they diverge... 
It's the powerful, shady pi lobbyists that have been doing their best to make sure pi wins all the textbook contracts. It goes all the way to the top. 
Could you explain how the diagonal argument proves that the cardinality of the naturals and the rationals are equal? Doesn't it only prove that the naturals and reals are *not* equal? 
Sometimes everything aligns perfectly to create "the perfect joke". This is one of those times. Bravo, sir. 
But if you fill it with paint, and then pour out the remainder, is there not an infinite amount of paint inside the horn? 
I have a simple proof for it, but it's too large to include in this comment. 
I realized that in algebra class and tried to explain to my teacher why I thought it was so cool and he just didn't get it. Fuck you Mr Chase. 
Oh, so the guys that were looking inside pi for a god's signature were sadly mistaken, should have looked at prime numbers... 
If you have a big enough paper and enough force, you could theoretically fold it as many times as you want. This is a math thread, not an applied physics one. 
Why does it seem like I get the same crappy hand in Hold Em every time then? Answer me that. 
We were playing poker once, and one of my friends didn't know how to play; she folded a Diamond Royal Flush. Maybe 3 turns later, she got ANOTHER Royal Flush. I don't even want to try and calculate the odds of that but my clueless friends were wondering why I was freaking the fuck out. 
We don't need a deck of cards to neglect the oceans. 
I dealt a natural royal straight flush one night to a customer on a progressive jackpot game called Caribbean Stud. I thought I was going to be fired. It took about an hour for security and the floor to bring her the payoff. It was the third or fourth shuffle on an 8 deck shoe so I was safe. I still had to spend the next few nights on the low stakes pit. 
And yet the set of possible answers -- Z ~~union~~ intersect [13, G(64)] -- is a finite set, meaning that we've pretty much nailed it. And hey, the lower bound used to be 6. 
That might be the least significant result in mathematics to date. 
After exponentiation, they're just named with Greek words for numbers. But if you want the joke angle on my first couple paragraphs: exponents are just repeated multiplication. Repeated exponentiation is tetration. And repeated pentation (or penetration) is sexation. Heh heh. (Got that from SMBC comics, but it's a pain to search and find a particular one, so I can't link it.) EDIT if we're talking about numbers penetrating others -- you know why six was afraid of seven, yes? Because seven was a registed six offender. 
I have seen comments about this problem for years and just now I got it 
They actually are just two number patterns here. The ones that end in 6 ( 9376, 376, 76, 6) and the ones ending in 5 (90625, 625, 25). So the pattern may continue infinitely but it's clear that each time a number is added to the front of the previously discovered number. 
Well that's a pretty fuckin' selfish thing for two to do. 
Ding ding ding! In theory, theory and reality are the same... In reality they aren't. This is one of those "if we start with a perfectly spherical cow and ignore wind resistance" type facts. It's only true if you make incorrect assumptions about the nature of the universe (and therefor not true at all, although certainly interesting and possibly useful). 
"Where did you put my shoes" "Somewhere in this earth, but not on Toronto" 
This is more a joke than anything literal. The idea is that the number is bigger than the amount of information that can possibly be stored in a human brain, because it is limited by the space it occupies and the associated entropy. A system that violates that bound by having too much entropy (or information) would become a black hole, according to the original theory. A human brain of the average 1.5 kg can hold roughly 2.6x1042 bits of information, and Graham's number is *much* larger than that. It's in fact so large, that the whole observable universe cannot hold enough information to store it ... think about that for a second. 
Euler was pretty much just flexing at the point when he wrote it like that 
Anything to do with digital communications relies critically on this equation. It basically provides engineers a way to deal with sinusoids in a convenient mathematical format. 
I came across this 9/9=1=.999999 thing once when I was drunk (yes I know I am fun at parties) and I lost my shit my friends had to calm me down. 
It's worth noting that even if the numbers do become infinitely small, the series can still become infinitely big. The classical example for this counter-intuitive fact is the harmonic series: 1 + 1/2 + 1/3 + ... + 1/n which can be as big as you want. 
The problem is *keeping* them drunk long enough for the experiment to complete. This might kill the bird. 
That's actually a different problem called the illumination problem 
Did your teacher sit at the front of the class sneakily eating pretzels out of his suitcase? 
2 to the 74,207,281 -1 I like good primes and i like good trig Do so much calculus you wouldn't believe 
I had that happen during a probability class. The professor made the statement, and since we were about 30 people in class, we decided to test it. Two twins are sitting in the front row, smugly grinning. What's interesting is that apart from those two, we found one more pair, and four people with birthdays in the same week. 
Since each new person N adds N-1 possible new connections, the number of pairs in the group grows the same was that 1 + 2 + 3 + 4 + 5... does, which is (N2 + N)/2. The highest term is a squared term, so it grows quadratically. 
It's true. Works exactly like that. Was hard explaining to my boss why I was late the other day. He didn't buy the whole 'I accidentally flung myself to another galaxy with a piece of paper again' story. 
Ah, I see. The keys were pretty easy to correlate but I didn't recognize the correlation with the drums - thanks! 
Is your dealer's middle name "the"? Vinnie the Rat, Eddy the Don, Barry the Cyborg? 
but it is possible, the deck(s) weren't shuffled properly and the chances of that happening were higher than they should have been. 
This is interesting. Do casinos typically punish card dealers for allowing large winnings? Seems like unjust punishment, assuming they deemed the hand fair play. 
To really drive the point home: Imagine there were 100 doors, but after you picked yours, the host still brought it down to two. Switching here is the obvious choice. 
This is why 1 is the loneliest number. He got trapped next to the most selfish number, and selfish numbers don't make good company. 
That escalated from "trizzle" to "sieve of eratosthenes" quickly 
Except your analogy doesn't begin to scratch the surface. Not your fault -- no analogy could, when dealing with numbers like this. If you said you were looking for a particular quark, and I said that first, I am positive that one and exactly one particular quark existed that was the one you wanted, but it isn't touching this one -- see it, this one here? Even that wouldn't tell you how wide open this question is, even if dealing with G(1). This is how narrow the range is. (Because the problem by definition needs a real, whole, positive number, we can't say we've narrowed the search by half for ruling out negatives, for example). 
Euler had more clout than any of us can even hope to comprehend 
What are these strange symbols? Source: Experimental Physicist. 
Really any field in STEM that deals with waves, even superficially, is going to use this equation. 
Yeah, I used to think I was good at math - I took classes on multivariate calc, basic differential equations, and basic linear algebra as part of my CS degree. But then I read some posts on another board by a guy who called himself ultrafilter, talking about fields and rings and stuff. I had no fucking idea what he was talking about. 
Indeed sir. This username has been a huge reaping of karma over the years. 
In my 4th year (now Y10) tutor group we were seated alphabetically by *first* name for some reason I no longer recall. This resulted in four people with consecutive birthdays sitting together (seat 1 May 15th, seat 2 May 16th, seat 3 May 17th, seat 4 May 18th). Our form tutor tried to work out the odds of that happening, and failed miserably. Two of them (1 and 3) were also first cousins. The poor things had had joint birthday parties every year of their lives and were rather fed up with it. 
"While Shepard goes all in, I'll just fold" - Director of the Andromeda initiative. 
Doesn't work if the interest rate is too low, or if it's negative(i.e. risks) 
More likely they just did that while investigating. If the dealer was up to shady stuff, they can't do much harm if they're dealing low stakes. 
Yea, this is how I always explain it. This is how it made sense to me. Also, seeing it actually drawn out, or shown with household items just lying around and showing all 3 possibilities of doors which were first picked. 
Considering that Python is named for Monty Python... well... 
Yeah, but 2 can be as bad as one. It's the loneliest number since the number 1. 
It's not to the same scale but I think it gets the idea across 
Yeah but no one ever mispronces my name. Check Mate Oiler. 
yeah, my guess is he got like 100 pages into the proof and he finally gave up on it and considered it virtually impossible and this was his mathematical version of gallows humour. 
On of the reasons this works is that not all days in the year are equal concerning births. Some days just have more births than others. In particular, 9 months from Valentines day, 9 months from Christmas, and 9 months from those two dates as a fair amount of people were conceived on birthdays of their parents. 
Offer to repay her 10k$ at the end of the month and she might agree. 
Yeah but I don't think you will find many investments with a yield of 100% per day, compounded daily. 
Except they actually did it more than 7 times. 11, in fact. 
Here's another. Take a ball of titanium the size of a golf ball, and hold it in your mouth. When that ball has completely dissolved, pluck a hair from someone's head, then pop in another titanium ball and start sucking again. When everyone on earth is bald as a cue ball, kill one ant. Killing this ant instantly regrows everyone's hair, so start sucking on another titanium golf ball.... once all the ants on earth are dead, grab a bottle of pink nail polish and cover as much of any section of any road in the World as you can. This, in turn revives all the ants, and each ant is worth every hair on every human's head, so start sucking titanium. When every road in the word is covered in a 3 foot thick layer of pink nail polish, you'll be half way through 52! Lol jk I have no idea. 
"That guy dealt a royal flush jackpot win last night, and tonight that little old lady won $30 at his $5 blackjack table? He's fired" 
So, you just accomplished the same thing as the guy who raised the lower bound from 6 to 13. 
Maybe 2 should get their shit together and quit being so selfish. 1 is lonely because 2 is a dick. 2 is lonely because 2 is a dick. 
That's why they never even bother inviting him to a division party. 
next time i fuck something up im just gonna explain that i didn't fail, it's just that the parameters of whatever i was trying to do don't apply to me 
Wasn't there some guy who proposed a simple enough solution that turned out to be wrong because of a small mistake? He could've had proof that was just wrong. 
Trust me, after 6years of doing that shit, it comes to you in your dreams... 
Yeah, and get that shit in writing. Preferably, choose a billionaire friend. 
To be fair, they used extremely thin paper the size of an aircraft hanger if memory serves. 
Hell, A(10,10) is practically incomputable. This shit just gets ridiculous 
Literally, I have maths dreams where my brain tries to solve impossible maths problems by literally making shit up. They're quite disturbing. 
My initial instinct was to say that, if someone was a billionaire, they wouldn't be so stupid to not understand how exponents work. Then I realized that this is quite probably not true... 
That's weird that Double Factorial is significantly less than a single Factorial. 
I used to have those all of the time during my teens. Oh god, the math dreams were horrible. 
At one point I had to celebrate 6 different people's birthdays on Oct 10. Close friends and family, not people I could just ignore. My entire close family-of-birth, my ex-husband, two of my sisters-in-law, my godson, my niece, and two ex-in-laws have their birthdays between the end of August and the middle of October. It's an expensive time of year. My own son is clearly a Hallowe'en baby. :) 
Mine were less dreams and more just endless brain cycles of me thinking about random numbers that made no sense that kept me mostly asleep but kind of conscious, in a miserable sort of way. 
Funny thing is, a lot of the socially awkward people I know are so caught up in *what the other person thinks about them* that they dont give any mind to what the other person *is thinking*. Do they look interested? Have you reciprocated interest in stuff they want to talk about? 
This is so true and a harsh truth I have had to learn over the years. In my opinion, I come up with some pretty hilarious banter but I have a fairly quiet, soft voice. I have just had to accept that I only get one shot at a joke, and if it barely gets heard, so be it. 
I see this a lot on Reddit. Like someone will freak out like "Omg someone just wished me happy birthday and I said thanks you too I literally died inside fuck". It's not really that big a deal, really. Just laugh it off and move on. When I worked as a cashier people would trip up on their words all the time and I, nor anyone else who worked there, ever cared at all. They got their groceries and we moved onto the next order. It happens so much that I can't even remember any specific instances, only that it happened a lot. Like you don't have to speak like you're a character in a Shakespeare or Hemmingway novel to be socially fluent. I think TV and books does to this in part, where they see these characters who never miss a beat or get tongue tied or have any error in dialogue unless it's relevant to the plot or it's to an extreme end because the character is being portrayed as awkward intentionally whilst everyone else never slips up. In real life, everyone slips up. 
I love self-deprecating humor, but the key is to make it humorous. I am generally pretty good at it and I use it as a way to connect with people so they're not on edge around me. Normally I am a quiet person and serious looking person, so I think it helps most people relax if they know I do not take myself seriously at all. 
Or even just being a buzzkill. I have learned that when with a new group of people (who I'll probably never meet again) it's not always necessary be a downer, even if it's the truth. For example, when they hear I have twin stepchildren (a boy and a girl) maybe they'll reference how girls and boys dating/driving/other milestones are different. Now, if I'm honest, I'd say, "well, my stepson is developmentally disabled/has autism and he'll probably never do those things and he's going to need lifelong supervision," but, if I want to have a nice night and not bring everyone down I'll just say, "yeah you're right!! My husband is crazy protective of my daughter...lol." Sometimes it's not worth the pity on their faces and the resulting depression I feel for the rest of the night. Know your audience. 
I have a friend that does this, she'll just drop it right in there. Conversation ongoing, lull in conversation, suddenly: "Sorry I'm not entertaining enough" (in sad voice) or "Sorry I feel like I'm dragging everyone down" or "Sometimes I get socially awkward" 99% of the time if you're not talking, or not "entertaining" enough, people will just assume you are shy, quiet, or simply don't have anything to say at the moment. When you open your mouth it's like you're saying "I feel awkward/sad and everyone else should too". 
Similarly, if someone gets cut off by a monopolizer, listen to them and encourage them to finish their story. 
And if someone is taking about something you have no knowledge of that's fine, don't pretend because it will be wierd when you start trying fool them. Instead something like "I don't know anything about football, have you always been a big fan?" gives them the hint you're not into it and can't really take part in the conversation, and steers them towards taking about things more abstractly ;"I enjoy going to live events because of the buzz" or and opportunity for them to give you a question that opens up new avenues ;"how do you spend your Saturdays? " 
Holding up sporks aside, I think there are a lot of people that do this who are actually just incredibly nervous and are grasping for comedic straws to try and break the ice... even when the ice has been shattered and pulverized and is now evaporating into water vapor. 
Especially "bad" stuff. Your dad is in prison, you were arrested for drunk driving, and your son was molested? That's horrible; write a country song but leave me out of it. 
This coupled with just laughing it off or casually correcting yourself if you say something wrong is about 90% of not seeming awkward. EVERYONE says stupid shit. NO ONE remembers it but YOU. The best way to make sure no one remembers it is to laugh at yourself, correct what you *meant* to say and move on. If you don't make a big deal of it, neither will anyone else. 
I was going to mention this one. Just because there's silence doesn't mean you have to fill it with chatter. It can be awkward for someone to just keep talking at times and comes off poorly. 
My roommate's incredibly guilty of this. Almost every day it's some convoluted variation on "[ex?-gf] is mad at me because [something about how she's bipolar and jealous and he's the good guy] and [totally not twisted version about something that happened at a party last night] and now she's blocked him/called the cops/etc". I'll inevitably tell him that their relationship is doomed to fail and they should probably cut it off, but they'll somehow wind up patching things up and the cycle continues. Rinse and repeat 3x a week. Initially, I thought it was awful and cared about what happened, but 3 months later it's to the point where I just nod and say "oh shit" or "damn dude" once every 15 minutes, and tell him that his relationship is unhealthy, until he inevitably goes back out to talk to her about something. Truth be told, I'm fairly worried about the both of them. 
Related, if you are ADDish and catch yourself interrupting people, say "sorry, I interrupted you, go on". I've found people tolerate these tendencies a lot more if you do this. 
not sure how this is considered strong social skills. he just sounds like an idiot with no social skills. 
Hey man you ever smoke weed and played video games?? I never knew i could mix those two things until now! How have i been missing this!? 
oooooh good one. Nothing says 'I'm dying of anxiety inside' right now like doing this. It just comes off as so... desperate 
I'm always afraid of stepping over this boundary. If everyone is chatting as a group, I feel like I can't jump in because it would be rude... Which probably makes me seem extra awkward because I'm too quiet :/ 
Oh god Im cringing just reading this... I think its okay to try and be funny but not from references to internet jokes or obscure shit to people who clearly wouldnt know about them. I waste far too much time online just like everyone else and I'm real geeky but I know when to keep it lowkey. Ive met a few people who start talking about fanfiction or pewdiepie to random people or at parties and you can FEEL the awkwardness... I remember when I was in school I used to sit next to a guy who only communicated through memes. Bare in mind this was before memes were as mainstream as they are today. These were proper old school shit memes like "IM FIRING MY LAZER", "ITS OVER 9000" and he would just constantly quote HGTTG... the cringe.. Anyway, be aware of your audience. Even when theres folks like me who get the references you still feel the extreme awkwardness 
I'm not sure about this one. When someone repeats the punchline of one of my jokes and laughs, that's how I know it's especially funny. It usually makes me feel all warm inside. 
One conversation leaver I like is "All right, well, I don't want to keep you," because it acknowledges that the convo is over and lets them make an easy escape without being too blunt. 
The best advice ever given to me was to never talk about RAPE (Religion, Abortion, Politics, Economy) with people you've just met. Depending on the person, it makes future conversations much easier. 
"Be yourself." "But I am socially awkward as myself." "..." "........." 
He's doing a terrible job of hitting on you. I don't think he's trying to look confident so much as just that his dick is a little bit hard when he says that stuff. 
I'm not sure those people even want to talk to you, or be socially active. 
A little late, but when it comes to dates, you could probably save it by telling your date that you're having a bad day and ask for a reschedule. 
Yup. I use the "assume everyone likes you" trick all the time, but it takes real conscious effort to maintain, and is easily deflated by the smallest thing. Once the seed of doubt is sown, even by the smallest glance or pause, it derails all the confidence and I snap back to assuming they don't like me. I was bullied at school and have social anxiety (diagnosed by a psychiatrist, not on the internet), so maybe I have it hard wired to assume that everyone dislikes me, and that I have an uphill battle to change their minds. It sucks, because logically I know that that's not true, but I often feel that even my closest friends are just humouring me. I'm in my 30s, and it's still a constant struggle with my own mind. 
I find myself thinking that about strangers all the time. 
Prince said that cool is being able to hang with yourself. He'd know. 
Yeah this is a different kind of social awkward, the person talking isn't shy necessarily, but they aren't interested in what the other person thinks. Which is off putting and socially awkward in itself, yet they likely don't even recognize that. 
Look at the feet. Feet tend to always point where you want to go. If someone is standing with a foot toward the door, it's likely they don't want to be there anymore. It's a rule of thumb though, not a rosetta stone, so consider other body language as well. 
It was probably the best conversation he's ever had. 
Also, when somebody invites you to their home, don't overstay your welcome. Don't make them drop hints for you to go. Leave them wanting more of your presence, not wishing you had left sooner. 
The same situation while majoring in CS has made it way easier to talk to people than when I was in high school. Worst classes I ever had were the ones where CS majors and engineers collided, never have I been through so many awkward silences or razing one sided "discussions". There was no middle ground. 
ESPECIALLY healthcare! You may be great with a patient but good god most of the people I interact with on a daily basis (nurses, doctors) cannot shut up about themselves when there's no patients around. 
Fairly quiet and soft is a great tone for tossing out one-liners when everyone gets quiet after an awkward moment. Please remember, that doesn't mean you just go 'awkwardddd' and hope everyone politely laughs. You have to think about the situation, think of something absurd that is at least mildly related, and commit. 
And then look off to the side as if you're making eye contact where Paul would be. Then people will think you're crazy and laugh along because they don't want to die when you snap. Or something like that. I don't know. 
Agreed. I tend to trust someone that can poke fun at themselves more than someone who is uptight. 
Which makes it that much worse when you want to talk about your problems, but you genuinely don't want sympathy or pity. Sometimes I want to use someone as a tool to identify where my weaknesses are and bouncing things off of people is a really good way to do that in my experience. 
"wow, that's really good, it must have taken a lot of time and dedication!" You compliment their effort without downplaying yourself. I do a lot of fitness stuff, and when I see people at a level I admire I say something like "You're awesome! I can't wait until I can do that!" 
Yes! That's a whole nother point that's super important in this discussion, and it's true even when interacting with people who've known you for years. Sometimes buzzkillers aren't very obvious until you've grown to know them after some time. I'm definitely kind of a know-it-all and one thing that's helped me immensely in my young adult years is learning that I don't need to correct *every* falsehood about random trivia topics that don't actually matter. Learning that biting your tongue won't make you explode can go a long way with making friends. Or getting laid. ;P 
I have an otherwise good employee who I have to have a regular conversation with about this. He has a never ending boring story about just about everything too. 
I almost don't even bother trying to tell a story, it just feels like I'm wasting everyones time. Instead I just toss in jokes while everyone talks or I ask leading questions to help whoever is talking to show that someone is listening. 
Bless you for knowing it and trying to stop. I used to get to work an hour early to enjoy the quiet, avoid heavy traffic, and get some work done. A new guy started that does the same but has to stop to tell me pointless stories for an hour. I've started coming in a half hour later so I can sneak past him. :( 
My mom will manage to turn one sentence answers in to paragraphs. She gets pissed when people start to tune her out. Sometimes I feel bad because I'll get distracted and forget she's talking 
I feel like that could so easily have been resolved with a laugh and a "no worries, me too" 
Those people are heroes. I always get a warm fuzzy feeling when I hear someone do it but then I'm like "why didn't I do that?" 
Same. Worked a sales job for several years and now run a small business where I regularly have to interact with customers. I would still rather be alone, but money is needed to fuel my hobbies. 
So random but a solid becoming vapor is actually sublimating. Was I enthusiastic enough? 
True that. I worked behind the bar of a metal club when I was a university, the club owner owned a number of non metal clubs in the same city and would often organise shared social events, the club owner was an awesome old metal dude. At one particular staff meeting, one of the metal club staff complained that he and the other metal club staff were getting funny looks from the other venue staff. The owners response? "I've been wearing cowboy hats and trenchcoats in this city for 30 years and I get funny looks everyday. You are more than six feet tall and choose to dye your hair bright red and wear leather trousers, when I was a kid we did stuff life that because we wanted to be stared at" 
Eventually everyone I know will ask something about my father, and I'll have to drop it on him that he died in a fire when I was 17. There's no getting away from it, and it's always awkward for them. You're probably feeling awkward right now 
This is a seriously important thing. Acknowledging your mistake and laughing it off does amazing things socially. Laughing is contagious and everyone understands doing or saying something dumb. They're with you not against you. And then don't bring it up again unless it's relevant. If it is relevant then you're just creating a tiny inside joke that can only strengthen whatever there is between two people. But don't force it in. LAUGH PEOPLE 
The trick I learned that made it easy is to not look at their eyes. Look at the bridge of their nose. It's close enough that they think you're looking them in the eyes, but you're not, so **you** don't get psyched out by it. 
My experience with people that have a wonky eye is that I'm so fucking nervous about which one I'm supposed to look at. Is it wrong to look at the one that's not looking at me? Do I just stare a hole at the one that is? Omg do they hate me? 
Something I started doing a few years ago; when I notice someone get interrupted mid story or sentence and the conversation goes someplace else for a minute, I'll try to remember the person and the last thing they said. Once there's a break in the conversation, I'll urge the person who was interrupted to continue what they were saying. Many people just don't feel like making a "big deal" out of being interrupted, or lack confidence and assume what they were saying wasn't interesting. Sometimes they'll just say "It doesn't matter" but oftentimes they appreciate someone remembering what they were trying to talk about and giving them an opportunity to finish. And the person who interrupted them almost always apologises when they realise what they did, which is nice. *Most* people aren't dicks and are just eager to say something, not realising they're cutting someone else short. 
My mum has this habit of holding onto whatever she was going to say four rounds of conversation ago and won't let it go until she's said it. So you'll be having a normal conversation which is naturally moving around onto different topics and when there's a pause she'll start on about something from five minutes ago. I never realised how annoying it was until I left home and realised I did it too when new friends at university called me on it. They did me a big favour there! 
it's pretty great. one time playing oblivion stoned and a daedra hurled a fireball at me and i dodged in real life to avoid it 
Nervous giggler here. Trust me, many of us are fully aware we're doing this, and are actively trying to stop. It's a reflex; people are less aggressive, usually, when you laugh. Sort of like a submissive dog showing it's belly. But when it's ill-fitting for the moment, it can definitely backfire. The worst part is that so many with anxiety are fully aware they do this and so it cycles because our own laughing makes us even more nervous. 
I have a fear that all of the people around me just tolerate me. So I basically don't talk to anyone, ever, unless there's sufficient evidence to prove that they like having me around. 
My go to (because I'm also not too familiar with all that goes on in the hair department) is to just get it cut short on the sides (1 guard) and to keep the top longer and just get it trimmed. It's a great, simple cut that's very good looking on almost anyone and very easy to maintain. Just don't overdo it until you really find out what you want...you want to look like u/ChaoticallyNatural and not Goku. 
An immediate red flag for a person for me is if they reference memes in real life conversations unironically, it makes me cringe so bad. Memes are just for the internet I guess, if someone mentions Harambe or something in person I just feel so embarrassed and I'm not even the one saying it. Keep that shit online. 
And then you get the awkward people who will tell, verbatim, some story they heard in a youtube standup clip. Usually without good delivery. 
I've found that a simple "Well, i'm gonna head out, I got some shit I need to do" works pretty well. Obviously not in more formal settings. 
Oh wow. I just sat here reading this to my wife and I realised she wasn't replying (or even listening) I just read about this socially awkward interaction about people who keep talking when others aren't interested AS I WAS DOING IT MYSELF 
Also probably best you don't talk about rape either. 
*DINGDINGDING* We have a winner. So painfully obvious. 
I think that a huge reason why I absolutely hate going out in public and talking to other people is because I'm a judgmental fuck, and I just automatically assume everyone else is a judgmental fuck 
I think people that ramble on about anything that comes to mind are just as socially awkward as the shy types. I do know a few people who talk nonstop but keep those around them engaged &/or entertained though. 
That's weird because my CS classes were full of well adjusted and even popular people. Most the people were either really funny, or lifted/partied etc. Very few were like me. 
Their entire existence is listening to other people talk about their own problems for 12 hours a day, I suspect that builds up some frustration over time. 
To be fair, you shouldn't be waiting for someone to ask about you to talk about yourself. A normal conversation goes back and forth. If we are talking about dogs, we should both share our experiences with dogs before the conversation shifts to another topic. Some people just prefer to let a conversation flow organically, rather than being a series of questions and answers, but that requires both people to be contributing or it can end up being one-sided. Not saying the guy wasn't just full of himself, but it could have just been a conversational thing. I actually find it sort of off-putting when I feel like someone is interviewing me rather than sharing ideas with me. 
Or when they do ask you a question they barely react to your answer and then proceed to talk extensively about their take on the topic. 
No, no. The WORST is when only one person hears you, then THEY repeat your joke to everyone and steal your laughs. I hate when people do that. 
But then the one person that heard it laughs and repeats it, then everyone laughs. 
You just blew my mind. I can't think of anything embarrassing that I've seen anyone do without thinking about it for a solid few minutes. 
Yeah, it ventures into humblebrag territory of fishing for corrections to your self deprecation. This hits people with that nasty cross-section of awkward and obnoxious that makes for cringe inducing interactions. 
That's the right situation for it, though. If you're having a serious, intimate discussion about your problems that both people are on board with, that's fine. It's the people who shit talk themselves all the time, even in conversations that have nothing to do with what's wrong with them and with people who they are not on close enough terms with to confess profound emotional issues to who make things awkward. 
Just avoid the trap of turning everyone into your therapist. People who turn *everyone* into their therapist are kind of irritating IMO and it's usually pretty obvious when someone is just using you to work through their own shit without any actual interest in you. 
It also puts the attention on your inability rather than their talent. Now we're talking about *you*. 
Also most of the time it doesn't even matter, whatever you're about to say. Like I've definitely been in the situation you're referencing where someone says something that's not right. I'm tempted to correct them, but honestly nothing really bad happens if I let it slide. Also correcting them can potentially open a can of worms that I don't want to get involved in. It's fine to not assert your knowledge of stuff 24/7. 
Yup, I simply do not ever tell stories. Only comments, questions, jokes, and a whole lot of active listening. People seem to like me. 
Plus, self defeating humor where you acknowledge a story is lame afterwards always helps the mood if its going downhill. 
I once called my mother because a pipe burst and water was pouring full flow from my upstairs bedroom into the living room downstairs, to find out what I should do. She starts tell me about how important it is to have good home insurance and about this other time something happened... Eventually I got my father on the phone and he told me how to turn it off, but that really wound me up. I was shouting 'So I'll just let the house get flooded yeah?! Shall I start packing my stuff?' 
When that situation happens I say "everyone is awkward", with a smile and laugh. It diffuses any tension and works really well if it's a conversation with multiple people. 
I usually cut in to acknowledge the interrupter and then turn back to the interruptee and ask them to finish Bob: "I really love skiing, I took my wife last week to our cabin in Denver..." Douche: "you like skiing too?? Dude just last month I started teaching lessons at the local resort..." Me: "wow you teach? That's awesome, I've never been skiing. Bob you have a cabin???" OK terrible example but hopefully you get the picture Edit for emphasis and toilet typing typoes 
Do you think subtly warning, or any kind of subtle response is appropriate? I'm not suggesting publicly calling him out, but an email spelling out the problem and telling him how he can correct it would be more effective, in either helping him correct the problem or providing basis for eventual dismissal. I think that subtlety is lost on some people, and while confrontation (not necessarily face to face or in public) seems harsh, it can be kinder in the long run if it gives the person information he will need to make positive changes. 
It was a help desk for me. I learned all kinds of customer service skills that have served me well even in other social situations. Being introverted doesn't mean you can't be socially adept. 
It allows you to be funny without really trying too hard or having to come up with actual jokes 
I just got the most clear mental picture of this guy going home and complaining to his wife that he puts in so much effort to stay "Upbeat and Fun" and wishes he could just be a "nice, chill guy" without management asking more of him. 
I feel you. I hate when people I've just met ask about my parents. They'll ask what my parents do or where they live or whatever, so I'll talk about my mom for a minute. I will pray that they will pick up on the fact that I didn't mention my dad for a reason, but no. They will inevitably ask "and what about your father?" and then I have to awkwardly tell them he's dead which is uncomfortable for both parties. 
I accidently knocked over my freshly made drink at my local dive bar, and the bartender immediately made me a new one but put saran wrap over it and stuck a straw in it. I earned myself an adult sippy cup and it was pretty funny to me and everyone around me. I loved that he did that! I was pretty proud, showed it to everyone. 
There are times to ignore the spit... like when you're standing in the break room next to the cake someone brought in and left uncovered and you're not quite sure if your spittle hit the cake or the floor and you're not willing to demean yourself enough to check. 
Every now and again I become aware of my own eye placement during a conversation. I'm sure I come across as an insane person because I can't even force my eyes to look at their nose bridge. Just darts all over. 
I'm lousy at conversation *because* I'm polite. I never want to interrupt someone, and I can't judge whether their pause is a sort of verbal paragraph break or if they're actually finished with their thought. 
I have a lazy eye, as long as you don't do something to indicate you're looking at the lazy one like moving over to get the lazy eye to look at you (if that makes sense) then either is okay 
And then when the person being talked to backs up to recreate their personal space, the close-talker immediately steps forward to invade it again. If you're wondering how to tell how close to stand, an arm's length is a good rule of thumb. More distance with strangers and professionals, less with good friends. And if the other person backs up, don't take the space back - they want it! 
I'm one those people who seems to be interrupted a lot, and I really appreciate whenever somebody does this. So thanks for doing what you do! 
Sometimes with ADHD its an impulse that's hard to control. As said before, just own it and apologize and people won't hate you for it 9/10 times. 
We have a team we work with in the office whose manager does this while explaining how she is disagreeing with us, and I am sure she thinks it is easing the tension, but it comes of as the most condescending thing I have ever witnessed. Every time she pushes back on anything while laughing she is met with stone faced disapproval. 
Or they deliver every sentence like its the punchline to a joke and wait expectantly for you to laugh. 
I looked through that user's posts for a solid minute trying to figure out what the fuck you were talking about before coming back and realizing it was the person you were replying to. 
The "I've got things to do" part is totally optional, btw. "Well, I've got to get going, but it was nice seeing you!" is a great option. Also, if at a party and you don't feel like continuing hanging out with the other person, if there is a lull or someone else comes up, you can just allow yourself to become distracted by something else (e.g., "ooh, they have bagels") or even just back away and blend into the crowd (obviously not in the middle of a sentence/talking point). If you really feel stuck, ask a question that would require you to walk away (e.g., "Have you seen [the host]?" or "Do you know where the bathroom/drinks/food/whatever is?") 
I think it's also good because even if in your head, you're thinking, "I cannot wait to get the fuck out of this conversation. I just came to buy some ice cream and milk. Not hear about your grandma's kidney stone," when you finish the convo with, "I don't want to keep you," it sounds like you're doing them a favor by moving along. And, no matter how small or insignificant, everyone likes it when someone does something to benefit them. 
yeah but thats what ur wifes for i bet you listen to her shit too 
Yep. I see you judging me. I'm judging you too, dick. 
As a programmer, the last thing on my mind is MORE programming. I talk about programming with great passion during work, when we *need* to discuss XYZ. But when I'm with some (programmer) friends? We literally say 'no programming talk' because it just gets boring and in the way of our beer and snacks. 
Honestly, it depends on which department CS falls under and what classes they're required to take. I went to Virginia Tech, and CS falls under the Engineering program there. Every CS student is required to take a number of engineering courses - so the vast majority of CS students were socially awkward engineer-types (myself included). 
Oh yes. I know I shouldn't wait. But I'm not about to interrupt someone when they're talking about something that matters to them. It does go back and forth, but the only thing was the ball always landed in his court and he never bothered to hit it back. Anytime I would share something of my experience, he'd interrupt me to continue about his own. That's what *really* bothered me is the amount of times he interrupted me when I finally *did* get the chance to speak. It wasn't a flow. It was just narcissistic. The few times he did ask me questions, he belittled my job, my age (there was an age gap), and my generation. We only went on 2 dates. Edit for more context: We had also been on the date for about 30 minutes before I was really able to speak. 
I tell them but then I realize I only have maybe 3-4 stories and everyone has heard them. So then I don't tell them. Except to my wife, the poor woman. 
Yeah I've found that to be effective. If I realise that I'm rambling on pointlessly I will often end with "Just in case you cared" or some thing like that which lightens the mood. Another good one is to say "You know, this story is way less interesting than I thought it was", which often gets a laugh and relaxes people. 
No its not a terrible example. Tell me about bobs fucking cabin. 
It really depends on the context. If I were giving a speech, I wouldn't say "I'm a little nervous" because I want to appear confident. If I were talking to a friend and I spit on them, I'd say "Oh gosh sorry, I think I spit on you!" and laugh it off. 
I look from eye to eye and feel like they can tell. 
I do this when I'm attracted to someone... Inexplicably drawn to lips. Is awkward. 
Honestly though is it really common to maintain eye contact through every second of the entire conversation? I don't have an issue with making eye contact and when I do talk with someone I generally keep eye contact but as the conversation continues I'll glance away maybe at their hands if they are using them, maybe at their computer if they are talking about something related to that, if we're talking about a report I'll glance at the paper, etc. I would find it strange for a person not to ever break eye contact. 
Usually I'll wait just long enough to decide that they actually finished, try to say something and they'll simultaneously start talking again because they thought I didn't have anything to say. 
In that case you can just imitate their eye contact and you should be able to pass yourself off as human well enough. Remember to govern your blinks with a Fourier system to approximate randomness as not blinking can easily ruin your cover too. 
I once got basically all around a room with this guy before I realized what was happening. It was super difficult because the party was busy so I found it difficult to hear him but if I got close enough then he'd back up. Rinse and repeat. 
I learned it from my friends ex-wife. She was a very quiet, reserved Japanese woman but she was very polite. And our group of friends are very talkative/enthusiastic, so people got interrupted a lot. She **always** managed to steer the conversation back to the person who got interrupted, and I admired that so I started doing the same thing. So, on behalf of her - you're welcome. 
Yep. Your brain basically goes "I need to say this right now, because I won't remember it in five seconds." And it's true, you won't. If you have ADHD, you'll need to constantly focus on what you were going to say so you don't get distracted by another topic... And at that point you've missed half of what the other person was saying, because you were so focused on what you were going to say. 
"Oh, you aren't keeping me at all! Please stay longer while I regale you with tales of the inner workings of my grandma's body." 
I feel like if the reschedule request was made politely and apologetically enough it would seem reasonable. 
I have a buddy who is a successful programmer who completely refuses to talk about anything programming related when he's not at work. It's a little frustrating because I have a genuine interest in programming and will try to pick his brain sometimes, but he just shuts it down. 
Yeah interrupting is definitely a no go. When you feel like you can't get a word in because the other person is talking over you, that person sucks. 
Shoulda been like "You feel awkward? That's *weird*, I feel fine." Unless the guy had some other quip ready, the silence that fell after that would be crushing and it would now all be on him. 
There's a fine line between this and "hold my beer". 
Stuff like that bugs me... if you're working/concentrating on something, why do people think it's okay to talk at you? I've gotten to the point where if they're just back to shoot the shit when I'm clearly in the middle of something, I'll just straight up ignore them until they leave. It's not nice but after so many times, trying to be polite and getting roped into conversations, or offending them by saying I'm busy... I just don't give a shit sometimes. If I see that someone's busy, I'll walk away and come back later (unless it's an urgent/work related thing). If they don't look busy but aren't responding, I'll still take the hint and leave. Why can't other people get that?? 
"Just in case you cared" can come off as really passive-aggressive. It can read as "I thought you cared, and now I'm offended that you don't", even if it's not meant that way. I prefer "that wasn't as funny as I thought it would be." 
Don't worry! Its a common gesture that most folks do to indicate attraction. You aren't alone friend. 
Usually if I'm listening I'm looking them in the eyes to be attentive. When I'm talking or recalling something my eyes move around 
Here I thought I was just rude, but this is the daily struggle and I hate interrupting... I'm sure my ex hated it more though. 
I agree with this  . I would describe it as the difference between a discussion and a conversation. In a discussion both (or all) parties have informally agreed to talking in depth about a certain topic, so to go back to a point from earlier is still relevant, but in a more casual conversation the main goal is the social aspect rather than the specific subject matter. 
At this point in the conversation, your own social anxiety is no longer the problem. Congratulations! 
It also depends on if someone gives a concrete date as an alternative instead "let's do it another time" 
Yeah, I said something like, "It wasn't awkward until now." But I should have said what you said! Next time. 
"Hold my beer" is a time honored tradition and we must ensure it is around for our children, and our children's children. 
I think that interrupting them and saying, "hmmm that's interesting. Sorry I'd love to continue this but I really have to get this done and I can't concentrate while talking," works pretty well. And if they keep talking get progressively ruder until they leave. 
I just have a hard time hearing people so I use their mouth as a guide to what they're saying. I am sure wires have been crossed.. Oops. 
It is always a better idea to specify time, place and activity, instead of inconclusive possibility suggestions. 
Eh, I've given up on that. I've probably said something to that effect multiple times to a couple different people. You'd figure after explaining that to them a number of times that they'd begin to get the hint, and if they see that I'm busy, not try to engage in conversation with me. But they don't. I took the extra chair out of my office. When they look for a place to sit, I've even said "yeah I took it out so people wouldn't just hang out back here anymore" or that "the manager doesn't want people hanging around." Yeah, they never think it's about them. 
Was exorcism only allowed in closed in courtyards? 
that takes determination, really impressive of you to turn it around 
Our professor explicitly warned us not to run Bitcoin miners on our university's high performance cluster as that would get you expelled. I highly suspect someone did exactly that the semester before. 
How you did you manage to post this comment from 1917? 
I'm dealing with a roommate like this now. He was kicked out probably a year ago but is just paying rent at our apartment. It's 3 am here and he woke up 3 hours ago. 
Flip side of that, there was a guy who was in my OTC for about three months. Seemed nice enough, bit quiet, and eventually just stopped coming and vanished off everyone's radar. About a year later a picture of him got posted next to the other mugshots of people not allowed inside the barracks for security reasons. "Staff, why is Lee not allowed on MoD property?" "Oh, he went to Syria and fought ISIS for like six months." Dude had just gone full soldier of fortune and helped out the Kurds for a while. Last I heard he was saving up for some body armour and another plane ticket. 
My freshman class (~2007) was the first to have more dropouts due to WoW than to drugs... and it wasn't because drug use was down. 
Just curious - could you take the class at another school and then transfer the credit when you go back? 
I lived with my track team and we shot bottle rockets across the street at the football house in college and started a mini intersports war 
Enrolling and attending are two different things. Source: University of Hawaii student, err former. 
Too much? What's the punishment threshold on cocaine there? 
That's some of the worst behaviour you experienced at uni? Where did you go? This sounds like a standard Tuesday afternoon at an English uni. 
I failed a ton of exams. But i also put in a lot of hard work to fix my situation. 2 degrees later, i can tell you that if you fail the exam you better start dragging your ass to every single class, no excuses. 1 exam doesn't dictate your outcome. Hell you can take the course over again if you have to but if you keep the same routine, you will undoubtedly fail again. Take summer classes, lighten up your fall and winter schedule, spend more time at the library, eat better, exercise a little more, get up early everyday even if you don't have class. Doing the little bit of work everyday is easier than all your work from all your courses at once. Reward yourself for doing this stuff too. 
How did they know it was him? "Oh yeah, this smells *exactly* like Jimmy's asshole, it must be his shit." Or was he such a dumbass that he did it the next day? 
"Known to create good journalists" - a journalist. 
I like how he got caught multiple times. Some people just don't learn their lesson. 
A frat reported it instead of just getting back at you? Lol wot 
 What you do to deserve that? Just break up with her? That's some bullshit man 
Seems to happen with a lot of engineering majors not understanding the intensity of the math they will have to do 
Yup. This was a self defense situation. 100% justified. 
it's ok, just transparently relay DOS attacks through your school's multigigabit connection disguised as requests to google.com and start selling booter/ LOIC/ DOS services. College kids gotta make money somehow. 
you mean that electric space heater? Cause I'm sure it's not mining shit anymore. 
Also seems super shortsighted - you are unhappy with your rating on a website and as a result make the one guy who controls that website, and if he wants to your rating, your enemy. 
I sleep in a lot when I can, but I can't even see how sleeping that late is physically possible. 
I also cannot discharge the 72,000 dollars i borrowed which is accrusing at around 7 percent interest.. Currently it's over 140,000 dollars after 10 years 
No, you have to yell "HUMANITIES? DO YOU WANT FRIES WITH THAT?!?" so that they know youre an engineer. 
Ahh the WoW crack. It was the real deal. I had to quit WoW cold turkey when I went off to college in 2007. I sold my account on ebay for like $500 to make sure I would not be tempted. I knew if I brought that shit with me, I'd just be holed up in my room all day for raids/virtual friends and missing real life. No regrets although I did miss it! Definitely one of the better decisions I made in college :) 
Im actually kinda confused by that statement simply cause for my uni it is normal for everyone to have stuff from previous years. I dont think theres been a single exam where I didnt have exercises and exams with the solutions from the year(s) before. Unless of course we were the first year to have the class with a new prof, but we still had the material from the old prof then. 
They had some sort of fault in the fire alarm system that caused it to go off at least once a night around the same time, very rarely more than once. The building the dorms were in were, uh... bad. Very poorly constructed and very old. But this was just "a part of life" and people who complained or tried to get partial refunds for their dorm rent were denied. Because, y'know, paying a shitload of money for a room to sleep in that you CAN'T sleep in is always oh so wonderful. 
Mistakes were made. Had I know how bad it would be, how terrible the classes are, I would have made different choices. 
Nah, all of my upper level classes need to be taken at the same place. 
For us it's specific to my department, engineering. So it doesn't apply to out of department classes like calculus, chemistry, or political science but it would apply to in-department classes like thermodynamics, fluids, or heat transfer. For engineering majors that's basically all of the junior and senior level courses you take. My Achilles heel was process controls. However, you'd be hard-pressed to make it even that far after failing calculus twice. Even getting in is competitive to a toxic degree. 
College is like $2k a semester. Law school is like $12k a semester there. It's insane. E: I forgot the 1 in front of the 2 for law school. 
I assume it's an amount that's clearly for selling rather than recreational use. That's a common line for schools to take. 
I knew the basics. Anything past that and I was at a loss. I got by because my friends helped me and in group projects my groups probably took pity on me because I tried to be useful but I wasn't so I was able to rely on others to make the grade. Fortunately I can program now and do so for my day job. 
I read the "photocopying" suggestion as sarcastic not an alternative. They were claiming that not only did OP cheat but that OP put barely any effort into the work. 
I currently attend a prestigious university and 4 of my classes don't take attendance at all. I went to the first week of classes and stopped going completely except for quizzes and tests and spent my time traveling. I did get a 33/100 on one of the first tests in one of the class though so attendance does help sometimes. 
It depends. There's generally more to class than just passing tests. For example, in some classes there are class discussions that really only work if people are there to participate. But if a professor is literally just lecturing at the class for an hour or two at a time in preparation for papers and tests, then sure; I don't see much wrong with just taking the tests/writing the papers and being done with it. 
I ended up getting my degree in 2.5 years. I flew through the material and challenged several courses. It helped that at the time I was also out of work (I was laid off in 2011 and this was during the bad unemployment days. I had 4 extensions). I enjoyed it so much, I thought I wanted to get my masters, but I had to get a job because ui was ending. School is fun. And I couldn't get enough when I finally matured enough to appreciate it. 
That's what he should have done. Sounds like he just dipped for a few weeks but stayed enrolled. 
Honestly though. Fuck them. Can't you take that to court? Didn't you technically have a reason to be considered for a leave? 
He did it that same night. So the RA pretty much knew who the shit sprayer was. Also, his buddy dimed him out when confronted. 
Its because its a strict religious school so you can get kicked out for bullshit reasons, but they actually have legit academic and athletic programs that draw in a lot of non religious students. Most strict religious institutions don't really have much to offer besides continued indoctrination for parents who want to keep their now adult kids in their chosen religion so people from outside the relevant church don't attend them. Schools like BYU and Notre Dame are the exception for religious universities, not the rule. 
I'm not a teacher, just a fellow student but ex-military are some of the most pleasant classmates. They are always the best to work with on group projects, they don't slack like everyone else, always polite. And every year in college a former marine has brought the whole class some type of baked good and coffee for the marine core birthday. 
Well heck, if they spent those years getting good at something then there's nothing weird about them teaching it to you. They'd better not be a dick about it, though. 
I'm thinking that was an "upset" that got autocorrect ed. 
Oh god Bob Jones is crazypants. I went to college in like the next city over and had good friends who went to another university in the same city as Bob Jones and if I recall correctly a friend from the area who actually knew someone who went there. They have some INSANE rules. We used to see them around town in their "dress up clothes" not talking to the opposite sex. 
In fact "carne" is just meat, not beef in particular. 
Meals weren't set, exactly, but my RA wanted us to "bond" and so we were forced into attending a floor dinner once a week. Most of the time I'd get my food to go and eat with my sister, who also attended, or I'd skip all together, but I guess that contributed to my ungodliness, because i didn't want to join my "sisters in fellowship." 
I was at a party a few hrs later, and one of the guys casually approached me, patted me on the back, looked me in the eye, smiled, and said, "we gotchya on camera" and walked away... 
I learned after my freshman year to always throw someone under the bus when they're in the wrong. I have lost my patience for asswipes in group projects who don't pull their weight, or people who try to use me to copy an assignment they were too lazy to do. 
I think he would've been way sadder to let a capable young person walk out of his office. 
Jesus. It's a grave yard under your comment. What'd you do? 
"Socializing with the opposite sex?! We'll teach ***you***! Now get back to your dorm room, where your all-girl pajama sleepover lock-in *is just getting started.*" 
All it takes for BYU to kick you out is your bishop to retract your ecclesiastical endorsement, which they can do on a whim. People have literally been kicked out of BYU for having a coffee machine in their residence. 
Yeah I recently wrote a required review on a teacher that she brought up in class. Apparently it was so bad it made her cry. I feel horrible because I used anonymity to my advantage to berate someone, but at the same time I feel like she should've expected at least one horrible review, and I don't think it was necessary to talk about in front of all my classmates. Anonymous reviews always stir up trouble, and I'm pretty sure she's trying to figure out who it is right now :/. Wish me luck. 
Especially for professors. Working at the university gave me a whole new perspective on professors. I ran the phone system, helped recable buildings, and maintained the network, and a whole lot of professors are fucking arrogant, condescending, divas that think they can do your job better than you can while you're there to tell them that no, they can't just unplug their phone, go to another room, plug it in to a random jack, and expect it to work. Also, yes you have to be able to tell me what room you worked in a few weeks ago to fix this because I need to move your line to that room, and how the fuck can you not remember where you spent the previous 5 years working? 
It's part of a rotating sleeping schedule. When I was on my gap year a couple of years ago, it would go in cycles - Wake up at 9-10, maybe 11 AM, and going to bed past midnight. Then one night I'd go to bed at 4 AM, and wake up a little bit later, maybe wake up at noon. A few days later, 6 AM, wake up at 2 PM... and it just cycles like that. Eventually I'd end up going to bed at 8-9 AM, waking up deep in to the afternoon. When you sleep through the day, you don't feel like you get the same quality sleep as you would sleeping through the night. I'd regularly go to bed at 8 AM and wake up at 5-7 PM, and still be fucking tired. 
My roommate in college tried to kill me with a knife :( 
"This was by far the best semester of my entire college experience. I learned so much over the months about the culture, got to experience the beautiful scenery, and slaughter godless pigs in the name of Allah. Would absolutely recommend this exchange to anyone is even just slightly considering it!" 
Mine had a degree in Information and Systems Technology (IST), which was considered non-engineering and separate from the CompE/CompSci degrees. Everyone always said that IST actually stood for 'I Stopped Trying' 
Bonus level: saying this loudly in a required humanities lecture hall. I had STEM friends, the amount of cringe is fucking powerful. 
Dude - the professors are not the ones to blame here. It's the administration and the money grab from the international students. Trust me - the professors are sick of the cheating and are sick of trying to teach students who are not college ready. Plus, do you know how much red tape bullshit is involved in reporting a student for cheating? Not to mention the fear of retaliation from unstable students. And all this for slave wages if you're an adjunct. Source: am adjunct whose soul has been crushed by the corrupt and incompetent higher education system which creates this goddamn mess. 
It depends. Sometimes, professors choose not to show old exams (because they're lazy and recycle them). This gives a huge advantage to those who have them because it's literally the same test. My school has recently done a thing where all professors lock down their old years' sites with a password so you can't look up old stuff. My friend (in another university) somehow obtained an answer key after someone in his group of friends (a girl) decided to randomly visit the TA at 3-4 AM. I suspect fuckery but he won't say how it happened. 
I don't blame you, especially if you're young because mistakes happen and sometimes one just doesn't know and gets hit by the bullet that could've been evaded. I wish more youngsters knew about the bad rep for-profits have. 
Are you a chem eng student? My controls wasn't bad but thermo 2 was unpleasant 
I'm from the Mormon part of the states. A surprising number of guys I know go to BYU explicitly for the purpose of laying sheltered Mormon chicks. 
Oh yeah, anonymous craigslist blowjobs from BYU guys is basically a trope at this point in Utah gay culture. 
As a BYU student, I can confirm. However, I will say that none of my classes have mandatory attendance, like I keep reading about here. 
As an accounting student with an internship coming up this summer, I'm pretty sure I've offended a few people by visibly recoiling when they ask if the internship is paid or unpaid. You'd better believe I'm not about to work for free. 
An acquaintance of mine got expelled and then shot herself. I suspect it's pretty common. 
Kinda? I'd passively attempted it before, aka taking more of a dose than was safe of sleeping pills, but on my walk back over getting the news, with all intention of taking everything, the thought of my parents and the fact that it would kill them... yeah, that was what made me stop long enough to get in my car to go to my friend's. That's something I think about alot and that I hope my parents understand. They are so good and I love them so much that I valued their well being over the depths of my depression. 
That sounds a lot me. Like, scary similar. I'm about halfway through my program, and I'm fine if I'm answering basic theory questions (e.g. Q: When would you use a linked list over an array? A. When you need to do a lot of insertions and removals, but random access isn't important), but any time I'm tasked with actually programming something, my head turns into a brick in seconds. I'm not positive if I have an anxiety issue regarding this or not (my housemate thinks I do), but I'm really interested in hearing how you overcame your programming problem if you don't mind sharing. This is pretty much my only shot at a decent life and I feel like I'm going to blow it. 
Ok but even if they were being sarcastic how can it be cheating if you quote a cited resource? It's not like OP cited last semester's answer or something either. 
To any incoming college students: read the syllabus. That is both your best and your fallback if shit goes down with the instructor 
Wouldn't have killed them to cut him some slack and help arrange that, its not like he may have had a few to her pressing issues occupying him at the time 
Notre Dame doesnt make its students go to fucking church 
That's what I was thinking. Don't think of it as someone you think you're equal to being above you. Think of it as someone with a lot of knowledge and passion in a subject trying to help their society gain the same experience. 
Maybe, but how would the dean be able to know that young person was capable? As an adult you are judged on results not promises. 
Its just about the only place where they have arranged marriages and freakout about adult couples making out, but still allow women to attend universities. 
GreenVillain! That's what I'm going to start calling some of the idiots on Woodruff Road! 
They generally aren't supposed to read those until after the class has ended because of possible retaliation. If you notice, teachers usually leave the room and someone else gives it to you. You may need to speak to your dean about that. 
Ah man.. living this right now..have been doing this for months now. I always feel so good when I have a "normal" cycle but I always slip up. I had to get up at 9 AM and now I'll probably go to sleep at 11AM and sleep until nighttime. However, the reason I had to do that is cause I'm in therapy again, so yay for some progress, I guess. 
I hear of you play your cards right it is really a once in a lifetime experience. 
Current IST major at I believe the same university. Was electrical engineering before that, definitely stopped trying. Also really bad at math so that may have had something to do with it. 
The same assholes who loudly argue with their professor in econ 101 because "STEMlords know numbers better than their phd professors" 
Yeah the professors are not the ones handing the stuff out to us in most cases, but theres people who take the classes the year before and they usually pass it down to the next year. We got some file transfer server where all of that stuff is deposited and whatever you think can help others to pass the course is stuff that you upload there. 
Okay I do have to admit the Mormon tabernacle choir is really amazing. It's begrudgingly admitted (my family is mormon and the association with them is too strong) but I will admit it. God damn am I a slut for amazing choirs. 
Oh man, I don't know whether to be sad about this or laugh. Religion is a scary thing if you don't realize you can walk away from it. 
Right? Tuesday the year before was like the lamest day in the VEISHEA week. I was a bit of a party guy, but I was actually studying that night. Cracked my Friley window for some air, heard a bunch of chanting, and just thought "WTF?" 
Lol I've done the exact same. The thought of going to a 9-5 job and not getting paid is just absurd. 
I am so glad I did this, My English syllabus specified that late work would not be punished as long as an adequate reason was given and alternate date arranged by morning after the day it was due. Saved my ass on two occasion, once when my grandfather died, and once when my other grandfather died...it's been an interesting couple months 
When I was a phi tau, the TKEs were kicked off campus. That was scary. Stuff like that was always a rumor, never a reality. I remember someone from the national charter came down to hang out with us, check us out, etc. Our president at the time thought it was a good idea to tell this guy about the drugs and underage drinking because he "seemed cool" and would "understand." We lost our charter for like 6 months. Couldn't rush anyone, couldn't make any changes. The only reason we got to stay was by kicking out 1/2 of the actives, making them alum or expelling them from the house. It was a massacre. I got to stay because I was still a neophyte, but many of my friends were gone. Obviously, I didn't last much longer because of grades. 
I would be a lot happier to go to fucking church rather than regular church 
If he sold at the right time, he could have made a fair amount of money. 
Damn, didn't expect to hear Woodruff road mentioned on Reddit today. Hello fellow upstater. Also, fuck woodruff road. 
Yeah that's not right. A student drops off the evaluations at a separate office at my school. Our professors don't ever touch the forms. 
Progress is progress, I used to use sleep as a getaway tool, too. Never made me feel better, but waking up, having a shower, and getting that feeling of 'getting ready', even if nothing happens, always helped me tremendously. 
Lol, I used to be like those smug STEMlord who graduate from the best university in the country. Until I met some people from language major/communication major from Nowhere-college made more money than me. And just like that, I realized that my glorious STEM degree doesn't means anything. 
Is it just me, or does this poem read like a section of the song The Distance by Cake? Someone should do a rewrite like this of the entire lyrics 
I'm doing an engineering evening class and one of the modules was changed last minute from a seminar taught class to "distance learning". The reason? The college had Qatari students enrolled on the same course and the lecturer was double booked. I've had other tutors tell me that they can't fail the Qatari's. It's not even a good college, complete joke. 
You skipped your business class to fire fireworks out your ass, I take it? 
It's criminal. The fact that it's allowed and considered a norm is disgusting. 
Just remember you're out of grandfathers the next time you're late, I suggest doing aunts and uncles for a bit so it's not just grandparents, they might catch on. 
Tekes got kicked off our campus around 10 years back too, they put their pledges in a cage with a keg and told them they weren't getting out until they finished it. Pledges may or may not have been naked depending on the version of the story you hear. They only got busted because a mailman happened to look into the basement window and see it. Phi Tau got kicked off this year, when Tekes got reinstated. One of phi taus freshmen went into a coma at the hospital after blowing a 0.53 and that was it. 
And do you really want to stand up for the guy who threw his own feces in a fit of anger? 
Two reasons. i) Most students at IIMs are upper class and their parents wouldn't have that big an issue with their kids hooking up. ii) Those people are not dependent on their parents. So even if they were caught and parents called nothing much would come out of it. 
I read it in the cadence of Jizz in my Pants at first, but yours fits way better. 
I live abroad in Taiwan and many of the people I come across are trying to get their TOEFL so that they can attend grad school in the US. Many of them struggle to pass the TOEFL and a few that I know who have passed have had a difficult time in the states due to the differences in learning. As it's been explained to me, many of their schooling was rote memorization while in the US it's critical thinking which some have issues with. I also know of a few who pay for people to write their papers as they see a masters from the US as their ticket to staying in the US. 
Or when you have to pay them to get the internship. 
Eh, if you're new to programming, I believe you're just supposed to practice. I mean, I could say I knew the syntax of Spanish and the meaning of the words, but I'm not going to have many meaningful conversations with people unless I practice. It's the same with programming for the most part. With a few years of experience, it'll become second nature to you. 
Immediate family works best, plus what professor keeps track of how many siblings everyone has? 
I choose to believe naked. I also choose to believe they did the baby elephant walk. I bought a portable breathalyzer a few years back (after reading a tucker max story) and the highest I could get to was a .2. I can't even begin to imagine a .53. 
They don't take mind altering substances, so no caffeine. I've never heard the no hot beverages rule though, I've known a few Mormons who would definitely drink hot cocoa to warm up in winter... 
As someone who is in my first semester and heading down this road, this thread is making me feel a lot better. I've never been good at math (but I also never really tried or studied) and I've been terrified of programming but I really want to learn it. My friend tells me I'll hate it, and that it's the worse thing ever but my other friend who followed through with his school tells me all about how he's come to appreciate it so much, and to appreciate math itself a lot more. It's good to know there are others out there that haven't been programming since kids and I'm not alone. 
Whichever Dugger goes to University next is fucked in that regard 
The comments are so much cringe. They should get rid of the "pretend everything is real" rule. It's stupid. 
you obviously have to be cool with dead bodies though. That's a pretty big deal for most people. I thought about being an embalmer because I find the way bodies decompose interesting as fuck, although i'm sure in person with the smell I'd be less intrigued. 
Going to say Medical Lab Science is a great path. It's a 4 year degree. You will have minimal patient contact. Usually just draw the blood at some smaller hospitals. You run around the lab doing many different tests on body fluids and tissues. Start out of school at about $50K a year. 
How does one become a technical writer? I just graduated with a degree in Chemical Engineering and a minor in English and I'd love to be able to use both at the same time. 
How does one get into this? Is there a specific title for this kind of design position? Is it just called instructional design? I have a Bachelor's in graphic design that I haven't been using(my security job pays better than the design positions around here) so I'm curious. 
Husband was a merchant marine in the gulf and had to change careers due to the oil field going under. Has the tow boating industry held up? 
My foreman is 24 and makes 1,500 a week. You add in over time and night pay. He makes 50 a hour. Easy 2300 a week. Trade play with long hours is crazy. If played right. One could be making bank. 
What is a NOC technician? Apparently that's what I do, but I don't even know what the fuck it means, I thought it was made up by my boss. Pretty sure that's just my title but I don't actually do it. 
In my experience non-automation based QA/QE (manual testing) is dying fast. Most places want you to code up tests now (automation), so they can run automatically. This tends to lend itself to hiring more of a developer than a traditional software QA/QE. If you go this route, learn to code. 
I'm not trying to be offensive or anything, but if there's a serious shortage for those jobs why are so many Polish people moving to other countries like the UK? 
So you make $40hr, but how many hours a week are you reliably working? You're only working if there is a show in town right? It sounds great but if you only put in like 10 hours on a Friday and Saturday that might not be enough depending on location. 
To be fair it is getting harder to get into an SCM field for major companies without either 3-5 years of experience or a college degree. However, you can normally work for a third party logistics provider (3PL) out carrier service in dispatch, and earn some good money that way. 
As a slutty English major, how do you get into this? 
Transportation is the biggest business in the world. 
Be careful who you go with. Government gave extra funding to Apprenticeship schemes and lot of scammers tried to exploit it with worthless training to get the contracts or cheap labour. 
Glad to see OT in here. It really is an awesome profession. Guaranteed job security across the country and I've seen positions out west (mostly California) that are over $100 an hour plus benefits for home health care companies. Also, take it from 1 of 6 males (out of 32 total people in my cohort), guys in the field are in very, very high demand. I graduated from undergrad with a 3.01 and a GRE score of 301, but was heavily involved. Got into my public program easily. 
I work in an un-unionized factory. You be thankful, you be thankful right now. 
Every job fair I've gone to has been MLM trying to bullshit people and retail positions :/ 
It's a very nice ideal, but it's not at all practical. 
How do you get this kinda job? Serious. I'm 28, and bored as F with my office work, want a serious change. 
I've no idea about the US, but definitely in the UK, and from what I've heard a lot of the rest of the world. If you want to move to Australia it's on the same level as brain surgeons in terms of desirability 
Same here. I am about to quit my teaching job just a few weeks in. I don't know what I'm going to do but I just can't keep doing this. There should be serious intervention for teacher burnout. It's no joke. 
That and being able to handle continuously dealing with families going through some of the most difficult/heartbreaking times of their lives. 
My uncle who is a cardiologist told me about it. I love my job. 
I went to the Texas Heart Institute in Houston. It's one of the only 1 year programs. It is $20k and you get 2 years of education in 12 months. So prepare for long days but the rewards is amazing. Probably at least double your salary. That being said there are other schools available and I know almost nothing other than my experience at the Texas Heart Institute. My job is awesome. The machine drain blood from the patient, oxygenated it, removes carbon dioxide, stop the patients heart, cools and warms them and you can change their electrolytes. Check out a couple YouTube videos to explain it further. Deciding to go to perfusion school was the greatest thing I've ever done. You should do it too. Try to find a Perfusionist in your area and go see a surgery. You'll be hooked. 
My mom used to be a lab tech, it was a two year diploma (I think) and paid for entirely as well as her living costs and she got a good job immediately after school. Granted she started in the late 60s and early 70s but it is still a great option. 
My local community college has a wait list for their nursing and radiology tech programs. The nursing program is highly thought of by local hospitals so getting a job isn't terribly difficult. 
I went that same direction. Linguistics is a decent match but it's not a direct path. Or at least it wasn't for me. I had to attend a post bachelor's program to get the rest of my coursework for speech. It's very doable and speech pathology is a lot of fun but be on the look out for courses that speech grad schools would be interested in. 
I am a bit of an odd case, most of my experience as a MLT was during my time in the Army. I've only really been in the civilian side for the last year and a half. I can't really speak to the long term, but my company has a predominantly older staff, and over the next 5 years or so will involve a large amount of turnover in our middle and upper management. From what I can tell there can be a fair amount of stagnation, but there can be a fair amount of bargaining power as a worker with respect to your wage if you are in an exceptionally "dry" area. 
There's a big need for technical writers at a lot of companies - it helps if you have clips under your belt that show you can write, write well, and in the field in question. (So if you don't have any clips, work on that -- blog posts, articles, whatever you can manage.) Honestly the roles tend to stay open for a long time, so you shouldn't have a hard time finding open roles -- just look and apply, even if they are looking for more experience than you have. There's a lot of OTJ training in any case. 
The TLDR: Can you write well? Tech writers (more broadly technical communicators) create documents that others can use - whether it is something intended for a general audience to something intended for a very specific group. Take a manual. If someone has a problem, does your manual explain how to fix it? That's tech writing done right. Does it end up with several complaints that something still isn't fixed? That's tech writing done wrong. Text hierarchy. Can you navigate a document and understand where you are? That's tech writing done right. Does the person just give up and not bother to read what you've written? That's tech writing gone wrong. We write for the audience. We write for the client/boss. We do it in the most succinct, clear, and usable way possible to yield positive results from both the internal (client/boss) requirements and the external (audience/customer) need. 
The first bit gives me hope. The last bit scares me a little. 
I don't totally disagree - there is actual, valuable information in a path like this. Unfortunately my professional life is littered with people who know everything about learning models, but who have zero practical skills to bring those great thoughts to fruition. I am lucky to be in an organization that has learning strategists who chart curriculum, so IDs and course developers can execute. But in most places I have worked there isn't that luxury - the ID has to wear a lot of hats. And from a manager's perspective, I will take the guy or girl who can do tangible work - even if it makes a mockery of Mager or Ruth Clark - over someone who knows a lot but can't build anything. I don't mean to knock down a straw man here - you are right that to be effective you need solid design. But in order to stay employed, my employees have to execute. 
Spanish, Chinese, ASL, Arabic (various dialects), and some languages out of SE Asia are always in demand. 
This seems difficult because I would think there tons of Dutch people that speak both. 
I used to be a TD at a dual news station, man were those crazy days. Sometimes I have nightmares about it and sometimes I really miss it. I called the show and operated the switcher for an NBC/CBS affiliate. Arrive at 2, furiously make graphics for a few hours and dispatch the production assistants to live shots, then direct at 5, 530, 6, 630, make graphics for the late shows, simulcast with the CW at 8 and 9, squeeze in as many last second graphics as I can finish off, then direct 10 and 1030 shows. Also reported and produced on the weekends. What a time to be alive. 
Everything is expensive in Australia. Toilet paper is $500. 
They're talking about Sydney so I'm certain it's AUD. 
I never imagined I would ever be working in such a role -- I studied finance and mathematics, and worked in investment banking for a few years before I decided to do some travelling... and now I work as an ESL teacher! It's good fun because you are forced to find creative ways to teach people all the grammar and nuances of English. Today, for example, I gave my students a relatively difficult comprehension on Eminem. And then we played one of his songs and discussed his choice of prepositions, and how selecting a different preposition can either subtly, or significantly, change the meaning he is conveying. 
Comp Sci degree will help but isn't usually a requirement. I never went to college but I was able to work my way up to them from a tech support position. These types of jobs usually don't require in-depth knowledge so self-teaching is viable. 
This is one of the very few reasons I regret getting married so young. I love my wife and I'm very thankful I married her and I wouldn't change it for the world. That being said, I think it'd be sweet to work a job for 6-9 months a year, then get the rest off (and actually be able to afford to live). All this maritime merchants/tugboat stuff sounds awesome and like one hell of an experience. Unfortunately, I just can't imagine being away from my wife and our dogs for extended periods of time :( glad it worked out for you! Hope you're having enough fun for the both of us! 
Generally, yes. However, in populated areas there are often multiple avenues of work. With transportation, you can be in touch with multiple IATSE locals, working multiple calls and keep yourself busy/employed. Sometimes the paychecks take time to come in (i'm waiting on one from the PGA Tour that I did back in June), but they're worth it. There are often minimum hours on work calls, so you'll often get paid for at least 8 hours to load in a show, with usually a 4 hour minimum on the loadout. I started as an overhire worker;hauling gear off trucks and helping with bulk carpentry work. Once you've got knowledge and the IATSE crew knows you and your work ethic, you'll get set up on different tasks; lighting, sound, wardrobe, props, etc. Rigging is a more specialized subset of this, which pays GOBS of money in hazard pay, but if you're motivated and hardworking, you can get set up to learn from a rigger on a call, all while making $25 an hour at a minimum. 
I wouldn't say this is true at all. I work as a manager in SCM at a major company and entry level positions are mostly filled by collage grads. In fact we have relationships with many colleges that have good SCM programs and actively recruit from these schools every year. Really though you don't even need a SCM type degree. If you enjoy analytics, can get around in Excel and are open to learn we will teach you the job. 
Your layovers can very anywhere from 8-24 hours usually, longer if its a long haul international layover. 
Note: Anytime anyone says "gain seniority quickly" it's because people leave at an alarming rate. This should tell you something. 
Which is why it shocks me how much of it is never spoken about in a schooling situation until very recently. A Supply Chain and Management degree is a fairly NEW thing. I think people automatically assume there's drivers, conductors, etc. but do not think about all the other things that go on as well that need people. Half the people I speak to about what I do have absolutely no idea that it even exists. There's so much that goes into getting something from Point A to Point B. 
I'm currently doing an IT apprenticeship in the UK and it's really good. The company I work for hire all their apprentices because the work is so specific to the company. Also all the work for the course is based on the company work. 
Sure you're doing the *exact* same? I work at an Engineering company which also has apprentices, and while they do work that Engineers also do, there's a good amount of stuff that the qualified Engineers do that the apprentices wouldn't be able to do yet (though I'd say this is maybe only 30-40% of their time, there's definitely a *lot* of work that anyone could do...) 
What's the age cap for joining the army? I want to join, but have a record that I have to wait a few years to get expunged. I'm 25. 
I mean I don't know how it is in Canada, but in the US the FAA takes that shit extremely seriously, since you are literally the only thing keeping several planes from colliding with another, while simultaneously monitoring various other issues and problems. If you were "relaxed" during the stress test, I don't blame them, it is an extremely important and high stress job, and you can have hundreds if not thousands of lives in your hands for every minute of your entire shift. 
What's the difference between a unionized factory and un-unionizied? 
And business requirements should explain the issue/problem that needs solved. It shouldn't be "add this exact button to this exact screen." 
I'm not the vending expert but having worked in transport/distribution my whole life I've got a pretty good grasp on how these things work. Try this: Next time you see some vending machines somewhere, take a close look at the machines themselves. Somewhere on the machine there is almost certainly going to be a small plaque or a decal that says the name/address/phone of the company that owns and stocks the machine. Probably somewhere inconspicuous like the bottom rear corner on one of the sides. Then just head on over to Family Name Distributors, Inc. and ask if they're hiring. 
Agreed. But a low stress high paying job isn't for free. If you don't need an expensive Ivy degree or grad school, something's gotta give and the exams require a significant amount of study. For a talented math student, it should be reasonable though. 
Actuarially speaking, "close to 150-200k" means [75k, 400k). 
Yea they are hard and my mistake on the numbers I live in Manhattan. 
Absolutely. Someone above said "speech pathologist" and I had a laugh. I was in a speech pathology path and LOVED it in 2008. Watched my cousin who had done it all 4 years earlier struggle to find a job since all spots were filled by people no older than 30(so no option to fill in once someone retired. Too new of a career). You can work at hospitals or schools but schools only want one if they even want one at all, and hospitals are the big bucks so those spots fill quick. My school also told us that only the top 4 of us out of a couple hundred would be selected to go to grad school(which was a requirement at the time to be able to practice. I'm not sure if this is still the case but it's what I was told. There also may be more schools offering it. At the time there were only a few.) So sure, it's unconventional and pays well, but gooood fucking luck! Wasted two years of my life and now working as an accountant because as much as I fucking hate it, at least I will always have a job. 
Sorry if I sound ignorant, but isn't 3 years of courses a bit too much for just piano tuning? I'm not saying it's an easy job, but certainly you can reach a high enough skill level within less years if you have any musicality in your ear or practice with tuning tools... 
Dealing with people who are grieving can be exhausting, but if you keep in mind that your job is to make everything easier and better for them in their time of grief, it helps make the work more rewarding. 
Cool beans, thanks for the reply. Did you do a couple years of patient care before? e.g. CNA, EMT, etc. Some programs I'm looking at require up to 2 years of work experience in an allied health field. 
Plus though, being a nurse is a tough, tough job. 12 hour shifts are hard on their own, but working with some awful people, VERY high stress and demand on you without the "glory" that doctors get. If you're a nurse practitioner, in Canada, you can give out medication and run your own practice, it's the college programs in canada that land you the stressful "empty the pee pot" jobs. With that said, the other professions listed are 100% dead on- they have lax hours, will ALWAYS be in demand, etc. 
its the "2020 cliff" - the amount of senior employees retiring at or around the year 2020 is staggering. 
Some jobs offer signing bonuses of 5-10k as well. That's how large of a shortage there is currently. 
Is technical writing something you can learn via online or correspondence? Currently I work as a typesetter, but that is not just a dying field, it's dead... If my career was a human being, I'd be a zombie. Desperately trying to figure out where to go next, what to do. My computer skills I had before this job have stagnated sadly, and I keep trying to figure out how to get new skills, and where do I want to go. I've thought about teaching, but getting a degree at my age, with a family, would be difficult, and we have an abundance of teachers here, and no jobs. 
Check out if you have a chapter of the STC nearby. Society for Technical Communication. They offer relevant programming and networking opportunities. And usually free food. 
Start with a rope and a stand-up-paddleboard and work your way up from there! 
When I was in the Netherlands I didn't encounter a single person who didn't speak impeccable English. Granted most of my time there was in Amsterdam but even in some smaller cities everybody spoke great English. 
Don't you basically have to know someone to get those jobs though? 
As a self taught IT person, direct knowledge isn't necessarily the most important thing, sourcing research and problem solving are your BIGGEST factors. I've met people with multiple degrees in Computer science that can be run circles around by the guy who got the art history major and then started tinkering with computers. 
Well I think the downside is that you spend a lot of time at sea? 
But be very careful. There are industry trends to move QA towards automation. You can be the guy who writes the automation, but companies may want a computer-science-like degree for that position. 
Yeah i have seen how my neighbour - a building labourer/mechanic/everything - had his hearing ruined on the job. Its really sad :( 
Don't know why we would look down on plumbers or electrictions, long as they are honest and not gouging me. I need a plumber to fix a leaky waste water pipe. Waiting for the call back. If he knew how much I looked forward to his help to fix something I only *might* be able to fix with a few hours of research, tons of stress, and buying one use tools I don't have... well, he should be pretty proud. But damn, I know it's going to cost a few hundred bucks and it'll look so easy in retrospect that my wife will feel I'm useless. Plumbers should make a point to exclaim how challenging something is. I'd pay an extra 20 just to have him cuss and bitch about the difficulty. See, wife? There's no way I could have done that. He's a PRO and it sucked for him! 
Expunged is a meaningless word to the federal government. There is a waiver for everything. Just go ask. 
Hey, it's me, ur squad leader. We had a division run at 0630 tomorrow, so I need you to be at the company at 0330. Still miss the military? 
And it's not even that nasty of a job anymore I would guess. I don't know what they do besides driving around and taking the garbage cans behind the truck, but it seems like they don't need to get in contact with anything. The smell is the only thing that could be a problem in summer. We need a garbage collector AMA 
They take it extremely seriously by psych testing people and selecting people that don't take it too seriously. The psych profile is a non depressive with stable ego high ability in detail orientation, not too creative, and a high level of self control. Source : my brother is an air traffic controller. 
When corporate pushes, we can push back. Our pay, our benefits, everything is determined by our work contract. If corporate wants to make big changes regarding the employees they have to modify the work contract. So they sit down with the Union and negotiate. If we can't come to a satisfactory result our last resort is striking. Our contract is up next year so things are going to be renegotiated. I hope to whatever is out there that we don't have to strike. 
Oh tip of the ice Berg. It's this stage little company that tries to be big and multinational but still feel like a "family". Nepotism, intimidation, and changing of rules and paperwork depending on the situation. It's strange, the job itself isn't that hard, the real pain of it is dealing with shit that isn't actually my job. Pays the bills though, so I can't bitch too much more about it. 
The senior employees are retiring and the postal service is slowly reducing the workforce by hiring a little less than the number of retirees. New hires start as "non-career" employees who get limited benefits, aren't guaranteed 40 hours, and have flexible schedules. They usually start around $15/hour which isn't bad and eventually they can become full time career employees. 
I'm sorry, but your comment is missing a closing quotation mark and therefore won't compile. 
Girlfriend currently working on last exam for her ASA. There is nothing low stress about her job. 
Me and my dad joke about this a lot, "retire at forty, die at fifty." 
Three years is barely enough, typically you want and additional experience to be aurally good enough and fast enough for professional work, and to be quick at fault finding and repairing. Tuning courses also cover repairs to the action and casework, along with regulation and some voicing towards the end. There are so many variations on the instrument that there's always more to learn. There is a one year fast track course using mostly software, but it's really just an introduction. Musicality has very little to do with tuning either, and perfect pitch is no help at all. It's purely down to time and practice :) 
No I worked in a completely unrelated field. I think that I had to study harder than some of my classmates but things turned out well. 
My contract is 3 months, but agencies always want kids to stay for longer - they really struggle to get interest. I know my family would take me for the next 6 years if I was willing. I live with my family, and they feed me and treat me to all sorts of cultural activities. I teach at the mother's school in the morning, and do private tutoring with the daughter in the evenings (less than 20 hours of work a week). I have some experience in Chinese language and culture (studied Mandarin for 2 years in US), but many people come with out. As an Au Pair, you get free language lessons, but you will struggle for the first few months if you can't communicate with the gamily well. 
Nursing sounds like an extremely difficult job that I could not handle. Just doesn't fall in my skill sets. Luckily there are people that are cut out to handle that job. 
so what you're saying is I have 3 years to make myself qualified for a senior management role? 
Thank You : ) It's always great when people actually post useable information in threads like these 
This is a common mistake but I just wanted to point out that translators work with the *written* word while interpreters work with the *spoken* word. It's just a little pet peeve of mine because I work in the business. :) 
I knew nobody. I just knew to have a resume ready when there was a representative around at my community college to talk about working for the company. About %95 of my colleagues didn't know anybody either. 
I also do this overnight. It's actually a pretty nice gig. I spend all night reading, 12:30 to 8:30. 
Yep. I've definitely seen a shift in the last two years at major companies towards "automation engineers" verses your typical QA tester. You can still make the jump to AE without a technical degree, and there are still plenty of traditional QA jobs out there, but for the purposes of this thread (college-aged adults looking for interesting career paths), I'd go as technical as you can. 
Ear protection isn't for pussies is it? Like I had a former co-worker (who went partially deaf) used to say. 
Yeah I worked as an onsite electrician apprentice this past summer, and although I learned a lot... people on reddit need to realize that the trades are grueling work, and very physical. A comfy desk job would be preferable for most people. 
The trick is to work your way into management before you get too old. 
Here in Illinois almost all unions require you to have a sponsorship from a current member. I think it's a silly system, and really at the end only helps those whos families have connections. 
Oh, and I know it's fucking freezing out here, but Johnson forgot his fucking sweats, so we're all stripping down to shorts. Next time police your own. 
Agreed. Sfs and maintenance are easily the most fucked jobs for their BS to pay scale. Pilots get fucked, but pilots are paid handsomely for it. Sfs and maintenance get more ass fucking with even less lube as a reward. 
Isn't that against a labor law? I'd imagine he can sue. 
I'm also on my last exam for the ASA designation. The job's not a cakewalk obviously, but I would definitely put it in the "low-stress" category relative to other things I could be doing. I'm sure things vary by company though. 
How does it damage your health? I thought the danger is that you cut open a pipe and the change in pressure sucks you in or something. 
How hard was the schooling? I'm an RN now but want to specialize down the road. 
Better teach those kids the real American way by slacking off on the boss' dime to browse Reddit at work 
Not necessarily. Most likely, there will be people above you to take these 2020 positions, but you'd be able to move into their vacated positions in, say, 2021. There's a flow. 
Wow, that it's my most useful "TIL" for ages, thanks. I had no idea they were different. 
Yeah, I watch Twitch and Netflix a lot. Actually on shift right now too. Watching MightyBluJustice on Twitch at this moment. 
So my 18 y/o son is interested in the Coast Guard but finding several road blocks with getting in. This merchant marine career path could a be viable alternative for him, thank you for this. How is the USCG OS credential training different than pursuing active duty, and what does it require him to do? Is it free? 
Well, I mean, they're called ear MUFFS but damn man, don't put them on your genitals. 
If he was union he wouldn't have to. The union would sue on his behalf. Things go wrong in unionised workplaces as well it's just when it does there's a safety net. 
This has been my experience with unions as well. They have benefits but they can make small tasks impossible. Unions work when both sides work together and they are miserable when that isn't the case. 
It's just really, really high stress on your mind and body. And of course normal welding isn't the healthiest thing in the world, either, over many years. I have not done statistical research on the average lifespan of underwater welders compared to the average population, though. 
Why, god forbid we should promote our own people. What godless heathens do you think we are, to reward your long hours of toil and years of loyalty with a promotion and a raise?! Oh, you're leaving us for a better position and more benefits?! After all these years, the nerve! *He seemed to say*. 
So does that mean there's only really work when something is down and you're not assigned any kind of busy work when idle? Is that common in this line of work? 
The planet should move to a 4 on and 3 off schedule. Four 10 hour shifts and 3 days off. 
I'm currently in the Coast Guard if you need and info you can shoot me a PM 
The smelly smell of husband. You must really love him :D 
It wouldn't surprise me if we saw a major resurgence in unions in our lifetime either. 
Yea it will be like the black plague in europe. After being treated like serfs, they had a lot more bargaining power when half the workforce in Europe died. We too shall benefit from the ashes of the boomers 
Yes that's correct and no it's not common. I'm part of the overnight team but we only service council workers, who are all sleeping when I'm on shift. So where the day workers get over 400 calls a day and are always busy, us night workers are lucky to get 2. 
But if we go that way I would still say we need a 30 hour work week. I believe most studies actually show productivity dropping after 6 hours in a day anyways 
They should talk to my local. I'm an apprentice in SLC. We were a good ol' boys club once. Now we have less than 17% market share and can't get enough people to even do that little bit of work. We no longer have paid time or sick leave. I even brought work to my hall and was laughed at because they are greedy fivks who can't see long term (in my opinion, also given what most of the work being done here is.) when I have my license I'm out. Our Union sucks, the non Union side has it better here, despite what we are told. 
Of course, I do. ;) I actually have a very sensitive stomach (I just dry heaved just thinking about the smell of his garbage truck--now that smells horrendous!) so if he actually did smell bad, then we'd have a big problem. 
It depends on the field, but yes, productivity takes a nose dive after 6 hours. For some fields, especially those requiring high degrees of problem solving skills like development and data science, it can take as little as 3 hours to get burned out depending on the person and their work environment. 
How about the fact that oxygen was the cause of the largest extinction event in the history of the earth? 
Your mind is going to be blown when you find out about TV. 
My first memory was *something* weird. I remember wandering into the living room after breakfast and stopping dead in my tracks at the realization that I was alive. It felt like the very first thing, from then on has been a consistent stream of memories forming. It's like the transition from animal to human. I described the house to my mom and she says I had to have been two years old. 
Cabbage, broccoli, cauliflower, kale, Brussels sprouts, collard greens, savoy, kohlrabi, and gai lan are all cultivars of the same species (Brassica oleracea) 
7x the weight of a shoelace is still fuckall though 
And every computer program ever written is made out of just two. A lot of the power and variety comes from the hardware that runs it and interprets the data, which can't actually act on its own. But without the information a computer would just be a lump of silicon, and a human would be just a lump of goo. 
I *really* hope NASA uses this exact terminology when they release their findings. "Breaking: There's shit swimming around on one of Saturn's moons" 
The really trippy thing is combining that with a bit of other relativistic knowledge: - there are no "absolute" speeds. All speed is relative to another thing. - you can't accelerate to the speed of light with respect to any other thing - you can accelerate to 99% of the speed of light with respect to the earth and then shoot another object out in front of you at 99% of the speed of light... and from the Earth that looks like that object is barely faster than you. 
This makes sense to me but I'm unable to comprehend the size of both an atom and the earth. Looking at diagrams or videos that try and explain the scale of this planet don't help by much. I don't think we'll ever be able to grasp the concept of huge or tiny amounts of anything. Distance, size, amount, time are things we can only understand in human amounts. 
I own birds. I tell people that I own birds because I like birds. The truth is I'm envious of their extra-spectral sensory abilities and have been keeping them captive to slowly wear down their resolve until they finally crack and give up their chromatic secrets. Then, with phase one complete, I'll corner the art supply market. Suck it, Crayola. 
Yeah, the fact that GPS satellites have to correct their software for time dilation effects to sync properly with ground stations because they receive less gravity than the GPS stations on the ground just amazes me. It exists. We can measure it. 
When I was in 5th grade we had a substitute teacher who said the sun wasn't a fucking star, and the whole fucking class agreed with her because they were all stupid too. God that pissed me off, haven't thought about it in a while until I saw your comment 
I forgot who the exact person the quote is attributed to, but a physicist once said "Given enough time, hydrogen atoms will eventually go through puberty and want to talk to girls." 
if you go up one more, 1 trillion seconds is 31,710 years. A lot of people were still alive 1 billion seconds ago, but 1 trillion seconds, we're talking pre-civilization. Something as basic as writing wouldn't be invented for another 25,000 years from that point 
There's roughly 7 x 1027 atoms in the human body. That's more than a trillion trillions. Or more than a billion billion billions 
A lot of people forget just how insanely old the Pyramids are. 
Luckily we have satellites like the COsmic Background Explorer (COBE) that can image the moment the universe stopped being opaque, redshifted all the way into the microwave spectrum and long before any galaxies were even thinking of coalescing. Not to dis the James Webb, because it's pretty kickass and high resolution in addition to being able to see really far back in time. 
you can fit all of the planets in our solar system between us and the moon 
It's one of the few solids that is less dense than its liquid form. It's actually a very surprising fact. 
Let's not forget that the very same ball of protein mush ends out electric signals that are capable of precisely controlling other slabs of meat. 
Cleopatra lived closer in time to the opening of the first Pizza Hut than she did to the construction of the great Pyramids 
Don't know about the milky way around the universe, but the sun is traveling about 500,000 miles per hour around the galaxy. We've literally flown a million miles between the time you posted your message and I read it. 
Over the years I've worked with some pretty nasty materials in the lab. Acutely toxic, mutagenic, caustic as fuck, etc. Most dangerous part of my day? Commuting to the lab and back. 
Maybe that's why we haven't been contacted by life on other planets, because they all think we a bunch of fucking dinosaurs. 
Similarly, because matter is never created or destroyed, the atoms that make up your body will always exist in one form or another. I see it as a form of immortality; you'll be around, in a sense, until the end of the universe. 
That those very same clusters of moisture and heat create some of the most destructive and deadly weather in the world? Or, that they create enough energy to turn air lethal, capable of whipping debris up to speeds of over 250 mph, that are capable of destroying homes and lives like nothing? Or that the amount of energy harnessed in a single thunderhead per minute is more than we (all of humanity) can produce in a year? Or that lightning is plasma, created from the rubbing and friction of particles inside clouds? 
Do you think this will hold up as a defense in court? 
And if you wear glasses that invert everything you see, your brain will eventually figure out what's going on... and flip it back for you. o_O 
They're just badly named imo. Mathematically they are valid but calling them imaginary just makes laypeople think it's something mathematicians pull out of their ass for fun 
The first time I knew that the internet would truly change the world was in July 1994, when comet Shoemaker-Levy 9 crashed into Jupiter, and I could see the NASA images within a few minutes of it happening. It blew my mind when I realized that *everything* would be like that going forward. 
I think the "Big Rip" theory is more terrifying then Heat Death. ELI5 Big Rip: The universe is not only expanding, its expanding at every point at a growing rate. Meaning that the space between the nucleus and the electrons is, you guessed it, also expanding but the atomic force pulls the electrons back inline 'faster' then they are getting pushed back.... for now. The Big Rip states that there will be a point, because of the increasing expansion rate, that the atomic force will be too weak to counteract the expansion. So every atom, every group of partials in existence, will be 'ripped apart'. AND because the expansion will be faster then light at this point, every partial will be doomed to wonder the universe alone, never grouping up again. 
You can do the same thing with people! ...Don't, though. But film it if you do! But don't. 
But isn't Cold, the term we give to things that have low heat? 
For another perspective, though, the universe has already expended most of its (available) energy. All the stars that will form from now until the end of time will only amount to about 5% of the stars that have already lived, and mostly died. 
Ah, the old existential crisis. Hello my old friend. How I've missed you. 
I think you have a misconception in there. The Universe isn't expanding in the sense that there is space outside the universe that is getting filled up. It's more that the distance between points is increasing. Imagine drawing marks on a balloon and then inflating it. The points aren't 'moving' as it inflates, but they become further apart. 
That's a common misconceived debunking of a "misconception" that's actually not a misconception. All the caterpillar's organs stay in roughly the same place. 
Not even floating. We're fucking hurtling through space. 
Betty White was born seven years before Anne Frank. 
Maybe to you, but to the shoelace it's everything 
I still don't understand how hardware stores software physically through circuits 
The last example really helped solidify a lot of relativity ideas in my head just now. 
Cats can see ultraviolet color coming off of prey's urine. Those selfish bastards will never give up their secret. 
Not just the gravity but also it's incredible speed as it orbits. GPS is one of the only technologies that needs to account for both special *and* general relativity. 
My 10th grade full time history teacher spent over an entire class period trying to convince us 500 BCE occured before 1000 BCE. For some reason, she wasn't teaching the next year. 
That one sentence just made dark matter make much more sense to me(or rather why we don't know anything about it other than the fact that it's there). 
Well being aquatic helps a lot there, something the size of a whale isn't going to do well on land. 
And I just couldn't get a couple more billion for my penis. 
We look back on Rome as an ancient culture, the Romans looked back the same exact way at the Egyptians. The mind boggles. 
Are our solar systems part of the equivalent of the atomic structure for much larger solid matter? Does it just keep getting bigger? Is it turtles all the way down? I both hate and love thinking about this stuff. 
Try using plastic wrap or aluminum foil next time. 
Evaporation happens so fast you can measure it's rate on an analytical balance. You can literally stick a beaker of water on the balance and watch as the beaker gets lighter. 
Also the world as we know it would be fundamentally different if not for that fact 
That slab of meat also tries to figure how itself works. He even namned himself that cheeky bastard. 
Cleopatra wasn't Egyptian either. So maybe it's more appropriate to call her closer to the opening of a little Ceasers 
This would be really weird with time travel. If you traveled 100 years back in time, you would also have to travel to another place in the universe to end up on the same place on earth. 
I work with hydrofluoric acid on a semi-regular basis. Pretty much the only thing that scares me more than driving a car. 
Or they've already been and discovered no intelligent life. Or maybe we ARE the first intelligent life to form. 
I had to explain to a colleague what the ISS was after he over heard me talking about how awesome it is and confronted me about openly supporting terrorism in the work place and threatening to report me to HR. 
Jesus. Not sure why I read this shit before going to bed. 
Yes, but most people's intuitive idea of "cold" is that it's a substance that matter *has*. Or at the very least that was once a popular idea. The fact that it's just the absence of something else was an actual discovery. 
Nothingness doesn't exist. Applying properties to it is impossible because, by definition, Nothingness is nothing. 
Still, if you dissect pupated insects that are going through metamorphosis, they are pretty much goo with some slightly more solid bits. I had a friend who made the mistake of looking at _Drosophila_ imaginal disks during pupal stages as part of her PhD project. Apparently the already tricky dissections on tiny fruit flies were _insanely_ hard when everything has the strength of wet tissue paper soaked in dilute wood glue. 
Yeah but if there was a black hole that was the same size as the sun, well... 
Are humans "good enough"? A lot of more-common causes of natural selection don't apply to us any more. 
That impact force is actually carried through your articular cartilage, on the ends (condyles) of your tibia and femur. Articular cartilage has virtually no blood flow and is essentially an ionic gel, so with age you eventually see osteoarthritis (degradation causing higher friction and pain) 
I'd really love to be able to understand all of this, but, to the sadness of my ego, I can't. 
Even better: You're going at 0.99c from Earth (relative to Earth). Your friend is going at 0.99c the other way (relative to Earth). A photon passes you, and moves at the speed of light relative to you. It passes Earth and your friend, and is moving at the speed of light relative to both of those, too. 
Ten minutes later I am still seeing the blue circle. I think I stared at the white dot for too long 
Same, kinda like a weird Japanese flag stalking my eyes. 
I turned off Night Shift for this and now all this blue messed up my sleep. 
Idk looked like regular cyan to me. Wait, *am I a bird?!?* 
Same here... We've been on the Internet too long. Any time something requires staring and concentrating, I'm afraid it's a screamer. 
All that science and we use it to find the closest fast food place. 
Lol, still not comfortable, but what can I do y'know? 
When I was a kid there were these Gatorade commercials with Michael Jordan and Mia Hamm, where they sweated Gatorade. For some reason I assumed our blood was various Gatorade colors also 
I think they're just done with all your bullshit. /s 
my year 6 teacher told me if obama was elected he would be notable as the *second* black president of the states, as martin luther king was the first .. 
In 8th grade our English teacher got into an argument with the class over whether the word balloon has two sets of double letters. We had to get a dictionary to convince her. No one paid much attention after that. 
What's even crazier is that we're surrounded by dark matter. We usually think of it as something off in outer space, but it's even passing through you right now, which it can do since electromagnetism is what causes things to collide. 
At 68% of the universe, I think it is normal matter. WE'RE the weird ones. 
I wonder how much bigger it would make it? You probably just gave yourself a thin coating of smegma. 
Don't you mess with my mostly empty brain like that! 
The Romans would have looked back at the Egyptian New Kingdom like we look at the Romans. The New Kingdom Egyptians would also have looked at the Old Kingdom like we look at the Romans. 
Fundamentally as in life as we know it would not exist. Liquid water is pretty nifty stuff. 
The brain does not know how the brain works. Pretty crazy when you think about it. 
I'm 25 years old and this comment alone is what made me fully understand why time travel is so complicated. People say "you would have to move through space AND time" but it wasn't until this comment that I fully understood the gravity of that statement. 
Or maybe some of these far away planets have intelligent life on them now, but we're only able to see their past. 
Don't worry it's unlikely to happen before morning. 
It felt too important, and didn't want to be beneath any organs. 
We dont really face the darwinian challenges because of modern tech. Evolution is still happening, but incredibly slowly 
Here's my metaphor, it may not be 100% accurate but I think it helps explain. Imagine a crazy person trying to determine if they are actually crazy or not. They'll need to come up some tests to help them decide if they're crazy. For example , they might say "I'm crazy if I wear pants on my head." This statement is like the axioms in part one. It now becomes a rule in our "crazy person test". Now, part 2 of the idea asks, how do we know the rules in our test are valid? We can't determine within our "crazy person test" that the rules actually describe a genuine crazy person. We have to look outside our test system to see if the rules are correct. So in this example, we'd have to ask other people "Is wearing pants on your head crazy?" in order to establish the rule as a true indicator of craziness in our test. So to wrap up, the idea is that there's no way for a crazy person to determine if they're crazy or not without the input from someone else besides the crazy person. 
I'm too tired for this shit not to fuck with me please stop this is hurting my brain 
You could type "the joys of blowing the minds of kids". 
Side effects include GLOWING SWEAT Use your sweaty body to fuel **SWEET RAVE PARTIES!!!** *techno music intensifies* 
Dude fuck you it's Saturday, I just woke up I'm trying to chill, and now I've got you telling me there are little black ghosties flying through my bod. 
1x10-15 ml. You just gave yourself *one* HIV virus 
And your brain is nothing more than a bunch of cells creating electrical pulses and moving molecules around, yet somehow you are conscious. 
What the ever loving fuck. Of everything in these threads, this, and the guy above you, just fucked with my head. I can't process this correctly. 
Actually they have no idea when Oxford was founded. They know people were teach8ng there as early as 1096, but don't know when exactly they starred. 
I just read We Are Legion (We Are Bob), and one thing that kept throwing me was the distances and velocities involved. They don't even use velocities most of the time (since that is relative), usually refering to acceleration in term of G. But they will come hauling into a system at like .99C and spend months decelerating at 5G. Really good book that is super engaging. *Relative. Not relevant. But it is relevant. 
Yup, I think a lot of people don't realise how far it actually is. Space exploration is so cool. 
That's something that messes with my head. I know everyone says "there's stuff going on inside of me that i don't even think about!" and yeah, it's crazy, but the heart of that is that your brain, the one you do everything with, make every decision and devise every plan, is simultaneously controlling your entire body in ways you can't even comprehend. And you, with direct access to your brain, cannot attain the information that it's using to do so. Makes me feel like a spectator. 
Ok I've been reading through a bunch of these and your comment is the one that fucked with my head 
Literally the only thing that matters is enjoying the time we have alive. Existence is pretty meaningless but our reality is that right now we have consciousness so binge watch netflix, eat pizza, and fuck your SO plenty of times. 
*10 minutes later* .."and that's why dogs chase their tails" 
The concept breaks down once something can guide it's own evolution. (genetic engineering is better) 
SSDs simply are arrays of charge traps that can be read without changing. Though with each write the "trap door" degenerates a bit, because the charge is shot through them. That's why SSDs degenerate. 
Maybe there is alien shit but maybe not. Maybe aliens don't poop. 
time goes slower next to heavy shit. Get away from heavy shit and it speeds up. 
Ugh, what the hell am I gonna do with a second HIV? 
That's okay, Sumer was likely the Old Kingdom Egypt's ancient civilization, though I believe there's still some debate on that subject. 
Well the aztecs started in the early 1400s. So It's even longer than I remembered. 
I love that we can look at a date like that, and know a number hasn't fallen off. 
I wonder how the ships in star wars decelerate so quickly after warp 
Especially the moon. I drove from Savannah to Cape Canaveral on Monday for a rocket launch to the ISS. The Space Station when it overflew Cape Canaveral was closer to me than was Savannah. To cover the distance to the moon, I'd have to drive around the Earth 10 times. It's so damn far out there. 
We are spectators. The brain mostly does its own thing, makes its own decisions, and conscious "us" trails along after telling ourselves we meant to do that. 
Also this whole comment thread was our brains speaking about themselves. 
But do dogs have tails, or do tails...Have dogs..? 
Or for a simpler example: Artificial Selection. The dairy cows and pigs and dog breeds we have today didn't exist back when we first domesticated wild cows, hogs and wolves. They simply evolved with thousands upon thousands of years being with us. In fact the majority would die out without us. Specially the dairy cows and sheep. They NEED to be milked/fleeced or they'll have health problems. You should be VERY aware of all of this if you ever owned an expensive dog breed. They're walking packs of minor health problems. Asmathic Yorkies going blind, Labs with infinite hipbone and fur problems getting so itchy they scratch their ears and lick their toes till they bleed... 
Can't imagine a better way to die, honestly. RIP woofs! 
Read the description. It's not a color you can't see, but a color your display can't show you. 
I find it fascinating how few people are aware of that 
Did you ever see the beauty of Cyan the True? It's not a color your monitor would show you. It's a chromatic legend. 
The last people who called themselves romans were incorporated into the kingdom of Greece at the end of world war 1. 
God, Cheryl would be my poison. So sexy I couldn't resist, and so crazy she would literally poison me. 
Why not Rachel Ray and Bobby Flay then for a *true* flavor explosion? 
The only man in the thread who will ever get what he asks for. 
Would it be weird to say that I think Tom would be better in bed than Elizabeth? 
If you pull off Nanny McPhee's makeup you get Emma Thompson, that definitely works 
He didn't get the nickname "The Polish Cannon" from just his kicking leg 
Maybe your friends would prefer to meet Ser Bronn of the Blackwater, Hero of the Battle of Blackwater Bay? 
Because even as a joke, I wouldn't want to see Bobby Flay shirtless. 
I can't tell if you just complimented him, or burned everyone else. 
Tom Hanks is always great in everything he's in, including you. 
"I regret the day we took that ring off then promised to put them back on but ended up not putting them back on but I never really took it off because this was all for money" 
Yeah what the fuck is this I came here for sexy not for 1800's political slogans. 
Damn, I would've thought Reddit knew about Asa Akira, considering she's even done an AMA before. 
I would bet good money that her and Aubrey Plaza have fooled around. 
I'm a straight dude but in that threesome *I'd* definitely be the one getting spitroasted. 
I feel like he doesn't want to remembered as a guy in a wheelchair, he wants to be remembered as a transsexual alien. 
I'd bet he's a world-class cuddler too. Like the kind of man where you just want to curl into his chiseled chest and wrap his strong arms around you and listen to his heartbeat as you drift off to sleep feeling safe and warm, wishing that you could just live there forever. But not, like, in a gay kinda way or nothin'. 
Suddenly, Macho Man Savage kicks open the bedroom door. BOOOOONESAW IS READYYYYYY! I GOT YOU FOR 3 MINUTES! 3 MINUTES OF *PLAYTIMMMMMME!* 
More like you becoming the third wheel watching two supremely attractive people making sweet, sweet love while you sit in the corner feeling completely inadequate and hating yourself 
But don't Polish women have their surnames ending with '-ska'? 
I, for one, think about the sex lives of ALL the people I meet. Not just celebrities. 
Don't lie to me, boy. I know what you're thinking: Here comes old Greg. He's a scaly man-fish. You don't know me. You don't know what I got. 
Titties in the morning, titties in the evening, titties at supper time... 
You can't sue me! I'm already being sued! Double indemnity! 
I was going to take this class called Cooking for One, but the teacher killed himself. 
That's exactly what I would improve too. If you have a lot of self discipline you can do anything 
You'd become the one that can drink anyone under the table. 
Depends on your level really. If you're a lower level like level 12 or so, it is pretty significant. You'll mainly be going through the Education questline so stuff like INT would be super helpful. All the way through the University expansion pack. However if you're a little bit higher level (I'm 25 for instance), 10 points isn't *too* much, still nice to have though. I need to train some other skills to make up for my lack of certain attributes but I found a good guild that is nice to do missions with so I think by having more currency from that, I'll be able to train as I please. Good luck! 
If you are the only one that can use Mage Hand then you might be OP. 
With the additional intelligence boost, you'll be as dumb as shit! ;) 
+10 Charisma! Unfortunately, my Apathy and Ineptitude stats are still abysmally high. 
Totally this. I have my first interview outside of college today to be a developer for a mixed reality serious game company(like real life applications) and pretty nervous so my stutter shows alot more often and I ramble incoherently when stressed... 
Hopefully you just saw the skill name and said "I want that one". 
 You encounter a wild jammed printer. Attempting to troubleshoot... Oh dear, you've fainted. 
Drinking a glass or 2 of water before going to bed usually forces me to get up once I wake up. Then I try to snowball that into making food or doing laundry or even just going for a drive. Gotta keep moving even if it's sideways for awhile 
What, no ammo? I'm skeptical a Floridaman would walk around with two guns and no bullets. 
You've allocated 1 too many skill points there, mate. 
While you may indeed want to be better at debate, it does no good if you're trying to debate with people who aren't good at debating in the first place. 
Just gonna warn you, it feels more like sucking a dick than getting your dick sucked 
You... You sure he's that happy because of his dancing skills? I mean, I'm pretty sure there must be really untalented happy people and amazing dancers with depression. I feel like the guy's happy cause he's happy and the dancing is a plus. 
Okay, now what skills do you want to spend the 10 points on, other than these exsisting racial skills? 
More strength=more battles won=more EXP=more stat points early on 
When Little Timmee found a chance To multiply his skill - He chose a pleasure-luck advance, With concentrated will. 'Oh clever me,' he said with joy, And self-indulgent glee - 'I really am a cunning boy, And no one's smart as me! 'I'll be the finest lad alive,' He laughed aloud with pride. But Timmee timesed his pain by five. And Timmee fucking died. 
If you do decide to min-max life roll a bard for that nifty expertise to double your proficiency. 
Whoa. I'd put two into linguistics then. I'll work on leveling the rest by myself, but mastering a romance language and mandarin seems like it would give me a good starting point. I feel like my skills are already pretty high and diverse, but I think I'd add the extra into REPAIR or similar because I can't fix anything now and I'd love to be able to do work around the house or fix my car. 
There's no garuntee you be able to do that. Though being smarter is always nice. 
Jack of all trades. Because when you need somebody, you go looking for the person 1 point above normal. 
Then open a bar in Nepal and have drinking contests with the burliest of men around until your old BF comes back. Unfortunately, he will have some cronies following him and they burn your bar down during a fight over some stupid piece of jewelry your father said you should never let go of. 
Referring to age as level makes life so much more fun. At least then there's a legitimate reason the lvl 70s-80s get to make the rules. 
Steady lads, it's a killer DM. Hold it together and we might make it to the end of the module yet... 
infected by soul-poisoning dagger... and finds a deus machina cure... but it gets him imprisoned and spawns what at least *looked* like was going to be a serious recurring enemy at the time even if he didn't do much at first(had to absorb a couple other accidentally released ancient evils before becoming relevant) fucks up with the fae! ...and gets away with only a lost eye and significant powerboost out of it... except part of that boost was he has half his mind replaced with random war tactics which heavily skews his personality gets raped at knifepoint... but at least it was a princess who's demanding you marry her rather than be executed like her other victims(anyone who wears a raven mark, which was part of your random "lucky" award for surviving the fey) right?...but shes even worse than most of the OTHER wot women and that's almost impossible luck can only do so much to make a shit situation better, other stats might avoid it entirely 
Because with my luck, I'd apply the +10 to find out it's out of 1,000. 
"this invisible thief took out all our cameras with incredible accuracy with what appears to be a bow and arrow" 
I played a lot of Skyrim but never browsed the community. I thought I was so cool and unique with my "Stealthy Ranger" patrolling Skyrim, killing all the bandits. Imagine my surprise when I got on reddit and see... *Just about everyone else did the exact same thing* 
Same here. I tried to train my skill set for an increase in [Empathy] but damn. It's annoying because you're never on the same quests as anybody else so there's not much [Empathy] you can give them ya know? 
"Yeah we have a video of you murdering those children." *10+ Charisma* "Uhhh, sorry you're free to go, sir." 
+3 Diplomacy +7 Deception seems about the right mix. 
Random advice: if you start rambling, just stop midway through the sentence and reiterate the main point. Awkward but looks way better than trying to "tie in" your rambling sentence into something coherent as you go along. 
seems like a good skill from the description though 
My brother game to visit for thanksgiving and I bought the handsome jack collection for Xbox, even though we had both already played through to oblivion on the computer honestly that entire 5 days we sat on my couch drinking beer and playing Borderlands, morning into night. . .it was great. 
Why not Chaotic good? All the benefits of being good, without the draw back of having to follow pesky laws. 
To be fair, pretty much everyone in the thread is putting the points into stats/attributes, rather than skills. 
He couldn't stop you. Not with those muppet arms. I too shall steal this. 
Ask yourself: does it make sense? If the answer is no, that is the CORRECT answer as to what Floridaman would do. 
+50 Happiness +77 Luck +42 Charisma +10**6** Math skills 
+10 Reading Comprehension is a huge boast though, most people never really level the skill up to more than 7. *Dude tries to use [Facebook], but realizes the ToS are much to invasive and he can't use the [Facebook] chat platform to communicate with females* 
Well used to talk to them , but most of the time they were ignoring me , so now its hard to get back my confidence. 
As someone who likes to dance and start dance circles I can tell you that during those moments the joy is overwhelming no matter how shitty your day was. People light up, cheer you on, call you back to dance again to show someone up, and then congratulate you afterwords. Not saying this guy isn't a positive and uplifting guy bc most people I have met that do these things are, but there is a lot of joy that comes out of dancing. 10/10 would recommend learning if you are feeling down. 
Yeah, but if you boost your Intelligence enough, you can get additional skill points at level up. 
Well then he can beat you up and take your lottery money. 
The motto of a Rogue. Jack of all trades, master of none. Still better than a master of one. 
You might want to add a point to basket riding and snake charming too. 
Yeah I mean a lot of the higher levels are in good positions (have started guilds, been active on their servers, etc). Ultimately though the devs have the final say, however a lot of the players think they abandoned the game after creation and scrapped the project. So, going off of that, nobody really knows the point of the game other than to seek out self-imposed desires. Either way, it's a lot of fun! 
I'd suppose he could firmly establish the methods of wizardry, and assuming others add points to the stat, he could become the head of a new powerful field of applied science (-magic) 
the key distinction being that he was thrust into those situations, and without luck, any normal person would have succumbed to the first threat immediately. he needed extraordinary luck to deal with extraordinary threats. having extraordinary luck on its own seems like it'd just be great...unless there's some unknown apocalypse coming I'm not aware of...in which case, an eye is a small price to pay. 
Been a while since I read the book, but I remember stuff like people around Rand miraculously surviving 20 foot falls, and other people accidentally tripping and breaking their necks. 
Same with the Fallout series. Stealth sniper is the most common tactic to do. Can't really blame people for it though. Sneaking in Beth games is very easy and very powerful. And enemies usually forget of the giant arrow sticking out the side of their head. Or how their friend who they were just talking to had their head explode. 
Yeah, [Empathy] is a really rare stat trade. I have maybe two friends that are sometimes on compatible quests, so I can sometimes trade [Empathy] with them, but their's is always really awkward, and it generally doesn't seem worth the trade. 
"Yes, I killed the kids, but I did I it so smoothly, didn't I?" 
Nah it's all teeth and no hands. Terribly ineffective. 
That sounds like a really great vacation. It's cool you have that with your brother. So was Salvador your favorite ? 
PC is "paper cassette", not "personal computer". It's what HP used to call the tray you put paper into. "Load" means to put paper inside the paper cassette. "Letter" is an abbreviation for "letter-size", which means standard 8.5x11-inch paper. So the printer is asking you to load some 8.5 x 11 paper into the tray because it is empty. Source: I have had an HP LaserJet 4P on my desk for the past 20 years. 
Its not relevant to the original post, but it's relevant to the comment/thread I replied to 
*I am wrong? Am I out of touch?* *No, it's the kids that are wrong* 
A quote I have found true "For in much wisdom is much vexation, and he who increases knowledge increases sorrow." 
Still, a part of me would think that floridaman has a bunch of ammo but no gun. Like, he plans on throwing the damn bullets. 
You suffer an aneurysm Lana as the punch is thrown. Lucky for them. 
 Bruh, he literally wrote you a song telling you not to. 
I just wish they'd give us an option to remake our character. I know it's supposed to be permadeath but some players really didn't anticipate the value of an attractive character. 
he totally ruins that fuckers day though. doorway to no where, falling forever, bye bye. 
yup, the dragons luck is messed up. some days every single person for 100 mile radius runs out and gets married, then next week in another city every married person cheats on spouse. the bad guys actually tracked him via his wake of fate strangeness. 
No, his points are invalid because it's an attribute. Pay +4 attention. 
I love old people, but if they had the advantage in physical abilities to go along with their currently overwhelming ownership of economic capital, the world would be over in less than a year. 
*noise* "WHO'S THERE?" *gunshot* *friend died* "Hm..guess it was nothing." 
I was already Archmage, and Farengar was still telling me to join the College. 
In my opinion the most OP build is enchant/destruction mage. At lvl 100 with the right potions you can enchant 4 pieces of gear with 25% mana cost reduction for destruction spells. Then at destruction level 100 if you get the lightning mastery spell you can kamehameha everything forever. Or you can dual wield fireball and just completely trash a whole room in 5 seconds. Either way, super fun. 
All of my first playthroughs of Elder Scrolls games go like that. My main character is always heavy armour and a big fuckoff sword 
In most cases, you can substitute [Sympathy] with [Empathy]. Even though you haven't completed that quest, or compatible ones, them knowing that you're rooting for them can mean a lot. 
'You caught me on tape as I murdered the teen - A witness observed when I fled from the scene - You've had my confession; you found DNA; Rejected the bribe I was willing to pay - 'But maybe, just *maybe*,' he said with a smile, 'Perhaps if we pondered together a while - You'd see that I'm really amazing, I think.' They dropped all the charges. He dropped them a wink. &nbsp; ;) 
"I am the Senate." "Not Yet." *10+ Charisma* "It's treason if I try to stop you then Senate." 
Wild Jammed printer used Tiny Bit Of Paper Stuck In The Smallest Hardest To Reach Crevice It's super effective! 
Try cooking tomatoes with baking soda. It cuts the acidity , and they taste much better. 
Sounds like a different way to say ignorance is bliss. 
Scientist 2: "okay now let's beat him up for the next 5 hours" 
Should've put some points into Intelligence instead of Pain. 
Well, now I'm gonna go watch Godfather II. Thanks for the inspiration. 
So glad they introduced player housing on that Sedentarity patch a few tens of millennia ago. 
Or it could be like rimworld where old people have a lot of skill but also the drawbacks of their age like cataracts, bad back, injuries, etc 
There's apps that make what you're talking about a reality. You basically assign goals for yourself and log each time you work towards that goal, and it gives you experience points. 
He's irrelevant in all of them. Every time he does something heroic it's a pity-victory set up by the rest of the Avengers so Hawkeye doesn't get depressed the way the 9/11 rescue dogs did if they didn't find anybody for a while. Like, Iron Man sneaks behind enemy lines to plant bullshit cameras and stuff for him to shoot out. "Oh no Hawkeye look it's a camera that none of us could possibly hit even though we all have missiles and lasers and shit, WE NEED YOU!" 
One of my favorite moments in video games was in Fallout 3, seeing two raiders talking to each other at Evergreen Mills. And I killed one of them and his head completely exploded and his friend just looked down at him and walked away. 
Well, the alteration spells increase your armor rating. It's not the same thing, but it's pretty effective with higher level spells. 
That sounds like an awesome compromise actually, one I'd gladly take at early levels. I hope they introduce something like this in the next mod. 
My first and biggest playthrough was as an orc with a two handed hammer. I maxed the crafting skills like you do, and full buffed two handed weapons. I literally just walked up to things and right clicked to win. If a boss fight was too hard I activated my orc rage, which had exactly the same effect as turning the game difficulty down a level. I tried stealth archery on my second play because I wanted more of a challenge. At least then I had to aim. 
Hes a bit isolated and while word among the guard about every thing you do travels fast, your mage status seems to only exist in those walls. 
Takes more work though. You can buy medium damage bow/arrows at a relatively low level, and archery has the obvious advantage of staying out of reach from everything but other archers. It gives you time to shoot several arrows and the only resource you spend is stamina. However it takes much longer to gain enough mana to not blow it all on one spell. 
Man I am really early to this sprog poem And as always it is a humdinger 
You people all seem to think skill points = stat points... 
Everything to +Deception/Bluff. You can then just pretend you have the other skills. 
So few people believed he was actually one of the devs that it didn't matter what he'd said. He could have given them so many cheat codes and they still would have called him a filthy n00b nobody. 
What's the definition of "skill"? Because I'd definitely define "luck" as an attribute/stat in both FF and Golden Sun - it sits alongside Attack/Defense in Golden Sun or Vitality/Spirit etc in FF. A skill is something like "magic" or "steal" or "two handed weapons." 
Unfortunately greedy players in my area have the monopoly perk and applied it to the housing expansion. It gave them the power to drive the cost of housing to a nearly unlivable rate. On the other hand the guild masters for the various guilds in my area are cutting cost like crazy and only offering half ass quests that end too soon and the reward rate is shit. 
And this thread tried to tell me that +10 to perform was a bad idea... I'm going to write a song about how bad they are! It's going to suck, but I'll play it *really* well 
Youll have elderly munchkins who try to compensate for their cataracts with an attribute boost in their one good eye, and then give that good eye laser beams so they could do their own LASIK so they would have two good eyes with lasers. Also, weaponised mobility scooters to shoot people off their lawn. 
Funnily enough, when I felt I wasn't achieving as much towards things I enjoyed doing (writing, art, music, etc), because I thought I should be doing other things (taxes, dishes, exercise, cleaning etc.), I utilised an RNG and matched it to a list which included all of the above. Set the timer for 15 minutes, with some not-too-annoying tune for an alarm. That helped me get over a slump in my (not always terribly) productive life. (It helped the procrastinator in me.) 
To be fair, he does bamboozle Loki that one time though with the exploding arrow. 
I recently played fallout 4, and yup that's exactly what happened. 
To elaborate: Ebonyflesh gives you 200 armor for three minutes if you have the Mage Armor +3 and Dualcasting perks. Dragonhide gives you a flat 80% damage reduction(Equivalent to 567 armor, stacks with armor you have equipped) for 21/2 minutes if you have the two Necromage perks, Stability, and Dualcasting. This is a Master level spell, though, so get fucked if you want to use any other spells after casting this even with the halved resource cost perk unless you carry around a buttload of potions. But potions are for pussies. Basically battlemages are about as OP as stealth archers, you just have to wait a long time to get the good shit. 
You know, it's a bit of a pity that you can't really roleplay like that. I'd love to play as a smartass who puts down those around him, and when Farengar is like "Ah, no mere brute but a thinker! Perhaps even a scholar" I'd be like "Yeah, I am, I learned Dovahzul and researched the Dragon War.". And when you become the Archmage you could actually use that for something, like control the College or get respect from court mages. 
True early game is more difficult, but you also get pretty much infinite money through enchanting. If you spend some time on that, you can enchant yourself some really good heavy armor which makes it more doable. 
Okay, going to make a two-handed stealth ranger............. and I'm using a bow again. 
Me too! I've never caught a sprog poem while it was still fresh 
And the next chest you opened would contain a full pack of Chlamydia pills anyway so no need to worry. 
Arnold threw skill points in to CHA and INT afterwards though, and he was able to get in to a diverse group of guilds because of his STR. He wasn't afraid to take on shit quests though either, and neither should you. Sometimes you need to go through some shit quests in order to develop those skills and intangibles for the bigger guilds later in life. 
Yeah it's so annoying. One of the foreign servers had a ton of rich players who decided to bandwagon onto ours and they've completely driven up the cost of housing. 
Nope even the villains are in on it. "Oh look an arrow with a larger arrowhead. I'll just hold on to it close to my face. CURSE YOU AND YOUR INEVITABLE BETRAYAL, ARROWHEAD!" 
Black widow is used for espionage. Pretty accurate. 
Iron Man could still wipe out a bunch of Apache's though. But his powersuit is basically just a miniturized Apache helicopter/Fighter jet suit. Plus Tony Stark is a billionaire philanthropist playboy so he is the king-shit of comic book world. 
No, he effectively immobilized Vision for over a minute. She's the one who dilly-dallied. 
I've done it in Fallout 4 but Beth made the AI better in that game because they'll at least react to their friend exploding. Sure they forget about it 30 seconds later but its the thought that counts. 
The problem with playing a mage properly in skyrim, especially at the high level, is you need to get enchanting up and get the right equipment so you can cast for free. Reduce casting costs by 100%. It's expensive because you need potions for enchanting too iirc. So by the time you can afford to start leveling conjuring, you're already a level 20 stealth archer. 
Lucky bastard... killing babes and opening their chests just to find a stomach full of Chlamydia pills. 
This took me back to middle school playing runescape before they had "3D" runescape 
This had me pissed a few years ago. I wanted to migrate to the Canada server, more specifically the Vancouver sub-server but the housing rates are absolute shit. I hate that players are able to make credits on a foreign market, and migrate servers to take up all the cheap shit, ruining the economy. 
He's like the 'special' child of the marvel family 
I knew jerry every since I was a kid. We even managed to raid Covenant together. He helped me raise my son. He's worth at least 30 seconds of my time trying to avenge his death. 
Is there a subreddit for that? There's probably a subreddit for that. 
And let's not even get ourselves started on how fucking useless Illusion becomes at higher levels. "Let's fill an entire school of magic with spells that only affect certain levels without any scaling in a game where everything levels up with you and you can't even tell what level anything else is." 
The Vancouver sub-server is nuts on its housing rates. My gaming partner and I want to upgrade our housing but man there's no guild around that we qualify for that would even come close to supporting the upgrade we need. Soon to be 4 players squished into a tiiiny little place here. We were even entertaining migrating back to the US server but we would be trading lower housing rates for incredibly high prices on healing potions. We go through a lot of those suckers so it unfortunately we'd blow through our coin too much for it to be a benefit to us. 
tfw you want him to be your favorite but he's shit and everyone makes fun of you so you just say your favorite is starlord even though he's your second favorite and everyone says he's shit and everyone makes fun of you so you fall into a state of constant depression whenever anyone mentions marvel I mean me too haha same. 
Honestly the only things I care about with Illusion are Quiet Casting and Clairvoyance. 
Super awkward when your buddies wife is finding any excuse to touch or rub on you. If you say something you risk causing a fight or him not believing you. If you say nothing your a dick. 
"Your honor, I would like to present exhibit D into evidence." 
Ah! Can confirm, some mothers turn into absolute psychos when we (daughters) hit teenage years. She actually would cut my hair, slap me, leave the house for hours at a time expecting me to raise my brothers, randomly throw shit, broke several of my phones (that I bought with my own money made from my job, so they were actually mine.) When I turned 20, I found out she had credit cards and loans in my name AND had stolen all of my saved up college money. Moved out, never looked back. Visiting family is tough, because everyone thinks my nightmare of a childhood is something I've made up. 
This one hits close to home with me. My dad and mom were never married, and I was 2 when they broke up, but mom was supposed to be there for me. She would make all sorts of promises to come hang out with me and pick me up and do things, but 9 times out of 10 she wouldn't show. I remember getting excited if she showed up for one of my birthdays. How sad is that? She should've been there regardless. And she always had these dumb excuses as to why she couldn't come. Broke my heart. My mom has been dead for 3 years now, I'm 22, and all I can think about when I think of her is I hope I never damage a child the way she damaged me. Tell your daughter some internet stranger sends her empathetic love. 
Oof. I've read most of these answers and this one hits me especially hard. Sorry dude. 
this post hit me. i feel so used in my relationship but just cannot leave because of my 3 yr old son. 
I had a similar arguement the weekend me and my ex split. I picked up work at an old employer, in addition to my current employer, so that I could bring in some extra money. This meant I was going to be working 12 days straight. I had earmarked the money for boots for my regular full time job because I needed steel toes to be in compliance with safety standards. She found out and screamed at me for taking money away from the family for my own selfish reasons. I'll never forget the phone call I got from my grandmother asking me how much money I needed for boots and that she was wiring it to me right away. 
This happened to one of my parents friends. Both couples did a swap and are now happily married. 
i hope you snuck up behind him and popped an inflated paper bag REAL aggressive-like! 
Was it like a sudden 'yup, I want a divorce' or did you take your time? 
Mine was our four year old repeating an argument he had overheard. I realized it had gotten so bad, we weren't even attempting to hide our fights from the kids anymore. 
Can you elaborate a bit more with the first one? Where had she gone? 
that woman takes the cake for queen of rationalizations. 
was she the type to make itineraries and always wanted things done when she said it to be done? 
what?! I'm sorry. This angers me more than anything. I'd give anything for my husband to have been able to call this past Christmas, instead of doing duty. Fuck. That. 
Oh man. I would have crashed the absolute *fuck* out of that wedding. Because, honestly, unless the rest of the family already sees through her bullshit, they'd be on her side over yours anyway. Blaze of glory it. 
My sister said something similar about her ex. He had to go out of town for a business trip and she found that being a single parent was less work than having him be around. Then he fucked one of her friends, and her first thought was "Finally, an excuse to kick him out!" 
You just need to rip it like a bandage. The longer you let this sit, the more rotten it will become. 
Question #1: Does your husband enjoy watching Oprah Her: Well of course, he's sitting right here with me.. tee hee Him: I wonder if I can accidentally pour bleach on me eyes . 
That's a terrible thing to happen to you, but I can't help but find some black comedy in the way you worded it. 
When my ex-gf dialed 911 to report a false DV claim, I knew enough to be gone when cops arrived. Grabbed car keys and cash and spent night at motel. Otherwise I would have been arrested. She apologized to me but that was night everything between us died. I soon moved out. 
Ouch. That's so fucked up. I know what it feels like to hear shit like that. I'm sorry, man. 
Jesus christ. I hope you are doing better now, and that your oral situation isn't worse for wear because of her. 
Fucking hell, that's cold. She took thanksgiving away from you AND her own kid. If you can be objective, why was she so angry with you? 
I would have marched to the person who bought my dog and taken it back 
For real. Some of these stories are so horrible... :( I'm laying in bed next to my snoring husband, just thinking about how lucky I am. 
It amazes me the patience some people have. The moment someone does some psycho shit with anything that cuts, I am fucking gone. Whether that is my hair or my clothes, my next thought is, this person is going to cut my dick off. They're just working their way up. Be glad you got out intact. 
One of my friend's mum's was diagnosed with cervical cancer, and when he told his gf of around 5 years she split up with him. But then took it back the next day because she was 'only doing it for attention'. They're still together, I wish he had the balls to just say enough is enough. People are sick. 
Did she really expect alcohol to coax you into agreement? There's not enough alcohol in the world for that! 
The last sentence felt brutal just to read. I've had that feeling once before and never want it again. Sorry things turned out like that for you. 
This sounds similar to my life right now. She's a fantastic mother to our child but when it comes to actual real life decisions for our future I'm the one planning everything. 
This is such a good answer! Divorce isn't always this horrible event triggered by a bad incident, sometimes it's just not the right kind of love 
Oh man I did that on accident once! Thought I could just speed things up a bit by chipping away at the ice...hiss goes the freon! I offered to pay for a replacement multiple times (this was at work) and didn't have to, which was weird. I learned my lesson, though... 
He'll grow up one day and will find out the truth. Just be patient. Happened with someone I know, kid loves his dad now that he knows the truth and is old enough to see through the bullshit. Stay strong man. 
Damn, you dodged one hell of a bullet, not to mention they are practically threatening to murder you. Amazing how something so insane sounds completely normal to them. 
Damn...I feel that way right now. That last quote, god damn. My situation is a little different than most. Our property has two houses, the main and then the smaller cottage. The cottage is supposed to be hers and the the main is for me and the kid. Well, she stays in my bed all the time, "forgets" to sleep in her house, just things like that. So I get be in close proximity to a woman who I find insanely attractive and who also, for the past 1.5 months, not wanted anything to do with me physically. She wants the comfort of me being there but doesn't reciprocate a damn thing. Fuck. I needed to read your story though. Thanks for getting it out there. Hope you always forget the milk. 
Unless of course you hate your family in which case them disliking her is a good thing 
Have you guys tried couple's counseling? Sounds a lot like someone who fantasizes about getting into a car wreck so they don't have to go to work at a job they hate. If it's making you both that unhappy...you need to take steps to fix it, whether that is working on the relationship or going your own ways. 
The alternative would be to stay plastered and fuck constantly. 
Fuck that. I wanted kids. If my wife had married me knowing that, claimed to be unable, and HID HER OWN CHILD FROM ME, I would have had a hard time speaking to her ever again. Yelling, sure. Speaking no. 
She sounds like she's used to getting her way. Good thing you shut that down. 
Haha. My buddy had a crazy ex who was a 26 year old virgin. She caught him masturbating one day and broke down crying. He asked her why she was crying and she said: I just caught you cheating on me, with yourself. 
Honestly, it sounds like she used you from the beginning bud. 
Wow. Did they investigate you as well, or were they only interested in him? 
Aren't there laws about turning off heat in winter in Michigan? 
Phew, reading that at first had me dreading a Shutter Island type turn in the story. 
Divorce Trial?? Is there still such a thing? I just filed paperwork and was done. 
"Inadmissable due to lack of proper magnification device for viewing." 
Yep. Tried to forgive her and make it work for our daughter's sake after the first affair. Thought she had changed. What a fool I was. 
"I would just go ahead and absolutely ruin someone's life because he wanted his kids." What a complete cunt. I'm curious if the friend had a positive or negative reaction to this? 
My parents divorced when I was ten. I knew it was coming for as long as i was aware what divorce was. My parents were amicable enough during and after the divorce and my sibling and I turned out alright. In plenty of scenarios where people stay together for the kids it really doesn't help the kids much. Just my two cents. 
The dogs were always fine. I'll give her that, they were her kids. But she ate xanax like skittles. And I bought my first-ever pair of red wings that year- US made expensive fuckers. Because fuck that bitch. 
My high school girlfriend's parents had a weird dynamic. Husband A slept with Wife B. Two divorces later, Husband A married Wife B. Husband B is Husband A's best friend. Wife A is Wife B's best friend. They all stayed best friends. 
Yup, time to start finding a place to go. I found out on a sunday, first thing monday I was scouring the internet for a place to rent. I kept her in the dark for the next month, until everything was set. When she got home from work, I handed her my ring, and told her I wanted a divorce, and I left... 
When my youngest son was three years old he once started repeating the argument his mom and I always seemed to be having. Another time he had to tell us to stop fighting. 
She took off to a friends house a few towns over. This was early 2000s and the internet was still fairly new and she got hooked into chat rooms. She would never really hold down a job, but I did the manly thing and stood by her since she was my kids' mother. Years later I can look back and see the warning signs, the kids were 2 and 4 at the time. I worked 2 jobs to pay for daycare and the house bills. She had mental issues and I always suspected some drug use but could never prove it. 
Jesus died for our sins, if you don't sin, he died for nothing. Now, you don't want Jesus to have died for nothing, do you? 
I'm right there with you. When my husband was active duty I would have given almost anything to have him call home on special occasions while he was deployed. 
Slightly relevant; my last relationship was getting a bit rocky, I was fairly sure I (we) would be happier apart. So we took a 2 week vacation overseas. I was worried it wouldn't go too well, but we had a really great time (the whole time; not one disagreement), great sex, got home, split up amicably about a week later. It still worked out in the end, because we both had a good holiday, and now we're both happier. 
bro you rip band aids off, not bandages. please never rip bandages off. 
I was totally expecting him to see her with another guy, on his beach. 
It was rough. He verymuch became a surrogate dad while we were together. A best friend, really. At times, I felt worse for him and what he was going through, being in the middle, than I did for me. 
Naw... It's over now. My life wouldn't be as what it is now if not for the trials we had to endure. I am a better person now, and have made more positive changes because of it, than at any time during the 15 years we were together. I said as much in another comment; I wouldn't want to revisit any of it, but knowing what I know now is more important to me than not having had to go through any of it. 
Thanks... No worries. It's been 5 years now, and I'm well on my way to being whole. The kids are much better. She wound up with a POS boyfriend who knocked her up a couple of years ago, and knocked one of my boys around a little bit. The kids and I got an order of protection against the POS boyfriend last year, and they've been great ever since! She's been trying to convince the kids he's changed, so we'll drop the OoP, but there's no chance. 
Similar thing happened to me. We were fighting, she called the cops, I packed a small suitcase and went downstairs to wait for them to show up. It was cold outside and she was out there without a coat yelling at me. They showed up, patted me down, handcuffed me, and put me in the back of the cruiser. I'm sitting there, looking out the window at her talking to one of them. I could only imagine what she was saying. Then I muttered, "What happened to my life?" The driver chuckled. The other cop talking to my Ex came over and let me out, un-cuffed me, and said if I'm a good boy they won't have to come back and arrest me. "Yes, sir Officer sir, and thank you." They left. My Ex turned to me and said, "You know why I did that? To teach you a lesson." 
None at all from what I could tell but I pretty much kept away after it all happened because I didn't want to risk being arrested again. I did find out about some of her legal troubles a few years after the divorce was finalized. She was also hauled into custody once due to a contempt of court charge but had answered the charge before the cops called her. They released her after calling my attorney. 
I had already caught her in her affairs. We have two children together--they were both under three at the time. I wanted to work things out with her for the sake of a family. She didn't. That's how she let me know. In truth, at least she didn't fake trying to work out the marriage. I'm better off now. 
I had to get sewn back up, and the recovery clock reset when she did that, but it was strangely worth it. I'm happily married to the love of my life, have two beautiful kids and just found out there's another on the way. I'd go through every bit of that stuff again to get here. 
I'd pay real money to hear the other side of that story. 
Well, there sorta is. You can hire a private investigator to dig all this information out of someone's past. Not cheap, though. 
Because that person hurt you and you want to hurt them back - unfortunately, much like waiting too long before rubbing a dog's face in his shit when he goes on the carpet, it loses meaning and coherence if too long a time passes between the offending events. Edit - ITT people exploding because I used an analogy about dogs. It is a figure of speech, relax; I don't go out in the middle of the night and punish dogs that shat on their owners' carpet. 
Maybe that's how she thinks partners work. You're good at planning, so you do that. She's good with the kid so she does that. My mom does all the future planning for my parents, put all their assets in a trust, retirement money, vacation money, renovation money. My dad does all the errands shopping, planing family things, organizing repairs. They've been together 50 years. 
This happened with my parents. The spark/passion/excitement dies. There's nothing bad and there are no fights because both parties are apathetic and have checked out of the dull relationship. Its like committing to eating pasta every meal of the day for the rest of your life and eventually getting tired of it. The pasta isn't bad but its not offering you anything amazing after a while 
Gotta hope the partners of the others making those suggestions were taking note of those huge red flags and getting the hell out of dodge. You may have saved a few guys lives. 
You know EXCACTLY how I felt in that time. Sorry that is true. There is no reasoning with a person who chooses to be unreasonable. 
Years and thousands upon thousands of dollars in counseling. 
Thanks. We are doing great. The relationship was very toxic in itself. She threw violent, nasty tantrums. It's taken me every bit of two years to recover, especially since I've been called on for help by her several times with things like rent, food and transportation. I held out hope until the beginning of this year when another friend told me she had been secretly seeing the other guy for months. She didn't want me to know because she wanted my help for lots of things. Thank you for your kind words. I wouldn't wish the experience on anyone. I honestly didn't know if I'd survive for awhile. My life is my daughter now. Being a single dad is no joke. She fills my days with joy :) 
I already had my torch lit and my pitchfork sharpened. Whew! 
Seriously. And I love his understanding of how coming out is hard. That is so compassionate. But she had no compassion of any kind. 
Lots of people think they can threaten people with an ultimatum on anything. "Can we have steak for dinner?" Money's a little tight. "Get me a fucking steak or were done." That's about how it goes.. Any extreme situation my dad does something like this. When my mom finally got ahold of her senses and thought about leaving he threatened to kill himself and forced her to stay. I can tell she's so miserable. 
"No, you have it all wrong, I loathe that guy, I frequently sit around thinking about what a colossal failure he is. I do use him for cheap physical pleasure, yes. But that's all we have together." 
Were you pen pals or did you move to Mexico as well? 
Oh I cooperated. Thankfully, I'm a bitch who doesn't share computers/gaming systems, etc. So all my stuff was password protected that only I had access to. Made it easy to see he was the baby popper and not me. I was in shock for quite a long time. Took years to fully recover from it, for obvious reasons. 
That's what I want to know. I'm from WI and heat cannot be turned off in the winter because of the severe cold. 
I'm a female, and when I was in high school one of my close guy friends once told me he wouldn't tell me if he (hypothetically) knew my boyfriend was cheating on me, because "bros before hoes." I tried to explain that that saying was supposed to mean friends before hookups/girlfriends, not random people that happen to have penises over your friends who don't have one, but he couldn't seem to grasp the concept 
It depends on the state and circumstances. I had to make a few trips to the courthouse in my relatively amicable divorce, and if she had a better lawyer or more fight in her, she could have dragged it out. Luckily, her lawyer seemed to be as sick of her as I was and tried to settle things as quick as possible. 
Can't stress enough, having one person saying she's worth something and NOT a piece of shit, as her mother is trying to convince her, WILL make a difference in her life. Compliment her. Tell her she's pretty. Compliment her hair or her clothes. Ask her how her day was. Anything to make her feel like she has a place in this world. My brother has gone through a similar situation with my step mum constantly berating him, telling him he's useless and the reason my parents split up... Point is, you can help undo damge! Good luck!! 
I'm the daughter of an abusive mom. I spent most of my childhood trying to earn my mother's love. I realized it was impossible when I was a teenager. I had lots and lots of anger issues after that. I fel like i was cheated out of a mother. I felt worthless and unlovable. I'm grown as hel now and I'm still dealing with the damage. Your daughter wanted her mother's love. She thought if she lived with her she would finally have earned it. You might be happy to have your daughter back but your daughter is carrying one of the heaviest most painful burdens imaginable. She's a kid but her heart has been broken into tiny peices. Drown that little girl in love. Get her into counseling. Be mother and father to her. Take her shoping and do her hair. Find female adults she can spend time with, mother figures. Help her heal. 
Seconded. My parents didn't communicate about some heavy stuff when I was little, divorced after 5 more years and 1 more kid. The last 6 months dad lived with us, mom cried every night because he was sleeping elsewhere and her life was (reasonably) a shambles at only 25 years of age. Post-divorce my parents could almost be called friends, which was really nice when you consider how much of a fucking cunt my stepmother was about my mom's(who didn't pack my brother's shit- he did) shitty packing job on my brother's clothes. 15 years post-divorce and my parents are back together again, and almost seem like the teenagers that they must have been in my youth. 
Nice! I bought my first ever Nikes when I started a job at a nursing home. Those suckers wore like iron and my feet were much happier in them for 9-18 hours at a time than they were in cheap walmart shoes. 
I tried to hold it together for years. Kept hoping things would get better. But as soon as our daughter let us know that she was consciously recognizing we were arguing, I left the marriage. I couldn't do what my parents did to me. They had tried to hold it together "for me" and it turned out way worse than if it had ended years earlier. 
Had a similar experience. Felt that my relationship with GF was going nowhere for a few months. We went to a music festival with friends. Had a great time, good sex, no drama. About 2 weeks later we split up with no shouting and a hug at the end. Still friends to this day. 
A lot of people become completely irrational when it comes to family. For some, the ex will forever be the villain of the story regardless of what their relative did to split the relationship. 
Wow. How was the dynamic between her and her parents, who clearly (and rightfully) took your side? 
"does anyone know of any reason these two should not be married" "Yah, I fucked him last night" 
She knew he was ugly when she married him. No excuse. 
Yeah I hear ya. Her mom was a real Bitch. Basically her dad had raised her little sister believing she was his child for 4 years and then her mom came out and told him she had been having an affair for a really long time and the kid was her lovers kid and that she wanted the child to know her real dad so she was telling the kid that he wasn't her real dad and that she was no loner allowed to call him daddy, etc... After the divorce she moved in with the man she cheated with and they had to retrain the kid to see him as her dad. For four years she called my friends dad "dad" then was just told nevermind you can never see him again you have a new dad now. When my friends dad would come on weekends to pick her up the younger child would run outside and say "Daddy take me too, etc" and the biological dad and the mom would come outside and spank her. Pretty fucked up: on second thought I actually understand why he destroyed the dinner. 
This is why my father always stressed the importance of doing a date night once in a while, and make an active effort to keep the relationship fresh. He also has one of those no-fault divorces in his past too, so I guess he knows what he's talking about. 
I just got this visual: A man sits on his chair in his living room, browsing reddit on his phone. Suddenly his expression shifts, as if an animal has awakened inside, the man shifts his weight forward and reaches under the chair he sits on, with his left hand he draws a four toothed pitch fork, perfectly sharpened, all the while looking at the screen with the same murderous expression. As his eyes run around the screen his face suddenly seem to relax and he puts the pitchfork back under the chair. 
A decent divorce lawyer can use exactly this story to argue that you will be a better guardian. Use it. (God forbid, I would never wish this on anyone) what if she let this happen to her and didn't think it was a big deal 
Do this, OP. *Please* do this. I was so similar to your daughter. I *needed* this. I would have healed so much faster. I don't blame my Dad. He never even realized how bad it was. How so malignantly bad it was, until me and my sisters were adults and able to tell him. It's one of the only things he cries about. 
You were lucky indeed. I have a friend who did all that with his wife and they even started going to couples therapy afterwards. He was so happy and hopeful for his marriage until after over a month of counseling the therapist asked for their individual goals in therapy... He said he wanted their relationship to improve and she said she was hoping for an amicable divorce and that they could be friends forever. They had never even talked about splitting and it really took him by surprise. Allow me to tell you that the haven't seen each other ever since they signed the divorce and it's been like four years. So, my friend; allow me to congratulate you on a beautiful, successful divorce. 
Honestly... I think it was tougher on them than me. Her dad was my friend, so naturally I wanted to confide and bitch to him about... His daughter. After a while, I had to make a conscious effort to back off because it was killing him. 
He may not be a looker but he sure can baste a bird. 
God that just broke my heart..."daddy take me too"..Jesus WTF is wrong with people. 
The same said sergeant also lost his pistol on a tank trail and the entire platoon was sent out to find it for him. So yeah, standards weren't set very high. 
Probably because it reduced her income enough that she qualified for more assistance or the doctors/hospital could write it off as a charity case. 
Yeah it's like in that marital advice thread a few days ago **"Keep dating the person you're married to"** 
Good job on being there for someone going through a fucked up relationship/time in their life. 
"Holy fish in a closed container Batman!" It checks out. 
Man, you sound like an alright kinda guy. Props to you for being so aware and level headed through everything. Sincerely hope life's on the up and up! 
If women don't find you handsome they should at least find you handy 
My friend was raising his daughter full time, other than the 2-3 hours a week the mother could spare to see her. Mom was unemployed living about 3 blocks away. The daughter cherished those moments with mom and looked forward to them. Then a pattern began where the mom would have the daughter call her dad to pick her up cause she "wasn't feeling well." Mom had her child lie to say she's sick because mom wanted her to leave. The kid was around 4, but she picked up on this. So one day my friend is reading her a storybook about a princess who made some kind of wish, etc. The last page of the story asks the child what kind of wish they'd want. "I wish I had a different mommy." 
Plus he wouldn't get stuck with medical debt if the worst were to happen. How well thought out. Sad, but smart. 
Strongly agree. My wife and I already went through a stagnant patch, and we're not even five years married. Life gets crazy, work gets busy, and before you know it, I don't know what's going on in my wife's life. Don't let that last for too long. Go on dates. Find a hobby you both enjoy. Talk to each other. Have sex. 
It is, indeed. 5 years on, and I'm doing great. Thanks for the kind words! 
Jesus, this strikes a chord with me. My fiancee is a preschool teacher and she's got this absolutely adorable little girl in her class with a narcissistic asshole of a mother. The mother doesn't work and lives on disability, which is fine. But she also drops this girl off at 6:30am and leaves her there until 6:00pm. Every. Single. Day. The worst part is that the mother is friends with the director of the center, and she makes time to show up and go to lunch with her 3-5 days a week and she never so much as pops her head into her daughter's room to say hello. This little girl wrapped her arms around my fiance's legs a couple of weeks ago, looked up at her and said "Ms. [teacher] I wish *you* were my real mommy." It tears my fiancee to pieces having to let her go at the end of the day to such a shitty person. 
You lost a wife but gained a family.. I think that goes down as a win 
Where are you now in life? Relationships? Still in contact with the family? Where does her story take her? If you don't mind my asking of course. 
What does "je ne sais pas" mean? Was a question on the radio trivia the other day. I thought it was perfect. 
My "Everything hurts and I'm dying" shirt usually gets a few chuckles at the gym. 
Took a while to get this because I don't have an American accent 
I like that one. Any chance of a link to where I could get it? 
My name is Creighton and I wear a Creighton University hoodie sometimes. People who know me hate it. 
Isn't it obvious that the raven would just quoth "nevermore" 
i just looked up a picture and it looks completely normal. Why do people give you comments for it? 
My autistic son would love that (no sarcasm). He talks about shit like that all the time. Seriously now I have to hunt something like this down. 
Not historically inaccurate, but I have a "Kennedy for president 1960" shirt that I wear just because I think it's neat. I get lots of, "You know he's dead right?" Yeah, no shit. 
Yep, I have a $1 t shirt from Walmart that says "World's greatest grandpa". And another shirt that I bought with the sleeves already cut out that says "Dad's got guns" with arrows pointing to the arms. As a 21 year old girl, shopping at Walmart a few weeks after father's day is a great time. 
Or you're just misunderstanding them and missing out on all that ass. 
Just seeing it written out in plain text as "Bave Datthews Man" is making me giggle like an idiot for reasons I can't explain. I wager I'd have to buy you a drink if I saw it in person. 
Reminds me of this time I bumped into my boss, his wife, and their 6 or 7-year-old daughter at street fair. I was wearing a shirt that said "every time you masturbate god kills a kitten" with a picture of this adorable little kitten. I was standing there making small talk, with zero thought about which shirt I'd chosen to wear that day when i hear the six year old struggling to read my shirt aloud. "Every time you mas-tur-bate...?" One of the more embarrassing moments of my life. My boss still gives me shit about it to this day. 
You could've been the real life version of that kid on Xbox. 
My dad used to work at a school who's initials were A.S.S. and who's mascot was the Rams. They had some fun T-shirts 
I got my brother a shirt for christmas a few years ago that says "I MET LIL' SEBASTIAN AT THE PAWNEE HARVEST FESTIVAL" with a picture of Lil' Sebastian 
This is a joke in some show, and I can't remember which one. It's really bothering me. 
So they share their Jimi Hendrix Experience with you? 
I've got that one. I've had complete strangers walk up and type in the Konami code. It was awkward. 
I have the same shirt! So many times someone will go "Wow that's a cool looking shirt! Looks artsy. Are those words? What are they?" and I have to explain how I have the entire bee movie script on my shirt 
Have same shirt. Wear it every Friday. It's my default answer to engineers who want to change something on a Friday that's going to lay waste to a weekend for everyone if it goes tits up. 
I'm not denying that this is a semi-regular occurrence up here 
I have that shirt! I don't wear it often but one confused man asked if it was the Coca-Cola logo in Spanish lol. 
Something about Golden Age Rap just resonates with people. I always get a good conversation out of my Snoop & Pac shirt. 
I started doing this lately and it's pretty fucking great. I typically always wore band shirts, but I never liked trying to explain punk bands to people who *probably* aren't going to like the music. Now, no one asks me what the logo on my shirt says because the only logo is on the inside against my neck and it just says Hanes. 
I have a shirt that says "Jesus Loves You" with a picture of Jesus holding a boom box over his head like John Cusack in Say Anything. 
I often say this, but most people don't get what I mean. No soup for you! 
Yeah, I'm gonna need to know where you got the Golden Girls shirt. 
To be fair, any remaining N'Sync fans are in their thirties. 
My best friend has a "The Smiths" shirt that has pictures of Will and Jada Smith's family. 
Now I want a shirt that reads "Hi, my name is Graff" 
"What does Je ne sais pas man?" "I don't know" "Then why are you wearing the shirt?" "I don't know" 
Similarly my bright orange "Running Sucks!" Shirt I have worn to a few 5Ks... 
I don't either but I read Myraq as "mir-rack" (sounding like myriad). So Iraq (ih-rack) was still clear to me. English is weird. 
This reminds me of one of my favourite quotes in Neil Gaiman's American Gods: Protagonist tells the raven, whom he assumes to be one of Odin's birds, to say Nevermore. The raven responds 'fuck you'. 
I'm just imagining some poor guy wearing that shirt in 2017 who's hearing this for the first time. 
Man, I bet you found all the differences between the two pictures in your Highlights for Kids. 
I too am a 21 year old girl, and now I can't wait for father's day 
I once accidentally said Bat Penatar, and now that's how I say her name. 
LMAO! Either you have kids, or she was talking about herself. ;) 
That's probably because you weren't following rules 1 and 2. 
Here come the ASS Rams! Coming in number 2 since 1969! 
There was a shirt a few years ago that said "you can't lick our Cocks. That was a crowd pleaser 
I have a Bluth's Frozen Bananas apron that I wear while cooking. It is amazing 
I've always wanted that one! That or the one with the mouse rat logo. 
The office? Andy and his chaffing nipples? Season 4 ep 1? 
Yeah, it's pretty great. They're like: 'have you ever been experienced? Well, I have.' And then I'm going: 'cool' 
That's hilarious, but unfortunately no, ours just had the crown image on it (long inside joke thing) and calculus bc, no clever puns. But I did see one that says "even calculus has its limits" that I really liked 
Scripts tend to be shorter than what you'd think they are. 
At my plant we have 2 rules. 1: No PLC programming on Fridays. 2: nothing new after 2. 
I have this shirt, and wore it once to a work acquaintances' BBQ, and he was wearing the same shirt (and the same khaki zip-off shorts). Our wives are friends now. 
He looks like Anthony Fantano mixed with Tay Zonday. 
I do this to but I'm pretty sure everyone else thinks I just wear the same shirt every day. Probably doesn't help that I don't change my jeans often enough 
Lol I'm white so people are usually a little confused 
I feel like most people in their 30s or 40s would get the reference? (In the US anyways) 
Did you actually learn it for 24 years or did you just live here? 
Thats upsetting. I get the sense that there is a quiet war against mimicry. If I wanted to truly divide people, Id suppress play and mimicry because mimicry actually allows empathic play and emotional connection. My coworkers are Iranian and they are absolutely delighted when I try to mimic them as they speak Farsi. They know its a concerted effort, not mockery. Think of the delight we feel when a child mimics us. Or videos of dogs mimicking people. It creates empathic bonds. To demonize mimicry as racist I feel is more culturally damaging than the occasional person that mimics with the intent to hurt. TLDR Mimicry is healthy. Mockery is hurtful. Dont confuse mimicry with mockery. Mimicry is not racist. 
I have a "exercise? I thought you said extra fries." Shirt that I wear when i do any exercising. 
"Why do you suppose I just hurled a chair at your head Neimann?" 
I'm 16 and a girl and all these comments about others having these dad and grandparents T shirts is making me really want to get one!!! I'd wear it all the time, I didn't realize how funny it is until now 
Next time I get that, I'll have to act super surprised. 
He's a student of the Reynolds school of advertising. 
I'm a 36 year old dad and I have like 6 of them in my closet. They're like $3-5 at WalMart after father's day. You will get far more use out of that shirt than I ever will. Like really when the fuck am I supposed to wear a "world's greatest dad" tshirt? 
We have kids, it was intended to be referring to me, but it's still weird for my mom to put those words in my husband's mouth, you know? 
 1: No PLC programming on Fridays. 2: nothing new after 2. Those rules? 
"Even if it means taking a chubby, I will suck it up" "Nothing wrong with that one" 
Oooooohhh myyyyy godddd! I love your skirt! Vintage? Nice. That's the ugliest effing skirt I've ever seen. 
Wow. That was incredibly specific. But yes, I imagine you're right. Thank you. 
So true!!! Our rules (water agency) are no big jobs on Fridays and don't touch anything after 2:30. 
"We've decided to implement a major change to the core system at 16:30 on Friday, make sure you're available" Urgh. 
**I move away from the mic to give this album a decent breath/10 
I feel like this would be an amazing thing to do for somebody's birthday. Everybody show up with the bday person's face on their shirt. Especially if it's stylized differently on each. 
Then say, "In a fit of grief, I absorbed him..." and stare into the distance. 
I'm a 17 year old girl, I definitely want a "worlds greatest dad" shirt 
My girlfriend flipped her shit at the ending jusy screaming at me 'SHE'S SO CUTE OMG SHE'S SO CUTE' I hope she's okay now 
You wear them on superbowl. And whenever your kids do something stupid. Like being born. On a side note though you're 36 and a dad. Tell me a dad joke dude. 
The parents at the playground do not find the humor. 
Not the only thing she wanted to put in his mouth, you know? 
Okay, who'd like a banger in the mouth? Oh, right. I forgot. Here in the States you call it a sausage in the mouth. 
The Michael Scott Dunder Mifflin Scranton Meredith Palmer Memorial Celebrity Rabies Awareness Pro-AM Fun Run Race for the Cure. 
make sure to wear it around your dad and remind him it's not for him. 
Same. From her vids she seems like a really nice person. I didn't even expect a face reveal. Thats some damn courage there really. 
I told my wife I have a doctor appointment on Friday. She asked "which doctor?" and I said "no the regular kind." 
I don't think anyone would call your uncle an asshole for giving you a straight answer, as an adult. Also, it sounds like your grandpa was a really fun guy! That arm hair-pulling game memory is adorable. 
Wow. So very sorry you went through this. I stopped climbing years ago..... I can't even imagine going through that. I hope you are doing okay. Hugs from a stranger. 
You couldnt have known. You tried to save your loved one anyone would have done the same in your place. It isnt your fault. Hang in there 
As somebody who has broken their neck and was a quadriplegic.... having friends by my side when it occurred when I readily expected to die at any moment, was the most wonderful and peaceful thing during a traumatic time. Please take comfort in knowing you got to be there for him and he was cared for. That is all that mattered to me in those moments. 
Texas mom here. After reading this post, my mind is made up on getting my gun license. Abduction kit?! **shudder** 
I'm so sorry. That's the crazy thing about black ice and life. I was going 70 mph on a highway in the bright sunshine, clear road, and I rounded a curve that cast a shadow over the road, and the whole 20 ft stretch was pure black ice. My van spun two times, stalled out, and I wound up broadside in the opposite lane. Luckily, amazingly, there was no one else on my side or in the oncoming lane. I was able to take the 10 seconds to restart the van, pull back, and drive forward with no greater incident besides an elevated heart rate. On a different day, with a different set of circumstances, I *easily* could've been hit by a truck going 70. I really hope you can find peace with this tragedy. It sounds like it was an accident. You weren't drag racing. You weren't drunk. It was just the machinations of life on a bad day. 
This story really hit home for me. When I was about 9 months old, my sister left the basement door open and I crashed down 12 stairs onto a concrete floor. It's so weird because I have never until this moment thought about how fucking badly that should have ended. It's like a funny story my family tells... I'm really sorry that happened! 
I was sleeping off a hangover when mine called. I pressed the red button instead of taking her call. 
That just sounds like the universe was on your side that day. 
I always try to justify it but the fucking sound that was made that night will never leave my head. 
Wow. This is def the most innocent post on this thread and it hits me the hardest 
Everybody could say "if I did/didn't..." and blame themselves. Sure, if you didn't encourage her to go cycling she might not have died, but maybe if her mother made her eat one more piece of toast that morning she wouldn't have died. Or her cousin decided to ask her to hang out that day instead. Or her father decided to go cycling tomorrow instead. You can always blame yourself. It doesn't mean it's your fault. 
Elderly people are very fragile and minor things can have huge results. My grandmother was once double medicated for high blood pressure on one morning because of miscommunication on the nurses part. She stood up and fell due to lightheadedness from low BP. She slammed her head and a few days later her brain had swollen and she was gone. I don't blame the nurses though. Sure, this probably could have been prevented, but she had already had two strokes in the past year. If she hadn't of hit her head she likely would have had some other issue. Don't feel bad, you are only human. 
Nurses like you helped my grandfather die with some dignity the way he wanted. 
That is awesome, and at the very least certainly the least depressing post here. 
We make a million tiny choices everyday that could have horrible outcomes, just a half second difference here or there, I know you blame yourself but it is in no way your fault, its fucked up but that is just the way life is. 
That's rough. When in a situation that boils down to you or them, you have to make that call. You stopped some bad people who would have done some horrendous things if you weren't there. You did what you had to do and as ccw holder I can whole heartedly appreciate the gravity of your situations. God bless. 
I've been in similar position with friends and partners. At some point you just have to internalize that you are not responsible for any other individual's life, you know? 
I'm so sorry for the loss of you young children. Did you leave your daughter because it was more likely she would cry (as babies do), attract attention and put all of you in danger? I have a friend who was born in America but his parents fled from KR with his young sister. He told me they had to drug her to make sure she was quiet while they were escaping. 
This might be considered off-topic, but I noticed you said "was a quadriplegic." Does that mean you aren't anymore? I was unaware that our medical technology had progressed to the point of giving back use of limbs to paralyzed people. 
Black humour is a genuine and effective coping mechanism. You just need to be sure of your audience, some people just can't understand that. 
What's more awful is his situati9n isn't unique. When will we recognize mental health? When will it not end your career to talk about it? When? I'm so fucking tired. This shit needs an answer. A good non career ending one. 
In another comment someone said that in the UK they get three months off with counseling. The US really treats its workers like shit. 
I was the same age, my grandfather forgot to close the gate. Fell down right or nine steps onto marble floor. We, and op's friend's sister, are why walkers are illegal in Canada. 
As a parent, this was one of my thoughts while reading this story. Nor would I ever have left an infant with someone (even a sibling) to wake up and discover they were baby-sitting. 
Sounds like the standard person that has 24 hours worth of stuff to do in a 12 hour window. 
I'm glad to hear you're better now. Because 'so mangled they had to cut the car apart to find all the body pieces' is no option for anyone. Especially since the EMTs tell me he probably didn't die on impact. 
You're absolutely right. It doesn't take away the guilt, but it has made me take a look at my life and the least I can do for him now, is make the absolute best of it. Life is short, too short. 
OP this sounds like some pretty sound advice. Please listen to this redditor. 
Thanks, I appreciate it. The fact of the matter is that I'll never know if I could have saved him, but I DO know that his mom thinks I could have, which is neither here nor there. I'm almost a decade older than he'll ever be, and I'm ok now. 
It's crazy, it most likely took us over a minute to get down. I remember feeling like I flew down, I dont remember a single thing about heading down. I do however remember leaving our backpacks up that tree, and I would not be surprised if they are still there. 
Thank you. Like many others have said its a day to day thing. Some days its water under the bridge, and other days I relive it to the point where I just want to lay in bed all day and cry. The only thing that really makes it easier is comments like that, knowing others dont blame me makes it a lot easier not to blame myself. 
I dont think so... I think it was more because I was a constant reminder of what happened that day. 
Probably just didn't believe him. Nobody really saw it, could've easily been a push. Plus you could always try the stupid argument of "the CPR killed her" which actually has worked. Probably also mentioned the fact he was covered in blood. Even if that was from his best intentions, if brought up in court it could throw the jury off thinking about a young boy covered in blood. All this are really terrible things to do but they don't think about the life or lives they're ruining, all they want is the payout. 
My stepmom's mother lost her second pregnancy when my stepmom was about 3. When she got pregnant again her mother told my stepmom to make sure to be good and not stress her mom out so she would have a healthy pregnancy. Cue my 3-year-old stepmom thinking she had caused her mother's miscarriage and freaking the fuck out. The third pregnancy was successful and they're both happily married adults now, and the whole incident is behind them, but that shit's scary for kids. 
It must be a distinct sound because I've seen a lot of comments about it on reddit. Multiple in one thread which was something like "what is the single worst sound you've ever heard" 
Because it could happen so easily to anyone. That's not Afghanistan or Vietnam. You could cook for your friends during a football game and it could happen to you. So fucked up 
Yup I live in this town right on the river where it happened. Crazy to see this story posted here. I was very young when it happened but my parents always told me it as the reason not to go down to the river. This incident definitely shaped my childhood. 
I learned to respect (and fear) vehicle wheels from seeing a car go over one of my toys. Smashed it flat and afterward I wouldn't even stand close to the edge of the side walk. Seeing the damage in action would probably keep most kids away. Past that, it's just backing cameras and hope. 
Maybe once or twice but they just tell me I'm too sensitive or I'm taking it too heavily and to just "chill" 
If it were my five year old there's no way in hell I'd let him know she'd died. 
She has been wonderful mother to me and gave me every opertunity to succeed in life. I am actually retired at 34 thanks to the wisdom she imparted on me and the education she paid for. Accidents happen and unfortunately a lot of those can change lives and families forever. 
She was hospitalized for a nervous breakdown right after it happened but to my knowledge she has never seen anyone. I kindof remember visiting her in the hospital not knowing that is why she was there. I don't ask questions unless she starts talking first and then she never speaks long about it. 
Wow that was very calm and rational of you. Having worked in healthcare, I feel that nurses have so much on their shoulders and miscommunication/mistakes can easily happen. Of course, that doesn't excuse them or make them acceptable, but it does make me feel bad for them when people blow up at the nurses who already have so much responsibilities and are trying their best. Thank you for not doing that. 
It was piercingly loud. There were a lot of things that went wrong that would have just made the post too long. I seriously almost laughed right then at yet another thing wrong. I had just got that pistol back from the armorer due to misfiring at the range...and it misfired. 
He had a pocket knife with his own blood on it, his car was in a parking lot up the hill with a small pool of his own blood outside the car. So he cut himself to get close to me. That post is a regular position so an officer is there every night. 
Municipal PD took me to the hospital, forensic nurse did her thing, doc's looked at me, voluntarily took a pee test, and waited on admin leave for 5 months due to lab back up on his blood. The commonwealth attorney cleared me after 5 months. Would have been sooner but the blood test was the last loose end to come in. I'm glad it took 5 months because there was no way I could have gone back to work sooner. I should have requested light duty for another month or two but I was too proud and sucked it up. 
his pride in his son was made apparent when he took the blame. because if anyone was going to have their life ruined because his son did the right thing, it wasn't going to be his son. 
While both are no doubt horrible things to go through, I think the guilt from letting a loved one die(even if it's not your fault, a lot of people blame themselves) would be far worse than the guilt of killing a unknown criminal to save your loved one's life. 
Honestly, I hope that's how my grandmother goes. I'm not sure my family could stand to see her live much longer. Not that I want her dead, I certainly don't, but I don't want her to get to the point that she doesn't know who we are or where she is and then live for another 5 years. She's 91, she's lived a good life. She has 6 grandkids and 5 great grandkids and another on the way. She's been instrumental in the lives of many people in our community, and she deserves to go out with dignity. She's physically pretty healthy, but mentally, she'll be gone in a year or two tops. 
*You* are not killing the person, their disease process is. You are merely delaying death up til the point you withdraw care. 
Same for my Mom in December. Completely unbearable but absolutely necessary. 
It's sad and disturbing how we euthanize animals humanely but we don't do the same to our fellow humans. 
One time I asked a psychiatrist how he deals with the fact that almost everyone he talks to all day has either recently tried to kill themselves or someone else. He said basically exactly this. You talk about really sad situations with clients sometimes and you WILL feel sad. Those emotions are appropriate. However, you need to take things day by day. You should also take the opportunity to feel happy when it is appropriate. Basically, you need to take both the happy and the sad and resist the temptation to let one emotion seep into the rest of your life. 
Phew, thought you were going to say your mom broke her neck carrying you down the stairs 
I just protected myself. That's all I can take responsibility for. 
Learning this information for the first time. When I was young I called to the lifeguards attention a floating boy. I've always wondered what happened to him, I guess now I have my answer. 
Yeah, this exactly. Once someone's just face down in the water, they've inhaled significant amounts of water and haven't been breathing for probably at least a couple minutes. Or they've suffered spinal damage or similar, but that sounds unlikely in this situation. Most likely the kid had already drowned and there was nothing to be done. 
The attacker could have been a trusted friend of the family or a family member themselves. It's amazing how fucked up a family can be about things. I'm willing to bet money that somebody in her family said "yeah, but she didn't have to kill him" 
Where I live in Australia, killing your attacker can be a justified defense against "serious sexual assault" (i.e. rape). 
For what it's worth, this a 14 year old kid in America that hoped you'll pull through. It wasn't your fault. We all love you. 
That was my though too. As terrible as the accident itself was, one of the real tragedies, to me, was how quickly a town of so-called adults turned to vilifying and shunning a CHILD whose only crime was being in the wrong place at the wrong time, and who you *know* is just as traumatized, if not moreso, by the accident. Real adults comfort a kid going through that, not assign blame to him. 
I was in gareshk and sangin in 2013. Its a shit part of Afghanistan, but luckily after 30+ convoys we came home in one piece, lots of purple hearts in my platoon but i was lucky and came out without so much as a scratch. Idk why though. I still have my brothers and sister's close to my heart. 3rd platoon is family. Semper fi. 
Key word being thought. True strength comes in defying that feeling 
Thank you. Sometimes it's hard to remember that. Weeks after the accident, thanksgiving rolled around. His parents invited me over to their family dinner. They spent the whole evening blaming me for the fact that their son is dead. It's nice to hear from other sources that this isn't my fault. I'm happy four years later, but I sometimes have nightmares of that happening. 
I have a 17 year old grandson right now and he looks so young... simply cant believe thats how old I was when I first got there. Very grateful his biggest problems are girls, grades, and baseball. 
I had an 'incomplete spinal cord injury'. I perforated my spinal cord with pieces of my vertebrae. Between that and massive swelling, several surgeries and bone transplant, I regained movement of my legs after 3 months and arms after 6. Even quadriplegic who completely sever their spina cords can have some movement in their arms or other areas. There are different levels of functionality. I am incredibly lucky to live in a city with some of the most talented surgeons and specialists in the world. I was also still young which can help in recovery and nerve regeneration. There is also somewhat of a survivors guilt. I don't know why I didn't die and this mans friend did. I don't know why I'm not still paralyzed and others are. I don't think it's fair but I try and stay active and dedicate my time to organizations that help quads and paraplegics do things they'd never dreamed possible, like stick their feet in the ocean and even surf. 
I made a pretty awful joke when our baby died. My wife laughed.It's weird. Nobody else would get it but it is definitely a coping mechanism. "Gallows humour" they call it. 
The irony is that it's would ultimately be safer for OP to be getting mental health help, he would be able to focus better and have less anxiety on the job, but instead he has to fear losing his job over getting the help he needs. It's really a shame. 
Why would they tell you that? It seems so unnecessarily harsh on you. Even firing squads are given blank rounds so nobody knows who fired the killing shot. 
was the town really that small they could still be there? Also if it's not hard to answer and you don't mind. What happened after? 
Seriously not your fault. Accidents happen. You're not to blame. 
Maybe. Sometimes people just don't or can't accept that something terrible but random happened. It's easier to think some dumb kid killed your daughter than to accept that fate, chance, and poor decision led to her death. They were probably in denial, and angry. 14 year old boy was there, he's an easy scapegoat. 
It's a horrible fucking sound, that's what it is. My understanding is that it's actually a number of different sounds, but while I'm not particularly traumatized I wouldn't mind forgetting what I've heard. 
I'd stop the fake laugh and tell them that it hurts you every time. 
Ah man thats fucked up. Sorry that you had to go through that situation 
Yeah, definitely. Wasn't trying to say his dad wasn't proud or anything, just that I'd be too. 
 My grandfather was partially paralyzed. On his last day, he was walking around and flirting with the nurses. Fell asleep and never woke up. 
This kind of hits home for me. My grandmother passed alittle over a year ago. She had been ill for awhile and slipped into a coma. It was her wishes that she be allowed to pass naturally in a situation like that. I wish she had been able to be assisted in passing, because she essentially starved in her coma (though I disagree with her decision, it was her religious belief so I respect it). I'm sure you love your grandmother, so please visit her as much as you can. Not doing so is a regret I'll hold for the rest of my life. 
This exactly is the appropriate mentality, and so much closer to reality. PSA: be aware of what it means when you tell doctors to "do whatever they can to save him/her" --- that situation can get much more brutal than people realize 
Likely, even if no one told him, he would have put it together easily. there was obviously no child born. Even if no one said a word to him, six year olds aren't exactly stupid. He'd definitely would have put two and two together "she was pregnant, she tripped over me, now the baby is gone." 
30 year old from Australia standing with Trexis. We love you friend 
What an awful group of people. It was an accident, and you don't deserve that because it wasn't your fault. 
Here's to hoping it stays that way. Kids should be kids for as long as they can. 
As I see it, when it comes to someone's MOM, the guy causing harm to her deserves whatever comes to him. That cunt deserved it all. 
You mean directly after? I told him to stay with his brother, I ran for help. This was almost 20 years ago so its kind of hard to remember. I got help, we spent what felt like an eternity explaining to everyone what happened. My friend and I were inseparable for almost a month afterward, but then drifted apart. 
What's crazy is how easy it is to notice a fake laugh. There's more hurt than joy. Yet nobody seems to care. I mean. Fuck. I see it constantly. Are people really that insensitive and don't notice? Is it just a social thing we do cause the the fake laugh is a green light to make people uncomfortable? Do people just not care? Bums me out. 
Based on how scarred a lot of these other people are, even the ones that accidentally killed someone at a young age, i think they did the right thing. 
We have an easy community to deal with. Pretty rare that we encounter someone who is instantly hostile just vocally let alone physically. So we generally don't have to be assholes by default. 
do whatever you can to save them with 100% quality of life preservation is probably what most people think they're saying... 
20 year old from Arizona. For what it's worth, I think we'd all feel the same way. 
What happened between you and your friend after that month? 
Some people are oblivious to it and some people are purposefully avoiding it. 
I agree. This is no way pales but when I was 13 or so I was carrying my cousin down the stairs. She was probably 18 months. Slipped on the steps about five steps down from the bottom. I tried to catch her as best as I could and I even did keep her sort of in my arms as we both fell. She screamed for hours afterward and I was in tears. The next time I saw her she had her leg in a cast. Just a hairline fracture. Everyone reassured me baby's bones heal quickly...but I cried and cried. I still feel awful when I think about it. I can't imagine being told that something worse happened. Phew. 
Yes, but preservation of 100% quality of life is unlikely. When you start to intervene, you often set up the circumstances requiring further intervention. 
32 Oregon, much love brother you can't control life. The only thing you can control is the ability to let go. 
I know my relationship to my siblings and if there was anything in this world that would remind me of that loss I would avoid it. I doubt the other friend blames OP but I would imagine that the grief would make it very hard to continue any friendship at any age. 
Thank god, I though that was going in another direction. 
I'm so sorry you had to go through that. Hope you and his family are doing alright. 
21 years old, Canada here. I'm sorry you had to go through that emotional pain, and I hope you can see the good in yourself and focus on the happiness you bring to people than rather than what's in the past. 
26, Brazil, my heart is with you and I will pray for you to overcome this 
30 from Germany here, "Those who have a 'why' to live, can bear with almost any 'how'." Victor Frankl. I hope you believe in and love at least a small part of who you are now, it will see you through the suffering. Good luck man, I probably won't forget your story for a while, in no way do I think it is your fault - just a 'shit happens' thing, and it sucks that you've been giving a life sentence in dealing with that. I hope you find freedom in your heart soon. 
I think I would do this intentionally just to piss off my boyfriend to be honest. 
A surprising number of people don't realize reindeer are real animals. Also narwhals. Like, why would there be a unicorn whale, right? That's OBVIOUSLY made up. 
You should have explained, "In New Orleans they erected numerous dykes." 
That's the type of guy who only sees breasts as sexual objects, and would be offended if he saw a woman breastfed in public. 
Cats A) don't have money B) don't give a fuck about you even if they did 
What a strange, surreal question. I get vertigo from even reading that. 
You know there is a fine line between an idiot and a sadist that secretly hates you, right? 
That seems less "stupid" and more just plain "evil". 
I'm trying to imagine a rolling pin constructed in a way where you *could* put food inside it... I've got that classic solid wooden roller design in my mind, and that's all I can think of. **Edit**: apparently lots of people have rolling pins that are hollow so you can fill them with water to add weight. Apparently most of these versions are crappy plastic kinds. 
I know someone who has fallen for *several*. He has even travelled to Nigeria (*several* times) to set up gold buying/selling deals. He has been taken on shady drives, has been beaten up, thrown in a Nigerian jail for a few days, etc. He has transferred at least several tens of thousands of dollars (of borrowed money), but possibly in the hundreds of thousands. For example they will tell him they have the gold, they have the contracts, they just need $70K from him to charter the plane. He still gets these scam emails and still responds to them, and still holds out hope that one day soon he'll make his millions. I am not bullshitting. This guy is real and he's a fucking idiot. 
As someone who's really into graphic design, this hurts me. 
Perhaps it comes from holding a map in front of you, and seeing the map's points of the compass always pointing directly in front of the map holder? 
Knew someone in high school who told a story about how once she was really nervous about getting pregnant. She wasn't, but when she finished her story, the teacher asked her if she checked for stds. Her reply: "I'm on the pill". 
Blame her parents: "How do you get a baby, mom and dad?" "Well, when two people love each other *very much*...." 
I mean, old-school answering machines can be picked up at any time (though they don't continue to ring), but obviously any provider-side voicemail doesn't do that. Still dumb, but maybe he got confused? 
I mean, in recovery circles that's a very common euphemism for being an alcoholic. Never heard it used tongue-in-cheek before, but I'm kind of hoping.... 
She's not wrong. Due to privacy regulations, if your password is your SSN, we can't type it in. 
I had my boss show me that facebook post because he thought it was cool. I said, "Dude....Halloween is the last day of the month...". Yeah, he felt stupid for a bit, but just laughed it off. Too many people were fascinated with that (it's more or less just accepting what they are told). 
The headless horseman never used the word "British"...stupid! 
What's Egypt got to do with Africa? Egypt's in the MiddleEast, duh! 
Lolol wtf the thought of a rabbit walking like a cat totally gave me the heebie jeebies 
i would have died if she had said it was a really fat deer or something. 
"Pfft, I saw her homework, it doesn't even have any numbers in it!" 
I've had a very similar conversation with a friend of a friend. She also wouldn't fly at night because the plane might hit the stars during the trip and she didn't want to risk it. 
Well, that's true actually. You've never heard of "taking someone's temperature"? You think they still have a temperature after it's been taken? Who's the idiot now? 
That's a very special type of stupid. "Haha - look how well-read you are!" 
I can't decide if this is idiocy or comedic genius. 
I've seen worse. A friend of mine used the manual mode on his auto transmission and said that the coolant temperature is how you know when to shift. 
"Gelato isn't vegan?" "It's milk and eggs bitch." 
The president's just had a heart attack. We're here for your heart. 
Jesus. My wife said something like this not long ago. 
It was a risky move ; dumping someone who angrily chucks knives at things. 
well... technically she's right. Those wind farms are to use as an alternative to fossil fuels which curbs and helps to remedy global warming. Looks like you are the dummy 
I mean, that's what they mean by "he put a seed in her belly," right? 
Sharon a PC is bad enough, but Sharon your girl with another man?! Too much. 
I was shopping with my girlfriend and she said she wanted steak. I picked up some and she said "no, that's beef. We need steak". I feel your pain 
As a vet tech, you would be surprised at how many times I've heard that 
Maybe she was thinking about Miami, Ohio. Still stupid but makes a little more sense 
The perception that wealth and godliness is connected is actually based in history. I forget what it was called, but it's studied in sociology. 
My dad's name is Ken and when he was grumpy one day I asked if it was because he's going through kenopause... not the best idea I've ever had. 
I dated a guy like this and it was the only reason why I broke it off. "How was your day?" "I want to be in your vagina." 
What if the driver was a poor, uninsured person? Then what's her master plan? 
Maybe he wanted to make sure you had the requisite black underwear that you needed for the mourning process. 
Exactly. Somehow that... I didn't even know what the hell to think. I just stood there in dumbfounded silence. What do you say to that? Sorry I tried to make the gift more personal? 
You end up marrying the latter so you can torment each other for eternity? 
Yeah, that's what I was thinking. Hence the trope in movies of people saying, "Hey, are you there? Pick up." People might do that outside of movies too, but that's my primary experience of it. 
Oh, she is 100% an alcoholic. But she genuinely uses it as an excuse for her behavior. 
you should go to your doctor. Inability to process small amounts of alcohol can be indicative of reduced liver function. 
I'm from remote Australia and I went to study in Scotland (Dundee) for a year. Driving long distances is a common occurrence where I'm from. Anyway, so I drove down to London for a trip. People in London couldn't believe I drove 8 hours to get there. The vast majority hadn't even been to Scotland for short trip! Bitch please, I've driven over 17 hours solo in a day to see my cousin. 
Doesn't take rocket appliances to know that's an albino shit hawk Julian. 
That's fair. To be honest, I don't like girl sperm either. It's coarse and rough and irritating and it gets everywhere. 
It's the "Push the limits of your state's age of consent / romeo and juliet laws" camp. 
They actually do sometimes! I showed rabbits for years and my little sister still does. They'll occasionally do what looks like an army crawl and it's adorable. 
Dad used to fly helicopters for the military. Had a door gunner try to jump out when they flew through a cloud. He thought they were solid. Guess he never saw fog. 
I would have a hard time keeping it together, would make my day for sure. Source: am waiter 
"We may be doing 30 miles per hour in first gear at 8500 rpm but the temp gauge is still dead center so I don't need to shift yet!" 
I'm going to venture a guess that she also complains about how her food is full of chemicals? 
No proper manners at all. The butter knife is only to be used to put out scented candles. 
I always wonder, when people are *so* wrong, how did they ever convince themselves they were right? 
"I found weird bumps on my dog!!!!" "Sir, those are nipples." " But, he's a boy!" ::facepalm:: This happens like at least once a month in our ER. 
Miami University is a college. It's in Oxford, Ohio. There is a Miami County, and the Dayton metropolitan area is often referred to as the "Miami Valley", but there is no city or town in Ohio called Miami. All named for the original tribe in the area, the Miami Indians. 
Some churches teach it, and it's referred to as the "prosperity gospel". It's pretty heretical, though. 
Yeah, I was going to say, if she wasn't ever exposed to that exact blatant fact, how can you fault her? Took humanity long enough. 
Yeah. You can pull out a line like that maybe once a year, and then you gotta spend the rest of the year saying smart things to reset the balance. 
I don't understand therefore this problem is unsolvable!!! 
You yell at the cat because you thought it was clear you were going to put BOTH names on the card 
Seriously, I definitely would've believed that as a kid. 
I don't even get how you would clean a loaded gun properly. 
For years my mother would leave me voicemails at work saying, "It's Mom. Are you there, hon? Pick up." 
I went on a tinder date with a girl once. We had two beers each over the course of a couple hours, thought it was going well, she asked to come over to my place to Netflix and chill. When we got there, we each drank another beer, hooked up, then she proceeded to: Chug 4 beers out of my fridge Fuck up my bathroom Try to smoke in my kitchen Get offended when I told her she had to smoke on the balcony Try to pee on the balcony I kicked her out, called a cab, blocked her on everything. I found out later from a bouncer buddy of mine that she has an alcohol restriction on her license. :| 
Tell me about it. An ex-gf was born in Weybridge (about 10 miles SW of London) and had never been more than 10 miles North of London (Watford Junction station, to meet someone) on land. Yet she had visited every continent, including Antarctica. A quick straw poll of colleagues (25 or so) discovered that I was the only one who had visited England, Wales, Scotland and NI. Three had never left England. (The last situation is surprisingly common). 
Tell him reddit thinks he's an idiot, but we also find the notion quite cute. 
She had a cold last week and didn't want to take DayQuil because it was full of chemicals. 
Was it in an Olive Garden? I feel like this happened at an Olive Garden. 
I cant decide if he's very racist or just very paranoid. I guess maybe both 
Maybe OP's Indian-American girlfriend is posting about him somewhere else in this thread. 
I lived in Ohio for a while and saw a ton of "Miami University" stickers. I was talking to my boss and was like "oh, wow, a lot of you Ohioans go to Florida for school!" I'm still embarrassed by that comment. 
It is easier for a camel to go through the eye of a needle than for someone who is rich to enter the kingdom of God Mark 10:25 But I guess they don't read that part of the bible 
Just mask it with a nice milk steak and a side of jelly beans 
SIR, I ALREADY TOLD YOU THAT I AM NOT A FRACTIONS PERSON, YOU'RE REFUSING TO HELP ME SO I'M GOING TO GIVE UP 
"At what moment did you realize redditors were idiots?" 
Its like the most important thing to always be honest with kids for this reason imo. They're literally asking those questions in an attempt to build a reasonable framework of the way the world works. If we lie, bullshit, joke, whatever, they don't know - they're going to incorporate that into their worldview until it gets (hopefully) corrected later, most likely to their embarrassment. See all the askreddit threads that talk about those scenarios for reference... 
This is still my favorite thing to say and I've messed up the delivery every single time because I'm so excited I have something to say 
Lol right? As if a tiny ass star could take down an airplane. 
I'm almost afraid to ask, but does she know who Food Babe is? 
Local hangout pizza joint place. Still not an establishment where it is ok to throw knives. 
This is also common post-surgery. My father told me to tell the nurse that I was having regular shits after my surgery, because the medicine they give you otherwise will have you running to the toilet every five minutes. Well I'd rather have had the medicine than endured what I did. I just kept going days without needing a shit, and began to get worried. Eventually I had one and it felt like shitting a rock 5x the size of my asshole. I was gripping the seat with the force of 1000 silverbacks, wincing all the way until I finally came to. Laxatives are way better than severe constipation, let me say that right now. 
How it goes for me every time: "Hey look a flock of cows!" "Oh" "Hey look a FLOCK of cows!" "That's nice." "Can you please say don't you mean herd?" "Don't you mean herd? "Of course I've heard of cows. Look, there's a whole flock!" 
After my hernia surgery, I was taking codine tablets to help with the severe pain. For some reason, the surgeon didn't mention "Do NOT take opiate painkillers or you won't be able to shit." 5 days later, and after hours of excruciating pain and intense laboring with a freshly operated-on abdomen, a fair bit of weeping, I gave birth to something the size and consistency of a tennis ball. It felt like it was velcroed to the inside of my colon. 
[opens mouth as if to say something] [...closes mouth] [scratches head] [looks down] [frowns] [opens mouth again] [...closes mouth] [raises eyebrows and nods in approval] 
The Elvish confusion comes in because the inscription of the One Ring is Black Speech written in Elvish script. Like Chinese being written using English characters, for example. 
This one annoys me because some people don't take it into consideration when talking about how life expectancy back then was around 30-40. People didn't die of old age at 40, a lot of people just died before their 20's and that brought the average right down. 
Just a few years ago in Kansas, we had a 17 year species and a 13 year come out at the same time. The noise was tremendous at night. My BIL from Oregon came to visit and the sound scared the shit out of him. 
Barring how stupid that is, why 3.2 instead of 3.1, which would be the proper rounded number with two digits? 
Fun side fact, it was used to cap the top of the Washington Monument due to it's initial value at the time. 
if you beleave that placebo-effect is somekind of a magical phenomena that will happen no matter what, it will happen no matter what. So in a way you experience placebo-placebo 
They have been sent into space and not only survived, they multiplied. 
So when the sun goes all our eyeballs are getting nuked? 
That's like saying Pluto was a planet for less than a year. 
Similarly, there are more molecules of air in one breath than there are breaths in the atmosphere. That means that every breath you take probably contains at least one molecule of Newton's last breath. 
They could have at least let the condemned see how the movie ended. 
Nuke from the future to correct a time line issue? 
But what about a married persons digestive system? 
Can confirm. My girlfriend often uses her head more than I. 
LPT: Climb a mountain in a silly costume so that you become everyone's favorite waypoint. 
So, technically, if i were to go swimming in the Atlantic, i'd be swimming in the pool of the Titanic. Or would it be the Olympic? 
How many Coast Guard helicopters were mistaken for school buses before they made the change? 
TIL T.Rexes lived closer to toy stegosauruses than actual stegosauruses. 
So either it's 22,015 degrees in here, or I have a serious cricket infestation... 
You mean no one's brain exploded when they say read 37 break up texts they couldn't believe were real? 
Maybe not roamed, more like "there were some left here and there" 
[ ](/derpybag)So if we reverse the order of the lenses in it, would that allow us to look billions of years into the future? That could be useful. 
Sort of, technically it reads both. Light reflects back off barcode into a light-detecting electronic component called a photoelectric cell. White areas of the barcode reflect most light; black areas reflect least. As the scanner moves past the barcode, the cell generates a pattern of on-off pulses that correspond to the black and white stripes. 
If you stacked elephants on top of each other from here to the moon they would all die. 
Also, on the logarithmic scale the average number from a number approaching 0 to a number approaching infinity is a number that approaches 1. 
Gee, I don't know, Cyril. Maybe deep down I'm afraid of any apex predator that lived through the K-T extinction. Physically unchanged for a hundred million years, because it's the perfect killing machine. A half ton of cold-blooded fury, the bite force of 20,000 Newtons, and stomach acid so strong it can dissolve bones and hoofs. 
The Latin alphabet, and its ordering, are derived from the Greek alphabet which is derived from the Canaanite/Hebrew alphabet. The Hebrew system is a semitic version of a component in the Egyptian hieroglyph system that was used to write foreign names. In the Egyptian and Hebrew systems, the leters are named by actual words that begin with the sound that the letter represents. Originally, the letters were also shaped as hieroglyphs representing those word names. For instance, the first Hebrew letter, Aleph, means ox, and its original shape was an ox's head. Over the years, the face lost its features and in the Latin version, got turned upside down, to form what is now the letter 'A'. The actual reason for the ordering is not known, but it is believed that the letter names were part of some long sentence that kept the ordering and was used as a menmonic for the order. 
Can anyone link a source or more information on this? Sounds like an interesting read. 
Tell my Protestant mother that. Anytime I go and see her she always says, "I really think you're going to see the end days. Things like this never used to happen". 
I could singlehandedly destroy this fact by believing in all of them. 
Interesting fact about Oxford, there's no official date of it's founding, but records show it teaching as far back as 1096. 
Or pretty much every language in Western Europe being written using the Latin alphabet. IIRC that script was used for a bunch of languages in Middle Earth. 
Something similar happened a few years ago here in Ga (locally dubbed the *Cicadapocalypse*). 
It gives me shivers up my spine thinking about that. We need to colonize mars just so we can watch somebody climb it 
When I was young a friend told me that thinking of elephants stopped you from sneezing. I believed him, and 10 years later Im still avoiding sneezing by thinking of elephants. He was clearly lying, because this doesnt work for anyone but me. But even with the knowledge its complete BS, it works. Truly amazing. If anything it makes me kind of sad that everyone I tell it to doesnt truly believe me :( 
However, they did not multiply in space. After returning to Earth and being rehydrated, they had laid eggs that successfully hatched. It's important to note that the vacuum of space didn't do anything to them, but the ultraviolet radiation from the sun caused damage to the subjects not shielded from the sun's UV rays. 
Among other things. Worse things. Much, much worse. 
Actually, his German captors gave him a certificate. From what I read, they had mad respect for him. 
Keep in mind that even though he fell 22,000 ft the forces in play would be no worse than 2000 ft due to terminal velocity. 
Any last wishes? "Yeah, I want to watch the end of the movie!" 
Why can't they have lethal opiate overdose. Win-win. 
Yep they had to totally rethink their coloring system when they stopped using school buses to fly kids to school. 
I've always found it interesting that we grew up playing with all these dinosaur toys when many of them would never have encountered each other. Of course Darth Vader never fought Batman either, but dammit, it's my imagination and I'll do as I please. 
My 9th cranial nerve is broken due to bells palsy! Can't take me down! (But please fix my droop.) 
I think it's most impressive that he's been 21 for 10 years. 
But unless they were perfectly still, or always were going somewhere with a specific destination in mind, they were at least sometimes roaming, right? 
Actually no, we can't see that far back with just our eyes; the furthest objects we can see with the naked eye are some 2-10 million light years away, so about 1000 times less than the Hubble. 
It can see over 6000 more colors than humans. Nah, just 9. I mean that's still a lot, it's just... 9. 
Pretty much. The white activates the photosensors, but without the black bars to *not* activate them, you'd just read a bunch of active bits. If you want to think the black bars are read, you can think the sensors note the lack of input. It's a matter of perspective, really. 
Have you ever seen giraffes neck-fight? Crazy shit. 
One of the two practical consequences of the Hairy Ball Theorem, the other of course being that everyone you ever love will leave you. 
People in all times have fervently believed that the "end days" are just around the corner. Every single generation has pointed out all the signs that it's going to happen soon, real soon, any day now. People don't like to think about how the world will just keep on going without skipping a beat when they're gone, so they'd rather pretend that the world is going to go with them. 
And the Aztec empire was founded in 1428, which means that we aren't even talking about a few decades but actually centuries of time difference :-) 
She was also the last member of the Ptolemaic dynasty, so that *clearly* wasn't a good idea. 
Yeah, Hayha realized that in winter, his breath could fog up the regular scope. And the sun reflection would be more obvious. He also ate snow while shooting to hide his own breath. 
Now you just need to remain engulfed in a swarm of cicadas at all times and boom, tinnitus cured. 
That'd be insane actually. But I dont think it would be all that interesting to watch if they had to do it in spacesuits. Lets terraform mars and have a race up that cliff! Also might be easier because mars has less gravity (?) right? 
At what point then is it not even really a mountain or a hill, but just an irregularity on an otherwise spherical planet? 
I'm a teacher and I told my class that you can stop hiccups by staring at the person doing it and demanding them to hiccup for us. We've used this technique to great success when children in the class get the hiccups. Last week, I had the hiccups. 25 children all turned and looked at me, waiting for me to do it again. My hiccups stopped. Freaky. 
notice how there are no trees on the sun? can you imagine how long it would take to cut all those trees down using an ax or a hand-saw? of course the sun knows what a chainsaw sounds like. 
Did you just assume that man's surface area relative to his direction of travel? 
Imagine how Fucked up that would be. Mr. Smith, You really Fucked up the board meeting this morning....fuck, delete that. You are a total idiot and we would be better off if you killed yourself...fuck, delete that. Fuck this email. 
Easiest method? Fill a chamber with nitrogen. You asphyxiate, but you don't notice as much because the body has a reaction to CO2 build up, not nitrogen. It's how Kevorkian performed a few assisted suicides. 
I mean one could argue that if there is a God and he is truly timeless such a thing wouldn't be any different than us leaving in time to get to work 10 minutes early. Except heathens, of course. 
That's not horrifying, the fact that all of the toilets are over flowing is horrifying! 
Imagine a color that you can't even imagine, now do that 9 times. 
Like how when we read a book we read the lack of light reflecting from the lines on the paper? 
It never seems like a good idea to give an apex predator a bigger murder toolkit. 
Stick it in space, this experiment is not finished 
They did start off trying it with just the cars but they all sank 
It also means that the gap between the Aztecs and the alleged founding of Oxford is longer than the entire history of the USA (332 years vs. 241 years.) :0 
She could have gone on speaking Coptic if she had just not fucked with Rome 
This is the coolest part of the story. The fact that he was willing to sacrifice a scope. 
SIR, I ALREADY TOLD YOU THAT I AM NOT A SCIENCE PERSON, YOU'RE REFUSING TO HELP ME SO I'M GOING TO HANG UP. 
In high school, I cured my friend's hiccups by telling her thay eating popcorn (which was handy at the time) stops them. She apparently spread this wonderful cure for a couple of years until it came up again when I was around. "Oh, no my dear..." 
I back this, solid evidence, consider me a peer and it now peer reviewed. 
Huh, that's really interesting. I feel like this would be a really good book/movie idea. 
When you climb Everest you are warned: this is no joke, you *very* well may die and nobody can help you. If you get tired and sit down, it's on you to get back up again. Anyone who tries to help you is likely going to end up dead for trying. Source: someone who would die on Everest and thus has *no* intention of going there. 
It's really a stupid thing to do from a safety standpoint. If you attempt to climb it, you should live with the fact that there is a chance of death. I know a few climbers who have an Everest pipe dream, but they all at least acknowledge that if they were to go for it they'd have to be ok with never coming back. 
Thanks for asking, no one asks. But Adthis was a friend of mine I met while travelling to Greece who's supposed friendship followed me back to the states. We were the best of friends, until I invited him to my house introduced him to my wife and daughter. He was very proper at the meeting but I could tell something was up. A feeling I couldn't shake. The "friendship" continued for a while, but every time he came over, I couldn't shake this odd feeling about him. Until, one day, he came over unannounced, and asked to use my bathroom, and asked for a roll of toilet paper. I didn't think anything of it, but after he left, I had to use the bathroom, and fucking Adthis put the TP roll on "under" style. Never spoke to him again. Fuck you, Adthis. 
Because black reflects (theoretically) nothing, and clear reflects a tiny bit. If you've ever tried to scan one of them, you've no doubt noticed it's much harder than scanning black on white. 
"Yeah officer we taught our crocodile how to fire cap guns to signal it wants treats and uh, well it was smart enough to figure out real guns were more effective and gave it better leverage. We are currently on the roof but my son taught it how to jump off its tail as well so you better hurry" 
Do you want space crocodiles? Because that is how you get space crocodiles! 
I think surviving artillery strikes or surviving an exploding round to the face are a little bit cooler *hey guys, it's like, an opinion 
There was this show I watched in high school where there was a scene in which a girl for whatever reason mixes up choking with hiccuping, but she can't go behind her friend to do the heimlich maneuver so she just tried punching her friend's stomach instead. I though it was hilarious. Well one day in class this girl couldn't stop hiccuping and the teacher asked if anyone knew what causes it. I answered correctly with "spasms of the diaphragm." So the teacher said "very good, now how do you cure it?" The correct answer was literally anything/placebo effect. I said "punch her in the diaphragm" as a joke. Well the guy nearest to her took me seriously, and punched her right in the gut exclaiming "it's around here right?!" Funniest shit in my life. 
There's an excellent short story called "A Pail of Air" which details how a family survives what you describe, by insulating their house with plastic tarps and keeping a constant fire going. They susbsist on canned goods that they scavenge from the surrounding city in makeshift space-suits. Because the atmosphere froze and fell like snow upon the Earth's surface, they occasionally have to go out and retrieve pails of air -- thus the title. 
They keep assimilating "normies". That's the only way they can reproduce. 
Nah because any lucky bastard can do either of those. Picking off five hundred soldiers using a rifle without a scope is as cool as it gets. 
And he said that the Soldiers he killed with his submachine gun didn't really count. Or not worth remembering, I forget his actual quote. So that's the reason you hear about his confirmed kill count and then also having an extra 300ish higher estimated kill count. Imagine being so badass that the times you killed folks with a little bit of spray and pray didn't count because you were using too many bullets. 
You are forgetting that moon gravity takes about 17% of that, leaving earth with only 51% earth gravity. 
Yeah, or he just didn't wanna fuck up his hit percentage. 
Still a majority of gravity for Earth to decide all gravity-related legislature. 
Great theory mate, another one from BTTF II is that Marty got into Biffs suit in his casino to confront him about the sports almanac by getting Doc to drop him off on the roof in the delorean, hence the reason why Biff says "how did you get past my security down stairs?!?!" and also why doc meets him at the roof. It is also said just like in your theory, that Marty was forced to jump off the roof to his death, when Doc found out about the death he then went back in time and hovered his delorean just under Marty hence saving him. I love the BTTF trilogy, I was really expecting more fan theory's about the film in this thread. 
I actually really like this. I will take note and rewatch!! 
I figured this out as soon as I re-watched Heavyweights on Netflix 
I feel it's this or suicide as the only possible endings to bojack 
I think Dr. Klaw is Penny's grandfather. The real subject of interest is the dog which was enhanced via genetic engineering and experimentation. Inspector Gadget's main mission is to protect the dog which he does by pretending to be unaware of the dog's actions and putting himself in harm's way before the dog does. 
Wow. I like this a lot. Definitely makes Luke's shame / guilt even more powerful. To Luke, losing the kids to the dark side could be more painful than just "losing" them. 
This has always been one of my favorites. I love how the movie strongly implied it but gave the audience credit that they could figure it out for themselves rather than beating us over the head with it. 
Makes sense, they're an old family, seem to all be rather good at magic, have some interesting family heirlooms like the clock. Being poor even fits well, the gaunts were Slytherin's descendants and poor too. 
The alternative one I've heard is that the Thing had no intention of harming anyone. At least int he 88 version of the movie. IT was chased down and shot at. Then whenever it was discovered it protected itself. But only when discovered. The only reason the guy at the end of hte movie wasnt obliterated was because he just stopped giving a shit and the Thing recognized it. If they just let the damn thing build its ship and leave they'd have been spared the problem. 
He doesn't care to remember his name. Why would it matter to Gatsby? He's just another means to his end with Daisy. 
This would also explain Vader's line to Boba in ESB, "No disintegrations". Because the last time Vader had worked with Boba, he torched Ben and Beru. 
I think the creator confirmed this. He said something about how he didn't even want to hide it, but Nickelodeon made him call wine "smoothies". 
Or maybe just an animagus that decided not to be a person anymore. I know if I could become a dog or a bird or something I'd probably just say "fuck that human nonsense, it's time to be the longest living dog in history." 
Dave Filoni, creator of both Clone Wars and Rebels, has basically confirmed this. I'm actually really happy with it. 
That's my thought as well. Qui-Gon's explanation was based on the Republic's scientific understanding that couldn't fully grasp the relationship between midichlorians and the nature of the Force. 
Your theory is kinda true. Han doesnt need to be force sensitive for the force to guide him, it just means he cant use it/bend it to his will. Chirrut from R1 is not force sensitive, the force simply uses him for a purpose (hitting the button), he is simply aware the force is using him. 
I think he did it more because he knew that the Orb was safer with Nova Prime. But, as Captain of the Ravagers, he had demanded the orb from Peter in exchange for the Ravagers assistance in the fight. If he was seen openly rejecting the orb to leave it with Nova Prime it could've made him look bad in the eyes of the crew. This way, it looks like Yondu tried to do right by the Ravagers but that dastardly Peter kid tricked them again. But really, Yondu knew exactly what was happening and wanted to do the right thing without losing his crews respect. 
For being so poor, The Flintstones certainly have many exotic and extravagant working animals 
I believe George Lucas has confirmed that the entire saga is R2-D2 telling/documenting the story, as he's the only one involved in all of the major events. That theory came from the horses mouth itself. 
Jesus Christ. This is my favorite movie ever and your post just made me like it even more. I'd heard the Totem theory before but the Ariadne theory just gave me chills. Thanks! Watching it again tonight! 
also makes more logical sense. using living humans as batteries wouldn't work, because it would take more energy to keep a human alive than you would get back out of it. Also, the idea that upon being rendered incapable of using solar energy, that they resorted to human batteries, instead of nuclear, or even coal/oil (not like *they* need a healthy earth) 
I thought it was because the slippers were the only things not made from something else. Like FG made them with just straight magic, where as the coach was originally a pumpkin, and the coachmen were mice etc. 
This one sounds awesome, anymore episode evidence to this theory? I want to read more 
The important part of this theory is that the vehicles conveying the children around the factory never have extra seats, even though the tour group keeps getting smaller, so Wonka must have known the children would be picked off one by one along the way. 
this is one of my favorites, but one of the creators did an AMA here a while back and pretty much crushed my dreams itsrealtome.gif 
Yes, I firmly believe that the Walking Dead is the story of how Carl came to become the leader of the new world. He is the main character of the series, not Rick. 
Kevin was also a master poker player. Since he learned and perfected the bluff, maybe his bluff was acting dumb. 
But wouldn't the majority of them be addressed to Philadelphia, *PA* and not Philadelphia, *Pennsylvania*? 
Well, that's definitely the metaphor they were going for anyways. A lot of folks bash the movie for being kind of a terrible Sci-Fi film for a number of reasons, but none of the Sci-Fi stuff really matters too much because it's all just allegory in service of the main plot line - Gibson's character finding his faith again. Of course it's up to the individual as to whether they think that makes it a bad film or not. I'm of the mind that they could've put more work in to it. An alien race that's fatally weak to water decides to visit a planet where water is so prevalent, it's even in the air, and they don't even wear suits? C'mon! 
Okay, so why is there a talking squirrel from Texas? 
Didn't Gatsby know the woman from before the military though? 
SO THAT'S WHY PEARL TOOK KRABBY PATTIES OFF THE MENU FUCK MAN 
Or you know, a bunch got burned at the stake before there was any wizarding organization so they decided to just keep to themselves 
Bing Bong lived in her imagination and memory and now he lives in the imagination and memory of everyone who saw him in the movie! He has eternal life this way. 
There's a little scene in one of the films where ET aliens have a senate seat. 
Reminds me of the theory that the reason China went fully capitalist, or "socialism with Chinese characteristics", manufacturing most of the world's commodities, is because one day they plan to halt all production. Which would cause massive economic fallout making the proletariat to reach maximum conscience and then go forward with a worldwide communist revolution. Meaning communism is established without a capitalist world power interfering China is striving to become the dominant economic world power so it can then reverse it all and force the rest of the world to follow suit 
Newman isn't the customer; The reason Bob Saccamano is never seen is that Kramer knows better than to let worlds collide and have a skeezy cokehead mingling with his yuppie friends (and George). 
The guy who played Freddie legit confirmed it on twitter. 
I'm partial to the ice dragon being inside The Wall and the ~~Lord~~ King of Winter (a super white walker) being imprisoned under Winterfell by Bran the Builder. 
I read that as "Rey is the grand-daughter of Emperor Palpatine and Obi-Wan Kenobi." I need a bigger mobile. 
So they'll know how dumb you are now instead of later? 
Yes! That one's my favorite theory. In a finale episode of one of the earlier seasons (a season where Eric was still the smart, cool older brother), Eric is locked in a car overnight during a snow storm. At some point during this he hits his head badly. He's saved in the end and the season ends. When the next season starts, Eric's character has changed into "dumb" Eric. No one ever addresses it. So the theory is that he suffered a massive head injury, wasn't rescued in time, and now has permanent brain damage that the family never acknowledges due to guilt. 
I like this; then, after an uncomfortable pause between Bojack and the bartender, a voice in the background will say "Hey, aren't you the horse from Horsin' Around?" Theme and credits start. 
Isn't Gadget Penny's uncle? So would he be Gadget's dad then? 
The kind of nuance and subtlety that Michael Bay would become known for. 
Big families and the wealth divided amongst all the children every generation, it'll evaporate pretty damn quick. 
I'm so glad it's here though there is so much about that show that should be unpacked 
Why do you think it was chased by the Norwegians? The scene left at their camp does not look like one of self defense (in terms of The Thing) but an assault; why the hell would that guy slit his wrists and neck otherwise? There's a behind the scenes shot of a guy hanging in a closet or whatever; that's not self defense. The Thing is an assimilator; merely surviving is not suitable for it. 
To be fair calling them smoothies would still make sense, cause it would be a way to try hiding her problem from Helga, and also she could actually be drinking smoothies spiked with vodka or something. 
On top of this, everyone would assume the surviving boat pulled the trigger making the ones who survived and made the right choice look like the ones who "failed" Jokers twisted little test and killed off the other boat. 
That's the joke. Nightman convinced young Charlie that his hands were massive and powerful. He still goes on about his hands as a clue. Why the fuck would that be such a memory to include in the song if Jack hadn't forced it down his throat? 
What if she's from a pure blood family, who didn't approve of her squib lover, so she faked her own death and moved in with Filch at hogwarts. She could be in human form whilst in private with Filch and then turn in to a cat when in public. It wouldn't surprise me if Dumbledore was in on the whole thing. 
I have no idea if this is true, but just Imagining Rita Skeeter fighting off dementor with a tiny beetle patrons is a funny image! 
One day, Andy's mom is browsing a thrift shop. "Oh, look at this, a Woody from Woody's Roundup! I used to have a Jessie when I was a little girl! Andy would love this!" They're all rare. 
Yondu smiles when he unlocks the orb and finds the troll doll. He knew he had been tricked and even found it amusing 
If Spongebob is retarded, what does that make Patrick? 
So Palpatine got Darth Vadar to unknowingly kill Padme to save himself? ! This makes so much sense. 
I always thought Anakin only survived long enough to be picked up because of his hatred, basically being sustained by the dark side. When his electronics get fried in Return, he's in a similar place health wise, but he doesn't have anymore hate. He's at peace with the force, and welcomes becoming one with it (read: die). 
The Navigators are Psykers. Dear God that makes so much sense. 
Ariadne is the name of the mythical Greek character who helped Theseus escape the minotaur's labrynth. 
Originally, the humans were networked together to act as a giant, organic, super computer that the AI used as their "server." Last minute it was changed to "power source" so less people would be confused. Remember, it was the 90s...... 
Yes this is my understanding... Cinderella's dress, coach, coachmen, and horses were "transfigured" (to quote Harry Potter) from her old dress, pumpkin, and mice... where as the glass slippers were conjured and given as a special gift to her by the fairy... that's why the magic did wear off... it's not magic, it's real glass slippers which happened to be brought over by magic to be given to Cinderella 
It's a good way to reconcile the 'Oh, the Genie just magicked an *entire nation of people* into existence just to give Aladdin a place to be a Prince of' ethical issue. When you see the song *Prince Ali*, none of them are real, even though Aladdin wishes to *be* a Prince rather than *look like* a Prince. They're just temporary magical constructs and disappear when they're not needed. 
And the shark tried to eat Flounder and Sebastian and King Neptune was so angry that he forbade the shark from ever eating fish again, so the shark formed a support group to help him through his punishment and tried to convince himself that "fish are friends. Not food." 
They are also found in very similar locations in the original games 
That's been confirmed by the creator of The Walking Dead. This is ultimately Carl's story as he grows up in the zombie apocalypse. Rick is the main character for now. However, slowly yet surely, Carl is growing and learning and adapting. The adults have been thrust into this life. They are the ones who remember how things were. Carl has been molded by this life. He's the one who will only know how things *are*. 
I don't care if the creators shot the theory down, your comment shot it down for me in my heart. I really wanted to believe that but you're so right. When addressing an envelope you would never write out the state name 
she is a scientist there to study the mutated creatures 
True, but I'm arguing that the dude is probably the best martial artist in the series, not that he's the strongest human, because that's a much easier argument to have. Dude is constantly outmatched and outgunned, and yet he manages to hold his own for at least a little bit. In fact, it's because of this "meat shield" role he plays that he gets the image of being weak, when in fact he's ridiculously powerful. 
I'd bargain that he'd wipe the floor with quite a few aliens as well 
Jack was from the States and traveling back home, he spent his days abroad lusting after women in form, drawing models but never quite finding someone like Daisy. On his way back home he discovers a way to get the money he'll need to win her attention with those lavish parties. 
Pretty much. There was another episode where it was revealed that everything that had happened was actually from several years prior and Ted went and "Met" the Mother before he actually did. It was basically an entire episode of Ted having a mental breakdown from his own perspective. 
I can't remember exactly which book, early on, they explained in the history of magic that the Salem Witches pretended to be burned at the stake. 
What Bing Bongs never dies, but rises Bingier and Bongier. 
I think it's actually confirmed. Machete is their parents friend. The "uncle" in the movies. 
And his code name was machete in spykids, in fairly sure this is a true thing and not fan fiction 
That's realistic enough to make an awesome story. I want more of this. However it's difficult to actually believe China has any plans other than winning capitalism. 
I have another theory, that Palpatine was killing her. Palpatine was trained in unnatural Dark Side techniques, and it would be smart for him to fuel Anakin's rage over his loss. Also he could be transferring Padme's life Force into Anakin to keep him alive until he had full life support. Now, the problem you may ask is why Obi and Yoda not sense it. The Jedi had lost their ability of the Force over time, with Mace saying that their mastery of the Force has been weakening. Sheev was so trained that he managed to sneak up on his master and kill him in his sleep. 
Jerry is a comedian, if he didn't care to associate with drug users/dealers he would be in another line of work. George started out in real estate and ended up working in professional sports. Elaine definitely doesn't fit in with her respectable female friends. Even though none of them take drugs and they barely even drink, it's hard to imagine any of them would truly be upset or judgemental. Jerry is constantly commenting about Kramer's lack of apparent employment. Sure, maybe he made some brilliant investment, it happens, but I wouldn't be surprised if he was dealing. 
"Remember, son. There must always be a Stark in Winterfell... but I forget why..." 
True. I read Fight Club and this theory doesn't really apply. I think it actually only applies to the movie, as alot of the evidence for it is only extra scenes created for the movie. 
Also in the episode where they find out an insider trading convict is working at Dunder Miflin, Kevin says something like "I'm pretty sure I'm doing what he was arrested for" 
Didn't he get strangled by the Scranton Strangler though? 
I believe Gadget isn't a cyborg at all but a full robot. Penny's father and grandfather were in a horrible accident when an experiment went wrong. . After Penny's father died of his injuries, Klaw (Dr. Klauswiek) retreated into his grief and blamed the government for his son's death. Klauswiek built Uncle Gadget (Universal Corporeal Law Enforcement - Global Assault Directive Grasping Extraordinary Tasks) as a limited proxy to protect Penny. However the government found out about the uncle robot and seized it, turning it into a government agent. This made Klaus so mad he became the mad villain we know now. 
I saw a theory that the reason there were so few students when Harry and co were there was because a large population of the wizards had been wiped out by the first wizarding war - the kids there were the children of the survivors/the ones that stayed in GB 
Like what else?? I will say, though, the intro irks me every time, with Mrs. Pteranodon keeping the random baby dinosaur that just showed up in her nest. If I found a lost child my first reaction would be to find their parents, not adopt them. 
I'm kind of sad neither boat pulled the trigger now... 
or also be a cat in private. Furries are everywhere. 
She probably couldn't produce a patronus, she doesn't have any positive thoughts. 
Peter even used it as a way to give him a gift. Yondu collects all those little tchotchkes. He didn't put something in there Yondu would throw away, he knew that little doll was gonna go on his dash. 
But are you actually dumb or have you just been raised from an impressionable young age to *believe* that you're an actual fucking idiot? 
Ironic. He could save himself from death, but not others. 
Not only that. But they use navigators who become deformed over time. Just like 40k... honestly warhammer 40k borrowed a LOT from Dune. 
A real shame because this explains why humans can manipulate the matrix - their brains are literally the computer which creates their world. 
Imagine how uncomfortable real glass shoes would be. Heels are a bitch as it is 
I didn't think anybody thought those people were real, especially after the opening number from the genie. 
Or an experiment to test radiation effects. Suit is so she doesn't drown. As for the accent.. Well I've never heard a squirrel's accent so can neither confirm or deny. 
I'd say by the time Cell rolls around, Krillin was more than a match for most of the Ginyu Force. He can't come close to the main antagonists, but he can take on a lot of the named mooks. 
Wouldn't it be more like he was manipulating the story to make it seem like Robin and he were destined to be together to justify asking her out to his kids after his wife died? I find that more realistic than a mental breakdown and they all but say that at the end 
The movies were also both directed by the same guy 
Yeah well palpatine was the one who suggested anakin accompany padme to hide on naboo. Also he was aware of anakin's dreams about padme's death in ep. III (possibly the result of planting them?). So at the very least he set up and anticipated her death and used it to control anakin. I could definitely believe he planned their relationship and her death from the beginning and found some way to cause it all. 
even chuck said this wasn't true way before the comic was a thing. I remember when they both dine out that the waiter says "I'd advise against the clam chowder for the lady" or something of the sort. 
He says "I had Martin repeat what he did to me, because it sounds a lot like what I do here *every day*". Why would he say that to the camera if he was guilty though? I don't buy it. 
There's a great video out there something that covers everything. Basically the idea is that Toby felt guilty that he put the wrong person in jail to save himself, so he told the guy that he was the actual Scranton strangler. The guy strangled him in rage 
It sort of works, but even then, Rowling guesstimated a UK wizarding population ~3,000. Even if you assumed that the population had been halved by the war, that's a national population of ~6,000, which is nothing really. I'm willing to take the argument that young adults were disproportionately caught up in the war, or emigrated/fled in larger numbers (people of the Potter's generation or slightly older with infants/young kids), which accounts for the under-population at Hogwarts, but you have to deal with some fairly colossal multipliers to get the national wizarding population anywhere larger than "village", which seems terribly small for a bunch of economic and social reasons. 
Intro: Finds baby. Says (literally) "This is your family and I'm your mom....Let's take a vacation." 
Even if you see yourself as the hero, saying that sentence probably means you are in fact not. 
With great midichlorean levels comes great responsibility. 
Its amazing how children's television can potentially affect the rest of their lives. In your case, I would say this is good. However most shows don't necessarily make it a point to talk about something deep. 
She'd have to be a bipedal cat with the figure of Scarlett Johansson for it to be furry. 
Goddamn Dolores Umbridge could produce a Patronus ~~in a cave with a box of scraps~~ using whatever twisted thoughts she think to feel warm and fuzzy. Evil people can be happy too you know. 
Well, there's a lot of hints for a lot of Tobias's... "subtleties" in his book. 
At least it didn't blow up *cough* End Times *cough* 
Do you see the god emperor turning into a worm though? That'd be crazy. Praise the worm! Never doubt the worm 
Which makes us the Orks of the Matrix. In W40k when Orks believe red things go faster, this literaly works. When an ork slaps a tube, a magazine and a trigger together and believes it will work, it'll shoot bullets! 
I think I'll happily settle for clear jelly flats. Bonus points if there's sparkles in there too! 
His point isn't to say that any of the viewers thought those people were real, but that those people being fake brought up an ethical issue to the way genie apparently fulfilled Aladdin's wish. 
Glenn Howerton pretty much said that whatever fan theories come out, he likes to think are real. Fans start thinking he's a psychotic killer, he starts playing it more. I don't think they will ever say he is, maybe they will, but I think he's going to make it as canon as he can without saying it 
It was the movie, and yes that's exactly what happened. He was poorly impersonating a kidnaped ship's captain, and when Batman tried to verify that it was the penguin, he couldn't due to the masked fingerprints. 
Still though, dude beat Biology with Geometry. Just fuckin' launched triangles at Cell to pit him in a giant fucking square. 
Krillin is always trailing behind by a saga or so. Vegeta shows up? He's probably about as strong as King Piccolo. Oh shit, now Frieza is here? Guess Krillin could probably wipe the floor with Raditz, Nappa, and Saiyan-saga Vegeta, and so on and so forth. I wouldn't put him on Cell's level at the Buu saga, because each saga gives a diminishing result, but he's still exponentially stronger than at the start of the series. His improvement throughout the series is absolutely phenomenal, it's just never touched on because Saiyans are just *that much stronger*. 
"Kids, while your mother was dying in the hospital, I discovered your aunt Robin didn't mind receiving dick pics from a grieving friend." 
He also said at a reading that the only reason he created Marla was so that readers wouldnt think the two main characters were gay. 
She definitely kidnapped that kid. She probably had three eggs but accidentally stepped in one and in her grief she flew around until she found a nest and then just took the egg as a replacement. 
For fucks sake I'm never going to be able to look at Mrs. Pteranodon the same way again. The hussy. 
His arm was ripped and his shoe was written on though, it's hard to believe he wouldn't be able to find a Woody who was in better condition than being literally ripped apart. I see where you're coming from though 
... I would watch that episode of Emperor text to speech. 
He does portray him as a bit of a creep, but IIRC he is pretty nice at portraying Barney and Robin's love story. I mean, their later attempts at a relationship that is. Their first attempt didn't go over so well. 
Because it plays into the perception of his stupidity. 
The strangler choked him out after Toby whispered that he was the real Scranton Strangler 
I think you mean four. Tiny, Shiny, Don, and *Buddy*. 
More than the lives, I think it is about principles. Batman believes that people are inherently good. Joker wants to convince him that they are inherently bad. Joker wins if they press the switch. 
Here's why I think the theory falls apart though: everyone, especially Angela and Oscar, know (think) Kevin is dumb as hell. Like, can barely count dumb. I have no background in accounting, but I assume financial reports are due every quarter in a business. Over 9 seasons that's what, 36 quarters? If you were Angela or Oscar and you had someone as stupid as Kevin working with you, wouldn't you check his work to make sure you're not getting in trouble? If a branch is having messed up financial records, they'd come back to that branch's accountants and find out what's going on. It doesn't seem feasible that neither Angel or Oscar ever checked his work once, which would have quickly found embezzlement. 
They may not have. The final episode there was that whole bit about Kevin's special number, the 'keleven' that he used to balance the books. He offhandedly said to Dwight "a mistake plus keleven gets you home by seven" implying it was something he at least though to himself often. That would mean the keleven has been around for a while. At the very most I would say if Angela and Oscar did check his work they would only make sure that the final balance was what it should have been while assuming he was too stupid to be doing something like embezzling. 
I never understood the point of Bob Saget to begin with. I liked that he was there....but why not just have Radnor so it? 
Because Bob Saget's got a natural narrator voice? And it also conveys that Ted is older when he's narrating. 
That's crazy, you never really think of those other two as having their shit together. 
I saw a high school letterboard that said "Do turtles think frogs are homeless?" It gave me a chuckle. 
Yeah man, I tell ya what, man. That dang ol' Internet, man. You just go on there and point and click. Talk about W-W-dot-W-com. An' lotsa nekkid chicks on there, man. Click. Click. Click. Click. Click. It's real easy, man. 
Suddenly I'm aware that my passion for the things I used to be passionate about has substantially diminished. Shit. 
If you had a penny and had to spend every penny by tomorrow, what would you buy? 
I read this as "science" like yes, let's listen to science. 
My mother-in-law was in a community theater play recently. She had never done any performing before. The night I went to see the show she forgot a line. There was this long awkward silence with four actors on stage staring at each other, and then we hear her whisper "I got nothin'." We've been teasing her about it ever since. 
"kali ma shakti de!" "chup re be" "kali ma shakti de!" 
I'm like halfway down the page and this is the first actual answer. 
Indefinitely. The first wave of tots is easy as you're full of energy. But you know it's going to get progressively harder as time goes on, so to combat that, you create a fort out of the corpses you've left scattered around. Now if the next wave of 4 year olds want to try and attack me, they have to climb a mountain of their peers. eventually the climb will be too high for them to make before the physical exhaustion and mental torment takes over. 
I always go for "So, how about this weather, eh?" Being British it serves a dual purpose. 1. It is a well known humourous cliche phrase that sometimes gets a chuckle 2. Being British, it's actually a very good conversation starter, as we can talk about the weather for literally hours. 
I wonder how many of them are fart molecules... [make face] I wonder how many now 
I'm pretty sure I just read this answer on the "what's the most shocking thing a quiet kid has said" thread 
People have said that to you a lot, haven't they. 
I don't know why this still makes me laugh. It's been months and I still never see it coming. 
#THE MOVIE THIS IS FROM IS CALLED "SCOTT PILGRIM VS THE WORLD". SINCE FUCKING NO ONE WANTS TO ANSWER ME OR THE PLETHORA OF USERS ASKING THE FUCKING TITLE. 
I seize the moment and gaze deeply into your eyes Y'know, platonically. 
definitely scarlett johansson infront of me and emma watson or something behind me 
They came to my apartment in college and asked me, "Do you mind if we share our thoughts on our lord and savior Jesus Christ?" My response was, "Only if you don't mind if I share mine in return." They left. 
You merely adopted the silence. I was born in it, molded by it! 
Girlfriends body, 1 dick, in the head cuz I just fucked my hot ass mom and sucked a dick 10 times. 
*BRRRRRppppppthhhhh pfffttttsss* *drip* "Nailed it." 
Yeah, I think Myanmar should try not to associate itself with them. 
It took me far too long to realize you weren't taking about some kind of Bible movie where Jesus is an air bender... 
ewww I dont like it when people take things that are absurd seriously 
This is oddly uplifting.. in a destructive sort of way. 
With my luck it would go like this: "Who's your favorite Disney princess?" "Oh, definitely Pocahontas." "... oh, ok." 
who eats bagels after work? maybe if you work a night shift 
"Hey I'm Wolfbastlin, welcome to my TED talk. Today we'll be arguing whether Hank Hill's homophobia is masking his own bi-curiosity. Please follow the PowerPoint closely." *lights dim, Crazy Train starts to play* 
'ting about Arsenal is, their always walkin' it in! 
One of the other three actors should have "rescued" her. My theatre group used to do a lot of improv exercises just for that purpose. 
but the sun ain't got claws and sharp teeth so there's that 
"Kali ma shakti de" "Ye kya chutiyap hai bc bhag" 
You only have to hold them off for a year before they all become five year olds. 
Or take the maple syrup out of the fridge and remove the cap (because your wife didn't tighten it) and alternately chug it and pour it onto the 2 yr. old. 
Can any film critics give me an explanation of what the deal with this scene is? Why is Bateman so into Huey Lewis? Is he doing it for effect, or is he legitimately just that into The News? Is there some underlying meaning behind what he's saying, or some significance? 
But they should! Because it's not just about the pleasures of conformity, but it's also a personal statement about the band itself! 
Nope, somebody would have to start a conversation with me in the first place for that to happen. 
No I think the cringiest line is when he awkwardly tries to leave and says "I have to uh pee on her, i mean go pee" *nervously runs out* I think I'm remembering that right at least 
This is awful for girls especially, for y'know, when you're on your period. "Why didn't you go at lunch?!" Because I can't control the speed at which my womb discharges blood Miss Flynn. 
"I look very attractive reflected off your balls. Eyeballs that is." 
I didn't know I was circumcised until I was in middle school. Went to the doctor, nurse gave me the cup for the urine sample, told me to make sure to pull back my foreskin so it didn't mess with it or whatever. Went into the bathroom, unzipped, and thought "okay, now what was she talking ab- Ohhhhh." 
Reverse those, you want the woman who lays the smallest shits to be in front. You know scarjo has some monster patties 
You know, animals never have war. War is an invention of mankind. 
And then they poke you as they say it, becoming the alpha. 
Bagels are a food appropriate for all times of day and situations. 
You just said football things! In a football voice! 
Yes, absolutely. The director had a part and was actually on stage in that moment. He did a lot of saving people who forgot their line throughout the show, but didn't in that moment for some reason. 
I heard that the sun is actually about the same size as a quarter and that is sets in Arizona, near Flagstaff. 
One break lion The you have two lion Lion win everytime 
'Arre madarchod ham to kali ma se bat kar rahe tum kaun hote ho mujhse baat karne wale? Saale kahan kahan se chutiya le kar aatey hay yea suar ke aulad.' 
You forget that there are such thing as three year olds... 
Based on Christmas carols, young children are tender and mild, so it could be worse 
He's basically memorised reviews and articles to fit in and make it sound like he's a normal person with opinions on things when really he's a psychopath who is totally dead inside. There's a similar scene near the start where he talks about all the world's problems. It sounds like he's just reciting an article because that's basically what he's doing. 
And two men, can love eachother in the exact same way. *mimes emotion* 
Ha Ha Ha HA HA Ha Ha Ha HA HA 
It's a Sith legend. Darth Plagueis was a Dark Lord of the Sith, so powerful and so wise he could use the Force to influence the midichlorians to create life... He had such a knowledge of the dark side that he could even keep the ones he cared about from dying. The dark side of the Force is a pathway to many abilities some consider to be unnatural. He became so powerful... the only thing he was afraid of was losing his power, which eventually, of course, he did. Unfortunately, he taught his apprentice everything he knew, then his apprentice killed him in his sleep. It's ironic he could save others from death, but not himself. 
I know a guy that did that on the first day of high school. He asked to go to the toilet and the teacher said "one of the first things you need to learn about high school is that you cannot go to the toilet whenever you want. Only at lunch and break". A soon as she finished he pissed himself. 
I legitimately had no idea until I was a freshman in college, some girl that had been hitting on me asked if I was for some reason. I was just like umm I don't know. Anyways it ended up leading to us banging it out that night so I guess being oblivious works out well sometimes. 
Well, today has been fun. See you tomorrow, internet! 
This icebreaker is now infallible. Assimilating to be more human. 
Two things I wanna make clear to eeeverybody in this room. Never betray me and it's time to go. 
#AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING 
If this is a re-branded Clippy I'm going to spend the rest of my life doing nothing but finding computers and setting them on fire. 
Sometimes it just escapes you or takes you so off guard you can't recover even though you know you should know better. The magic of live theatre! I'm always amazed when I see High School students improv their way out of a bad situation. I watched a couple guys add an entire extra scene to The Importance of Being Earnest where they fought about cucumber sandwiches for five minutes because the lights didn't go out. It was the best part of the play. No one had any idea. 
I see that you too know the work of Bill Watterson. 
I always thought it was because Huey Lemis and the News were considered sort off a joke and he was comparing them to Elvis Costello. It sort of showed what a clueless yuppie he was and how he gravitated towards transparent commercialized music thinking they were one of the greats. Your conclusion seems more fitting though 
She asked what happens when two men leove each other like that? 
i'm not into dnd and i know how rad mindflayers are. keep spreading the word. 
There was a teacher at my high school who was notorious for being a stickler about letting people go to the bathroom. One day a bunch of kids got together $50 and bet a kid to ask to go to the bathroom (knowing she would say no), and then piss his pants while sitting at his desk. He did it. I never asked him if it was worth it, but hey, I still remember him all these years later which is more than I can say of most kids 
INDEED, AS A FELLOW FLESHY HUMAN, I HAVE NOW FOUND THE PERFECT OPENER TO TRY TO ~~INTERFACE~~ TALK WITH PEOPLE! 
#**AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING AND THEY DON'T STOP COMING** 
You know what tilts me about that? The word emergency *literally* means it must be addressed immediately. That's the textbook definition of the goddamn word. 
The Legend of ~~Bagger Vance~~ Wetter Pants. "See the trick is... to drain your thing... receive 50 dollars... become at harmony with all that is..." 
I love quoting that sometimes but I seriously doubt many people get the reference so it's a bit weird... 
I'm gonna do a reverse Snowden and tell the NSA what he's doing 
I like to swipe the bar of soap betwixt my buttocks like a credit card, and make a beep sound with every purchase. 
Shit, who said I could? Preferences are fine, reality gets dirty. Pound it. 
I actually keep a copy of Sports in my office desk for such an occasion. The CD isn't even in there anymore, but you never know when a visual gag is going to go down a treat in the office. 
"Reverse Snowden" sounds slightly like a snowboarding trick. 
Nice use of 'betwixt'. You are a gentleman and a scholar. 
Waterboarding at Guantanamo Bay sounds pretty rad if you don't know what either of those things are. 
I reckon any word with a chocolate bar inside of it is a tiny, special gift to humanity. 
I find if I spit that saliva out, i can avoid throwing up. If I swallow it, I'll throw up. Since i hate throwing up, i spit and spit and spit until my brain is like "ok then" 
This just makes me wake up 3-4 hrs after I fall asleep. 
Dammit, you gave away my secret! Been doing this to impress people once in a blue moon when a spot the difference thing is brought up for some reason. 
Do you follow guided routines or should I just channel my inner spaz? 
For a around half a year (October last year till April this year) I had really, really bad acid reflux, to the point of having to leave work because I couldn't do anything anymore. I tried changing my diet, I talked to my doctors, nothing helped me. I hadn't any idea where it came from or what caused it, but it persisted nastily. And then, from one day to the next - they were gone again. And since then they didn't come back. This story has no really conclusion or life hack, I simply wanted to share it with someone for once. Fuck acid reflux. 
This is called autogenic inhibition. You're stretching the muscles which causes an automatic reflex in the muscle (using Golgi Tendon organs which sense muscle tension) to release the cramp. This is also why standing on your leg when you have a Charlie horse is the fastest relief. 
It's called a precordial catch. I find it too painful to breathe in all the way, so instead I hold my breath right at the point where it starts to hurt. It goes away after holding my breath for just a few seconds. I guess that's the equivalent of peeling the plaster off carefully. 
For photographers: doing this serves to reduce the aperture, thereby increasing your depth of field and putting more things in focus. 
My friend uses this tactic to help people if they're having a panic attack or have gone similarly funny from ingesting too many recreational substances. Asks them to describe something in detail, keeps them focused on something else and distract them from being worked up. It's a great idea :) 
I find using my thumb pressed against the roof of my mouth works 10x better than my tongue. 
I'm a Postman. I walk 8-9 miles a day 6 days a week, why am I not a genius yet? 
I just wear an eyepatch to bed and switch it around after I've swabbed the poop deck. 
My teacher in grade school used to literally kick us in our shins if we said we had a head ache. Worked great n everyone loved her. 
To add to this, if you hate running/ cardio because it makes you feel like you can't breathe, you might have asthma. I learned just recently that I had an activity induced form of asthma, and that most people don't feel pain in their lungs when they run. 
I could have really done with this a couple of days ago - the stinking cold is abating, now... 
I tell myself to hiccup again, and get all stressed with myself, go on, hiccup again, and the pressure of trying to force an involuntary action seems to prevent further hiccups. 
Or purchase a "squatty potty." I've seen these on the market now & am thinking of having my husband make one. 
I always tell people this, it's amazing how much dehydration can fuck you up. 
Okay, so I'm female and I was like, what the hell are you doing normally? Does she mean crouching? Can she teach me how to stand and pee? 
Thank you!! I am one of the 18-35% but nobody else at work is apparently because everyone acted like I was insane when I told them to look at the sun if they need to sneeze. Glad to hear this is a real thing. 
Doesn't work if they are currently looking at a white horse 
Started going to yoga, and it really helped for me. Best one was telling us to think about our intention. Mine was "peace" because I overthink. You think about the word peace while you inhale for five seconds, then you imagine the words "everything else" leave your body as you exhale. I do this ten times a day, and I don't feel as anxious anymore. 
Just tried it, what the hell... It's like I'm not even controlling my own hand. 
Although, if you want to sort out the blocked sinus, try a neti pot with the right solution though. It's incredibly weird at first, but works like a charm. The second cure I will not comment on. 
Tricks your brain not your body. I like to think of it like this: humans now have constant sources of food and water, but this is only a recent occurrence. We are animals, and animals don't always know when the next meal is coming. So if there's food in front of you, eat it all and eat it as quickly as you can. You know that minute or so delay between when you stop eating and when you actually physically feel full? I like to think that's my brain going "shutup stomach, I'll say when we stop eating and we stop eating when all the food is gone!" 
Have you found a good source for this? On Amazon, every microclover/miniclover offering has a ton of reviews stating that there's nothing micro about it. Some photos show that it's a lot _larger_ than the clover that's naturally growing in my lawn. I've read about microclover and like the idea, but it seems like a lot of people are just selling clover seed. 
The male method is to push your "taint" area close enough to your anus to feel the poop that is trapped in your colon. By bearing down gently and pushing (gently!) on the poop you feel through your peri-anal area, you can also guide it out. Before I learned the vagina trick, I was doing the male version. The male version is actually my constipation go-to...but if that won't work it's time to take it further... 
I feel like I must be exercising wrong... I've never experienced anything like an "exercise high." I just feel tired, bored and sweaty no matter what I do. I keep doing it because I know it's healthy, but it never stops feeling like an unpleasant chore. Meanwhile my coworkers talk about running like it's cocaine and I don't understand at all. 
Haven't read this paper, but I'm inclined to think this is more for mechanical tinnitus, where a physical object like a blood vessel is causing the perception of unwanted sounds. Neurological tinnitus is probably unaffected by this. 
Ah, a remedy for the old, truly old, quip "No matter how you shake wiggle or dance, the last three drops go down your pants" Thanks friend. 
And then in a few minutes the other one is clogged, so repeat the process 
r/loseit calls it CICO or calories in, calories out. As long as you stay in a deficit, you will lose weight. I am 12lbs down in a little over a month using this method. The only exercise I get is walking 10,000 steps a day. 
Can I turn myself into a wacky, waving, inflatable, arm-flailing tube man? Because that's what I'm picturing. 
Yea and I heard that after certain point your body will no longer need food or water. You'll save a ton of money. 
"Well fuck you then, I thought throwing up would help but NOOOO mister rabies over here decided he was gonna spit out all that protective coating I made for him. What a jackass. Have it your way!" 
I have to go pee before I even fall asleep, making me wonder if I reset my falling asleep clock. 
I assumed your Roman numeral "X" meant ten hours before bed. 
Why didn't just one guy drink heaps of water. Then he can just make a big noise when he wakes up to wake the others. 
Whenever I'm feeling really overheated at home I wedge the biggest ice pack I can find right up in between my thighs. Works like a charm for cooling down your body temperature quickly. I always assumed it was because of those huge arteries in there. Not recommend for public places. 
Same. Like exactly the same spot, top of the ass crack. I thought I was the only one tbh 
This is why the anonymity of Reddit is important. If I knew a co-worker did this, I'd scratch their back at every inopportune moment. 
See, guys? The reason I crapped my pants when the snake showed up is that I'm Vietnamese! The reason I squealed is that I was scared. 
I have a routine of sorts that involves stretching out as much of my body in different ways as possible but it varies depending on what my body needs at the time. The weird thing is that even if i do a quick version (because I'm tired, sore and cbf) I still feel HEAPS better for it. 
I get them a lot and they usually last for a long time, up to even 30 minutes. You know what helps? Burping! Gather as much air in your throat as you can before it starts to sting, and burp. It goes away almost immediately after! Try it next time. :--) Now they never bother me anymore, such an easy fix. 
For gun enthusiasts, this is how peep sights (aperature sights) work, and is why bladed sights are an ancient relic. 
Has to be so small the hole is almost turning skin-coloured. 
A couple years ago when my dad went into cardiac arrest in our living room at home, once the paramedics arrived and tried to work on him, one of them pulled aside my sisters, who were understandably flipping the fuck out, and started asking them about what classes they were taking in school, what their majors were, etc. I mean my sisters were obviously still flipping out but it distracted them enough to keep them from having a total meltdown as well as physically kept them away from where they were working on my dad (no, he didn't make it). They were pissed at the time but understood later why the person did it. 
Well at least it seems like you don't have dementia. 
Whenever I lost concentration at the library whilst doing assessments I would walk around the building and come back feeling really refreshed. 
Yes, jock itch and athletes foot are fungal infections. I see you know that, but am reiterating for OP 
Just find the toilet by sonar i.e.: keep peeing until you hear water. 
It's a good cure! After the first few kicks, the entire class stopped having headaches! 
Biohack: don't wash your junk and you can still make her gag! 
This is a much more wholesome activity than I imagined using this technique for. 
Same. I would run a mile every weekday for 3 years and never got "used to it". Would always hurt my lungs and make me breathless. I had no idea exercise induced asthma was even a thing until long after I had stopped running. 
This gives me an idea. My eyes see colour differently, my left eye is always tinted slightly blue, I wonder if there would be a way to use this sort of thing to temporarily correct it. 
I can only imagine the first of humans (or whatever they were) slowly dying because they can't breathe through their noses... 
Haha, I did it too. "When... will I... be allowed... to breathe..." 
I'm not in the mood for vigorous exercise when I have the flu. 
It's amazing to me that people even get to this point. How do you go all day without drinking water?! 
On a serious note, my girlfriend can teach you... I've seen it... Many times. 
It's true, I have a set schedule each morning that includes a small cup of coffee after my workout. Nothing is more uncomfortable than when that schedule is interrupted and my morning poop is either inadequate or incomplete. That can ruin your whole day 
Fun story time. I was recovering from having septoplasty done and was driving into the Dr's office to get things checked out. Due to the surgery, I couldn't wear sunglasses and the bright sunlight made me sneeze. Blood. Blood everywhere. The inside of my truck looked like that scene from Pulp Fiction where they shoot Marvin in the car. 
"The hell is wrong with you, there's one **HIC!** there's one right there." 
My sister's trick is she has someone listen to her hiccups. They pay close attention and wait for the hiccups to come. But they never do. 
I do this, but when you restart beathing you have to do it as slowly as you can. 
I used to bend all the way over and drink upside down, which forces you to hold your breath anyway. 
I was having an anxiety attack coming on before I read this. I tried it and it helped. So thank you. 
Weird huh? It's a trick my dad taught me when I was a kid. He was a draftsmen before computers and everything was drawn on paper. 
Doesn't work for me either, I can draw a much straighter line normally. 
 My husband is the fastest drafter in his group. He could draft circles around a board drafter any day. No one draws by hand anymore. Sure they might sketch something real fast but the actual drawing is going to be in CAD. In no small part because if there are changes that need to be made it's way easier in CAD than on a board. And almost all technical drawings need multiple rounds of revisions. 
My only familiarity with netti pots is that story about that woman who got an amoeba in her sinus, and it ate her brain. 
I noticed this 10x what I normally see when I did training with the Marines. You're in the field, eating shitty MRE's and don't know when you'll have time to eat another. I found myself eating EVERYRHING no matter how gross it was. Sure, it was only a week, but I really did notice my mind telling me to eat everything cause I need it. I was even eating the fuckin m&ms they put in those even though I never normally eat candy. 
I bought the miniclover from Outside Pride. A few things about it: you do have to mow it to keep it in its dwarf growth habit, and it is not very heat tolerant. It did not persist when we tried growing it in a hot climate, but has here in the Pacific Northwest. 
Change your poop position, prop up your feet with a small bench thingy or similar, normal sitting tenses some tendon around the colon that prohibits pooping. What also helps me is stretching my arms as far as possible to the ceiling, somehow that relaxes or tenses the right parts of my body. Probably looks way stupid, but I never have "long sittings" anymore. 
I understand you, everybody seems to love it but for me exercise sucks. Where's the fun of getting tired running around or lifting heavy things when i could be doing something really fun? 
My friend used to be a semi-insomniac (never properly diagnosed but often had completely sleepless nights) and after developing a proper workout routine it helped immensely. Working out for 20/30 minutes each day will help you, but even if it doesn't cure your insomnia it has immense benefits in other areas! Everyone owes it to themselves to work out regularly. or bud 
I just throw my empty guns on the ground and pull out two other guns. Works so much faster than reloading. 
When a knife is not available you may have to resort to unarmed combat 
I thought you were about to make the ludicrous claim that you can grow a cinnamon tree out of a bunch of cinnamon powder and was already in mild pre-outrage. I feel very stupid. 
It might give you a few minutes to fall asleep. Works for me anyway. 
Yeah it's actually 10,000 IU (international units), not grams. Or around 0,25 mg. 
That's still more exercise than most people get. Good job on the weight loss. 
If you're like me and have 0 discipline (or eat stuff without even being aware of it), just don't buy the stuff in the first place, no matter how much you think you can control yourself, it's just not that easy getting rid of bad habits. It's way, way easier to control myself in the 30 minutes I spend at my local supermarket than it is during the rest of the week when I am at home, bored and have plenty of junk food within my reach. 
Came here to say this. In addition, many of them are sedative. That said, they are great for treating allergies :) 
Rabies affects the brain... It'd probably be a good idea not to throw up your brain - this kills the human. 
Well some of us don't have dainty vomit sessions. Some people have to involve their entire body, and in the process let out a pained moan after every hurl. And when the puke runs out, you begin to dry-heave, which is arguably even worse. 
Same. If I don't pee before going to bed, I'm guaranteed to toss and turn for hours until I finally relieve myself. 
Why didn't one guy just stay up, and wake everyone up at the exact right time? 
Is this the same as cracking ur sternum? I do that daily but it never hurts 
This right here. Works every time, and is a lot less painful than doing some breathing exercise. 
For physicists: doing this with a small ray of light through creates a diffraction pattern, and is evidence that light has wave properties. 
Before I got glasses I used to do that in school to read the board. 
Sorry about your dad. I'm a removal driver for a funeral home and I can honestly say that losing a loved one out of the blue like that is the absolute worst. You have my sincerest condolences. 
Or that friend that says you can cool your mouth with a Listerine breath strip after eating some really spicy food. 
If you're suffering from migraines you're going to try almost anything to at least alleviate them, no matter how stupid or nonsensical it seems :/ 
I'm a Postman. I walk 8-9 miles a day 6 days a week, why am I not a genius yet? 
Yeah, I thought that was the case but didn't bother looking it up. If the medications OP used weren't specifically for fungal infections, then they wouldn't do much good and could even make it worse, but if vinegar works, then by all means stick with that. These things are also good to know if you're female, as the bacterial/fungal balance in the vagina is pretty delicate and can get messed up by using soap or antibiotics. The bacteria is needed to keep the fungus in check so it doesn't cause an infection, but bacterial overgrowth can also happen and it has pretty much the exact same symptoms as yeast infection. TL;DR: Some skin issues are fungal, ask your doctor or pharmacist before using any antibiotic creams as it can make a fungal infection worse. 
Yea it was a great one. If you like Hugh Laurie check out the Night Manager. He's great in that too. 
Also if they complained of leg pain, they'd get a shin to the head. Great teacher. Awesome teacher. Today, not so much. You know it. I know it. 
I stumbled apon this about three months ago. 30 minutes of the experiment for each eye for each color, 2 hours total (just because curiosity), and I had totally forgot about it until I saw this post just now. So I checked, and yup, still has a slight effect, but mostly just the red, not so much the green. Highly recommend you try it, but only if it's in the name of science. It's not permanent. 
I believe the term "mouth breather" exists for this reason... 
Read in the voice of the wheelchair kid from Malcom in the middle 
Honestly, when I get the chills nothing helps clear it quicker than running till I feel like I'm going to die. Within about a half hour, it swings the other way completely and I feel like I was healed by Jesus' less successful twin brother, Jebus. 
For some reason I read that in Rick Sanchez's voice. 
My mom said she would give me a dollar if I could hiccup again. She could tell if I was faking. I haven't had hiccups since then and that was probably 35 years ago. 
Also you DO have to restart breathing. I didn't do that step and died 
I consider this the nuclear option for huccup removal. 
I took a drafting class in high school, and it was half CAD and half hand drawn drafting. Completing a draft by hand like that is a serious sense of accomplishment and pride 
I would suggest finding a form of exercise that is fun. Running and lifting are common but if they don't do it for ya then try something else. Rock climb, road/mtn bike, swim, hike, etc. It made a world of difference for me when I found an activity that I wanted to do every day. 
Several people I know with insomnia worked in an office setting. Once they started walking a few miles a day, they started being able to sleep. Like, it sounds like a duh, but if you expel practically no energy the entire day, you're going to have some during the night time. 
#eeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee 
GO GO GO! HIT THE TARGETS! FLASHBANG THROUGH THE DOOR! HIT THE TARGETS! SPRINT TO THE FINISH! Not bad but I've seen better. 
Look at this guy, falling asleep without crippling guilt keeping him awake for hours 
Rabies makes people spit their saliva out because they become hydrophobic so the brain is calling him mr rabies because he's spitting up his saliva just like rabies patients. 
I wonder what causes this? Some people puke and go on about their day like it's nothing. If I puke it becomes a day ending trauma as described above. 
I have to pee before going to bed, and then, in order to fall asleep, I have to wait and get up, and pee again. I then go back to bed, and then I can finally sleep. 
For me, it feels as if a rib is poking me in the lung. Like the part of the rib where it should be connected to the sternum. 
For fishermen: using the eyes on the rod allows even stress along the rod length, and prevents pinching in the line. This helps fighting fish. 
Well at least it seems like you don't have dementia. 
Adam "*in a rough pirate like voice*LET'S PILLAGE!!! *goes inside pitch black room, uses normal voice* Oh shit! I can't see a damn thing" 
Oh no you just created an infinite loop of kicks to the head and shins. 
I know this is a joke but this is actually how I am. I dont throw up but I get bad breath easily so I'm always brushing my tongue and end up gagging and spitting like a retard 
Indeed, I am from the future. Fidget spinners are still popular here. 
Really? For me, the day after a workout I'm always sore as fuck and can't even be productive. 
I've had both depending on what's going on. Abdominal migraines I had when I was a kid used to go away instantly once I threw up, to the point that I'd spend all day waiting and trying to. Too much alcohol works somewhat the same way, but when I get food poisoning I usually end up dry heaving and continuing to feel terrible. 
But not just any kitchen sink *signed* Banned from Cracker Barrel 
He my not be my partner be he sure is my right hand man. 
I like you. What do you think of me? I'm gonna hurt you. 
That's like the third banana story that I've read in this comments section. TIL that bananas hold some special status across all human cultures. 
I don't know about pens or paper, but there is only one kind of pencil and that is Ticonderoga #2. 
It's not wasted. I just don't like my peas touching my carrots 
Yeah you're dead on with that one! I visited last year, and there were lots of strange things, but one especially is that the guides would talk about the buildings in Pyongyang, saying things like "This is the wonder of modern architecture that I'm sure all of you know, as it is world famous for having been built in just 2 years!" or "This amazing feat is admired by countries around the world, as you all already know" when talking about something literally no-one's heard of, and wasn't very impressive. 
Ah that story comes from Barbara Demick's book about North Korea 'Nothing to Envy' where she tells the story of a few defectors from a poor region of North Korea. If you haven't read it already, I highly recommend it 
Imagine having praised someone like a god for your entire life, and then you see all the memes. ded 
In the video on top of this thread it was mentioned that not only grandparents, parents, siblings and children would get punished but also distant relatives, i assume cousins.. 
Heck, in America, insulting the President is downright *tradition*. 
This is what I think when I hear South Koreans are sending over messages via balloons. Some of the recipients will turn the message over to an authority or toss it out. 
There is actually an account of a North Korean refugee who decided to leave partly due to a pen. It's included in the book "Nothing to Envy" by Barbara Demick. They had seen a negative news report in North Korea about the US, showing a US protester as if to say "look at all the problems America has currently". However it had the opposite effect. The person noticed that the protester in the picture, who didn't seem to be anyone of high standing, had a biro pen in their pocket and a zip on their coat, both of which were considered luxuries, and so realised that if an average protester could own these, then the claim that the West was worse off must have been untrue. Highly recommend the book for anyone interested in the subject. 
Mate, a picture of Dear Leader is in every house of North Korea and he's not exactly thin. 
A lot of propaganda is smuggled in on memory sticks, so they're not completely technologically deprived. A lot of modern tech is small enough to be easily smuggled and hidden. 
Or that Kim Jong Il was not actually the greatest golfer ever. 
There's so much black market information though that I highly doubt many people buy into that stuff. There'll be a few smaller things left, maybe, but I highly doubt the supernatural parts are all that serious. 
We'll meet again in the place where there is no darkness. 
Hopefully you didn't use Zebra for Z, How would they ever learn of a zebra. I guess you could bring them to a zoo... But then they would be more confused. Let's just hope you never got to Z. 
It's hard to help a country when helping it means potential nuclear war and a guaranteed artillery barge at South Korea. 
They might be surprised by just *how* true all those notions and stories are. I'm sure stories and rumours (and pirated content, common sense, etc) *abound* about how other countries have lots of food. Those stories are pretty standard when food gets scarce even when there *isn't* literally a land of milk and honey next door. But the reality that eating too much is a norm and that people go to huge efforts to eat less? That food is a minor expense for a lot of people and tons of it are discarded, perfectly edible? That in an ordinary city, even a town, you can get nearly anything to eat, from any part of the world, nearly any time of day or year? With food, at least, it would be hard for even the most fanciful imaginings to overshoot reality. 
It took a Cuban friend of mine about 30 minutes of watching TV to be thoroughly fed up of ads - and this was in the UK, where there are far fewer than in the US. 
Fucking Soju man, that shit will make a rock talk. 
Yeah I remember when i went to Korea there was an ambulance. My dad didn't pull over and I asked him why they cars don't pull over for emergency vehicles like in America he just said you can't. 
I think it's hard to gauge just what the typical North Korean thinks or feels about their regime. It's possible many of them have dissenting opinions or may not believe the propaganda but they can't ever tell their friends or family that they have dissenting opinions because everyone is supposed to turn in dissenters. The decision to defect also has a lot to do with personal safety. If you are starving to death then you will try to leave regardless of what you have been told. When leaving most North Koreans also go to China since the DMZ is way to secured to try to escape through. 
and i'm just sitting here being allergic to bananas 
You have reminded me of how my neighbor was a complete badass and escaped to the west alone at age 13 
The peas are green you see, and the carrots are orange - they cannot touch! 
I'm assuming the guides are given a script and forced to say such things? Or did they take questions? Did you ask any? I'm very curious! 
That was right. She couldn't understand why such a huge bowl of amazing food was on the floor, then the dog appeared. It blew her mind that Chinese dogs ate better than North Korean school teachers. 
Actually, it would be just the opposite, imagine the rest of the world laughing at your oppressor as to how weak he is, and not doing anything about it. While, we understand how complicated the situation is, they might not be able to grasp it because his meme portrayal. 
"So you guys didn't help at all?" "Nah but we made a really funny movie about killing your leader." 
In the interview they say he was tied to a scaffold, the whole town (including his wife and sister) were forced to watch, and four soldiers shot him with full auto bursts working from his head down until his body was deformed enough that they could pick him up and put him in a rice bag. 
That entire movie was James Franco's demo reel to be the Joker for Suicide Squad, and he would have crushed it. 
It was *many* Soviet officials, I personally know someone who participated in a technology exchange program, and took his Soviet counterpart to a grocery store to pick up a few things for dinner. The Russian assumed it was the rich capitalist's store, so they went to another one a mile away that was nicer. My friend said the man was crushed, his entire society was a lie. One of the "history porn" subreddits recently featured an official photo of one of the best markets of Soviet Moscow. The architecture was stunning, there was abundant produce, and when you looked more closely it was all cabbage, turnips, and potatoes. There was a decent amount of fresh beef, but the finest market in Moscow had less than your local Wal-Mart. The ratio of meat to cabbage was certainly far less than we capitalists prefer. 
Back when my grandfather's sisters came to visit Canada for the first time from the USSR they absolutely broke down in tears in the produce section of the grocery store. They could never have imagined such variety of produce. They also never knew bananas were supposed to be yellow. They hated those mushy black fruits. 
It's the one thing we post-commie kids from all countries can discuss as a group: 'where were you when you saw your first grocery store?' As for me, my dad thought that we must be in some kind of drug front or something was 'off' so we hustled into another one...another one... we shopped at tiny bodegas for a year, with their smaller choice of products. The shoe fell when we saw a homeless man buying bread with change. The fact that a decent shop allowed him to purchase bread next to all the wall street executives- ??? The first few months were like living inside a surreal stage play. 
It's your patriotic duty to be displeased with the government. Shoot I switch parties every time we get a new prez, otherwise it just isn't fun 
Brisket is the king of BBQ. Never understood why the southeast states favor pulled pork so much. I mean I like a good pulled pork sandwich, but it's not in the same league as brisket. 
They might be surprised to see the history but it's probably wouldn't be that big a thing for them. No soviet union now russia just annexes somewhere every now and again. 
She just seems to "get it" when it comes to barbecue. I bet a lot of purists would love her. 
*Police Baby*, coming to theaters summer 2018. "Somebody needs a diaper change!" 
I watched a documentary about Lithuania's basketball team at the 92' Olympics, after the tournament, one of the players was signed to an NBA team. His new teammates took him to the grocery store, he took one look at the vegetable aisle and burst into tears. These guys had been on the soviet national team, so they'd had it easier than most too. 
I was friends in HS with a Soviet guy who got out. He said the stores were amazing. Soviets had stores, but the shelves were always empty. Their family used to go to the grocery store all together, and wander the aisles for entertainment. 
There was a similar effect of showing american movies of poor people, like Tobacco Road. But they noticed that the poor people still had trucks and stuff. 
but i wonder if that creates some sort of an association where chubby = high diplomatic power, imagine seeing a handful of folks just walking down the street 
Yeah, the biggest shock might actually be how much people underestimate how much North Korean people know, the shock will belong to people like the OP. 
Not only *can* you *eat yourself to death*, you have to *actively avoid* doing so. 
My family hosted a man from Cuba who was working for my dad over the summer. The first time he went to a supermarket he burst into tears as well. Later on, he was describing it to his wife over Skype, and said that they had a whole aisle of beef. Beef is an ultra-luxury in Cuba, it's usually only available on the black market once a year for a couple of weeks, and everyone races to buy as much as they can. So his wife's first response was "oh my god, go down and get as much as you can! Right now, what are you waiting for?!" He had to explain to her that "No, there's an aisle of beef *every day.*" 
I bet they would love to go to a zoo, though. Man, I just wanna bring a bunch of North Koreans to the zoo now, and watch them have their minds blown. 
Plus a huge amount of people is brainwashed and would resist. There's more than a million people in NK's army. In a country with a little more than 20 million people. And many more would get drafted it war broke out. So even if an invasion could be done without significant casualties on the side of the invaders it would still involve the death of countless North Koreans. Probably millions. It's basically the equivalent of trying to help a mentally deranged but armed guy. Staying at a distance and hoping that he calms himself is probably safest for everyone involved. 
As a Brit who visited Canada a few years ago, as soon as I watched Canadian TV for the first time the difference was astounding, over here the only ads seen during sports games are the advertising boards and when it's the end of a half but they have it all the way through, coming up from the bottom of the screen and being attached to the score/time display 
It's a serious issue. Used to work EMS in Seoul, and on several occasions it took well over an hour and a half to make it to the hospital with rather severe patients. 
Maybe it's different in China, well actually I know it is, but in Vietnam you're an asshole if you don't obey the rules, it's just that everyone is an asshole. Don't excuse that behavior. Eventually they will need to modernize and stop treating the road like a mosh-pit. Japan seems to manage quite well, despite being Asian and having the most mega of mega-cities in the world. 
You can live vicariously through my 1 year old. She eats like 2-3 a day. 
Actually, they did this with Coca Cola and Hershey's in Berlin during that time period. 
the escape stories are so awesome. everyday people that did some amazing things. one build a freaking plane with two moped motors, so small it fit in a van (because it had to). One family build a hot air balloon out of singe long cloth stripes, because buying a lot at once would have been too noticable. they had luck the searchlight broke down that night so they made it. 
Hello! I'm really not sure on this one. It felt very heartfelt, and said in a really straight forward tone, so I think they've been told that and do believe it. But this is the government appointed handlers...so they're presumably not very representative of the normal North Korean. In terms of taking/asking questions - yep you could ask anything, except I suppose personal/disrespectful things about the great leaders/government, or about the military. I was chatting with one of the guides with us and had no clue what to say...I mean what do you ask a North Korean government handler?? So I asked if he enjoyed his job...and was a bit surprised when he replied with: "I try to! But I studied at Pyongyang University to be a geologist, which is my real dream. My parents thought that this would be a useful job, so that's why I'm here". It took me off-balance because he seemed really candid 
"As you know" every foreigner in South Korea has heard this phrase enough to agree with you. 
It's interesting how we view him as a petulant child stamping his feet, and yet, he's still responsible for the deaths of thousands. 
"But my entire family was in a death camp for 3 generations." "Haha yeah Seth Rogan is so funny" "You could see the death camps on google maps!" "Yeah lol his laugh is so funny" 
They must have spent at least twice as much killing him as the rope cost. Smh. 
Weird to think that this shit is happening somewhere in the world in 2017. 
Step 1: Steal rope in 1 inch sections. Step 2: ? Step 3: Profit 
He also supposedly fell in love with corn products, in particularly corn flakes. 
It's always the little things. I remember a Vice video where they showed the inside of a home belonging to a privileged family living in Pyongyang. They were supposed to be the poster family for how prosperous and successful people could be in North Korea and I couldn't help but notice how fucked up the floor was. It had this laminate shit that sort of curled up at the edges as if the person who laid it down couldn't be bothered to cut the excess off and glue it down. Just something tiny. And that was the best they had to offer and they had floors you wouldn't even see in a ghetto Section-8 house. 
Wow, I would love to hear more of this story. I really cant imagine feeling that way. 
Pork is more consistent. Good, fresh brisket beats good pork bbq. Bad brisket or good brisket that isn't fresh isn't nearly as good as pork bbq. 
I have experienced this with my daughter. Sometimes when she has a need at night she will not come get me even when I remind her that my door is ALWAYS open and she is more important to me than sleep. It took a while for her to begin to trust me, that I was going to do what I said I was going to do, and I wasn't just tricking her like some sick joke or something. I am definitely certain that these types of things happen with kids of all ages, not just older children. Even young children get conditioned easily to do as they're told and not to have an opinion or a want or a need. It really makes me think about how grateful I am that I live where I have the freedom to be myself. Many many people around the world do not have that. 
"I'm getting to old for this shit (in my police diaper)" 
Can you explain this a little more? Why are they dressed as cops? Also, isn't that very illegal? 
The one I remember the most, happened in front of me when I was a child so I don't have all details. A friend of my sister (about a decade older than me) had a cuban friend visiting our country, Guatemala, and his breaking point reached him in an ice cream shop. He said the only ice cream they had available was either vanilla or strawberry (I think), in very small cups and not exactly frequently and now here the menu took the space of a wall, with a myriad of options and with serving sizes going up to almost the size of your head. I was maybe 10 at the time and I remember that was the point when I started wondering 'hmm, whats up with Cuba?' 
I've always heard that, after the fall of the Berlin Wall, the one thing East Berliners wanted was bananas. They couldn't get enough, and people poured through the holes in the wall to go buy more. 
Not true... The entire official economy has been supplanted by ad hoc barter and dollar economies. Yes... dollars. 
That's still common here in America. Especially among rural youths. People playing hide-and-seek in Wal*Mart, for example. 
I remember hearing a story once of someone in a dictatorship watching the Grapes of Wrath and being jealous of the truck they used to escape the dust bowl. 
I believe that Stalin banned "The Grapes of Wrath" when it was published because it showed that even the poorest of Americans had cars and trucks. 
Kinda. He saw pigeons on the streets and they weren't afraid of people. 
Yes. I spent New Year in North Korea. One of my guides literally could not get enough of my football magazines - its one of the few things they can keep without any repercussions. They also asked relentlessly to see pictures of where we lived, what we ate etc etc 
So what you're saying is North Korea is when I play Civ and build all my good shit in my capital, and let my other cities rot. 
i eat them anyways. i was embarrassingly old when i fpund out bananas don't make everyone's throat itch. 
Oh man, I got a book in the East Germany museum in Berlin about that topic, Fascination Freedom. The stories are insane. One guy turned an old school bus into an armored tank and smashed through the border checkpoint while being fired upon by guards. Two other guys windsurfed to Denmark in Autumn storms with out any open water experience. One guy stole an agriculture airplane's manual and learned how to fly (but not to land!) it and just stole one of these things. One guy hijacked a train, another one a steamer to break through border guards. Tunnels below the border, crossbows across streets, self-made airplanes... the stories are an amazing testament to the human spirit. Fascinating stuff. 
His response to you is fascinating to me! Like maybe when North Korea falls that these people could properly adjust to the rest of the world? However like you said, these are government folks and educated ones at that--probably not representative of the typical North Korean. :/ 
Korean-American here with maybe an insight into this phrase - I heard it a lot amongst the polite chat, but not the familiar talking with family and friends. I think it's part of the idea of politeness or saving face - they tell you something, then imply that of course you already knew that - they in no way meant to infer you are less informed or educated than themselves! There also seems to be a translation error with the word "famous" - my mom and her friends would use the English phrase "it's most famous restaurant in Seoul" or something when they meant "highly rated" or "exclusive". So it ends up sounding like they think everyone knows about it, rather than it's highly regarded. 
And scary enough that we haven't intervened not because of apathy but because of fear. Not fear that he would win, mind, but fear of the damage he could cause on his way down. 
We'd have been happy to do the same thing with Hitler indefinitely; it was only when he invaded Poland we said "fuck THAT". Not to mention, it's generally considered bad manners on the world stage to oust a leader simply because we don't like their policies or how they treat their own people. More-or-less anything short of outright genocide is generally tolerated simply because it becomes very difficult to be some sort of international democracy police and still get along politically with everyone else. 
But think about how much they saved on rope-theft in the long run. These guys play the long game.. 
I dont know why people think that things lie these are weird in 2017, cultural evolution doesnt work like that , humans are constantly going back and forth in what they do and believe is ok to do. we adapt with our current environment, maybe in the future eating babies will be the fashion. 
The main problem with this is that it's hard to put the rope back together after you've stolen it. 
They're married now and have three little corn-babies to take care of. 
"This is a palace! How in... How in the world can you afford to live in a house like this, Simpson??? ... look at the size of this place! I... I live in a single room above a bowling alley and below another bowling alley." 
Imagine having to stand in a line of hundreds of people with ration cards that allowed you to buy an allotted amount of meat, toilet paper, milk, sugar etc. The black market was thriving because you simply couldn't buy things in stores. My parents were university professors but ran a side hustle of running goods into the country from Levi's jeans to video tapes. Sometimes these hauls were more than each made in a year at their job. This was in the mid to late 80s. Western goods were a rarity for the most part and only those with money could own something as basic as a VHS player. When the first big chain grocery stores from western Europe started opening up in the 90s it was like jumping 20-30 years into the future in terms of consumer availability. Nowadays these areas have been completely transformed and some of the cultural uniqueness is gone. 
I'm sure most of them didn't make the conscience decision to have a kid there, knowing what kind of life they would have. They sure as hell aren't passing around condoms in those camps, but people are still going to have sex, and I don't blame them for going after the once source of comfort they have left with a loved one. Sad all around. 
This might sound creepy, but completely intend for it to be out of curiosity and interest: I would love to hear more stories about your daughter adjusting to her new life. Has school entered the picture? Pets? Extended family and friends visiting? 
That's really really tough to read man. Hope you have the strength to endure it, hope it goes as best as possible. 
My wife tells me stories of some of her older family members who defected. One story specifically that her uncle cried like a baby the first time he went to a mall. 
Ya but that was a Randall's. Imagine if he went to HEB instead. He'd have had a heart attack. 
As anyone who ever cashiered in a grocery store: the first produce code you learn is 4011. Bananas. Easily the highest selling produce item in a grocery store. Seeing how much it is sold and how rarely it is sold out, it is baffling that a country wouldn't have any... 
So you are saying that North Koreans use American dollars in their pseudo economy? 
Soviets in general. Even being a scientist you were lucky to have a car. Most people didn't. 
Actually it was a bit more similar to the Dallas situation. It was the only American movie they were allowed to show so as to show the horrors of poverty in American life, but instead Soviet citizens were just shocked that everyone had cars. 
My inlaws are from a very poor SE Asian country, but are middle class/lower upper class. My husband and I are upper middle the US. It is fascinating the things that are "luxuries" for each of us. We eat meat at nearly every meal, we have a good size yard, our roads are paved and smooth, a monthly plan for cell service (not even an option there) and the shops we go to are clean and well stocked. They are so impressed by these things. We travel to their country, their every day things that we consider luxuries: household employees (maids, cooks, drivers, nannies), custom made clothing (off the rack is very rare), access to luxury resorts (similar to a country club) for a reasonable daily fee, incredibly nice hotels for inexpensive prices (the nicest hotel I ever stayed in anywhere in the world was $90 a night). These visits make each of grateful for what we have. 
I remember reading in Gulag Archipelago how the inmates would send letters to Comrade Stalin telling him about the miscarriage of justice they'd been subjected to. Of course it was Stalin himself who likely instigated their arrest in the first place by demanding a certain number of arrests, regardless of who it was. If only Comrade Stalin knew... 
And you still keep an iron grip on production, yeah. 
Yeah I agree! There were lots of interesting things that happened on that trip, but his reply really stuck out to me. I think because it was so human, and relatable. I didn't think the trip would change my opinion on NK at all, but his comment is probably a big part of why my feelings changed...because I think it's really easy to kind of dehumanise them, but they're just normal people. 
There is also the part where whatever parties involved now get the pleasure of attempting to establish some form of government and re-educate whatever portion of the 24 million people that have been brainwashed so utterly that don't get killed by the conflict. All of that on a chunk of land that has limited economic value aside from its outdated energy source (coal) and being a land barrier between South Korea and China. For a situation where the combatant plays a game of chicken with Russia and China, there is very little reward, a whole lot of risk, and an immense amount of long-term costs. 
I heard similar stories but in Holland during Nazi occupation. My ex's grandmother had to go to insane lengths with her brother to keep their family alive. 
And if you did, they could use that to hang you... damnit, it's tricky to steal rope in North Korea :( 
 something like this reminds me how truely lucky I am. 
I watched an interview of one of the defectors who escaped from one of the camps. He claimed that his parents, who were both sentenced to have three generations punished, were forcibly "married" inside the camp so they could have children. He apparently escaped the camp by his friend being electrocuted on the electric fence and him climbing over the friend's body. Says something about what little he learned of empathy by growing up in a North Korean concentration camp under a pointless punishment system that only drains the economy and hurts people while having no good impact on society at all. I mean, this "three-generation-punishment" system sounds unreal, like it was devised by a disturbed child. 
Thanks. When dealing with Alzheimers, every little while one has to reset the "new normal" to what is normal. We're doing fine, for a given definition of fine. 
Awhile back, a trailer for Boss Baby was on before a movie some friends and I went to. My friends and I were exchanging, "are they serious with this?" glances when a guy started laughing his head off at every 'joke' in the trailer. I don't need to meet that guy to know we likely won't get along. 
Baby legs here we go! Blbllblooooohhh that's the noise I make when I run 
I often cry like a baby when I got to a mall. But it's not because I'm happy to be there. Takes all kinds. 
I'm always baffled when I hear about these things because I live in a tropical place so bananas, mangoes and the like are extremely common. People tell stories about banana scarcity and it's surreal because here they literally rot on the floor if someone doesn't pick it up. then again, I've never had real berries of any kind, so... 
Not only did he marry a child, but he also knew that a woman in that tribe is vulnerable without her husband around, and he left her alone for months. So she gets gang-raped by 20-30 men, which he *knew* was a likely possibility that only he could prevent, but when it's brought up, he's just like, "oh yeah, that". 
I'd imagine that everyone there is guilty of crimes and it only comes up when it's politically beneficial for someone else. 
I dont know if they are making the newer style bills or just the older ones, but they are near identical to the real things 
Yeah I heard that they showed that movie in the USSR as to show the shortcomings of capitalism. Russian people noticed that even in such poverty, American people had cars and stuff. 
Labor is cheap in developing nations, that's why reasonably wealthy people can afford servants and fancy resorts. This was similar during the industrial revolution in Europe and even well into the first half of the 20th century. My grandmother worked as a maid for a lower upper class family, they owned a small factory, in the '30s. 
There is a Canadian show, not sure if it's available in the US or anywhere else, called **Departures**. The 3 guys travel all over the world, checking out weird and under-traveled places. Their episodes in NK were just incredible to me. They befriended their guides, a really shy, sweet young woman and a goofy guy who loved singing. They had such a good time with these government-appointed guides. They even took a river cruise when the guides were off duty and got drunk together. It was all so genuine. I loved it. I've never been to NK and I'm sure I never will, but that show completely shook up my perception of the people there. 
This is the big thing. China could EASILY take out North Korea, but they would lose their buffer between them and the Western realm (South Korea), and they would have to deal with millions of uneducated, unemployed people flooding into their country. They don't want that. South Korea is even starting to wane on its enthusiasm to reunite due to the enormous work it would be and the toll it would take on their economy. 
It's really amazing how 2 people living in the same place can have such unique perspectives on life in ways someone born in the United States could never understand. Not sure what the point of this comment is other than to say that I am so fortunate and lucky that I was born on this patch of dirt and didn't have to experience such terrible and dismal things growing up like the vast majority of the rest of the World 
I understand the sentiment, but I'd challenge you not to think that way. You and I, living in relative safety, are not lucky; the North Korean people are having their rights trampled day in and day out. We aren't *lucky* to not be denied our human rights--they're human rights, they're ours; we aren't lucky to get something we inherently possess. The problem with thinking we're lucky is that it establishes those human rights abuses as "the norm", ~~to~~ from which we are (by "luck") excepted. That's not right: the right to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness, as well as any other human rights, are the baseline that everyone should have; in terms of human rights, we aren't rich, we're middle class. And the North Koreans are miles below the poverty line. ...Did I make any sense there? 
What a lucky little girl! She has the best parent in the whole world. You two are gonna be companions for life, that's so amazing. Good luck to you and her and I hope you guys do as awesome as you've been doing so far :) 
I spend most of my time now as an adult alone because it's so nice not to have any expectations of me. To be able to sit in a room and know that no one is going to barge in and start slapping you or kicking you for whatever made up reason convinced themselves you deserve it. I live with a married couple now and sometimes I still get what I call tension flashbacks, where my jaw will tighten like I'm expecting to be hit. Usually it happens after someone makes a loud noise or something that startles me. If you ever want someone to talk to about the things you went through, feel free to message me. My mother hid her abuse from everyone but the immediate family, so I had no support in Arkansas from the people who said they were my friends because they didn't believe my mother was abusive. She never showed that side around them. 
If it makes you feel any better, bananas ARE berries. 
Old ones, the new hundreds came out just recently and have a bunch of anti-counterfeiting tech. 
Not to mention the vast amounts of uninhabited land. Sure, you can't precisely grow sunflowers in most of the territory, but there must be *something* that can turn into farming revenue. Worst case scenario, solar and windmill fields to produce electricity. Add tourism and you've got yourself a flourishing economy. 
Trebuchets can launch 90 kg objects *AT LEAST* 300 meters. Come on 
What shook my perception was watching a video on YouTube from two people who escaped. They said life in North Korea was more simple. People were happier! Can you believe that? They said in North Korea they have their problems, but generally everyone talks and laughs and just makes the most of what they have and are appreciative. They said they feel bad for us in first world countries because we complicate everything. We're not happy and we're always on the move looking for our next accomplishment. 
That sucks when your country is so shit no one even wants you anymore. Not only do they not want to invade you, they don't even want you for free. 
I'd rather have the possibility to leaving the region than being shot in the moment. 
This is a brand new way of thinking about this to me! Thank you! 
You saw your chance, you fucking saw the shit out of it. 
That's surprising to me. Beer and bread totally make sense. But bananas? I knew people liked them, but not **that** much. 
Russia benefits from climate change like no other country on Earth. If they are forward thinking (doubtful), they can do very well this century. With the thawing of the permafrost opening up arable land as well as making construction easier, they will have more effective space. With the shrinking of the polar ice cap (North) they have the largest amount of coastline, there is a shit ton of oil down there. It also opens up very efficient trade routes. Very little of their population will be affected by rising sea levels. 
This is why paper newspapers should stay around. It's difficult to convey the full effect with a tablet. 
They were doing karaoke in our hotel bar, and I had learnt an NK song, so we sung it. I was also very very drunk, which helps in these situations E: should have just answered 'because my life is dope, and I do dope shit'. Fucked it 
I heard similar sentiment in a documentary about bushmen going on a trip to Europe. Their opinion was that we are crazy and we work too much. 
Well it's not for 'free' by a long shot. Kim Jong Un isn't offering anyone his country, and taking it would be costly cause we can be almost certain that'd he'd attempt to nuke the surrounding countries. 
Yeah of course, it's just that there's literally no incentive to do so. Better to keep the status quo 
They're popular, and pretty cheap compared to most other fruits. Even organic bananas are usually cheaper per pound than non-organic apples, oranges, pears, or plums. They're also easier to eat; no napkins necessary for banana fans older than 4 years old. 
I'm 100% certain velociraptors still exist and they just pretend to be these assholes when they lose their teeth. 
There's a teaching zoo near where I live, and a few years back they had to evacuate due to a wildfire. Afterwards the local paper did a piece on it and interviewed the people who had to evacuate the animals. They have lions, water buffalo, cougars, hyenas, all kinds of large animals. Which was the hardest to evacuate? The Galapagos tortoise. He is enormous, bad-tempered, and much more difficult to train than most of the other animals. Getting him out of his enclosure and onto a truck was apparently quite the challenge, especially given the short timeframe they had for evacuation. 
Aww what a nice lil guy. He just thinks you're a massive, stupid, flightless kookaburra who can't find food on your own! 
Corvids in general are smart fuckers. I had a crow (raven? Fuck knows I'm not whatever you call a bird specialist) that hung about our garden. Barbecues were a fucking nightmare, anything shiny left unsupervised was almost 100% guaranteed not to be there within 30 seconds. We eventually found out where he was stashing it and it was like a treasure trove of stuff from all over the neighborhood. Apart from that he was a chill dude. Used to come and sit next to me when I went out back to smoke. Although in hind sight I'm thinking he may have just been trying to steal my lighter. 
I've been behind-the-scenes at a zoo once in my life. It was while they were feeding the monkeys/primates/whatever the proper term is. An orangutan with a mouthful of fruit looked at me, sighted in, and launched a golf ball sized wad of spit and chewed fruit at me. Hit me straight on the mouth. As gross as it was, it was a hell of a shot. 
Many zoos allow their peacocks to wander freely. I'm not sure why, but I've see it at multiple zoos in the last few years. 
Swans are evil, but have design issues, specifically if you grab them behind the head, and pull them towards you, you can then hold them down by the wings, and fold their wings down, and then they're basically fucked, and they know it. Depending on the swan you can carry them around under your arm, while the swan evinces 'I have made a terrible mistake' body language. Search for it on youtube if you want to see what I mean, but don't just do this for fun, only if they're being assholes. 
Chester Zoo has the best bat enclosure I've ever seen. I was with a co-worker who knew a keeper there so we got to go back at feeding time. I watched a banana disappear before my very eyes, didn't even see the bats in the dark. 
Chimps are sadists. I've heard of them catching squirrels and then rip off each limb. 
Parrots will try this as well. I've got three parrots and my cockatoo is a bit of an ass sometimes. I stopped letting him hang out with me when I'm at my desk because he'll occasionally try to mount my mouse hand. I do not approve -_-. He tries to be suave about it sometimes too. Still *prefer him directing his sexual frustrations elsewhere *. 
Probably not even exaggeration with "Deafeningly loud". When the lion at our zoo (Henry Doorly Zoo) really wants to roar, can pretty much hear him from anywhere in the zoo grounds. 
Sounds about right, never underestimate a giant murder turkey. 
I went on a school field trip to the zoo in elementary school and a hippo shit in my general direction. The memory of the massive amount of shit flying everywhere still haunts me to this day. 
I assume anxiety since he wasn't accustomed to so many people? 
I would bet that iguana was a rescue from someone who Died/moved. Giant green iguana will create a relationship with their first owner and fucking HATE everyone else on the planet till the day that Godzilla wannabe dies. Good friend of mine had one it loved him however, it could tell the difference between him and his twin brother without a second look and it fucking hated his brother more then anything else. 
Just start howling and all the Timberwolves will have to stop what they're doing and howl too. I know it works because I saw it in some nature documentary about a city full of animals 
Does that really happen? Females growing out manes 
That sucks. One of the many reasons i gave up my salt water tank was shit like this. The final straw was a hitchhiking sea slug. He came in tiny on some nice live rock, took me about 3 months to even notice him, and he was amazingly colorful. Just beautiful. He/she wasn't much bigger than a mini carrot lol. Then for whatever reason he died. i had a 240 gallon tank so it was hard to keep track of everything. I bet you know the end of this story tho... that sea slug died and released toxic neuro poison that killed every living thing in my tank. Easily lost $5k of fish and polys. At the time i was selling them to support my hobby. Alas, even the copepods were dead. Now days i keep African Cichlids. Fuck Sea slugs or cucumbers or whatever you want to call them. 
A few years ago I was at the SA zoo with an ex when she was stalked by one of their jaguars. It was super fucking scary to watch this murder cat single her out of the crowd and obviously want to eat her. 
My uncle worked at marine world. The female employees were not allowed to swim with the dolphins if they were menstruating because the male dolphins would try to rape them. 
I went to a thing at either the San Diego Zoo or the SD Wild Animal Park where you could give them sugar water or something and this bald ugly bastard shat on me three times before I realized what had happened 
That Galapagos Tortoise was like, "Fuck you. I knew Charles Darwin. Charles Darwin was a friend of mine. You, zookeeper, are no Charles Darwin." 
Sounds like a cat, except less likely to scratch you. 
 Check the feathers.. crows have 2 pinion feathers, ravens have 3. So whether it's a crow or a raven is a matter of a pinion. 
It would just store them in its' enclosure and use it to "decorate" (as some others mentioned they are drawn to collecting shiny objects). 
It's crazy man, I remember seeing him at only a few years old and they already had these crazy stories about him. Every year I went back he had done something new and ridiculous, and now he is like a big deal - you can buy Stoffel t-shirts and shit. 
You're assuming that he hasn't been harvesting the souls of everything he's killed to prolong his malicious existence indefinitely. And anyways I am a sadomasochist myself. So just to please you, sure, me and my sub will put his elongated whip-like tail to good use when/if he passes. 
I *love* opposums and difficult animals (they have character and spunk that I find endearing...I've had more than my fair share of obnoxious animals that hate everyone but me). Molly sounds amazing. 
I know exactly what you're talking about. Because when I went to that zoo as a child - on my birthday and during school vacation, no less - a monkey literally shat on my face. On my FACE. My mom was laughing so hard while trying to wipe it off my screaming face that there were tears streaming from her eyes. 
One of ours found a quarter that had been dropped in the exhibit. She decided to fold it in half and push it through the bars to return it to the keeper. Shows how strong they really are. 
They weren't jerks to visitors, but they weren't friendly like the emus you remember. I'm sorry to hear that your childhood friends got eaten by wild dogs! 
That movie was actually largely based on the aquarium where I was volunteering. The animators and stuff came to visit us and tour through all our back rooms so they could accurately depict them in the movie. I had just moved away when the movie came out and watching it really made me miss volunteering there :( 
Back when I was a contractor, one of my employees, who was a cokehead felon, but otherwise a very nice, friendly dude, told me about a friend of his who had a seriously massive aquarium with an octopus in it. The octopus spent weeks luring the guys bastard cat, which tormented the octopode by banging on the glass, closer and closer to the top of the tank. The dude came home one day amd the octopus had eaten the whole cat and stripped the flesh and fur from it's bones and piled the scraps nearly outside the tank. 
It's not easy. We needed two people. You kinda just pick it up, but then it suckers onto you and it's really hard to break their grip. The first time I ever handled one (same one from the story, actually) I got overwhelmed and had to call my supervisor over to get her off me. You generally try to only let one or two tentacles get to you at a time. Beyond that, you're fighting a losing battle. Every time you peel a tentacle off, there are 7 more to take its place. So after that escape attempt two people had to work together to get her in. She's not particularly heavy, but the suckers make it hard to let her go again. 
They're fairly domesticated and handle crowds well. On top of that, they aren't migratory and don't need a large area to range in. Also, they stay where the food is. Finally, if one DOES wander, the surrounding neighborhoods know who to call if they see a peacock in the right yard. 
Used to work there, got lots of mean looks from parents when I told their kids to leave the peacock alone. Well a few months go by and guess what, a peacock bit a kid pulling on it's feathers. All in the name of a picture. 
Thank you. I've always just stood up to them and haven't had issues. We feed the geese on our lake quite often, and often they're right at our feet. If one gets too aggressive, a firm, but gentle, pat to the top of the head usually calms them down. And swans can be grabbed like that guy did and they pretty much know they're gonners. 
Took me several minutes of fencing with my fishing rod to escape from a swan that caught me crossing through some shallows in a lake I lived by. First few hits were forceful but nothing damaging but by the end I was swinging hard enough and hitting it in the head I thought I would kill it. 
While working with one I was told to be careful. They can break your smaller bones when they beat you. 
That same species litters US parks. My mother has told stories I don't recall about being attacked by them. Barnyard geese howrver, I've always found to be worse. 
How do the courts not know about the evil that is swan-kind? 
Lol. They sure do love banana. The older the better. Ours also seem partial to melons as well I'll have to check Chester Zoo out sometime. 
Oh my God, it's not just my bird that does this?! I just thought he was weird! He will try to mount my hand all the time. 
A buck followed me around a pond once. He kept making noises at me. It was scary as shit. 
I once took care of an owl which had been hit by a car and was now 'intellectually disabled'. It was literally a Pixar movie poof ball and the kindest animal in the whole rehabilitation project. The owl just wanted these fat worms which it would hold in its adorable talons and eat like a banana. You could pet it like a cat and he loved it. So cute and sweet. 
I'm not to ashamed to admit it took me at least 2 minutes to get this. Nice one. 
So... The cuticles thing. Do you guys not wear gloves when you do this? 
Yeah, apparently they have killed people before so when he get's out, it's a pretty big deal. We have a couple little monkeys that keep escaping too, but they don't have to shut down the zoo to find them. 
The escape artists at one of the wildlife rehab places where I worked were the coyotes. The adult coyotes, I discovered, were kept in enclosures where the fences were very high and curved inwards at the top. This was because the coyotes would run in rings along the base of the fence, gaining momentum, then continue the run *up the fucking chain link* continuing around and around in rings until they were up and over. Bizarre. Also, raccoons had to be in triple-locked cages, because guaranteed they would figure out how to unlock *at least* one. 
He's a Tokay. If he's breathing he's probably on the verge of getting bitey lol. 
I saw the aftermath of a goose that got in a komodo dragon exhibit and apparently thought it could take the residents on. The zookeeper was mildly amused when she explained why the exhibit was closed for cleaning and mentioned geese are dicks so it deserved it. 
There are tons of geese in my city. Of course there are laws to keep people from harassing them but we've all wanted to shoot one now and then. My husband loves telling the story of his friend who showed up looking like he had been in a gang fight. Turns out he decided to punt a goose. Not only did he break his foot on the goose's fat ass, but that goose retaliated and destroyed him. 
They ARE nice if you raise them right, but I think it's a bit of luck too. I had a few geese a while back, the main group was awesome. One male and three females, they just kinda supervised the yard and would listen when you told them to get off the driveway, never saw them get mean at a person or a dog. Super lucky, because we didn't do a damn thing to train them. Got a couple more geese a year later. One started hissing and running people down when you turned your back to it. She ended up being a tasty goose meal. Worth it. 
They're too busy enjoying life by trolling the other animals 
If I remember correctly, yes. He only ever entered the enclosure a few times a month. 
Nice. One time we were taking a group of senior citizens around the wildlife sanctuary, the highlight of which was our lioness (yes, we had an African lioness, long story). Anyway, they were oohing and aahing about how majestic and regal she was...when an adolescent raccoon suddenly appeared in the enclosure. Suffice to say the seniors got a brief but extremely memorable demonstration of the food chain that day. 
It's probably like with orangutans how the dominant males grow those giant face flappy things. 
My dad once hilariously pointed out to me, "Look at how the lions perked up when the kid with the crutches (cerebral palsy) came by the glass. That's natural selection wanting to happen." Sure enough, the 2 females had their heads up and were obviously following the kid. Kind of a fucked up lesson though. 
Obligatory Not A Zookeeper, but from what I've read, cheetahs are really nervous animals. The dog acts like an emotional support animal - it'll keep the cats calm and redirect their energy by playing with them! Dogs are too good for this world. 
This seems counterproductive on a number of levels. 
Yeah they aren't really known for their smarts huh? I had to replace my window glass a few times after she got carried away and beak-smashed some poor reptile against it while showing off to me. Pretty efficient alarm clock though. 
I can't remember the specific city but I think it may be Tokyo where people observed them dropping nuts on the street that were too hard for them to crack open with their beaks. So they'd drop them at traffic lights and the cars would run over them and when the lights turned red they would fly down to retrieve the edible part. 
He chose that bedroom. This is now Stoffel's game, and he was just wanting to rub it in. 
Why would I buy him T-shirts if all he does is cause trouble? 
Because I'm a sadomasochistic lizard-lover with delusions of grandeur and I think raising pet monsters is cool. 
You should get a hedgehog. Most people I introduced mine (former) too, were terrified of her "viciousness". They're really just cowardly little creatures that make strange, scary noises. They're cute af once they know you. They're dumb as rocks, though. 
Down in florida there is this tribe of monkeys that got loose from some Tarzan movie back in the 1930s. I took a canoe trip with some juvies and one of the kids unwisely decided to throw a rock at one of the monkeys. The monkey caught the rock, threw it back, and hit the kid. The little fucker then hit the kid again with a handful of shit. All the while I was sitting in the back of the canoe, the kid in the front, watching.. and laughing myself senseless. 
How did she break it? Are they strong enough to snap it like a pencil? 
Roos are bigger and ostriches are mellower? (My favorite is keeping small predators with large herbivores, particularly dinos if you have the expansion. The lion and anklyosaur exhibit was a big hit.) 
Oh wow that's really cool. Which aquarium did you volunteer at? 
Houdini did have a major limiting factor we call 'bones'. 
In the neighborhood where I grew up, someone had a pet peacock. He would get out and roam the streets on occasion. He wasn't mean and we all just Keynes him do his thing. Anyone who lived there long enough had a story about seeing the peacock and thinking they were hallucinating. 
This happened at my local zoo recently. A kid who was way too old to be fucking with animals at a zoo decided to try to pluck a feather. It was mating season and the peacock almost ripped his ear off. His mom tried to make them put the peacock down, instead they got banned. 
Man if I'd been around to see you slap that swan, I'd probably have broke down laughing right there and then. You really showed that jerk of a swan! 
I love animals and would never willingly hurt one, but at that point I think I would be seeing red and snapping its neck in a rage. Power through the pain and just wring it's neck until it's dead. There are limits. Once bones have been broken, it's self defense time. 
Because swans infiltrated our justice system a long time ago. 
They see you fuck your hand often enough they want to try it for themselves 
grunting and snorting noises? probably had intentions of mating with you 
fair enough. Also during the rut the males put on a shit ton of mass and get super horny and territorial 
I got to work with a crow in a similar situation. We had to hand feed him and occasionally he'd grab your thumb, but never painfully or maliciously. He was really sweet, and liked it if you talked to him while working. 
As a kid I was chased down by two geese while my parents we're distracted. I was just chilling with my packed grilled cheese, my little legs couldn't outrun their sadistic flippers. Fuck geese man. 
If playing Zoo Tycoon taught me anything, a penguin will fuck up anything you put it in a cage with. I laugh every time I remember seeing the dust cloud settle and the penguin emerge victorious over a bull moose. 
That's the theory why dogs and cats can 'smell' cancer. 
Cheetahs really like having the social interaction, and hate being left alone, thus the dogs are there to keep them company because humans can't just stick around all the time. 
Counter-reproductive. However dolphins are one of the few non-primates that have sex for pleasure. 
Brian said he woke up to Stoffel scraping at the door, so he grabbed a 10,000 Volt stun gun from his cupboard and zapped the honey badger with it... Stoffel didn't move. Didn't even flinch. Brian says he just got angrier and started growling. 
They are pretty much just a limp sack filled to the brim with muscle. Everything I've heard leads to me to believe that a rake would be no problem. 
Do not bring me back to Zoo Tycoon, I beg you! "Lion 1 needs more X" *gives Lion 1 more X* "Lion 1 wants less X" *Removes 1 X* "Lion 1 wants more X* 
Monterey Bay Aquarium. It's absolutely amazing there. Highly recommend that everyone visits if they get a chance. Admission can be pricey, but they're a nonprofit and all the money directly funds the aquarium, conservation efforts, and education programs. That's true of most zoos and aquariums in the US as well. 
There were a couple in my neighborhood too! They lived down he street, but would wander around with a chicken and a turkey like some Kind of rag tag bird gang. The noise the peacocks made was terrifying. It's also a little freaky is you startle them without knowing they are there and then BOOM big fluffy peacock display. 
Good, fuck that kid and his mom. Putting down a wild animal for not acting domesticated is some Grade-A stupid. 
That's what I was thinking. I was not about to lose my virginity to a damn deer. 
I got a bear proof screw top can because they kept throwing trash everywhere. Then I put a ham in it, screwed the top on, and smeared ham juice all on the outside. Because I was so mad at them. I found the trash can a few acres away from the house. They didn't get it open. TAKE THAT RACCOONS! 
The crow probably knows your are untangling it, and wouldn't risk being aggressive in case you changed your mind. 
Read "cow". Was amazed. Now I'm somewhat disappointed. 
I'm imagining you flipping through channels late at night. "UFC fight? Nope. Flip. Boxing? Uh-hunh. "WrestleMania? Ewww." And then you flip it on national geographic of something and you see "Geese Vs Komodo Dragons!" and your like 'Oh hell yes! and start making popcorn. 
You haven't met my corgi. I'm pretty sure he was a tyrannical dictator in a past life who was reincarnated as a silly looking, short legged dog as punishment. We jokingly call him "corg-ligula" when he is throwing a tantrum about not getting his way. Either that or he is a cat trapped in a corgi's body. 
So the dolphin is just being responsible user of birth control 
And that's just how they are. They're naturally muscled. Could you imagine if you taught one how to lift? A bodybuilder orangutan! 
I wonder what Microsoft is smoking for not rebooting Zoo Tycoon. It'd be the one game I'd buy at full price no questions asked. 
Visited once. Can confirm - is amazing. Their Giant Octopus was SUPER active when I went. You look into their eyes and you just know they're looking right back at you. The...I wanna say mimic octopus - was super cool as well. Absolutely perfect camouflage - I could NOT find it. I asked one of the workers if it was actually in there - he couldn't find it either for a good while - then he pointed it out to me. The coolest part by far though was the million gallon tank. A MILLION GALLONS!! It had sea turtles and tuna - so cool. 
'Rag tag bird gang' is the best thing I've heard today! 
Same thing in my town. Apparently it started with a couple "pets" that got loose and started breeding, now there's a whole flock of them just wandering around, hanging out on the neighborhood roofs, fences, streets etc 
I understand! Raccoons are relentless! I was always pissed at them for getting in my pump house because they'd mess with the light aimed at the water pump to keep it from freezing. Inevitably they'd knock it out and boom, 2 in the morning on a subzero winter night I'd discover I didn't have water because my pump was frozen. One time I saw a muskrat trying to dig in under the side wall to get in there. I ran out with a shovel waving it around like a crazy person with the intent of scaring him away. That was how I discovered that muskrats will turn and chase you back and they've got some wicked teeth. 
I had a parakeet who once managed to get wrapped up in some tape and when I freed her was quite affectionate to show thanks. Birds can be scary smart. 
If you've successfully bonded with a wolf, is petting them an option? Is there a way to display affection and bond with them? 
Why do I imagine one of those adorable little cunts brandishing a lug wrench while it says that and slowly walks up to the injured emu? 
I loved seeing how big the ocean sunfish really is in the million gallon tank. Thing is unreal. 
I love these country stories! Super annoying and anything but funny when it happens, but makes for good telling later. 
Really? I had a parakeet once who everytime I let him out of his cage to let him chill and everytime he flew around he would ram into a wall and I would have to pick him up and put him back in the cage 
Dude. He's eying your jugular in an alarming way. You put him down just in time. 
A rabid (the docile type) red fox followed me to the back door when I was taking out the compost for my husband's parents one night. I'm 25, and I called over my dad in-law to come see this super friendly fox! He did the rolly eye thing, then went to the safes, grabbed his .22 and I'm sure you can figure out the rest. I only knew it was rabid when he called animal control to report it. 
Nah. Just trying to figure out where those sick beats are coming from! He/she chilled for probably a half hour on my shoulders before putting it back where I found it. 
Read about a guy who had a sweater made of wolf fluff. Dogs reacted BADLY to him. Either by acting aggressive, or running away screaming. 
I'm imagining a dog running and screaming like a person instead of running and barking and I can't stop laughing 
My first sims game was sims 2. The very first night the sim moved into the new house, he decided to eat barbecue for dinner, proceeded to light himself on fire and died because I didn't know about fire alarms. 
The other moment like that for me is the chainsaw guy cutting off your head. My first death in the game was from that and it made me drop the controller and I was shocked that that just happened. 
What?! Is there video of this somewhere? I have to see this. 
Oh man, being outside at night for the first time in that game was the worst. 
OK so you know how that game has an extra ending scene when you beat all three gods on the same save file? I pre-played two of the gods. Then we got two more Gamecubes, two more TVs, and two more copies of the game (this was college and I had gamer friends). We spent a Halloween with each of the TVs showing a different playthrough with a different god. Then when we all wrapped up, we watched the final scene on my TV in the middle. One of my favorite gaming memories. 
I remember the part where the 'Colonel' says something like, you've been playing the game for a long time, you really should take a break'. I thought it was going to be truly necessary to save and reboot the game, since Hideo Kojima is insane. So I did. 
Ah yes. It must have felt good being an only child after that. 
And then when you're expecting it in the remake. But it only cracks the window. It only jumps through when you enter from the other side, so it got me when I wasn't expecting it at all! Also, crimson heads. 
Are we talking about the moment when the game glitches and makes your believe it's started over and you've lost all your progress up until that point (which was basically about half to 2/3's of the way through the game)? If so, then yes, the developers really knew how to put fear into the hearts of gamers for a second. 
Shoutout to the Butcher in Diablo 1. When you open the door full of dismembered naked people and entrails everywhere, and that big motherfucker yells "FRESH MEAT" and runs at you.....I was like 5-6 when I played that and I'll still always remember it 
That scene is messed up, but the puzzle in that one sucks. Walking on the blood was really annoying to do. 
CK2 as well. A good Late Game horde in that game can fuck up people in the safest of areas. 
I've heard a story from someone who had observed the unluckiest person in existence, they encountered two shinies in a row, both Graveler, both self-destructed, they are also the reason I will always have a good supply of quick balls 
I always thought that Tragger cutting off some of your fingers with those giant ass scissors was the freakiest. Then again, I haven't seen much of Whistleblower... 
Because it LEARNS. It found out I liked to hide in those computer carts. Though my scariest moment is when I found out it can chase you in the vents. It was after me so I ducked into one and made a 90 turn, I thought I was safe until I hear a fast bangbangbang and as I turn around it was just barreling down the vent at me on all fours. Nearly passed myself. 
The bit on dead space 2 where you go back onto the ship from the original being fixed up in the dock. No no no. 
How about the Dead Hands in the bottom of the Well and in the Shadow Temple. 
Whistleblower was hands down better than the original game. Outlast 2 comes out tomorrow and I'm holding onto my manhood while I can. 
"Have you faced an asari commando unit before? Few humans have." 
Are you saying you don't stockpile these items only to beat the game without ever using them? 
The vault in Fallout 3 where it's just full of dudes that say "Gary" scared the shit out of me back in the day. Not sure why, was just uncomfortable. 
The dam turbines/generator was worse for me. The exhilaration of getting to the elevator made me want to scream as I lunged for it. Also, David. Although I died so many times during the last phase that by the end I was more irritated, but his unnatural agility did frighten me initially. 
Anything eye related makes me freak out, it's as if my eyeballs don't want to see their kin being hurt in any way 
I had a FF7 save get corrupted on me. Ever since then I would always make 2 save files. Then when I got older separate memory cards. 
"You DEFINITELY don't want to go in that room. That's a party killer right there." 
Yeah fuck man, i would've been like grade 5 (10 years old?) when Halo CE came out, and those fucking hunters on "The Silent Cartographer" level scared the shit out of me. Just looked back at some old YouTube videos and the nostalgia is real. Don't even get me started on the flood lol. 
Man I didn't give this game enough of a chance to get interesting like this. I need to revisit it. 
I don't know what HL2 you played, but there certainly weren't any cats in mine. 
I was naive and thought there was no way that I was gonna go out like that.... 
In the first Sims, randomly, the repairman passed away while fixing my dishwasher. From that point forward, every time I called for a repairman, his ghost would come by and fix my stuff. Wasn't expecting that at all. 
My scariest was when I had forgotten that I had a mod installed and the tank spawned, and I walked around the corner to see the Stay Puft Marshmallow Man charging at me 
Shit, I couldn't even get as far as encountering the Alien before quitting the game. Creative Assembly hit me in the right spot with my fears to make it too spooky for me, I can't think of any other game that has done that. 
Get a Mankey next time form route 22. They're pretty much a must for Brock if you have a Pikachu or a Charmander. 
Or when you play CS:GO and everyone speaks Russian. 
I once was in the exact same situation in my first and only ranked game on Dust. I was terrorist side getting our asses handed to us, then we switch sides and we pull all the way up to a 14-14 tie and we actually lose that round and lost the game. It was so much fun, but I felt like I should never touch ranked again after that. 
and that's why I won't spend that many hours on an unfinished game. 
Had that happen to me once. Turned quicksave on to everything to the point where I felt like if I farted it would save it. 
Up until this mission I had the brightness on my TV too low. I just didn't see that fucking bird throwing the bomb in the way. 
For years, I thought he meant "No russian left alive" for some reason, only recently when someone said it to me did I realize he meant "Speak no Russian" so he can set you up, and blame America for the attack. 
Well when every grenade ever made is being thrown at you, it tends to get harrowing 
My wife was playing Fallout 4 yesterday on Xbox One at least half way through the game when it violently and loudly crashed. Went to boot the game back up and it crashes on the "Please Stand By" screen at the very beginning, just crashes to dashboard. Have installed and uninstalled all the DLC and all the updates, and the game is on disc. I go to research it and apparently it's a known problem that has been happening since launch with no fix. FML, my game is completely broken and literally unplayable. 
I would just like to add to this: if you hate the realistic, grey-brown shooter genre, play it anyway. Can't say I honestly *liked* the game, in the strictest sense of the word, but it's definitely one of those that stick with you, and I do recommend it. 
Counter story. I was playing TF2 and a kid kept talking. I just randomly told him to "shut the fuck up" or something along those lines. He asked me to please not swear. I felt bad because I was just frustrated with the match or something and taking it out on this pretty nice seeming kid. So I apologized and he said it was alright and we just chatted for the rest of the game. He seemed like a very polite and good kid. I was rightly embarrassed for lashing out, but it was nice to run into a well-mannered kid while gaming. 
World at war zombies, on your own, 1am in the morning was the scariest and best decision I've ever made in my life 
I had a load of human meat fall out of the sky during a hard winter. Whatever the hell happened on that ship, my pawns were so hungry they gobbled it up raw, right there on the snow. 
He was probably just protesting the persecution of Vietnamese Buddhists by the south Vietnamese government 
I used to think how unrealistic it was that so many Sims set things a blaze from simple cooking until my current roommate has set off the smoke detector 5 times in the last month 
Yeah, I thought he was just a beefier dude. I expected to take a hit or two figuring it out. Then Leon was trying to stop a chainsaw with his hands. Um. Yeah. Yeesh. 
If you watch TV at 4:00 it says "death" in Japanese a whole bunch and Aliens broadcast on it 
I love that game during the day. Hate that game at night. 
When you're a kid, you're so immersed into the game. When the game breaks the fourth wall, it really fucks with your mind. I shut the game off when he told me too 
mgs is great for breaking the 4th wall My favorite is when psycho mantis in metal gear 4 tries to read your memory card but realizes since you have ps3 theres no memory card. 
They were great. You're bangin along doin your RE thing, crossing through that long mirror-hallway room like you've done 15 times then the zombie corpse that's been lying there all along *gets up* and fucking sprints at you! Now you think oh god I've been killing zombies this whole time, the mansion is full of them! Haha, I know I'm not the only one who spazzed out a little there 
I was so scared I borrowed the game from a friend and thought "oh fuck he'll never lend me anything ever again" 
Haha first time I opened the door and heard 'FRESH MEAT' I left immediately and was like HELL NAWWW 
I fucking hated that blood trail puzzle, but if I recall correctly, there was a little trick where you could jump off a ledge at the beginning and land at the end. That was so satisfying to discover after 30 attempts at that goddamn puzzle. 
First play through (no idea what was going to happen) I chose Georgia. I was having a great time and really felt like I was getting the hang of the game... 
Pretty sure that's from chuggaaconroy's pokemon platinum let's play. 
Then you find the Shiny Zangoose/Seviper in a horde in X/Y. For those out of the loop, in X/Y, Zangoose/Seviper would spawn in hordes in a set of 4 of one kind and 1 of another, depending on your version. Given the whole mongoose/snake feud that is their design inspiration, the 4-of-a-kind will all gang up on the 1 oddball *before* attacking your Pokemon. "Now that doesn't sound so bad," you say, "I can just throw the Master Ball still." Except you can't: in a multi-wild battle, you cannot throw a Pokeball until there is only one target remaining. 
Whistleblower is much of the same that made outlast so scary. Nothing new, however. Still worth the 2 hours to play it through What creeped me out the most was constantly hearing the snipping of those giant bone shears the entire level. He was really easy to beat because you can hear him coming. But man, did it freak me out. 
Moment I got the shotgun upgraded with electric buckshot, I feared nothing 
The way they would move was the worst. They were super slow and deliberate until they realized you saw them, then suddenly they went into murder mode. 
IIRC it searches the type of place it found you last when you repeat section. For example it finds you under a desk and kills you, but when you repeat the section it'll search there first if it thinks you're nearby. Really makes you think on your feet and improvise. 
Yess. The game did a really good job of narrowing your options just enough to consistently push you outside your comfort zone. Also I felt pretty okay about the androids until that one level... 
Yep, you see it in the docking bay for the early part of the game, and you know you're eventually going there. And then it's a dread actually going in and waiting for shit to hit the fan. And then nothing happens. Until it does. 
That's the level with the Hunter (regenerating mother fucker) right? Definitely the scariest IMO, hearing that thing roaring and clomping up a hallway behind you while you fumble with a puzzle was not nice. 
Had to search way to long to find this! I almost shit my pants the first time. 
IT WHAT? SON OF A BITCH I HAVE TO FINISH OUTLAST TONIGHT THEN. 
Funny, I was thinking of the krogan dude on the elevator. Benezia was harder, but at least you didn't have to sit through a slow elevator along with dialogue choices over and over if you died. 
For me it was more like: Sober: Oh god oh god I'm gonna die I'M SCARED. Tipsy: Bring it on you piece of shit monsters I'm gonna beat your asses! 
I like to think there's an afterlife with a video game that has all of the unused supplies/potions/weapons we amassed over our lifetimes :( 
They're all clones of the same guy made by some experimenters that the Gary's killed thus leading to them controlling the vault by the way. Oh and Gary is their language, they aren't completely brain dead (just really fucking insane), it also seems they speak English as when dying they'll say no and you can hear them talking normally to each other if you sneak up on them with a stealth boy and sit around cloaked for a bit so they *choose* to speak only by saying their name. Also remember the door to the vault is open so the Gary can leave any time, and some of them likely have already. 
First time I hit that generator and heard that scream I was shook. The David part was amazing because you really get a perspective on how helpless Ellie is against a grown man after playing as a badass brawler the whole game 
He said DS! Am I the only one blown away by the fact that they remade it?! I havent seen a physical copy of that game since like 1999. Did they reproduce Riven and Exile? 
I think it's because the game is grimbright, but that section is both grim and dark 
I remember the music during the Hunter part really amping it up. 
The whole bit before the Flood first appear is *great*. I'm tempted to look it up on Youtube but I'm sure the grainy graphics and watching it at 4 in the afternoon won't do it justice to playing it aged 15, in the middle of the night, tense as hell. 
Or those fucking ballerina statue things randomly placed everywhere and you find an upgrade machine in a small, dimly-lit, flooded room and when you finish upgrading you turn around and there is a statue there that wasn't there before. 
*I want to make them beautiful, BUT THEY ALWAYS TURN OUT WRONG* 
I played through on the hardest difficulty and there is nothing like a Big Daddy on that difficulty. I was shitting myself running from him hoping to find ammo somwhere. 
I was naive and thought "pfft, they never kill important characters in games or film anymore. So how is he getting out of this one?" I had also been watching too much crap TV where even when someone "dies" they come back in one way or another. So I started thinking "okay so he's wearing a bullet proof vest or something then?" yea, in 1911. Lol. 
In the original Sims my sim family had a glitched? child. His square icon pic was an evil upside down face. It was terrifying. 
Fun fact: B&W checks the name of your PC's currently logged in user and has a secret file containing voice clips for common names. If your User name matches one of those in the list, it will very rarely whisper YOUR name instead of "deaaaath" 
I remember the first time the ghost of a drowned Sim returned and covered the house in wet footprints...my friend and I were transfixed for a minute, then ran and begged her mum to make it go away! 
I let a friend play a campaign with all of my mods just being graphical enhancements with the only exception being Princess Peach as the witch. He accidentally shot her from a distance so she was running at him before he could see what it was. His reaction was priceless. 
I kept my first horse's meat in the chest in my first house and never bought another horse again ;___; Then I ported to Whiterun and my horse was in the stable??? So confused but relieved my horse was alive! Brought it with me to Kynesgrove and it got roasted by the dragon there. I hate my life. RIP clipclop doggo 
Or when you are 5 rounds in and the same 13 year old That's been shouting "rush Long" the whole game and is 1 and 9 and is still trying to tell everyone to rush before you even check the cross. 
Sand man and Metal Squad went down fighting covering your escape. They knew that that was where it ends for them. Ghost and Roach saw Shepard as a friend who was about to pull their ass out of the fire. They were thinking, hey Shepard's here, we're not fucked anymore. And then he goes turncoat on you. 
- playing Bethesda games - only keeping one save game. Amateur. 
I'm guessing you must have played it significantly after its original release, because *very few* games in that era autosaved (and the ones that did were just autosaving stuff like high score lists, not progress). That also means you never got the sanity effect where you go to save your game, and the game pretends to delete all of your saves. 
If you hate the realistic, grey-brown shooter genre, you should *especially* play it. It turns out Spec Ops hates it too. 
I find the WAW Zombie mode the most scary of the CoD Zombie modes. It just, fit in perfectly with the rest of the game. Especially if you've played Dimitri in a much more ruthless manner (the one that results in the writer guy writing about what a ruthless monster you are) Like I picture it as a PTSD nightmare Dimitri is having about all the Nazi's he's slaughtered by the end of the game. 
My little sister was in the room when it happened to me, "I don't think I should have seen that" was her reaction 
Oh yeah, but the, "What was he doing in there?" line after cracked me the fuck up though... 
By endgame, my friends and I would hunt night crawlers all night long. So much fun progressing from that first terrifying night. 
Also metal gear was infamous for fucking with you. In the PS1 game you couldn't beat one of the bosses until you plugged your controller into slot 2. 
Self-awareness and camp (when done well) in games is my biggest guilty pleasure. The MGS series has this in spades. It's a shame MGSV didn't deliver on that front despite nailing the minute to minute gameplay in a lot of places. A lot of the post-modern stuff from MGS2 didn't really resonate with fans at the time but when we look back at it now it's disturbingly prophetic. All the talk of memes and social media trends and stuff like that. Nobody really knew what they were talking about then but look at us now. I'd say that's the most horrifying part of the game. 
When my boyfriend had me play the remake, he warned me to burn the corpses from the very beginning. I feel like he missed out on a really great opportunity to watch me lose my shit 
Pencils sound generous. Should have gotten her a rock. Bland, boring, with virtually nothing artistic or special about it. 
Protip: run away until you find a part of the dungeon with a barred dungeon door, shut it, then proceed to spam arrows while the fat bastard runs fruitlessly against a closed door. Loot cleaver for profit. 
You are correct. IIRC you walk through a door onto the trail and immediately to your left is the trail leading to the exit door. If you bullet time lunge you would clear the gap from blood trail to blood trail, skipping the entire maze. 
Jeez, Georgia and you didn't get your ass fed to you by the Seljuks before the Mongols. You got lucky there bud. 
And it happens 3 fucking times. The Ilkhanate, Golden Horde, and then Timurids. And on top of that they usually come with a plague or two too. Just hide on Britannia and you might be ok, until you remember you forgot to disable Sunset Invasion and 140k Aztecs invade Ireland and turn it into a giant sacrificial altar. 
One of the major things that stuck out about Condemned, to me, isn't just that's it's a legit scary premise, but that the gameplay was really fun. Condemned 2, while it's story wasn't the best, started to feel like a first-person version of the yet to be released Arkham games. I really wish a reboot would happen. 
It's probably the best AI in any game I've played. The programmers were geniuses 
I never made it past that point. Really thought Dead Space 2 was a great sequel, but going back on the ship gave me some very real creeps, so that was the end of the game for me! Recommend it though. 
Other than the demo that came out a while ago, there's been next to NO marketing for the second game. I just randomely checked up on it last week and was surprised to see the Steam page said "Release date: April 25th, 2017". "Wait... what? Like, you mean next week?" Did more Googling, and it turns out it's true. 
That fight is where men are made. You either watch a krogan battlemaster shrug until your eyeballs bleed or you come out the other side with a thick rug on your chest and Liara in your arms 
the first time playing it took me a month to beat him, second time i beat him first try, probably because i learned how to dodge 
There's one on the pre-war bunker that the Brotherhood Outcasts find (Operation Anchorage DLC). 
Never thought of it like that before. It was definitely the hardest/most frustrating part of the game. 
Design process: What happens if the operator misses? Retract and start again? NO! INSTANTLY STAB ALL THE WAY IN AND WIGGLE. 
I recently played it for the firs time (im 20) with my friend who played it as a kid and it definitely still fucked with me. I absolutely loved that level. The Master Chief collection has really well updated graphics and we were playing coop at like 5 am so that may have added to it lol 
I immediately ran up and started beating the statue with my wrench. It didn't die, but it bled everywhere. Let me know those things were alive. 
I was kinda freaked out by the room with the plastered family and his audio tape nearby where he's clearly gone insane and starts weeping about "wanting to take the ears off." 
I legit thought I was gonna be able to dead eye all of em 
Yeah this happened to me. I was up late playing when I should have been in bed, roughly around midnight back when I was in grade 8 so I was wearing headphones so nobody could hear me. So I'm starting to get drowsy, basically playing as I'm falling asleep when I suddenly hear "Greeeeeeeeeeg" which is my real name. I wake straight up and start looking around the room, nothing. I immediately shut down my computer and go to bed. Now wide awake but convinced either my house is haunted or I hallucinated it. I then found out a year or so later it could do this. 
"curl my asshole into a knot" that made me laugh really hard for some reason. 
I remember skimming the map when I picked it up and was like "ok yup this room is there, need that key for that, hallway leads there ok ok *Kid's Room* **fuck**" 
Well, Price got put in a Gulag and MacMillan became paralysed from the waist down (i think). 
On the other end of the spectrum there's me...2GB of Witcher 3 save files, which amounts to ~1000 saves. I played about 70 hours, so that's one save roughly every five minutes lol 
I always rhought autosave was a newer gaming feature but I just recently realized my NES copy of Startropics has it. Maybe it just wasnt utilized much 
Fuck you, I tried to be reasonable about what was happening. It's not my fault Kate died. **sobs in the corner** 
Well, a lot of it probably didn't resonate with the fans, because the fans wanted a cool game about espionage and shooting people and stuff. MGS2 is - among other things - a criticism of the fans of MGS, who kept demanding more MGS. So Kojima pulled a big bait-and-switch. "You want to be Solid Snake? *Sure*. You can be Solid Snake again... heh heh heh..." 
The problem is that there's nowhere near enough fuel to burn them. It ultimately means that you have to avoid zombies instead of killing them all. It gets rid of the old RE problem where for huge portions of the game, having killed all the zombies in the areas you've been through, you could spend hours before you see another zombie. 
Styrofoam rock. That way she can't throw it back at you and do any damage. 
Or shut the door to his room and cast firewalls where he stands. Gotta love a cowardly and honourless kill 
My biggest gripe with condemned 2 was having to balance alcohol intake to avoid withdrawal symptoms. As someone who has lived with alcoholics and seen them go through withdrawal it definitely takes the piss out of you but holy shit does it make for a frustrating game mechanic. 
Not just the AI but the music as well. It really picks up when the alien comes close but dies down again seamlessly when it leaves. 
Man you missed out! The real creepy shit in that chapter were the audio logs of the crew cleaning up the ship. Couple that with what you know happened in DS1 and the quarantine aesthetic to the ship (DS2) it really creeps ya out. 
Yes! It's amazing how they were able to make you feel the most on edge the quieter it got. 
Just watched the trailer. Super excited. Glad I got the first game and Whistleblower on Steam a few weeks ago for like $6. 
Same, either that fight was harder in the original game or we we're just really bad as kids. 
That was also the only time I genuinely felt bad for them. IIRC there's a recording in that bunker that basically has you listening to the guy's agonized screams and cries of "Gary" as the BoS Outcasts tried and failed to remove the pipboy glove from him. 
Heh, it sounds worse than it was, really. I was in 2nd grade and called in to the office for some reason. Right as I was entering, a 5th grader was leaving with a pile of papers held at just the right height. She and I collided, and one paper sliced across my eye. It didn't hurt, actually (no more so than getting poked in the eye anyway) but it did cause damage and I had to get some work done. Ever since, had a phobia of touching my eyes. No way in hell I'd ever get contacts, for example. I prefer glasses, anyway. 
Handwave time! Issac rips the control panel open and fiddles with it so he can do the procedure on himself. Clearly he's broken some safety features to do so. 
Even the ones that don't move still bleed because they're all splicers that the artist froze in place. 
Haha same, I was like, "Hang on, did I just fuck it up?" 
I didn't even realize there was a kid's room in there until I opened the door and there were toys. I looked at my friend and was like "fuck you for asking me to play this." 
True. Now that you mention it Price also had to live with knowledge that most of his squad mates and close friends died. Not really something you want to live with. I don't know if MacMillan ever recovered use of his legs but he was like an an advisor/commander later on. 
Fun fact, the level when the Russian troops parachute in is called "Wolverines!" 
I FUCKED UP ONCE. I DIDN'T FIGHT THE SCHOOL SECURITY GUARD FOR HER. THAT WAS RATIONAL. And then I was sure- I was so sure that there was no way to avoid her death. That's fine. That's okay. It's just a fixed point in the plot. I'm not to blame. And then 70% of people saved her. The end of the episode broke me. 
Better yet, not even a styrofoam rock, just get pebble, this way she can throw it, not do any damage, and have her lose it upon throwing. 
Yes! It's unnerving. And the sounds in general are so well made and so detailed that you really could tell everything that was going on. Even when hiding in a spot, you could hear the alien running around, snarling, or looking around for you. It's truly a horrifying experience 
absolutely this. most horror games become way less scary once you become used to the patterns in the AI, laughing at the amnesia monster when you learn it cant climb onto cabinets for example. any attempt to game the Aliens AI results in a quick death. Seriously Isolation is a masterpiece of horror, ive never had a game leave me so afraid to make any move before- just huddled under some desk so scared to move but also knowing that every second i stay there the damn thing is one step closer to finding me... 
I want to hire those fuckers who cleaned up the ishimura, their work really was ahead of our time 
It's not just the cut scenes. The story in FEAR 1 was pretty dark and fucked up too 
What's the actual science behind being able to remove a PipBoy? You're able to snag one from a skeleton in Fallout 4, granted you can just pull it right off his dismembered arm. Also, Doc Mitchell takes his off and gives it to you, so it isn't physically adhered to your person. If the BoS were torturing him and, iirc they cut off his arm, would the Gary not be intelligent enough to just take it off? 
If you read the Myst books, you realize that it's a long, dangerous walk from D'ni to the volcano cave that was mapped out by Atrus's grand parents. I highly recommend reading the books if you like the setting of Myst. 
Or nothing at all because she doesn't deserve a damn thing! 
The sound design is impeccable. At the time, I played on my roommate's huge plasma TV and amazing sound system. When we first HEAR the alien doodling around in the vents I put the controller down and turned on all of the lights. Nope. Nope. Nope. 
If the goal is to piss someone off, an intentionally shitty gift is better than no gift. 
Playing with high quality headphones and lights off in a room is the ultimate experience 
It's not difficult to be better than Fontaine though, but I can see where you're coming from. 
Very true. It's also a nice little touch to play it with the Kinect. If the Kinect detects too much noise in the room, the alien will be alerted if it's actively hunting you. But it's not a good feature of you have dick friends who would scream while you're hiding. 
Very true. I was also just sort of heartbroken because I *adored* Atlas. maybe because I have a thing for irish guys but whatever 
The part that messed most with my young mind when I first played the game through was the ["Would you kindly?" command reveal. It was so weird because I legitimately felt betrayed by a video game ally at that point despite never really having had control over it. I was so ready to kill Fontaine after that.](/spoiler) 
That's the best. I had a professor of constitutional law who used to say that the French proved that all forms of government suck. 
Got super wealthy. Built hundreds of temples Got poor. Got taken over. China, Thailand, Vietnam. Whatever. Ok. We are free now! Oh shit. Crazy dude inspired by Chinese guy is killing people. Land mines everywhere. Country now slowly becoming touristy. 
A volatile union of not-so-fraternal states held together by a strong leader who's a bit *too* strong. Russia, always being glued together and falling apart at the same time. 
 The gold cannot possibly run out. The gold runs out. Can't possibly be more christian. Catholic inquisition. Can't possibly lose these wars. Loses those wars. 
Its Egypt btw not Syria. Does Syria have pyramids? 
Finding oil is like using a cheat code in the history game. Unless you're Iraq. In that case, the cheat code doesn't quite work as intended. 
Forgot the earthquake. History seems to also have forgotten how much that contributed to Portugal's decline as a global power. 
Made Skype the lifesaver of expats the world over. 
So basically Singapore prostituted itself to wealth? Noice 
If we're taking about the antiquity world I guess Greece? 
It's actually surprising how many countries this could apply to, considering how specific it is. 
We need to know, were your natives aboriginals or aboriginees. Which hemisphere is this? 
You left out the difference between the pre- and post-Lord of the Rings eras of New Zealand tourism. 
Malaysia. You guys had a rough time....great food though! 
Don't forget that growing bananas through lava is a thing your country did too;)! 
The Winter War was one hell of a conflict. I gather the biggest problem for the Fins afterwards was what to do with 2,000,000 dead Russians. 
I recently discovered that as far back as my Aussie ancestory goes, on both my father's and mothers sides my great great (...x?) Grandfather's were both convicts. Im the walking product of a cliche. I do try to limit my slaughtering of natives during daily life though. 
The best indicator for shit going down is austria being involved 
I prefer to think of our history as we were invaded and invaded and invaded and invaded and inaded till we snapped and took over the world, then run out of money and just sorta stopped 
Germany still isnt united you dont have Austria or Lichtenstein yet. 
Isn't the non-TLDR like that but with heroin and gunboats 
Spain was like: -Do you believe in god? +Uhh -INQUISITION! 
"Hey Mom? Can I be my own country?" "Sure thing sweetheart. Love you" "Love you too Mom" 
Oh man, this made me laugh. What the fuck is our country doing. 
I actually love that I had to scroll down this far to find a US post. 
Invent three major world religions and color the others of geographic proximity. 
Penicillin was Scottish (Fleming), were you thinking about insulin? 
What's worse is, the British Army had also been wiped out along with the French, but they had an island fortress to get behind while you didnt have that option. That said, you guys also did lose the whole Napoleonic Wars. 
To 1789: Absolute monarchy 1789-1793: Constitutional monarchy 1793-1794: Totalitarianism 1794-1799: Oligarchy 1799-1802: Military dictatorship 1802-1815: Constitutional monarchy again 1815-1830: Absolute monarchy again 1830-1848: Constitutional monarchy again again 1848-1851: Democratic Republic 1851-1852: Dictatorship 1852-1870: Constitutional monarchy again again again 1870: Experiment with Communism 1870-1940: Democratic Republic again 1940-1945: Facist puppet state 1945-1958: Democratic Republic again again 1958-present: Democratic Republic 5th time's a charm I think that's all forms of government except theocracy. 
And for expats who have moved back to their home country and have forgotten how to communicate with normal people so they Skype with old friends from overseas 
Singapore was kicked out of Malaysia (seriously, the Malaysian parliament voted unanimously, with the exception of the singapore rep. who was not allowed in, to kick singapore out) 
I'm realizing that too haha. In my case the Netherlands here. Selling New York in particular and some rights in Australia. The real colonies (Suriname, Indonesia) all sorta claimed independence 
It seems to have learned it's lesson, the fucking wet bastard. 
Pre: Wheres them birds that look like that fuzzy brown fruit? Post: WHERE DA HOBBITS AT! 
You could be writing that in English or American and it'll still be right. 
True. Wished that would make some of us more tolerant about other's past suffering and history, though. 
My mum's side traces back to an Irish guy who was arrested for treason and my dad's a European post war immigrant (aka a wog). I am a product of both cliches. 
Belgium is the only country I can think of who's explicit purpose in being created was to piss of all of their neighbors. 
It's like the guy who when he appears at a party *will* fuck something up but no one has the heart to tell him to stay away 
We we're invaded and invaded and invaded, until we snapped took over the world, discovered tea and slowly calmed down. 
And Elsass Lothringen, or Mallorca for that matter 
"Just promise you'll call. Your brother made such a fuss when he became his own country, and he never calls! And zip up your coat, it's cold!" 
That's true,let's hope the new movie about it that's about to come out won't forget this. I'd hate to have another Battlefield 1 scandal. Yeah of course Napoleon angered like 95% of Europe, he was bound to fail eventually lol. But he did it with *panache* as we say. 
And you can make a case for theocracy during Cardinal Richelieu's period of importance (although that was admittedly before the French revolution). 
One of the few countries that became independent against its will. 
Netherlands would be more recognisable with: thats a lot of water lets turn it into soms land. 
The rest of the world calls it "pretty badass", we just call it a tuesday morning. 
Didn't we hold out for like 5 days? (Which, while short; was immensely longer than expected) 
Norwegians have them too, and Im sure the Danes do as well. In the Norwegian ones, the Swedes are almost always the dumb ones. 
Really its a "Don't go into enemy territory when conditions are poor. 
More like he shifts 100% of the blame to his next door neighbour while quietly escaping notice. 
IIRC i looked up his paintings once and they actually seemed good, i mean he wouldn't be as famous as he became later probably but he'd manage... 
Hope NZ Health care covers burns of that magnitude.. 
I mean, tea pretty much solves everything. Source: British. 
Hey we called in the thirties and even sent you a bunch money and supplies. 
Can confirm. Am from Newfoundland. Our version is "First the Vikings were here. Then the English were here. Then the French were here. Then they fought, and the French won. Then they fought, and the English won. Then they decided to stop fighting, and mama England gave us lots of money. Then we spent all the money. Then we joined Canada, because they gave us lots of money." 
I think it was in Liddel Hart's work on WW2 history where he says that when the rapidity of German movement and the scale of defeat started to dawn on French officers in HQ started crying or laughing hysterically as they tracked movements on the map. The strategy the Wehrmacht used was pretty shocking right up to the first 3 months of Barbarossa. As a fan of Napoleonic strategy, I concur. His fighting retreats after the ignominious defeat of 1812, were some of his finest moments. It was literally 1 v 5 and boy did you guys give them a run for their money! 
I'd love to know if there has ever been a war of dependence 
I just imagine a hung over dude stumbling out of his cottage by the ocean on a stormy morning and just yelling "Hey! Calm the fuck down! Some of us have to sleep!" then the water calms down right away. 
An active one too, the incidents are so frequent. 
5 times longer than predicted! Thanks history textbook! 
That's so funny, I felt the exact same way. Not about the first video, I'm not Japanese. But I am a person on Earth, and I loved History of the Entire World, I Guess. 
I think we have a lot of the same jokes, you just swap the nationalities around depending on how is telling them. 
it's utorrent, but I've just now realised that the "u" is actually not a u but something pronounced "mew" in the greek alphabet. 
Honestly they are kinda lackluster and boring, his attention to detail is not bad. I can see how a professor in fine arts would totally obliterate him on his work, the frustration slowly eating away at him over the years, eventually making him bitter and harsh. source: me_irl 
I attribute Brexit to the rise of Coffee shops getting everyone riled up. Lets just have a pint and wait for it all to blow over. 
I think WW2 was probably the ultimate "hi mom, hi dad. Sis. Been a few years. Brought some food, water, guns. Lots of guns. Heard you had a pest problem" 
Sooooorrta Texas? They were independent for awhile but they fought that war against Mexico because they wanted to join the US. 
It also looks quite a bit like Lisa Simpson giving a blow job. 
Yeah, I had a friend in norway when I went there as a kid and for literally every norway joke I knew, he had a norwegian version where the stupid person was a swede. Examples: How do you sink a norwegian submarine? You swim down and knock on the door. How do you sink it again? You swim down and knock on the door. They'll open the window to say "we won't fall for that again". Why are all houses round in norway? So the dogs won't pee on the corners. 
Odd though that he didn't get into art school. Seems to me that usually art schools let in kids with talent and then harness it. They don't throw you out for having the wrong direction. That being said if it wouldn't have been Hitler it would've been someone else. Germany was angry....buuuuut anybody but Hitler is probably a good thing. 
god I love that series. I need season 2 to hurry up 
Cities that exist: * ~~Hiroshima~~ * ~~Nagasaki~~ * Some others 
According to Wikipedia, the institute thought that he had more of a talent in architecture than in painting (since all his paintings had a building as the main focus) 
As a Canadian I think the hate for it is over blown and the love for it is dumb. It's a very mediocre but convenient place for cheap decent tasting coffee. I spend about 10-15 dollars a week on tims. $750 a year! I should buy a nice travel mug and just make my own for work. 
I will always laugh at and love when things are used for the exact opposite point. Jerking off TO the sexual harassment poster is fucking GOLD. 
Having been the kid who just has to lay there and listen to your friend jerking it next to, I can confirm that you indeed are very much awake and paralyzed. Spoke to other kids at school and at least two of them experienced the exact same thing at my friend's house. I don't know what is worse. Having listened to a dude stroke his meat under the covers next to you while clearing his throat 500 times (did he honestly think he was masking his moaning?) or having to awkwardly watch him eat yoghurt at breakfast the next morning? 
Like... Where on the internet? You know, so I can avoid those places. 
Not masturbation but I did something similar. I bought an electric nose trimmer and shaved far too much of my nose hairs. When I went to use my vibrating toothbrush all the tiny hairs vibrated against my nose and I was tickled and itching so bad I had to hold my nose shut while I brushed my teeth for a week. Sure I could have just turned off the vibration but cavities! 
honestly, you were 16, at that age you do ANYTHING to get laid 
Freud couldn't even decipher this shit. Fuck, man. 
Getting the guy horny to get the girl horny, still gratifying! Also, nice, uh .. post history! :D 
"Well if I'm getting fucked this hard I may as well get off" 
Can you provide context on how you guys came upon agreeing to do this? Like if you guys hated each other wouldn't she be disgusted at you wanting to hook up? 
Had to look up what scarowinds is. A FUCKING AMUSEMENT PARK?! I applaud you. 
that's so weird. sex wasn't even remotely appealing (didn't make sense, really) when i have taken lsd. similar with violence. i saw a bar fight that had tumbled out into the street when i was on acid once and i thought it must be some kind of act, like the fake shootouts at western theme parks or something. operating a phone, masturbating and arguing with security about it while on acid seems impossible 
Dude the exact same thing happened to me. But it wasn't a 6 year old, it was a line of people (5 or 6) and I had to pretend I was pooping 
I had sex with my gf in the hospital but we were in the hospital bed. There's like a half hour window there before a nurse comes in. 
Plot twist: the blanket was only concealing your head. 
Depending on what part of NJ, not that bad a drive. Would do this. 
I did this with the Warthog machine gun in Halo, pretty much sure a lot of people did 
I'm pretty sure you did need to continue the treatment 
I did volunteer work (Rita/Katrina) with the United Way in SWLA. Basically college age kids spent their spring break volunteering. Generally the first or second night every week you'd be trying to go to sleep in a room full of bunk beds and probably 40 guys. I'll just say the sounds of hands rubbing on sleeping bags throughout the night was reminiscent of crickets. 
I used to have some weird shit on my foot. I'm glad it's gone. 
I just got back from traveling abroad and while I was away, I broke my hair dryer. I couldn't figure out why it was blowing so hard and then shorted out until just now, when I read your comment. I know this isn't the main point of your post, but thank you for the providing the answer I needed! 
This reminds me of an important lesson I've learned about camping... If you are going to fuck in a tent, you might as well just assume the sound level is the same as if you fucked out in the open. 
You're in your wife's childhood bedroom on a masturbation thread? 
I'm a dad and I'm trying to figure out how I would deal with that. My first inclination would be "What the living fuck are you doing, you idiots?", not just because it's a dumb to do that shit next to your dad but also because I deeply resent people interfering with my sleep. 
Big mistake not asking for a mother-daughter threesome. That's how real life works, right? 
No comments, so I'll give you my applause. *claps* 
Don't mean to one-up you, and I'm not proud of it, but I was 15 and we had power when I did that. 
Who puts that in their OK Cupid profile? "Turn-ons include candlelit dinners, the way a man smells after working out, and the destruction of the Zionist usurpers." 
Surprised you didn't just jerk it in the elevator. Seems like that's what most of the people in this thread would do. 
Everyone noticed. The smell of sex filled the air. 
I have a sneaking suspicion this is way more common than decent folk would care to admit. 
My uncle spent 4000 dollars on a cam girl in a month. She was going to come visit him if he got her the 6000 she needed for a passport. Googled how much a passport was and it was less than 400. 
Yeah, totally avoid those! I would never want to see that! 
yep it was. I still have the vid. My mates have seen it. I basically stopped any form of internet dating from that point on. Infact i didnt wank for a month. NOt because of my balls. They were fine. They can hold that sort of weight easy. Tbh i felt slightly used and violated. Then i got over it and didnt care. There was no way for it to be connected to me in real life. No im not posting the vid. 
and you dont want to get pregnant with a tree man, i hear ents smoke weed like 24/7 
In the US (or at least my state? City?) you have to be 18 to go into sex shops. If you're young with a debit card, it's a different story 
When it happened for me with this same hate she actually proposed the idea. She was moving in a month she didn't want to risk having sex with someone with a disease. We hate fucked each other maybe 5 times or so before she moved. Felt bad about myself afterwards but during the sex was always gratifying. 
Dude like half my acid trips turn into jack fests if i gst left alone. Put the dick in the hole. Makes sense to me. 
"This will go a lot faster if the... third, I think? Woman in line would moan loudly. It helps me poop!" 
"Patient in room 4's heart rate is spiking, wanna check on them?" 
Statistically it's likely he's from the northern part of NJ. Also, most people from South Jersey will make the clarification. 
I was in a party with like 8 people and I'm pretty sure my friend did this. Someone mentioned it in a funny way like "ohhh you could keep this controller vibrating for a while" and then my friend went ghost on us and a few minutes later we heard a faint like, grunt from his mic and a minute later he was back on the mic and claimed his mom wanted him to do something. Thing is you know the sound the old headsets made when you took them off and on (if you didn't mute them which he never did)? His mic never made that noise before or after, leading me to believe he did the deed while also hearing us 7 guys yell his name 
nope, was just horny as hell so i crawled into fluffy's home and polished the dolphin 
You're probably the dad aren't u? A very understanding one. 
I was. Now I'm in her parent's room watching football. 
Yea, I'd have to shut that shit down just on general principle. You want to do some sexy fun times you spring for your own room. My room is for sleeping. 
If I had a bag of drugs I think real life could have worked like that. They were calling coke dealers at 6am before they got in their argument. 
YOU'RE GOIN' NOWHERE! I GOT YA FOR THREE MINUTES. THREE MINUTES OF PLAYTIME! 
As someone who's jerked off in a car wash before: I know. 
I actually still semi-regularly use Vicks. At least put some on the balls. I love this sensation. 
Wonderful sister, my dad was the same way kinda. ("You guys can hang out at our house alone today if her parents are ok with it") But oh god, did he at least get to change or did he have to brave dinner with cum-pants? 
"Six things I can't live without: - My phone - Coffee - Chapstick - Family - My dog Wiffles - Pizza! Notice I didn't include the state of Israel in there." 
There's a Curb Your Enthusiasm episode that's similar to that as well 
Who *are* you people? I didnt even like taking a shit unless completely necessary let alone wanking one out 
First one guy lights his dick on fire, then some girl lets her mom eat her vag-cucumber. 
That's crazy! I'm female and I was on Fetlife for a while. The opposite happened to me. A bunch of dudes would message me and ask me to blackmail them. I didn't really understand what they where asking, and I thought this was some sort of role play. One of them even had a website full of humiliating videos of himself, and he wanted me to send the url to certain people if he messed up. I thought it was just a game in which I was threatening them, until one dude asked me where to transfer money. I noped right out of there and cancelled my account. I just wanted to yell and spank some dudes. 
This one chick kept giving one of my friends a handjob like every other day at lunch. I guess they thought they were getting away with it until one of my other friends poured a carton of milk on the guys crotch mid-handjob and told them they were fucking disgusting. 
Miscounted. 90 year old Chinese lady begins "moaning" 
A guy once brought a game of Halo to a complete standstill because he was either watching porn or having sex with the mic open. Of course the entire team could hear it all, then the enemy team began to pick up on it since a few of them got near enough for proximity chat to kick in. Everybody stopped fighting and just listened trying to work out what he was doing. 
So are you ever going to clean that shirt, or frame it like people do with sports jerseys? 
"Hey, girl. You ever snort coke off an immediate family member's asshole?" 
Didn't they get him drunk and essentially rape him? 
The heavy eye contact with the security camera is a bit of a giveaway 
Palestinian Chicken. Also one of AVClub's few A+'s 
I used to make out with my boyfriend in the back of our friends car when his mom drove us from church (around 13/14years old). I thought we were sneaky until like 10 years later, I ran into that friend and his mom at a bar and she said "Oh I remember you! You always let (boyfriend) feel you up and made out in my car!" Fastest way to make a 20 something year old blush. 
I take it every once in a while if I want to just fuck for like 4 hours straight. Multiple partner scenarios, for example. You can just orgasm, and keep right on going until it's basically painful to touch the damn thing. It is unwavering. 
And thats why i was on fet life. I wanted to test out my submissive side. And get pegged by a hot blonde. 
Everyday in middle school I remember this girl jacked her BF through his pocket everyday during lunch. It was kinda funny because it was blatantly obvious. 
And you sir, are you waiting to receive my limp penis? 
It's long gone. I believe I made it my go to jerk shirt... 
Mike: Sure. Remember that time you ate cum sandwiches? 
Just make sure it's not longer than 4 hours, or else it'll explode into mini penises. 
When other people have balls of steel, you're sitting there with your urethra of steel 
Who then explode into micropenises until you defeat the final boss 
gas, liquid, solid, plasma, Bose-Einstein condensate 
I remember in year 3 we had to answer a logic question about why there might be an uneven amount of shoes at the door. Id recently watched titanic for the first time so decided to write "one person might be a one legged prostitute". It helped that my mum was parent helper that day. 
Reminds me of when my wife worked in an undisclosed location women's shelter. My daughter wanted to see where mommy worked but we could never go. I was picking up my daughter from school when she said (in the middle of the crowded school hall) "daddy can we finally go visit mommy in the shelter". 
Another story you guys might like from the same classroom: Was going over tastes and food-related descriptions. I brought up the word 'sticky' and gave some examples, then asked if any 35+ students could think of more foods that are sticky. One quieter kid raised their hand and with the most serious look on their face: "Cum." Me: "...What was that...?" *mortified* Student: "Cum. Cum." Me: *No idea what to do or say." Another student: "TEACHAHHH, CUM!!" *Made chewing motion with mouth* Me: *Finally realized that they were saying "gum", because the G and C/K often sound the same to Koreans.* YES!! GUM!! RIGHT!!! I laughed for the 10 whole minute break after that class and still have no idea how I didn't while in front of the room. 
Yeah, I had a smart ass do something similar in my directions class. Me: "How do you go to the bookstore?" Student: "Use Uber." Funny the first time, less so the next 7. 
I tried so hard And got so far But the after was here It doesn't really matter 
Reminds me of an anecdote I heard in another thread. An Asian guy was grocery shopping in America, but couldn't remember the English word for "chicken." To remedy the situation, he grabbed an egg, walked up to a cashier, held up the egg, and asked "Where is mother?" 
You know what I don't get about that story? Why is the pig the one who becomes famous? The real news is the fucking supergenius spider who knows how to think critically and write in English. Who cares what it thinks about the pig; I want to know its thoughts on the origins of reality. 
Whats sad is whe had to grade a first semester chemistry test once at university that was made for the medical students (I dont remember if the medical students were at first semester too .. they just took the test together with the first semester chemistry students but had an alternative version anyway). Thing is the grading sheet with the right answers was leaked beforehand ... one student wrote the correct answer down and then wrote "one point for every correct formula" underneath ..... How do you finish school without walking in front of a car if you are that damn stupid. 
I feel like this one in particular ~~can~~ you can get away with. 
Reminds me of a friend's story: I don't know about public schools, but for sure at private schools you get a little quiz-type test with a teacher before they confirm you're ready for kindergarten. One of the things he had to do was identify pictures. He aced the section except for the picture of the airplane - he looked and thought hard and then burst into tears saying, "I don't know! I don't know what that is!" Turns out his dad worked for Boeing and he was trying (and failing) to discern exactly what model plane the super-generic picture was depicting. 
"Why are you late?" "I had trouble with my bike" "what was the trouble?" "I didn't get on it early enough" 
Unrelated to this post, but related to this comment. I was working for a carpentry company framing up houses. I like to say this company was a bootcamp for framers because of the "gung-ho" ,hold nothing back work ethic. Any how, i had an appointment that was very important i arrive on time for and in the florida heat, any excuse to quit early is important. I know it is getting close to my take off time, I ask the foreman "what time is it, matt?" he yells back "its game time baby!!". I lowered my head in defeat and went back to work. 
What does idk mean? 'I don't know'. Nobody seems to know what it means. 
Oh man this reminds me of the time I tried to find an elevator at the Louvre. I found one, but it only went to lower levels, and I was trying to go up a level. I saw some museum employees and asked if they knew where there was an elevator to go up. They took me to this same elevator. I was confused and asked, "but does it go up?" They were like "Yes, elevators go up and down," rolled their eyes and walked away. 
That sounds like a strange acquaintance I have. A reporter once asked him (as your typical man-on-the-street average-Joe) what he thought of the Catholic sex abuse scandal and he said "if God ordains it, it must be done, even if it's molesting children." 
Similar thing happened to me. They took us into a room to "test our eyes" so I left my glasses in the classroom. After a couple lines they recommended glasses. So I went and grabbed them. They looked at me like I was crazy. Hey man, you wanted to test my eyes, not my glasses. 
I don't think anyone I work with has any of this kind of integrity. 
Competently drawing the leftovers of an exploded balloon sounds a lot more challenging than drawing a single circle and a rectangular basket connected by lines. 
This reminds me of high school when i had this pretty attractive history teacher She was talking about jewels or something at a museum and i blurted out, "Mrs.____, i can show you some real nice jewels." And everyone bust out laughing and the teacher got very red and flustered/embarrassed and i look confused because i meant i would show her big diamonds and rubies like to jokingly woo her but the class and the teacher took it as i was referring to my genitals. 
I can't remember which grade it was, but probably second or third grade. Teacher was asking something relatively simple and no-one wanted to or knew the answer. "What's going on here? There should be hands up like trees in the forest!" "Maybe this is a logging area" said the joker of our class. 
"Yeah but who pays for the doctor to make you feel better?" "Daddy" *Shit* 
My friend is also autistic. Has led to similar "punchlines" to the classic corny jokes. "Why don't people play poker in the jungle?" "Because the undiscovered tribes who inhabit the jungles have had no contact with Western culture, therefore they would never have heard of any game called "poker", let alone know how to play it." 
Well, it's better than stone tablets, eucalyptus leaves and blood ink. 
Oh yea I forgot about that! I remember when the great Mexican nation joined the UK in 1500 under the great reign of Suleiman I. 
i get this pretty often from my students! my favourite is when i say "please be quiet" to new students and they ask their friends what i said...usually someone will come back with "shut up" 
I wanted it to be a zoology class and have him say, Uhh that's a lemur. 
"I am telling you this bus ride was the best bus ride I've ever had! Listen to me! Listen! People come to me and say 'Have you ever had any bus ride like this?' and I honestly say to them 'No, that is the most incredible bus ride ever!' Just amazing." 
Student: "Oh, teacher. You look so handsome today." Me: "Yes, I know, but you still have to take your quiz." 
Seriously it would never cross my mind to classify living animals as "things" either. Not even worms. 
You sound like you have traits from both terrible and awesome teachers! 
I was listening to a podcast about swearing, and this guy was saying that his daughter's class would just say "swear word" instead of actually swearing. But since swears are about context and emotion, the school ended up banning "swear word" because students were using it as a swear. I was thinking about that when my nephew got mad at me for saying "stupid." 
If I were in that class, I'd write a long list of similarities, then write "pure coincidence "for each of them. I'm adopted. 
Reminds me of some preschoolers I taught. We were going to read Goldilocks and the Three Bears and one kid *freaked out*. "We can't read that book! It has a bad word in it!" The book obviously does not have a bad word in it, but he was pretty adamant it had a bad word in it. When asked about it, he said "when the bears come back in and Goldilocks sees them she says 'OH SHIT! A BEAR!'" 
3) Run a plumb line of the roof and mark it. Use the meter-long barometer to measure the length of the plumb line. 4) Stand the barometer on end and measure the length of the shadow it casts. Measure the length of the shadow cast by the building. The ratio of the length of the barometer to the length of its shadow will be the same as the ratio of the building height to the length of its shadow. 
I did that same. I love art but I got frustrated with one project, and after redoing it twice, I just threw some paint on it and outlined some shapes in sharpie. She said she was "almost moved to tears" at my piece. I was like "Bitch what?" 
did you have pets growing up? Did they live long? 
I am still pissed I missed the "how to have safe sex" question on my 8th grade sex ed exam. I said use a condom. The "correct" answer was abstinence. 
anxiety, denial, exhaustion, heightened awareness, New York 
I mean, why else would there be an Uneven number of shoes? Lol 
This reminds me of my nephew when he was ~3. We dropped his mom, my sister, off at work, where she met a colleague outside and went in with him. Back at home, my nephew reported to everyone that he'd seen mommy "go away with a man". 
In high school, our football games were televised occasionally on the local public access channel. I had a friend, call him Kevin, who was a pretty good outside linebacker and had a few QB sacks during the game. In chemistry class the next Monday, our teacher opened the class by saying, "Kevin, I saw your SACK on television last night...it was quite impressive." Every teenage boy in class laughed for 5 minutes. 
I really *really* want to believe that they actually did mean Cum and just covered it up. Somewhere out there are some Korean's telling the tale of cum cum. 
As someone who once stood at a butcher shop mooing at the meat in an attempt to get them to understand I wanted to buy *beef* when I didn't know so much as the word *cow*, I totally respect this dude. 
Thank god we don't live in a world where talentless pigs hog the limelight. 
In high school (classes were in Spanish) a teacher was angry about people copy-pasting online material for homework. She claimed one essay even contained a "click here if you want to know more about Tutankhamun". One one of my classmates started laughing and the teacher told him "you shouldn't be laughing, you didn't even realize your essay was in Portuguese!". I wish I was making this up... 
During a similar test I was completely sure the color I was supposed to identify was dark blue, not black. I was so insistent that the tester got a few other people to look at it, and they decided that it really was a very dark blue. 
Reminds me of the time a teacher told me to "look it up in the dictionary" when I asked her how to spell "entree" (I had heard the word, but I had never seen it -- this was 3rd or 4th grade). I eventually gave up, as she refused to so much as hint that the word *might not start with the letter O*... 
My ex used to pick up hitchhikers all the time and my favorite one got in and instead of saying thanks or anything he immediately said "hey just to put you guys at ease you are statistically a lot more likely to murder me than I am to murder you." 
this reminds me of the sideways stories of wayside school books by louis sachar. the book takes place in an oddball school and there are many mishaps and whatnot, but at one point there was a chapter where the nutty principal wanted elevators (because the school was 30 stores high), but didn't want confusion as to which elevator to take. so there was an UP elevator and a DOWN elevator.. they only worked once. 
IMPOSSIBLE PUZZLE ONLY .00001% OF PEOPLE CAN SOLVE THIS!!!!!!! CAN YOU????? 
I did the same thing. I had an awful eye doctor who messed up my prescription so for years I could see better without my glasses than with them. The school decided to test us one day and I couldn't see the board out of my really bad eye, let alone any letters. They proceeded to chew me out about not wearing my glasses and wouldn't let me explain. I hated those school nurses. 
Or, forget the basket because it just said balloon, not hot air balloon. Even easier. 
Story time In high school, we had a history teacher that everyone insisted was perverted, but I never saw it, so I was all "you guys are crazy; he's fine." Being the immature sophomore that I was, I was part of the group of friends who would just poke each other in the side at inopportune times, you know, for the lulz or something. A friend of mine, let's call her D, could not control her reactions to save her life. D I were sitting next to each other in the middle of the front row. I reach to poke D, who then let's out a short, but really high pitched "eep!" In front of the class, teacher looks me dead in the eyes and says in a *very* loud and frustrated teacher voice "RelativelyObjective, stop fingering D." For years I insisted that it was unfortunate word play, but then I finally concluded "hey, maybe he knew how that was going to be taken." 
Kid in my school told this joke: Why was the pine tree on fire? Because it was snowing outside. He explained (because nobody got it) that it was a pine tree *inside* while it was snowing *outside* so it has to be a christmas tree with defective lights that caused it to catch on fire. He was so proud of himself... 
I have a similar situation. When someone offers a woefully wrong answer, I usually respond with "That's a good thought, but..." Once a kid asked what I meant, and another responded with "it means your answer was stupid!" 
Took me a second, the following second I fell in love with the kid. 
Do you always carry around a list of seemingly suggestive compound words with you? 
Ya, I wouldn't immediately think of "I". He never says cuntblaster but would that give me extra credit? 
What the cuss did you just say? Are you cussing kidding me? 
As a substitute teacher 5th Graders are actually the most low maintenence of anyone besides high schoolers. 
Hahaha, what?! I wonder who read him his bed time stories. 
5) Place barometer on edge of roof. From the ground, use a laser range finder to find the distance from the ground to the barometer. 6) Use the Mercury in the barometer to create mercury fulminate. Use the mercury fulminate as an ignitor for a large amount of black powder to demolish the building. The building's height is now 0. 
Q: how do you safely jump out of an inflight aircraft? You: Parachute I'm sorry, the answer was "don't jump out" Abstinence is a retarded answer here. The question asks you how to do the activity safely which means you need to do it. Oh well what I can I expect from a teacher who uses abstinence as an answer. 
My nephew told his mother I did bad things to him. I was putting him to bed. 
I once 4-pooled into a protoss and cleared his drones almost before the second wave of lings landed. He messaged me for 15 minutes about how I was a huge noob and should give up forever. I never cleared bronze league and that was the height of my SC2 career. 
And look at you now! Typing with more grammatical grace than most native speakers! 
You... actually just made me re-think the intended message of that story. 
Lol i once remember my friend copied off someone on a spanish quiz. Unfortunately he copied the name of the person on it aswell so the teacher was confused as to why one person had two quizes lmao. 
The real question is, if you have a wolf that listens to you, *why the fuck would you leave it behind*? 
The teacher was soooooo concerned, and his mom just cracked up when she heard what happened. 
teacher: look it up in the dictionary me: i can't spell it, how am I supposed to find it? 
In English, we just call that a plain old Junior Army Cadet Plane School Training Cadet. Nouns can modify nouns, we just have spaces. 
I worked with a Nguyen Nguyen. He said his first name was pronounced differently from his last name. No matter how carefully he said it, no matter how carefully I listened, they sounded the same to me. Twenty years later--and I still wonder if the joke was on me. 
Oh my goodness, I could not be a teacher and hold a straight face. 
We were on a long ski lift mixed in with a French school group. They clearly figured out we were English speakers and kept shouting basic English phrases at us with no interest in an answer. One of them really ran with it and just absolutely yelled: ***"NICE TO MEET YOU"*** ***"NICE TO MEET YOU"*** ***"NICE TO MEET YOU"*** over and over again. (Or some similarly banal phrase from English class, I forget). 
That is actually very close to what he says in the cockney language version. 
Except the kids probably discussed the fact that he never refers to himself as a singular being. 
I had my next door neighbour kid come to me and tell me about how he learned the "c" word in school. He was grade 6ish. I was like "okay .... whisper it to me". It was Crap. All was well with the world and I let him continue believing what he thought he knew. 
I'm thinking an uncle. I have two uncles who played jokes similar to that. 
Black powder isn't a great explosive for performing demolition. It tends to deflagrate rather than detonate, and mercury fulminate, while a great primary explosive used in building up your explosive train, isn't reliably initiated by convenient means. 
When i was in kindergarten I told my teacher my mother did drugs because when she drank her morning coffee she always said she needed her drug. 
4pooling when you started with 6 workers? Might've found your problem :P 
I thought he was going to start a pun chain with the hog the limelight joke 
If it listened to you, you wouldn't have to keep it away from the sheep. 
The next twist is, if you took all the replaced parts and built another bike, which one would be the original? 
Maybe he had a habit of actually using the hand soap? 
I'd love a remake with Alan Ford (Brick Top from Snatch) as Gandalf; "You shall not pass, you fiery fucking cunt! Now fuck off back to the netherworld!" *Gandalf's leg is snagged by the falling demons whip* "Gadalf nooo!" *Gandalf struggles but his grip is slipping* "What da Fuck are you dozzy little cunts gawpin' at! Fuck off while ya still got the legs to carry ya!" *Gandalf drops into the abyss after the demon* "Think you're fucking hard you lavafaced gobbshite? I'll fucking show *you* hard!" 
~~He never refers to himself in first person.~~ He refers to himself as a singular being all the time. **My** precious, or mentioning his own name in 3rd person. e: I guess he just never says "I". u/boubird below pointed out that "my" is first person, my b 
He learned "crap" in grade 6? "Blowjob" was the word of the year when I was in the sixth grade. 
My mom made us call them toots. I once accidently farted in front of my friends AS AN ADULT and said "Oh no I tooted!"... One of my friends laughed so hard they actually pissed themselves. I will never live it down. 
Well that's kinda your moms fault since she referred to it as "her drugs" around a 5 year old lol 
Cynical social commentary rounded off with a puerile pun. I like to offer something for everyone. 
Ew yeah. I'd never just sanitize after going to the bathroom. Still feels dirty unless I actually wash them. 
My father, who cusses like a sailor, has always used the word "spoot." Which to me sounds dirtier than either fart or toot. No idea why. When my middle child (now seven) was a toddler, he used to announce, "My butt sneezed!" We still use that sometimes. 
My mother used to think it was funny to pronounce doughnuts "dog nuts". When my kindergarten teacher asked what my favorite breakfast food was that was exactly what I told her. My mother was mortified! 
Can we all just appreciate this for the perfect example of irony that it is? 
I think spoot sounds worse because it sounds wetter than toot. 
Yeah, that's probably it. Gives it a real *moist* sound. 
Basic principle of economics. Diversify diversify diversify. You avoid the huge fickle swings of the market. 
I remember reading about people saying that the air smelled like "burnt oven mitt" for weeks afterward and I thought "Doesn't anyone realize what you're all breathing right now?" 
Damn good call I told several quacks, repeatedly, that a particular antibiotic wasn't working against an infection I had. They ignored me because I'm just a stupid patient and not a MedigoD. Lo and behold, about ten months later, some Germans published a nice little paper saying, "Umm, hey, guys, this shit doesn't work against these two entire classes of organisms that it's approved for, it just puts the bugs into a suspended state and they come back, with the added bonus that the stress changes them so that the test we use doesn't detect them any more. So, umm, those patients who are still sick. . . ." Fuck you, Bayer A.G. 
I used to work at a deli and left just before it shut down. I predicted it would go out of business in three or four weeks and was spot on, even though the owner hadn't said anything explicitly. 
Jeff and Sally are looking for a house to flip. Jeff is a part-time pizza delivery boy and Sally is a homemaker. Their budget is 800,000 for the property and 400,000 for the materials and labor. 
I called this one too. I saw the same interview, and while I don't recall her stressing her professional relationship with him, the way she talked about him was just so personal the interview stuck in my mind 
Bloody hell. That cast didn't do too bad at all with their future projects, did they? 
Looks like the grandma herself disabled the brakes. 
An acquaintance of mine is dating a person currently incarcerated for selling drugs. A few days before he was arrested, he was posting pictures on social media of him purchasing a Corvette with stacks of cash. I told her he is stupid and absolutely going to get caught. What baffles me is how he himself was deluded enough to not see this ending coming from a mile away. 
I did an internship with WF Subprime Home mortgage in 2006 and even as an idiot 22 year old I could see that giving mortgages to people who I wouldn't trust to pay me back for lunch would bite us in the ass. 
Wait, she's back to normal now? If that was all marketing then she and her team are geniuses. 
Interesting way of predicting Border's demise. I'm still quite heartbroken over that loss. 
Broke five different kinds of lines but no one thought to stop after 1 or 2? 
I remember in primary school there was this weird kid, his dad was really into gadgets and novelty stuff One day the kid comes in with these stupid wheeled shoes and we all laughed. Nobody had seen anything like it before, he just looked silly This was years before just about every kid seemed to either have or really want a pair 
Yeah, 3D is a flop, but I read somewhere that the reason why entertainment companies produced 3D movies was to force theatres to upgrade their system to digital. That way they did not have to pay 8K for the rolls anymore as everything became digital. 
Grew up in a farming community where our grandparents were generally products of double digit numbers of kids... the amount of dirt you hear about the family scandals as you age and people aren't so careful of keeping you out of the loop anymore is significant. I mean, I'm not talking necessarily illegal scandals and whatnot, but considering the number of them attending church and preaching abstinence to the younger generations, the number of related baby-having-outside-of-wedlock-and-secretly-adopting-out incidences was eye-opening. Like, one family I know of, half of the 6 elderly daughters have such a skeleton in their closet from their youth. 
in germany the taxi companies got together and got uber banned. 
That's called a "Chekhov's gun", it's a theater/literary device. 
Even as a person who doesn't know much about this kind of stuff the first time I saw their timetable I knew there was no fucking way. You plan on essentially inventing, testing, and putting into use concept systems that have never even been attempted in like 10 years, on a trip where the stakes are "it works perfectly or everyone dies"? Not going to happen. 
Tallahassee never thought they were going anywhere, he just had to find them. 
As a Christian, it's EXTREMELY creepy to me how involved the church gets in people's sex lives. 
Suicide Squad and the newer Fantastic Four movie too. Everything in those trailers looked like a gigantic mess, and, surprise surprise, that's what both movies were. 
Did the same with my grandmothers house. It was an absolute trash heap and required Tens of thousands in repairs. We figured the market was never going to be better and sold it as-is for over $100K. That was in early 2007. By the time the purchaser finished repairs and resold it, the local market was in the toilet. I think they resold for $110K or something. It was excellent timing. 
Don't fret, unless you get the actual means to make the system rest assured a lot of people probably had a similar idea and never had the ability to make it. I have a lot of ideas I think would take off, but didn't study cs or programming so I haven't done them. 
One thing I've learned in my 50+ years on this planet: when people show you their true nature, believe them. 
Anabolic steroids don't cause testicular cancer...but if you already have cancer it creates a perfect environment for it to grow. Usually any athlete that stands out above the rest is usually on peds if not they are a certified freak of nature. The only pro I don't think is an peds or at least a smaller amount is lebron. The guy is a gift from god and just hit puberty early and hard and was born well proportioned so it made him even more athletic/coordinated. 
When did you realize it was gonna be a multi-million dollar game 
All I wanted to do was watch some wrist rockets, is that too much to ask? 
Sometimes we win. I had a 2%chance from a different type of trauma. Good to meet another lottery winner. My life treat you well friend! 
Me too, my dad kept lying to her and convincing her he wasn't and would never. Anyways I called that number for my mom the person didn't answer. I left a calm message explaining I was his daughter and he's been married for over thirty years. Anyways the next day my dad is crying and refuses to ever talk to me again. 
Did you say it backstage a 30's theatre set, dresses in fur with bold and dramatic exclamation whilst waving your diamond-tipped scepter in a semi-circle? Or mabe it's just me. 
In about 85 we were learning about microprocessors in a digital electronics class. I told some classmates that we would be able to walk into a record and tape store with an IC chip and use it to buy any song we wanted. They acted like I was an idiot because no way that the information contained in a song could be held on a computer chip. 
Tyson and Bill are trying to follow in the footsteps of Carl Sagan. Their mistake is in their delivery. Sagan always explained things as if he was discovering something for the first time, and in doing so invited you to join him in the wonder and curiosity of it all. Tyson and Bill explain things as if you're an adversarial plebe who needs it explained to you and they are the benevolent scientists there to enlighten you. Granted, the political climate of today and Sagan's day are very different and I believe that has an effect on this. 
What do you think happens if there's a student loan bust? Do millions of kids get their credit ruined? Does the government forgive it? I feel like forgiving the loans makes a lot of sense since it's something like over 60% not paying them. 
Fidget Spinners were pretty much forced into popularity. Hundreds of YouTubers where contacted to make videos on them, they where advertised everywhere 
People hate Airbnb? Hosts or guests? I recently started using it as a guest and I couldn't be happier with how my stays have gone. 
Ohh, a *SAR*casm detector. Now *there's* a useful device. 
My recollection of events from back then is that nobody believed the narrative about WMDs. We all thought it was about oil. 
Friend of mine said that there was a really cool twist near the end and I kept waiting for it until I realized the twist had already taken place. 
I got it in alpha just after the nether update. Still remember the big arguement against the game "the graphics look like shit". 
Nintendo absolutely knew *what* they were doing, they just didn't know *how* to do it. They wanted Gamecube-style consistent quality with Wii-style casual appeal. Problem is, they expected it to happen through some kind of... dark sorcery or something. Made zero efforts to get titles on the Wii U. 
If you can recall, remember the skyscraper-sized walls of smoke? Yeah, lung cancer rates are going to soar sadly. It's unfathomably tragic to think that the deaths from that event aren't over yet. 
I worked in a grocery store as the manager of the entire store, our deli manager, who had almost 20 years in was quiting to go manage a sandwich shop that was opening up, they offered her a $1 more an hour (she had a union job with full benefits she was leaving) I advised her against leaving but she ended up quiting & burned the bridge with our chain, fast forward 8 weeks after she got the sandwich shop up & running they let her go, she came back asking for her job, but there was no way we could hire her back, I ran into her working at a gas station/deli 2 yes later, she was working 20 hrs a week for minium wage. 
I just find it funny you 2 almost got the same names. 
I don't believe you can insure yourself from a failed marriage 100%, but I feel like so many people don't discuss important issues and sort of just sweep them under the rug for fear of losing their SO. 
lol I know your post is satire but I swear I saw an episode like that. 
"Come for the scenery, stay because everyone else in the world is dead from the plague." 
Same here. I watched The Secret Life of Walter Mitty tonight and remembered when the movie came out, it sparked my interest in going there. I read something recently that says now it sees more tourists at a time than it has residents. 
That movie is also a fantastic parody movie, not like the others that flooded theaters at the same time. 
Drug dealers who live frugally and don't sell to idiots can probably get by their whole lives without getting busted. Cops have their hands full with people buying luxury cars in cash, posting photos on social media, and driving around poor areas with the nicest cars by a mile. 
I worked at Wamu and when our mortgage lady was like "send me anyone, I haven't gotten a decline in 6 months" I thought But I sent her that lady that doesn't ever have money in her account, how did she get approved. So I inquired and was told that they accepted her income as stated. So I assumed she had great credit. Same lady came in a week later, she was mad and sat down at my desk. She had applied for one of our credit cards and had been declined. She wanted to know how she got approved for a new home loan but couldn't get a credit card. Her decline letter said she didn't meet the minimum credit score. That's when I knew it was time to go and quit a month later. 
The roaring 20's will last forever! It's smooth sailing from here on out! Then WHAM. Great Depression then the largest war in the history of mankind. That poor shoe shiner 
It was aimed at people who didn't' understand how ARM worked. Or who could be tricked into thinking it was a good idea and you'd be able to refi at an even lower rate before it adjusted upward. 
Shit was crazy back then. My wife and I were approved for a loan because she had a letter that said she was going to have a job. Mind you, she had not acquired a single paycheck in her new line of work. Just a letter that basically said "You're hired." 
Even in her crazy phase, she wasn't really acting that crazy. Apart from being really into weed and dressing like an insane person, she seemed completely normal and level headed in interviews. Girl just had her teenage rebellion at a late age, because she had a full time job when she was an actual teenager. 
That's a pretty huge lifestyle shift for it to not have been at least a little genuine. She didn't just have weird performances, she was smoking weed and talking about drugs and posting lewd photos pretty much on the daily for a year or two. While I think you're partially right about her capitalizing on the marketing aspects of "going crazy," and was indeed glad to be abandoning her disney-star persona, she really *did* have a period of rebellion once she gained some personal autonomy, especially after years of being forced by Disney to be squeakly clean both on and off screen 
Yes, the demon possessing her left and went into Katy Perry's body. 
Whenever a business struggles to pay suppliers, utilities, payroll, or repairs it's a very bad sign that there's trouble with the cash flow. If there's a problem with the cash flow, that's a strong sign the business itself is in trouble. 
"We already broke 2, there can't possibly be more!" 
digsafe doesn't really do you any good on an industrial property because they only mark to the meter/demarcation point. works well on residential where the meter is at the house, but on an industrial site the meter tends to be at the edge of the property and the distribution within the site is privately owned/maintained. 
Communities like that tend to have a lot of seven pound "preemies", too. 
I heard them say that her and Jinger's wedding had to be done this way so as to prevent "haters" from sabotaging it somehow. Who knows. I like your theory better though 
The one kid IS gay. At least, everyone is like 90% sure. Except his parents probably. 
That would make way more sense than Steve Carell's time traveling brother. 
This I correct, I just watched it, but 1993 is a bit more impressive than 2015 
In the late 70s / early 80s at school there was talk of him having a mattress in the back of his van but we assumed he was having a great time shagging every bird he could. No inclination he was doing the nasty shit we've now heard about. 
In Brazil taxi drivers got together and beat the shit out of some Uber drivers for a while 
Or if they think you're drunk. I've been in a cab where he said "I give you good price if you pay cash, $40, you don't want the meter"... to go from Randwick to Central which is like 5km. Told him to fuck off when he flatly refused to turn on the meter "it's broken sir" and waited half an hour for the bus instead. 
I love Reddit because you can describe something loosely from memory and there's always that one cool dude who just knows what you're talking about. 
Even if their plan works, I think a better way to put it is "It works perfectly then everyone dies" as there's little to no way they'll have the continued funding to supply the "colonists" more than once, if that. 
Board games are a pretty solid go in my experience, a few hiccups but they're not fad items so they usually turn out a result. 
FTL was kickstarted? Holy shit. What an amazing game though 
That's the most American paragraph I've read this week. Carry on, Patriot. 
You have *what*. *WHERE.* *HOW.* You guys never seem to stop to think if you should, before doing something because you *could* when it comes to food. And I love it. -Canadian 
I was renting a house from my best friends parents. They decided they didn't like that I had my girlfriend over on weekends when she wasn't in nursing school. They didn't like us "fornicating". Yeah, I straight up was like "What fucking business is that of yours?!". I'm a Christian too, but that really pissed me off. 
The moment I saw The Joker promo pics, I just thought "Oh... It's gonna be awful, huh?" 
We didn't over pay but we did pay market. We already had a lot of equity in the original property we sold, so there was plenty of equity in the two new to ride out the slump. The people who got into financial trouble were those who had little to no equity and ended up under water. Our equity dropped a bit but not deeply enough to lose money. Hope that explains it. Thanks for your question. 
I noticed how he would always skirt the questions about the exact nature of multiplayer. And I remember once there was a curious emphasis on how unlikely it would be that two players actually meet up (yeah, because it's not fucking possible). 
I remember I was in one of my classes in high school when a friend told me about this new game called "Minecraft". It wasn't blocked by the school, so I went on and started playing it (this was still when the game was in early alpha). I played it for the next hour. As soon as class was over, I leaned back in my chair and thought "This game is going to make fucking millions." I was right. 
I just wanted to take down some Super Battle Droids. 
it was awesome for about an hour until you realized that was the entire game 
Wow. Well good on you for getting him caught at least! I'd like to know I'd do the same thing but I don't know if I could. I've always had suspicions that my dad has cheated but I never found any proof. When I was younger, I wanted my parents to break up because my dad was so rotten towards my mom (and me.) But now that they're older, I don't think my mom could handle it and I'd never want to hurt her in any way. 
Thank you for pointing this out. Sagan was a boss at explaining shit. What I really liked about Sagan is that he also tried to incorporate the humanities into his work. Tyson seems to disregard them completely. 
The government stops giving loans or severely cap them. Which i assume would force colleges to lower tuition costs. 
Like most of these things, the impression is hipsters sharing, 90% of the reality is cut throat businessmen using it to get around safety legislation that was put there for a reason. 
But fuck those first responders getting healthcare amirite? 
Wouldn't it be advantageous to hire the person with 20 years experience back? 
Just change the words "to flip" to "to start a family" and you've got House Hunters. 
Throughout the entire interview, it vaguely seems like he's dropping random sexual innuendos alluding to an affair.. paranoid person's worst nightmare, but those two you mentioned definitely stood out the most to me too 
I agree, it seemed pretty normal. I've never slept with Chris Pratt but I talk extremely passionate about him. Lol 
In fairness that's not super difficult, the capital Reykjavic has like 200,000 people and it's by far the most inhabited part of the country. 
Cause it actually did more than just make references to things that exist. Amazing! 
Can confirm, have known drug dealers. Only the careless ones get caught. 
That punk must have been ashamed of himself. I feel bad enough when I cause someone to be late to a meeting, I couldn't imagine how bad I'd feel if I caused WWII and the Great Depression. Fucking nimrod shoe shiner 
That's crazy. I bought my house in 2013 and had to turn over multiple months of paystubs for me and my wife, all of our banking records and prove we had enough cash on hand for 6 months of mortgage payments. It's a small credit union but I hope most mortgage lenders are doing something similar. 
She perfectly capitalized on marketing to her base. All the little girls who watched her TV show went to high school and bought in on her new rebellious persona. 
I have no doubts that she fully lived the lifestyle. I think who ever was behind the scenes helped her to capitilize on it 100%. I think it is weird to go from being a child star where everything you do is scrutinized so much by adults all over the world and controlled by the brand you work for, to suddenly having the ability to do what you want. It seems like a lot of stars that are connected to Disney and other large brands go through a really rocky period after they aren't under contract anymore. 
This is totally a thing. When I worked for Linens-N-Things; we were nutty about our fake wood "racetrack" (main isle through the store). If there was a skuff mark or anything on it you stopped everything and fixed it. A corporate visit would be derailed if you even had a dust bunny or small blemish on it, so it was a big deal. Well, one day, we had a piece of it about a foot and a half long come up right st the main entrance. I went into panic mode and immediately did a "heat ticket" (what we used to call a help desk ticket (this shows my LNT cred)). Well about 15 minutes late I got a call from store maintenance directing me to go to the Dollar Store and buy some duct tape to tape it down. I had him email that direction to me and I was shocked when he did. I redid my resume and started the hunt that evening. 
"Okay now four makes sense. I guess. In retrospect. There can't **be** anything else to fuck up. We'd be idiots to stop at this point - at least we'll be able to get production restored." *Five*. 
That spelling bothers me so much. I mentally pronounce it "Jing-er" when I see it and I can't help it. 
Yeah and they sent the poor kid to that awful camp where they reprogram wayward cult members. That whole sect is so fucked up. 
Quick, delete any awkward reddit history from your account! 
The imitation butter flavor is what leads to "popcorn lung" 
In Poland taxi drivers stopped supposed Uber drivers (sometimes just people who drive with phone navi) and broke their cars and called "road transport inspectorate" (basically police for professional drivers) on them. 
If there are people on mars, someone will get together the cash to feed them. There's no shortage of people willing to spend money saving first-worlders 
We just got our dark souls board game but that had monthly updates and there wasn't a point where we were worried about it. 
It has it all. Twinkies, dollars, Amazon, capitalism, bourbon, and Samuel Adams for months. All it needs now is the American flag and a AR15. 
Says the country that invented poutine, a food that shouldn't really work but it's the best thing ever. 
lol we were offered a place to stay by my boyfriend's great uncle while we were visiting his city. We show up and are firmly directed to two different rooms with several rooms in between us, because 'we don't believe in that'. Um... We were not warned beforehand that this would be the case, and we weren't intending to do 'anything' in their house because that'd be weird. When we visited each other's rooms we had to have the door open. I was 29 years old. We were pretty upset and insulted. We often joke that when we get married we should go back to visit and then loudly make sex noises, they can't complain as we're married? :p 
Seriously. Regardless of my beliefs on the matter I have never been deluded enough to think that I need to voice my personal opinions on what two other people do with their genitals. It's gross. Like, I want to know how this situation went down. How would the pastor even find out and why would he think it's his place to call them out for it?? You're there to teach, not enforce. It's just creepy. I slept with my boyfriend at 18 and someone ended up finding out, telling the pastor, and having a meeting with my parents??? I was fucking EIGHTEEN! I was legally an adult. Fucking creepy, man. Whether or not that is considered "ok" by religious standards does not negate the fact that you have no fucking business discussing or "calling out" one adult's sex life with/to other ADULTS. Sorry, this is a touchy subject for me lol. It's very violating. 
Ya the whole hot topic joker was a complete mess. Like who the fuck gets 'damaged' tattoo'd on their forehead, it's like something a 45 year old thinks would be cool. 
I see, and it does. Having a smaller mortgage payment can mean a lot. 
Don't forget TF2 keys and hats. I would love a new Half Life, Portal, or Left 4 Dead but I don't know if it will ever happen... kind of sad. 
Yeah, I meant them as an example of a well-run business. Great model, great growth, always thinking about the future as well as the current fiscal. 
I somehow managed to avoid all of that drama. I didn't even hear about the game until after it came out. What all did they promise to deliver but didn't? 
There are still apologists out there that claim he never misrepresented multiplayer. Seriously, people don't get that saying "it's unlikely players will meet" is an indirect way of saying that players can meet; if he wanted to say there was no multiplayer he could have said "there's no player interactions" or something and then talked about the stuff that is shared via internet connection. 
I too played in Alpha. Simple yet addicting to play, true exploration. The game was updated constantly. I never thought it'd be this big but I knew it was going places. 
I'm a bank teller... I just cringed like crazy.... 
This would be really interesting because it could result in much lower university attendance and degree completion. This wouldn't have much effect in the short term, but if a whole generation was raised with prohibitively expensive tuition and no loans available to pay it, then degrees would become more valuable to employers as their workforces aged and retired. The increasing demand for degree holders and the decreasing availability of them would result in much higher salaries offered for those jobs, further driving income inequality. 
Plus all that lovrly concrete dust. Silicosis will be big in the next 20 years. 
Everyone thinks all criminals are dumb. But like you said generally it's the stupid ones that we hear about. 
I like to think it was a big rebranding scheme. Demi Lavato and Selena Gomez got out of being Sunny and Alex by becoming talented singers. Miley was already a singer, so she opted for publicity stunts that almost everyone forgot about. Miley is neither Hannah Montana nor crazy chick, she's Miley. 
Did you have him email it to you so you could show people why you left your current job or wanted to leave or just to make sure you weren't mishearing? 
Time to put your life savings into shorting the Bed Bath and Beyond. There's no way this can go wrong! 
What I really want to know is whether they stopped after the fifth line, or they managed to finish the job without hitting a sixth. 
- be depressed - take antidepressants - still be just as depressed - keep repeating with different antidepressants for a decade Am I doing it right? 
To add to this, the opinion about taxi drivers in Poland is very similar to their Australian counterparts. They usually drive 15 year old VW Passats or Audi 80s, run their taximeters as long as possible, often on wrong mode (and by some weird coincidence, it's almost always the more expensive one), drive around the city for half an hour when you could get to your destination in 25 minutes by foot etc... There are a few companies that don't suck, but they're the minority. 
I asked because where I live (Brazil) taxi is close to a mafia business, quite expensive and awful service. When uber arrived people were so pleased, taxi drivers had to swallow it - not without a fight. Now both services - and other uber like apps - coexist in relative harmony, prices went down and service is a lot better. I still go out of my way to avoid using taxis though - I know there are good drivers, but still have in memory the many times I had to cope with drivers talking or typing on their phones, driving like crazy and wondering around "by mistake" just to make a few extra bucks. 
The american flag and AR15 are implied. Obviously 
I mean it's fried potatoes, cheese, and gravy Those are things that work together in basically any combination 
I was reading this thinking "fair enough" if you guys were late teens or something, but 29?! 
"You are using your adult genitals in ways that I have not approved of you to use!" 
Then people went to the same place and didn't see each other on the day of release and he went with "Wow! amazing that you guys met on the first day, blows my mind" instead of actually clarifying anything. 
yeah, it was fresh thing at that time. Nothing was like that. Big world, freedom to do what you want... I was first playing that browser version and it was pretty boring after a while but I still played it. Then a friend told me that the version you buy has more of it and has survival in it. I tried it and maaaan I was blown away. But it was not early alpha, it was some early beta stage. I think 1,2. So I was a bit late to the party but... awesome game. 
Look everyone, even a bank teller is worried about this! 
I'm trying to remember the study, but the Federal Student aid program got a lot of people in the door, but didn't take them to graduation. Many people would start college, get some substantial loans, then never graduate. More people graduate now than ever, but more people drop out more than never as well. I'd have to really dig into the numbers, but I believe it could place a focus on public community colleges which are government subsidized. I'm not arguing one way or another, but I'm also not under any student debt, so I'm clearly biased. I'd also be curious about how many baby boomers/gen X parents saved money for their kid's colleges versus previous generations. My current goal is to save a decent chunk for my son's college education so he isn't crushed by debt. 
Makes me think. I wonder what I could actually get away with. 
Christina Aguilera went through that phase, too, to break out of her teenybop image. 
It was so outta left field that I wanted proof that this was the "fix." If my DM or a corporate partner came into the store I would expect them to fire me on the spot. That is what the culture of the company was around that floor. As a side note. I would not lower my store standards to allow duct tape. I just used liquid nails to fix it. 
Next line they would have hit was the natural waterline 
Same here in Portugal. Taxi's have a bit of a reputation of driving longer than needed to have you pay more, and when Uber popped up there where tons of manifestations and slow marches. They argue that Uber should also pay the Taxi Medallion they have to pay or else its not fair competition. Surprise, most people don't care, they just want a service that's reliable. 
They're propped up on either side of the monitor as he types. 
Yeeeep. We'd been together for a few years at that point too. We lived together. We were insulted because we were being treated like kids. We also had no warning, like 'oh they're religious' or something. 
I love how on Reddit everything slowly devolves into Star Wars Prequel quotes. 
I played straight through from alpha through full release. Hooked up with a server of great people which really aided in keeping me addicted. I've recently fallen away though. Fond memories. 
This is a tell tale sign that the bank workers have inside information about this crash. All the proof we need is in their reaction! 
A rival company opened factory in snowbelt. Hired ~50 people from our company. Within a year about 40 came back and were rehired because they couldn't stand foreign management style, and well snow. Except one guy who wanted to return. But before he left he badmouthed company to all and called those of us who stayed fools. Then in his exit interview he blasted the company and managers. That's burning your bridges. 
Read this in Mike's voice from Breaking Bad: Rule of thumb is to only break one law at a time. Trafficking drugs? Your tail lights, head lights, license plate lights, registration and insurance paperwork should be impeccable and don't speed or run red lights. Also drive a boring but not older than 10 year old car in good condition with no modifications, no subwoofers or loud music or exhaust. If you are white this isn't as important but if not get your windows tinted, but not the maximum tint, just enough so it isn't easy to see your skin color at a quick glance. Shower daily, get your hair cut short once a month and wear casual clothes, polo shirt and jeans or chino shorts. For shoes nothing fancy, black running shoes work well. No visible tattoos or strange piercings (not judging just don't be a criminal if you have them). Guns: If you think you will need one, don't do it. Oh, and the biggest thing: Pay taxes! You are now a freelance computer repair worker. 
That last line shows a lot of pride in your work, great to have no matter what you're doing. Good on you! 
*We kept going and hit magma, then hell.* *And kept going.* 
Some red, white and blue fireworks perpetually going off behind him. Literally in his room, dude lives dangerously.. 
I don't Star Wars Prequel quotes, they're coarse and rough and irritating and they get everywhere. 
I could almost definitely get away with dealing drugs if I wanted to. I'm a 31 year old middle class looking white woman. I've never even been pulled over unless my car registration is expired and I have a 100% success rate at getting off with a warning. So, if you want to avoid the cops I highly recommend being a plain looking white woman in a working class neighborhood. 
*Then Brooklyn, oddly enough* *and finally* super *hell.* 
When I drove a taxi during college we had a flat rate for anywhere inside the small city. Then we had set rates for popular destinations outside that area. A tip was never expected but always appreciated. I did this really weird thing where I helped people with their bags and opened the door for them and what not. I know crazy right? Also I carried a huge bag of laffy taffy for drunk people to amuse themselves with so they would leave me alone and I could drive. Drunk people are the worst. 
Haven't you seen Weeds? By the end of the second season your life will be terrible. For the viewers. 
Then a thin layer of caramel, which was nice, then back to Hell. 
Holy shit I hate this so much. Especially when it "pulls" the info from your resume but it fucks it all up so it takes you longer to fix it than it would have to just type it all in in the first place. 
The flying Koopa Troopas are NOT flying Koopa Troopas, as you assert, but Koopa Paratroopas. 
Noooooo oooooooone's Tall as Gaston Or has balls like Gaston No-one's farts melt the paint off the walls like Gaston 
Agreed. It's just so wrong. The entire point of the bag is to temporarily preserve what you have inside it and HOW CAN YOU DO THAT with excess air in there ruining your bagged item?!?! 
Cookies and cream ice cream is literally ice cream with Oreos in it. How meta are we getting that we have Oreos inside Oreos. 
Now they ask for Chrome notifications. Bitch, Google dragged me here because no one else has what I want, I don't want your shitty clickbait on my desktop all the time. I barely put up with it for Facebook, and I kind of like Facebook. You toss off. 
So they can aggregate user data and sell it on ad exchanges as an audience 
I would settle for my gf adaquatly rinsing hers out... 
Who puts a pair of scissors in a package that requires scissors to remove?! The reason you're buying scissors is because you DON'T HAVE FUCKING SCISSORS! 
And I'm also paying to hear every mother fucking curse word in every mother fucking song. I fucking paid for that, bitch. 
They do die. In the first Cars movie, the old Model T looking car has a dead husband. 
And why is fun size the smallest size? What the hell is fun about having less candy than everyone else? 
It's so bizarre, It's like they think their mom is going to read every reddit comment and ground them. It's the internet you're allowed to fucking swear. 
Same with trains (those who want to get out) . I've been pushed in by those getting in while I struggled to get out but couldn't. I've had to get off at the next station, go back one station to get down where I intended to. Indian metro is fucking scary. 
And please for the love of god, rent a violin from the violin shop for $20 a month instead of trying to bring your $90 eBay violin to lessons. $90 POS models are incapable of holding their tuning and will only frustrate you, especially if you're a beginner. 
I, too, was traumatized by a peacock as a child. It was chasing me around a garden until it got distracted by its reflection in a mirror and stopped to attack that instead lol. 
Don't get me started on how badly they fucked up the ending of the last movie. What happened to all the helpers who showed up? And Grawp? And the centaurs and house elves and hyppogriffs joining the fight? And then they took out the fight between Voldemort, Slughorn, McGonagall, and Shacklebolt?! And then instead of the awesome one on one confrontation in front of everyone, Harry defeats Voldemort OUTSIDE IN THE COURTYARD WHERE NO ONE IS WATCHING?!! Then he goes back inside and I guess everyone just assumes he won?!!! 
When the radio station says "1 hour of non stop music" and then interrupts their one hour of non stop music by talking about "1 hour of non stop music". 
Totally agree. I tried on my boyfriend's pants the other day, turns out we wear the same size. I couldn't believe the size of the pockets and all the things I could put in them. And he wonders why I bought a fanny pack. 
And over here (somewhere in Europe), they do because the law makes them put up a sign detailing the building company, amount of floors on the building, purpose of building, rendered picture of building, chief engineer for the project, as well as estimated date of completion. 
It's frustrating how many people don't get this. Especially using stairs at a bus or train station. 30 people coming up,the stairs, take both sides, the five of us that want to go down are like fish running against the stream. 
I agree. My mom and her best friend were aghast when they found out that I taught my toddler daughter that she has a vagina. I grew up calling it my "peeper." I have NO idea where my parents got that from. The first time I heard the lyrics "Jeepers creepers, where'd ya get those peepers?" I was HORRIFIED. Why would my parents do that? They were both college graduates. I think the word "vagina" was my mom's version of some people's "moist." 
It's worse when they do, but the exhaust for it is above the range, still in the kitchen. The point of it is to get smoke out of the kitchen, not circulate it. 
*sitting in my friends car* Him: "You wanna plug in the aux and play some music?" Me: "I can't, I forgot my dongle." EVERY. SINGLE. TIME. 
Right?? First of all, you're a grown fucking woman. Sit your ass down, you're being ridiculous. Second of all, if you MUST do this, then WIPE AWAY YOUR OWN PISS!!! I know you must see it there, you unsanitary monster. 
As the only person I know who still buys CDs, this is still how I order them. 
Adding to public restrooms: there shouldn't be a 2 inch gap between the door and wall. I don't want people peeking in at me while taking a shit. 
I've got a list of things I would change if I was ever made president. Make sirens/horns illegal on the radio Unify calculator and cell phone num pads Switch to the metric system Make a standard by which all belt loops are placed on pants 
The only time this is acceptable is when you take a bite and end up bringing the whole slice of bacon with you. And even then I usually just put it back on my sandwich. 
Totally agree. Since phones and tablets are becoming more and more powerful the games of my youth could easily be run on them. Any ports I've seen have been money grabbing shit heaps. For shame, game developers, for shame. 
I agree that sincerity is an important part of so-bad-it's-good, but I think another important aspect is that it has to have something compelling. That "Friday" song actually had a respectably catchy tune and singable lyrics. "You are tearing me apart Lisa", with that particular intonation, has an appealling melodrama. It's the mixing of these good bits with the terrible bits that make something so-bad-it's-good. 
Yes! Songs that have police sirens on them always freak me out when I'm driving. 
Chewie also didn't get a medal at the end of A New Hope, clearly Leia has something against him. 
Lime is back at Walmart for a limited time, according to their Facebook page. 
Cate Blanchett also lost Best Actress for Elizabeth to Gwyneth Paltrow that year. Fuck Shakespeare in Love. Lousy bribers. 
My wife just gave birth 2 months ago. While she was pregnant I told her that if anyone did that to her while I was there, I would silently approach the person doing it and place my have on their stomach. It fortunately only happened to her twice, and fortunately for me, the time it happened while I was there was my aunt. The look of realization on her face when I put my hand on her was priceless. 
My husband watched me push a human being out of my body..he cannot be near me when I poop. My body just stops. Can't do it. 
Yes. And I hate "plain" ice cream that gets labelled as vanilla when it just tastes like frozen milk. Vanilla is an amazing flavour that is very understated. 
MW dictionary did a segment on the word and acknowledged that while it is technically a word, its usage causes confusion and it should be avoided. I concur! 
6 years in fast food and you wouldn't believe how many people didn't understand why I did this. After I'd put the change in their hand I'd try to give them the bills. Most wanted me to just lay the bills flat on their hands but after the first couple of times the wind blew it away, I'd hold it until they secured it. I would literally have to explain to people how to hold things. 
Hell not even that. Just putting people in danger because they want to be a few cars in front is what pisses me off. 
Its not country in Texas unless u have a fiddle in the band. 
I always enjoyed charging people $10 to use the bathroom on roller coaster tycoon 
Imo, ALL of the holiday Reese's are better than the regular cups. Eggs, trees, pumpkins, etc. Better chocolate to PB ratio 
As someone from Ontario, your opinion makes me feel defensive and threatened, because my impulse is to defend bagged milk... but deep down, I know you're right. Bagged milk is nonsensical. 
And then adding a blown up version to the sides as a sort of background to fill in the black bars. Yeah fucking great, it was already useless on any 16:9 screen, but now I can't watch it full screen on my phone in portrait as well. Who does that, people with eyes vertically stacked? What's the use of vertical video when nature gave you a horizontal wide-screen view. Screw all these people, vertical video is a disease. OK I'm more pissed off than I should be... 
For the record, out of the 8 countries I've been to, I've never seen this not be the case. 
In my opinion, they were cute in the first movie, before they got individual personalities and were just a hoard of brainless yellow tictacs, they were a funny concept. But as soon as people realized that they were marketable as all hell, which was likely the plan all along, they just kinda overused what I saw as a joke you shouldn't overexpose. 
Well technically myth busters proved that if they attached roses life jacket under the door it would've had enough buoyancy to keep both of them afloat. 
Shouldn't it be called a mini trident if it has 3 tines? 
Some elevators have a 'call cancel' button, which will clear out all the selected floors. Then you should be able to select just your own floor. 
Whats so missing from a lot of weed culture (mostly north America and mostly younger people) is the 'light beer' of weed, are people who are going out for a drink or two annoying? No are drunk people annoying oh fuck yes they are.. Its the same with weed, its far more common to go from sober to silly giggly blazed which is annoying to others, having a little puff here or there is way less a thing but should be because its great.. 
E.L. James blocked me on twitter because I made this criticism. 
A full retaliatory nuclear strike using the entire U.S. arsenal was the only valid response to Creed's death in the ring. 
No. "Boneless wings" are supposed to be called chicken tenders, which are made by slicing up a chicken breast. Chicken nuggets are made from ground up chicken parts and held together with glue or something, I don't know. The point is, while you are correct that they shouldn't be called boneless wings, you are incorrect in calling them nuggets. You have insulted my love of chicken tenders. An insult for which I will not stand! 
Actually, some do. It depends on the type of sword, and how it's drawn. Only thin, flexible blades make the sound, so the movies are mostly bullshit, but it is real. 
Noooooooo ooooooooooone Sits like Gaston, Takes big shits like Gaston, No one's dick is incredibly thick like Gaston's! I'm especially good at ejaculating, Oh what a guy.... Gastoooooon! 
Lately, there's a new kind of cancer when it comes to notifications. Some script on the page monitors your mouse and just when it goes out of page, it shows full page vibrating notification asking you to sign up for some crap. And even more egregious implementations pop-up notifications with options like "Yes, sign me up!" and "No, I don't like to save money." instead of simple yes and no. 
Any image search I do has -pinterest tacked onto it. Fuck Pinterest. 
We go over my wife's mother's house once a week for a family dinner. After dinner no one will rinse their dishes, or scrape remaining food off their plate. Everything just goes in the sink and sits there until after we leave. It bothers me to no end. The first few times we ate there I would offer to help clean up, but my mother in law insists on not letting me. 
And in Cars 3 Doc Hudson is dead; but the guy who trained him is alive somehow? 
Once I was returning home from vacation and I was waiting in the very long line to go through customs. The line was one where you followed the maze-like path laid out by the rope barriers. There was a pretty generous amount of space between the ropes and an older foreign man just pushed through everyone who was waiting patiently for the line to move. People argued with him about his line-cutting several times but he didn't care - he just kept pushing towards the front of the line. I was quietly seething until he got to the front of the line, went up to the counter, and found out that our line was for citizens only and as someone on a visa he would have to go to the back of the next line over. Oh man was it delightful. He probably cut the shit out of the other line too, but walking that walk of shame was fantastic. 
Oh man, the worst thing is when some family thinks that since they have children they get priority to push through the line and then us brits will light a fire up their arses 
Back in the day (age 9 or 10) I used to frequent some various gaming message boards, and my dad would occasionally monitor what I posted to make sure I didn't do anything potentially dangerous, seeing as I was a naive kid. Of course, he also was super uptight about profanity and would bust my ass if he found any fucks or shits in what I posted. I like to think that's not the case for the people self-censoring on Reddit, though. The userbase on here is generally older than that. 
And my students wonder why they sound terrible on the $100 flutes they bought at Costco of all places. Spoilers: it's because they can't play a D in any octave, and the foot joint keeps falling off. 
Oh god, this reminded me of the time I used a green crayola marker to write on the keys on my great grandfather's piano (I was like 10 and trying to teach myself how to play). My grandpa has the piano now and I still see faint green spots when visit. 
And the last battle is A GOD DAMNED FIST FIGHT? uhhhh are you not wizards? What is this movie even about?!? 
The mayor of Juarez, Mexico lives in El Paso, TX. Can't say I blame him though. 
I bought guy jeans from Levi's for work when I worked in a restaurant. They wore like a straight leg cut AND THE POCKET WENT HALFWAY DOWN MY THIGHS. That's shit could carry my iPhone 6+ in the front pocket. Most of my girl pants can't even do that. 
That's awesome! The curious side of me wishes the same were true here. 
And every month, at a random date, there's one phone call from the warden. If you pick it up, you go free at the end of the month. If not, you stay another month. Sometimes it's disguised as a telemarketer pitch. 
Good lord, this really ticks me off. I'll warn you now, don't *EVER* go to Korea. I've done a fair amount of traveling, and I've never found a nationality of people who are so *bad* at walking, as the Koreans. They're great at many things, and the country has some wonderful things about it, but you will constantly be stuck behind 4 people (often women/girls) walking side by side, perhaps holding hands, walking slowly, window shopping, edge to edge on the sidewalk, with alternating speeds. When you eventually push your way through, they'll look at you like you're a crazy person. I'm used to US city walking. Inline, at a quick pace, with purpose, weaving in and out, and filling into the open spaces. You should walk, like you're riding a motorcycle, among trucks and cars. Koreans walk like they're playing some sort of twisted version of window shopping red rover. Amazing food though. 
And in some contexts people don't even mean vagina, they mean vulva. Not teaching the right terms leads to a lot of ignorance and confusion, like people thinking women only have one hole for everything. 
Dongles are just hippy way of saying adapters. Be classy my friend 
Third of all. If you are going to hover, just put the seat up. It isn't like you are using it and you know you would bitch about a guy who didn't put the seat up. 
The best is coagulated period blood on the walls. ON THE WALLS. What the hell, fellow women? 
That really is just a US thing - I've never been to another country that has this. It really put me off my stride when I was visiting! 
They added micro transactions and crafting to the remaster of call of duty 4, and it didn't include it's original extra map pack, and when they did release the map pack, they charged $5 more for it than it originally cost 10 years ago 
I payed $11 for rocket league and have played over 1200 hours, that's a pretty good ratio. 
That flower shop scene belongs in a montage about an anxious guy's daily life or something. The terrible pacing and odd delivery just make it so uncanny and rushed on Wiseau's part. 
A lot of spotify ads are just unnecessarily scary. I have to walk on crosswalks a lot and I swear it never fails, every time that car honk one comes up, I'm at a crosswalk. I mean geez, all they're promoting is Spotify, to people already using Spotify! 
She has been trying to get that walking carpet out of the way for years now. 
I can see it now. The year is 2022, the first special editions begin to release. A cgi Leia hugging Chewbacca is the first of many changes. 
Chewie is Han's bachelor bro who always gets Han into trouble and to Leia is a huge reminder of Han's less glorious days. 
The top comment is about stickers, and now we have Gwyneth Paltrow. Fascinating the meme miscrocosmos is. 
See that's why I think we should have super oscars every ten years. Would be awesome to recognize the truly amazing movies of the decade. 
For those wondering the other nominees were; 'Brokeback Mountain', 'Munich', 'Good Night and Good Luck' and 'Capote'. 
I don't think that many women are, it's just usually easier to smile and brush it off than cause a scene. Especially with little old ladies. No one wants to be the "crazy hormonal bitch" that yelled at a "sweet old lady" who was just trying to touch her belly. I hate it. Many pregnant women will let you feel their belly if you ask (although usually there's nothing to feel anyway so I don't see the point), so why do people have to do it without permission? It's so frustrating, and it's not like it stops once the baby is born either. I know plenty of moms who have had their babies touched and grabbed by strangers. It's insane. 
This confused the hell out of me and still is annoying if I see something in the supermarket that is labeled vanilla: it is like black spotted delicious or bland bland bland. 
I care around the medium-mark, maybe even medium-low 
I agree the tech s outdated, but instead of spending money on hardware they could just set them to switch to flashing every night at 12am. But yeah I don't disagree with you. Hopefully self driving cars will fix this problem for good soon. 
I love the scene where Sam calls Freddy a fucktard 
Arrested Development wasn't a drama show? That's a low blow! 
You can save two seconds, or make someone's last Christmas their LAST Christmas... Seems worth it. 
I always charged $0.10 or thereabouts. The minimum required to not lose $50 in operating costs every month. Because I'm not a monster and customers were fully able to pay any denomination if the sum total of their cash holdings were greater than the cost of anything. 
I love Europe, but the lack of bathrooms there pisses me right off. The absolute worst was when I was visiting Denmark recently, and the pay toilets at the train station could only be unlocked by sending a text to a phone number. A phone number that I couldn't text because I had a Canadian phone. If there hadn't been other people standing around, I'd have pissed on the door in frustration. 
In cheap, smaller buildings I've seen floor 1: rooms 1, 2, 3, 4; floor 2: rooms 5, 6, 7, 8; floor 3: rooms 9, 10, 11, 12; etc. 
I'd say even in the second movie they were alright. Then they got their own movie and they had to find a way for them to carry a movie...I don't hate them but it's clearly cashing in on something kids latched on to. 
You know who really gets on my nerves? Mycenaeans. 
It's more common than you'd think, it's just that people who do the solo puff don't talk about it and just enjoy the buzz without being blazed. 
If my partner treated me or tried to treat me like Edward treated Bella I would be out. 
Right. One has identifiable meat with a real chicken texture, and the other has the texture of amalgamated chicken bits. Tear each apart and the difference is clear. 
How long did it take for you to realize buffalos didn't have wings? 
Noooooo ooooooone's Nice as Gaston Heals sick mice like Gaston No one's scored quite as high on FreeRice as Gaston His charity work is an iiiinspiraaaation 
I'm mainly saving that air I paid for. The Doritos are just a formality. 
I will always upvote any post shitting on Pinterest. 
My mil's is the same way. I still rinse my dishes off completely. It's infuriating because if everyone takes a few seconds to rinse, washing takes significantly less time. 
Is he dead? I don't remember them specifically mentioning that. Though it was sort of weird the whole time. And he did have the big crash. Maybe he had some chronic condition from that. 
You mean stare at them with narrowed eyes and pursed lips, don't you? 
Are Costco flutes like 13ft long? I know Costco does everything in bulk, so I'm just curious to now if they give you more flute for your buck. 
How can you tell if it's a good instrument from a bad one? 
One of my students did that to my piano while I wasn't looking. That was the last time I let the crayons out of my sight. 
I know. In the first Wizarding War, he disappeared after the Boy that Lived, lived, and the Potters were killed. Then, 13 years later, he returns to terrorize the wizarding world again, and three years later, the Boy that Lived is killed. And then comes back to duel and disappear again. How is the Wizarding World not to believe that Voldemort isn't going to return again? 
These seem worse than "the next town over". It's not even the same country! 
A friend of mine found a WEDDING DRESS with a pocket hidden in the ruffles of the skirt. An actual pocket big enough for her phone, tissues, and a few odds and ends we gave her for luck. She said she'd have bought it even if she hated the dress because of that pocket. And yes, she spent the whole day telling everyone "And it has a POCKET!!" 
I wore my new dress out for the first time last week while shopping for a new couch. *Four* different saleswomen commented on how cute it was, and every single one of them gushed when I showed them it had pockets. Pockets on dresses are universally fucking amazing. 
I noticed signs like that when I studied abroad in France and a professor told me it had something to do with the use of public funds over there. The law was boiled down to "if you're using the public money, the public must stay informed" 
I went to a Big 10 University and the Korean students did the exact same thing here. It was annoying as hell trying to walk to class when they're 6 wide walking at half the speed of smell. 
I'm a dude, so a bit different yet related, is that my old roommate would never pick up the toilet seat when he would piss. Never. And he would leave piss on the seat!! Like I know it's just us dudes who live here, but we still have to sit occasionally. We still have lots of friends over who will go use our bathroom. It was disgusting and I felt so bad any time girls were over because I'd have no way of knowing if they were gonna go to the bathroom and find piss on the seat. It also made me paranoid that people would associate it with me doing it, and that's not cool since I'm a neat freak who keeps his stuff copacetic. 
Right? For the love of everything, please clean that up. And maybe don't swing your used tampons around or whatever. Good lord. 
I am a male and I always see messy as fuck public men's bathrooms. I am very afraid to imagine what the women's restrooms look like if men's are clean in comparison. 
Micro transactions and crafting to cod4? What the fuck lol 
Hey! Jeff does his best to fix what he can! It's not his fault he doesn't know a SATA cable from a USB port! 
If anyone talks during that scene when I watch *The Room* at my place, they get kicked out. The flower shop scene is *The Room* experience in a nutshell. 
To be fair it must be hard to get sexy time in when he is curled up at the end of the bed. 
Chewbacca isn't a bachelor, he has a wife and child on Kashyyyk. There seems to be absolutely no video evidence of this, though... 
Good on you for not being a dick and correcting them. We can all agree that the proper response is to leave and then cut off all contact with them forever. 
I'm not even sure I believe it's true, has she never watched a funny movie? 
Ceptia also sounds like a disease you would catch from a public toilet. 
I'm hoping the third movie isn't too minion heavy, because the overall plot of the mainstream Despicable Me movies is actually really unique and funny. 
Yeah, but I'm going to eat about two pounds of them regardless. 
speaking as someone who has had the same problem, about as long as it took to for me to go "ohhh" and quickly google it before I wind up saying something like "bruh have you ever thought about how buffalo wings taste like chicken sometimes" and bringing dishonour to my family 
Have you tried that new Dorito air? It's smells wonderful, but my doctor said my lungs are coated with cheese dust. 
Classical Instruments are really one of those things where you get what you pay for. There are diminishing returns, but that $200 violin or $300 cello is not gonna be a good choice. They can still be chinese made, just not pumped out of a factory that uses gorilla glue and plastic fingerboards. Look for actual wood, actual inlay, and of course, play it before you buy it. Also, going to a professional shop that is specifically tailored to your type of instrument is a good choice. 
I'm totally loving this comment. Like yay I'm getting married and oh by the way in the best day ever it will be even better cuz my wedding dress has pockets!! Double score! 
Woah! I can't believe this didn't occur to me before. I just walk around holding junk like an idiot 
It is even mandatory for private buildings, my neighbors had to put up one when they built their house. 
Yeah, they also don't seem to understand that when they are on a collision course with someone else, that they need to adjust their speed or direction. I've also had it where I'm walking at a constant speed, on the side (so I can't adjust my course), and someone walking across my path, has just run into me. I'm not sure what it is. When I was in Korea, a friend of mine was actually googling to see if he could find any research about it. Whether there was a reason that Asians, specifically Koreans, seemed to have less awareness of people around them. From my experience, it was just in Korea and the rest of Asia, because I didn't notice in the US, and I lived in an area with a lot of Asians. 
When they do that, you should pull to a stop with your bike perpendicular across the entire path, and eyeball them as they have to walk around you. Then, when they're past, continue on. 
I picked up the game a couple years ago on reddit's suggestion, 800 game hours and a beast computer later I still enjoy the fuck it if it. The devs behind the game are solid. 
Jeff...one is a cable and one is a port...how did you even get this job...? 
He hates sand, so it only makes sense that he hates sand people. 
You made me think about it, but then made me smile. Maybe the healing has finally begun! 
It's the right thing to do. I have to be able to live with myself. 
The trailer showed them with all their past masters and that pissed me off. I was looking forward to seeing them bumble along with other evil bad guys but nope. They already had spoiled it. 
That's the right way to do it. If you can't type the curse word leave it out entirely. 
I wish I could play a chromatic harmonica before I buy one. They don't like that, though. Same with wooden recorders, too. 
Except if it's a P-Bone. Apparently those actually don't sound like garbage. 
I walk around holding my wife's crap, looking like an idiot. 
Me too, looks like the bookstores we frequent aren't run by assholes. 
Whoa dude... just because some people on Tattoine may call each other "sand people" doesn't mean it's okay for you to use the term 
I should point out that in our large bookstore, we usually attach the peel-off stickers to new releases. Never (or rarely) to backlist titles. The only exception would be bibles (some of our highest theft numbers come from bibles being stolen. Just feel the irony there,) test prep books, and the dreaded DSM-V, which is so often stolen that we keep it behind the counter. 
I'm guessing it's signature recipe is the Chocolate Mousse? 
That's the part that made me giggle more so than him freaking out. 
and the guy could be the animal control dude that's dumb as hell. 
 For real, I started giggling a couple seconds into the clip and then broke down once it actually happened 
Y'know, most people would say "whoop" there it is, but I believe "BLOOF" is much more appropriate in this scenario. 
The accent makes it so much funnier. His voice is so calm the whole time 
Maybe they usually get excited about the ice cream van and decided to film their reaction the next time it was coming. 
bear has given up & that guys scream pulled him thru. real hero 
Of course! Naturally you want to be prepared should you lose one of your buckets. 
You know a person is good at telling a story when they are trying to get a drink real quick from their cup, but still going on with it. You know this guy's fun to be around anytime. 
I did not think a bird could express that complex an emotion, but there we are. 
If I were the graffiti artist I'd paint the word "Blue" at the very end. 
I too like geraffes but they are pretty dumb. Stupid long horses. 
I'm actually crying of laughter. I've watched it three times now. 
#MAY I BORROW THE KEEEEEYS TO YOUR CAAAAAAAARRRR GOOOOO DOOOOOOOGGGGGSSSSSSSSSS 
"No, you don't actually kill the birds." "Ok, got it. Kill them" 
It has to be. Looks like the news crew decided to have some fun with their report. 
I love how calmly he explains what the problem is as if she might not be fully aware of the situation. 
For sure. I have a couple stupid stories I tell more often than others and at this point it's like a rehearsed performance with some improv for variety. 
I'd return with a pressure washer and clean the word RED into the red wall... 
These are your friends. Well, a few of them *wink* Savage 
It's scary for more reasons than being out of nowhere. It's scary because ocean. It's scare because deep, open water. It's scary because giant fucking creature. It's also scary because it's out of nowhere. 
I absolutely lost it when he calmly explained that if she doesn't help him out of the box he'll kill her. 
Wow. Kevjumba and nigahiga is considered "early Youtube" now? Seems like it was just a couple years ago. 
Remember, when you smashed car and ended up in hospital *While your fiends had fun winking* 
I lost it when he fell on the floor and just starts rolling and flailing, still shouting for help. 
Oh, well. That's different. Doesn't really make it controversial at all. He was just worried about being internet famous. 
Don't worry about these sad moments tho. Remember This? *Cue Car Crash Photo* 
Should have gone for a third date to see if it was still the same. Then a fourth, and tell his jokes before he can, see if he still tries to tell them. 
But she likes TATER TOTS. I can look past a lot for that. 
This is my favorite in this thread, everyone is so innocent in making it weird. 
Seems like a casual convo I'd have with any girl..... So what's up? 
I'm gonna fare a guess that he nicked your sweater in a half baked plot to meet you again. 
-Past winner of Top 10 Tinder Date Award (over 100 entrants) That's a great new line for your profile 
I've been "different Joe" before. Made plans to visit a friend on Long Island (took me about 2 hours to get there). I show up and could tell she was thrown off by something but shrugged it off. A couple of hours later she confesses she actually thought she made plans with a "different Joe." Luckily, we laughed about it and ended up having a good time. 
On a different topic, who has the stage name 'Brad'? It's like the most underwhelming name anyone could announce. 
I just got the ending to sixth sense. That list of names? Those were all the people who worked on the movie. 
This is the most Seinfeld post here, well done man. 
You: That was the worst date ever! Them: You wanna go out again? You: ...yes. 
Turns out some women are just as socially awkward as guys 
I know this story a thousandfold, but just replace France with Japan. 
The fact that you still visit his grandparents is amazing. They sound adorable. :) 
This one isnt bad at all, just sounfs like you live in a super uptight neighborhood 
Was his collection not impressive enough for you ? 
You should have just left her at the apple store. Why do people that get taken advantage of think they HAVE to provide a ride home. I assume this girl was an adult with an iPhone which has an uber app. 
A young german that doesn't speak english? I am german and literally (the actual meaning of literally) everyone i know under the age of like 30 can speak english to some degree. 
This is my worst nightmare. The only thing worse than a bad date is an awkward one. 
The whole "pissing herself" thing makes me think mild seizure but I could be wrong 
Oh but so you just climbed a tree? Just like that? Can't stop laughing! What was her reaction ? 
It's a wounded o'possum story (kidding) Thanks for picking up on that. Nutjob. He probably did not have a gf who died at all. I have wondered if it was true or not. 
Well I think he left his balls in the house because in my car he was freaking out lol 
Are you some sort of universal false positive on gaydar? 
Thieves - male and female - use dating apps for just this reason. If it would have worked she would have left during the movie 'to use the washroom' and never returned. Smart OP dodged a bullet. 
The worst part was after I didn't respond to that message for 20 minutes he texted me "sorry if that was weird" 
I did! My friend said she knew "Monica" was living with a guy, but she was pretty upfront about setting up the date so she figured they were just roommates. She had no idea about the engagement thing. 
I was half convinced OP's story was going to turn into something Friends related. I was kinda disappointed when it didn't. Lol 
girls with horrible friends are horrible by proximity. 
I think the cigs they were getting were in the back of Tim's car. 
she showed him the beauty, he showed her the beast. 
A promise like that might just pull me out of dating retirement. 
I sure hope so. She was already at his apartment; couldn't be any more convenient. 
"FINE YOU CAN BE DONKEY KONG NEXT TIME AND I'LL BE DIDDY!" 
This is brilliant! I'm actually going to put this on my profile right now. 
Yeah, I never thought I'd think "Hey, I don't have any pictures on my phone of a bloodied up vagina I made, I guess I'm a pretty desirable guy!" 
He was a nice guy, he meant well, but yes, he was very isolated. I grew up in almost the same situation and have a lot of social problems because of it. I do feel for him and I hope he's doing well. 
My brother and I used to work at a little dress casual dining place. Every once in a while, this traveling salesman type dude would come in with a gypsy looking bag full of homemade hot sauces. Like the kind that you add a drop to a quart of sauce and it changes the entire flavor. One day, my dumbass brother decides to have a wing session with another dude that worked there but instead of mixing the FYA sauce to the buffalo, they coated it directly on the wings. Before either of them could get through 2 wings, they were both throwing up. My brother popped a blood vessel in his left eye from the dry heaving... it was a little pfunny 
First apartment is her soon-to-be ex's. The second apartment is her ex's. She was stealing the ex's gold or something. That's my take. 
Yeah - I think she was just looking for a shag. I think she was a very insecure little lesbian, hence the parading me in front of the youth group! 
The first thing that came to mind was me hearing a conversation between Jerry and George over this. 
Tha reminds me of my friend's mom watching *Sin City*. She does not like violence at all. "That is the most vile, disgusting piece of trash of a movie I've ever seen in my life!" *My friend stops the movie.* "...What are you doing?" 
I got lured into a cuckold fetish once. I was banging a girl at a party and this girl shows up and without asking just joins in and im like WHOAH because i know her boyfriend and i look to the door and he's standing there, gives me a thumbs up, and leaves after a while. I had no idea they were into that. At one point she was complimenting me while shit talking him basically and my only thought is "oh god, i don't want to get into a fist fight while naked" but he was cool with it. 
I usually don't let guys pay on the first date, but because he was late, I thought he was just making up for that. How wrong I was. 
Yeah I figure I should take it as a compliment, they're so into going on a date with me that the actual date doesn't matter, but still, come on... 
I know this story, replace France with Japan, and add that I'm Japanese. It's hilariously awkward when they find out I'm Japanese, their first thought is "Oh he'll know the animes I like!" or will start speaking in very very very broken Japanese or even just the stupid meme-like phrases. 
He used violence, lies, shame, pity, fear, and pretty much every other dirty trick in the book. The only upside is that his violence stopped after a certain point. 
"I'm protecting her from rapists!" in this context is like a guy saying "no homo" while making out with his bros. 
Plot twist: OP got his date mixed up with another girl and his date didn't even have a parrot 
I was also wondering. I guessed that since she put it on her dating profile, a lot of previous dates had used it as an *excuse* to try and go back to her place. For me it was the real motivation. 
This is an actual law where my mom grew up. She explained that when she was in high school, there was nothing to do (if you knew this town, you would not be surprised to hear this) and so on Friday and Saturday nights the kids would just kinda drive around. People didn't like that so they made a law about it. There are still signs all up and down the street that says "It is illegal to pass this spot more than three times" (or something like that.) 
I used to be a "good, christian girl" and can concur. 
Not when I learned he didn't have Serendib Efreet. Amateur 
My dad went on a business trip to Frankfurt a few years ago. It may have been his first time outside of North America. He was telling me that he had like an hour to kill so he walked around the city looking for something (I don't remember what), and couldn't find it because nobody he asked spoke English. In Frankfurt. Now, I lived just outside of Frankfurt for a summer back in 1998, and I learned 0 German, because literally everyone I met spoke better English than I spoke German. So I wonder if people just didn't want to talk to him for some reason. 
Idk, I was questioning if she got drugged by someone at the bar. Starts off normal, has one drink and loses all possessions, pisses herself and possible issues speaking? Strange encounter for sure. Hope she was okay 
I was just like 'Hey let's climb this tree' Because I knew she wouldn't follow me haha. I got to the top and was like 'Hey you coming up?' 'No I can't climb' 'Ah, that's rough. I'll come down in a bit...' 
Slightly hyperbolic... but yes? I apparently come off a little flirty. I make eye contact, smile a decent amount and just sort of look like someone who might be "into that" as I so often hear. But yeah... a lot of men have been certain they were getting vibes I wasn't trying to send, and the same goes for a number of women. Oh, the missed opportunities. A few weeks ago a new friend referred to me as "the manliest gay dude I have ever met". I haven't corrected him, because the label is honestly pretty fun. Will probably get weird if he meets my girlfriend though. He'll be like "don't worry bro, I won't tell her!" 
It didn't occur to me until years later that she could have done this with other people. I really regret not reporting her 
Dude, she was not engaged. Her roommate was her wingman in the event she needed bailed out. 
thats so sweet jeez grats on finding the one! (and not ending up in a pickle jar(s) lol) 
This. I really liked my ex but hated her friends. Turns out I didn't really like my ex. 
Yeah, the car was shaking so much because they were practically tearing the back seat apart looking for that lost pack. Definitely. 
That honestly sounds accurate. He didn't seem interested at all but it seems like his parents were trying very hard to sell the family to you 
did I mention the absolute lack of pizza boxes in my immediate surroundings? because I feel like that is information which should aid you in making such a momentous call. 
Even professional criminals get lazy with their opsec. 
Italian couples of Reddit, what was the most awkward time someone walked into your home uninvited and ate all your birthday spaghetti? 
Plenty. I worked at a place in high school that was putt putt and laser tag. They were money laundering--would show up with stacks of 50s that weren't from the business and put them in the safe, pretending they were from the putt putt register when nobody had played all day. Owner's dad went to jail for embezzling money from a department store. He sold it to someone who runs it as an actual business. 
Yeah? Well I can (kind of) cook, listen deeply and give logical advice (some times), cuddle up on the couch with kittens, bathe myself, and did I mention I work at a pizza place? Who doesn't love free pizza and snuggling up with kittens? 
I worked at a place that kept a small bottle of hot sauce that might as well have Satan's jizz it was so hot. We served hot wings, and every once in a while would get requests to make it as hot as possible. The cooks loved when I would bring them an order like that. They would always make me go back to the table and ask again "as hot as we can make it? Are you totally sure?" If they said yes the cooks would gleefully fuck their shit up. They would pop their heads out of the kitchen door to peek at the poor fool. It was usually about half and half satisfied customer vs ruined their night. 
Ew, under what circumstances was that poor bitch throwing up? Those novels sound so fucking ridiculous. 
I was thinking escort with the apartments being "hers" when she needed them for work. 
There is something oddly endearing how you keep calling her "little lesbian" 
Yea maybe the bear comes to life after the witching hour and consumes human flesh. She is probably bound to it through some evil blood magic. 
Jerry: "Y'can't *not* know how ya got the bear! It's *your* bear!" 
it's the good kind of vile, disgusting piece of trash! 
Okay, okay, okay. So, should-should... should, uh, should... Should-should... should... sh-sh-should Sh-sh-sh... Should-Should... should, uh, should... 
So I actually did a year of young life leadership training before deciding I was too busy to take it on. The whole idea is really to give high school kids an opportunity to make friends and build relationships with the leaders who play a mentor role. The meetings are really just social gatherings with Christian undertones. My local YoungLife clubs have kids from all different religious backgrounds and no one is excluded. I know I can't speak for EVERY club in the country but I think it's a really great thing that helped me make friends in high school. 
"Sometimes from a chair, sometimes from the closet, and almost always dressed as Superman." 
It's how people who are self-conscious and self-centered cope. They don't care about your feelings, they only care about their own and about how you hurt them by rejecting them. So they attack you to try and make you feel the same way they do. Pretty pathetic in my opinion. 
I fear like part of it is fear that the rape-y fucking idiot will turn into a violent rape-y fucking idiot if you're rude to him, which I think is a fairly reasonable conclusion. 
Look babe, we know this is alright but it's not anything special. You know why I'm really here. Where's the talking parrot? 
Awhh thats really cute! Its like your stereotypical awkward movie teenage romance! 
As a former "good Christian boy" it goes both ways. 
Holy shit, that is way more funny than I initially imagined it. 
Now I want to see some sort of autobiographical cartoon from you. This sounds way too funny to not see. 
That's probably why she just said fuck it. You were being to cautious so she figured on to the next one. 
That's definitely a possibility (and one I actually prefer, to be honest). She was in theatre after all. If it was just a wingman situation, I hope they both get Oscars one day. 
"I call it the shock wire, because if you touch it, ya die!" "...yes, that is accurate." 
That is rather impressive. I'm free tomorrow night. Does your car run? 
"Waitress": So, what do we do, throw them out, I was about to turn on the TV and these 2 just walk in without knocking. Man: Well if they just walked in, who knows who they could be, they might be crazy. "Waitress": I could tell them we are "closed", i mean this is our apartment. Man: No, no, no reason to be rude, we got enough food to easily share, let's let them stay, for my birthday. Just think of the story. 
Hahaha, I hear you. Our fry cook loooooooved when those came in too. I would always triple check with my guests before serving them like, "bro, you understand that your asshole is going to hate you tomorrow if these make it past your intestinal tract" P.S. You should trademark Satan's Jizz. Great name lol 
Ya, gangbang is dicks in parallel, a train is dicks in series. 
Well she was under 5'! But I also call my wife "littlest lesbian" as a term of affection - so maybe it's just me! :) 
"Did you just wake up one day sharing a bed with a bear? This isn't a one-stand with a stranger from a bar, aren't you the least bit curious where this mysterious ursine wandered in from? You don't even know his name, lady!" 
This. I was watching a popular teen Netflix show recently and asked why during a rape scene, the girl wasn't fighting back? And my brother explained she's either in shock or is well aware that even if she tries to fight, he can fight much harder. It's about trying to minimise the amount of violence inflicted upon you. 
I'm waiting for the movie/book deal offer to come in now. :) 
The Golden bit really just makes me think that it involves pissing too 
In my self defense class they also taught us about when to stop fighting. It's better to come out alive than dead. 
It did for awhile, we were married for 3 years. Just grew apart over time. Still friends though. 
Gotta make sure ya got the lights turned off before rolling around in the pig pen. Followed by an hour shower and then guilt on the couch. 
I mean.. It still can.. Don't let your dreams be dreams 
Not the ending I was expecting, but glad to hear a nice wholesome story here. 
I'm willing to push through this obstacle if he is. Maybe get some counseling... talk about our goals. It could work. 
And then she showed me her knife collection. Very thoroughly. 
I've always been fond of this one, but the proof is the neat part! Here's an example without getting into the nitty gritty of modular arithmetic: Say you want to see whether 462 is divisible by 3. 462 = 400 + 60 + 2 = 4*(99+1) + 6*(9+1) + 2 = 4*99 + 4 + 6*9 + 6 + 2 Notice that any multiples of 9 and 99 (and 999, 9999, ...) are divisible by 3. So all we need to do now is check if 4+6+2 is divisible by 3. If it is, then the entire left hand side will be divisible by 3, and thus so will 462. 
I just times by 10 and half it. Isn't that easier? 
This stuff won't get you through the AMC except for maybe the first two 
Similarly, you can start anywhere, not necessarily at the lowest. So for your example I might guess the mean is 52, which gives differences of -2, 0, -5, and 9, so the total offset from my guess is (-2-5+9)/4 = 0.5 which gives the answer of 52.5. Choosing a number in the middle of the set keeps the sum small, or lets you cancel out some numbers from the start. Like I might also choose 54 since I recognize that as being between 47 and 61, so the offset is just (-4-2)/4 = -1.5 for an answer of 52.5 again. Tons of flexibility! 
"Hey Tim, can I play with those Legos?" "EIGHTY TIMES THIRTY IS TWENTY-FOUR HUNDRED!" ".....never mind." 
Or just use (a+b)2 formula for almost any squaring. 552 = (50+5)2 = 50*50 + 50*5*2 + 5*5 = 2500 + 500 + 25 = 3025. 10242 = 1000000 + 48000 + 576 = 1048576. 
This is such a good one. With a little practice, you get yourself doing 843*843 and other large numbers in your head. Makes for a neat party trick, especially when everyone is drunk. 
In Australia this is usually easier - you just get up and leave. 
B-but you won't have a calculator in your pocket every day! My teacher said that! And now my top comment is talking about teachers talking about calculators. Great! 
Are you talking about Zeller's Rule? x = d + [(13*m-1)/5] + y + y/4 + c/4 -2c d is the day of the month m is the month, starting with March = 1 y is the last two digits of the year (subtract 1 if the month is January or February) c is the century, or the first two digits of the year Round all decimals down. Then divide x by 7. The remainder will be the weekday, with Sunday = 0. 
Also for multiplying 9 times 1 through 10, the first digit increases by 1 while the second digit decreases by 1, and each pair of digits adds up to 9. 09 -- 0 + 9 = 9 18 -- 1 + 8 = 9 27 -- 2 + 7 = 9 36 -- 3 + 6 = 9 45 -- 4 + 5 = 9 54 -- 5 + 4 = 9 63 -- 6 + 3 = 9 72 -- 7 + 2 = 9 81 -- 8 + 1 = 9 90 -- 9 + 0 = 9 
say we have 147*641. You can also take (150-3)(640+1)=96000-1920+150-3=94227 
Maybe I'm reading this wrong because it's late, but isn't the quickest way to just to *number* x 10 + *number*? 90 x 11 = 90 x 10 + 90 = 990 
You forgot the first 1 in the Fibonacci sequence. Not a big deal, but I guess I'll point it out. 
Also, Eight and Eight fell on the floor, pick them up there's 64! 
Calculus is a lifesaver after it finally starts making sense haha... 
I find it easier to divide first, since that way you'll be dealing with smaller numbers and you do the hard step first. 
Yep. It's usually always easier for me if something is broken down closest to a multiple of 10 or 100. If it was 218 x 7 for example... 200 x 7 = 1400 10 x 7 = 70 8 x 7 = 56 Total = 1526 Since the original comment was regarding multiplying by 5... 218 x 5 = 109 x 10 = 1090 ... I can see how OP's method is easier than doing 200 x 5 = 1000, 18 x 5 = 90 for a total of 1090. 
there isn't much hope for people who spend 12 years in high school 
I get distracted in meetings when someone asks a question like this, this... cause i always try to get close to the answer that someone is inevitablly going to use a calculator for. I'd subtract 2% from 350.472, so 1% is 3.50, 2% is 7, so 350-7 = 343 
MUCH easier way to do this when dealing with friendly numbers like 15. Ten percent of 40 is 4. Easy, just move the decimal one over for ten percent. Five percent of 40 is obviously just half of ten percent of forty, so 2, yeah? 4 and 2. 6. One second. 
I was familiar with the idea behind Quintin's post, but yours turned on an even brighter lightbulb. Thanks! 
I like how perfect this example fit in with the original example. 
True, but if they know why the trick work it still helps A LOT towards reducing the work involved in solving the resulting system of equations. 
I mean... It's how they explained it to me in the first place when doing Laplace work. 
Agreed, and it's not even really a trick, it's more of an observation. that the system has to hold for *every* x. 
I don't know if it's easier but it's pretty interesting 
Can confirm this still works after 18 years in IT. You just have to memorize a harder problem. "8675309 OCCURS FIFTEEN TIMES IN THE FIRST TWO HUNDRED MILLION DIGITS OF PI!!!" "O... Okay. Do you want to go play with Legos now?" "Yes, thank you." 
Alternatively turn one of the numbers into a very easy number to multiply, then swap the other by the same amount but the other way the add the square of the change 532 = 50*56 + 32 = 2809 1020 = 1000*1040 + 202 = 1040400 
How it should be. You shouldn't have to pay the employees of a restaurant you eat at. 
My dad does that, but then keeps doing it when he travels, so he's a cheap tipper in Virginia where tax rate is less. He refuses to figure out why, or use a method that's independent of the tax rate. 
32 = 0.00... 40 = 4.44... 50 = 10.00... 60 = 15.55... 70 = 21.11... 80 = 26.66... 90 = 32.22... 100= 37.77... 
i've written the proof in the sideline of my fine cahier might get lost in time but it should be so simple to figure out that it doesn't matter 
Mine told me I would always have a calculator in my pocket, I just wouldn't always be able to use it. -_- 
If you need to know the decimal representation of the elevenths, then just multiply the numerator by 9 and repeat it. 1/11 = 0.090909090909... 2/11 = 0.181818181818.... 3/11 = 0.272727272727... etc. 
Going to tens is easier for me because it gives me less to manage. 
I find it easier to do it OPs way for certain numbers, like I can just look at 72x11 and know it's 792 without really thinking about it. 
I'd always heard "I ate and I ate until I fell on the floor, 8 times 8 is 64" 
at least 7,11,13 have the same rule. A lot of people are replying that the same trick works for all primes. I'm talking about a different trick that exploits the fact that 7*11*13=1001=1mod1000. 
But multiplying by ten is just popping a 0 on the end (or moving the decimal place over, if there's already one) 
Holy fuck i haven't thought about science bowl in a grip 
turn your % problems into simple math - Thins might look long and drawn out but in reality IT ISNT its all a matter of PERSPECTIVE! Lets say you were standing in a line and you were asked to answer whats 67% of 5400 before you get to the cashier - i would guess 90% of people would give up! But this is very fast and simple for people who dont understand math because it simple basic addition and multiplication that everyone knows and can do very fast in there head So... what is 67% of 5400? 10% of 5400 is 540 X 6 = 3240 1% of 5400 is 54 X 7 = 378 so... 3240 + 378 = 3618 or if the multiplying messes you up 540 X 6 = 1080 (540+540) X 3 then just add... 1000+1000+1000=3000 and 80+80+80=240 3000+240= 3240 and 54 X 7 = 7 X 5 which = 35 add the "0" so 350 and 7 X 4 = 28 so 350 + 28 = 378 - and 3240+378=3618 duh da da daaaa!!!! alternate answer - what is 67% of 5400 - time to buy a calculator 
Totally agree, at least you ended up getting a GED though! 
One technique to approximate the answer would be to round the variables into something that can be easily calculated and then add the difference. For example, we know 10% of 90 is 9 and we know the true answer must be higher because we rounded down the 13% by 3% to make our first calculation. Now we can take the leftover 3%, calculate 3% of that same 90, and we're left with 2.7. Add the 9 + 2.7, and you get an estimate of 11.7, which is ~98.9% correct. I use this technique often. There's a name for it, but I don't recall. 
What do the backward slashes mean?  it's probably obvious but I'm dumb sometimes lol 
I work a lot with density's of fluids, For example: Instead of 85% it is then 0.85 And i work exactly the same as you do haha, it is most of the time quicker than a calculator 
That's pretty quick. You can also use difference of squares. 23*17 = (20+3)(20-3) = 400-9 = 391, then shift the decimal point for the percent. 
LED, burning the same amount of electricity as incandescent. 
Like this? 14.00 +14.00 -------- 28.00000 
Yeah here we see that as the restaurants' responsibility not ours. 
Ive never spent over $100 on a meal so I apologize for the confusion. 
Exact same method and exact same reason here. Plus 5 is a lot easier to figure than 6. 
The proof is trivial, and left as an exercise for the reader. 
To add, many mathematicians think what Fermat found was a "false" proof, something that was promising but had a hole he didn't realize. The only other option is that centuries of mathematicians missed out on something elementary and elegant that would have been doable using the techniques of Fermat's time. He was still right in the end, though. 
lmao. Closest thing mathematicians have to a meme? You have no idea. 
I found a very simple workaround for this: become a calculator 
They could have just been predicting the elimination of pants pockets. 
I got pretty good at it a while back but honestly you'll never use it and most people won't even realize you did something cool if you manage to squeeze it into regular conversation. I could probably pick it up pretty quick again if I wanted to but it was disappointingly useless once I got past the whole telling people their birthday 
What kind of person knows the Fibonacci sequence and can't multiply by 1.6? Or by 1.5 and add a bit? 
Wanna know the decimal representations for nineths ( 1/9, 2/9, ... )? 1/9 = 0.11111111111111 ... 2/9 = 0.22222222222222 ... 3/9 = 0.33333333333333 ... and so on. This is the proof I used to make myself believe that 0.999999999999... = 1 . 
On some level I wish you would have been applauded. Realizing these sorts of things on your own early on in math isn't exactly easy. Noticing patterns and doing critical thinking should be rewarded. 
Well, we had to learn all multiplications up to the 12th table by heart 
No, 11 actually has *two* rules. 1) Add every other digit together, then subtract all the other digits. If you get a multiple of 11 then the number is divisible by 11. Take 4972. 4-9+7-2 = 0 which is a multiple of 11. 2) Pair the digits and take the sum. If you get a multiple of 11 then the number is divisible by 11. Take 52635. 05+26+35 = 66 which is a multiple of 11. 
Yeah, which is easy, therefore not the hard step, therefore not first. 
It's more widespread. I have lived in Florida and Pennsylvania growing up and it's just as common there. I think kids just say it because it's easier to say, and then keep the habit as they grow up, and now a lot of people don't realize how dumb it sounds. 
I haven't heard the term "grip" in an Illinois minute! 
13% of 89 is like 13% of 90 which is like 13% of 100. 13% of 100 is 13, which means 13% of 90 is 10% less than that: 13 - 1.3 = 11.7 Take off 1% more (0.13) and you're left with 11.57. 
RIGHT? It's so weird that they aren't in reverse position. 
That's pretty quick. You can also solve a quadratic. Let x = 20 (x+3)(x-3) x2 - 9 = 391 x2 = 400 x = 20 Plugging in 20 to our quadratic equation 20 - 9 = 391 Then shift the decimal point for the percent 3.91 My calculator gets the same answer. I did all of that in my head, in under 5 seconds. The other way around takes me longer. This tip isn't ALWAYS helpful. But sometimes it makes it a lot easier 
I think the only people who like the tipping system are restaurant owners and strippers. 
That's true, but if you come to a country that expects tips please still give them. We need them to survive since that's the reality of it :( 
One way guarantees the workers get enough money even if the customer's an asshole and doesnt put any pressure on the customer to decide and calculate the tip. 
Yeah, living so close to NYC has some disadvantages. 
In Analysis we were taking a test and a friend answered a question he didn't know with "The proof is trivial and is left as an exercise for the grader." We all thought it was hilarious he gave him a single point for the reaponse 
Or probably he did realize, and it sounded better to blame the shortage of space for not including the proof. I've heard both versions, but I find that idea particularly amusing. 
WHY YES FELLOW HUMAN, US NON-CALCULATOR FUNCTION CARBON ORGANISMS SHOULD GET A CALCULATOR FEATURE BUILT IN THROUGH THE FORM OF "HABITS". 
A startlingly high number of "tricks" in this posts seem to be ways to avoid multiplying by simple decimals/fractions. 
For decimal representation of n/7 just remember the ring of digits 142857 So 1/7 =. 142857142857... For 2/7 you just start at a different spot on the ring. 2/7 =.285714285714... 3/7 = .428571428571... 4/7 = .571428571428... 5/7 =. 714285714285... 6/7 = .857142857142... 
Public school in America is not at all about the love and enjoyment of learning. Fortunately for me, I never gave a *damn* what was actually being taught... I tended to follow my own curiosity. 
I've only heard the first rule before, but the second makes sense. For two neighboring digits *AB* you're essentially adding *10A + B*, and *10A = -1A (mod 11)*, so the sum is equal to *B - A (mod 11)*. You end up performing the same calculation as the first rule. Easier too, seeing that you don't have to add then subtract. 
It's based on modular arithmetic and expressing numbers in appropriate bases. You can easily find similar tricks. For instance, you can check that 999 is divisible by 37. 999 = 3 x 3 x 3 x 37. But this means that the remainder of 1000 divided by 37 is 1. So, when you have a big number like 3120950, you break it up into powers of 1000 like this: 3 x 10002 + 120 x 1000 +950. Checking divisibility by 37 now means the same as checking divisibility of 3+120+950 by 37, since you already know the remainder of 1000 by 37 is 1. 3+120+950=1073. Apply the trick once more 1+73=74=2 x 37. This is indeed divisible by 37, so the initial number 3120950 is too. Give it a try and find your own tricks for other numbers. 
But it also ensures your number is divisible by two, and you never have any decimal pints to deal with... so it would make both steps easier by doing it first, right? 
...Just want to throw out that this is what I do in my head to wake up. My alarm doesn't let me turn it off unless I do math and I set it to hard mode... 
Woah. The 100-10-1 threw me off a bit... So for 13% of 79 you do 100-20-1, or 13-2.6-.13 = 10.27? 13% of 70 is 100-30 or 13-3.9 = 9.1. Am I thinking about it the right way? You can tell it's math because of the way it is. 
FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP 
You & your enthusiasm for math are adorable ! Thank you for your explanation - I've never been great at calculating percentages, but your comments made it super clear. You're awesome 
The odd thing being that the former is much easier to wank to 
Can this become a Math meme? We don't have enough math memes in the world. 
Went to Hard Rock cafe in Surfers Paradise, they did that to me, I just feel pressured into it because she's standing there smiling saying "if you like the service you're able to put in the tip amount to add to your total" Eating here is way too expensive to start tipping too. 
Last year I spent a month in Cali, and the whole tipping thing was / is disgraceful. I get it that the servers have to live and the tips help them, but why the bloody hell does that responsibility have to be shoved in the face of your customers? I did notice that places like McDonalds, Wendy's etc you don't have to tip those guys and you're kind of doing the same job. It's really fucked up! Your employer should be paying its staff a decent wage. Why has this never happened - add another 10% to the price of everything and the employer could pay its staff a liveable wage. I'm just ranting as it pissed me off every single day, especially when I received bad service! 
Maybe he just knew it was true by intuition and hoped nobody called his bluff. 
YES, WE HUMANS SEEM TO LACK THE PROCESSING POWER NECESSARY TO SOLVE SIMPLE MATHEMATICAL COMPUTATIONS. IF ONLY WE HUMANS COULD ~~UPDATE OUR PROCESSORS~~ "LEARN" TO MORE EFFICIENTLY COMPUTE SAID COMPUTATIONS. 
I just think it's way easier to do 60 plus half itself plus a tenth. 60+30+6. Or just 60 plus half itself and round up. 
At this point they're trolling you. If they aren't, it's time for you to kick it up a notch and learn about Cauchy sequences and fields. NB: I'm not entirely serious. 
I heard of a way to quickly figure out what 11x is if x is anything larger than 99. Lets take 11 x 12. You take the digits in 12 (1 and 2) and put split them so that a third digit can fit between them. Add the digits and you get 3. Put the 3 between the 1 and 2 and you get your answer (132). 3+ digit numbers need some more work, but the theory stays the same. 11 x 123 1 2 3 (1+2=3) (2+3=5) =1353 I'm pretty certain you could reverse this process but I haven't done any math in 3 years since I left school so I don't really know how to go about doing it now 
Yeah multiplying by 10 first ensures an easy, clean half. The idea that a number must be easier to work with simply because it is smaller, regardless of all other factors, seems rather juvenile to me. 
I tried that. My sleep self was smarter than I thought. Was able to force close the app in my sleep. :( 
I'm a math dumbass, how would I extrapolate this to mentally calculating tens x hundreds, hundreds x hundreds, and so forth? Thanks! 
For sure. And anyway, the 3 times a year I've got some personal project or fixation that requires exact numbers, I'm just going to use a calculator anyway. 
Exactly right. Instead of multiplying stuff by 7 or 9 shift it around so you are multiplying by 1 or 2 or 3. Much easier. One key that I wish most people knew is that you don't have to be a math brainiac to do this stuff. Well, for some problems yeah but for a lot of them no. 
Sometimes I don't understand why I spend so much time on Reddit. Im like, its late at night, why don't I just go to bed, what am I looking for? And then someone comes along with a beetle juicing goldmine name like Mathturbator Fapping to percentage and I laugh so hard at something so dumb. This is why we Reddit. 
That was actually a Neature Walk reference, but I also want to appreciate the time he took to explain this. 
Yeah that sounds a bit awkward to do that here, it's not like waiters/waitresses rely on tips over here for their income 
Most servers do not want it to change because they'd make far less. 
In mathematics? Not likely. One of the first thing people learn in mathematics is that obvious things stop being obvious if you stop to consider all preconditions and special exceptions. 
I TOO HAVE OFTEN WISHED THAT I COULD MORE EASILY PROCESS ~~HUMAN EMOTIONS TO MORE EASILY BLEND IN~~ COMPLEX MATHEMATICAL FORMULAE AT AN INCREASED EFFICIENCY TO MY CURRENT STATE. 
Big numbers like that were the subject of a speed maths test I took. They were made big to look overwhelming, but in reality the things you were asked to calculate were rather simple. (Halving, dividing by ten or two, adding two numbers together) 
I moved to the USA from India about 6 months ago and I went to this restaurant nearby with some friends. It's a great restaurant with amazing food, but there's a reason why I haven't ever gone back. I didn't give any tip because I didn't know I was "supposed to tip". When the waitress came back with everybody's change, she asked me a question - "You're taking math in college, right?" Me - "Yeah" (expecting a joke or something) Her - "Do you not know how to calculate 15%?" and then angrily walked away. I just sat there dumbfounded as to what just happened. 
YES FELLOW HUMAN, HAHA WE MOST DEFINITELY ARE NOT ROBOTS! 
What did your kind do before smartphones? I have not knowingly encountered your people in any capacity or form. 
As a server in Seattle, I really don't take it to heart when a table doesn't tip. I figure they didn't think to, didn't want to, or honestly couldn't. There's a lot of reasons people do stuff and it's not my money. I would be able to survive off my hourly wage, but tips are nice to get. Some restaurants take tips out of paychecks, so people will end up with $0.00 every 2 weeks and literally survive off tips alone, though. I guess I just feel like it's not up to me either way, and getting upset on either side feels entitled and a little closed minded. 
IM SORRY ABOUT MY FELLOW ~~ROBOT~~ HUMAN HE DOES NOT UNDERSTAND MODERN ~~PHONEGAZER~~ TEENAGE TERMINOLOGY 
Another one here, we overslept and our lives suffered. It's gotten to the point that I can do eight of those problems half asleep then pass right back out. I bought some NFC tags and stuck them around the house, and I've got to get up and scan them all to kill my alarm. 
HAHA THIS IS WHERE WE HUMANS INEXPLICABLY COMMENT ME TOO THANKS HAHA LOL AYYY 
Party Down is so good. I wish there was more. It's on Hulu in the US. I wish Netflix would buy this show like they did with Arrested Development and make more. 
Oh my god yes. I watch a lot of period dramas because I am a nerd and it popped up on my suggested viewing... It's just so perfect. Great writing and I could watch that woman for days and be a happy camper. Also, it's the roaring twenties. In Australia. What's not to love. 
I love this show! It used to be called 'Scrotal Recall', it's so worth a watch! 
One of the things that sucks most about Canadian Netflix is that it doesn't have West Wing. 
While you're on Canadian programming - Letterkenny is the bomb 
John Lithgow plays a surly Winston Churchill! He was incredible in it. 
The writing on Frasier was damn near perfect. Even though certain seasons are over 20 years old at this point, they have aged remarkably well since the episodes are never topical. Also, Niles is one of the best TV characters ever created. I rewatch this show all the time. 
The one episode where no one can correctly pronounce: "The Rural Juror" made me cry laughing. 
"I love you, Toilet." "Please vomit now." "I LOVE YOU, TOILET!" "Vomit now." The only animated show (currently airing) that has no real danger, negativity, emotional daggers in your heart, or troubled intent. It's about a family that gets along (not often, it seems, in my experience) and that always pulls through with a strong message about friendship, family, or doing the right thing. 
Good one. Didn't see the last two seasons. How was it? 
But the blue balls at the end always gets me down! We need more!! 
Loving season 4 right now, can't recall a bad episode yet. 
Futurama has been on repeat on my Netflix account for some time now. Unless I find something that catches my interest it's always Futurama. I keep finding little hidden things left and right that I haven't seen the last how ever many times before and it's nice. 
Don't trust the B in App 23 doesn't have that many episodes I think, but it is sooooo funny. 
I don't know man, there are some pretty deep feels in Adventure Time that come at you unexpectedly. In the beginning, Ice King was hilariously absurd. By the time you reach recent episodes, Simon becomes a terribly tragic character. He is the future we all fear most: losing yourself and the connection to those you love to mental illness. The fact that Marceline always calls him by his name, even though he doesn't remember it himself, has always been heart-breaking. 
And the theme song gets stuck in my head with absolutely NO warning. 
Add a drop of lavender to milk, leave town with an orange, and pretend you're laughing at it! 
Oh man it gets so much better after the first season. I just rewatched it not too long ago, and it's comparatively terrible to the later seasons. Up until season 7 or so I think it was 
I love that Alex Hirsch didn't want to milk the show dry. He knew he had something good, and it would if it was short and sweet. The second season was hell scheduling-wise, though. It was two episodes, then three month hiatus, and always indefinite, so it was tough keeping up near the end. But then it got to those last five episodes, and man, so worth the wait and the delays. And they just dumped them out in regular intervals, like the glory days. It was awesome! And it ends perfectly too. Wraps up nice and tidy with a sweet bow on top. Disney even offered him to keep it going if he wanted to, and Alex said "nope, I'm gonna reboot Ducktales now." 
I second Letterkenny! I grew up in a hick farm town, so it's very real for me, but it's also hilarious and has great characters. 
He is so beautiful! And I love his characters pansexuality. The wine metaphor was genius 
I agree with you 100% about Frasier's writing. It's some of the best, if not the best, comedy writing ever on TV. However, that is not the only reason to watch Frasier. They worked in a huge amount of physical comedy. Frasier and Niles are constantly pulling pratfalls and other physical jokes, and you'll find homages to Laurel and Hardy, the Marx Brothers, Harold Lloyd, and many famous acts and scenes from the silent film era. Plus the acting is excellent all the way around and they got everything right with the camerawork, editing, sound, etc. They did everything right. It's amazing. Frasier completely hit the ball out of the park. It's funny on its own, but if you know a little about the history of comedy, it's even better. They went after everything and got it. Such a remarkable show and I don't know if we'll ever get anything that good again. 
Lois's mom? Are you crazy? She's a monster by any standard, except for when she saved Dewey though. 
***"THIS IS A SHOW WITHIN A SHOW! MY REAL NAME IS TRACY MORGAN!"*** 
My entire take normally goes.... *Done with the show I'm watching now...* Me: "Hmmmm, I guess I can throw on an episode of 30 Rock to end the night and pass the time. *Proceeds to watch the entire series again for the 10th time* 
Also, they never really win. It's almost always kind of a neutral ending where it's like, "Well... let's move on, then" 
""You're my family and I love you. But you're terrible, you're all terrible" - Bob 
It's still bumming me out too. I used to pop that show on whenever I needed a pick me up. 
Go watch Chuck, if you haven't. And psych movie soon December 17, 2017 
It's one of only two shows I own all the seasons on DVD. Psych and Futurama. 
I get so calm watching it. The music, the banter, the delicious creations. The pastels! It's like a dream wrapped in sugar. Compare that to American reality tv.... 
It's fine. The last season had some plots that a lot of us dislike but really, even the worst episodes of Chuck are still enjoyable. The show is a charming geek fantasy. 
I love some of the little things, like their dedication to grammar and making jokes about it. 
Avatar is the show that made me think an entire generation will be OK. If this is what they watched, they'll be fine. 
I rewatched the whole series again recently and those final episodes made me so emotional. That show had an AMAZING message and I'll share it with everyone I know until I die. 
The show is *okay* without Frank, but I definitely agree that I couldn't do it for more than a season without him. He really helped the show out. Also the writing imo got better second season in general once they figured out what they really wanted to do with the characters. 
'Now a diabetic cat is in play? Jesus, we can't catch a break.' 
Sitting here watching s1e1 and when I saw the title I thought, 100% The Office is the #1 answer. 
*When Pam gets a new chair, I'll get Pam's old chair. Then I'll have two chairs. Only one to go.* 
Watch Raising Hope. It not only concludes Earl's story, but also features a lot of the same storytelling techniques with the same backhanded optimism. 
Yeah I get the why, cause Harmon's worst enemy is seriously his own ego, but without question it had a negative impact on the show. 
I'm really loving this season, but the part of the show that made me laugh the most was when they calculated how long it would take for Ehrlich to jack off the whole audience of Tech Crunch. The way they approached that problem is similar to how I see actual problems be approached in tech engineering problem solving meetings. it's fantastic. 
Oh totally. I've watched S4, E1 a few times now, and I still pick up things every time I watch. Like when they're on Piperchat in the car and the child locks are on, you hear Jared say "I was babysitting my friend Gloria's great granddaughter". Just a classic Jared moment, and a throwback to the time he says he has organized a lot of estate sales because he has a lot of elderly friends. Little tidbits like that make this show so amazing 
Erlich Bachman this is you as a old man I'm ugly and dead alone 
I do this too, except with Archer. If I have nothing else to watch, it's basically Archer on repeat. Almost sad, because I have multiple seasons basically memorized. 
I never had a dog. I don't like dogs. I've been bitten multiple times from dogs that the owners have said "he never bites". I fucking hate dogs. Because I'm TERRIFIED of dogs. I cried like a baby back bitch after that episode. 
"Oh, I love being Scary Terry. He says what regular Terry's thinking. THIS IS TAKING TOO LONG! I'M GONNA MISS THE FARMER'S MARKET!" I will never be out of things to watch as long as at least one episode of b99 is on hand. 
The entire ensemble is great, but his character is definitely what hooked me onto the show as well. That monotone delivery is just perfect. 
Crazy how she originally auditioned for Santiago's part. 
The opening theme is what the inside of Andy's head sounds like. 
Welcome to UK television. Make a fantastic show and end it on a high instead of dragging it out for fucking centuries 
Uuuh.... it's a weird show for a lot of other reasons..... 
And the whole show is set on an earth so ravaged by nuclear wars that they've destroyed almost all history and either killed or mutated nearly every living thing on the planet. 
My five-year-old goes in and out of being obsessed. There's not a lot of raunchy humor, at least not that a child can pick up on, any cursing is limited to like hell, and maybe damn. She loves the songs, and things Tina is just adorable which is a little bit scary but we love to watch it together. 
It's actually the opposite compared to every other show. 90% of the time Bob is the voice of reason for EVERYBODY and always ALWAYS thinks of how to benefit the business first. Its everybody else who is like "Lets make a burger and call it beef curtains", "Awww Bobby lets take the day off" , "Dad help me incite revenge on Tammy", "Dad can you help me with this project to impress Jimmy Pesto" In no way is Bob perfect but unlike every other dad in every other show the words "What? No, thats irresponsible" actually come out of his mouth. Hes a more light hearted version of Hank Hill. 
My guess is, Fox is moving their programming away from Netflix and moving it on to Hulu, and Hulu pays Fox extra for the exclusivity of certain seasons. I imagine this happening with a lot more TV shows, especially now that Netflix is investing more in its original programming, and much less licensing existing TV shows. 
I agree with Chuck. It also has a really good soundtrack. 
As an American, I also knew it as Bake Off. They had to change it when it went to Netflix, though, because Pillsbury owns the phrase "bake off" over here. (Or that's what I've heard, at least.) 
I like their dedication to proper use of "literally" and "figuratively"! 
And then later, Krieger's ringtone "Teutonic Butts" WHITE ASS MOMMA WHITE ASS DADDY 
I'm attracted to her and I'm not even ashamed of it. 
Yeah but did you see the baby sky bisons in LoK?! CUTE OVERLOAD. 
YOU sent Sparky Sparky Boom man after us? Well, that's not his name, but... 
Have watched the entire series twice and plan to do so many more times. Also Korra for anyone who wants more from the universe. A shaky season or two but also some really amazing ones 
Frank and his hoooor wife are goddamn legends. The best thing about him is his gradual descend into insanity. He comes into the show as a relatively normal businessman. He is a dick right from the get go, but he has his shit together relatively well. Then he starts to realize he doesn't necessarily have that many years left on this earth, and decides to get really weird with it. Now his life is about boiling denim, finding eggs under the bridge, banging a lot of whores, hanging out naked in the sewer and spreading AIDS in waterparks. 
That is "Northern Lights". Cannabis indica. No, it's marijuana. 
Wait, what? I have watched My name is Earl from start to finish probably 3-4 times, and I never knew this. I will have to check it out when I get home. Thanks man! 
The creator also wrote out his plan for the ending of the show. It was pretty much perfect. Probably too late now, but it's a show that Netflix could revive I guess. 
Even for someone like me, who has no knowledge in tech and coding, the stuff the show goes on about is easy to follow and all in all, just a joy to watch. Gavin is my favourite though, hands down. 
If I would have been drinking something the first time I heard Jared say it, it would have been all over my laptop. Richard's "What the fuck" makes it even funnier 
Jurassic bark, is the only episode i skip every time it's up next. 
My favorite is when Terry was delusional and Jake was looking for a murder suspect and Terry goes "It was me. I killed him." 
He's getting too many 'breaking character' scenes now though. I kind of miss old Holt that drew still life paintings of a rock. Now he's got a walking group and gossip and everything 
The writers/director also do an extremely good job of reining Samberg in. You can almost tell when there's moments that someone says, "RELEASE THE SAMBERG!" 
When she did Santiago's voice in the last episode she really nailed it so she could've done the part. 
I wish Skins would have stopped before it went totally off the rails. 
I always think of Chuck when I go to Best Buy. I think I'll rewatch this one. 
Totally. Scrubs is the reason I went from hating "How to Save a Life" to loving it. 
The fact that Cheryl does macrame because she isn't allowed to have needles. 
Yet the unforgivable "let's build up this huge war over 3 seasons, gather the republic army together, stand off, then totally do nothing". 
When Pam gets Michael's old chair, I get Pam's old chair. Then I'll have two chairs. Only one to go 
"Consider the possum, nature's..." "Gavin, if you're bringing another animal into this boardroom, this meeting is over." "Of course not! Don't insult me!" [shoos away possum rolling in on cart with face] Fucking comedy. 
I was hooked when a friend sent me the YouTube clip of them trying to solve the mean jerk time from the season one finale. It was so hilarious and yet so spot on for every software dev group that I've ever worked in. The writing is phenomenal. 
Jurassic park, and the episode where fry goes into his mom's dream at the end and finally gets to say goodbye, can't remember the name, these two episodes always get me no matter how many times I watch them 
Absolutely, it's like the perfect level of hilarious dumb shit. 
Skins took a nosedive when it switched to a new group of kids. The ending of the Freddie/Effy thing was balls to the wall fucking insane. 
We can't stop Coronation Street. It is too powerful. No matter how hard we try it just forcibly assimilates promising actors and shits out new episodes. It is a living, baleful presence now. 
Hearing George Michael's chicken noise and almost seeing his dance was gold. 
One of the first times I legit wanted to cry watching TV was seeing Dr. Cox's rollercoaster of emotions being happy he saved his friend, then furious when he dies from the infected liver. How to save a life for perfectly with the scene. 
It's considered the best dick joke in the history of tv. 
His hair and tash in those flashbacks kill me every time. 
To be fair though, that was the second generation which we wouldn't have got if they didn't switch the cast around the first time but I agree that the first four seasons were way better than the ones that came after. 
I'm pretty sure if you went inside the heart of coronation street you'll find a fully powered Ken Barlow 
Not having a go but I've noticed Brooklyn nine nine has the same setup and draw as Community and Scrubs. Great shows based in one place with talented actors, long running jokes and well written jokes. There are many you could compare but I feel these are close. 
And the fact they never cast a younger actor or try to make him look or act younger - it's just him, as he is now, but with a full head of hair, tash and 70s clothes. Fkin brilliant. 
The characters are really well written. They feel like actual people, not sitcom characters. I was watching a Season 3 episode in which Charles and Genevieve decide to have kids. Jake asks his friend the very reasonable question of 'are you sure - you've not been together long?'. In a low-quality show, this would have been the catalyst for an episode-long argument, in which Charles is mad at Jake for 'not believing in him' or some nonsense. Instead, Charles explains why he feels ready to be a father, and Jake listens, and is happy for his friend. Discussion over, on with the plot. 
Hey I have a friend like that. We were way fucked up about to smoke a cigarette and I light mine and hear him light his and then an "unfortunate..." He lit the wrong end and had hit it a couple times. He just broke off the butt and smoked it anyways. What a guy 
Forever leaving him wondering whether it was Under pressure or Ice Ice Baby, that satan material. 
Bet you I can throw a football over them tombstones. 
"If you strike me down, I shall become more powerful than you can possibly imagine." 
I tried that joke on my friend the other day. "What's that" "what's what you said" Total joke killer he is. 
Proceeds to drunkenly struggle with the bindings before asking the executioner for help 
I'd probably start by asking each of them how much they weigh. If they can't communicate it's unlikely I'm going to convince any of them to get on a giant see-saw, and if they can there's pretty good odds they've used the see-saw before and already know the answer. 
"This is the song that never ends It just goes on and on my friends Some people started singing it, not knowing what it was And they'll keep singing it forever just because This is the song that never ends..." 
NOT IN THE ARM! NOT IN THE LEG! IN THE FACE! THE FACE! 
"Can't I just be hung? I don't want to go to hell AND be autistic" 
Honest ASoIaF/GoT question, why isn't Daenerys the rightful Queen, instead of Stannis being the rightful king? 
you weren't very popular, so there's only the Warden there He just shrugs and flips the switch 
Have you tried stalling for time by changing your race and appearance in front of the guards? 
This would be a good opening sentence in a satirical novel. 
Then go into a 25 episode tale of how you got into that situation. Explain about your friends, and in the last or second to last episode, explain in detail their plan to get you out. As you are telling the guards this, the guards look at you in disbelief, all the way up to your friends driving a humvee through the wall, and rescuing you. You drive off into the sunset with your love interest. The season ends, and there are 4 more seasons. 
For my final words, I'd like to quote Isaac Asimov. I'll start with "Pebble in the Sky", and continue in chronological order through "The Return of the Black Widowers." 
That'd be pretty amazing to guess in advance with that level of precision how long your incarceration and appeals process would last. 
You would have a long time to come to terms with it. Decades, probably. Even if you choose not to fight it. By the time your date rolls around, while you might cry, you probably won't be begging for life. 
I dont speak birdperson but that sounds like a nice way to go. 
Bundy fried like an egg. Gary Ridgway did get out of the death penalty by agreeing to lead the police to as many bodies as he could. Neat catch, though. If he's convicted of a murder he committed outside of King County, he can still be sentenced to death. 
They say the pie is still in his cell to this day, waiting for him to come back. 
no you see, theirs is "dun dun dun dudu dun dun, dun dun dun dudu dun dun" and mine is "dun dun dun dud dun dun, *da* dun dun dun dudu dun dun". totally different. 
This isn't kangaroo court. We're not in Australia. 
Must be a Thursday. Never could get the hang of Thursdays. 
It's even better if you don't have the chat filter on and they type this all out 
Bad-Badger was brutally murdered last night. &nbsp; He was killed by a member of the **Mafia**. He was also mauled by a **Werewolf**. He was also incinerated by an **Arsonist**. He was also murdered by a **Serial Killer**. &nbsp; His role was **Survivor**. 
"I don't know if this will work, but I'm sure as hell going try it" -Scheherazade 
You can kinda worm this for dense friends like that but it doesn't make the joke as good. "The Gas Chamber?" "No, the other thing you said" "Updog?" "Yeah" "So you're asking me what's Updog?" "Yeah" "Not much man, how about you?" 
You are with out doubt the worst pirate I've ever heard of. 
See also: "I'm Henry the Eighth...", "Found a peanut..." and, most dastardly of all, "I know a song that'll get on your nerves...". 
I NOTICE YOU HAVEN'T SHOT ME IN THE FACE! CURIOUS AS TO WHY! Maybe you're weighing the moral pros and cons but let me assure you that OH MY GOD SHOOT ME IN THE GODDAMNED FACE!! WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR!?! 
That's Postal (maybe Postal 2). Going Postal is a book by Terry Pratchett. 
You could argue she is, for sure. But Robert won the throne by conquest, so the new lineage starts with him. 
Or rather he waits until the scheduled time and flips it. It's not up to the condemned to give orders to the warden. 
All of the people in the room are his accomplices. Epic kung-fu battle begins. In the din of noise, a voice is heard. *kaaaaaaaameeeeeee-haaaaaameeeeeeeeeee* 
Unfortunately (for them) the dragon also wait for you to do this 
That's why you leave her enough food for 15.1 years 
"Took you goddamn long enough" would be a bit more accurate then? 
You'll have to pry my covfefe out of my cold, dead hands. 
Yeah, I know Bundy eventually got what was coming to him, I just thought I remembered reading that he delayed it by like a decade by bribing people with locations of bodies. Interesting though. 
"Ares? I already killed you." "No, I'm Mars, the *Roman* god of war. *Toootally* different." 
I like to mix it up, "who's the mother fucking snap crackle pop today, pillion?!" 
People complain about Overwatch and league having dumb players but ToS has the worst case of actual monkeys playing a game that I've ever seen. 
djpokeboy was stabbed by an SK. We could not find a last will. We found a death note next to their body. "I'm not evil you tarnation scrub" Their role was Mafioso. 
That guy IS the law. This one is my favorite. - Last Statement: No, I have no final statement. 
"1,001 times, to be precise" - still Scheherazade 
They're given a warning to behave. Think wording I heard was: We'll treat you as humanely as you allow us to. I hope those with long statements are taken to the chair early so they have time to say their peace 
The whole thing went on for a good 5 minutes before he ended up saying "what's up dog" and my hilarious joke was complete. He just paused for a second and was like "god damnit..." 
yeah, I'm in the field of pharmacy. if the formula isn't stable then the convicted could survive and that's a rabbit hole of headache. keeping things sterile helps keeps things stable on top of preventing infections. 
I sat, atop a mountain of Bones, in a castle of skulls, on a throne of blood. I, Vigo, command you! 
This! Right of conquest legitimized Aegon's claim to westeros. It did the same for the baratheon's, and will likely do so again for dany 
And a song beings to play.... *Everybody was Kung Fu fighting.....* 
Yeah, he tried all sorts of stuff to get out of it, including escaping from prison twice. He also met with law enforcement to try and profile Gary Ridgway. No respect for life other than his own. 
Can't have the good god-fearing folk subject to profanity while the state murders people. 
nah, starting at year 3 is at least getting me around the tutorial 
Plus, it seems like you don't want anyone in the habit of giving unsterilized injections. Even if it doesn't matter in this one particular instance, the next time they give an injection might just be a vaccination or something. Don't want to be like "oops, forgot where I was for a minute and didn't sterilize when I gave that flu shot." 
Should I just read the manga? I stopped watching after I realized I could skip entire episodes and still get what's happening. This was near the beginning of the Dressrosa arc. 
Not only conquest! Robert had the best claim to the throne because his grandfather had been a Targaryen and Rhaegar was his distant cousin, this is why he becomes the leader of the rebellion even though Ned had a bigger army and had the entire North to back him up, this is also why at the end when Ned is in the throne room right after Jaime had stabbed the Mad King in the back he doesn't just take the throne for himself, he knew Robert had a better claim to it. 
Sounding kinda like Link when he's rolling on the ground 
Which was weird because wasn't he a volunteer for a suicide hotline? 
Are you kidding? The tutorial doesn't end until year 18. 
The manga is miles better than the anime after the timeskip. 
Ned could have done it, but he was a righteous bastard 
thank you skyrim! i love ya man. it's raining trains... 
This thread is becoming a problem for me making weird facial expressions in public. 
The subways in Uk have chicken tikka? As in the Indian dish? 
Can't wait to see my Facebook flooded with this next week. 
Maybe they were fucking with each other and made a bet that they could order sandwiches for one another and the person who fails to eat theirs loses? God I hope so. 
People who wanted way too much sauce like this were a dime a dozen at my store. Probably one in every twenty customers would drown their disgusting sandwiches in oil, vinegar, sweet onion, southwestern sauce, and mayo. BUT, the worst was the guy who always got double seafood salad, on white, microwaved (not toasted) with extra mayo. That abortion of a sandwich made me gag every time he came in. 
My friend once ordered a veggie burger from In n' Out and they just gave him bread. A different friend once ordered some fries and was given a bag full of sliced pickles. 
Fun fact, frozen mayo scoops just like ice cream. Not suggesting any applications of this fact, I'm just saying. It also looks uncannily like french vanilla ice cream. Just saying. 
Lol I imagine OP standing in front of the counter yelling "MORE SALT" at some poor teenage girl who's in tears. 
That doesn't sound too bad to me. I'd actually try this. 
Not toasted but tell them to throw it in the microwave for a couple minutes. 
I want yours to be the highest rated comment... cos I want to see how you eat it. 
Something everyone seems to have missed: Subway has breakfast sandwiches with egg. This egg is precooked at the factory and frozen into individual portions. Then it is microwaved into a watery mess before going on your sandwich. If egg doesn't fulfill your meat requirement I guess you could add tuna, because who the fuck wants tuna and eggs? Vinegar and lite mayo for sauces. If you get tuna, specify that you want A LOT of mayo. Olives and iceberg lettuce Wheat bread. Not the one with oats on top, just the plain wheat. Do not toast. 
Something about going to Subway and saying "No bread, thanks" is super funny to me 
Hahaha what the fuck. You got me cracking up on the subway dude, why Jeremy Clarkson? 
Upvoted just because I want to hear what happens when OP tries to order that. 
I've never had the Subway experience summed up so majestically. 
This. It's essentially a glorified bologna sandwich with turkey bologna, which is even worse. It even *smells* like bologna. I *adore* Subway, and I ate there nearly every day during high school, and this is the only sandwich I could never learn to love. That, and their roast beef. 
Because just fuck everyone within fifty feet of you, thats why. 
Yeah... Chicken Tikka is like the national dish in England. (not even joking) 
I've never seen seafood at subway before. I guess it's a regional thing? 
Hardly. That & lettuce both share this primary purpose on a sandwich haha. But that's mostly to avoid moist bread due to pickles/tomatoes, not sauces and shit. 
To the contrary, every time I ask for mayo I say one squirt/line and the person proceeds to drown my fucking sandwich in the stuff. I think it's a chain policy to ruin the sandwich with a fuckton of mayo because they do it at every location. 
Cut the sandwich in half lengthwise. *your move fucker* 
People think ISIS is our biggest threat today, but this guy is easily number 1. 
I once ordered a buffalo mchicken or whatever it was from mcdonalds, as it was a dollar and I both needed lunch, and hated myself that day. when I got back to work and opened my sandwich, there was no chicken patty, just lettuce buffalo sauce and bun. I ate it anyway. it was just as good as with the chicken patty, tasted exactly the same. 
I don't think you can blame the employees on this one. It sounds like he gave his wrong order to someone from the school and they just repeated it to the people at Subway. 
This is in fact in America. We don't normally have a delivery option on subway, but my school had a deal worked out because we had to order our lunches from there (there was no space to put an actual place to sell food in my high school). 
That's quite the substitute though. Idk how interchangeable lettuce and chocolate chip cookies are 
He won't need to eat anymore period because I'm pretty sure he'd be dead. 
"But the shakers are empty now" "WHO IS YOUR MANAGER" 
When his manager looks at him like, "That's coming out of your paycheck." 
"Can I get just tomato sauce, pepperoni, and mozzarella?" "You know, we do offer personal pizzas..." 
Agreed, dunno how this has 500+ upvotes as the worst possible sandwich. It's just a regular tuna sub with mustard on it. 
I grew up eating tuna salad with pickles on whole wheat bread. This just sounds like a more adult version with things I'd never consider as a kid (olives were yucky, mustard was only for hamburgers and fried spam). 
Or globs of mayo. It's like if the americans tried to make bubble tea. 
I used to work at Jimmy Johns and we didn't have a rule about meat quantity specifically but I once had somebody order double meat on the gargantuan, which already has all the meats on it. I just shook my head said "can't do that" and slid it down to get wrapped. 
We use different dollars than you. We like our presidents on our money, not your queen or kangaroo or whatever you guys put on it that causes inflation. 
About 2 ounces, enough for a single 6 inch sub. Subway uses prepackaged trays of meat to speed up orders. 
Actually this meal would be pretty high in protein and fat, and therefore unlikely to cause the beetus. Heart disease, however... 
Tuna and eggs go well together. Egg is often an ingredient in a tuna salad. 
Just get a wrapping paper full of cold cuts and condiments, then load that shit up with dressing, ball it up and stick it in your mouth 
You know people the other day I did have a rubber biscuit..oh yeah..now a rubber biscuit is that kind of a biscuit that's supposed to bounce off the wall and into your mouth...and people if it don't bounce back...you will go hungry! 
Maybe the UK subway is different, or at least my local one near work is different, but the subway near me is awesome. Friendly staff always cracking jokes, lovely fresh ingredients. No wonder the queue is out of the door at lunchtime. 
People seem to forget that these ingredients play an important role. Sandwich architecture is no joke! 
This is my issue 9 times out of 10, doesn't matter which location. 
Similar to the tuna salad but made with imitation crab meat (instead of tuna)... so imitation crab and mayo stirred together 
I get them to wrap mine before cutting it, then cut right through the outer wrapper and everything at the end. I eat it walking back to the office, and that way it stays neat when you unwind a spiral of paper as you eat it, and you can put the other half neatly cut-end-up in your coat pocket until you're ready for it. I don't know if this is 'a thing' anyway, but my local shops had never seen it before and it works really well. 
ISIS would claim responsibility for this if they knew about it. 
This reminds me of a time at McDonald's, I ordered a plain cheeseburger. They gave me a beef patty with cheese on it. No bun. It's not a burger if there isn't a bun what the heck! 
I've... I've never even considered this. I sure hope Steve in accounting likes peanut butter and mace sandwiches. 
You don't have to be a bossy jerk about it. You can just say, "Hey dude, please don't tessellate my cheese." 
From a nutritional aspect they are basically the same....right? 
"I'M SURE YOU HAVE MORE STOCK IN THE BACK NOW CHIP CHOP CHIP!" 
You do realize that salt is not particularly expensive, right? 
Dear god thats the worst thing I've read in this whole thread 
I worked at JJ when I was in college at University of Kentucky and we had the head football coach come in and tell us we couldn't sell the Gargantuan to the QB any more because he was on a diet trying to shed some of his 300 lbs. He was a good QB, got drafted, got a SB ring out of the deal. Jared Lorenzen, the Hefty Lefty. The Pillsbury Throwboy. 
Relevant-ish question How do you aussies choose your president or king or whatever? Is it just who can box the most kangaroos in a row or what 
The trays aren't prepackaged, although the meat is, the little tray/boat things get meat from the big bag of meat put in them until they weigh a certain amount, but at my store we just eyeballed the amount of meat because we were all lazy fucks. 
I just googled it and everything I found said that it's just a rumor and the ham really is made of pork and the beef really is beef. I would think it would be labeled "turkey ham," or "turkey roast beef," etc. 
I've learned from this thread that many redditors really dislike tuna. A lot of suggestions have been "Hahahahaha eat a TUNA sub! Good luck!" I love tuna :( 
Jesus Christ, this entire thread is full of masochists. 
and imitation crab (sealegs) is just pureed fish refined into a stick. 
I like to keep my food seperated. It's hardest during Thanksgiving. 
Ya know, a peanut butter sandwich with either a few drops of pure capcasin mixed in or a ghost pepper/Carolina reaper jam actually sounds goddamn delicious. 
I wasn't mad when I watched it. When I opened up Youtube later and saw it in my recently watched, and noticed how many subscribers/views his videos had.... I'm still pissed. It's been days. 
Each bite of the meal must also then be dipped in the drink. 
yeah, this went from "funny" to "I don't want to be here anymore" with that comment. 
That fat bastard was glorious to watch in college. Had a pretty good arm, but when he went down I feared for others' safety. 
My brother will rants about a guy who got the gargantuan as an unwich and had them add tuna 
we get the biggest cunt we can find and run him as a joke, somehow they always win 
In Switzerland they just put in generally as much as is reasonable. So that one layer of meat can be made over the whole sandwich if you get what I mean. 
i just googled it and in the cold cut combo everything is turkey, but it looks like all other meats come from their correct respective creatures 
Ohhhh *Spanish* chorizo and not *Mexican* chorizo. I'm in south Texas and was confused as to how or why 
I like "eat TUNA and PICKLES! Haha that's disgusting! Add olives for instant death." And I'm like, "so basically the only thing I ever get from sub places, oooor?" 
Does pure capsaicin actually have a flavor? Or is it just blandly spicy? 
What kind of barbaric workplace doesn't provide soda and snacks? We who work in tech are so pampered. 
If those kids ever existed, they're probably dead now. 
I kNow the origins of the sorry one, but is there a story for the stutter? 
I'd probably end up actually stuttering or something "Did you-- did I fuck st- dammit did I fucking s-stutter?" 
What was it about his cunnilingus that made it so dangerous? 
I had to remind myself what word salad was because I thought I was having a stroke 
This got me thinking, what is Subway's policy about asking for your sandwich to be re-done when you get an "artist" with a bit too much conviction on his sauce? 
It's hard to make it sound good, but it is. It is kind of blandly spicy by itself, but I've found that I tend to taste more if the natural flavors in whatever I put it into. 
Do they hate fun or something? Who decides to have one cheese? 
No specific policy afaik, but since the customer has not paid for the sandwich I would assume they can safely decline purchasing it unless it is remade. source: previously worked as a "sandwich artist" 
I had the exact opposite problem recently - I got iced coffee at McDonalds, and requested "half the normal cream" and was given a half cream / half coffee monstrosity. It must have been a pint of cream 
What you are tasting is the death throes of your taste buds. Kind of like if you prime a patch of skin with a good sharp slap or abrade away the flesh, your sense of touch there becomes super-sensitive. Source: Lies. It's all lies. 
We can change that. Do youb have any underground oil resources? 
This. Plus lots of people think they will dissolve in rain so they get indoors, leaving the outdoors to us. 
Yeah, I know the ones! And that's such a nice little memory :) 
Yeah rain is good for running. In winter it means there is no ice. In summer it cools me off. I have a half marathon on Wednesday, I am kinda praying for rain. 
Completely agree. The rain makes me feel better sometimes because it makes me feel reflective and allows me to feel whatever I feel without feeling I have to "cheer up". 
I know what you mean. Also why I don't like bright lights, I prefer it to always be dim. So on those rainy days when the sun isn't shining and it's kinda dark, I still don't turn the lights on usually. 
Arizonan here. It's going to be 118-121 this week. Give me some rain! 
I also enjoy the gentle gratitude for having a roof above me, particularly during a cold rain. 
I absolutely adore how this response shows two such different sides of you! Haha :) 
Thunder and lightning is awesome. Lightning storms are rare here, so me and friends get together and drive to the highest hill around for a good view. 
Thats most likely how shower thoughts happen. It sets the mood. 
The sound of rain is one thing that Minecraft gets perfectly. It changes as your character moves inside and I will often stop what I'm doing in the game to listen for a while. If night has fallen I won't go to bed as the sleep action resets the weather. 
Sounds weird, but when I'm out in the 'elements', especially torrential rain and perhaps a full on storm/thunderstorm, I feel a sense of spirituality. I don't mean like a religious kind.. I just feel powerful and connected to the earth. Some people get drenched and feel weighed down by the rain, I feel full of vigour and life. 
I'm from Oklahoma and I was thinking this too. Now that I live elsewhere it's funny not having to worry about the weather try to kill you every couple weeks. 
Wait what do you do for work that gets cancelled by rain? I want that job. 
I can recommend rainymood.com for some excellent audio. I also have mild tinnitus and I use rain sounds to get to sleep. Edit - rainymood, not rainymoods. 
Agreed! I love that, "washing away the days troubles." 
Even indoors, rain is awesome, makes any home feel cozier. 
We had a beautiful storm in the piedmont last night. Something like 6 hours of downpour, foundation-shaking thunder, and lightening. It was the sort of storm that helps me remember why I stay here. 
This might not be what you're looking for, but I just turn on a bunch of small fans in my room. I make them face a wall so my room sounds like I'm in a wind tunnel. 
I'm not scared of it in general. But sometimes it can get rather ominous and so loud that you're waiting for the house to blow apart. From Houston, been through many thunderstorms. 
More rare then the sun? Well it depends, it rains all the time in my town, and we barely have summer. 
I too am in Phoenix. I agree, the rain is so nice. I can't wait until the monsoons start. 
This is a really interesting idea, its the first example i thought of when 'evolutionary component' was mentioned. When you break it down, most forms of flowing water are found to be incredibly soothing - flowing river, waves on a beach, etc. 
For people with more light sensitive eyes (blue, green, etc.) it's a lot easier to see when it's a bit darker. So the colors and things really pop instead of being washed out and over-exposed feeling. 
Do you get headaches when staying in well lit areas? I did. Turns out the cornea in my right eye is deformed and the headaches are from the brain trying its best to correct my sight. The doc prescribed some fairly weak glasses (-0.5/0.5 diopter) and after adjusting to them I'm now sunlight headache free! 
When you can grab the doona and a mug of hot chocolate, and it's storming outside _ 
Kids these days... Going outside for recess was the best part 
I feel you on this. I have the lights out in my office (overhead fluorescents) and a desk lamp. People come by and like to turn the lights on, as if I forgot.. 
I'm not alone! I've always preferred darkness over light. And I absolutely love rain. The smell, the feeling, the coolness, and most importantly, the gloomy darkness. Blackout blinds are my best friend. Even at 2pm, it's always night to me. 
Who else inhaled deeply and imagined the scent just now? 
I saw it mentioned in an episode of Doctor Who and then Boom! Everywhere. 
Except that it's one of those bastard words that combines Latin and Greek. Ombrophile would be more correct, but it's not as fun to say. 
When my family first moved down to Florida (in the middle of a torrential downpour) we stayed with a friend who lived in Sarasota. Every day, we'd get afternoon showers, which I thought was the shit. Twelve and half years later, both Florida and it's stupid humidity can **fuck off back to Hell where they belong**. 
Yeeep. AL here, and it rained a lot last night and this morning. Feels awesome and beautiful, for now. I know when I leave work this afternoon I will be in my own personal hell of mugginess. Hell just opening my front door yesterday after some rain, I could feel my hardwood floor in front of the screen door getting sticky. Haha.....hah... 
Yeah hot day+rain just makes it humid as hell for a few days... 
Yeah, it absolutely makes a situation more cozy, provided you're warm and dry. 
This is one of the comfiest feels in human existence. 
I highly recommend it (provided you wear the appropriate gear to protect against hypothermia)! Especially if you're hiking to a hut with some kind of stove/fire. The wild weather keeps everyone else at home so you might get the hut to yourself, and the weather means the glowing hot pot belly stove makes for an extra cozy stay. It's fair to say that I prefer winter hiking in general... 
Your english is fine! You painted a nice picture there. 
Haha well that's fair enough, kind of like me with the hiking. Keeps you cool, blasts the senses! 
That's a solid plan. Next time take a big metal rod with you. 
Depends on the thunder for me. When it is that low rumble then it isn't bad buy when it is literally shaking your windows and the cats are running for cover then shit gets real. 
Rain in Minecraft is so soothing. I literally go inside whatever shelter is closest and look out a window and listen to the rain whenever it happens. 
I get that feeling too! Especially when I'm drenched wet and walking through the rain, it feels so natural it's almost euphoric. I want to touch the puddles with my hands, feet, run around... It's strange. Rain is awesome :) 
House painter up in the mountains. Rainy or windy and I get the day off. Sucks when I'm broke and want the money but usually it's awesome and I just hangout and relax. 
Northern Ireland checking in. We're getting the hot temperatures but completely overcast skies. It's fucking awful. 
If you don't have tinnitus, don't do this hahaha. I did this all through college as my house had no AC. Now at my next place, I didn't have a fan and it ruined my sleep for a few good weeks. Didn't realize how much I loved the fan until I didn't have it. 
I want to make short low-budget films, and in all of my scripts there is at least one scene with rain like in Se7en, I just love it 
I've always supposed it's a holdover from detective drama noir shows. 
Dude, I just got to work and you're going to make me think of that scene? Not cool. 
This reminds me of when I went to Toronto as a kid and I was scared to leave the Underground and be near the tall buildings. I said, "The buildings might fall on me!" My sister just responded, "Have any buildings fallen on you before? I think you'll be fine, Luke." I lost my batophobia right away. I'm a cured man today. 
I had an Irish friend and we would often exchange photos of our day, just as a way to keep in touch. She was always so shocked that just about every photo I sent her had a sunny blue sky in it. Just something I always took for granted because I love the rain.. She hates the rain and loves the sun. Just growing up in two different climates I suppose. 
It's a great feeling coming into a thread, seeing expected comments that you know will be there, just scrolling through and wondering why one is even here. And then poof, you hit those comments that make you go "ah, that's why I clicked here" 
The rain won't make you sick. Nor will the cold. These are myths. 
I think it's a combination of knowing that no predators are out and about, plus our historical relationship with water. You come from water. Once we moved onto land, we still needed to drink water, and still do to this day. Rain is our planet dumping an essential part of staying alive, so it makes perfect sense that part of you clicks and you get happy about rain. 
I never thought that this might be why I always thought things looked more intense just before a storm! I have green eyes. TIL! 
Anything bright. I've been checked out, and my corneas are fine... I'm just "blessed" (used in the loosest possible sense) with overly sensitive peepers. Which is great when I'm camping and can walk to the bathroom / designated spot without a flashlight and not worry about tripping on roots and the like, but not so great in pretty much any other circumstances. 
Rain days were the best because they were different. Going outside for recess was same old same old, but staying inside and watching cartoons *at school* was always a thrill. Note: Grew up in Southern California and there were probably only 5-10 rain days at school per year. I have no idea if I'd have the same answer in, say, Seattle. 
It's actually raining where I am, and the smell is all around :). 
Glad I'm not the only person dorky enough to notice this! 
So you went to stay with your friend in Florida and... never went back? 
Best thing about going to UT I get to leave during the summer lol 
Have you been out West? Dry heat is amazing. I'd take 103 degrees and dry, over 88 with full humidity. 
Yeah, it's rained damn near every day in our state for the past damn month. 
Where I live it's already humid as hell all summer, to the point that everything in your apartment starts growing mold if you're not careful. I appreciate the rain because the days before a big storm are even muggier than usual. 
Even if that situation is as a butler in a mansion in the middle of a murder investigation during a heated game of the board game Clue. 
Sounds amazing and right up my alley! Definitely wanna try it sometime. 
We learnes in physics class that the best to do when in that situation and there's lightning is to crouch with your legs together because that way you would lead the lightning directly into the ground. If the lightning reaches the ground by other means, you wont take in much of it. Just make sure you're a small ball and your legs are closed and not creating a potential for electrical tension. I still recommend you look it up yourself because I took this class two years ago but it's a good thing to know if you're ever in that situation and would rather survive. 
What are you? Some kind of globe-earther? I'll bet you think Europe is real 
Definitely do it barefoot so you can really get amongst the sensation. Wet feet are essential. 
When you've forgotten how loud thunder can get, and you are completely fine with the normal thunder but then there is one that literally vibrates the entire house, then you think, Is this the end, but i was watching this shit movie, come on if its ending at least tell me. 
It was even better when paired with the old music. There was such a soothing vibe. 
I was a house painter for a long time. If we had an exterior job, rain days were like snow days when I was in school. It was the best. 
I'm in college and I don't have tinnitus. I do it to drown out most of the noise from my dorm/suite. It works quite well. If someone is cooking in the kitchen, I can't hear them at all because of my fans. I should probably buy a white noise machine to achieve the same effect. 
I've watched it all the way through at least a dozen times (it's my favorite movie ever) but even I put it on sometimes to help me fall asleep. I do the same thing with Futurama, TNG, and LotR. 
I love how throughout the film it rains, and then the final scene is sunny. It's an excellent contrast. 
Cyberpunk definitely is closely related to film noir and hardboiled fiction. The aesthetics and characters and story structure often overlap greatly. 
Californian my whole life. Wanted to move to Seattle for years. Never did because people always scared me off because of the rain and gray. Then my husband got a job in Seattle. It's our second year here and I can honestly say I love it. I love the rain and gray. I love being cool. I love not having to avoid a bright, hot glaring sun. That said, I definitely appreciate a clear, warm day in a way I never did in California. But my preference is gray and rain. It shocked me. I regret not moving here earlier. 
I envy you as im sitting in 110 degree weather.. I wish the sun would leave 
Self reflection? For sure, if there is rain, there are puddles and water can be pretty reflective. 
It's true that the sun can energize. As someone pessimistic with dysthymia that didn't really work for me anyways though. I'm kinda getting the hang of early mornings and - well maybe not optimism, but some form of lesser-pessimism. I still prefer a rainy night out alone than a dark one though. I feel less lonely. I guess it has to do with spiritual reasons, I believe in spirits in nature, so when it's rainig it's like having a friend with me. 
I live in Australia and am doing a "1 Second Every Day" thing where you film one second of footage a day. I'm about four months in and have noticed that, if you were to base Australia's climate on my video alone, you would assume we always have really gloomy, grey, wet weather. Nope. I apparently only bother to go outside and *record* being outside when it's cool and wet. I knew I disliked the sun/heat, but didn't realise how much it was affecting my behaviour. 
I spend most of the time indoors with a consistently cool temperature, so I'm not really used to it. Also because in England, the cold weather seems to last forever, before a week or two of switching between almost snowing and warm weather, announcing the impending heat waves. 
Yeah! The sun can damage them! Protect those babies 
I am also not blue eyed and photophobic almost all of the time. In my case, it's related to the migraines I get. Whether the photophobia is a cause or a symptom of the migraines, I don't know. 
Dude mine are blue/grey and suuuuuuper light sensitive too! 
I grew up in so Cal we played heads up 7 up or some type of games like that 
As is tradition. I can't tell you how many people I've met here that have done this. Come for a weekend, call their work and tell them they aren't comin' back. 
Yea the rain here is usually heavy I wouldn't use the word torrential except occasionally. Not really any tornadoes though 
Moved from West Texas to South Carolina for a couple years. I felt like I had to morph into a higher species to adequately process air. Dry heat def the way to go. 
I don't mind temperatures in the upper 20s as long as it's dry heat but we only ever get stifling humidity here in the UK so it's balls. Over 30 is just stupid anyway 
Absolutely! The humidity is the worst part of the climate that I live in and it has been due to rain for days here. It was so hot and muggy yesterday that you couldn't even walk out the door without breaking a mild sweat and it didn't let up last night. I'm not a praying person, but I'm saying a few for a good storm to finally pass through. 
Especially if that situation is as a butler in a mansion in the middle of a murder investigation during a heated game of the board game Clue. 
Yep, knew that. That was the last resort. Squat in a security guard stance (but lower - ass as close to the ground as you can sustain). And stand separately - rapid CPR is nearly certain to save a lightning strike victim. Me and the friend I was hiking with had that as our last resort plan but fortunately, not needed. 
I've tried a lot of different white noise machines and none of them work as well as the sound of a fan. 
I've heard it's very good, unfortunately I lost my DVD in a separation and never got around to seeing it again. You've just inspired me to find another copy of it and give it a proper go. Especially before the re-make comes o ut. 
From Alabama, but my extended family is from Seattle so we visit a lot. I have to say that I would gladly trade the miserable steamy humidity for 9 months of cool, misty gray. I don't know if i would feel the same way if I lived there full time, but every climate has its positives and negatives. But here, 5 months out of the year are like a sticky, bug-infested sauna. I try not to get the "grass is always greener" syndrome, but damn.. 
I feel this. Digging ditches in 110 degree weather is not how I expected to spend my summer 
If you can't handle Norway at her worst you don't deserve her at her best. 
Haha well said. But, I gotta say rain is one of the best times, well, proper rain which actually pours down with some force and thunder. It brings this mixture of moisture and cool which just soothes me completely. I feel more relaxed in a thunderstorm than pretty much any other time. Maybe it's an Indian thing, or maybe it's Maybelline. 
Ah yes, British heatwaves, or as we call it in Australia "winter". 
I don't often get migraines, but yeah, I can see why you wouldn't know. What a mess, right? You live somewhere super sunny? 
Wait is that a thing? So are my eyes and when the snow is on the ground and it's to bright I am literally blind... and durning the summer I have sunglasses when ever I can get away with it 
We call them duvets here. Never heard of a continental quilt. Source: Am British. 
Grew up in Olympia, can confirm. I've experienced more downpours here in the Midwest than I ever did in back in Washington. 
There's always the risk your boss comes down to try and win you back though, before fucking off on a boat cruise to the Bahamas without you. 
Welcome to the dark side. I'll take evaporation all day. 
Exactly 100% spot on, dry heat is fantastic but it's just sticky heat here! 
It is. It's the smell that comes when dry soil gets wet, at least it's most prominent then. 
I've only visited Tennessee in the South. but from that experience alone I feel pretty confident saying it's not for me. 
I could handle frequent (or always) overcast and rain. It's the cold that would do me in. My kid was in Seattle for a couple of days last week and she fell in love with the city. I reminded her that Seattle is perfect in the summer time, but come fall/winter/spring, its rainy and overcast. She's like me though - as long as it's not too cold, there's nothing wrong with rain. Plus she, like me, is a creature of sunburn. The sun hates our pale, nearly see-through skin. I'd love to live someplace where it's not always trying to kill me. 
I am originally from dry, brown Arizona where there's ~211 days of sun per year, but have since moved to lush, green Oregon where there's ~144 sunny days per year. 
Yeah the lighter the color of your eye the more light sensitive. So that's why I rarely need a flashlight when I'm camping but go blind without sunglasses on a bright day! 
Also Brit, I've heard them called Quilts, No 'continental' though. 
A cunt doona is what they do for the space shuttle launch. 
American South here. It's going to be 33C highs with 24C dewpoint today. At 8am in the morning its currently 24C outside with 96% relative humidity. The air is like soup right now. And we get 2 1/2 more months of this... Thank goodness for air conditioning. 
I've always wanted to live in Az because my curly hair would do great there and my allergies would probably lessen. But I have blue eyes and pale skin so while my hair would be perfect, I'd either get melanoma or wind up looking like luggage. 
Agreed, but to me 'quilt' would usually imply that the actual quilt is decorated. Like a patchwork quilt or whatever. A duvet goes inside a duvet cover. 
If a 'continental quilt' is the duvet equivalent of a continental breakfast, I'll have nothing of the sort. 
Agreed. In the American South, air conditioning isn't just a commodity, it's pretty much necessary. 
I'm from Yorkshire and I'd understand a quilt as a type blanket made from tessellating sections sewn together. 
But it would remind us of when nothing really mattered, Out of student loans and treehouse homes we all would take the latter 
That's also what I understand a quilt to be. Source: Am American. 
Sobbing? That's creepy as hell! Like he had pre remorse for what he was going to do to you. 
Fuck I wonder what they were saying that sounds insane 
Oh my god my mom did the same thing. I was one of the only kids that was verbal. I will say the Occupational therapy room was sweet though. Admittedly the camp I went to seemed to have more of a range of kids, but most had severe anxiety or behavioral issues. First time I ever felt so normal. 
My father once told me, "when your gut tells you something's wrong, if you wait around, you'll find out why." 
Oh man, you just reminded me of a similar situation I had in Springfield, USA. Got in a car headed to a party. I didn't know it, but everyone but me was wasted... driver included. He was driving so recklessly that all I could do in the back seat was hope the impact would be swift and painless. He decided to cruise the main strip, squealing tires and drifting... right in front of a cop. Before that moment I never thought it would be a relief to be pulled over, but I certainly feel they saved my life. Turns out the driver and his girlfriend had drugs and warrants. The guy I was with had drugs as well. As everyone in the car was being arrested, I was lectured about my choice of friends, given the keys to the car to take home (I'm not from there and had no idea where I was or where to go), and told to have a good night. 
Total missed opportunity to join the dark crusade... if I were you I'd be full of regret. 
This is my favorite story of the bunch because it just seems super fuckin rad from an outside perspective. That's a neat experience if not absolutely terrifying 
Has something similar with alligators. Went for a walk in the park (FL, of course), noticed a baby gator, about 8 inches long. Cute! Then another one, and another one. Then 2 more. Got the fuck outta there before momma showed up. 
You could leave the gate open all day. If you want him to go in he never will. As soon as the gate shouldn't be open, he's in. Fuckin cattle, man. 
I was walking down the road in LA one time, in Hollywood I think, and I heard a loud cracking and crashing behind me. A woman was walking towards me on the sidewalk and ran up to me and started yelling at me in Spanish. The only thing I understood "oh my God" from her several times. Then I turned around and saw a huge branch that had fallen directly behind me laying just where I was walking on the sidewalk. I probably should have had your reaction. I'm lucky. 
he was just making sure you brought his diet dr. kelp this time 
Drove through Waco once.. expected much more cult activity 3/10 prob would not return 
You know there are climates in between right? You don't have to pick between just hot as hell and cold as hell. 
Dirty Mike and the Boys call that a "soup kitchen." 
You'll regret that, guy was probably a real Nigerian prince. 
I'm glad you're ok and it must have been scary for you but you make it sound so casual! "So yeah, ISIS turned up uninvited so I just noped away from them." 
Your gonna go through hell for a bit. But it gets back to normal. Same thing happened to me. No kids thank god, but I paid an arm and a leg for my 3 dogs that she didn't even want but used against me in court. Lost all my possessions too but got replacements shortly after. Missed the fuck out of her, but never went back and am way happier. 
The lighter trick does work, but it also usually ends up the way you described. 
I was expecting you to say "I was staring at the portrait when Jon Bon Jovi whispered in my ear 'I drew one in the center.'" 
I was once outside playing basketball with a friend as a thunderstorm was rolling in. All of the sudden, I felt a tingle and my mouth tasted like metal and something told me to run inside immediately. As soon as I got into his open garage, lightning hit the metal pole supporting the basket. That day I learned to trust my gut. The feeling was incredible, it was a mixture of existential dread and the innate knowledge to take shelter immediately. 
*throws rock... fucking horde of teens incoming* WHAT THE FUCK!!! 
Hi I'm in a more evangelical tradition of Christianity And let me tell you a little secret about Jehovah's Witnesses. They have a very specific set of beliefs and from my understanding they might not try too hard to evangelize or even take in conversations that are trinitarian. A JW asked me on the bus once about the Bible. And i was very excited. I said I'd love to share in God's word with you. What are you up to tonight. And they were not into it, because they have a very specific style of doing their evangelism. I guess, if you ever feel a Jehovah's Witness is talking to you too much. Just talk to them about the divinity of Christ and ask them if they have ever invited Jesus into their heart. And it's funny they didn't want to have much to do with me. So maybe that will work. 
Were you just like "hey, can you just drop me off at this corner? Nah, I know it's a four hour walk home. I could use the exercise!"? 
My mom is Guatemalan and lived there until she was 20. Drug cartel is nothing to fuck with. 
I wonder what he thought when your 'Aura' got the fuck up outta there. 
I've lived in china for years(not now thank god); cancel that card and check the TV for an internal wifi connection. EDIT(For Clarity!): its very easy to put a crude data collection apparatus in an electronic device. No, I am not being paranoid; the nature of Chinese authentication systems makes this kind of info gathering the most effective means of fast, comprehensive id fraud. Also ask for a replacement USB device from your bank(provided you opened that kind of account). 
I was so confused when my school started an atheist club. I understand its' usefullness in a religious area but this was in a super liberal region where religion is considered a private thing and isn't really present in society. When the yearbook came out and I say the photo of this club they were literally all wearing trenchcoats and fedoras, it was so cringey. 
A friend was on a first date in the movies and accidentally let one slip out. He turned around to the couple behind him staring at the man and called him a, "fucking animal". 
Should've called 911 and spoke to them like 'Yo what's up John, can you come to me real quick?'. They now how to react to that. 
How did your mother take you being *that* high, or high at all? 
We lived in such a friendly area so people stopping to say hi to everyone wasn't really that unusual, but once he started sobbing my internal alarm was so loud I'm sure it could be heard everywhere. I don't know what he had planned and I don't care to know, if it was so bad he knew it was wrong enough to start getting hysterical it had to be horrible. 
those guys don't cry. they're too slick for it. it was probably going to be a rape and murder. 
I think I was 15-16 at the time. Pretty scrawny kid. I had this H.I. class that I had to do community service for so I chose my uncles church and I greeted the people coming in and helped out in Sunday school. Keep in mind this is my uncles small church I've known all these people since I was a baby. This one guy who I've never seen before and looked like a typical clown without the make-up or costume came up asking me to take a bus to his house and play football. I never said anything about that guy, and I always feel guilty about any kids he could have been successful at luring to his house. 
We have no clue who opened the door, the police said one creeper got away but they got one. 
Yeah but the neighbourhood that got fucked up has since been completely been rebuilt from the ground up with nice architecture and urban planning from the start, best hood of the city now. Very nice. 
Omg my mom is a speech therapist, and sometimes I go visit her at work to hang out in the OT room. I'm a 29 year old adult, OT room is still super cool. 
All humans in Grozny were targets during the Chechnya conflict. Entire blocks were leveled by air support just to send a message 
That just makes me want to wait around. Fuckin click-baity gut. 
Sometimes when your lizard brain kicks in you jusst have to trussst it. 
Jesus. Those are good cops. A lot would just arrest you along with the rest for good measure. What did you do with the car? 
My late aunt committed suicide. She was married to a man who, by my family's tales, was a devil worshipping D&D druggie. He went out in the forest with his "coven" and did weird rituals with the other devil worshippers. They believed he coerced my aunt into killing herself with a shotgun, or murdered her. I was always forbidden against playing RPGs, as that would lead to D&D, and eventually I'd become a witch and worship Satan. I'm talking worse than Jack Chick levels of propaganda, here. I think I have it figured out. The guy was a LARPer just having a good time with his buddies in their own weird but harmless way. My grandma couldn't grasp the concept of her daughter being responsible for her own suicide and "going to hell", so she blames this guy. I haven't thought about this in a long time, as it happened over 35 years ago, but now I kinda want to look the guy up. 
I was still young and a bit timid, I tried to resolve the issue without essentially escalating it too much to the best of my ability 
Couldn't be like a shoo shoo motion, because that just gets sassier the more insistently you do it. 
The state inspector that oversees my work on a few job sites drives a Prius. Dirty mofo sneaks up and scares the piss out of me every time. Hate that little ninja car. 
I think alligators are cute (from a distance) so a baby alligator would distract me so much. It's a good thing I don't live near any alligators 
I rode a mule for a while who was like this. "Stubborn as a mule" is a saying for a reason. We came to an understanding eventually but we had to at least *pretend* that whatever I wanted him to do was his idea. I miss that ornery old fucker. 
The falling branches were the only reason I noticed at all. If the tree had gone down without that convenient warning, I'd probably be dead. Thanks, tree! 
Every time I drive through Waco I-35 is under construction. It's like its been under construction for the last 6 years. Get your shit together Waco. 
They aren't that great. I'm halfway between them in Kansas and we just get both extremes. 
I know, right? I was sure he was going to insist that I come to the party. 
"My mother who has cancer and frequently volunteers at local animal shelters and is a nun is waiting for me." 
He was just looking for a genuinely nice woman to marry him and pay $5000 so he can collect his inheritance. 
 Pretty sure I would not be visiting Syria right now under any circumstances. He went for a wedding? That is crazy. 
100% did the right thing, hope you're doing better. 
The initial video? It was like 20 minutes and 24 seconds long. How long has he been recording me as a whole? From 9 years old to 15. The fallout: My mom tried to kill him. She didn't even maim him, but we gathered my little brothers and refuged in a family friends house for the night (we didn't stay friends for very long after that lol). Pastor was calles. Police were called. He was put in jail for a month. Was let out. Stalked my family for a bit (wasn't my first experience with stalkers) and then some other stuff came out (I didn't remember but he did some *other* stuff to me when I was MUCH younger) and I made a statement and he was put in jail for a much longer time. His end sentence was 5 years in jail. 
Five minutes after I collected my thoughts and calmed down a bit I did call her on my cell phone to come pick me up. I was 15 at the time, and I'm 18 now. It happened quite a while ago. 
Smart move, who needs a friend who uses silly made up words like "judgey" 
Mate. Leave. Now. Today. Wait 'till she's out or whatever, but leave. You don't deserve to be treated like this and staying isn't helping you or her. Get out and stay out, it'll be the best thing you ever do. 
She was either Plan C, was there to make the potential vibe with a stranger less rapey, or to surround Sugar Daddy with more women, because a guy like that's good judgment is inversely proportional to the women:him ratio ("the Strip Club axiom"). Some combination of those three. 
I don't understand it either, if he had asked it may have been different (probably not though), but to just put it in Teddies when I've gone for a dance is creeper territory. I'm glad I ended it pretty soon after! I have never had a good time with hallucinogens - and this just made it 1,000 times worse! I honestly was freaking out thinking I was going to be date raped. 
I've seen it done successfully, albeit rarely. I think I am at 1/3 now 
yeah, this. Losing a parent isn't easy, he's just not dealing well. This is the saddest of all posts here so far :( 
He's a pretty cool bean, yeah. Sad tho that he had to realize that. 
When I was younger the Jehovah's Witnesses came to the door. I invited them in as I had just started house cleaning and invited them to jump in. I told them we can talk and pray while we work and they did! Sadly, they never did come back after that. 
I wish but they were in my car. Pretty sure I was a drug mule 
I found it a little easier to use the term drug lord but yeah, the dude was a lower level dude. Thanks for the correction, cerote. Jaja. 
Apparently the most surprising fact here is that op didn't know her cousin fucking boyfriend was a racist 
American here, Why would he/she have to check for an internal wifi card in the tv? 
Feels like something out of an action movie for me. It's like a distraction for the protagonist before some other person who doesn't look nearly as sketchy actually shoots up the place. 
Damn, he must've been really invested in his date! 
The thing is, ren fairs are particularly bad because they hit the sweet spot between high nerd density and high "badly aging hippy" density. 
She knew that I smoked weed before, so she wasn't too upset about me being high, but she was pretty upset at me getting so high and making Thanksgiving so uncomfortable for everyone. 
Physics teachers are petty cool, let's be honest. Source: I teach physics 
Yeah sounded too compulsive to be caused by anything but mental illness 
Did the one they catch confess to what may have been up? 
What's occupational therapy? And what does it have to do with a room? Serious questions. 
Ah god bless the Russian tactics. They have hostages in front of the windows? Shoot the hostages! Hostages in a hospital? Shell the hospital! 
1990's conflicts showed a special side of human apathy, that I think most Westerners still look away from / don't bother to review facts about. Pretty much anyone praises who Bill Clinton for his intervention in the Balkans didn't bother looking up any facts. (not trying in any way to relate this to current politics, but that conflict sure was a fuck-up from a humanitarian standpoint) 
 *This stay-at-home mom makes $6,000 interpreting gut feelings.* *Intestines hate her!* 
You know they loved every minute of that. I've watched enough COPS to know that the sneakier they get to be the more fun they have. 
Your kind didn't survive in Florida. So it only makes sense. 
A family friend had one escape and try living wild for weeks. They'd keep getting phone calls with vague sightings, make their way there and by the time they'd arrived they'd find it gone. Ultimately it got into the quarry and they said "deal with it or we will", so they just left its calf (did I mention it had a calf?) making calf noises in a corral in the middle of a field and waited for it to come back. 
Your brother is full of shit. There's only a 20% chance you'll use it. (I'm from the area, back off) 
It has, in fact, been under construction the last 6 years. It feels like it's been under construction my whole life. It will never not be under construction. The world will end, and IH-35 will still be under construction. **Edit** I feel like someone should point this out: Y'all keep talking about highways that were finished and then The Powers That Be decided weren't good enough. We can't even get that far through Salado. They were close once. Then an overpass collapsed and it seems like they've completely started over. So, it's not just the constant construction... it's that the construction never moves to a new stage. 
Probably the Executive Inn & Suite DIRECTLY west of I-30 across from BU...I know, I've stayed there 
I'm glad they're in a safer city now. My heart goes out to Kurdistan. 
This has been my experience as well. They even have the text alerts and will send you a text when they're getting close. 
Your mom rocks for that. We read too much how parents pick the abuser over their child and it makes me want to punch them in the lungs. 
I get that. What I don't get is why a "friend" would put her in that situation and not be honest about it. 
Russian Scale 1- Bottle of mostly drunk Stoli 3- Nesting Dolls 5- Red Square in Winter 7- Child Smoking unfiltered Cigarette 9- Adidas Jacket and Pants of the same color 
A much better way is to boil water, pour it into a cup and put the ping pong ball in there. Cleans ya dirty beer pong balls & sorts the dents out 
Kids are way more observant than you think. My parents divorced when my youngest sister was ten, and when they told her, she just said "I think you'll both be happy now." 
You may be the most diabolical genius alive. Jehovah's witness vanquished never to return AND you got the house work done in a fraction of the time! 
I have no idea, it's been over 10 years and after the initial arrest the police got our statements and that was it, I heard nothing else. 
Given it is acceptable to bomb a hospital that has enemies in it according to the Law of Armed Conflict, but it really isn't best practice. They really don't give any fucks to civilian collateral damage in any of their war campaigns 
Drawing aggro like that is very dangerous without proper raid gear 
Went to Florida as a kid and almost got naturally unselected for a similar reason, didn't realize the fuckers could jump, shit should be in the pamphlet or something. 
That's their long game. When judgement day comes around, Wacovians (?) will be like: "Dear Lord, give us more time, IH-35 isn't finished yet!" 
Oh hell. That place looks scary from the 7/11 parking lot. 
She was an awesome mom for that definitely. I love her. She's a little... overprotective, but I know where it comes from, and I can't blame her for that. 
Nobody ain't got time to boil water at a college party. 
Kids don't get the respect they deserve. My family isn't huge, when my first nephew was born I got to watch him grow up. His parents and my parents would treat him like he knew nothing, yet when I looked at him you could just tell he knew enough to understand whatever was going on. 
VERE SAFETY IS - *loud teenager screech* - NUMBER ONE PRIORITY HOLY CRAP 
Well he could have used misdirect and told the old guy the cops were coming, thus giving him the opportunity to do a multi-strike or even a barrage or rocks to the old man and would have been fine. Although if he had taunted the old man by calling him a dirty hippie or something to that effect it could have started an enrage phase. 
When I lived in Florida as a kid they taught us how to spot and out maneuver gators in school, and of course my entire class still almost got eaten. 
i think she's earned the right to be overprotective a little. She sounds amazing. 
Kids aren't dumb, they just don't know as much as we do because of the lack of exposure. It's like when we move to another country and having to deal with stuff we don't know about. It doesn't mean we're stupid, even if locals are surprised you don't know of basic stuff. Also, I've noticed that people look down on kids because they simply cannot remember a lot from the past. I have a pretty good memory and would remember my thoughts as a kid, so I'm pretty sure that other kids had the same ideas and thoughts too. 
I'd have probably stuttered at "inept", then try to say something about words being hard, but then somehow manage to fuck up the word "something". Probably end up walking away embarrassed. 
Probably future you went back in time to hook you up with your true love. 
Did M come to meet you because you guys were talking or was she just a friend? 
"I fucked your mom xxTripleSnipexx" "How about you fuck me next" 
*u/SmirkingSheep realizes she does it on purpose *MGS ! Noise 
Aww. My first girlfriend happened this way, she out of the blue pursued me because I must have made a good impression the first time we hung out with a mutual friend. Didn't find her attractive TBH and was really hesitant about reciprocating because, you know, didn't want to hurt her if I changed my mind and also first girlfriend so I was pretty clueless. Fast forward a year or so, we are madly in love and I realize she's one of the most physically beautiful people I've ever seen, it just took me a while to see it. I still think about her sometimes, but that's life. Everything would have been totally different had we stayed together and while I do miss her and the feeling of being completely comfortable and in love with someone, I wouldn't be the same person today and I honestly wasn't emotionally mature enough to sustain that type of relationship and keep both of us happy. I really hope she's happy and hope I can find someone to make me feel like that again :) 
Is this guy from texas? Because this sounds like something my friend from texas would say and do. 
Ah, the classic love story we all came to this thread for 
Tried this. It didn't work out. Was adopted, then abandoned 
Ah Bebo. I remember my quiz that i created for people to fill in on their profile: "What Genre of music are you" ended up getting really popular. One of the possible outcomes was "I am a pineapple and not a music genre" or some such nonsense. 
I knew someone in highschool, had a bit of a crush on her. Both of us too introverted to do anything about it. We didn't see each other for a few years after high school. I was with some friends from college when we recognized each other. After a few months of hanging out, we figured we should go out as we intended in high school. That was 4 years ago. We got married last October and adopted a lizard together. 
Silly me, this theater is so dark that I dropped my weiner in my lap. 
This reminds me of drake and josh. You are Josh and she is Mindy. 
Even with the advice I'd probably still be too lazy and scared to use it 
I don't think it's occured to anybody he might be joking Just ten replies going "END IT SHES A MONSTER IT'S TERRIBLE PUNCH YOUR GYM AND RAPE FACEBOOK, TICKLE THE LAWYER" 
There are lots of comments about online dating, why not give that a go? 
Good on your friends part to give you a little push 
Amen to that. Out where i live theres about 300 women my ageish over 10000 sq km. 
Math?? I would've thought you had...CHEMISTRY together 
So just to clarify, you mail-ordered your Russian gf? or did you have mad pickup game at the airport? 
was you profile exactly like that i should rewrite mine hope you don't mind me copying this 
I would have contrived to say it too quietly. Even the smoothest lines sound awkward when you have to repeat them. 
I smell a movie in the works... Except admittedly, that concept is an overused trope 
Hey once she wrote her number on a bunch of twix and gave them to me. My fat ass just ate the twix and didnt even notice lol 
There is a beginning and ending, where is the beef? 
Successful Tinder stories are my favourite. My boyfriend and I are both introverts, met on Tinder and have been together a little over two years. 
Don't worry, you remain stationary on treadmills, it's unlikely you'd run into her. 
Japanese rope bondage hookup. A tale as old as time 
And that dog's breed? A labra-huahua. And now you know...the rest of the story. 
This is so true for me it's sad. Instead of holding a conversation like a normal person you just end up saying the same things to everyone. It's more like a script than a conversation. 
Damn. I'm the opposite. With strangers, I can say just about anything: it's not like I'm gonna see them again... With coworkers and friends: Oh shit, is Karen upset? Is it her 17 year old dog that died? Should I bring that up in a conversation? NO. *That's insensitive you prick. * Fuck. Maybe I'll ask about her Nieces wedding... Oh yeah, they broke up 3 weeks ago.. "Oh hey Karen, how you doing?" "Good." "Okay." 
*looks girl in the eyes, clams up and starts to sweat* "So... u-u-uh... know any good school shooter jokes?" 
Yeah it was an effort for sure. I'm not naturally good at that sort of thing. I've got a set amount of "energy" to use on people throughout the day, and I usually use it on what few friends I have. Using it on people I don't know is always an effort, especially when you're as awkward as I am.. 
I had to re-read a couple times. I wanted to know where I can adopt a wizard. :-p 
Ah, I see you are a man of culture too. (99 in cooking, firemaking and fletching because I'm a noob) 
The trick is to drink alone in your room with an attractive person you like. 
OP: *running out of argument points* THUMB WAR!!! One, two, three, four, I declare a thumb war! Girlfriend: One, two, three you lose *fast forward* Girlfriend: I love you. OP: SEEYA IN CHEMISTRY! 
10/10 sprog. I always enjoy finding your replies in these threads. 
Man, I made an account on eharmony the other day and between the questions about hobbies/interests and the parts where you have to rate how much different descriptions apply to you, I realized I'm a pretty boring person. 
According to the ads though there are hot singles only a mile away! 
I was about to Google image it, then I read your comment and did what you did. Thank you. You are my hero. 
"Hey girl. You were just on a plane, but I'm high as fuck." 
Or they respond and it's too loud for you to hear them and shout, "WHAT!?" and they repeat themselves but you can only make out, "I said jdsjmdsjmofgjidvjf!" and you just smile and nod, "OHHHHHHHHH!" 
How about going back in time to make yourself fall in love with the female version of you to give birth to you? 
The stars were perfectly aligned that day. Good for you 
A woman who can beat me at Mario Kart *is* the dream! 
The beef was we started fighting. A lot. She was bipolar, it was my first relationship...not a good combo. I wasn't mature enough to completely take care of her, she wasn't in the right mind to even take care of herself. It really boiled down to a combination of both of us being young and dumb and a lot of fighting and frustration. And don't get me wrong, I was at fault too. I was insecure and jealous every opportunity I had. I was every bit to blame as she was, especially when it "officially" ended (we went on a break for like a month, resumed our relationship for like four after). I was a mess and did every rotten thing in the book after. Eventually I realized it wasn't going to be and I stopped. Still sorry I put her through that, still miss her, still wish nothing but the best for her. Have a good life, all I ever wanted for you anyway. :-) 
I've been using Tinder for the past eight months and haven't gotten anywhere. I rarely match and when I do they never seem to want to actually converse. Do you have any tips? I've noticed that nobody else really writes an actual bio about themselves so I'm thinking of getting rid of mine and writing something short and dumb instead... 
1. Ask how long they've been dating for 2. Devise plan to break them up 3. Sell as lakefront property 4. Date 
... True as it can be Barely even friends Then somebody bends Unexpectedly 
My grandfather, his two sisters and one of there husbands are Dutch, and when he pointed out "washing" I immediately thought of them. "Shecks and Shairs" I miss them :( My grandparents were married 30 yrs. He was always a gentlemen. 
The funniest (and most embarrassing) thing is when you accidentally read the wrong line from said script and seem like an idiot. As an introvert working in a restaurant, regulars would constantly come up and introduce themselves/talk to me. Never forget the time someone mentioned the rainy weather and i responded with "Im well how are you?" 
It is true, that there's something totally liberating about a complete stranger that you'll never see again. I never feel self-conscious around cashiers at the Target out of town while I'm on vacation. There's an inner-circle of maybe 10 friends or family members which I thrive. I almost feel like an extrovert around them. But you pegged it exactly around acquaintances & co-workers. You're supposed to be nice, but not too nice. You're suppose to like your hobbies but if you like anything too much people think you're nuts. Maybe I'm supposed to get them to talk because not everything is about me, but then I feel like I'm interrogating them. And everyone is different so I have to act one way around Chuck and another way around Bob. Not like I'm a totally different person, but I have to know my audience. But happens if Chuck and Bob are both there? What do I do then? I've made this a bit amusing but there's some truth behind the humor, these are my social worries. 
Yes. Please. Change the female lead if you need to. I need a movie about Ryan Reynolds as a shy but romantic army veteran finding love on a bus. 
I thought we established that the step before profit was, "sell as Lakefront property." 
Actually weird can be OK. As long as chicks are looking at you then you must have something that interests them. 
I kind of figured that might be the case, but we weren't even really dating at the time he was supposed to come down, just best friends. still able to enjoy the "off-again" part of our on-again/off-again relationship without it being awkward of uncomfortable. it was really nice. but yeah I'm thinking he either met a girl, or relapsed on drugs and knew I would be heartbroken by it. 
Why on earth would you sort by length before guilt? 
Everyone's got something going for them mate. You just need to find it. I'm a pretty boring person in general but I've got hobbies that I enjoy whether most people think they're strange or not...and sooner or later you'll find someone who think they're interesting. 
Kate (3.21 miles) has sent you a private message! (1) 
Except it takes a while to realize you've got a fish on, most of them get away. 
Haha, we played Halo with eachother for hours almost every single day after that. Then I got some really weird picture message from a random guy on Xbox Live. I told him about it and said "I'll show it to you" then came back with "oh wait there is no way to forward it on here". And so he said he'd give me his cell phone number and I could take a picture of it and send it to him. At this point we had been talking about 2.5 months. Him and his friends recreated the picture and sent theirs back to the guy. Umm, then I think shortly after I asked for his MySpace :') and things just kept progressing! We met in person 7 months after we met on Xbox Live, then decided to make it "official". He moved states to be closer one year later 
I had a relatively simple bio (short list of things I'm interested in), but my boyfriend's was really funny. I found the bio to be the most important part, and didn't swipe right on people who didn't have one. But you could always try something short and witty to catch people's attention. I'm sure the people worth matching with will like whatever you have. Best of luck! 
"A common mistake that people make when trying to design something completely foolproof is to underestimate the ingenuity of complete fools" -Douglas Adams 
"so, have you ever used your elephant trunk to do anything *interesting*?" 
He probably started playing jumanji and is now trapped 
yep sounds like you've got a sure-fire case of the autisms you have 2 months 
That was a really good pun. Unfortunately I'm knot able to make a pun nearly as good as that, pls no hurt 
Just back away slowly while talking about the weather until your view of the other person is blocked. 
It's kinda hot outside huh' florida and all i can't believe it's this hot pleaseleavemealone 
"WEVE INVADED CHINA." "PLEASE RESPECT US, OR WE WILL INVADE YOU AS WELL." 
Step 11) I think I skipped some steps and now there are all these armed clowns and apparently I'm the President of Ecuador, what do? 
I used to call myself a hydroceramic technician lol 
I'm a quality technician for a metal fabricator. My entire job is telling people that they fucked up or giving someone bad news. It's really disheartening when my boss gets pissed off just because I'm trying to do a good job, or when I'm pressured by production to cut corners just so we can honor the almighty ship date. It can be very thankless work at times. 
damn im so jealous, how did you get into it/what experience did u have before?? 
Sales is a really good skill to have, and it translates well to almost every industry. Great thing to be able to fall back on. 
Doesn't that mean you're the sex ed guy? What's the weirdest question you got? 
Ya know porn star sounds more appealing some days to me too Then I remember I'm a dude and to get my MF break, I'd have to do a lot of MM stuff and I decide teachings more appealing 
Have you ever thought about building something that can maintain and build things that maintain and build other things? Then you could just sit back and let your machine do all the work. 
Could I hire you to follow me around and when I do something stupid you sing, "MistAAAAAAKE!" 
why would you just say you have stories and not give one 
Oh I'm a confederate Seamstress but I guess we're pretty close 
Also a vet tech here! I put your pets in a headlock and stab them in the throat to harvest their blood, all while talking to them in a very monotone soothing voice. :) I also do pretty much everything else in the hospital too, short of diagnosis, surgery, and prescribing. 
What happened? How long you been graduated? What was your field? 
I just loved your emotional trauma kit, it was perfect to help me get over my girlfriend. For anyone wondering it had: A fifth of cheap vodka A nice mixtape Some tissues And a recording of you calling me a burnt out closeted homosexual, just like mom used to say :) Fives stars my man 
Had to do this at Toy's R Us one summer. So many dirty diapers left in carts during the summer... 
Did you make $8,000 /month working from home with just a computer? I've heard about this. 
I took a combat hunter course in the Marine Corps about 7 years ago all about tracking and hunting humans in various environments but with an emphasis on jungle environments at the time. Still one of the best course I've ever taken. 
I want a job doing voices. I can sing and I have very good enunciation. How did you get your job? 
This is my stapler. There are many like it, but this one is mine. My stapler is my best friend. It is my life. I must master it as I must master my life. Without me, my stapler is useless. Without my stapler, I am useless. I must use my stapler true. I must staple straighter than my enemy who is trying to staple me. I must staple him before he staples me. [...] 
How can I help you today? Translation: *Fuck you, die in a fire.* 
I have a WRX, I love that car more than anything!! 
My favorite is when they want you to call the manager and the manager tells you the exact same thing you said 5 minutes ago. 
I'm a former editor, Deal mainly with motion Graphics now. How did you get "in"? And are you in Cali or Nevada? 
Have you tried turning it off and then turning it on again? 
I base collection buys on inmate tastes (recreational fiction) and add in a healthy dose of positive biographies, a heavy shake of non-fiction. I also know that many inmates read at a lower reading level so I include a lot of young adult fiction and books with excellent photographs/art. My current budget is amazing! We probably spend about $15,000 per year just on books. We also have about 10 newspaper subscriptions and 20 magazine subscriptions. I work with the degree-granting state college that is offering degrees as part of President Obama's act to include felons to be eligible for Pell Grants. 
"Stationary Sanitary Engineer" I called myself in high school. Everyone else called me the Dish Bitch. 
I briefly worked in a much smaller musuem but that was years ago! I applied through a temp agency and I'm on a rolling one month contract right now. 
can confirm, I work for one, but after working 6 to 7 days a week since February, the day after tax day is freakin glorious! 
It's amazing how sales clicks with people sometimes. I've been in sales for... 8 years now I think, and the change in people that take it up for a while is seriously profound. I've taken wallflowers who get nervous on the phone with their own friends and seen them transform into people who are comfortable in any social setting and confident enough to talk to anybody about anything, and actually enjoy doing so. 
I am actually drunk right now so if I say something wrong to you, please, let me know and I'll delete the comment, but I really hope you find your way through this difficult time! I hope you succeed! Is so refreshing seeing someone willing for the best! Good luck! 
I'm a component tech and the bulk of my job is overhauling CRJ and Dash-8 wheels and brakes, you might be rolling on some hardware I put together. 
hey bud, you'll have to wait about 2 hours until that question gets reposted on askreddit 
Right now I'm an interpretive (educational) ranger having fun with it before I move on to the next logical step: assistant campground manager or something of that ilk. The hard part about this career is the fact that you usually have to start at the bottom. I went from groundskeeping to maintenance to parking lot fees and tickets (not fun) to interp and visitor services management. Plus a Wildlife Bio degree. 
Other than a 4-year degree I collect certifications: I'm a wetlands delineator, tree sawyer, fur trapper, and certified interpretive guide. A lot of places provide a training or two to give you relevant skills. Right now I'm making around 36k and hoping to jump to the 42k GS-7 bracket next year. Although with my skills I could be doubling that at an oil company or environmental firm. I do it for that hat. 
Read a few ama's the advice for men to get a start into MF is 'bring in your super hot gf who will only go on camera with you' 
I look for jobs on UpWork.com mostly. ACX.com has work if you're more interested in doing audiobooks. 
Reminds me of the IT guy who coded a program to do his job, spent all day playing League, and forgot how to code after years of doing that. 
Mainly because I never planned to be a bartender for 3 years. I just ended up kind of doing it since it was good money, and I like evening hours. Just hate having to deal with stuck up drunks all the time. 
I don't know about her, but if be happy to do that for you. My daughter used to love when I declared "opera day" and we sang everything. Now she's a teenager. :-/ 
Swim to your local recruiter. Seriously, we need people. 
27 if you go in without going directly to your job specialty school (called A School) right after boot camp. 32 if you do go to school directly after boot camp. 
When I'm doing an a.g.e. I look one particular dr in the eye and say "feels good." 
Accounting and finance. 6 months. A rough divorce, and recovery from depression from that. Working on turning things around. 
Volunteer here. If only 85% of our calls weren't second homes who's automatic alarm systems are out of date or people who haven't been introduced to snow tires. 
Pretty much every conversation I've had with a contractor ever. "I don't get what you mean by the space opens up and the light plays a certain way in the morning.....I'm just putting up a big window wall. Plenty of light all the time. So what if it's the north wall." TBH though I went to a school that taught us to work with and not against the engineers and contractors. Just wish they'd try it, too. 
"You want that!? It's much too complicated, there's no way." *Sigh*"Ok, missionary it is." 
Because half their designs aren't feasible with a budget. 
No, more like "Hello, do you have a moment? I have this amazing apple here and it'd be great if you could take a bite out of it". 
I lived there for a while not as an ESL teacher. The accommodations are pretty basic but totally livable. Usually in larger cities since that's where the demand is. You get paid to start around $30000/year but the tax rate is pretty low and with housing paid for, you pocket around $2K/month. Of course there are mobile phone, food and transport expenses. I'd say you could save easily $1000/month since life there is pretty affordable and fun. You can make up to $70K after a couple of years. 
Yes but I make way less and get covered in stickers on the daily. 
Absolutely. Allows for quicker promotions and helps you immensely with how you teach. 
I mean, they don't line up with the rest of us... 
I made the change to retail and corporate. Took awhile to get used to sleeping like a normal person again! 
This is in the U.K. where one of the biggest problems is actually distinguishing tracks as there aren't many places where there's only one set of prints/sign. I started off doing it with SAR, but it translates into law enforcement quite easily. 
I love when I'm just following policy, so they ask for a manager and the manager ignores the policy and gives the customer what they want. 
Well, like I said, I work from home. Home is Ontario, Canada. Most of our stuff is shot in LA, probably half. The rest is done all over. Czech, New Zealand mostly now but they used to book locations in crazy places. The company is based in BC. When I signed up I was in Calgary. I moved there, saw the ad and, while there were many jobs to be had I just knew I would end up working there because crazy shit follows me around. I got a few offers but overall, none were as good. When I started I worked in a pod with about 6 others. I moved back home and took the gig with me. I consider myself super lucky. 
very cool! I work as a nurse in juvenile facility and the availability of books is a huge deal, both in terms of the kids tolerating their sentences, and in terms of their education. So many have never read recreationally before, and many get a lot better at reading because there is nothing else for them to do, so having the entry level books is essential, along with something a little more challenging for them to graduate to. I'll never forget one kid who told me "They have REALLY good books here!" As if the JH librarian had special access to books not available in the community... made me kinda sad. 
Did it for 5 years. Didn't have any ink for the first 4. It did hurt my business on occassion. 
Sales is generally a solid background because the key portion to getting a job is selling yourself to the hiring manager. Making yourself seem like the best candidate is more important than being the best candidate. 
Why can't everyone be like this person when drunk? 
"good" is not the whole story in this case. It's one of the highest stress jobs out there and they have huge retention problems. 
I've had two friends go through it. One is one of the smartest, most disaplined guys I know, he failed. Was a total pot head and party boy. Passed with flying colors. Both said it was the hardest training/schooling program they've ever been through. 
Sex Sexers of Reddit, what is the sexiest sex you've ever sexed? 
Yeah thats what i figured, im already in concessions. But dont exactly know how to go the next step. My best guess is college. 
it definitely hasnt. I'm an avid fan of nosleep and have yet to find something I like as much. 
What's a wetlands delineator? I know what the words mean, but not when put together. Do people really look around and say "shit, I'm in a wetland, I really wish someone would have delineated this for me"? 
Yeah, for most of us, MM is a lot easier than bringing in a smoking hot girlfriend... 
True true, haven't had to deal with anything too bad but I know it's coming. Also depends on the clientele 
I just realized you can end a lot of comments with "Now she's a teenager :-/" 
My BIL just tried to join this week, was told he didn't qualify because of his anxiety (which I tried to tell him, but of course I don't know what I'm talking about). If you have anxiety, they probably don't want you. Edit-Spelling 
No swimming, but you sure as hell need to learn how to skate. 
After being in it long enough it's hard to know if you could ever fit in at any other field's workplace. 
Dude you got this. Things often get more difficult before they get easy. This random internet stranger believes in you! 
I never had a hard time working with architects. It's fun trying to work with them to make something aesthetically pleasing. It's a challenge at times that keeps it interesting. Contractors on the other hand have been a different story. 
only on the starchitect-level (like zaha hadid shit)... i design houses and spend most of my time trying to get my engineer to not over-engineer the shit out of everything. dude, it's not the starship enterprise. 
I have a friend that does similar things, but they buy huge bulk items and then break down and resale. Stupid lucrative but the startup capital was also high. 
What's your opinion on Jackson Galaxy? (Not his questionable fashion choices, but his observations and interpretations on cat behavior) 
In my state you cannot be a teacher unless you have a Masters. 
I never did retail or any apartment complexes or anything like that Corporate security is really the way to go lol. Safer, better pay, less shitty people I just got stuck doing overnights and weekends which sucked. 
When i know something isn't in our policy, i always go to this one manager who wont budge. He's my favorite especially with upset customers who cuss at employees. He will ask them to stop and if they keep doing it, escort them out 
So he just called his phone a 'PC'? Sounds like a customer alright. 
I totally agree with all you have said. There is pleasure in serving such an appreciative and information-hungry populace. Many of the men at our prion never set foot in a library before their incarceration and probably won't after prison-- but I like creating exceptional libraries for inmates to be entertained and educated. 
Which is weird. It's not like tattoo artists do all their own ink. Like c'mon . 
Show up to work carrying an axe, grow a beard, and have a distinguished hat. Soon they will hire you, or you can become a mercenary Park Ranger anyway. 
I can find the definite boundary of a wetland by digging a hole for soil samples, doing a vegetative survey, and recording evidence of hydrology. It comes in handy for construction, road planning, and trail creation because choosing the wrong spot can make a road crumble, house foundation sink, or flood neighboring areas. Not all wetlands look like wetlands. I took the class through the Army Corps of Engineers. 
You don't have to actually be dating her. You can find someone on the street that's willing to bang for bucks. 
They'll wear you down. At first you won't notice the patterns, and won't read too much into things. The longer you do it, the more you will start to guess how things will play out, and be right. Then eventually the stuff you used to ignore is practically a call to war and you quit the next day. 
For example: "My ex and I used to have the *wildest* sex life, but -" 
TBF clinical-level anxiety isn't exactly the greatest thing to have for a Coastie to have 
You spelt stumbling miles though sand with a 100lbs on your back funny 
My father just retired after 30 years working as an architect for the federal government. He worked on a lot of boring but *very* large-scale projects, and man does he have a lot of unbelievable stories about contractors. The federal government is required to go through a bidding process and pick whoever bids the lowest amount. So he was often forced to work with horrible, crappy contractors who bid the lowest (knowing full well they would just screw the government in the most creative ways to, in the end, charge more than a good contractor would have). It was pretty much always a battle. There were good contractors, but they had a habit of giving fair estimates at the beginning that reflected the actual cost, not just a number low enough to win. 
Which pretty much gets destroyed every single mission nowadays. 
When I worked retail I appreciated that my managers were team players. :) Despite the level of discipline they upheld (still respectable), they always had underlings like myself in their best interest. Never took sides with a customer over me. 
Imagine that though. Like, people keep insisting he can't be a good tattoo artist without doing his own ink, so one day someone comes in, asks to see what tats he did on himself - he lifts up his shirt and just has this scrawl over his back, and he looks at the customer like "how did you expect this would look?" 
I believe the term for that is a prostitute, but if you're filming it's no longer illegal and she is a paid actress. 
I didn't want to be the one to say it but you nailed it. *Now-* 
Yeah, that could be problematic while you're trying to save somebody's life. 
How is it possible that society hasn't figured out that taking the lowest bidder doesn't work out, and then to make it worse, force government & municipalities to do so. 
Well maybe if you'd let them add in more reinforcements... 
$1000 dollars for an apartment? Lol it better have maid service, 10 rooms and a gold plated toilet. Source: Mississippi. 
It depends on the popularity of the book and the volume of sales. The one I did I'm getting paid through 50% royalties, but it's only sold 3 copies since it's release 4 or 5 months ago. 
He probably didn't develop anytbing revolutionary - a lot of the coding he did likely already exists, the company simply wasn't aware of it. They likely never needed this guy to begin with and had no idea. 
I think the law originally came about to prevent fraud, like where you would "choose" a contractor that intentionally overcharged and then they would give a kickback to the federal employee or politician. So I think it was good intentioned, but there should have been a provision to have a "banned list" of shitty contractors that have proven themselves to be con artists. He shouldn't have had to deal with some of these scumbags multiple times. I can safely say that he worked really hard his whole career trying to protect taxpayers from getting ripped off. I think he was pretty effective, but it was a non-stop fight with some of the really shady companies. 
Standard code is 30/105, meaning that it can survive a 30 minute barrage from a 105mm howitzer, but really, you'd want at least 45/155 if you want your basement to last. 
San Francisco here. You have no idea how angry and sad I got just reading this. 
If you link to it here I bet you could at least double that 
There's a joke about SF rent: I was looking for apartments close to work and couldn't catch a break, until I finally found something downtown for only $600/mo. It was small, but I couldn't refuse. Then I realized it was a parking space. 
My SO likes to become a steamroller every now and then when we're lazing around in bed (usually when he wants to get up and do things and I'm feeling lazy) and roll over me. The worst part is that he makes engine starting and rumbling noises first so I know it's coming. 
My husband tucks me into bed every night. He's a night owl, but even if we don't go to bed together most nights, I get an awesome tuck-in. I don't remember how it started, but ten years later I'm still getting tucked in and it's my favorite part of the evening. 
I'm scared of spontaneous brain aneurysms, she's scared of spiders. This might not be one size fits all. 
To add to this: cooking class together. They're a blast, even if you have no idea how to cook. Maybe you'll learn something, maybe not. Even if you don't, most cooking classes let you bring your own booze, and you eat what you cook. 
I feel like now that I'm an adult with access to credit cards and Lowe's and whatnot, my blanket fort wouldn't stop until it filled the entire house, the yard, and half the neighbor's yards. 
"No kids, i swear we weren't worm racing in the house. The rug burn is from all the fucking we do when you're gone." 
My girlfriend and I are teachers. We had so many plans on what we'd do and accomplish this summer. We basically just did this for two months. It was pretty great. 
Just decide how before hand. My SO is a piece sorter (even has special Lego sorting trays) and I am a dump into a big pile and hunt person. After the trial seperation, we worked it out in marriage counseling. Still, overall would recommend. 
Sounds like pure horror to me. I'm imagining loud, heavy metal in a dark house not knowing where the fuck you are. Touching someones head and long hair, saying "gotcha!" then you hear your significant other from the other side of the house "but I'm over here..." 
I always get kicked out because I'm going for melee kills. 
We do this too! Every day pretty much for 7 years now. It's not even about sex, sometimes it's the best conversation we have all day. And I can diagram stuff on the shower door. 
TFW your girlfriend is a third your size so you can't lava boat her. 
same, probably not gonna happen anytime soon, but a man can dream :) 
Upon first read, I thought "backroading" meant...exactly what you think I mean 
I tried the spaghetti thing with a churro once and all I got was a real hard bite on the lip 
Can this be done with underweight people? My boyfriend and I are 110 pounds. 
My husband and I play a game called "Bed Shark." It is innocent at first, but can get dirty if you want. It's basically just wrestling on a bed. In order to win and claim the "Bed Shark" title, you need to pin both of your partner's shoulders to the mattress for three seconds. It all got started when we made the bed after doing the sheet laundry. It was so warm and cozy that I crawled under the covers and started wiggling around, calling myself the "Bed Shark". Then my husband jumped on me, pinned my shoulders and claimed himself the first "Bed Shark" champion. He currently holds the title. 
I feel like this would result in solid forever marriages or immediate break ups. 
Yeah.....unless your SO is really good and forgets how hard skiing is for someone who has never done it and encourages you to take on a medium slope before your class starts and you come so close to breaking your back. Skiing is the devil. Never again. 
You have to play the long con and replace all of the family photos with non-bear photos. Plan ahead, take one with and one without. 
Careful there, Cosmo girl. Next thing you'll be saying something like "bat it around between your hands like a cat playing with a toy". 
Look at her post history. Very sad, but he's amazingly lucky to have her. 
So I ask of you the same thing I'd ask someone who got hit by a real steamroller: how did you not get out of the way? 
THAT'S EXACTLY WHY YOU NEED TO TRAIN! What if there's a real fire! 
When my son was two, I started a third shift job and the second morning when I came home, showered and went to bed, he was waking up and read me a story, tucked me in and kissed me good night. One of my best memories. 
I pictured them together making the kayaks 69 while doing voices and sound effects 
Instructions unclear, performed fellatio on my kayak 
Only losers think there is such thing as "too competitive" 
I have a vision of you throwing dice at her and knocking over the board, yelling "I WARNED YOU THIS WOULD HAPPEN!" 
Monopoly is one thing, but Monopoly Deal is a next-level relationship destroyer. 
Dominion is a great game. I've recently got a second expansion for it. But I'll say this. The game requires very pedantic set of mind when it comes to procedure. A lot of the little mechanics depend on those procedures executed in the right order. Also setup time and changing a game can take a while. Especially if you start having more then the base game. What I recommend for a lot easier experience is Star Reals. Very similar deck building game. But building combos is a lot more obvious for new players. Its a lot more giving when it comes to play order and it still has fair bit of depth. 
Ask for a back scratch instead. Back scratches are the best. 
Fill a terrarium with deadly hobo spiders and then take turns smashing your head into the side. God, do I have to think of everything? 
I'm afraid of catching her cheating. Of course that could turn into, "Dear Penthouse, I never thought I'd be writing you" 
I've got 50 bucks, can you seed a bonsai treehouse? 
 Yeah, but you said it... you said Night Crawlers. Now... now I feel like I can't... move past it. I gotta know what that is. It... it's no big deal, you know. If I were you I'd just write it down cause it's not really a big deal. What is it? It's... what it sounds like. What it sounds like is that you two crawl around like worms at night. That's what it sounds like. 
Husky owner here. There's not enough lint rollers in the world that will take off the fur on our clothes after worm racing. 
I would almost rather walk in on them having sex. At least that would make sense. 
It was somewhere in PA, I don't remember what town, but it was on our way from Pittsburg back to Rhode Island. I was also introduced to scrapple there, although I was very hesitant about eating something with "crap" in the name. 
Awww that's so sweet. I always let out sleep farts and it wakes me up because I'm like 'shit, did he hear that massive fart' and then I'll hear him giggle. 
If you thought that was bad try Keep Talking and Nobody Explodes. We bickered a bit during Portal 2, we were just straight up flinging abuse at each other with Keep Talking. 
A nice noob against your back or your chest is a wonderful thing. Extra points for hard nipple. 
At least the melee cool down for laser tag is fast. 
An ex seduced me by taking a mouthful of red wine and kissing me, pouring it into my mouth. Was one of the most sensual things I've ever experienced. 
I can just see you and your wife standing with your hands on your hips butt ass naked in the shower: "No, no, no, the induction pump goes before the turbo-encabulator, like this" *modifies shower door drawing* 
Yup, I'll buy a magazine or show her funny stuff on reddit or youtube. Or just sit and talk. Showertime, or her bathtime is my favorite part of the day. 
Probably because they do it daily. I dont find it odd and think it is cool but I could see other people thinking that is odd. 
It's funny because it's true lol Money isn't everything; not having it is. 
Yeah this just made me realize people don't know the struggle of literally being able to crush their SO to death just by laying on top of them. 
Of course you did. Who the fuck wants to share a churro? That's my churro, get your own bitch. 
Gaining weight together sounds a lot more fun! Donuts, wings, beer! 
My wife has a version of this. For some reason playfully biting me is something that makes her happy. I've never questioned it, and have actually grown to enjoy it as one of her little "quirks". It's not sexual at all, usually just a quick chomp on my shoulder, the back of my arm, my ribs, or my "flank" as she calls it (basically my sides). Anyway, sometimes we will be laying in bed in complete darkness as we go to sleep, and she will randomly just take a bite of me. It's always followed by a short silence and her saying "....bed shark". 
You said "What the fuck out loud this is a great comment"? 
Agreed! I vote mandatory wilderness retreats as a necessary step before you get your marriage license. I bet you get fewer divorces! 
One of the golden rules of skiing/snowboarding is to never personally teach a significant other skiing/snowboarding. 
Or, all you do for their first semester of college is Photoshop. 
I mean, if you're thorough and otherwise act like a normal parent, but in a bear suit, they're eventually going to realize their parent's an asshole, and figure it out. It'll be like Santa Claus. No real harm done, since as far as the kid knows up until that realization, thats just how you dress. Then the first visit back will just be a "finally they dressed like a normal person" moment. Assuming there ever is one. 
I'll give you the true answer for both: They didn't want to. 
It's probably my fault and it's probably okay to leave me behind. 
How did I read "shitting" ? Sometimes I wonder if I'm regressing. 
There is no competitive and non-competitive, there is only victory, and those too weak to seek it. 
That sounds like a fun craft project. I love bonsai and i love tree houses. i shall combine my loves, and take lots of pictures and then get trashed on r/diy 
haha same!! First night after getting an apartment together - as soon as I got in bed one squeaked out. We laughed hysterically and he said something along the lines of 'at least we got that out of the way'. 
YOU SAID THERE WERE ONLY TWO BATTERIES ON THE BOMB, FOR FUCKS SAKE. 
These fucking noobs better not touch me. I know you meant boob 
I don't know why but I got a boner from reading that. I have no idea what a turbo-encabulator is. 
Or, like me they have a shower that barely fits one person and two requires extreme care to not cause each other bruises. I hate my garden tub....... why builder, why? I want a big shower, not a big bathtub. 
My husband is literally 2.5 times my weight so this made me laugh out loud. He's always accidentally hurting me. 
so many places have such ugly smileys it makes me sad. I just want my text faces. 
Add a canoe. If the couple doesn't disintegrate into a huge shouting match, fantastic marriage assured! 
Yep, my husband is a pretty advanced snowboarder and took me for the first time last winter. We mutually agreed that, for the sake of our marriage, I would take lessons with an instructor and he could go do his own thing. Worked out great, got hooked on snowboarding, and now he has a buddy for this next season. :) 
The neighboring kingdoms have fallen, this is a glorious day for the people of Pillowshire. 
I can shamelessly admit to having sex by a small waterfall. I was more adventurous than I should have been 
YOU EXPECTED ME TO KNOW WHAT AN HDMI PORT LOOKS LIKE! 
Me and my boyfriend lost a 250+ streak cause we were on holiday together and forgot 
Please stick to the rivers and the lakes that you're used to. 
Didn't think I'd be reading about an Australian guy eating at Shady Maple on reddit this morning when I woke up. Small world! 
Boyfriend is 2.5 times my size. Sounds cute, but I'd become a fine paste. 
I want to burn one half of both heathens, is this acceptable? 
I thought he was lying when he said he needed the money for four pairs of work boots. ... 
I want you to know I appreciate the fuck out of this 
and if you look close enough you can see the little "g" on it 
Oh good heavens are we so stuck up these days we can't have a rip roaring old fashioned mass heathen burn? 
Just stick your head right in. You could do it when you were born, why not now? 
"No, it's cool, I used to be able to do this. Just lay back..." 
This is usually called a "monkey morality" cult, the leaders act like dominate apes (set all the rules, fuck all the females, no one outside the ape extended family allowed to interact with anyone etc). Usually the young male apes leave for the same reason you did, ha! 
Sounds like my childhood. More burnt toys and movies and books than I can count 
How did people actually react when the world didn't end? 
Same here, friend. Though thankfully my parents left also. Went to all of those strange conventions. Vaguely met Bill Gothard when I was a little girl. He has such a creepy smile. Hope life is okay for you now? 
My dad used to be one of those cult guys you'd find in airports with the shaved heads and robes. He said he joined because the cultists were all like friends to eachother and he was dissillusioned with the world in the aftermath of the vietnam war. One day he was offered a fair days pay for a fair days work on a construction site and after a few weeks of that he just broke off contact with the church, grew his hair out with a beard and they never found him. 
My ex started becoming friends with a few people whom we assumed were in a cult. It was a group of college kids and they would get a house with say 5-7 rooms but then fill it up with 20 people, filling each room with bunk beds. At first I thought that it was nice to make such cheap rent, but they always complained how poor they were. Turns out they "donated" an absurd amount of money to the church. He would offhandedly mention that he liked soccer then within the week they would message him to tell him that they were playing. So he'd experiment by slipping something out and sure enough they happened to be doing that exact thing. It was clever way to gain trust in people. I'm imaging if someone wasn't suspecting, and desperate for friends it would be easy to slip into their ranks. 
Wow, they tried to get their hooks into me in college. I remember the exact moment. I was hanging with a bunch of guys in the dorm. One of them starts talking about how he's found a great group. Suddenly, everyone else in the room says they've been as well. And hey-- I should go some time, I would totally enjoy it. This was before internet. Stop 1: library. Figure out who they are and learn about Werner Erhard. Stop 2: a trusted professor. Stop 3: the dorm manager. Dorm manger was polite. But later, after I left, was overheard on the phone: "I thought I'd seen everything... now I've got a fucking cult!!" I don't think those guys ever forgave me for calling the housing advisers in. But it shut down their recruitment. 
When I was a teacher, there was a 10 year old boy in my class who was being raised as a Jehovah's Witness and I could tell that he was already questioning that lifestyle and their beliefs. On his birthday he asked me if I would sing happy birthday to him and not tell his mom. That broke my heart. 
Whenever I wonder to myself, "How the hell do people fall for cults?" I remember that they take advantage of people at their most broken/vulnerable. You rarely see the rich, famous and successful joining them (aside from maybe Scientology), since they don't really need the help. 
Damn that blows. Sorry to hear of the family disconnect. I could never imagine my mother "shunning" me if I left the Catholic Church. She wouldn't. 
You use the word "moonie", like everyone knows what it is. 
My family left around the time I married my wife through "courtship". Mr. Gothard basically kicked me out of Headquarters because I was too "in love" and my father pulled my family out because Mr. Gothard showed too much attention to my sister and tried to pay for plastic surgery to improve her face while she was at Headquarters. It's taken years for all of my family to leave the mindset 
I did *not* know Betsy DeVos was the daughter-in-law of the guy who started Amway. 
He called Reddit a cult, SHUN HIM, SHUN THE DISSENTER! 
And when these cults fall apart it's usually because of discontent among young males who don't have any sexual outlet available to them. The same thing happens in polygamist communities, which I suppose are essentially the same thing. 
Well, if you're my mom, you think the world IS currently in the long process of ending, and you plant an "end time garden" in the backyard so that when armageddon comes you have tomatoes and shit. 
Never underestimate the ability of True Believers to cherry-pick what they Truly Believe in. 
Yeah it was pretty twilight zone-esque. You know the previews for Get Out ? That's how I feel when I go back to Clearwater. I'm pretty sure I have PTSD. 
They won't take away the rights because they are afraid of the lawsuits. Not just against the agencies but against the employees of the agencies. We're talking thousands of separate lawsuits that will probably take years to conclude. 
He was creepy AF. I still remember fangirling at 12 when he called our house one time and I "was blessed enough" to speak to him. Gaggggggg. Life is pretty good now! Very non religious now which is hard for family life but ya know. Boundary skills are super strong which helps. 
YES THIS. It's so fucking damaging and TLC actively capitalizes on putting these poor kids on television instead of helping them. 
Much much happier and healthier. Very self aware and able to analyze normally vs how the cult taught us to train our thinking to be devoid of individuality. Some cultural things are still hard to grasp or pick up on. I also don't approach a situation or concept from the same way many others would which can lead to confusion. Financially not so amazing but I've turned out a lot better than many others who left. I've got a career, normal friends, and a healthy mind so I'll take it! 
The leaving process looked like a couple of safe people helping me do things like get identifying documents, find a same place to live, and then just walked out and the door. I have very strong opinions on the Duggars because I know/knew Josh's wife extremely well and had a front row seat up until their first child was born. 
My first day I sat in bed and thought what the fuck did I just do. I honestly lived in hardcore shock for about six weeks and then kinda numb for six months. I had made a commitment to myself I wouldn't do anything drastic for a year because even if I did something opposite of what I was raised to do it would still be caused by that belief system. An overreaction vs a belief. I wanted to learn who I was what I thought and who I really wanted to be and make decisions and changes from that place. That decision served me well. A lot of survivors hit some pretty nasty obstacles because they over corrected in reaction to the upbringing if that makes sense. I stayed with my bosses and worked two full time jobs to support myself. 
That's the most dad reason to leave a cult ever. "Hey dad, tell me again why you left the cult?" "Because I grew up and got a damn job!" 
It was not a big/famous/known cult. It was "the sun followers" and they litterally only existed for a year and a half. My dad got in at the beginning and left after less than a year. And my dad says most of them were cultishly psudeo religious, but other than chanting while doing drugs it was pretty benign. He says he was in no way abused and was sort of using them for their drugs, really. He says the sex crimes were not cult activities... That was something the leader did outside cult activities, but did lead to the end of the cult. 
Yep, my mother was in something similar but of the hippy Christian variety, which traveled across the U.S. doing seasonal stuff. My dad (not in the commune) had to apply to date her, and when the commune moved on she stayed. 
Yeah, that makes more sense, alot of people in the town called it a cult though so they were just like, yknow what sure, we're a cult now 
Yeah, the only reason I'd use the word cult is because of all the rituals, and the fact that they lived together and had something of a 'cult leader' 
This gives me hope! Thanks for your comment, I don't hear to many stories about people who do marry outside the church (due to the nature of that kind of thing). Having a blessing ceremony for when I do eventually get married is a great idea. 
I knew that place was run by a cult! Best damned vegan cake I ever had in my life, but yeah, definitely run by a cult. Every time I eat there, I wait for someone to come running into the restaurant screaming "PEOPLE! THE FOOD IS MADE OF PEOPLE! 
grew up in a cult like this too and I think about the boys all the time. When they were made to hurt us, it was clear that they didn't want to. It was clear that they gave a shit even though they weren't supposed to. I wonder how many boys got out of this with their empathy in tact. I wish I could go back in time and hug them all. Let them just be little boys. 
My first grade teacher told the class that my birthday had to be kept secret, and to keep it low key. Even went so far as to get me a cake. To the classes credit, they all did keep their silence on the subject. My mother never did find out. 
You have very strong positive karma (the proper kind) my friend. I hope life treats you well. 
The state should intervene in cases like this. The kid probably didn't even know that their religion was stopping them from treating him. 
Grew up my whole life hearing this. They are still saying it. I'm over 40. 
Adult patient at my hospital, not Jehovah, but his wife was. He accepted a blood transfusion, she left him. Just...wow. 
Good. I'm happy things are going well for you. There comes a point where we all have to go "fuck them" and do what we gonna do. 
For some reason I thought you were saying the church was made up of goth-tards and was very confused 
It's a pejorative name for someone in the unification church. They were followers of Sun Myung Moon. 
THE MAGICAL LEOPLERIDON HAS SPOKEN SHUN THE NON BELIEVER, *SHUUUUUUUN* 
From my point of view the Jedi are a flawed order relying on archaic standards and systems that have failed to update with the times to remain relevant, and have grown to become more loyal to their own dogmas than to the best interests of the Galactic Republic as a whole. 
It's like a classic rock radio station, except for sermons. 
I was camping when the world was supposed to end. Everyone I was with thought it was a joke, but in the hours before the event was supposed to happen, the weather abruptly changed from sunny to thunderstorms to hail then back to sunny/windy. It was a pretty surreal experience. 
Well if one of them wants to break away and write a tell-all book, they will probably be set for life. 
Congratulations. I hope you take it easy on yourself and never hesitate to check in with a therapist when you feel you need it. That can be amazingly helpful for anyone, not just people who grew up in that kind of environment. If you ever decide to write a book about your experience, let me know. I would read it. 
900 people *didn't* see it coming though, I guess that shows how these messages can still be compelling 
Funny thing is they used Flavor-Aid. Cool-aid got stuck with the bad association. 
That's a pretty zen response for a cult. Where do I sign up? 
The difference between a cult and a religion is merely how how crazy the Jonathan is. 
To me this is the best evidence for them being more like a commune than a cult. A cult wants to control your actions in order to control your beliefs. If a true (effective) cult leader knew you didn't believe and were just helping out to stay there, you wouldn't have lasted long. 
If this is the one in Toronto, I know the people who make the cake and are in no way affiliated with the cult. 
They often do intervene, as happened in my family, but it's usually too little too late. They have to have a judge turn the child over as a ward of the state, by which point the child could have died already. 
Believer to human rescuers: God will save me from this flood! God to dead believer: Dude, I sent 3 boats and a helicopter! 
It's one thing to refuse treatment for yourself as an adult where you fully understand the consequences of your actions, but it's a totally different matter when you force your views onto children. 
They've always said it. The JW were essentially founded as a doomsday cult but managed to stay in tact and prosper after their expiration date. They predicted the literal rising and returning to Earth of several of Jesus disciples and other biblical figures in the 1920's that would essentially run the world. They had another one in the 70's. It passes and they quietly sweep it under the rug and move on like no big deal. 
Oi, we don't use that kind of language you dip-fuck. /s 
They believe the Moon is the second coming of Christ according to the Wiki on the Unification Church 
Thank you. I don't really share this stuff much. I don't exactly get the opportunity to. So even though I'm nit broken up about it, it's still always cathartic to talk about. The Amsterdam seminar is probably the most insulting thing. I didn't go into tons of detail, but all those points I touched on, were inaccurate. The state didn't make me go to a boarding school for troubled kids, I chose to go to a boarding school (Milton Hershey School) because I knew it would be a better opportunity. I had to talk my dad into letting me go. MHS wasn't for bad kids, it was for kids with broken families. She made me seem unhinged and dangerous and that was probably the most offensive part of it. What did you think was fascinating? Just curious! 
Doing rather great now! I've always stayed in contact with Mom and I live 10 minutes from her. See her every other weekend or so. I did have sweet harry potter sorcery surgery on both feet, the left foot was done 7 years ago and the right foot last April. Waiting so long to get these operations has screwed me up physically though so there are some things I wish I could go back in time and redo... 
Driving through TN, headed East on 24 towards Chattanooga, about an hour out I would pick up this evangelist on one of the lower fm stations. It was some of the craziest fire and brimstone preaching I'd ever heard. I remember losing it one time because the guy got so worked up he started naming what hell was going to be like if you didn't accept Jesus. In his passion of the moment preaching, he described hell as being a place where you always feel like your toenails have been cut too close to the quick. LOL The guy was insane. 
That was God giving people the ol' "Two for flinching" test. 
Fuck. I live here. Always saw the Scientology church when heading to the beach but never thought too much about it. That's is terrifying! 
This is the first time I've given much thought to the scope of their permeance in Clearwater. Lived nearby my whole life and aware they have big stuff there but never considered the community-facing business they may take part in. Now I feel bad for any business I may have given them but have no qualms avoiding it from now on. Been considering moving out of state, anyway. 
Part of me wants to check it out just because I'm kinda into surreal places. I'd just want to see what a town controlled by a cult looks like or, if it's as creepy as I imagined. 
I've always thought it was easier for people who knew a big portion of their life before ATI. I never knew anything different. It's like putting yourself back together from nothing. 
Were they ok with you joining? I only knew a couple people who did but it was mostly discouraged in our circles. 
I think ATI was damaging for everyone but ultra horrific for us girls. So senseless. Sorry your dad still believes. My parents do also. 
It was openly known he had a type. It was common knowledge he had weird "counseling sessions" alone with girls when in the rest of our world being alone with the opposite gender wasn't allowed. It was common for him to meet a young teen girl at a seminar or event and then call the girls parents and ask for her to move to their headquarters to work for him. 
It took me a very long time before I was able to admit it for what it was. The words "I was raised in a cult" seem like a horrible sick joke. 
Yes I lived in GA and MANY of the ATI kids and here worked for him or in his circles. 
It's a process for sure. Layers upon layers of beliefs to be undone. Be gentle with yourself and enjoy the journey of becoming who you truly are 
Thanks! I've seen a couple therapists at different points in my deconstruction and it is a tool I'm a huge fan of! Definitely helped me a lot. You're not the first person to say I should write a book after hearing my life story and it's definitely an interesting idea. Probably would end up being more a healing personal process than an interesting read. 
I know... It's still happening, to this day... and once you're out for a perceived 'sin', all contact with family members on the inside is restricted (and must go through a another member) at absolute best, and severed completely at worst. 
I remember seeing they did see it coming, but went along with it. He made them practice drinking the cyanide drink. To test how "faithful" they were. Then when it came time for it, he made the children go first, so the parents would have nothing to lose 
I don't think it hurt the brand really. It was like Nike didn't get hurt when heavens gate thing happened. 
It was grape flavored Flavor Aid. My keyboard's auto complete finished that sentence from "it was gra". 0.o 
Yeah I read about it a couple years ago. Crazy what people with power can make other people believe 
"You people are a cult." "That's like....your opinion, man." 
I thought it was if Jonathan was still alive or not. 
I do, we actually have a group chat and stuff, I talk to them nearly everyday. They're all brilliant people, sort of like the loving family I never had 
Damn, misread OP's name and thought it was Brian Da Mage..... 
I'm not saying that's *not* what she does (I don't know anything about this cult), but the word "ostentatious" doesn't mean that... That sentence literally means that she has been criticized for publicly and showily doing charity. e.g., Holding a press conference to announce a large donation vs. making the donation anonymously. Ostentatious means purposefully showy in kind of a vulgar or gauche way, it doesn't mean dishonest. 
To be even more fair, there were a few cults that probably did that. I don't imagine those were the longest lasting cults though. 
I remember a lawyer telling me that this happened to him. He was at a bar drinking, when he got called into a case. This boy had fell off a roof, lost a lot a blood, and needed a blood transfusion. However, his parents religion would refuse to allow it. The lawyer tried convincing him as parent-to-parent, but they simply wouldn't budge. They ended up calling a judge late at night, and they held a courtroom in a hotel lobby, all the way up until midnight, just at constant debate. The doctors then barged in, furious, stating that the boy had passed. The lawyer said that was the hardest case he had ever taken. Really sad stuff. 
No joke. I wasn't allowed to get vaccinated until I was 18 because my mom was some freak about it being against "our(her)" religion. "What god wants to happen will happen." The only reason I could get my tetanus shot was because I cut my foot on rusty metal. Moment I turned 18 I drove to the doctor first thing in the morning pretty much demanding I get vaccinated. 
Man, I really used to hold that mindset. I was told that if my faith was strong enough, God would miraculously heal me, or fix the situation. Really messed with my head when I was diagnosed with a chronic illness and all the prayer in the world didn't make me better. I could tell a lot of the members of the church looked down on my for not getting healed, as if I were doing something wrong if God didn't want to fix me. 
Luckily, most states now have laws where physicians can override parents decisions if they try to refuse life-saving/emergency treatment for their children. I'm a medical student and, if I ever run into this situation, I would treat the child instead of allowing their parents to let them die, even if I don't have legal backing. The worst the parents can do is sue me and money is much more easily replaced than my conscience is. 
I actually googled her name and watched about half of an interview, the first one that came up. Unhinged is to soft a word. Bat shit crazy is to soft as well. Wish you the best. 
Don't sell yourself short, Vladimir. You did great! 
I'm an outsider, so my apologies for jumping in, but it appears to be a sizable group of you on here. Have you thought about creating a privet sub-reddit for you all to gather in a support network? 
No, but I have gotten out of the military, and they do visit and see the grandkids. My parents where never super into controlling, they where just sheep. The never ostracized me. 
And to your knowledge, did anyone speak up? Or was everyone so brainwashed, or under his thumb, that they turned a blind eye to this? Or was it considered almost an honor for him to take an interest in someone's daughter? Being that sexual sin is about the worst one in fundamentalist churches, I find it interesting the lengths people can go in their denial when their religious leader is a pervert. Just like when Catholic priests were molesting those boys - I just don't believe they didn't set off warning signs which people ignored. 
I'm really sorry that happened. I hope you're doing better now. 
Most of the hardest times were in college for me. Lots of conversations with my then girlfriend/now wife where she couldn't understand why I said or thought certain things and when I tried to explain it was like ripping a bandaid off. I'm actually more concerned now for my younger siblings. I have a brother who only recently found out the stuff about Gothard and it messed him up pretty badly. Two sisters still at home, but done with homeschooling now so out of it on some level, anyway. 
For what it's worth, I think there is a lot to be learned from people who were socialized in very different ways. I think you might have more readers than you would imagine. 
Definitely not. Just funny we have the term now "drink the kool-aid" when it was flavor aid Flavor-Aid finally had their time to shine! 
I feel like anybody who didn't want to drink it was forced anyways. 
A friend of mine and my ex b/f's had these videos about cults and people who left them. The Jehova's witness one had a guy who said his daughter needed a blood transfusion and how despite their church members giving them a hard time, him and his wife decided to go through with it. Then one of their church members told them "I hope your daughter gets hepatitis" 
I just watched some of it and holy wowzas. That's insane. She sounds like a lot of my patients who have fluent aphasia with empty speech. They use all these words but it means absolutely nothing. You feel like it should make sense, but it's just insane sounding. 
Yeah their show doesn't show a big fraction of their deep religious beliefs and the moments they chose to film weren't real life for them or anyone else in the cult. 
There's several Facebook groups and websites where many people have found healing and friendship. Personally I've moved past the anger and venting about it phase which seems to be how most of those posts go and have moved into finding friends based on current interests 
Yes!!! Normally these moments don't become too awkward but I'll realize suddenly it was weird and withdrawal a little bit because I feel suddenly embarrassed and completely out of place 
I like to bring up this point wherever I can. Tylenol had a scare a few years back where a disgruntled worker put poison in some of the bottles on the line. They issued a complete recall on the product to cost of millions of dollars. They did it so quickly and so completely that once the threat was over people flocked back to buying the product in droves. It was one of the few instances of a PR nightmare actually increasing market share. 
This is correct, from what I've read. They were basically forced at gunpoint. The recording of it all is absolutely horrific. 
New age cult. We don't subscribe to the 'classic perception' of what a cult should be, man. 
Remember, God loves everyone, except Becky, fuck Becky! 
"My head grew heavy and my sight grew dim I had to stop for the night" 
Not OP. but the one that got me in the most trouble was at 4 years free when I had a job and good friends. We were at a sports bar and I made a joke about how nice someone's trunk blanket must have been (think silver spoon analogy). Everyone stopped and asked what I meant. I explained that our friend must have been wrapped in only the softest most colorful blanket before her parents shut her in the cars trunk to stop the crying, my household only had an ugly towel! Hahahaha look how spoiled you are....... Why is everyone stopped? I later took a class in infant care despite never wanting kids because I dont want to accidentally murder an infant child. Its amazing what the human mind can recognize as "normal" 
Jim Jones was too much of a bitch to pull the trigger himself- one of his henchmen shot him. When those poor children were crying, moaning, writhing in pain, Jones told the adults, and I'm paraphrasing, "It's not hurting them. They don't like the taste, it's bitter..." 
A few years back? I think you're getting the same time dilation effects I do, where anything that happened since 1978 is only "a few years back." The tylenol tamperings were in 1982. We're old, mate. 
As long as you don't mass murder hundreds of people with it you're cool with me 
He would have drills where he would have kool aid brought out and have everyone drink it but they were just trial runs for their eventual suicide. They had done it before but that day I think everyone knew it was probably bad because people had already been shot and some members were trying to leave with reporters. 
AA does have some cult-like behaviors. The difference is that you can leave when you want. Its hard to tie members down when they're anonymous. 
As far as I know they are all in pretty deep. I was super close with Josh's wife, met his family at the wedding but wasn't besties with them or anything. From what I know and see and hear from people still close with them it seems all the kids are following pretty heavily into the cult beliefs. 
for me everything before 2010 is stuck in some weird time bubble, like a seperate world and every year after 2013 feels like it's 2015. I still jump sometimes when I see 2017. 
So were people just dropping dead throughout that recording? Crazy. How long does it take after drinking? Do you just drop dead? 
Does it surprise you that Anna stayed and is now pregnant again? Did you get any hints that Josh had serious issues? 
I listened to it a long time ago, and yeah, it's pretty awful. That was before I had my now 4 year old, and just remembering it is bumming me out more now than it did when I first heard it. Fuck that guy, fuck those people. Those poor kids, man. 
He sounds soo fucked up on barbiturates/sedatives in the recording. That deep, monotonous delivery which sedatives are known for making sound. 
Higher classes can change classes later in the game. Middle class and lower cannot. 
I spent a good 40 seconds fucking with a door, pushing and pulling after unlocking it. I said "this thing's busted we should call Plant Ops". My coworker then silently opened the door. It was a slidey door. I still hear jokes about that one. 
Too much effort to make friends? Just place a basket on their head! 
How haven't I thought of this before?! It's brilliant! 
Pretty sure I'm playing hard mode then, for a number of reasons.. 
Online content not rated. In some extreme instances you may encounter content not suitable for anyone of any age. 
sadly, every time my wealth level goes up so does my student loan payment. 
Don't brush your teeth after drinking juice, as juice weaken tooth enamel, and brushing too soon can cause damage to the enamel. 
 Bring your friends to real life, but don't forget to go outside real life with them as well ! 
Cannot believe how often I have it right first time, but fail, flip it (clearly wrong), then flip again and in it goes. I see everyone do this !! 
You just need a kindly old man to give you a sword to whack the locals with until they drop their money. 
Tip: If sad, clap your hands and repeat the phrase "I AM SO HAPPY". Repeat until happy. 
EU4 actually has that one too. Might as well be looking at me and saying 'GIT GUD'. 
Don't have shoes with your house on, and don't leave the booze if the sex is gone. 
There was one time where I was in the car driving away from my house when I decided to do one last check. Check for my phone, check for my wallet, check for my keys... fuck where are my keys? Did I lose my keys? I began mentally retracing my steps until it hit me. Oh my keys are in the ignition... because I'm driving... 
Well they *can*, they just need an insanely high charisma stat - the 'marry rich' achievement is available to anyone, just real hard to accomplish 
You must gather your party before venturing forth. 
I don't know why, I've never even played Skyrim, but this made me laugh almost to tears. 
It's not you, these pauses in gameplay are unavoidable - they are intentional and placed there to disguise loading occurring behind the door. 
Note: creators of goods and services may try to institute measures to stop you from exchanging them for money with anyone other than themselves. 
Tired of being friends with a certain person? Touch their nipple and refuse to stop until they stop talking to you. 
Wow, put 200+ hours into both of those games and had no idea that that was a thing. 
That's just an armour for weaponry trade agreement. 
I hate that. Yes, I'm quitting because I *don't want to receive any calls or messages* you dumb piece of shit. 
Next thing ya know, he'll be telling us to always make sure we have a towel. 
Real problem here is that USB are 4-dimensional objects. Flip it twice along the normal x-axis, then you need to flip it once along the 4th w-axis. 
Remember thinking we'd actually have arcologies by the year 2000, and then getting super disappointed when the local library got internet and we couldn't find any news about them? 
Oh god this works! I'm so happy! Wait, why am I braiding a rope. 
Never wash! EVER!! Women like a Man's musk cause of pheromones and stuff... science! 
You must gather your party before venturing forth. You must gather your party before venturing forth. You must gather your party before venturing forth. FUCKING IMOEN JESUS I'M GONNA FUCKING REFORM THE SHIT OUT OF YOU! 
It's the same reason it can take up to 45 minutes to get out of bed in the morning. Or an hour. Or five. Textures still loading. Ever notice when you're up early and everything seems foggy and bland? There you go. 
"If you find a door that you cannot open, try increasing your lockpick skill!" 
If I meet someone named Barney I'll say "hey Swarley, we know you miss Barney but he's gone" 
Bucket first, or every guard in Tamriel will hunt you down. 
One of the first things I do in a skyrim playthrough is brawl the stable master in riften. If you win, he likes you and allows you to take one of his horses. Free horse! 
A simple unspoken mercantile transaction. Carry on citizens. 
Yes! Sadly it also had some side effects... intelligence -10 
We could build them. Property values just aren't that high. They were absurdly expensive in the game. You could build a medium sized town for the cost of one of the bigger arcologies. 
This goes all the way back to SIM city. It's also referenced in Spore. 
Oh I misread the instructions. There must be someone else in the room apparently. Will test further. 
"While your characters don't need to work out and eat healthy to not be fat ugly fucks, you do, so get to the gym, go for a jog, and stop eating shit." 
I haven't played guild wars, but I have had a game tell me to take a break and suggested to go outside... I think it was on the Nintendo Wii... 
Actually one of the most common side effects for drowning is extreme thirst. It's completely counter-intuitive, strange, and a lie I made up. 
Skyrim has nine holds. Four of them are choke-holds, and two will produce unconsciousness in less than six seconds. 
and you're going to be a better woman for it. here is 'I Am Woman' 
IRL if you bucket-up your friends they might smell something's awry, especially if that bucket contained something not pleasant. 
That one time when adding "you filthy animal" really works ... 
Wii Sports and many other of Nintendo's fist party games had this 
On a mildly related note, a side effect of hypothermia is the sensation that you're burning up. 
"Empty buckets of their contents before using them as hats!" 
This comment made my night, loved that game. It was hard to keep myself from cheating for an entire playthough but so worth it. 
True, but technically speaking a labyrinth is not like a maze "A maze is a complex branching (multicursal) puzzle that includes choices of path and direction, may have multiple entrances and exits, and dead ends. A labyrinth is unicursal i.e. has only a single, non-branching path, which leads to the center then back out the same way, with only one entry/exit point." 
My serving of cookie is half a bag, I don't know what you're talking about. 
It's strange, because I'd think most people get more exercise from Wii Sports than just going outside. 
That one is true. I know victims lost in freezing weather are often found stripped down almost naked. 
Mods have essentially made it immortal (at least until VI) 
I told my roommate about the absurdity of Fortify Int stacking She made a Fortify Speed potion afterwards. Suffice to say it did not end well Morrowind had the most ridiculously entertaining exploits 
I had one character I fucked around with, perma applied so many points of Jump that tapping the jump button with even slight forward momentum would do that, going so far out into the ocean it takes like half an hour to swim back. Apparently fall damage isn't negated by water in that game, but delayed. Soon as you step foot back on land you die 
If you live longer than them you'll be causing yourself distress from their dying. That's straight up masochism. Everybody needs to die at the same time. 
Which isnt even in development (yet?) i dont think (i remember reading it somewhere but cabt remember where) so still years to go. 
So basically you're saying nuclear holocaust is a good thing? 
Fun fact: that footage was created for Home Alone and is not a real movie 
It is, they're just not saying it. Bethesda is moving away from announcing games long in advance, as you can see from Fallout 4 which had very short build-up. The Fallout 4 Team moved to TES-VI as soon as they were done with mainline Fallout 4 (with a smaller part of the team staying on DLC duty). The big rumor this time however is they may have another new team working on something else. 
How about a search engine for website idea websites so you can always find website idea websites when you need website ideas. 
Why announce a game 2-3 years out. The hype will be dead. I'd say a good 3-6 months depending on the kind of game and size should be sufficient. 
Haha, that is so cute. I just imagine her playing with the stapler, then accidentally stapling her hand, then indignantly getting revenge on it by throwing it away (in an "I'll show you" sort of way). 
An 8 year old should be smart enough to use the name of his Mom. Wouldn't even have to use the name of his mom. He could just say 'I'm the mom of ____'. 
When I was about twelve, I was over at my aunt and uncle's place for the weekend. My cousin was about four. My aunt and uncle told her "You can pour yourself some water from the cooler, but you have to use a plastic cup. Glasses are only for grown ups." Half an hour later, my aunt, uncle and I are in the living room watching a movie, and we hear what could only be a glass breaking. (Tiny voice from the kitchen): "Nothing broke, so DON'T COME IN HERE!" Uncle: Is everything ok in there? Cousin: EVERYTHING IS FINE....Where is the dust pan? 
I still do this when people ask me to hang out or do things and I'm almost 18. 
This kind of thing always reminds me of the story about how Koko the gorilla accidentally ripped a sink off the wall once and then blamed it on her kitten. 
My cousin did something similar when she was about 8. Told her teacher she couldn't do any homework because she had to do chores and look after her younger twin siblings. The teacher knew it was a lie but she called my aunt in anyway. They had a meeting where they pretended to believe her story and asked lots of questions until she cracked and confessed. She's 14 now and still gets teased about it all the time. 
When I was a kid I used to forget that I ate supper because I would get hungry again. I would be at a friend's house and they would feed me a second supper all the while thinking I had a neglectful mother. 
I had a habit of biting my sister when we got into fights as kids. When I was about 8, the dentist gave me a full mold of my teeth since it was somehow defective and they needed to make a new one, so why not? I got into a small argument (not physical this time) with my sister a bit later. She took the mold and proceeded to "bite" her arm with it. She ran to our mom, crying and saying I bit her. Mom got mad at me, since she'd told me time and time again not to bite my sister. I started sobbing because I actually didn't bite her this time, but mom wouldn't believe me. After about 15 minutes of my denying it, my sister took out the teeth mold and said "See? It's a perfect match!" and started cracking up. My mom just sighed. 
But... Couldn't you have just not picked up and it would have *actually* went to the answering machine? 
Similar story, but the parents were the ones doing the lying. When I was getting to that age where I started realizing something was fishy about Santa, I boldly claimed that I knew he wasn't real. Not wanting to give the hoax up, my mother had her brother stand outside my window and ring sleigh bells when I was going to bed. I ran thru the house shouting "CALL THE NEWS SANTA IS REAL!" for about 15 minutes. Still get reminded every Christmas.. 
Once I had a kindergartner tell me a story about "one time a very long time ago" when she was "very little" in which she had used a pair of scissors to trim her eyelashes. As she was telling me this I noticed that her eyelashes on one side were extremely short. When I pointed that out to her, she denied it vehemently. 
I'm impressed that a 4 year old knows what DNA is. 
I got in trouble in first grade for cutting holes in my clothes. Why? I don't really know. I had scissors and felt like cutting something so I started snipping tiny holes in my pants and shirt thinking if they were small no one would really notice. They noticed. My mom was not pleased. 
Reminds me of a joke: A drunk walks into a bar, orders a shot and and immediately pukes all over his own shirt. "Wha' my gonna do now? My wifez gonna kill me." "Relax," the bartender says, "give me a five-dollar bill." The bartender folds up the bill and puts it in the guy's shirt pocket. "Tell your wife some drunk puked on you and gave you five bucks to have your shirt cleaned." "Thass a great idea!" When the drunk gets home his wife answers the door. "Where have you been? What happened to your shirt?" He tries to put on a sober voice and says, "Relaaax honey, some drunk guy puked on me and gave me five bucks to have my shirt cleaned." The drunk's wife reaches in his pocket, grabs the money, and says, "There's $10 in here!" "Oh yeah, he shit my pants, too." 
It's my favorite when you walk in on them doing something naughty and they jump a foot and blurt out a "cover". My favorites so far have been, "what are YOU doing in here, mom?" and "I'M NOT DOING ANYTHING I'M NOT SUPPOSED TO!" Smooth, kid. Real smooth. 
I have 3 year old twins. I feel like 20 minute melt downs are my entire life some days. They lie constantly now about anything and someone taught them the phrase "I promise" although they clearly have no concept what that means. This morning kid B was standing in the hallway stark naked and promised me she didn't take off her clothes. Kid A assured me she ate all her breakfast... Promised... So she could get a hard boiled egg (it's weird, they're like crack to these kids lately) but the toilet full of cereal leads me to think otherwise. She could have at least flushed. Kids are devious. 
Twenty years down the road: "I was trying to let her out of the basement, Your Honor, I reeeeaaallly wanted to let her out. I didn't realize she was in there and I went to grab the door knob I guess just as she grabbed it trying to get out. I thought the door was stuck, and kept pulling on it, and I guess she kept pulling on it to get out. So I wasn't holding her in, we were both trying to open the door at the same time." 
"jesus fed a whole village off of a loaf of bread and turned water into wine. why in the world would he eat OUR cake?" 
My nephew accidentally cracked our fish tank while playing with his Buzz Lightyear doll. When my sister asked him how it happened he said that Buzz was flying around the room and he crashed into it. That was his story. He stuck to it, because we asked him 6 months later what happened to it and he said "Probably Buzz Lightyear." 
This is the perfect example of the kind of lies we tell our parents in our teens growing up. They hypothetically make sense but in reality it never actually happens. As well as the response from the parents. In a situation like this they'll never call you out on it because it's kinda awkward, but your not fooling them. And since they will NEVER call you out, you're about 99% sure they believe you. I'm sure one big topic of discussion with parents is the kinda shit lies their kids told them this week. 
Melamine sponges will take it right off. You can buy a pack of 100 for like $5-10 on eBay. Magic eraser is the same stuff. 
How fucked up would it be if your mom really *did* cut your doll's hair? 
I used a technicality like this once when I was a kid and my dad was like, "Very clever. Fair enough." and let it go. So from then on I found technicalities every time I ever did something wrong. He never went for it again. 
I'd actually be really concerned if my son came home like that.. 
The first time my friends and I took acid we did it in our friend's basement rec room. His dad came home early and shouted down the basement stairs "Son! Get up here for a minute!" My friend shouts, plenty loud enough for his dad to hear, "Holy shit you guys I totally hallucinated my dad just yelled for me to come upstairs!" His dad just thought we were being goofy 8th graders and didn't suspect a thing. 
On one of adam savages podcasts with tested.com he talked about one of his sons doing something similar. Adam would take his teens phones away every night at like 8 or 9 or something. Well apparently for MONTHS one of his sons was switching his phone with his old one that looked similar. He also apparently had the balls to do it even though his old one had a cracked screen. Pretty sure adam punished him by making him use a flip phone for a very long time. 
I can see why he'd think so; it works for John Cena. 
HER NAM IS "MOM" DUD| NOW YOUR GONA TEL ME DAD HAS A DIFRENT NAM TO. 
Love reddit and WoW and Lego and fantasy books and torrenting and going to see the better films like Deadpool. Though tbh Im finding TV is far more enjoyable than the majority of films now. They have the time to explore the story fully. I got a bit excited when I read that they might be doing a Deadwood film as a closure from the TV series, I was so pissed off when that ended so abruptly. So yeah, encouragement, never lose that spark of belligerence or irreverence no matter how old you get to be. 
LOL. My 5 y.o. always says (when she thinks she's being naughty) "Everything's OK! Uhh...don't look." Usually she's just changing her clothes for the 6th time that day, which drives us nuts due to excess laundry but isn't exactly "naughty." 
My toddler occasionally out of the blue states "I'm not pooping" 
Almost 30. "We have to go to the wedding." "...I'm sick." "Dude, it's your wedding!" 
I also did this, with different family members. My dad/mother/grandparents all thought the others were awful abusers, until my dad was confronted about it, and asked me, "what about that ravioli you had earlier? And what about the hot dog? And what about...etc." And each time I would go, "...oh yeah." I was legitimately forgetting though. Three hours seems like a really long time ago when you're that little. 
I'd like to plan a heist with your sister. She seems to have good ideas. 
The logic really is priceless. Don't answer the phone? Can't do that, mom said answer the phone. If I don't answer the phone she might think I'm gone, or hurt, like she said. OK... So... Ah! I got it. I'll just pick up the phone (thus fulfilling my duties as phone answerer) but then I'll just play it off like I'm the answering machine. She'll just leave a message to call her back like everyone else does on the answering machine. Oh man I'm so brilliant. 
Crazy cat person here, and I really want to do this as an easter egg for my bookshelf now. 
Sequined tube tops need to be the new mail carrier uniform. 
My dad actually signed a note once as "my dad". My teacher thought I forged it and I had to have her call home to find out it was actually him trying to be funny.. 
Yeah, whenever I have to send test faxes or scans, or the copier is out of order, I always grab a dry erase marker or a highlighter from a random desk and draw a stupid picture to go with the words "out of order" or "test." I once drew a picture of a spider, taped it to a scanner, and wrote "can't connect to the web, be fixed soon." IT really is run by children. 
I still do something like this when I know someone is on a cellphone. I would just randomly say "Turn Around" as if I was behind them the whole time like in the movies, but I would just hang up. This is usually followed by a text like "Fuck you! I actually thought you were here". 
My son dragged it out for 2 years. He knew, we knew he'd figured it out, but he kept up the act until finally one day I not so accidentally mentioned his dad buying one of his Santa presents. He looked at me and asked if I could just pay him now for the loose tooth he'd been working on all week. 
When you can only remember the last year, a week a a super long time. 
Dramatic twist, the people who lived in your house before you summoned the devil and he lingers there to this day. 
I was hanging out with a friend's 7 year old kid who asked what chicken nuggets were when we went past mcdonalds. I explained. Later i joked that i could feel the photons hitting me in the bright sunshine. "Photons have no mass" he screamed at me, scandalised at my lack of knowledge. 
Well at least that's better than what I did in pre-k. I had scissors for some reason during a quiet time, so I decided to cut some my hair off because hey, why not. I remember it took a while even after getting a haircut for it to look normal again. 
I did exactly the opposite thing, my jeans would get ripped from wear and tear and my parents would accuse me of ripping them myself to make them look cool. 
I'm also sure he felt proud too as the knife was clearly a priced possession and taken care of, like promised. 
And thats why, Michael, you dont teach lessons to your son! 
He forgot that you don't talk shit until you verify. Biggest mistake in the "gotcha" book. 
My father used to tell me a variation of this joke, but it was an Irish Judge who was notorious for sentencing offenders to 30-60 day on bread & water. (It's funnier in an Irish accent apparently) He was drunk and puked himself on the train home, so to cover up he claims another man puked on him and if he ever comes across him, he's going sentence the hooligan to 60 days on bread & water. The wife responds: it should be 90! Judge: 90? Why so much? Wife: well, he shit in your pants too! 
I... um... well. Okay, I guess. Maybe something else got lost in translation? 
He just wasn't smart enough to carry on with the sham. My baby is not smart. At least he's cute. For now. 
Yep. Best done while laughing them calling them dumb for thinking you were serious. Or even better: "You really don't understand sarcasm do you?" 
Give me one good reason why not except that it's unorthodox. Because I couldn't 
Haha! It's so much better when they take you into confidence about the whole thing. My friend's six year old was playing Mario and dies in a rookie mistake, so he mimics his uncle's favorite catchphrase of "God-dammit!" My pal, who is his dad, and I turn to him with these shocked expressions. The kid, in one-hundred percent seriousness tells us, "It's okay! Mommy's not here!" This was the milestone that let me know I should never be a father. Because I'd be raising sociopaths for not disciplining the bad things regardless of how funny. 
My son won't even acknowledge that I asked him if he pooped. He just looks at me like "what's this word you say... Poo? No. Never heard of it.." 
Yeah conceptually speaking the tooth fairy is goddamn terrifying 
Hahaha holy shit. ~~Really?~~ edit to not walk into obvious "yes they really aren't real" joke I mean did they really do that to you? 
Jan and I have a safety word... *foliage*. but sometimes Jan pretends she doesn't hear the safety word. 
Shoot, a 6yr old will hear you whisper "ice cream" from a 10mi radius. 
"And then she took my knife, Your Honor. I reeeeeeeeeallly didn't want to hurt her. I didn't realize she had the knife and tried to grab it, but she was also holding it, and then I guess our hands got stuck, and then it just slipped into her neck." 
It was just so exciting! I considered the trash can in my bathroom a second toilet, and it felt nice to have options when I was peeing. I still have a distinct memory of my mom cleaning out the trash can in the backyard saying "who the hell keeps peeing in the trash can?!" 
Happened to my wife. She kept saying she had to go, mom would say no. So she dropped trou and peed on the floor. Her mom felt super guilty about not letting her go so she wasn't mad. 
She fought for that lie too. Another one was when she had an accident and blamed it on the cat. Adult in Charge "child name did you have an accident?" Child: "no" AIC: " Child a piece of poop fell out of your pants leg" C: " No it didn't" AIC: " Its right there" C: Oreo(the cat) Did it" AIC: So Oreo climbed in your pants and pooped in them?" C: "yeah" AIC: " I don't think so. Lets take a bath." 
this is the greatest prank ever. noone suspects a child. did you ever tell him? 
I've been laughing for a solid 5 minutes at this so take my gold 
Well of course he's lying! Buzz Lightyear can't fly! He can only fall with style! 
Looks like he needs to break his brothers knee caps for snitching 
There was no set amount. He charged different prices for different classes and quality. If the kid wanted an A level paper, he charged more than if they wanted a C level paper. Some kids were weekly clients, which means he did their homework everyday and they paid him for the week. It was the same amount of money no matter how much homework. He had a couple of other clients that he only did homework for every once in a while. The word got spread pretty fast, which is why he was up all night doing homework. I found $60 in his pockets. 
Did the younger brother get shanked? Snitches get stitches. 
How did your ex not notice two packs a day were missing? 
I'm just imagining the scheming thought process in this kid's head as he's emptying the entire shirt drawer, putting 18 additional shirts on to hide underwear. 
Seriously, the kid's gonna think he can leave work anytime he has to go to the bathroom. 
Up until the part where the cops let you guys go, but then she decides to tell the cops the perfect escape route on how not to get caught stealing from that place. 
I would not be suprised if someone did design those book covers and posted them. It is a cat based photoshop challenge on Reddit. 
Holy shit that would be hilarious on the wizened old man with bad knees that takes care of my route 
My dad loved to sign all my school stuff with names like Bill Clinton and Barry Bonds. Eventually I just started forging his signature. 
God this reminds me of my boyfriend. Our schools out about two hours away from each other and one day we are on the phone and he says to me "look out your window" so I did and then he said "We are both looking out a window." 
"Listen, could I get an advance? You know I'm good for it!" 
I work at a preschool. I was swapped into a different classroom today than my usual one, and after school, a kid came up to me on the playground and said, "Hey Ms. Jones! Remember when you were in my class!?! That was so fun." Yes Jackson, I do remember, because it happened three hours ago. 
Paul: "Thanks for stopping by for another session tonight Satan. So how was your week?" Satan: "Awful. I still haven't figured out how to fully start the apocalypse, some weird family cursed me to their home, then left." Paul: " any positives from your experience?" Satan: "well a new family moved in. They have a little girl. I thought about being nice for a change. Try to be a little like Jesus. So I tried to cut the little girls hair. And i messed up." Paul: " I'm sorry to hear that Satan. But what happened next?" Satan: "the girl told on me, father didn't believe her, and the family moved away now... I just wanted to be nice for a change." Paul: "how does that make you feel?" Satan: "well Paul, I think I'll restart my plan to enslave humanity again." 
Cheetos have cheetah DNA! My imaginary friend told me so! 
But they do have momentum and as such they transfer energy. You teach that little shit. 
My sister had the same idea except she cut some other kid's hair. 
No mom I'm really not cool at all. Ask anybody at school. 
The fact that a presidential candidate uses the same debate tactics as a 6 year old is scary 
That tends to be my rule, too, with kids. You wanna try something really fucking weird that won't bring you any harm? Have at it! Usually, I'm kinda curious to see the results, too, cause kids can have some crazy ideas and kids can have some uniquely cool ideas. I've been working with little ones for nearly fifteen years, and--while some stuff is repetitive--it never gets boring. I can't imagine, though, what my days would be like if I tried to make all my littles fit in specifically designed boxes of societal expectations. I would really be punishing myself by making my job excrutiatingly, mind-numbingly dull. 
Oh a few weeks ago my son informed a grocery store clerk that "mum did giant poopy". Yeah. 
My kindergarten teacher spoke with my parents because she was concerned about a drawing I made and that I might be acting out. Apparently I drew the tooth fairy as a fat disgustingly ugly old woman with lots of pimples and like 100 teeth. Which is exactly how my dad described the tooth fairy to me, a really ugly fat old woman who took children's teeth to put them in her own mouth. He found it funny, fuck the tooth fairy for real though 
That line honestly struck me as sad rather than funny. 
"You have....4, unheard messages. First message.." 
"SIR, I ALREADY TOLD YOU THAT I AM NOT A DOOR PERSON, YOU'RE REFUSING TO HELP ME SO I'M GOING TO HANG UP" 
But they're five, they might not immediately know which way a door opens at first sight 
I'm cracking up imagining the anger and confusion in her voice as she cleans a pissy trash can. 
Wow! Just don't let him get too tired from doing other people's homework tho. He's still young to be working his ass off like that. But yeah, kudos to your kid. Such a hustler. 
YES. I TOO GET EXCITED ABOUT NORMAL HUMAN FOOD, FELLOW HUMAN. HA-HA-HA, GIANT AQUATIC MACHINES DO HAVE DELICIOUS HUMAN FOOD. 
Both of these comments made me laugh out loud. This is the kind of dad I want to be. 
I'm 29 and my family has the same attitude. I'm not gonna risk getting one fewer presents (and my mom is a big fan of Santa stuff so it's fun for her too). Last Christmas Santa gave me an HBO subscription. Plus now my parents go to sleep before me so I leave out a plate of cookies for Santa around 10pm or so and then I eat them at 1am. 
My nieces will do that. "Remember that time you were playing the game and you drove the lego car?" I do, that was an hour or so ago, now stop stalling it's time for bed. 
Chester Cheetah told you, and he isn't imaginary. 
I cut my little sister's hair with pinking shears. Gave her the world's shortest zig zag bangs. My mom was not pleased. She grew up to be a hair stylist, and I like to think I was the inspiration. 
Oh man my little brother got into the habit of using "just joking" to cover up a lie or an insult when he was a kid. My mother, my sister and myself made a deliberate effort to *destroy* this habit with nuclear force. It took about 48 hours of ending every sentence with some derivative of "just joking" and he was done. He's 25 now and remembers that shit like it was yesterday. 
Oh but that tactic is battle tested. It's not the tactic that the 6 year old needed to polish, it's the execution. But yeah can we just not talk about the election? I'm going to pretend it's not happening all the way up until November 4th. 
Plus his parents were pretty hard on him. I found that he behaved much better all around when you would let him do all of the weird/silly stuff, instead of getting upset at him for it. And on top of that, if I would have just said no because I told you so, he would have never found out that he liked this weird food, or found out why it's gross. I'm still not sure if he really liked it or not. He put on a good act. 
I think most of their interactions (especially while they're living together) are more sad than funny 
... "Steven." Second message: "Steven!" Third message: "*STEVEN!*" Fourth message: "*STEVEN RAY PARKER! PUT DOWN YOUR IPAD AND GET IN HERE RIGHT NOW!*" Press star to replay messages, press pound to delete all messages. 
I actually like this one, thanks for not letting it die. 
Im 28 and I still sometimes pull a push door and vice versa. 
you friend thats a girl took a shit behind the couch? is she married? 
I can just invision a kid cracking kunkles in front of a mom. Homework what homework? Then the brother in the doorway escorting the mom out. 
I put an end to it. That was a couple of years ago and as far as I know, he isn't doing it anymore. He got away with it for a while though. 
That's why you have to wash them, but we're talking about the clothes here. 
TOO TRUE. SO MANY NORMAL HUMANS SAY THEY ARE ONLY EXCITED FOR SPECIAL FOOD, BUT ME I AM SUCH A NORMAL JOE AVERAGE SIX PACK OF SODA CANS THAT I BECOME EXCITED OVER NORMAL HUMANS FOODS, LIKE NORMAL MACARONI AND REGULAR CHEESE. THOSE ARE COMMON FOODS THAT ARE EATEN EVERY DAY AND NOT RARE EXOTIC DELICACIES, AS ANY NORMAL HUMAN WOULD KNOW. 
My dad and I have the same initials, so we naturally have similar signitures. Signing forms for school is a pain! 
When I was 4 or 5, my brother (who was 7 or 8) chopped off most of my hair. All the way to the scalp in some places. When my mom asked him why he did it, he wailed, "She ASKED me to!" I most certainly did not. 
I agree. Kinda made me sad cuz I loved Michael so much and he was so oblivious to the toxic relationship he was in. The moment I felt the most sad though- Michaels futon. So funny yet so sad. 
He's paying other smart kids a cut rate to do the heavy lifting now. He set up a PayPal and no actual cash exists to be found now. The weekly kids even set up an automatic withdrawal. 
FELLOW HUMAN, WE ARE IN AGREEMENT THAT HUMAN FOOD IS MOST DELICIOUS. HA HA. 
Michael: Well, Jan has this school girl fantasy. Phyllis: That's a pretty common one. Michael: I just, I feel uncomfortable wearing the dress. 
Ah man- that line was funny, sad, and humiliating all at the same time. Steve Carrell man, really brought something special to Michael no one else could have. 
Took me by the hand... made me a man... that one night (one night!) made everything alrriiiighhht 
Yeah. I bought one for 170 bucks and it's amazing. I think everyone should have one. No more he said she said. Just pull up the video. 
And at the same time it potentially holds some fascinating and equally terrifying prospects as a tool for our species. 
I've been designing a passive solar earth bermed house for 5-8 years. I have the land, but banks won't loan you money when you tell them you want to bury your house. I'll have to save for another 8-10 years in order to pay cash. But it'll be awesome when it's done. 
Conflict is the part I like. I like knowing people died for this commodity I own 
It's the most cyberpunk thing I've ever seen in real life. Flying machines covered in LEDs controlled by guys wearing VR goggles in a damp and rusty abandoned warehouse. 
It's absurd that I as a 35 year old person can't just buy weed here in Sterling, VA. I'm not "hip with the kids" so I don't know where to get it. Feels bad, man. 
Who knew that Frederick Douglass could be so complicated? 
Can confirm. Just about everyone at my high school got addicted to nicotine in less than three months. They all walk around with their personally-decorated juuls and smoke between classes or in the bathroom. 
Maybe it's because of where I live, but bouldering has been a big thing here in Colorado for at least a decade if not longer. 
For the diamond part, I think it's also people discovering that there are many other jewels out there that are the same quality as a diamond, but much cheaper and ethically handled. Namely, the moissanite. 
I agree with this one. A group of people at work and now a close friend as well are always asking me to go over for "board game" night. And all the games they say they'll be playing I've never even heard of. 
As an IT guy, I'm trying how to pivot into that. I'd rather work in the field than be washed out because of it. 
I just got a fidget cube. I think they're more fun. 
Until YouTube's shitty administration accidentally kills it 
Ignorant country bumpkin in SC... what's poke? I'm going to google it, I would just rather hear you wonderful people describe it to me (because I love you so much and feel other ignorant country bumpkins may be curious). 
Oh man you must be talking about milk steak. Goes great with a handful of jelly beans on the side. 
Aussie here: why in the fuck are we in Eurovision? Is Eurovision really just the "anyone but America" song contest? 
The dashcam I got about two months ago was only like $30, takes incredible video, and has a g-sensor. So like if I'm in a collision, it locks down the last ten minutes of video and won't record over it even if it keeps running (it only holds 4 to 5 hours of video at a time). So if I'm incapacitated and taken to the hospital, I don't have to worry about "hey, did a first responder have the foresight to grab the card out of my dashcam?" I would highly recommend everyone get one. It saved me money the first week I had it - some guy backed into me *in the drive thru.* He could have easily said I rear ended him and I probably would've gotten the blame, because who backs up in a drive thru? 
We're seriously reaching a crazy time with technology of all sorts. CRISPR, self learning algorithms, carbon transistors, VR, space travel (I know I'm leaving stuff out); Any single one of them have the potential to revolutionize everything, and they're *all* coming down the pipeline. 
Keep it up, I'm also planning on building a passive solar underground house and waiting on financials. It a struggle but will be so worth it. This summer I'm helping a couple build a passive solar straw bale home and so far it's looking really neet. (So far it's just a slab of concrete but the plans look really cool and I'm still pretty stoked, I think I'm more excited than the owners) 
I wish I had that class in high school. Sounds like something one of my high schools would have offered. Do you go to a trade or charter school? 
Who cares about clean water when you can have the INTERNET 
In Mexico we also call tacos, tortas, tostadas, etc. "Vitamin T" 
There's a Snakes and Lattes (also a Snakes and Lagers when they finally got their liquor license) in Toronto. A couple board game cafes I saw in Calgary, even Winnipeg! 
You have to trick them into going into a session. Everyone thinks it's lame until they try it. 
If they keep changing rooms, swapping themes, new story lines and clues they do fine. We have a local one that changes a room out every 8-12 months. Their repeat customers LOVE it. 
I can't read this comment without it sounding sarcastic. My cynicism just won't let me do it. 
There are services in DC that take advantage of local weed laws and will "gift" you weed if you order $60 art or a $60 bottle of juice, so that you can buy it without technically breaking the law. It's pretty overpriced but if you can't find it the old fashioned way you could drive into the city and get it delivered to you at a coffee shop. 
That's when you have found a healthy boardgame climate. 
You joke but as a board game enthusiast and P&R fan I would drop serious cash on a functional Cones of Dunshire play set. 
Do you play online? We can have some games on lichess if you want to pm me. 
It was like watching a human made small-scale hurricane. That was caused by Ja Rule and only affected rich kids. Wait, yeah why didn't this get made fun of for a month straight? Oh right, the American government has been dominating media ratings. Shit, this last month has sucked. 
A renaissance has to start somewhere. Once downtown gets "too pricey," nearby districts/neighborhoods become more popular. See: NYC. In some neighborhoods in the 1970s, you could have bought a square block for what you pay for a 2 BR apartment now. 
Gone are the days of learning a new language to increase your value in the marketplace. Now you need to learn a new methodology. I'm currently at a point my career where I need to re-train to climb, and machine learning and AI is where it's at. 
Yeah they're amazing! I'm a huge fan of mead. They can range from super dry like a typical dry red wine, or have a very sweet honey taste to them. Also the type of honey used greatly varies the taste, so many different flavors to experiment with. 
Honningbrew of course! The best mead in Tamriel, and made right here in Skyrim! 
To each his own! I think it's the bees knees (I'll go kms now) 
I was gonna say, watch them copy and paste comments from this with reaction gifs into an article tomorrow 
I seriously can't comprehend how twitch could be supposedly worth that much less than Minecraft, especially with it's potential for growth in the next few years. 
My psychiatrist was using a fidget cube during our session today. I don't blame him, and it's not like he's my main therapist, but it was torture to watch him play with it while I sat there with nothing. He needs two. One for himself and another for patients. 
My wife is a teacher, I wish I could come up with some stupid fad item that kids go crazy over. She's lived through: smencils, silly bands, shopkins, and now this. I'm probably missing a couple lol. 
24, Got one today. Fun while it lasted lets move on 
Live in a college town. Can confirm. And they are also wearing the plastic choker things women my age (early 30s) wore in junior high. It's bizarre. 
I'm considerably more cynical. I think you're over-estimating, by a large margin, how much people actually care. I'd love to see the average person get out there and change things, but I just don't see it happening. We're too entertained. Too docile. Even then. Lets say, hypothetically speaking, that people do all band together and stop some heinous shit from happening, like we did with SOPA/PIPA years ago. Where did that get us? Year after year they pretend we *didn't* collectively shut it down; attempting to ram through similar legislation. Maybe we can band together once or twice to affect change, but after a couple years people get exhausted and disillusioned, "Didn't we already stop this!?" they'll ask, and while they won't be wrong they'll find it tougher and tougher to keep asking themselves that. I desperately want to be wrong. 
The Hong Kong Rugby Sevens are an amazing sight to behold. The South "party" section is insane. So much fun during the trip home on the MTR train system with drunk people in costumes staggering around singing. Plus it covers a whole weekend! 
Google launches new Google Kubrunustics, killing Youtube Then they launch Google Herfmajebees, and no one can tell how it differs from Kubrunustics 
It's part of Australia's 3 step plan to join the EU. 1. Join Eurovision. 2. Annex Poland. 3. Apply for EU membership. 
After this year's lineup I wouldn't be shocked, so many fucking English language ballads. The contest is much better when everybody has an increasingly weird and wild entry, that's what's so funny and fun. 
"Erlich this is your mother, is your refrigerator running?" 
There was a great documentary called The End of Suburbia that explores the tremendous misuse of resources by building homes and cities the way we currently do. It's pretty interesting. 
Goddamit. You Mexicans are so lucky. All we have in the UK for breakfast are soggy cornflakes and white toast. How much better the day would be if I could start it off with a breakfast burrito. I had one Guadalajara once twenty years ago and I still think about it. I can't remember my first wife's face but, that burrito! 
From what I've heard, some areas have water table issues, and it'd be non-ideal if the water table sunk due to individuals collecting the rainwater in their properties, rather than it going into the ground. 
I would bet they stay popular as team building exercises for work groups. 
it was genuine :) i get paranoid about my comments getting misconstrued sometimes but i really do try to be positive on reddit 
And here I was thinking it was a room in your house that you'd go to so you could "escape". Like with cushions and books. 
Either that or "here's how I made $1,000,000 turnover and only $0.03 profit but I need blog views." 
"The Gale of Creative Destruction". When newer, better things force the status quo out on its ass. 
I'm pretty sure one exists but it's really expensive. 
Lichess is really fun, unfortunately I suck and have not won a game ever 
I think the biggest thing is the stigma is gone. Dnd is something almost everyone can enjoy but don't realise because of the stigma. Me and my friends decided to bring dnd to one of our school trips. (talking early 4th edition here) so every night for 4 nights we played dnd, it started as just the 5 of us. Then Somone saw what we were doing and decided to watch, then anouther by the 4th night we had like 15 people jammed into this tiny room with 4 bunkbeds watching and enjoying our antics. the game spread like wildfire through most of our year, and even a little into other schools. This was when I was in year 10. 
3-5 is generally a healthy sized party. Anything over that number gets crazy and inconvenient for time. 
Seconding Betrayal here: It's really fun to play and easy enough that you can play it while really, *really* drunk and it's still fun. 
I used to work in a comics and games store, and I would always introduce settlers as the "gateway drug" of board games. It's a good intro to the wide variety of games out there. I'd say it only becomes dated after a few years of play, and by that time you're ready for something more intense. But always fun to come back to from time to time. 
I'm a big fan of introducing people via 10 minute games before trying anything big Suggestions along this line are Love letter Coup No thanks Sushi go Bang dice For bigger games settlers of catan and carcasone are both good entry points 
Not really. There are plenty of programming positions that do not need machine learning. Web devs and Mob devs pay well and don't need it. 
From what I've seen the current "mainstream" meads are sweet as fuck. I've had a few that are more dry and I've enjoyed them quite a bit. I personally hate honey so the dry ones are very nice and subtle 
It's taste is like a fair maiden's kiss, on a moonlit night! 
I'm not into the big commercial brewers, there's this nice microbrewery in Helgen that makes mead with juniper berries. It's very trendy, you've probably never heard of it. 
I really hope it does. From what I've read online increased honey sales haven't made more people raise bees yet, its just risen the price of honey. I'm hoping mead can solve the problem. 
Twitch has huge operating costs? Minecraft dev costs are tiny. Maybe at the time the owners of twitch just wanted some freaking cash...and YouTube will always be a big threat. 
I prefer the dinkySwink, fiddly foo, or the jippy zip. The jippy zip is my favorite because I can fit the whole thing without lube. 
My daughter's in 2nd grade and she keeps buying those smencils at school, I have no idea who's selling them. 
I had a feeling this was going to happen when high waisted jeans and jean shorts came back. Can't complain though, because they look good. 
We can't band together because the idea that it's people vs politicians and billionaires is a myth. Congress has a 5% approval rating because half the country thinks it's too liberal and half thinks it's too conservative, not because we want something that politicians aren't giving. The 99% hates the 1% up until the 1% gives money to the candidate they support or to the activist groups they like. If you're a Trump supporter than Trump and Thiel are you guys. If you're on the left than Soros is a godsend. The citizens shouting: "Let's unite" all mean that the other side should compromise their values for the sake of unity. There is less unity between citizens than there is in congress and anyone who could be rallied is already rallied with those who they would be willing to rally with. 
Hitler skipped step one. That was his greatest failing. 
You could get a box of ice cream sandwiches at the grocery store and keep them in your freezer for when you wanna watch a movie. 
That'd be sick as fuck, watching the race through a VR headset and being able to switch between the racer's cameras to see what they're doing. 
There's a side market popping up where some companies are bringing an escape room to your place of business for this reason. 
As a South African I thought it's a room in your house you can flee to when criminals are breaking in. 
I've got no idea what *any* of you are talking about. But this sounds like a fabulously complex and perplexing game. 
They had it at a convention once or twice, but I don't think it's distributed at all to the public. 
the more you lose the lower your rating gets and eventually you get to just step on children :D 
Streaming did the hobby a *huge* favour as well. Before, it was a very "you have to try it to see what it's like" kind of hobby, and most people had too much stigma as you've already mentioned to bother trying it. But now, streaming games actually get the appeal across; it's like releasing a demo. The truly massive number of people who've gotten into the hobby who have spoken to me about it all reference one online game or another as their inspiration. 
Only thing wrong with betrayal is that it takes forever to play it with inexperienced players 
You take 8 of em, you start curb stomping them until you make a carpeted highway. The bones add a nice crunch as you walk over it. That's what you do. Or at least that's what I imagine happening when I trade 8 sheep for a brick and wood to the bank at 4:1 and build a road... 
Home mead maker here; 7 years' experience. Yes, the low end commercial stuff is cloying. Some of it is actually cheap white wine fortified with honey and branded as mead (which it technically isn't). For a good bottle of mead expect to pay $25 to $30 a bottle. If you don't know what to select then get Schramm's (he *literally* wrote the book on mead) or look up a list of Mazer Cup winners. It's easier to know a hobbyist or to become one. If you're US-based, you're legally allowed to brew either 100 or 200 gallons per year at home without getting a license (difference is whether you're 1 adult living alone, or if there are 2 or more adults in the household). You're also allowed to gift a moderate amount to friends and family as long as you aren't receiving compensation for it. A batch of homemade mead usually costs me between $8 and $20 per gallon depending on the recipe. 
Well, I'd keep what you got, that meadery probably doesn't exist anymore. 
Minecraft was immediately profitable. Its the Dark Side of the Moon for video games. It sells 10-20,000 copies...A DAY. Minecraft runs on any device known to man. Every mobile phone. Every tablet. Every operating system. Every gaming console. Cross branding with Lego. Stuff toys. Plastic crap. Books. It never gets old, because there's always a new crop of 6-12 year old discovering it every day. Translates easily to any language known to man. Twitch is more susceptible to disruption IMHO. The operating costs are HUGE. Youtube Red exists in case Twitch makes a mistake a la Digg. Microsoft now has Bleem, which is *very* good. 
As a person with ADHD - the cube is great, it actually works in that I can mess with it without thinking about it. The fidget spinners are more of a distraction than not having anything at all. 
I visited her classroom to do one of those "career day" type talks and the memory of a 2nd grader screaming "Kaitlyn stole my smencil!" still makes me laugh. 
My jeweler that I went to get it resized didn't even know with the naked eye until later, we came back to pick it up and he was concerned that we got ripped off. On the stone itself, there are engravings that has to be there legally which can be seen under a 10x jeweler's scope. 
if you go to a meetup where local RC groups are racing you can do literally this with a good FPV headset, all the broadcast channels for the video are just standard composite over 5.8ghz, meaning you can listen in on anyone's video signal as long as you find the channel they broadcast from. 
Kinda hard to say that after only 4 seasons, where the 4th has only just been announced. CSGO CSGO Street Fighter CSGO 
today I have a business empire the likes of which the world has never seen the likes of which 
I believe it was Cone of Dunshire Winds of Tremorah? 
It also helps that the groups that are popular DnD streams are not stereotypical nerds. Showing a strong diversity in the people who really enjoy the game is great for helping people accept it. (Looking at you, Critical Role) 
Well, most of the modern board games take forever with inexperienced players. The key is just to kinda go with the flow and if no one knows that answer just decide on a ruling that everyone agrees to. 
As a home brewer who recently made their first batch of mead, I may start making a lot more mead. The process is so much easier and less time consuming which is fantastic! You don't even need to boil the water if you buy spring water. I'm so jealous others have known this for so long. 
I'll buy those boobies for 25 schmeckles, if it helps. 
Poppers? The ones that look like a diaphragm and fly when they pop? 
I bought a bunch of nose-shaped pencil sharpeners to give my kids when they earned their smencils, they loved it. Some kid at their school was making a killing selling smencil shavings. I really don't understand it. 
Fuuuuuck. I bought like $50 worth of bitcoin back in 2010 and I don't have the wallet anymore. 
It's not from ad revenue - you replace that with Patreon and paid subscriptions and a smaller viewer/supporter base. 
I think those engraving are probably limited to certain countries. im in the US and there is not one on mine from Charles and colvard 
Yeah, it helped the diversity issue massively. The game wasn't innately closed to anyone for any reason except the pervasive *perception* that it was. Popular streamed games helped convince both new *and* existing gamers that it didn't need to be that way, with no changes to the game. You just had to start playing. 
The things that if you pushed on them on to your forehead and they suck and then after 30 seconds of hilarity you take them off and then have to walk around with a big red 'love bite' circle on your head for a couple of days after? Yes.... I remember them. 
We had to call it dickety because the Kaiser had stolen our word for twenty. 
I feel like the Cones of Dunshire must be played while eating calzones. 
My husband did this a few years ago, the day before an interview. He's 27. Luckily it wasn't really dark, so with some makeup we made it look like a birth mark. Hilarious. He got the job. 
Hey it's me, your bitcoin wallet, was was the passphrase again? 
I found out about it and tried to start mining but my Mac couldn't handle it. Fucking Steve Jobs cheated me out of my millions. 
A friend of mine lost his ID in L.A. Like three months later someone dropped it in his lap in Miami. He never found out who. 
I hope you got some money for your troubles from the driver of that car. 
Glad you're still alive and well! Hopefully you haven't developed a fear of blueberries ... they're much too delicious to hate. 
Went to Canada at 19 cuz it was legal to drink. Each put $20 in the slot machine. Within first few minutes, won over $800. Left and played pool rest of the night. 
This reminds me of a promotion Sprite used to do when I was a kid. You had like a 1/10 chance to win another free sprite. The way it worked was that there was black text inside the bottle cap that said something like "you won a free sprite" or "sorry, no win this time". The bottles were clear plastic and Sprite is see-through so you could just about read out the text with a decent eye-sight. Free sodas for a broke kid while feeling like you're beating the system was fucking amazing. Too bad they caught on after a few months and the text became impossible to read without removing the bottle cap. 
It was legitimately the most surreal experience of my life. When he rolled down the window we both looked at each other for a few seconds before we spoke -- like "This can't really be happening, can it?" 
Your gramps must have been so happy! I wouldn't be happy for the money, I mean I would be, but I'd be thinking "My grandson is the next coming of Christ!" lol. 
I used that trick where you roll up the ticket in your hand before dropping your ticket in the drawing box (making it more grabbable, ya know?) I won 3 of the prizes at my kids school. It was kind of funny the second time they called my name. By the third time, the whole room just groaned. I never felt so hated by a bunch of strangers. 
Wow, so scary. I fell on my icy porch this December. Just cracked ribs but I was in agony for 8 weeks. Had to walk with a cane for 4 weeks. I was lucky not to hit my head, or my neck. It could have been a lot worse. I'm glad you survived your slip. It's scary. 
I work in a jewelry store and had a salesman pulling out loose diamonds for me to look at. One popped out of the paper and fell over my side of the counter. Looked around for hours and somehow could not find it. Got home that night and was taking off my shoes when the stone fell out of the pant cuff at the bottom of my slacks. Called up the salesman and told him. We had a very relieving laugh over it! 
Used to work at a taco Bell. If I accidentally made an extra taco or something extra I always just threw it in the bag, too much of a hassle to deal with it. I did one time make something with lettuce when it was supposed to not have lettuce, so I remade it and asked the guy if he wanted the other one we made free of chrage. He says no I don't like lettuce in a snarky way. Like fine, fuck you too, as if lettuce is gonna fuckin kill you. It's free food. 
I consider myself lucky because I've walked through the woods and was never mistaken for a deer by a bow-hunter. 
It's amazing how many people do the opposite - "wow, that stock's doing super well! I've got to get in on that!" followed by "crap, this stock's plummeting, I've got to sell!" Congratulations, you just bought high and sold low... 
nice. being poor I knew i wouldn't have a rich uncle leave me his inheritance, but often wondered about nice elderly people like that leaving me a car or inheritance for something I may have done or buy at a discount. kinda like the song people are crazy or the stories about people getting classic cars for cheap because the spouse caught the other cheating or something. 
I once had C+ going into a final, got a C- on the final and somehow ended up with an A in the class. Didn't question anything lol 
Wow, that's a lot to win on roulette. You must been making some big bets. Were you putting $25 chips on single numbers or did you just have a good run playing black or red? 
I bet you looked pretty. Was your wife mad you didn't give the necklace to her? 
I had a similar thing happen while I was playing baseball, I was pretty bored standing at second base and the batter hit the ball in my direction. I was like I guess I'll just put my arm out and look like I tried to catch this and the ball went right into my glove and the team started cheering. The hardest part was pretending it wasn't an accident. 
That's mine too. I was in the left lane on a highway, and a car coming the other way lost control and jumped the median. It flew right into my lane just behind me - not more that 5-10 feet. 1 second earlier and it would have plowed into me at 70 MPH. I saw it whiz by on my left, the saw the crash in my rear view mirror. I had to pull off at the next exit and just sit in a parking lot until I calmed down enough to keep driving. I still can't believe how close I came to getting killed. 
Are you a professional (or hobbyist) contester? I know a guy who enters contests as a hobby, and he's won all sorts of trips, event tickets, occasionally money... but usually he wins an ill-fitting t-shirt or a product sample. 
That's good but the accidental curly is the dream. 
"Daddy, how did you and mummy meet?" Cannot wait for that question to pop up. 
getting your foot inside the door in any capacity is SO important 
Were you born and raised in south Detroit by any chance? 
Reading this made me happy. I grew up with shitty parents and I always hated seeing everyone around me taking their (good) parents for granted and lashing out against them for giving them reasonable punishments and not letting them do literally anything they wanted. 
How did they fit an entire Xbox 360 and Kinect into the box of cereal? 
Well this is adorable. I met my future wife a year ago and know she is the one. I have had way longer relationships in the past but never felt this way about anybody in my life. I'm 26 and feel lucky too. 
No-- no one did that, but we gave the dealers a nice tip and the pit boss wanted me to stay their in this absurd suite but since the room was paid for by my work I didn't want them to know so I turned it down. 
"Oh wow, look it's the guy in the I.D. I found! Hold on, I'm gonna casually walk past and drop it in his lap. And he'll wonder, 'What the hell?' for the next decade." 
Made me reread the original comment and then I understood 
That is some serious luck. Source: I've been hit by a car, didn't turn out as well. 2 compressed vertebrae and road rash covering my entire back that had to be scrubbed off. Also found out many years later apparently some serious trauma to knees. 
I avoided them for years not because of the accident but because I was sick of them. They are delicious and good for you too. A super food. 
Lol yeah. I woke up about 18 hours later in ICU, and saw my dad at the foot of my bed. I knew I was in another city, but didn't know how long I had been out, so the first thing I said was "How the hell did you get here so fast?" Followed with "Go buy me a lottery ticket." To which my dad replied "Son, I think you used up all your luck today." 
I used to do this with 2L Pepsis. But the trick there was to read the underside of the cap off of the reflection from the top of the liquid. 
And then he slowly rolled the window back up while flipping you off before driving away, right? 
My grandma is actually the one that recognized me. He had passed me initially but then pulled a u-turn a few hundred feet down the road. She insisted he turn around because "I swear to you that's joshebgaming." and refused to let him keep going til he checked. 
Yeah (although I am a girl) but same sentiment. Of course the next time we tried I failed miserably lol. It makes for a cute story and it will be a fond memory of mine for as long as I live. 
So you roll it like a toilet paper roll and then unroll fold it once? 
My husband washed them. I've seen antiques roadshow enough that I freaked out when he told me that. According to a guy who wanted to buy them that took off 2k from the value, though the winning bidder didn't even ask so that's not really true. 
Yeah, he's over 90 and ill and doesn't give a shit. He's giving everything away including money. 
I didn't know about the Vita, but both PS4 deliveries were super easy. The first I got FedEx a few days before launch and the Destiny bundle came within a week or two. 
Before today, I 100% thought that those giveaways were a scam. 
Nope, that wasn't me. Sounds like one lucky girl though! 
Chevy Sonic. It actually convinced my fiancee to get rid of her old car and splurge on something new and safer. 
I would say he would be even luckier had he never been hit in the first place. 
It was a range tip, so it wasn't even like he was hunting. 
if I found a duffle bag like that I would assume I'm skating very close to a gruesome death 
I befriended and old lady that I met of Freecycle and hung out with her every Sunday for 7 years. When she passed, she left me everything she had. It wasn't much, but I got a car and a mobile home. She's been gone almost a year... I miss her. 
classic mix-up! Wow, the thrill of knowing your *teacher* is a total *bullshitter!* ... I'm aroused 
I had a teacher that did this. We all had to write a 30 page book on Greek mythology. My best friend who was generally a terrible student, but absolutely loved Greek mythology had put a lot of effort into this project got a C. I was an overall better student, but a huge procrastinator. I literally had a typo on THE COVER for this English project. Not only did the teacher not catch it, but she gave me an A. It was definitely not deserved. 
This is why I don't get people who act so mean to other people, it doesn't make sense. If you are rude to people, chances are they will be rude back, but if you are nice to people, they will probably act nice back. It seems like common sense to me 
Not great, there were 10 things that went wrong in the industry. 
It was a hobby that stole a lot of my time and I also had tons of crappy hats and shirts and sooooo many koozies. 
I entered all the time when ever I would see an opportunity. I set aside a couple hours a day to do it. 
You steal a mans wife before you steal his accidental curly 
Step one: visit Nebraska. Step two: go to Runza. Step three: order frings. Step four: cry tears of joy and ketchup. 
Just skip the sex part. I lost my wallet and she happened to find it. 
Oh, she did. I walked in for the inspection with the landlord while she was packing her shit. The look on her face as we negotiated price was priceless. 
We had a similar house rule: if you rolled two natural 20's, you rolled a third 20 to see how batshit insane your attack was. We're going up against a black dragon. My half-orc barbarian wins the initiative and charges right in. Lands that natural 20 for the threat. I roll again--bam! Second natural 20. The GM digs up the list he drafted long ago. I roll the die again and a third natural 20 is looking up at us. He looks at his list. He turns white. He made a third 20 instant death. "Mr. McSonsteinwitz charges at the dragon, bursts through its chest, and out its back. The dragon topples to the ground, dead. Mr. McSonsteinwitz is standing there, covered in dragon blood." I made clothes out of its wings. 
It was easier for Englishmen to go to Australia in 18th century than nowaday 
My god, that's some next level shit right there. I already felt like a golden god when I showed the sprite trick to people who didn't know about it but that would have blown everyones mind. 
Not before he beat OP with a pair of jumper cables 
He was professionally stalking you. Probably a two-car job. 
Keep it rolled, as the idea is to take up as much volume as possible. Plus the curl fits into the hand (and around fingers) better for a more likely pickup. 
Sounds like that 2k guy was just trying to save 2k. Remarkable find! I guess I didn't realize 85 year old pants would look so.. Modern 
My grandma did that too when she passed 94 and just didn't want to live any longer. She'd rather be alive to see people be happy than die with a pocket full of money. 
What do pilots do with the list of passengers other than scan quickly for friends and family? 
I've been working with survivors if TBI's for the last year. It can be amazing what the brain keeps for memories, or how it can recuperate. But on the other side it can be sad to see the changes that can happen or the lack of changes at times. Humor helps. Please keep the humor flowing. 
That was not the answer I expected. Aren't those things tiny and cheap? 
Only when bad fortune hits us can we appreciate great luck 
Then what the hell was he doing firing randomly in the woods with range tips? 
that's...technically correct. the best kind of correct. 
But wouldn't it be like taking a loan without the bank knowing beforehand? 
Just make sure you check the money for tracking devices and change bags. You don't want a weirdo with a bad haircut and and an oxygen tank following you about. 
This warmed my heart. Thank you for making her life happier, if she left you everything, it says a lot about who else she had around for her ((as frequent as you, at least)). Thank you for being the person she did have. 
I sometimes wake up so anxious that I haven't completed any course work for the entire semester then realise I've been out of university 10 years lol. It's a strange one since I never actually missed a due date. 
Dude, why is this exact dream so common. I've had this exact narrative play out in my dreams so many times. 
Every single person in the world is a liar, especially when it comes to saving face and not looking like an idiot. 
I feel so bad for your friend. Hopefully that event didnt discourage him from putting in his best effort into future academic assignments. 
I wish the retail world would act more like that. I tried my best but it's typically whoever makes the biggest fuss gets the free shit. Then again, nice people were often shown stuff others weren't (like promos, better buys, and the occasional "wait until the new ad comes out...") 
Damn that is crazy! What made you initially buy the stock? 
One was hiring people who didn't actually know anything about the industry into high-paying jobs way out of their league. 
Don't forget the sandwich. Gotta get a sandwich. You'll be like "cabbage?" That's right. It's a motherfucking hot pocket with cabbage. Eat it. 
I've heard the one onion ring in each side of fries is a thing. Maybe not everywhere, but I've had it happen to me as well. 
I left my heart with my wallet, and your mother took them both from me and gave them back. 
"I tried to just dip out in the morning but I left my fuckin wallet and had to go back" 
Kids, I used to banged your aunt Robin every time I could, but when I met your mother we just joked about the yellow umbrella 
Gonna need more details on that one. Was there any verbal exchange at all? Did the light die from behind her eyes when you put the money down? 
I did nearly the exact same thing! Half Orc Monk, Green Dragon, 3 20's in a row, punched the dragon so hard it exploded, covering the room. 
Look the wrong way at the lady of the manor and win a free one way trip down under! 
Ah, the old "I just realized my parents were swingers" 
I stick my ticket in my mouth to get it nice and sticky. That way, they don't even need to grab it, they just need to touch it and it sticks to their finger like glitter on dogs. 
Scan for enemies. "I'm gonna scare the shit out of this guy." 
You betcha ! Then again, I've always found it easy to make fun of myself. Really, the true secret of happiness is this: Don't take yourself that seriously. 
Tiny. Cheap. Safe. Chevy. Like a ~~rock~~ tiny cheap safe. 
Its nice to know I'm not the only one that has nightmares about not preparing for a test when I've been done for years. 
I had one lecturer who somehow wasn't. He was like a real Sheldon Cooper but with a slight sense of dry humour occasionally. Once saw someone try to pull the bullshit over an exam and he was straight up: "I do not misplace anything. You did not hand it in. It is to that end that you got zero.". Also it's near impossible to pull this shit with essays these days as they have to be submitted online using a system called Turnitin which analyses them for plagiarism. Our course would only mark essays on turnitin even if you'd given a hard copy in on time. So if you didn't submit you got zero and couldn't argue it. 
my sister who is a teacher says its difficult not to give the general same grade to the students who kind of fit the role. I was the type that fit the role of being a failure so it didnt work out to well for me. In grade 5 I was getting Ds in everything (I was sick for a month and missed a lot of school). I had to do a project and my sister who is 7 years older than me sat with me through the entire project and corrected whatever I did wrong. Later i got my project back and got a C-. My sister came in bitching and flayed my teacher for the obvious biases on me. 
I saw what the iMac looked like and liked it. Then when I found out, from a friend, how easy it was to set up. I thought that there must be millions of people like me who weren't smart enough to set up a computer that would love this. I was right. That got Apple rolling again. 
She also took my v card, it was lit bro you shoulda been there. Anyway, goodnight love you. 
Ugh fuck everything about that last season. Everything. 
It wasn't my money. It was the company's money. The price fit the formula we used. Company approved the deal for a certain price. Anything I can get less than that was commission. Company approved $122k and I negotiated down to $119k. She was in the room for this conversation. We bought the house, notified the tenant they had outstanding rent, and started the eviction process. She had moved out on her own by the time we got to the magistrate. We were happy enough to have her gone, we didn't push for the back rent. We put fresh paint and carpet in the house and sold it for $145k about a month later. All in all, a good deal with a sweet justice boner. 
If you look to the left, you'll see the Grand Canyon. If you look at seat 19F, you'll see Jeff. He slept with my girlfriend in college. Fuck you, Jeff. 
 All kidding aside, that's pretty much true. Not just of the sonic, but a lot of smaller cars. I dismantle totaled cars and sell car parts for a living, and quite often, the only valuable parts on small, cheap cars are all of the airbags. If airbags are blown, you are pulling the Engine and transmission, and the rest is scrap. 
I guess it's human nature, which makes it even more depressing. It's almost like a self-fulfilling prophecy after a teacher pigeonholes a student into being a failure. I can only imagine how difficult it must be to try to rise above that... 
Lol well I applaud your efficiency. I guess that's better than drinking every night! 
It's even worse when the teacher shoves a friend of someone they don't like into the "failure zone". Back in High School, I knew a guy that was close with a well known slacker; this guy was a pretty big tryhard, and was really smart. He went and got his 65% biology project regraded by someone from our science department, and apparently his teacher got *disciplinary action* for giving the guy a low grade for no reason. There's a lot of students that get told to suck it up, but challenging biased teachers is the only way to get out of that hole. 
oh my god, how hideous for your great grandmother. to have to go through the grief of losing him not once but twice... life is so fucking cruel. 
I'm sorry for your losses, they both passed away too early. 
I have an aunt who is twice widowed (my late uncle was her second husband) and lost a son in a car accident. What you said about Facebook pretty much sums up her timeline. My uncle has been dead for 8 years, her son a few years longer, and first husband even longer than that. I can't imagine carrying so much grief for so long. 
This is honestly the possibility that terrifies me. She's got a chronic disease that will likely kill her relatively early, but at least we know about that and can sort of see things coming, even if it's going to be sudden if it happens. This, though... you plan for all the known variables, you think you're ready, then something totally unexpected happens and throws it all out the window. Life happens, and that's the scariest fate of all. 
Hug her tight. My dad died on the way to work. This thread has made me sad :( 
This is sad and sweet at the same time. I'm glad they found each other. 
Fucking dreams, my dad passed away in 2010 and I still dream he is alive and I know he is dying but I haven't spent enough time with him before he dies. Stupid brain, my dad was paliative for over 6 months and I had plenty of time with him before he passed away, but NO, my brian has to try to screw with me 
My mother said something similar about her first husband who died young. I was always conscious that her great love wasn't my dad but she told me that it wasn't fair to compare as they only had a few years and who knows how they would have ended up. 
I'm a widower too and have tried to start dating again recently. Acceptance is one of the biggest parts of grieving, and to try and think what I'd do if she were still here...well I can't even process that question. Like you said, it hurts to just read it. 
Sorry for your loss. It's an interesting discussion though. At 35, I am totally different to who I was at 20 when I met my partner, but we've grown together. If I met the 19 year old her we'd probably not get on and if I met the 34 year old her without having been together in the interim, we might be totally different people too. We are so shaped by the people close to us, it's impossible to say how different we'd be without them (or rather with different ones) 
Sending a hug your way! I am sorry for your loss. 
I like this. Before my nana died last summer, we were talking about how she hadn't remarried even years after my grandpa died. She said "why settle for hamburger when you've had steak all your life?" 
Stay strong. If you ever need to chat, please hit me up. You mean the world to someone and you matter to this world. All the best. Strength and love to you. 
My grandfather unexpectedly died in his 30's from a medical issue. My grandmother eventually met and married a man who also lost his spouse. In the end, they were married about four times longer than either of their first marriages, yet they both decided to be buried next to their first spouse. It surprised a lot of people, but it was a decision based on logic more than choosing one person over another. Both had children from their first marriage and they never had any children together. They decided they wanted their children to be able to visit both their parents at the same place. My grandmother said she didn't really care where her body was since she wasnt going she be using it, so she thought about the people who would care. Even in death, she's doing her best to avoid inconveniencing others. 
Yikes. Was he suffering from any known mental illnesses or stuff like that? 
I think the talking about your grandfather is mostly because for some reason earlier memories get preserved better. Towards the end my grandmother would often ask my grandfather to go home to her parents :/ 
Was everything ok in your relationship when he announced his desire to transition? You mentioned the thing about being at the height of the relationship when a partner dies, do you feel like you were there at that time? Was he happy in the relationship (though obviously not in himself)? Did he want to stay with you after transitioning? Ignore me if these are too personal, I'm just really interested. 
That whole show is full of "what would you do?" scenarios. I can't wait for the second season! 
Is a mistress a mistress if she doesn't know she's helping someone cheat? 
There's a French series called Les Revenants which has a similar dynamic between a now married woman, her ex that committed divide and her new husband. It's Kinda about zombies but they're not rotting and stuff, they just look normal but keep coming back from the dead. Think there's an American adaptation. 
I find it a very interesting question. Better than most questions asked here. 
Sir, are there you aware that our planet is spherical? 
Yes - she always maintained that it was the First World War that killed him really. She knew that the cause of his death was appendicitis, but she was convinced it was brought on by the stress of the air raids in the second world war. 
When my grandfather died, everyone kept saying, "Oh, he's gone on to be reunited with grandma." And of course his girlfriend/common law wife was right there. She had been there for him for almost 20 years. She helped take care of him in his old age. She is the one who was there with him in his decline in spite of her own descent into dementia. My grandmother was the mother of his 8 kids and got the best years before passing away at 68, but his girlfriend got the 20 years of end of life care, a dying old man crying out in pain that he was ready to see his wife again, and his children telling each other that those 20 years didn't matter to him and that he was finally where he belonged (with my grandmother). I would hate to have been in his girlfriend's shoes, discarded by the children of the partner you were with for two decades. 
Jesus. Considering how I've been coping (or rather, not coping) after my dad's death, I cannot imagine how she gets up in the morning. What a strong woman. 
Yeah that's how I see it. During the few times I've let my mum talk about my dads death to me (I'm still struggling hardcore with the emotions even now) she told me that he's really good for her and that sometimes hell just hold her as they both cry. My sister was not supportive of the relationship. I was from before it happened. I called it a few months after my dad died (though it was two years before she told me that they'd decided to see where it goes) and that day I said to my ex 'i think something will happen there, and for her sake I hope it does. My sister has her own newborn to look after, and I'm an emotional cripple. He will be good for her.' And I've never been more happy to be right. 
I was thinking this as well. When you lose someone so close to you, you end up forgetting all the flaws of their character. Month by month, year by year, whittling them down to perfection. 
My MIL died of cancer a week before her and my FIL's 51st anniversary and in a similarly small town. They adored each other and are 2 of my most favorite people ever. A little before the first year anniversary he started going out to eat with a woman who had been a bridesmaid in their wedding and they've been a couple for about 5 years now. She never married or had kids. He will never remarry or even move in with her. He still chokes up talking about my MIL, but I'm glad he's found someone to be with and someone who will keep tabs on him (that elderly wife job stuff like nagging them to take meds, see a doctor about that funny thing in that weird spot stuff). I hope your dad finds a friend or friends to share the rest of his life with. 
That's not fair to either of you. I'm really fucking sorry that you're both going through this. 
My FIL died from brain fungus. Fucking brain fungus. You just never know. Always look on the bright side of life. 
Yea it's pretty nice, even the kids are really happy that their father found someone. 
Are you me? The 10-year anniversary of my mom's death from brain cancer is in a few weeks and I think about this often. My dad has had three serious partners in the decade since, and the last girlfriend died nine months ago from another kind of cancer. I have a hard time imagining how life would be if my mom had never gotten sick or died, but her coming back now after everything that has happened is even harder to imagine. 
Thank you. I couldn't imagine him being here and not being with him. I'm sure that is a whole separate heartache. I hope things work out for you too. 
My biological dad died when I was a baby and I was raised by a pretty awesome step-dad as long as I can remember. My mom almost never mentions my biological dad. When I asked her before why she said, "Well.... I honestly don't think about him all that much at this point. We were only together a couple years, I was so young, and we only got married because I got pregnant." It really put into perspective how even though it's sad, in the grand scheme of things my biological dad really was just a very small part of my mom's life, and that's okay. 
I'm really sorry for your loss. I hope this doesn't come across as insensitive but I'm very intrigued. Does this not discount the personal growth that he would have gone through between the ages of 24 and 35? 
It definitely is not easy. A lot of my fellow widows and widowers have had different experiences in our aftermath and coping because they have had to be a parent and a widow or widower. This creates it's own challenges that they have had to reconcile. (We have a great group of people at all stages of our grief over at r/widowers) For me, losing both girls destroyed my entire future. I had an identity crisis because everything I had planned for my future was gone. But I had great support and my counselor asked me, "who would you be if you never met your late wife?" From there I started reconstructing my life as an individual. I applied to law school, got in, met my SO (not in law school), and have been killing it in school. My current SO knows there isn't a day that day that goes by that I don't think of the girls and she supports me in that. 
Well there are several aspects to consider. First, my late wife was a young widow when we met. I was the product of love after loss so I knew of sorts what challenges I would face. Secondly though, I have always been a mover so to speak. I don't like to dwell or tread water. As such, seven months of counseling was sufficient to help me address every issue possible. Most widows and widowers don't go to counseling as long as I did. Once they "feel better" they stop. Me, I kept going even after I felt better to deal with the secondary issues like dating again. I stopped going in August when I moved to the east coast for law school and met my current SO shortly thereafter. 
Thats also my biggest fear, and I've found her already at this point, we have been dating a little under 2 years, and I think within the next year I will propose to her. The thought of losing her absolutely destroys me. 
I'm a young dope with no life experience and no wisdom to offer, but I'm thinking of you. :) 
My mum died of cancer. My dad met my stepmum through the Macmillan nurse who cared for my mum, and also cared for my stepmum's first husband when he was ill with cancer. She set them up and they grew close and that was that. 
I just lost my mother four weeks ago and my father lost his lover and best friend. Cherish that woman (I'm sure you do) because losing someone that holds your heart so close as she does is a painful thing to lose and a painful thing to watch someone lose. They were married 40 odd years. 
She was up in Isaan with her family. I can't remember what was wrong with her but I do know her family didn't want her treated in a hospital. They took her to temples and traditional doctors instead. She worsened and eventually got proper medical care, and then went looking for B. 
I'm pretty sure she blamed him. I was shocked when I heard that his wife was back from a mutual friend, I hadn't seen B in a few months, so I gave him a call and took him out for a few beers. He was already getting on in years but it really shocked me how fast he had aged in those few short months. 
I love talking to the old expats in Thailand. Some of them REALLY went through some shit in their lives. 
Liars often add a lot of detail to make the story seem more believable. Not saying *this* story isn't true, but believing something just because it seems too specific to be made up is misguided. 
Now I just want someone to refer to me as their steak lol 
Just murder your SO, marry someone else and use a necromantic spell to return your previous SO back from the dead, now you can participate in this thread! 
I was positive that he would kill himself the first time I saw that movie. I may have been in a dark place back then... 
One of my great uncles died very young like this, and his wife remarried and was buried next to her second husband in a different town. She's been dead for years now as well. But my uncle is buried under one of those double headstones with her name on it but no dates, like he's waiting for her forever. 
I know someone who intends to do something similar. His first wife would be in the plot first, in deepest. Not sure how he's going to plan this but he'd go in the middle and his second wife above him. 
He was secretly self medicating depression with alcohol. He constantly lied to me and I can't count how many times he put our baby in danger. But according to him, he was ALWAYS sober. You don't get two dui's, fired from a career job and forced into rehab when you are sober. The problem for me was he hid his alcoholism from me from the beginning and it wasn't until we were married and I was pregnant that I found out. Then everything started to make sense. All the phone conversations where was "just tired." The totaled truck a month after he got it. Falling down stairs in the middle of the night. I know I sound cold but the level of deception he brought into my life left me feeling utterly betrayed. He brought nothing but lies and heartache to our marriage. 
Those people were wrong. This question is perfectly valid for a serious tag. 
Husband of widow here. I don't like to think about it, but it honestly doesn't matter anyway - I'm not going to try to compete with a ghost. You can never win that comparison. 
We had an ok relationship. I was more unhappy than he was. He wanted to stay together, and we probably would have stayed together for longer if this hadn't happened. I was happy he was trying to figure out what made him happy, but our relationship just couldn't survive that. We have a decent friendship now. We text almost every day, he stays at my house when he visits our kid. 
Yes, but she's not in the wrong if she doesn't know 
Meredith would totally leave anyone for Derek in a heartbeat. 
This is the shit that puts things in perspective. 
A lady I work with lost her husband at a really early age and even after several months of leave from work when she came back she just looked dead inside. I felt so badly for her, I'd almost start crying just by looking in her direction. It's been over a year now and she moved houses and is doing really well though. She's back to her old self. I think you can have a life after something this tragic, you just have to be willing to fight through it. 
Life is harsh and a good partner is the only thing truly allied with you. People are so goddamned, inherently selfish that it hurts. 
That must have been awful for his then current wife. But I do understand the kids taking comfort in thinking their parents could finally be reunited. It couldn't have been easy for anyone. 
Make sure it's in his will. Talk to him about it. Make sure he designates -- in his will -- one of his children who will adhere to his wishes rather than his new wife's wishes as the person in charge of his funeral and burial plans. It will be a burden on the person responsible, but it will mean that your father can rest where he really wants to. If your stepmother really is crazy, make sure he has burial insurance that goes to the child he designates so that the stepmom can't refuse to pay and leave that child holding the bag. I cannot overstate the importance of having a legal will laid out (and updated) long before it's needed. My father didn't make his new will legal before killing himself, and that destroyed the family more than his death. I feel like we could have pulled together over his death, but my mother is a fucking psychopath and the lack of a clear will destroyed everything. 
Which is why I think objectively the best choice would be to stay with one's current spouse, because if you're in a happy marriage with someone you wouldn't otherwise leave, why risk finding that your old SO was not as perfect as the picture in your head, and finding that you no longer share what you once did that made you work as a couple before? 
Out of all of these here, you have me tearing up at work. Your sentiment, passion, I can feel it. Good luck to you, she sounds so lucky to have been loved like this... Ciao 
Holy hell I needed a healthy chuckle after reading all the other comments in here 
It pains me when kids try to interfere with their parents lives too much. My dad is in the process of selling our childhood home after living there alone for five years since mum passed. He's buying a small house up in the mountains and has vowed to live out his years riding motorbikes and skiing. I'm so happy my sister's are supportive too, we're so happy for him. Here's to new chapters. 
Once you really are ok with that for yourself. I discovered a few years ago that my mother was more comfortable telling me stories about her first husband than telling my siblings who are his actual children. I had to spell it out for her that they need to hear those stories. 
If he came back today, he would be the same person he was when he died, so you can't include hypothetical personal growth here. 
Thanks for the reply. You seem like a really strong guy, I hope that if something terrible happened to my wife and kids I would be able to keep it together as well as you have. I wish you and your SO the best of lives together and good luck in Law School. 
I commend you on seeking counselling. So many men this day and age are afraid to admit they need help, it's honestly inspiring that you sought it out and how it helped you move on with your life. I imagine a lot of people will consider the time frame in which you moved on as short, but I think it's testament to how actively seeking help moving on can work. 
Having a child is like having your heart taken out of your chest and letting it walk free in the world. It's the most lovely and horrifying aspect of my life 
If the situation ever arises, it sounds like my wife should pick my hospice care worker. No banging until our contract is terminated though. 
Wait, am I getting this right, is it a good thing that he's being harsh when you're feeling sad? Doesn't seem like something I would appreciate personally. 
I knew I was going to cry in this thread. I didn't know it would happen *this* quickly. 
The PI didn't think to look for her with her family? 
I thought so too. It would have been very ironic that he spent years trying to survive to go back to something that wasn't there waiting for him. 
Doesn't sound cold, it sounds like self-respect. You were deceived about something important, I don't think it's anything wildly different than a secret debt, or even a secret relationship. There's this societal norm of wanting to consider dead people as saints, and it just doesn't mesh since people are complicated and sometimes they act shitty and hurt people. 
My husband has a voicemail from his mom just the day before she went into the hospital. In it she says, with a laugh, that my husband was right, she was getting old and she was going to make an appointment with a mobility specialist soon to get a walker and other assistive devices. She fell the next day and hit her head. She had a severe brain bleed and never woke up. She died 5 days later. The message haunts him and he will never delete it. 
I lost my spouse 9 months ago and clicked on this thread with much trepidation. Thanks Reddit for not letting me down. 
Thank you for your kind words. All these replies have made my month. I'd love if my post compelled someone to do something awesome for their SO. And if you get a baby goat (had to Google to find out they're called kids), i got dibs on a family pic of you, your lady, and your kid 
Most Parents spend most of their life looking after us. We owe atleast a fun Retirement 
Absolutely. It would be as if you hit the pause button on him, then hit play 11 years later. We aren't talking about them dying, then coming back that same day and living an alternate and secret life until you just walk across him 11 years later. 
I have sought counseling off and on for different matters since I was 16. I like counseling, it's a conversation with a trained and educated professional. Talking to friends or family only gets you so far. But a professional is great because they will give you their honest opinion, ubafraid to hurt your feelings or ruin your relationship. Obviously they do it with some tact. I actually considered being a counselor when I was going to college, but I love the law more so I chose that route. 
Making the decision to have a child - it is momentous. It is to decide forever to have your heart go walking around outside your body. -Elizabeth Stone 
It probably depends on the person. Some people need to be sad for a bit, then get a proverbial kick in the ass to "snap out of it" while other people express the emotion differently. 
Isaan isn't really the kind of place you can just look and expect to find, even with a private investigator. It's huge (about the size of Florida), very poor and largely agricultural, with some areas being mountainous or covered with rainforest. It is home to around 20 million people, so finding one person among them is a big task, even without considering that many of the people are extremely insular, and probably not keen on strangers poking around and asking questions (it's the kind of place where seeing strangers is pretty out of the ordinary). 
I struggled with this after my dad passed. He was my dad, so I was supposed to love and respect him, right? And on top of that he was now dead, so you can't speak ill of the dead, right? Well fuck that. He wasn't a good father. He wasn't even a good person. He constantly put himself first before his children, he wasn't willing to work hard enough to keep jobs once he had them, and on top of all that he was an alcoholic who didn't get help for his addiction. So yeah, people don't change retroactively once they die. They just stop existing and their chances to grow cease. I'm starting counseling soon because ten years on I'm still angry and rarely happy. But I want to get help so I don't alienate the people I care about. 
Ive been on reddit for years, I get it, but fuck. Bout ready to head to the Winchester, have a pint, and wait for this all to blow over. 
Same . My husband would swear off society and disappear in the woods ala Bear Claw from the Boonies (he loves that guy) . My husband has done medieval, civil war and frontier reenacting/living history, so he has the skills and supplies to do it. Makes me take really good care of myself (or try too). During our premarital counseling I told the minister if something happened to me, I would want him to marry a tall buxom redhead. (My complete opposite). Because if she's loving him and maybe raising my children, the last thing I want weighing on her mind is " he only married me because I look like her" I dated a man in college whose dead HS GF could have been my sister....it sucked. He wanted me to act like her... 
If the timing works out you may get a picture of her, myself, our kid and our kid. She's currently about 16 weeks pregnant. 
This comment hurts if you had a shitty childhood... 
I don't have any great advice for you but I wanted to let you know that I read your post and I think you're walking a hard road and I feel for you. I think people should be happy that your husband is able to find some light in an otherwise dark world; would they rather he be alone? 
"Can you confirm where you were at 9:00pm, 1986?" "I wasnt born yet..." "So you're saying you *can't*?" *writes on notepad furiously* 
Even if you did, it's not like you would have grown together in that time, so who knows how much different you would be to each other. I say that as a 36 year old who married my high school sweetheart. If we hadn't stayed together, and met up now, who knows if we'd be compatible, after different life experiences. 
The night she was born, I remember crying for about 30 minutes or an hour straight once she and my wife had fallen asleep -- I literally felt a pulling sensation in my heart. 
Yep, exactly. The only suicidal ideation I've ever had is at the thought of something happening to her. 
I was married to my first wife for 16 years. It ended in divorce, not death. In spite of all the reasons we weren't good for each other, we were at least very similar when it came to expressing and dealing with our emotions. That single trait alone is probably what kept us together for as long as we were. I am now married to an amazing woman that is more than I could have ever asked for. But.... We handle our emotions very differently from one another. It's very difficult for me to deal with sometimes, because I'm expecting her to process things the way I do, but she doesn't. I need to let it all out immediately, she needs to think it over first. I need to be held, she needs to be alone for a little while. The hardest part has truly been accepting that she isn't shutting me out, which is how I usually feel. She comes to me when she's ready to talk, or be held, or whatever else the case may be. I've just had to learn to be supportive in an entirely different way. 
Wow, that is both sad and horrible at the same time. 
I can't imagine it's easy for her. But my mom's mentality right now is that of a ten year old so... 
Thank you. And honestly, I think they would rather he be alone. That way they don't have to think about him processing his grief and moving on, when they haven't. I appreciate your words. More than you can possibly know. Thank you. 
You wouldn't have grown up together, you are correct. However, if you hit pause and then hit play, they would be exactly the same person they were while you are different. It would be MORE likely they wouldn't be able to deal with YOU than you deal with THEM. You will know what to expect of them, they won't know what to expect with you. Relationships (and partnerships in general be it romantic, platonic, business, etc) work best when you can anticipate how the other will react. 
Well mate, let's hope we never have to have those thoughts again. Our kids will live to be 110 
I'm sorry to hear that. That must be challenging for your family. I'm just a random internet stranger, but my thoughts are still with you. I don't mean to say that this other woman feels like she's competing currently with your mother romantically. Many people would prefer to forget their past partners and those of their current SO. This woman is making sure to do right by your mother, even though she's not technically under any obligation to do so. 
There weren't even any records of his birth certificate until many years later. 
 Oh my God dude the rage! I recently helped my BiL build his own PC. He bought EVERYTHING (Windows license, parts, headphones, keyboard, monitor, etc) except the mouse because he already had one. It cost him less than $1K. We built it in about 4 hours (mostly because we took our time so I could teach him a bit). He uses it for school, his mangaka aspirations, some fairly hardcore gaming, and who knows what else... Your friend needs a good smack in the head for throwing away money. 
Not Ferrari, but I remember when asus had a Lamborghini laptop that was overpriced as hell. 
Ah, I remember getting back into band in high school and having to confess to my band teacher that my clarinet was made of plastic. "Is it a different color?" "...No?" "You're good." 
Oh man I *love* marketing departments that buy needless shit for no reason! One of the places I left a couple years ago had just bought a CRM/ticketing system that ran in flash and couldn't upload files - you had to go create a folder on an FTP with the ticket number and upload to it. They did this without any input from any developers of course, even though the marketing team had their own internal developer team. 
It's his bottled sweat from all those years of balling. 
who the fuck buys a 30 dollar spoon what is that I don't even 
Typical fashion watches. If you want a cheap "looker", go Timex Weekender. If you want a cheap "beater", so Seiko 5. 
I've been searching through the whole thread looking for someone to bring up the OTHER MAC. As a makeup artist the 'do you use MAC?' question kills me. Particularly in Australia where is $50AUD for a lipstick. 
Sparkling isn't tap though, unless you guys gas your water too 
Professors who don't require textbooks are my heroes. Sometimes, there's just not enough money to buy books. 
What would be a decent everyday watch that you would recommend? I bought my husband a DW because I liked the style, but knowing it's not the greatest. 
Who goes to Starbucks for a plain black coffee anyways? I go there specifically because I want a fancy, sugar filled drink that may or may not contain a small amount of coffee. 
Fun fact about Grey Goose. To increase sales, they made it more expensive so people thought it was a high end vodka. It worked. 
The thing is, a lot of these people actually think they belong in a higher ELO... 
What kills me about this stuff is that there are so many things you can do to improve sound. Measuring out and placing speakers in the correct place. Figuring out where that is for the room. Moving a sub around to avoid irregularities. Putting a carpet down to stop first reflection on a hard surface. Sound treatment or soft surfaces around the room. Putting the tweeter at ear level. All of these things will show a change in measurements and are very apparent. Yet some people want to buy super expensive cables even though they don't show anything in measurements. I tell ya, some people have more money than sense. 
There are a lot of gimmick dice out there but wood has to be one of the worst materials to make dice with. You can't guarantee internal consistency so they are bound to not roll well. 
A lot of raw chicken is actually treated with chicken broth, many of which contain some kind of gluten product as a thickener. Got the NON-GF ones once and ended with with my brother throwing up all over my floor. 
Trojan condoms: for when you want an impenetrable wall. Except that one time. Or Trojan Condoms: If a horse is getting involved, we can't make any promises 
Any reccomendations for someone who wants a cheap-ish set up for both listening to vinyl and for getting it on to my PC for sampling? I'm assuming I need a turntable and a phono preamp. What about an ADC? How does the audio to digital aspect work. I'd ideally like lossless quality and would probably need a high reoloution ADC to achieve that. I know that there are some USB turntables but I heard that they sacrifice a lot of sound quality. Pro-ject also do some decently priced turntable even with built in preamps but I feel I'd be losing upgradability there. 
Once again, that's $9.99 on the double-you double-you ee network! 
Who the fuck needs a decent GPU? Slap an i7 in there and call it a "pro gaming setup" 
Actually, please get started on flow hives. I was looking into bee keeping a while back and thought it was brilliant compared to modern methods. I'm not, however, a bee keeper. Could you explain the issues with this system? 
I get one when travelling because the long thin bottle shape fits well in my backpack and I can just refill it at every leg of the trip. 
Almost every medical student has a Littman Cardio III (I think they're up to IV now). My ears are garbage so I don't regret purchasing one. I mostly use an Ultrascope I picked up at a conference now, it's the clearest thing I've ever listened in. 
Totally agreed. My parents have that and although it seems convenient, the only reason I make coffee at home is to avoid overspending on coffee 
I think the key difference is a nice knife starts sharper and will stay sharper much longer. 
Vortex has been making waves as a high quality low cost brand seeing as how they are the new kid on the block and can't slap on the 4 digit price tag like Leupold 
I don't get why you would need more than one good, reliable belt. I bought one (perhaps more for a bit more than I should have) when I first started getting into lifting, but i've used it ever since. As for the squat shoes, I think if you like them, go for them; personally I squat barefoot or in Converse but each to their own, I guess. 
Your Mac book Pro is the same age as mines. Still haven't upgraded for the same reason. Love the damn thing but it is showing its age. Longest lasting computer I have ever had. I made the move after the infuriating windows 8 release. Looks like I'm going back to windows soon though. The hardware is a joke. 
Isn't "tacticool" the catch all for silly gear aimed at guys who play too much Call of Duty and don't know what they're buying? 
Of all the universes, in all the universes, you choose to shitpost here. 
Quartz is the second most abundant mineral after feldspar. There is never a lack of quartz. Sand is mostly quartz. 
Plastic's actually what we recommended for marching - definitely not gonna risk my R13 outside! But then for band camp one summer someone showed up with a bright green clarinet... 
Piano teacher here. I had a parent buy their child a keyboard before contacting me for lessons; I go to their home for the intro lesson and notice this keyboard has hella settings and buttons. Go home, google the brand- it's a REALLY FUCKING EXPENSIVE professional-grade keyboard. For like, bands and recording studios. And I'm a classical teacher, not pop. If they wanted to drop a pile of cash on an instrument I wish they would have asked me and I could have pointed them to some really nice baby grands. Then again, still better than the parents who thought a toy piano with about 16 keys total was enough. 
I own a $30 spoon and let me tell you, I can't imagine going back to a regular spoon. 
I found a free knock off one someone was giving away. The only actual workout I got from it was lifting it into and out of my truck. 
Hey, thanks for this. I was really attracted to the DW design so I looked up Timex Weekender. Looks super nice. 
Feel free to ask the lovely people of r/watches- we can help you understand anything you want to know! 
I bought one too and really had no idea until I saw this thread, I get a lot of compliments on it, I wear it everywhere and it's still in great shape. After seeing all this about them I feel silly but oh well it's still a nice watch. 
Ugggh right I'm an MUA for esports events and everything except my concealer (which is Inglot) is non-MAC. In fact, everything I use is drugstore - it worked and I decided to keep using it! 
It's really cool to see guys using a little make up! :) 
Tarte is very popular with that age group, as is Kat Von D, Anastasia Beverly Hills, and Urban Decay 
If you go into any department store with the various makeup counters, they should have no problem giving you a sample of foundation to try before you spend your money on it. Source: work in a department store, the makeup girls always give me samples. 
That's why you use other means to acquire them ;). But seriously if you tell me that I have to spend $500 for a textbook for one semester you can fuck yourself with said book...paper cuts and all. 
I couldn't really narrow down a specific watch since there are hundreds to choose from but the best brands under about $150 or so would be Timex, Casio, Seiko, Orient, Bulova and Citizen. It also depends on what he would like. Does he prefer quartz or mechanical watches? Leather straps or metal bracelets? Dress watches, dive watches, chronographs, etc. Hope this helps. 
It's not that it doesn't work, there are just much better options, and like beats, they're completely unknown to the general public. 
It's a classic move. When Moet & Chandon introduced Dom Perignon they made a big push to try and oust Krug as the top champagne in Britain. This included sending a few cases to the Queen, and having James Bond drink it exclusively in the first movie. In retaliation, Krug just ramped up their prices from $19 to $100 and introduced a new rare 'super premium' bottle. The perception change from the price increase was enough to push back. 
Made right next door, same region of France, same wheat used to process it. If you love Grey Goose (for whatever reason) switch to Kirkland if you can, so much cheaper. 
Celiac disease sufferer here. Since the FDA made "gluten free" actually mean something, I have a lot more confidence buying stuff. It sounds stupid but I really worry a lot less when things that are usually gluten free actually has the "gluten free" label now. 
Yeah the Trojan horse story is like the total opposite you want to associate with a condom. When I first heard of it I thought it's a humorous brand, like those parody products in GTA games. But it's not only real but apparently the no.1 brand condom in US 
In my experience, it's never worth buying more than one condom at a time because the rest will just expire before use. 
"Yeah Alienware is great for gaming, this pro gaming config has an i7 7700k, 64 GB of RAM, and a SSD., Only $2000 it's the best for gaming." "Alright, what's the GPU? "GTX 210." It wouldn't surprise me of this was an actually conversation with a salesperson somewhere. 
detroit tapwater is the shit. tapwater tastes terrible when i leave town. 
I thought people just bought Voss for the nice bottle to reuse. 
It does taste different, which is why it's a terrible example. Its high silica content gives it that silky/velvety mouth feel. Is it worth that extra money? That's up to you. But if you can't taste the difference you have no palate. 
How did she not notice the safety seal was broken on every single bottle she drank? 
I second this, I honestly can't even remember what the water tastes like, but their bottles are perfect for my backpack 
You're on your way, man. To what I'm not entirely sure, but you're fucking going. 
lol I had no idea there were different types of stethoscopes, I thought they just handed you guys a stethoscope and a white coat at graduation and told you to go do you. 
Yeah, I asked my parents to buy me one before school started. I asked them for a regular one, but they ended up buying the cardio 3 exactly for those reasons. As I was finishing I did see a 1st year student with one of the deluxe digital ones that had Bluetooth connectivity that allows you to record what you heard. I did think that was a bit of overkill for someone who is starting. 
The most consistent piece of advice I've gotten from doctors about going to medical school is to get a good stethoscope, apparently hearing clearly from the beginning is important for learning. I don't have any personal experience (yet hopefully) but if anyone knows they would. 
I've got both the 600D and the 6D. Man, I love that flip screen. It's pretty much the best implementation of a flipping screen I've seen so far. I never knew how much I used it until I got a camera without one. 
Nothing. People are snobs. (Okay, I won't say *nothing*. It's just an act that makes it seem like you think the only reason photographer's photos are better is because they bought better cameras. But I don't think every act that's fairly "casual photography" using a DSLR means you think that. Plus, if you learn about photography a DSLR can make your selfies better so whatever.) 
But if it ever breaks you can basically throw it at a guitar center employee and they'll give you a new one for free. The only guitar cable you'll ever buy. 
Oh shit your comment brought back to my memory an annoying petty reddit argument about Japanese and European knifes differences in steel hardness and sharpness lasting/easiness. 
Swiss here, all chefs I know use Victorinox, they're great knives actually. 
But you can get like seventy five dollar store knives for 75 bucks. that's like seven and a half times ten times one. Just kidding, I like my nice knives. 
I used to do all my lifts in converse but got squat shoes as a gift. I will never go back the difference is incredible. Definitely gonna buy another pair if my current ones get worn out 
Slightly different but my old marketing director did stuff like this. "So, I'm thinking this should be our new email theme." *click click click* "Dude, did you just send that ugly ass message to our entire mailing list? That had our company email addresses on it." "Oh, oops, can we unsend it?" He did this a few times a week. At one point, I had to run into the legal office cause I had received his test email where he had copied the wrong information and almost promised a one million dollar contest with four guaranteed winners to our 5,000 person email list. 
Can confirm. Born with silver spoon in mouth. Wouldn't use anything else. 
They had a broken bowflex, I bought a broken bowflex. 
Someone should start their own brand using that tutorial just to see how well it works 
Be warned that they are relatively loud for a watch. It's not super loud, but probably noticeable in a silent room. It's up to you if you think that's acceptable or not. 
Drugstore brands have gotten SO much better. They're effectively the generics of the makeup world, except their formulas occasionally beat out the expensive brands. 
It would be hilarious if they had a show together. Bear Grylls goes out and catches something in the wild, and Gordon Ramsay has to figure out how to cook and season it with readily available material so that it's delicious. "Zambian bulldogs have sharp teeth, so I have to approach it from behind with this make-shift net I made from branches and leaves." *throws net* "I got him! Their skin is highly poisonous so I have to remove that first. I can eat the muscles off his back and legs." "Pinch of salt and pepper, massage it in and let the seasoning get absorbed. Heat on, be generous with the olive oil. Meat in. Make sure you press it down in the pan. Dice in a clove of garlic and add thyme and butter. Heat off. Take it off the pan and let it rest for 10 minutes before serving." 
Neat. I'm a complete pleb that's only had Smirnoff, so, those all sound like interesting choices. 
Because not only is CLIX a catchy name. It's also the Roman Numerals for 159. 
Mythbusters tested that and the people who didn't drink Vodka really didn't notice a difference, but apparently they brought in a Vodka expert (or something I don't remember) who ranked them perfectly in order from not distilled up to 6 filtered and then with the 'top shelf' vodka rated as best. So basically the conclusion was 'yes, running it through the filter makes it better, but you pretty much have to replace the filter after you do that and with current filter prices for the filter we're using that actually makes it more expensive than just buying the good stuff in the first place.' 
I guess I do the same thing when I stretch my fingers and think of all the reasons I should leave my desk job... 
A buddy of my was stationed in Lebanon for 4 months. Played about 10 hours of WoW a day. Not in any way an irregular occurance. There's a *lot* of downtime. 
Yeah, life's gotten much better. I can't imagine Cheerios would have pulled their gluten free labeling (which they did because of cross contamination in the supply chain) and resolved that issue without the FDA mandate. 
Actually Troy had practically impenetrable walls for the time, which is why the Greeks had them under siege for 10 years. What allowed them to defeat the trojans was a trick, basically asking them to take down the wall just this one time. This eventually led to all of the Trojans deaths, because of the STG (Sexually Transmitted Greeks). 
In general it's a bad idea to buy anything for someone who's more knowledgeable than you about it 
What about INTEGRATED GRAPHICS? It sounds expensive. 
This made me spit my Dasani water out in classic LoL fashion. 
EMT students with super expensive stethoscopes lol. It's all fun and games until a patient in the field pukes on it and you. 
I am a student that has one of the deluxe digital ones. My dear grandmother got me it. But the only reason why i have it is that I am hearing impaired and it streams to my hearing aids. Its a pretty cool setup tho. 
Same for me, went from a 650D to a 6D and didn't realize how much I'd miss the articulation. If nothing else it was a great way to protect the screen during storage/transport. 
I thought they changed that a while ago. Mogami is nicer than Monster and still has the same replacement program monster used to have. If you want to spend too much money on a cable, get a Mogami. I've had mine for like 8 years and use it regularly and never had an issue with it. 
Played violin for 20 years. Paint changes the sound. Even too much rosin sitting on the wood can effect resonance. They're extremely temperamental instruments. 
I have a PBone and love it. It sounds fine for my purposes and only weighs a pound and a half. Had to ditch the plastic mouthpiece thought. It didn't feel right to me. 
Most of my knives are Victorinox. Great bang for the buck. 
I was completely convinced until I read your comment... 
Lasted pretty long considering the punishment it copped 
You can setup emailing to send a few mins after you actually click send, giving time to cancel i know gmail has it 
Honestly you could do the exact same thing but sub out Europe for Japan and I bet you'd corner the market of hypebeasts. 
I CANNOT stop singing the praises of the Wet n Wild Photofocus line. I use the primer and setting spray at events I do makeup for and they work beautifully. 
So the second batch does twice the work, but costs a fraction of the main stuff? 
I laughed at first when I read that but then I remembered that I breed ornamental shrimp as a hobby and so I humbled myself a little. 
Oh no which random person on the internet am I supposed to believe! 
I find that it's not really that good vodka is good, it's just that bad vodka is so incredibly bad. 
"Your computer is bottlenecking" Nah fam it's a 3.5 ghz one it's good! He has a fx6300. I weep for him 
That's technically a deployment. The rest of the year he's doing the 6:30am physical training and getting off at 5pm(hopefully) like everyone else. 
There is one way to do it. Ask them in casual conversation what their dream rig would be. Take notes (this works best over text message or other online communication, obviously). Let the conversation shift away naturally. Wait six months. Source: did this for my husband for a major anniversary. Our anniversary is in July. Had the conversation in February. He was very surprised and happy. And downright shocked. (And it took me most of that six months to pull it off, too! So many close calls...) 
It's all fun and games until you leave it at the scene and don't realize until AFTER you've transported the PT. Keep it cheap so it doesn't matter if it gets left behind somewhere. 
Oh the hearing aid thing is awesome! I'm entering an RN program, and I'm having a hard time hearing the subtleties. I may need to grab one of these. 
All we need is a gimmick... only release watches on the fifth of every month? 
I can't believe the improvement I've seen in wet n wild over the years,it's like the brand grew up with me 
Yeah see that's crazy to me. In Australia we can swatch drugstore so it's no issue. 
The second because he said the first guy wasn't accurate. 
Funny story, I bought it because it was Russian. I text my Russian friend a pic of the bottle asking her what the Russian writing said. Russian standard is what she text back. 
I'm translating from Danish and barely know the terminology in that language, so you're probably right. About the first part, at least. 
I raced back to the scene after dropping pt off at ED. Found a yard full of Mexican kids using my scope to listen to a dog's heart beat..... it was an all around win. 
Just release limited production signature series watches endorsed by attractive people. If they are welling to take money to say they endorse it then it must be affordable luxury. 
Sounds like I seriously need to try their stuff again. I haven't bought Wet n Wild since I was a teenager, and have been turning my nose up whenever I see it. 
I just realized how often I engage in this mode of thinking. 
Your syntax reads like a Russian speaking English. 
People who play to win aren't interested in self-evaluation. People who play to improve tend to be. It's really easy to tell them apart. Someone who only cares about winning will criticize anything someone else does to reduce their chance of winning. Someone who cares more about improving will criticize their mistakes. If someone loses a team fight and blames the support for not backing up his play, he is playing to win. If someone loses a team fight and apologizes to the team for making an engagement before the team was ready to follow, they're probably trying to git gud. I'm awful at the game now because I haven't had much time to play the past few years on account of steady employment, but I'll be damned if I don't see my own mistakes and get more frustrated by them than a teammate losing lane hard. 
Their liquid eyeliner (in the little pot, not the pen) is hands down the best I've ever used. Lasts all day with no smudging or transfer, removes easily, and doesn't irritate my sensitive eyes one bit. Also it's $3! Between that and the eyeshadow primer I've completely changed my opinion of that brand. 
So did I. I just realized I actually tend to automatically believe that. Holy crap. 
It's also a healthier mindset because you can't control your teammates, but you can control yourself. You should care much more about what you did and how that worked out than about any other aspect of the game. This also extends into life generally. You cannot change the past or the actions of others, so you should focus on your actions and their effects on the present. This mindset will make you more successful (you're watching and improving your own flaws) and less stressed (you're not focusing on what everyone else is doing/should do nor are you focusing on your past mistakes). .... But it's easier to put the blame on others because you're already the hero of your own story and without flaws. It's everyone else's fault you failed and they deserve to pay! 
suction it back up with a Lifestraw.... uh, nevermind. 
This might have made me laugh harder than the rest of the answers in this thread 
It's a film that spoils the endings of five hundred other films, from *The Sixth Sense* to *Citizen Kane* to *The Force Awakens*. 
I picture him using the Mrs. Doubtfire voice in this. ... speaking of which: Mrs. Doubtfiring: the story of an unsure female manager who has to layoff employees to save her job... will she sacrifice her career? 
Haha! You washed my car you stupid little shit. How was that going to teach you karate? 
I was expecting reggae in space, preserves are a nice surprise. 
"That lady deserves her false PPI money... ...and we deserve to die..." 
Also a movie about the underground California rimjob scene 
"Life moves pretty fast.. If you don't stop and look around for awhile, you might miss it. 
Or the moving true story of a German industrialist with one leg ever so slightly shorter than the other. 
Or, on a better note... One man has to cross the border to escape injustice. His only ride? A stolen kangaroo. Kangaroo jacking, staring Ryan Gosling as the kangaroo 
That is almost exactly what I would expect from a Pixar short, actually. 
The Land Before Timing: the true story of my garage band's ex-drummer 
But... That's pretty much what Total Recall is. You haven't made a pun... 
DO YOU SEE WHAT HAPPENS WHEN YOU FIND A STRANGER IN THE ALPS?! 
Jurrasic Parking: a film about a dinosaur valet service. Picture Employee of the Month except it's a valet service, and Dax Shepherd is a velociraptor, Dane Cook is a T-Rex, Andy Dick is a pterodactyl, Jessica Simpson is a triceratops, and Harland Williams is a stegosaurus (or a brontosaurus/apatosaurus, I don't judge). 
Damnit! I'm so good at tuning out the ringing until someone like you starts talking about it Now my entire morning will be filled with a high pitched whine just like my comment here.... 
Nice. I don't know anything about the original, but the *ing* version sounds incredible. 
In the states, "Dogging" means to make fun of someone. Probably why you haven't got a response for this. I learned this while saying "I'm just doggin you bro" to my UK coworkers and they all awkwardly had to explain the difference. 
The last scene of the movie is already some secret servicing. 
Or it's about a man trying to fight against the rampant clubbing scene overtaking his quaint little town. But in a funny little twist, he falls in love with the scene that he once sought to bring down. Starring Clint Eastwood as the grumpy octogenarian 
Let's see. *Dr. Noing *From Russia with loving *Goldfingering *Thunderballing *You only live twicing 
And it becomes a heartwarming tale of overcoming oppression and ingrained ideas, wherein everyone learns a valuable lesson? Or more along the lines of Paul Blart Mall Cop? 
Crashing - The sequel starring Paul Walker I'mSorry 
Xing is also a career oriented social network (in Germany), like LinkedIn. But I can't think of anything to do with that information. 
I'm guessing its about him heading to a McDonald's drive through but is stuck in traffic 
Then there's the Goblet of Firing, a tale about a magical goblet/bong hybrid. 
could probably do that with the entire cast, have Seth Rogen be the only one not saying spoilers, he's just laughing in the background. - Jonah: Darth Vader is Luke's Father Danny: You're an Oscar nominated Actor, you've gotta sell that shit, Darth Vader is Luke's Father! Jonah: [in a more somber manner] Darth Vader is Luke's father Danny: Okay, that's impressive 
"How could you *not* know that 'whacks off' was a masturbation joke!" 
I would even pay for that dub... I mean to watch that dub, not to produce it... 
The story of Wimp Lo Also: *Kung Pow: Enter the Fisting* 
Yeah but nothing makes sense by the third season and everyone has a mustache for some reason? 
Bicentennial Manning: The immortal Mannings ponder the meaning of life in a world where football is obsolete 
You know someone's already written this. Probably. 
*In a facist regime where everything is far-right, one man lists lazily to the left!!!* 
He's not gonna have much luck getting across any borders with a kangaroo. Unless it isn't set in Australia. 
Hey, it's me, the drummer. I'm offended by your statement. 
Never thought I would see the day the bad overdub of that scene would be relevant. 
Hmm interesting. Here in Australia dogging someone means ditching them or being rude to them. If you cancel plans you are 'Dogging the boys' or if you hook up with Aiden's ex it's a 'dog act'. 
I imagine this as a modernized version of *The Music Man* 
"Hey look, a kitty... Hi Kitty..." "Duuuude, what if that cat was, like, Professor McGonagall!" 
Paul Blart Mall Coping - He's trying to deal with his racist tendencies when it comes to these petty thefts. 
The story of a German student at the University of Heidelberg as he tries to find work, because no one will hire or care about someone who studied American History and nothing else. 
I always upvote extremely obscure rugby references, props to you good man! 
OMG And "jacket on, jack it off" was another! The remake was far more faithful than I ever gave it credit for. 
Ask the Rifftrax guys to do it. If they did, it'd be comedy gold. 
The last one was too hard, so we switched it to "ppppppppppop" 
Lots of places do this but I think they're generally kept quiet in back-alley basements, mostly due to the copious amounts of drugs. 
In Berlin it would be clubbing until it's early, then late, then early, then late and then it's monday. 
I read your comment and panicked so I transmuted my daughter and dog. Now what? 
Scarier and shorter than the original - people die before the 7 days mark. 
After a financial scheme goes wrong, he is on the run and steals it from New York zoo, and uses it to escape to through some other states and into the Socialist Republic of Canada before switching to a moose, and riding it to Nova Scotia, jumping into the sea, being swooped upon by albatross, who flies him to the Gulf of Cadiz before dropping him into the Mediterranean, where he is swallowed by a whale who swims to Galilee, and vomits him up into the coast. He hits his head, and passes out. Upon regaining consciousness, he realises he is on a hillside, and has amnesia only remembering the whale. When a local farmer finds him, he explains he only remembers being swallowed by a whale and waking up on this hill. The farmer has a chuckle at the whole thing, and our antagonist finds it very distinctive, along with his curly hair, and tells him his name is now all we know about him. Since he was swallowed by a whale and found on a hill, he will now be called Jonah Hill. 
Hey, it's me.. The producer. You guys booked 2 hours. You were 20 minutes late and we've spent the past 30 minutes getting the "vibe" right. Are we gunna record, or...? 
You listen to Reddit while you go through a morning routine? Great idea! I tried it, but the "permalink save parent report give gold reply" line is kind of annoying. 
actually... u/Your_Post_As_A_Movie is the one who should be here 
I'm laughing so hard thinking about a bunch of old people on those motorized scooters yelling at each other for taking up their parking space 
His first mistake was using the phrase "I'm just doggin you bro." 
*The Music Manning* Peyton and Eli quit their football careers to become aspiring musicians, but do they have what it takes? 
Harry Potter and the Chamber of SecretSing - Teenage wizards who secretly love singing start a choir and struggle with expressing themselves. 
"Duuuuuude.... What if there was a giant snake in the wall, *right now*..." "You're blowing my mind dude... Pass me the Elder Bong and that Pensieve, things are about to get super weird." 
Sticks and stones may break my bones but zings will never hurt me. 
With an alternative ending where they go to the middle east 
The blink182 album "Take off your Pants and Jacket" took me WAAAYY too long to get. 
Yeah, I wasn't aware this is considered an unusual thing elsewhere. Just go to a club that plays techno/goa/DnB, they're often open till the PM of the next day. Sometines they will only close for 1-2 hours in the afternoon to clean up, then the next party starts. 
Right! Then it's trying to recover for a couple of days, and then it's back into the madness. 
Document and report your findings, maybe you can finally get that grant money and continue your research! 
Idk. My timing seems a little off. Maybe we can yesterday. 
Really? I thought the way the sentence was put together was very photosynthesis. 
TL;DR: ***ENGLISH MOTHERFUCKER!!! DO YOU SPEAK IT!?!?!?!?!?*** 
I can't believe this is still a problem, I did the same thing to my wife so I thought I was in the clear! 
These puns are just outside center in the US but I still get it. 
Whaaaaaaaat? This is incredible. I don't have patchy network or wifi but this....this is still fooking brilliant. 
**Warning for PC Gamers**, Unified Remote (by default) will install a bunch of random USB Human Interface drivers (for emulating different sorts of remotes) to your computer which can sometimes confuse certain games into not being able to detect certain gamepads correctly. This probably applies to only a somewhat niche group of people like me that plays almost exclusively PC games using controllers. Steam (beta) has updated recently for better controller support/customization, but I had some Telltale games (which are notorious for controller issues), emulators, as well as some other games (Final Fantasy VII re-release for Steam), that had major problems due to driver issues related to Unified Remote. FYI, it's not Unified Remote's fault, it's almost always games not utilizing xinput properly, but it's something you should be aware of if you have issues after installing Unified Remote. 
Upvote for Torque Pro and the ELM327. Great app and tool. 
How does it bring up the game on TV? Do you need a Chromecast or something? 
Does this increase your spam calls though? I used Truecaller for a while. My number of spam calls went from one a week to 5 a day. Uninstalled Truecaller and submitted to delete my number from them, and back to one a week. Turns out the spammers have access to the Truecaller database of phone numbers. 
Screenshot crop and share is default now on my Galaxy S7 and I'm pretty sure the new Android version. But Light Manager is incredible 
The Chromebook experience on this app is amazing too - I have my **super high powered desktop** back in the dorm for the heavy lifting, but when I'm in class, I use a Samsung Chromebook 3, with Chrome Remote Desktop if I ever need to get back into my **great and powerful machine**. 
Stupid question maybe, but does it reduce the data that is needed? I only have 1.5 gigs per month... 
This is easily the best app for managing your podcast feeds. I love it so much I upgraded to the premium version just to support the creator. Xavier is up there for guys I'd buy a beer for. 
I wish Tile would partner with IFTTT, I really want to be able to set my phone to send me a notification when I forget my wallet :(. 
Also works for treadmill runners. Basically, it's an audio book designed to make you run your ass off 
My boy is amazing. I was really surprised when I realized it could link with other phone for multiplayer and even run multiple instances of the same game and connect those as well (works well for pokemon). Also theres My old boy that is a GBC emulator of the same caliber. 
I see a plane flying overhead and yep, it's going to Heathrow. And the next one, that's going to Heathrow too. And all those circling over there? Yep, they'll be going to Heathrow pretty soon. 
Seconded. If you're a Touhou / danmaku fan in general, this game is amazing. 
Scared to use that app. Might hear something or someone I don't want to. 
Does Textra allow you to reply from the notification drop down like Google Messenger does on Android 7.0? 
Nova Launcher is amazing. I paid for Prime even though I don't use any of the additional settings because I like it so much. 
Just finished The Room 2 and I could not second your comment any harder. Definitely worth the cost. 
I tried it, but I lacked the motivation to add all my to-do list stuff into my phone.. Especially since I know most of my to-do stuff by heart so I actually couldn't be bothered :( 
Truth. I believe it's also packed into the AMC Theaters app now. 
I suspect mine would go as follows : Monday - I hate everyone Tuesday - see Monday entry Wednesday - no change 
What do you think about the depth of this game? I played one game, and I feel like I've seen it all. 
I also love being able to scan barcodes on packages. MyFitnessPal almost always recognizes the scan, and instantly uploads the nutrition facts on what I'm about to eat. 
Just beware that wifikiller needs a rooted device. 
Cam scanner is amazing. Saves so much time and money having to scan and submit assignments at the library 
I tried getting that but Winamp keeps deleting it. 
tell me more about galaxy trucker. looks like its $4.99 on android. thinking about it, not sure I get what the game is about though 
Plus you can chromecast it! I have a projector and I caste it to that, works like a charm! 
I hate the stock Samsung messenger app because it often had trouble with group messages, especially groups that include iPhone users. Textra was one of the many apps I tried. It worked better but was ultimately still not very good. I've found the Google messenger app (simply called Messenger on the Play store) to be by far the best. I imagine anyone with a Google phone already has this by default, but anyone with a Samsung that doesn't like the stock app, this one is much better. It handles all the group texting issues no problem. 
Yeah I've done this on my fire TV, best thing ever! I encourage cable cutters to go this route. 
I liked Swiftkey the most until recent updates to Gboard. 
It has addons too, like uBlock origin. No need to download a special adblock browser! 
There's a TI graphing calculator emulator called WabbitEMU that includes the TI-84 and TI-86, which are both commonly used in schools. 
I'm still rocking a Moto G (2014), so only have 8GB internal, minus whatever for the OS, minus 500 MB for ... I dunno, stuff. Basically means I have to keep clearing my cache so Play can update the few apps I do have. I've had it for almost two years, so this is the year I can upgrade without feeling guilty. I figure by summer, I'll have a new phone. I'm going at least 32GB. I figure if I can make it two years on 8GB, I can do the next two on 32GB. 
What's the mile to point ratio? I drive about 1000 miles a week, I could definitely use this! 
Welcome to the club friend! What phone if you don't mind me asking? 
How have they rebalanced it? I played it for awhile when it came out but it was configured so that once you got through all the tutorial stuff you could barely scrape a win by. 
I got bored with the meta game. WAY too much grinding. 
But how do I text someone to let them know I've lost my phone?! 
This explains a lot of the issues I've been having when I try to splitscreen with friends. 
Or be like my neighbors where their routers are all set to seek the least congested channel and the result is they all just constantly hop around as they each chase the least congested. I was on a PC based wifi analyzer but watched as each of their SSID's would sit on the same 2.5 channel for about 60-120 seconds then jump to a far end channel that was less congested. What would then happen is each successive router would then "realize" the new less congested channel also and would jump. A short bit later all the SSID's are still crowded together just now on a new channel. Then the process would start over again... I opted to set mine to a static channel and left it. 
Looks like channel 14 is completely unused in my area. I'm currently on 4-8 with no complaints, and a bit of overlap from others. Would it be bad to move? Also, how do i even change my channel? 
So you can just use your phone during the final exam? 
When I used it a lot last year you would hook a computer up to your TV and go to the website which would have a code everyone would enter on your phone's to join that session. Tried using a Chromecast and the latency was way too much to make playing most of their games possible. I'd say card games or trivia owuld be fine but there are better apps for those to use with Chromecast, cardcast for cards against humanity is the one I use. 
Or TrueCaller is selling the data. They make money and make it so that you are like "wow I do need this app, look how much spam calling I get" 
I get these on my Nexus 6P. I think it's default on android 7 and up. 
This exists? Fuck right off. I just got a Chromebook. Thank you! 
Negative. It still loads the video while it plays even if the screen is off. 
That seems nice, but I really want to be able to set my wallet to send me a notification when I forget my phone. 
You recipe is one of the best. Just remember to don't go to YouTube drunk after midnight. Seriously, this is a great idea. Your dad is a lucky man. 
Anything IFTTT can do Tasker can do. But tasker has a learning curve. Except I haven't figured out how to notify me of a new post on an RSS feed, which IFTTT did with ease. 
Wait, you can run multiple instances of Myboy at a time and trade pokemon with yourself? I need this I am pokemaster 
Same here. This app is a life saver to handlers and dispatchers. 
Well all your planes are like right there in front of you not moving. 
I used this (moved to Sleep Cycle) because I talk in my sleep and was curious to hear what I was talking about. Incoherent gibberish, mostly. Now, my daughter tends to crawl into my bed at some point during the night, and rather than sleep-talk, she sleep-giggles. I found it incredibly unsettling to go through recordings, hearing myself speak in tongues and her doing her creepy-ass giggle. Recordings with Sleep as Android are very clear though, so there's that. 
Yeah for me it just opens a bubble up which automatically closes once you press send 
Yeah. This is tempting, but I want to know if there's any security issues before I install it. 
The ability to change how your apps are sorted and search by name is way nicer than the stock launcher on most phones. 
How does Arrow differ from Nova? Because in my current setup I actually just use it for the custom app drawer and dock, don't put anything else on my home screen. 
Yes, it is! I always check it to see if there will be post-credits scenes. 
When I use it, I use the built-in timer that notifies you at the right times. You can set it up during the previews and then flip your phone over when the "Universal" logo (or whatever one is there) fades out, and then it starts the timer. It vibrates at each time, and then while you're in the bathroom you get a text summary of what you're missing. This app goes great with the giant sized drinks that you pay like $8 for at the theater. 
Unfortunately, I feel the same. Buying civilizations and then playing, but its still the same. A single huge IAP would've been nice, rather than shell out money for every civ. Adds up a lot in INR 
I live above a tattoo place and google constantly asks me questions about it. I don't know man. I just live here. 
We're on the verge of (possibly in the middle of) a singularity, I would not concern myself with meat people. It's clear that AI is just the next stage of human evolution and we should be happy we are being made obsolete by superior beings, who will surely leave us to live out the rest of our limited lives in peace. 
I've been completely honest with all my surveys, but it has slowed down to a trickle. MAYBE one a month..? 
Be aware that if you're in a corporate network you can take down the whole network if the network is badly set up... I know of a case where 4 offices were taken out. :p the reason for this is that the app re-routs all the traffic through your phone and if it can't handle the load ... well, then the network gets kill. 
I heard the phone call quality was pretty spotty. Have they gotten any better? Also it's important to note: nothing is encrypted if both sides aren't doing it. Signal is nice, but if your mom (ha!) doesn't use it, then the gubmint can totally hack your phone and find out what's for dinner without you knowing. 
I still use milkdrop for visualizations, it's easily the best I've ever seen. 
Each player builds a space truck out of puzzle-like pieces (think Carcassone, but with more types of tile). Then, all the players join up in a convoy and truck through space, picking up cargo, and encountering various things that slow or speed up individuals, damage your ship. Bonuses at the end for delivering cargo, being at the front of the convoy. Penalties for having your ship damaged. 
How safe is this? Do you need a VPN with it or is streaming a different story and it doesn't really matter? 
Depends what they mean by that - I have my settings in Textra so messages don't pop up on my lock screen, or when my phone is unlocked, not even in the top bar. We pass our phones around a lot at work because that's our product, so I always have it on. I'm not sure if that's a common feature setting with factory default apps though. But again, not sure if that's what they were referencing. 
MY boyfriend is worried if we do this, it'll phish our information. Does anyone know if this is a possibility? 
How does KOTOR play on just a touch screen though? Or will I need some kind of exterrnal controller? 
I pay for the premium version. i feel it's worth it. 
I also recommend **Nine** for business (exchange). Restricts company policy to the app only (so, no, the company cant wipe my device) and has lots of options (including one to save all your configs so you can reinstall without worries). 
For one, you now have the freedom to play any chapter you want, meaning you could get some more advanced plants to use in the beginning. Second, they got rid of that bullshit map from launch and went for a more linear one. 
Most games are perfectly fine. But for the few that have issues, sifting through the 20+ USB HID drivers that Unified Remote installs, disabling them one by one until you find the conflict and then making sure it never gets reinstalled when Unified Remote updates... it's a gigantic pain in the ass. 
I have remote mouse on my iPhone and it's one great app. Same situation where I have a desktop hooked up to my tv. Instead of forking out the bucks for a wireless mouse and keyboard, I have my phone! Not the best solution. Definitely does struggle with intensive activities but for Netflix and very light web browsing, it works great. 
Huh. I'm 100% sure there's a better way to do that, even assuming that each individual router is "selfish". 
Well uh... It's not a minus so I guess that makes it a plus. 
My class was an online class that made me go through mymathlab. 
found the skeptic. That actually makes way too much sense. 
emuparadise is awesome. I get all my roms from there. 
The ability to install adons like AdBlock is 100% the reason why I use Firefox over chrome on my phone. It lets me use LastPass add-on too, which is much faster and less prone to crashing versus using the LastPass app and letting it fill in data in other apps. I haven't figured out how to whitelist sites though, I should look into if that's possible. 
Tasker is good for device triggered things while IFTTT is good for Internet triggered things. If I wanted my Hue to turn on when Accuweather says it's going to be cloudy, I use IFTTT. If I want Amazon Music to open when I plug in my earbuds, that'd be Tasker. 
Also you can use gameshark cheat codes on it, like it is the only way to get Pokemon mew in emerald. 
"Where is this plane going??" Nowhere you fucking idiot, this is the Smithsonian 
I've been using both for years they're both good for me, just pop up ads in the app sometimes. If you're rooted AdAway is recommended. 
once it becomes popular enough it will get shut down. i highly doubt they are legally licensing the content. 
So it's like going to the movies with a friend but for lonely people. 
Someone at Google HQ sifting through information must think you have a lot of tattoos. 
I answered a couple falsely and then they sent me fake survey and called me out on lying and I don't get any anymore. 
I blew mine on pokemon go microtransactions. INCUBATORS FOR DAYS 
Same here except I haven't gotten any at all in the past ~5 months :( 
My location services are practically always on and I've never received a survey 
Same thing with me, my constant reaction is to just ignore the notifications 
It's fine, the touch controls work well. It's also not very action heavy so you'll usually be moving or choosing commands. 
Also to note for others - if you do buy it, buy the premium version and do not do the in app purchase. 
Seems like the delay in information processing is what causes oscillation, so they should slow down the reaction time on finding a free channel, and randomize it slightly to avoid synchronized hops. 
If it only allows 1, 6 and 11 then that is working as it should. 
True Caller also collects your contacts information. 
AGHHHHH LOOK AT ALL OF THESE PEOPLE WHO UNDERSTAND 
does Coolrom still have PSP stuff? i know they lost all their nintento ROMs. 
What the heck? I'm making the switch right now! Just added ublock origin to my mobile firefox! This is great! 
Even better you can run the ROM hacks people have made. There's a couple that are on the level of the official games in quality. 
If you don't even recognize any of the stores on the list, the answer is always none of the above 
Maybe you should leave your parents' basement more than once a week. j/k 
Pfft, Musicbee is obviously superior. Just kidding, use whatever you please 
And the action that is there is played by choosing options and queuing attacks/actions. I can see how that would be very touch-friendly. 
In rougelikes your character dies and you have to start over, but *you* leveled up IRL by learning from your mistakes. 
Pokemon uranium is basically an official game. Its not a rom hack and it's only for pc but it is a fully fledged fan made Pokemon game with all new Pokemon, region, characters, story, etc. 
Absolutely. It's not like you don't usually get a few cents anyway. 
I have a feeling they use your location history to verify visits as well 
Me and my heavily modified (not by me I'm lazy) Foobar will fight you. 
Your answer is incorrect. Your answer: 3.6290 Correct answer: 3.63 
HALT and Catch Fire was fantastic, too, that was my big intro to him. 
The first thing it asked me was to turn that on. I didn't and barely get any surveys. 
Your answer is incorrect Your answer: 3.63 Correct answer: 3.63 
You lose the the fever regardless at the end of a miracle summon in 2. 
The worst was Your answer was incorrect Your answer: 0.50 Correct answer: 1/2 
You jest, buy people think like this. We advertise free wifi at the hotel I work at. A guest calls and says he cant get it. I go up to assist him and he has no computer, smart phone or anything or to connect. 
I had one during the series part of calculus: Your answer was incorrect Your answer: Diverges Correct answer: diverges I wanted to kill myself 
Thats neat, except in Japan everywhere in the middle is fucking mountains. 
Shoo I don't need you giving away internet secrets on the front page, this is how good stream sites get shut down. 
Yeah, for me it's in the sea. :D Would be nice, if it takes the shortest route and then calculates the midpoint. 
Oh, sure... if you want to call those knobs from Tau Ceti "people." 
They probably aren't counting people on the secret reptilian world government moon base 
You can't delete your account. I have a wechat account and I don't use it anymore, but I can't delete it so it just stays there 
My favorite was when it parked me right in front of a manor house with a sign in Japanese in front of it. So I already had the country pretty well isolated. Then I just explored the park around the house. I got it exactly right and got to discover a neat place. Of course I don't remember what it was called.... 
The key in most situations is to look at the roads. The narrowness, the condition, the material, the colour, and the markings. Can tell you a great deal. * Narrow + bad condition + lots of markings = UK * Narrow + bad condition + no markings = South America * Narrow + bad condition + solid lines = Eastern Europe / Baltic * Narrow + good condition + solid lines to each side = Central / Western Europe * Narrow + good condition + dashed lines to each side = Northern Europe * Wide + good condition + good markings = USA or Australia * Wide + double yellow lines + lots of signs = Canada That information combined with road signs, driving side, architecture, flora, and the type of cars you see, are usually enough to give you an indication within a few 100 kilometres. 
It's probably not a bad way to get into it, as long as you quickly move on to practicing on an piano/keyboard so you can develop a proper form. Much like Rock Band and Guitar Hero, it's not playing an actual guitar or drums, but it would ease you into the general idea and maybe give you a slight jump-start over someone with zero experience. 
I found 2067 particularly funny: "The first generation of antimatter-powered spacecraft is emerging Male and female salaries are reaching parity" 
Songsterr is a godsend. It plays the song while showing the tabs, so you don't have to figure out how it's supposed to properly sound by yourself. 
~~well that took a dark turn~~ light and darkness is just a concept we made so we can use our eyes, it has no physical impact on the surrounding world. Does light even mean bright? Darkness is light? Darkness is light. 
Look at the iPhone rumors. That's my favorite one. The comments on the website are hilarious. Guy saying that he's totally fine with his SE k700 with "heaps" of storage. 
That would be so great to walk in on. "Hey what are you doing?!" "Uhhh... Nothing?" 
Well I just looked out the window and everything is burning. So yeah. 
I'm guessing it is just a random point to show where the "unknown/military locations" are. But I'm curious if anyone knows definitively. 
The attacks are coming from computers in China, they aren't Chinese attacks. Those computers are part of a botnet. The people in China pickup malware on their computer that they don't know about. The distributor of the malware has probably sold access to his botnet to people to use for ddos attacks. Because the attacks come from individual pcs from all across the world, It's nearly impossible to tell who is actually ordering the attack. 
These are honeypots, servers that have the purpose of trying to attract and trap would-be hackers. St Louis is where the administrative headquarters for Norse is located. As for the China part, a lot of people will router their traffic through China so that's why it looks like China is the country of origin. 
Me too. I thought I'd discovered some new planets. 
Space is big. Really big. You just won't believe how vastly, hugely, mind-bogglingly big it is. I mean, you may think it's a long way down the road to the chemist, but that's just peanuts to space. 
I've noticed that too, but it's still a nifty site for some 5 minute fun. 
Ah, good ol PCP Art Picker. For when you want to take the scenic route. 
Nah, looks like it's just hosted on the Warner Bros web site so it probably costs them basically nothing 
You can use it to update the basics, like Flash, Java, Adobe Reader, Silverlight. 
I've used it a number of times and haven't gotten any bloatware. Another nice feature of it is that it prevents bloatware from being installed by the programs it's installing. 
God damnit. Last time he was posted on reddit some asshat whiteknighted and made some copyright claims, taking the site offline for days. 
You can also drag the midpoint marker around to avoid mountains and water. I agree -- calculating routes would be better! 
Kelly and Kornienko are on a 1-year extended mission, Padalka is a part of the regular ISS crew rotation, so if anything it's him (although he does have the current career space time record at 804 days and counting). 
To be fair, it does say PEOPLE not LIZARD PEOPLE. 
Someone used my e-mail to sign up for Oovoo. You can't delete the account, you can't also change the e-mail address. They also send plain text passwords to your mail. I'm stuck receiving this dudes friend requests 
IANAL but I'm pretty sure they can't do that legally 
My favourite was when it put me in Ukraine right next to a donkey pulling a cart, further down the road I saw some kids playing with a dead cat. Good times, good times. 
And they did nothing to prevent it? They're really committed to the lie. 
do what the band i was in in high school did, just sing louder *puprle haze, all in my brain* *twang* ***LATELY THINGS THEY DON'T SEEM THE SAME*** 
Nope we don't even get the first chord, we get told the original key and thats it have to get the nine chord progression. 
I can imagine the dad who doesn't understand technology grounding his kid for "hacking" because they looked at that site. 
My internet is actually down right now using phone for wifi.(I live in STL) 
That's correct, on the Mercator projection it's the centre of the world so most unknown locations will just default to there. If you turn on a GPS and it can't figure out your location, often the map will say you're at that point. 
Studying in China, looking at all the Chinese softwares spamming ads on both classmates and school computers, I am pretty sure everyone is part of the botnet. 
I feel like God. I sneezed, and there was a solar system of new planets! 
It must be Thursday. I can never get the hang of Thursdays. 
I went into the page source, copied the relevant parts, and used some regex to clear out the unwanted HTML and add some formatting. So easier than typing manually while scrolling through, which is only slightly more tedious than scrolling all the way through just to read them all ;) 
There will be alot of question marks at WB, when they see the traffic of the last hours. 
Sure is awesome, and incredibly dangerous without laser goggles. 
That's awesome. I always wish Netflix had a feature like this. Make a channel by picking shows and it'll just autoplay random episodes 
"automagically". Whether intentional, or not, I like it! 
Jokes on him, he can't accept them. Also could you direct it to your spam/trash? 
Plopped down by a dude in a Batman suit fighting a dude in a Robin suit. 
The important parts of the Star Trek universe are the overabundance of cheap/free energy and the resulting break from a monetary society. People work because it gives them purpose, not because they have to in order to eat. 
GENERATORS 1 THROUGH FIVE ARE UNRESPONSIVE. 6 IS ABOUT TO OVERLOAD! 
the problem is that you have to work backwards. The notes we hear and how we process sound has a lot more to do with what our brain does with it than an objective accoustic fact. So finding chords is very tricky because you have to teach the computer to listen like we do instead of just giving a spectral analysis of say overtone content or something. Plus the fact that multiple things are going on makes it much more difficult. Speech recognition on the other hand is primarily dealing with one source, the speaker, and doesn't have to do as in depth of an analysis. Consonants are a lot more uniform and make it easier to identify based on as well. 
*cold sweats* Whew, don't miss that a bit. Good luck on your exam! 
I drive a 13 year old car and it doesn't really seem out of place in the middle of other cars and it has been absolutely bulletproof. Cars have come a long way in recent years. 
So true, when I was in highschool my parents took away my computer because I was installing programs in linux for that reason. Technology ignorance is a bitch when you have parents who NEED to always be in control. 
"The tide got on with things. Further down the beach the last surge poured into a hollow in the rocks, and the new sun beamed down on the soaking remains of a half-eaten egg and cress sandwich. Tidal action turned it over. Thousands of bacteria suddenly found themselves in the midst of a taste explosion, and started to breed like mad. If only there had been some mayonnaise, life might have turned out a whole lot different. More piquant, and perhaps with a little extra cream in it." 
But they'll also see the source of traffic and be like, "Again." 
Ehhhh it was high school, I don't think its possible to advocate for my common sense. I would've probably ignored it. But you are right. 
One would think but the people who are able to legally charge us for things aren't very good at making nice things. I pay for Hulu and still get ads shoved down my throat. 
In second grade the teacher asked my class to list as many musical instruments as we possibly could. Obviously people got piano and guitar quickly, but I eventually raised my hand and said viola. The teacher said "That's not an instrument, but it's a very pretty name!". Screw you, Mrs. Nelson. I'll never forget that shit. 
Thanks I have been trying for 5 years to finish the 4 aural studies (one a semester). Passed number 3 a month ago now just have to get through number four! 
If you can catch the tears amd leave them out in the sun maybe on a spoon you can make a sodium reduction for the saltiness 
Yeah, when I was in Highschool I got banned from the computers for 2 months for "hacking" because I saved WAV files from the internet to the hard drive and not a floppy disk - the ignorant teachers/staff didn't know that was possiable and stumbled on the files and thought I had to be a hacker. Wow- I just dated myself there. 
Completely serious. Honeypots are servers with known vulnerabilities so as to attempt attract hackers. The whole point of them is to keep the hackers attention and keep them from hitting the real deal and to mitigate DDoS attacks. Norse (the company that is hosting ipviking) hosts a ton of honeypots in St Louis, so that's why you are seeing the attacks hitting there the most. 
You should pay for Netflix instead. Or Amazon Prime. 
Maybe she thanked her brother in person and he went with it. 
Designer babies will mean we can skip the fighting so long as we don't mandate too many government controls like intrusive lifetime monitoring and testing and prohibit adding animal DNA to these children. Japan is sure gonna look funny when they can make all their daughters look like anime girls and all their sons look like they came out of JoJo's bizarre adventure. Does anyone know if two dick guy has a genetic thing or if there is a genetic sequence for functioning hermaphroditism? People think immigration and banking rules matter but oh boy give it twenty years and they will see issues they never expected. 
In 8th grade my english teacher told me that ergo is not a word. Later a friend of mine brought her a scrap of paper showing the page, line and definition of ergo. It was a good day. 
My friends thought I was hacking last night when I got tired of bowling and just changed my score to a 300. There is a giant "Correction" button that no one else seemed to notice. They all assumed since I am a computer science major that I "hacked the bowling system" 
Oh, I know what honeypots are. I just didn't know there was a large concentration of them in Saint Louis. According to that news article I linked to, NorseCorp's data might not be all that meaningful if its for demo purposes. 
Better yet. Save the installer download on a flash drive. You can run it again later to update the programs. I have one that does Chrome, Silverlight, Teamviewer, PDF, 7 zip, Java, etc.. When I am on site I just run the installer again to update the computers. 
I was told "humongous" is not a word by my English teacher, bless her heart. 
Which is why you should always set dimensions with percents if you want your site to look the same on every size screen. 
I'm from Texas, so I should be in favor of that phrase, but I prefer the Australian version: "the fucking cunt" 
My dad is a twin too. He unfortunately passed away and my uncle is still around. At first I was okay with it because they looked enough apart, my uncle usually looked a few years older than my dad, but then we gave my uncle a bunch of my dads clothes and he's been wearing them more and more. At times when he hugs me goodbye or something it's different. Like it's the same body type as my dad, but it's not the same feeling. Sometimes seeing him is hard, other times it's not so bad. It's been a little over 4 years since we lost my dad. 
I'm so sorry for your loss. My mother knew my partner and I were in financial difficulties so when my Grandpa passed away, she offered us the chance to live in his house rent-free as caretakers until she's ready to sell. Every morning when I leave the guest bedroom - we hadn't the heart to move into the master bedroom - I expect to see him in the hallway, or in his favourite chair. I miss him so much. 
Uh, couldn't you just pretend with her sister when she's away on business? Aren't twins cool with that? They're always sharing dudes in the documentaries I watch online. 
Avoiding the living twin seems like a very reasonable response. 
I'm a twin too (fraternal) and this is terrifying. I'm so sorry for your loss. 
I'm sorry for your loss. Once a twin, always a twin! 
Which twin was your great-great grandmother? The one who passed away or the second marriage? Did the first wife and your great-great grandfather have kids with both or just one? This is actually a really interesting situation. 
I think that marrying an identical twin gives you a great backup 
Does that mean that you're so attracted to him that he couldn't possibly look any more appealing than right now? 
Damn. Pain creates hope in terrible ways no one could ever realize. 
My grandfather was a twin and after he died suddenly his twin brother told my mom and grandmother he couldn't see them anymore because it hurt too much. This was over 25 years ago and my mom has seen her uncle twice. I was there one of the times and she started bawling as soon as she saw him and said it hurt seeing what her dad would like like if he was still alive. 
"Promise that you'll only love me, and you'll never go on and marry someone different" "I promise I'll never marry someone different"* 
As a twin, you don't really see your brother as 'hey, that's me!' -- especially since you always see the mirror image of yourself, which looks distinctly different. 
It got there pretty quickly too. Maybe AskReddit needs more questions like this. 
I'm sorry, I'm incapable of understanding, could someone dumb this down for me? I guess I couldn't keep up with the unexpected twists. This is what I'm getting and it doesn't really make sense: So... one twin took you to a dance, both twins dropped out, lost touch, both twins became successful, the one twin who took you to a dance died, you ended up marrying his brother because his death brought you guys closer, so why does your husband have a hole in his head? 
That reminds me of when my grandma died and her cousin came up to me at the funeral luncheon. She looked and acted just like me grandma, it was both sad and wonderful. My sister and I didn't want to see her leave, we just wanted to be around her and talk all afternoon. 
Of course we understand how hard it must be for her, but we do miss them a lot. She did recently get in touch with us to discuss selling our family lakehouse that my grandpa, dad, and uncles built in the 60s. We used to go up there for a few weeks each summer and rough it (no electricity or running water there) and some of my best childhood memories are there. It's an all-around sad situation. 
Also a twin. Never thought about one of us going before the other and the complications it leaves behind. Well, CRAP! 
As a fellow twin I couldn't imagine life without my best friend, the person who has literally been by my side my whole life, it hurts just thinking about it to be honest. 
My twin is the evil one. At least that's what we both claim as he's had the "evil Spock" goatee for years now. 
This makes me wonder if all identical twins have similarly sized dicks. 
He got away. I was too shocked to note down the license plate number and he sped away. Attempts were made to track that man down but nothing ever came of it. 
Thank you :) but I'm really not as strong as everyone is making me out to be. I've been through hell trying to fight urges to end it all. If anything I have my parents and friends to thank for being the support I needed to push through. 
So I'm like, "OhmygodYES, your sister never cups the balls!" 
I don't think most duels ends with with double death. Murder-sucide is the only way. 
At first it helped a lot. He was someone familiar and he cared. After the funeral it was hard because the reality of my husbands death hit and being around his twin became difficult. I think it was difficult for him as well. To see his little girls without a dad and they would be confused when they were around him and I think it just hurt him a lot so we have lost touch recently 
It will be four years in October. We have recently lost contact. It's been difficult for him as well as me. It's hard for him to be around the girls and see that they don't have a dad. It's hard for me to see him because I don't have my husband anymore and here is an exact copy right in front of me 
Same here. I love my twins SO. Couldn't imagine what my life would be like without either one. 
Thank you it means a lot. It has definitely been tough. Thank you for the kind thoughts. 
The positive side to it was that I realized that I'm the only one that can take care of our girls. So it got me into school and I now have my dream nursing job. I can provide for our babies and I am found something I've always wanted to do. Thank you 
Yeah, he's a very strong man. Something I definitely couldn't do. 
This is real, I didn't mean to tell it in such a sardonic fashion. They are still married and I have only met the second husband because most of this happened before I was sprung from anyone's loins. 
I'll even settle for a good made up answer as long as it doesn't end with tree fiddy. 
What makes this even weirder is that any kids those two couples have will genetically be full siblings. Since same DNA on both halves and such. 
It's a war injury-they fought together. I mention it because they were identical until my husband lost his ear. 
It's not the same, but my cousin passed away much too young. Now my big family is all growing up and having exciting things happen in our lives. Sometimes I feel like it kills my aunt and uncle to see us. 
My twin and I have basically decided if one goes the other does if there aren't kids in the picture. Are we're 31 it's likely there won't be. As grim as it sounds, well, other twins probably get it. 
Sexual urges? Sexual urges, right? That's what you were looking for? Sexual urges? 
I agree. I'm also a twin. Fraternal. But my brother and I are as thick as thieves. Our wives hate it, but we don't care. 
Thank you so much. And I'm sorry for your loss as well. About your mom: From my experience I knew that if my twin survived she would have been a reminder/carrier/survivor of her sister. I was actually worried & very conscious of this fact. I wanted to respect her individuality but I know she would have carried a lot of external and internal baggage. Does that make sense? Now I don't know how much this applies to you (as an adult vs. an infant loss) but here (IMO) is the crux of what you mentioned: through you your mom still has a piece of your twin. And that is a good thing. 
Thats really sad... Stay strong and also, do buy a gravestone. My family left my mother's grave without one for a really long time and when it was finally sorted out it really felt like a weight was lifted off. Again, really sorry for your for loss. 
I'm a twin. Me and my brother do not, his, I think, is somewhat bigger than mine. 
How is having role play sex going to help your fantasy football team? 
Fuck, so not only did the guy not suffer any legal repercussions, you don't even know who he was? I hope his actions haunt him every day for the rest of his life. How you hit a young girl and keep going is beyond me. 
A big part of what I love about my wife is the life we've shared together, and not just her personality. There are things we've shared together that have changed each of us immeasurably. We would not be the same people without those experiences. And there's the intimacy we've shared. We've grown into a way of interacting with each other that would not be the same with another person: the inside jokes, the way we greet each other, etc. Of course I would be attracted to my wife's identical twin, but she wouldn't be the same person as the one I'm in love with. 
My nephews are twins. One is married and has a three year old girl. The other twin is single. The daughter couldn't tell them apart and tells everybody her daddy has a motorcycle and a big polka dot dog. He doesn't, it's her uncle that has the motorcycle and Dalmatian. She'd get really confused when they were in the same room together. The single nephew did the sweetest thing, he grew full facial hair, and the father remains clean shaven. Now she has no problem. 
Thank you for opening up about this, I can't even imagine how difficult this must be. How does his spouse react to/handle this? Is she understanding? 
I'm incredibly sorry. There's a lot of horrible things I read and hear every day but your story just hit me in the gut. I am happy that you have found something you love to do and your children will benefit greatly from you finding your dream job. Not because it's well paying, but because you have found something that has made you happy and stronger. I wish you all the best xo 
You seems really upbeat. I bet you literally SPRUNG from those loins, didn't you?! 
"What was my real dad like?" "well, son. He was like me except shittier." 
I bet that twin lives in constant fucking fear of having the same fate. In her place I would go cra-a-azy, live life by the second and never look back. Or do some exams if medicine can diagnose that stuff. THEN I'd decide about going cra-a-azy or not. 
Nah, definitely need some levity after that one answer. 
I don't get the point of this theory. Why would they do that? Especially when you have a child and name them after...yourself instead of your dead twin? I know it's not your theory, but it really just doesn't make any sense to me. 
My cousin passed away when he was 17. My aunt and uncle rarely come around to family gatherings any more. I think it is tough for them to see all the kids growing older and having fun. I hope no one ever has to bury their kids. The look on their faces that day were absolutely terrible. 
"a The Twilight Zone"... I know you're not wrong, but that hurts my eyes to look at. 
Don't know if I'd 'go' as you so eloquently put it, though I'm sure I'd consider it. But I definitely can't imagine my life without my twin brother. He's thinking about moving countries. As much as I want him to go because I think its the right move for him (he seems confined and bored, not progressing, needs a change). I really don't want him to go because I'd miss him too much. And that's just overseas. 
It's possible, yes. But I think it's more that they can't handle it themselves. I grew up and got myself a social work degree, so I'm much better at understanding emotions and psychology. For me, it was important to process even though it hurt unbearably because I had to do it alone. For them, they avoid dealing with it. If I bring it up, the answers are curt and the subject is changed rapidly. 
I believe in karma. So I like to believe he died in a fiery car crash. It's the only thing that keeps me from losing my sanity over the magnitude of injustice. 
I feel like reddit is either extremely funny or disturbingly depressing. Your post is the nicest thing I've read on reddit. I'm not sure my own husband could articulate the definition of intimacy as you've phrased it. It's very inspiring. 
and then do the same to her sister... Just in case. 
The tricycle is too much responsibility for one man to fathom. I can only imagine how tough it would be to lose your spouse and have their twin alive. I bet I would probably start to have feelings for the twin just out of desperation of missing my wife. Plus they look the same so I'm probably at least somewhat attracted to the sister. 
I don't have kids but my twin has a son. When he was little he'd run up to me calling me mommy. I didn't mind. He's now 12 and calls me mommy 2.0. Being a twin rocks. Except the whole if one dies part. We've agreed to go at the same time. Fingers crossed. 
I try. I try at least twice a month to call and see if they want to get together but no answer anymore. :( 
She is understanding but she also pushes him to see us and I think that frustrates him a lot so the easiest thing for him to do is just stay away. 
She's mean to Taylor Swift and that's enough for me 
I know three sets of fraternal twins; two brothers, two sisters, and a brother-sister pair. Upvote for the Siamese twins comment though, even though it's no longer a PC term. 
The way he conjugates ("was sprung") implies that someone rescued him from someone's loins. (think "springing from gaol") 
Her twin was tested at Hopkins, her heart is completely fine. 
I wasn't there when my parents found out but my dad called me and to hear the sentence "you're brother killed himself today, and he used the gun I gave him this morning to do it" with a trembling in his voice I'd never heard before still sends chills down my spine. Before any weird questions, brother parents weren't on the best of terms, brothers stuff (he was in his 30s) was at parents house and he wanted his gun to "go hunting". 
Probably should have gone with "an episode of the twilight zone" 
That's always been an option. I'm currently out of work though so totally not a good time. 
Thank you for sharing your story, I am deeply sorry for your loss. 
Twin suicide pact. After spending only a few minutes in this thread I can definitely understand. 
No shame. I'd have said the same if I had a twin brother with kids. 
Yeah, that really got me. Ouch. I hope she can find peace someday. :( 
I think the world would probably be a better place if the average american male hugged their kids more often. 
You knew what you were going into. I'm going to start carrying napkins on the go. 
When my mom passed away, my grandmother quit speaking to my sister and me as much. I always thought she'd want more of a connection with us after my mom died. Then, my therapist pointed out it may be very hard for my grandmother to be around us because we look like our mom and just remind her about her death too much. 
I harbor an irrational dislike of Taylor Swift. Maybe it's the way she smiles, but she always looks smug as fuck to me and it irritates me. 
New testiment vs. Old testiment. I'm not religious (used to be) but that's why the bible contridicts itself alot. Has to do with rewriting of "laws" and rules. So the point was to take what was in the new testiment as the new law or the new word of god. Adding to clear up some confusion: Jesus did a lot of teaching about how some of what was being taught of the religion was false (things added to benefit man or extremism) and how the hierarchy had become corrupted (e.g. the pharisees) and he went to change that, that's how god's teachings were "changed". (And yes I believe the bible was influenced by man's desire when i was religious as well, don't argue that with me either.) Stop inboxing me about the evils of religion. I don't give a fuck. I don't practice nor believe it. Tell it to someone who cares. 
This pretty much summarizes that question that most people ask, "What would happen if someone like me dies?" and there are answers, sadly. :( 
My cousin's funeral is the first and only time i've ever seen my grandfather cry. Or take off his hat for that matter. 
I, uh... Have to ask... Is there a Brilliantchick2 or 3? 
I don't think there really is. My little sister is only a year and a half younger than me so I can't remember a day without her. We're both incredibly close, and we can communicate with each other from across the room without actually talking. I'd give up everything I have for my sister if she needed it. If she died, I'd feel exactly the same as they've been describing they'd feel if their twin died. 
Well if you don't win the argument at least you stole their pants. 
My 2 year old son should of been a twin. His sister died in the womb and we had to rush his mother in for an emergency c-section. He was 2 month premature because of it. I wonder if he's going to feel like half a person down the road. I hope not. He seems like a fine, normal 2 year old now. 
The funeral would be the worst. Your spouse is laying in a casket while his/her twin is walking around alive and healthy. I can't even imagine. 
It's not uncommon for couples to divorce after the loss of an only child because their spouse is a constant reminder of their child. 
No worries I understand a bit what he's going through. I just hope he can be a part of our girls lives at some point and be ok with it. :) 
Yes that's definitely tough. I'm so used to relying on just me. So it's tough to key someone else be there just to help with something small. 
I hated her manufactured down to earth, pure, innocent, christian image. I think it was the tie in with the country demographic. The pinnacle of my life is being in love with a boy. And then crying about him in the rain. I'm way better than other girls. The rebranding of herself as a wacky woman in her 20s made me like her more. 
Ohhhh! So Wiz Khalifa and Taylor swift are in the same gang, thus Taylor Gang 
It's just that people today don't have a firm understanding of the theology of the Bible as a whole. The majority of laws in Deuteronomy and Leviticus aren't meant to be defended by Christians. The majority of these laws were meant for the Jews of the time to follow in order to stay a pure nation. Most of the laws have to do with cleanliness and social situations (Civil and Ceremonial Laws). Christ and the New Testament sees this world get flipped around. The Moral Laws like the Ten Commandments certainly still stand, but ceremonial and civil laws no longer do. God gives Christ for the World so that whosoever believes can have everlasting with Him. Now, its not the ceremonies and the rituals that make a person clean and pleasing to God, but its the work of Christ that is attributed to the believers that make them clean. 
yeah but when was the last time you communicated telepathically? 
Exactly. All these twins in here saying "as a twin, you can't imagine the blah blah blah." Holy shit, as a twin, the pain that I'd feel losing my twin brother would be no more real than you losing your sister. My brother is my best friend, but I'm not going to claim that me losing him would be harder to deal with than anyone else losing a sibling that they are extremely close with. That shit is terrible and I'd wish that nobody would have to experience it. 
Everyone would be staring at his twin at the funeral home. Fuck 
I agree. I lost a brother from an unexpected heart complication and my parents were never the same. They ended up divorcing 5 years later. Not only with my brother but with my moms sister passing(2 years later)who was like a grandmother bc I never had the chance to meet my true grandparents. I think anytime you lose any immediate family member the structure of the family changes and our family just didn't know how to recover. I know I'm just an Internet stranger but I hope you find the peace you are looking for. It took me almost 10 years to find mine. 
I'd say it's probably him seeing the recognition from them in him and all that it entails. That'd be heartbreaking each time. When you come over to see what your father would've looked like had he been alive, what it would be like to see your husband again, and so on. God damn, it's just awful to think about it. 
My father was abusive to my mother, me, and my sister as well. So, my mom's sister hates me because I look like him. She basically takes all her aggression toward him out on me, lies about me to my family, and says I was in cahoots with him to screw my mom over in their divorce. None of this is true, and I don't even speak to my dad anymore since my mom died. I lost so many family members when she passed away. It's hard to cope with it sometimes. 
For me, it's all of the stuff you just mentioned, topped off with the fact that she takes herself so seriously. I remember when Tina Fey and Amy Poehler performed a little stand-up at some award show and had some good-natured teasing aimed at her and she got pretty pissed about it. It's like...get over yourself. 
"Gaol" is actually older than "jail". "Gaol" is the etymology-respecting spelling, "jail" is what appeared when someone realised that English has spelling conventions that more obviously give the correct pronunciation. 
Just remember, she is human. I don't know about you, but I've overreacted before when I've felt attacked. Her dating life (the subject of the joke) is something Taylor Swift is often getting flak over. She probably felt humiliated. 
"Dear Sir stroke Madam. Fire, exclamation mark. Fire, exclamation mark. Help me, exclamation mark. 123 Amazon Cloud. Looking forward to hearing from you. All the best, Reddit Admin." 
I thought it was my phone app, i ended up deleting it and re-uploading it and i also restarted my phone like 6 times. I was going semi-insane. 
And then they give us this thread and an endless supply of crayons. Welcome to shit post central. 
This would be a lot funnier if I wasn't depressed by the fact that this is basically his campaign style. 
I've haven't thanked me skeltal in hours. Doot doot. 
Reddit was just trying to help out all the college students by making sure they got in some good study time. 
I'll just put this over here with the rest of the fire 
Been fine on mobile. Didn't know there was an issue. 
W E W L A D E W L A D 
I really love the idea of reddit's community (I imagine you all as marginally overweight 20-to-30somethings btw) sitting around on a floor with boxes of crayolas and scratch paper. Tongues sticking out a bit because of how much concentration and effort is going into it. 
Pretty much how I use reddit anyways. I leave...then 30 seconds later I come back. 
Yep, I bet one of those furry buggers pulled out a cord 
I'm passing on your report to the managers. They will determine the cause of error and eliminate the problem. Thank you for your concern. 
If you can't win them with intellect, win them with bullshit 
Look I'm really rich. I know how to run a business. I know this Reddit would be well off with me. Here's what I'll do, first, we have to cut reddit gold spending. It's totally out of control. Then we got to decrease reposts on reddit. It's become impossible to tell the difference between what is original and reposts. We got posters shipping hundreds of original content overseas to 4chan. That's gotta end. 
For real though, there is nothing we can do to take 4 strokes off Snoo's golf game. 
I love the way the smoke seems to be coming off the top of it. 
Yep. No blue links left? Guess I'll watch TV. *2 minutes later* Fuck this, what's on Reddit today? 
I thought you said "furry burgers" and I was about to have a serious conversation with you... 
I was born with a degree in Denmarking, i can confirm that it's a very useful skill here. 
...honestly I could see this account actually being something Trump would do. 
America will become gold plated in the finest bullshit money can buy. 
Damnit I read all of your posts in his voice without thinking about it. 
My favorite thing about it is I've never been to that sub, but I am aware of it, and it makes me laugh every time. 
Have you tried turning your house off and on again? 
Check the users online stats on the sidebar - apparently there's only 3 people on Ask Reddit. Things are still fucky, it's just not _completely_ broken. 
I personally dont think the extra panels add that much. Best left at just two panels. 
TV is so behind the times. Literally 5 seconds was ages ago. 
It isn't already? Just look at the money reality TV makes. I think we're there. 
I disagree, but I'm on mobile, so I can't just upvote another person with the same opinion--their opinion is not visible to me. I think the extra panels add a sense of serious discontentment. I think that the melting of the dog adds something that would not exist otherwise. Thank you for your time. 
There's a place I've heard tale of...it's only found outside the bedroom, but the legends say there is a throne made of porcelain that will take away your poop for you! No more pooping in the corner! Best of all? There's said to be wifi there, so you can maintain contact with reddit 100% of the time you are adventuring. 
Unless someone invents adblock for cable then I'm fine with not watching Tv for the rest of my life 
On the plus side it I do technically read much more than I used to. On the other hand I doubt it has helped me become more educated. Like the empty calories of reading, sugar reading or high fructose corn reading. 
So Antonio Brown is the best right??? (Serious) Also I broke a rule like twice if I was banned for real banned you wouldn't be able to talk to me right? Also thank you so much man 
What about the universe where the Reddit admins became leaders of the UN Morty? The answer is don't think about it! 
shit man, that's a three hour flight from an airport that's three hours away from me can you just give her my snapchat 
You are a foolish dreamer Horforia. All that lies outside these walls is death and torment. Our people have pooped in the corner for generations. Why can't you be like your older brother Grok? Grok brought us two reddit golds last week. All you did was complain about our ways on Tumblr. If mother was still with us she'd be very disappointed in you. 
He lost me when he said that the professional who came in did the same shit he did. That, and the fact that every single day had one neat little anecdote. It's still great stuff though, even if it isn't real. 
"Here we see the wild unicode in its natural habitat. Observe its tendency to lash out at movement, that is because its eye sight is actually based on motion, like Terabytesaurus Rex." -A TV Zoologist 
She says if you screenshot her pics she's going to block you forever. 
One day I'll find this throne..then you'll all see. Grok can sit in his poo corner, while i rest on my throne in comfort! 
Yeah it's like everyone in that story is just pretending to work instead of doing actual work. 
1. Execute Order 66. 2. Ice cream sandwiches are a human right. 3. Resign. 
Like 90% of the people you would encounter in a real office! 
Have you tried virtually poking them, it's how you show you care. 
This year..... One man..... One site..... A couple of chips... Don't forget Mountain Dew... Starring Seth Rogen... As infamous hacker 4chanz... "The gods have forsaken us" - Batman Reddit. Is. Down. "Save the people" - Superman Coming soon 2016 (GONE SEXUAL) 
Yes. That is exactly what you should do. I will then direct your question to the best place. 
Exactly! So is the story fictional? I don't know.. 
The O represents the cave where you mine the gold ore. Also if you color it yellow and put a star on it, it looks just like the reddit gold symbol. These are all valid reasons. By the way if your hand is itching you need an itchfork, not a pitchfork. 
Oh my god this entire thread is about clubbing actual seals not well thought out metaphors to the clubbing experience I'm so stupid. 
Are you talking about night-clubbing or seal-clubbing? 
At first I thought this was an actual answer for OP but now I'm not quite sure 
I think your first mix-up was expecting people on reddit to go clubbing or be social. Hahaha 
Some of these would be really disturbing if it was the first response you saw 
I almost thought there was one legit answer in this thread for a second 
When are the best instances to use power vs precision? 
Took me a minute to realize that all the top comments weren't about dancing 
I read the whole thing hoping... praying. Was not disappointed. 
I thought I'd found a reply about nightclubs for a second and choked on my drink. 
How these "seal protectors" got into *The Seal Clubbing Club* is the real question. 
I'm visualizing a heel click in that sequence and it makes me giggle. Also in my head, the person misses the target in a sort of comedy fail. 
If you are offering the seal up as a trophy for a loved one, 'Signed Sealed Delivered, I'm Yours' is an appropriate song. 
Ah, a fellow veteran. Personally, I like to hit on the moms when I go clubbing. It's more my speed. 
Took it in a different direction. Nice. Not particularly well done, but you get points for originality. 
This advice doesn't really apply if you're rich, though, because then you can afford a giant net that will prevent the seal from escaping 
Fucking shit. I can't believe you got me after all these goddamned posts.. 
I'm with you. I prefer a bad ass heavy metal bar to some gay club. 
I thought you said "of each line" as I was skimming through and was like "what does KAPASSTYO have to do with melee?" 
Do you actually have to have licenses? Asking for a friend 
PRAISE THE LORD -- IT DOES HAVE A LEGITIMATE USE AFTER ALL 
A note on the aftershave bit, always remember: aftershave/cologne is meant to be a whisper for someone getting close/intimate with you, not a shout to the whole room. People who douse themselves in cologne or empty a whole can of axe or old spice bodyspray are likely not going to be getting any that night. A tip for proper application: most respectable colognes will have a bottle with a screw top or stopper top -- turn the bottle upside down quickly, and then remove the top and dab it lightly once on each wrist, then rub them together, then rub them behind your ears/on your neck. Before you go out, ask a friend standing at arm's length if they can smell it on you. If they can, you've used too much. 
This is great advice and the fact that you're being downvoted ticks me off. People do drugs. Everyone needs to accept that. The best thing that can be done about it is to make sure everyone's doing it safely. A friend of mine bought some for a night out and wasn't told it was cut with meth. Cue a night of high & drunken paranoia. 
Use a lighter club. It's the speed that kills, not the weight. 
Unless it's Club Penguin, which we can visit from the comfort of our desks 
Mabey the default should be [serious] and we should have a [fuckwithme] tag for the rest. 
There's probably more than a million people browsing Reddit right now. Pretty sure some of them may like to go clubbing. 
So just let them lie there and club on until you find one that won't break. 
Power for the larger seals that need more strength to get through the fat. Precision for the smaller ones so that you can crack their skull. 
Holden Caulfield is a little whiny bitch, too. I'd club him if I could. 
Night clubbing is the best clubbing.. We are still talking about seals right? 
Used to be in a guild in WoW, "Seal Cub Clubbing Club." I think this joke originated somewhere else around that time though. 
Idea: 8/10 Execution: 5/10 Total: 13/10 ...wait 
I'm just imagining a polar bear sneaking up on a seal clubber, and then when the clubber isn't looking, the polar bear frantically defibrillates the seal. 
Absolutely not. That's cruel and inefficient. Only use a quality hakapick. Use the hammer to crush the skull and the pick to drag the carcass. 
By normal clubbing, do you mean like whipping your sister's boyfriend in the head with a tube sock full of D batteries so hard that it cracks his motorcycle helmet in half because you were all paranoid on coke and thought he was trying to steal your car? 
I don't know how to tell you this, but I think what you've experienced was a gay bar. 
you're welcome. I thought about throwing a joke in there but it's been done to death so I left it out. 
He's being downvoted because the consensus is that this is about clubbing seals, and we don't need druggies out on the floes. 
Isn't it the momentum? You can't club with an inflatable bat no matter how fast you swing it. 
About five bank accounts, three ounces, and two vehicles. 
I wrote that guide when I was living in Toronto and their last call was 2 am :P Now I live in New Orleans which doesnt even have last call so Id probably edit it to say stay in the bar till they kick you out or the sun rises, whichever comes first :D 
Right? How else would I get drunk and use the social lubricant to assist me in participating in relations 
I disagree. I always use the same swing: as hard and as accurate as I can. People don't respect clubbers because they think it is easy to just kill a poor squishy soft baby seal. Well they are pretty resilient creatures and you can't just half ass a blow if you want top dollar for your pelts. 
That's how adding fractions work. I think your math checks out. 
This is true and its the most efficient way to do it. If you feel finicky you could carry a tarp with you so that you can wrap it up for easier transport. 
No, no, man. Everybody had badass leather outfits on. 
To be fair, all of these could be serious answers for the question OP wrote. 
This stigma really needs to end. Recreational drug users are people too, and if anything, dropping some mild downers will only help keep your clubbing arm steady. 
Never thought an xzibit reference would ever be handy. Got em 
Wait. This thread isn't about seal clubbing? Well shit, I'm out. 
The variations on the wording of this joke make it perfect for Reddit. 
Pizza Pizza, then. For a slice of pizza that's only delicious when super drunk. 
There's a slightly altered version for a particularly heavy night or a student night out. 1. cash in pocket, with ID 2. Replace inexpensive lager, with inexpensive spirits, get-wasted. 3. practice looking sober when you go out so you can get in to the club 4. Lose cash and id immediately after you get into the club 5. neck a munter and go back to hers 6. do a runner after trying and failing to shag her in her flat 7. buy a kebab and go home 8. wake up at noon the next day, covered in the kebab you fell asleep trying to eat in bed 9. eat cold remnants of kebab for breakfast 
We if you think about it. The theory behind that statement is not wrong and can be applied to both types of clubbing. Seals and foxes. 
My advice is for intermediate clubbers. As you get more skilled, precision and strength go up so it becomes better to go with a 2 handed hit or if you wanna get fancy, dual wield clubs. 
If you don't remove it right way the skin turns blueish due to the rapid blood loss 
If you plan on selling the meat skinning them alive will actually lead to tastier meat, i learned from the best. 
I bet there were a lot of manly types there too right? Like construction workers and bikers. 
You can tell by the fact people are downvoting the proper replies that they aren't. 
These jokes are well-received by Reddit, due to the subtle changes made. 
Visited Toronto from Boston. God damn amazing city, amazing people, and SPECTACULAR food...except for Pizza Pizza. Seriously how does anyone there actually eat that when there the best dumpling place I've ever been to in Chinatown that is practically unlimited for $10 
You mean steal a kebab, you lost your money in the club 
He sure would get a big bang out of this thread wouldn't he? With all the goddamn jokes and all. 
What nonsense. I meant Seals I Like To Club Senseless. 
Now we know what being oppressed feels like. See you on tumblr 
Seriously? I ask because when I was taught to hunt deer, the idea was that you want to kill the animal as quick as possible, if you injure it, it releases adrenaline as it freaks out and that will make the meat tough. For cows and other commercial meats they often do knock it out then slit the throat to drain the blood more efficiently, so maybe if you club the seal but don't kill it, then skin it, that works. 
This is the 2nd R&M reference I've seen in the past few hours on here. I'm okay with this. 
Yeah man, one dude just straight up sucked my cock! It was so hardcore! 
You probably should adjust this. Yoh can't travel AT c while you have mass. Also, since you can keep putting in kinetic energy but v had a limit, eventually at very near c the mass of the bat would increase to compensate. 
What if this happened... in space!? (Seal will die from lack of atmosphere) 
Is this to The Difference Between Us? Because I keep singing to that tune. 
Redditors love to put their own spin on the same joke, so it works out well. 
Everyone knows you keep your kebab money in your sock. 
You're such a god damned prince Luke boy, you know that? A god damned prince. 
I think these are equally deplorable demographics. 
Depends on both species and perspective. Skinning women alive, for example, always tenderises their meat, and does the opposite to mine. 
No, you can travel at c with mass, you just can't *accelerate to* c. And i didn't bother with increasing the mass due to relativistic effects because the answer 'an infinite amount of energy is released' isn't nearly as fun. 
The jocular tone and variety in word choice make this well-suited for Reddit. 
Reddit likes this, because it's slightly different wording of the same joke. 
The joke won't need to change, if the phrase does, reddit will like it. 
Learned from Reddit to ask what they liked about working for the company. When I finally got to use it the guy chuckled, then sighed, and said "Uh, that's a good question." I didn't get offered the job in the end but I wouldn't have taken it based on his response. 
I work in HR and I one thing that my more strict colleagues say is that a person should understand the culture before they walk in to the interview. They see it as part of your research. I think that's bullshit, but just be careful with that question. 
I always ask this, and it is always answered with: "well there *is* no typical day at **this** company!" 
I like to ask it this way: "If I were to start working here, what do you think the biggest challenge for me would be?" Tells you something about the work environment as well as what they perceive your weakness to be. 
Trap. You lure the snail into a horseshoe shape of salt, then close it off. You place a metal plate down inside the salt-ring, and slowly pour more salt to force the snail onto the plate, where you then cover him with the jar. You flip the plate/jar and put a lid on it, locking the snail in the sealed jar. You pack your sealed jar in more salt, then cast the whole thing into a block of concrete and bury it somewhere remote in a place with legal protection against construction (like a national park - preferably one on an island). Bribe someone nearby to tell you if the snail grave is ever disturbed. 
MSP = Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport? 
I'd argue the only way you'll really tell if you *really* fit in a work environment is by joining it. If all you want know is whether it's exceptionally bad or not I guess this question would be occasionally useful. Otherwise you're asking someone who's personality you don't know whether your personality which they don't know will mesh with other peoples personalities whom you don't know. Realistically, you'll probably just get a broad general answer that doesn't mean anything and can't lead you to any useful conclusion. I understand the logic though and it probably doesn't look bad to ask that, I just feel as though it's better to direct any questions you have to information gained in the interview as I feel it portrays serious interest in the job. But I'm young. Haven't had to apply to that many semi-professional jobs. Could be totally wrong about that entire wall of text. 
For the love of god no. I'm the hiring manager doing the final interviews and I had a guy that had no questions for me or two of my engineers who talked to him. Like nothing. When we reviewed after we where all shocked that someone with that resume would walk in an not have one question about what we do or what the position was. Go onto the company website pull the last press release and ask about it. Anything for the love of god. 
This may be a bit of a sour topic they might not want to discuss. 
The first time I read this I thought it said "Ask for the job." and I was suitably impressed. "Would you like to ask any questions?" "Yeah, can I have this job or what?" 
If an interviewee started asking how profitable my privately owned business was i might get a bit uneasy about hiring the person. 
This is funny because the guy above you is a job interviewer and made pretty clear that if you ask such a retarded question you wont get the job 
After a whole set of interviews at one company, I got to ask the last interviewer some questions. He had been very open and personable up to that point, so so asked, "How's the work/life balance at the company?" He said, "Well, they expect a lot of hours. And some weekends. Most weekends, actually. Come to think of it, I had one free weekend this year." The interview was in late December. Also thought it was interesting that he referred to the company as "them" instead of "we". We ended up talking for a while and he eventually advised me not to take the job if they offered it to me. 
Then you start asking them how they would approach a hypothetical problem like the one they just described, and suddenly - *BAM* - you're the one interviewing *them* for the job. 
I start every single interview with "before I walk through my experience can you please describe what your ideal candidate is and what success looks like in this role". I then spend the rest of the interview relating all of my experience specifically to what they say. The only interview I have not received an offer at was when I interviewed at Google. I believe my successful interviewing is solely because of this approach. Side note: interview for fun and do it regularly. Every few months or so I'll interview if a recruiter messages me on LinkedIn. When you have zero intentions of taking a job it's a great opportunity to practice and then when it comes to crunch time for the job you really want you will be 1000% more confident. It also allows you to get a feel of what the market will pay for your experience and you can leverage that to negotiate when you get an offer. 
"5 years in almost a lifetime in tech fields, 5 years ago I had 2 fewer degrees and didn't even know this field existed. However, I do know that I enjoy working for companies with a good work culture and competitive pay. If both those conditions exist here it's not hard to imagine myself doing great things here for more than 5 years". 
I suppose you don't have to answer in concrete terms, but could rather say you want to be in a position where you enjoy your work and are able to contribute something measurable to your company, or perhaps be in a position to lead or mentor your coworkers or something like that. 
There's the culture the companies show as part of their market identity, then there's the work culture. The former is easy to research, the latter is not. That's how I would clarify that question if there seemed a issue 
I was once getting interviewed for a position by someone in the same position. I then asked, "all right, then what did you do yesterday?" 
Sometimes it can also backfire depending on the job. Some interviewers will view this as that you have not done enough research on the position and don't really know what the job is about. ...or maybe that is my interview prep for MBA summer internship positions taking over 
How do you get them to contact you or to keep in touch? 
For me, it shows that you value yourself. It shows me that you want the job, you don't just need it. I will hire someone like you over most simply because you have self confidence and aren't desperate. Or at least you don't show desperation. 
yeah this is good. i had this really bitchy hiring manager once blurt out her concerns about me when I was asking questions about corporate responsibility. it was sooooo awkward. needless to say, i told their HR I was no longer interested in the position. she sounded like a psychopath. granted, i hadn't asked the question, but her fears were really like "where the hell is this coming from?" definitely this is a question not to impress the hiring manager but to help you make a solid decision of "do I even want to work here?" 
It can be a good thing to throw them off a little bit. In my experience, the interviewer is surprised to hear this and it requires them to switch off the "script" mode and approach the question at hand: are you a good fit for this role? 
Brutal as it may have been, it was honest and hopefully she used that experience to prepare better for her next interview. 
I have always asked this and have had good results, but I'm also a confident candidate who interviews well and can usually overcome whatever reservation they have. I was interviewing with a panel once (recruiting manager, department manager, and branch manager) and asked this question. The recruiting manager, of course said "no" because it's her job to identify the right candidate and the branch manager deferred to the department manager. At that point she said that originally she was concerned I hadn't researched the company enough because I flubbed an answer, but that later on I recalled information from their website that showed I had in fact done my research. Obviously not all group interviews go this way, but I've been lucky. 
The ability to address the concern is the real key here. For example, if a interviewer said: "I'm not sure you have that 'sales' mentality that we are looking for", the ideal candidate turns around and sells him/herself... "Not only do I have success in sales at [enter example here], but I genuinely thrive in a competitive sales environment which offers both a challenge and satisfaction once the sale is made..." blah, blah, blah. Not the best Q&A example, but you understand the point. If a candidate asks this question and gets an answer from the interviewer, they have to be able to counter and turn that reservation around. 
Well in this case, you are probably better off. The interviewer was lacking in his ability to answer you candidly to your face. Not the type of manager that I would like to work for. 
In my experience, a lot of hiring managers / interviewers are ill-experienced and usually use a list of questions they pulled from Google or their HR manual which are pretty standard. They aren't always asking questions based on information they've already received which is why interviews feel SO scripted. Also, sometimes the question trips them up... They don't know how to respond and that leaves an impression. Source: I'm a recruiter and interview coach. I coach both my clients and candidates on interview skills. 
Keep in mind, the snail is super intelligent so he's gonna make more money than you and counter-bribe that person into carrying him closer to you. 
The money in general is completely irrelevant to this entire exercise. Mere immortality is enough to make the stakes big enough for the conundrum 
It speaks volumes about the fact that OP neglected to put a [serious] tag on his post 
Yeah except thats an STD, youre not immortal, and you get no money. 
And in every one of those interviews were you eventually offered the job? It's important to know to see if this question is effective or not. 
I've had consistently very good feedback with a variation of this question (I ask, "at this time do you have any concerns about me that I might be able to address?") And if they don't, they just say no. I like it for 3 reasons: (1) helps the applicant get a good feel for where they stand, (2) gives them the opportunity to clear up any misunderstandings that could cost them the job, and (3) gives the applicant and idea of whether or not the culture at the company is open and honest. I love it when interviewers are able to honestly discuss a concern they have. I think your supervisor is probably an exception if that question prompted him to be more thorough than he would have otherwise been. Personally I don't think I would want to work for someone that would be rubbed the wrong way by my effort to have a candid discussion about something important. 
My go-to is similar, but a little more aggressive because I'm in sales and want them to see I know how to close and handle any objections they may have... "Based on our time here today, and what you know of me from my resume, is there anything you could see that would prevent me from moving on in the hiring process?" 
I don't really like being asked "What does the position entail?" It's not a real STAND OUT question. I feel like the position "Network Engineer" should be semi-obvious. Now if they word it like "How would a typical day go for a network engineer?" then that's awesome. So... I guess I came here to argue your comment but ended up agreeing with it depending on wording. 
But every other vowel is replaced with the entire bee movie 
Shit happens man. I'm not saying don't prepare, just saying that preparation can be foiled by a long winded interviewer, and if you can't think of impromptu backup questions you end up coming off unprepared or uninterested 
I asked this question when interviewing for my current job. I was coming from a job with a very high turnover rate and wanted to know if this job had people leaving for negative reasons. They were honest and told me one girl was starting her own business and the other was leaving for personal (family) reasons. They offered me the job via phone two hours later, so I don't think it was a bad question, but you definitely have to go about it in the right way. 
Why? It's a valid question. Back in 2007, I interviewed and was hired on by a small private company. Had I known how bad their balance sheet and their financials were and the road they were traveling down, I would never have accepted the position. 
That's the kind of detail I would have missed. He seems very friendly especially when advising you not to work there... 
That's a shitty power play. Sounds like she did want you, but wanted you to feel in debt to her. That pressure point would have been trotted out every time she needed to impose on you or lay some blame somewhere. That kind of manipulative manager never has a highly productive team because they suck to work for, the staff tends to defend their interests rather than daring to innovate, and turnover is higher. Good thing you ditched that. 
I was actually in a similar situation, but the guy was way more up front. I'm paraphrasing, but he pretty much said "I got a job offer that gave me a lot more money. Even though I love this job, I just couldn't refuse the other offer." I appreciated the honesty at the time. Unfortunately, the job sucked. 
Yup, I got offered a job and they didn't really seem interested in showing me the location. I insisted before I accepted and it was an open floor plan. I 'noped' right the fuck out of there. That said, where I work, we always give a tour of the facility if we bring them onsite to interview (which we do as the last step of the process). 
That...honestly sounds flattering. I may be too money orientated and many could probably say the same but to flat out admit that you'd work for X despite offers elsewhere being drastically better? That speaks volumes. That said, salary **is** pretty damn important so yano... 
If you have a decent degree you are interviewing the company just as much as they are interviewing you. Can't just accept the first offer you see. 
In response to what he liked about med school, he said "nothing"? Haha. Intimidating. Or really sad... 
I feel like having been headhunted already kind of changes your odds as well, I mean you're already who they want.. 
One time I answered "I won't be here in 5 years". I ended up with the job though, mainly because they were in desperate need of hiring 
I had a similar experience. The interview board asked me what are my negatives? How to reply to this question, seriously humans all of them have their own negatives. Nobody is perfect. Then why such silly question I wonder? I answered something like "I am not much a talkative person". Anyways, didn't get the job. 
It's ok, I'm 31 and still not sure what I want to be when I grow up. 
I would agree. It's IMPOSSIBLE to identify the culture of whatever 0-10 person group you're likely to be working with via the internet. The best you can hope for is to find a corporate mission statement (95% bullshit) or some examples from news articles (extremely unlikely if you're not google, apple, or IBM). 
HR keep records of all these people they interviewed and "just almost" got the offer. It's their job to hire good people quickly when a position become vacant, and the talent pool that was almost a fit for one role in a company might be great at this new vacant one. Easy and quick hire. 
And don't forget to ASK for this if you do NOT get the job. I phrase it as "Thank you for the opportunity. Could you provide me with any feedback from my interview? I'm always trying to improve myself." Maybe 80% of the time they've given me honest criticism. The only ones that didn't stated a policy forbidding it. Once I was actually called back for a different opening by the same org and I nailed the second chance. 
It's HR-imposed bullshit because sometimes a candidate will freak out when you give them the feedback that they asked for. Source: had a candidate freak out. 
BUT, is it super intelligent by human standards or snail standards? A super intelligent snail could be as smart as Stephen Hawking, or more like an average goldfish. And goldfish are terrible at bribery. 
Immortal doesn't mean it can't be killed, just that it won't die of old age. 
That's definitely what I meant. Ask specific questions about the job. "What are the biggest challenges I would face in this role?" is a better version of "What does this position entail?" 
But every time they say bee the entire nutshack theme plays 
"The third one was the best. You know, the one where the big space weapon explodes!" 
Turns out the company is great. *He* is the problem and *they* were trying to hire his replacement. 
In a previous retail job, I was a regular employee, but during the hiring periods, I also handled resume reviews and first interviews. After I had finished weeding out the "I'm available everyday anytime except weekdays for school, weeknights for homework, Sundays for church and Saturdays for some me time" types, I would schedule final interviews with the store manager. Basically, sometimes the interviewer is an average employee. 
When I was quite young...maybe 20 or so, I went to a job interview that I drove a good 2 hours to get to. I was willing to move if I got the job. I got in there, and the first thing the very unpleasant white lady said was, "I don't know why HR sent you down here. You're too young, you're not qualified enough, and I'm not going to hire you. So let's get this interview over with." I was just kind of stunned...I told her that wasn't quite what I expected to hear after getting suited up and driving 2 hours and waiting another hour (she was late) for a job interview. She got boiling mad--red in the face mad--started slamming binders down back and forth on her desk, and told me I was an "ungrateful little prick" who should "watch his tone in an interview," I mean, just steaming. Part of me always wondered if it was a racial thing, but I really don't think it was. I think she was just an awful, high-stress monster who lacked all empathy. 
 I read that as career stealing gig... Take that persons job and be the manager. 
not to be that guy, but... *elicit. illicit means illegal. 
My current job is the best one I've ever had, mostly because of the awesome people I work with. Never underestimate how much fun you can have at work with the right group of people. 
I've never really seen anything but an open office floor plan I think, what is the alternative? 
Depending on the industry. In Forex and Marketing for instance (The two industries I've worked in where I was involved in hiring) degrees aren't all that important. For me, and most/all of the other hiring managers I've worked with, degrees are good in the absence of related work experience, but relevant work experience always trumps a degree (as a rule). It might be like a tiebreaker between ~~too~~ two applicants if it's a really close call, but it's never come down to that for me. But I've had 22 year old graduates with no professional work experience and a BCOM expecting a mid level position at a marketing firm; it just almost never works that way sadly. I think a lot of professors, or Uni in general kind of inflate students expectations; at least I know they did with me. 
I know at some med schools in Australia one of the interviewers on the panel is supposed to play it super hardass and give you nothing to work with - could have been this guy 
Sounds like she didn't know what she was looking for. 
I applied to a job listing for a graphic designer at a sign company, to which I had about 5+ years experience with signage at the time and thought it would be a good opportunity / easy interview. Turns out the Barn was the sign company, and my office would be a little wooden shed with no ac / heat. I new it was going to be a turd-in-a-punchbowl situation when I started driving down the dirt road, but part of me wanted to see how things would play out since it was such a ridiculous situation. 
Not necessarily. You're just someone who, on paper, matches a criteria. That doesn't mean that your full life and professional experience has set you up in good stead for that job. 
As somebody that hires in tech I only expect to have people around for 2 years generally. I still ask this question because I want people to be honest and have ambition. I love hiring people that say they hope to be working for a different company in a year etc. it's more work for me, but I know that person is gonna work their ass off for a year to get a good recommendation 
I never actually did, but I always thought it would be hilarious to answer the negatives question with: "I pick my nose". It's true, and I would be curious for their reaction. 
Unless it's Netflix. The have a fucking slide deck of 100+ slides just talking about culture. I kid you not. 
Then you just tell them "Either you hire me or your boss hears about *your* reddit habit". 
The key is often simply not caring. Try it sometime. Or don't, I don't give a shit. 
Hired people more efficient than you can even imagine 
Glad *someone* is still scamming noobs for gold in lumby. 
You've never seen my goldfish at feeding time....all flirty and cute and wiggly. It owns me at that moment. 
Right, you have to remove the head. Also good to note, while internal organs will regenerate, appendages will not. 
Wait so he just got two weeks pay for doing nothing? 
But every nutshack is replaced with We Are Number One 
Sounds like possibly a bit of both? Reporting that info to HR & preemptively declining with HR before the manager did might do some good, if other people reported messed up stuff about her also. But that's tricky, because you don't want bad vibes to travel with you. You definitely didn't want to work for her. 
I read it as career stealing pig. lol But considering the context, I think it still fits. 
Agreed. A mediocre job can be awesome if your coworkers are awesome. Likewise, just one crappy coworker can make an otherwise great job seem unbearable. Source: Experience 
Cubicles or rows of "cubettes" as I call them, which are just desks in a row with tiny walls that only extend to the end of the desk. I currently have a cubette but I spend 95+% of my time at a lab bench so it doesn't matter for me. 
If it wasn't a good stepping stone to something better, how come the interviewer got a better job? Personally, I've left a job that involved less pay for less stress (and a shorter commute). 
The little princes and princesses I teach are very good at inflating their expectations on their own... And sadly the ones that are astonishingly brilliant often also are the most humble in the classroom. 
It was a job a friend worked at and he told me afterwards that she had interviewed 12 people that week and didn't hire any of them. She was also a regional manager after having only worked for the company for 8 months so I had a feeling she was a little out of her depth, but that's just conjecture. 
Suspicious of what? Suspicious this guy might actually have what they're looking for? 
Yeah, my husband was at a job in a big tech company for almost 4 years and by the end he had been there longer than over 92% of the other employees. Five years is a really long time to stay in one place in the tech world. 
That sounds like quite a wildcard response. How do people usually respond when you drop this one on them? 
My mom (she enjoys telling this story) had her first "real" interview for a position as an office assistant at the local community college. She had no idea what she was doing. The interview ended up being a panel with like 8 of the professors. They asked her what her weaknesses were. She thought about it for a minute, and, terrified and intimidated, blurted out that she was a terrible speller. But! She could use a dictionary. They died laughing. She got the job. 
People almost always get promoted to one level above their compitance. It's a big problem in corporate businesses, people should get a raise not a promotion most of the time. Trouble is if you're really good at your job and therfore earn a lot, new managers will not understand why they are paying you so much, but will understand if you are being paid the same amount for a 'higher level' job. 
It is, but I guess in my mind it's like they're asking "Do you want to be a drone forever or do you have greater aspirations?". Especially with an entry level job it's not unfeasible to go from shoveling shit to being in charge of 10 people shoveling shit in a 5 year period. 
I'm surprised. The Noob spawn was moved up north some time ago, close to Taverly IIRC. 
Nice try but if you want gold for nothing at all you gotta be more clever than that 
"Hows working here been for you?" "well to be honest, I interview 25 people a day here because the turnover rate is so high. I have to come in on weekends and do this shit. I havent had a weekend off with my kids in over a year. Come to think of it. Fuck this company." "oh" 
I once worked for a company where I got in trouble for only averaging 60 hours a week for a month when they wanted more. Fuck you Epic. 
Source: Watched The Office all the way through 3 times so far 
Not to mention that people will come and go, there's not really much stability in it. 
HR doesn't usually solely do interviews for a hire. It's more common for HR to do an initial screening. There's usually at least one interview with management in the specific department/team you'd be working. So this tip is obviously for using with relevant interviewers, not necessarily HR. 
I've made my own office by buying earplugs and getting construction earmuffs. Unfortunately sound can still get through, I think I'm going to upgrade my earplugs 
Im not a programmer but I do write code in an analytical context (just SAS and SQL), but I also work in an open plan office that contains a call centre for revenue protection, inbound debt payments etc. Constant call centre buzz is not an ideal work environment for an analyst... One thing I really like is the 10 hour white noise videos on YouTube, there's one called "celestial white noise" or something that just blocks out every fucker. No good when you need to talk to people but for certain tasks it's a godsend for concentration. 
Suspicious that you're going to come up with some bullshit answers to fit what they've just told you they're looking for 
I've gotten positive responses in the past, though I would say the parent of the comment I responding to is a much better, more political response. My resume shows me getting large promotions every 9-12 months for the last 6 years. I guess it's a bit cocky to say that I'm going to 'wow them' but that's basically the persona I go for; I'm going to work way harder than any other employee they have, but only because I'm shooting for the top. 
If you think it's a problem in the private sector, come check out the military sometime. 
Only plebs refer to that game as Runescape! /s but in all seriousness I think that is true (idk never played RS3 after EoC), but in Old school runescape you still go to lumby after tutorial island 
Heh i know a few people who work at epic and they have told me the horror stories about the long hours. 
So true. Shows how even as awful a job as paper sales can be great when you share it with people with whom you connect. Even the worst of jobs can be a great experience when the staff is like a tight-nit family 
A workplace without much stability in personal may not be a good place to work, either. Where I work now, people don't come and go at all. I'd say most people have at least 5 years, and many have 10+. When a staff member leaves, it raises a lot of eyebrows. I've learned that's a sign of a good workplace: people want to stay for the long haul. 
My buddy has some clay earplugs that he got from a sporting good store I believe. Those things were no joke. The sound of deafening silence was almost worse than whatever you were trying to block out in the first place. 
Or take a page from Jerry Seinfeld's book, and ask them, "How long have you ________?". Most people love to talk about themselves if you just give them a jumping off point. 
I went to a school in the south and they recruited me. I did live with a bunch of female UW rowers when I moved up there though, went 3/5 in the house, felt accomplished haha 
If you let your talent sleep they won't make as many mistakes. If you can't afford payroll to do it right, when can you afford payroll to fix it? 
What field are you in? I work for a software company. I was the new guy last November, now most of the people I work with weren't here when I started. No raised eyebrows, fairly standard procedure. 
HELLO HOW LONG HAVE YOU BEEN OPERATING FELLOW HUMAN. 
Oh man I worked for a competitor of yours, if you think Epic is bad the shit I've heard from Meditech and others is absolutely horrifying. 
MY CURRENT UPTIME IS 32 YEARS, 7 MONTHS, 19 DAYS. LOCAL SPORTS TEAM SURE ARE LOCAL, AM I CORRECT? 
I needed to read this. I'm thinking about going to school for welding/tech shop stuff. And I keep alternating between panicking about it and pushing forward. 
When I was dealing with the impending death my mother (terminal cancer) I was sitting at work just blankly staring into the void. One of my co-workers is a pretty religious guy, not the pushy type though. He walks in and we make eye contact "You know...all this? It's just temporary." I smiled and thanked him, he smiled back and went off with out another word. I left work early and sat and thought about it for hours. I started crying. When I finished, I felt better and the more it sank in the stronger I grew to face the situation. That was over 10 years ago, and I still remember than moment more than anything that ever happened at that job. 
"Bran thought about it. 'Can a man still be brave if he's afraid?' 'That is the only time a man can be brave,' his father told him." 
Absolutely. The difference between others laughing at you or laughing with you is whether you choose to laugh. 
Damn, that just reminded me how negative I am about everything. 
I made myself so interesting, that everyone else is boring by comparison. What now? 
Bill Nye the Science guy taught me that one. I really liked the quote. 
I remember one time in 7th grade, this kid got up in front of the class to read a story out loud and his fly was unzipped and open wide. He ran away crying. That stuck with me, and now I check my fly obsessively, like 15 years later. 
This is such an incredibly important one. It's best to always try to judge people on their intentions, and praise them on their actions. If you think this way, it is so much easier to see the good in everyone. Most people have the best intentions, some of them just aren't good at following through or predicting how their actions will affect others. 
I believe it was Jillian Michaels in Yoga Meltdown 1. 
"Death is nothing to us, since when we are, death has not come, and when death has come, we are not." -Epicurus 
Can you explain this to me? It's going *way* above my head. 
"only 90s kids will get this" - a profound existential truth. 
"Education is expensive no matter how you get it" What my Dad told me this when I was on the cusp of deciding whether to go to college or join the military after graduating high school. Ultimately, I joined the Air Force and saw some of the world outside the U.S., widened my perspectives, and got much more out of college years later when I was more mature. 
I'm 33 and make a very good salary (much more than my parents, even combined)- when I was out of the country the past two weeks on business, my dad took my car into the shop and spent what was probably $2k tuning it up. I professed against it to no avail. It bothered me all week, until right now. Thanks, Internet stranger. 
Three zen students arrive at their master's place on bicycles. The master asks them why they rode bicycles. "I ride my bicycle because it is efficient" says one. "Wonderful!" replies the master, "Your path will be smooth and easy." "I ride my bicycle because it is good for my health" says the second. "Wonderful!" replies the master, "You will live a long and healthy life." "I ride my bicycle to ride my bicycle" says the third. "I am your student!" declares the master. 
I'd like someone to teach me how to give effectively on a one to one basis that isn't handing money to a pan handler. 
My SO says, "Is this the hill you want to die on?" 
What if it wasn't advice and your coworker just hates you? 
When I'm depressed or angry, it's hard to believe I've ever been happy or will ever be happy again. But I *know* I've been happy, so I have faith that I will be. And when it's really bad, I think of my happy self as a different self. So now matter how much I hate myself I try to avoid doing anything too stupid because I don't want to screw things up for Happy TryUsingScience in the future. 
This comment actually helps me feel a lot better about my study abroad experience. A year abroad is something that you can't avoid talking about when you return home. But it's also taboo to describe it as anything but an exhilarating, life-changing experience. For me, it was only life-changing in that I now understand loneliness and never want to be that alone ever again. I treat my family and friends better now that I see how much they make me happy. When people ask about my experience abroad, I smile, grit my teeth, and tell the same old lie I was told -- the one that hypes up travel as if it could do no harm. The truth is, when you make a huge leap in moving to a new place, the highs will be especially high and the lows especially low. More people, myself included, need to admit that going abroad by yourself has the potential for a lot of heartache. 
You've potentially helped hundreds of people with this post, me included. Thank you OP! You are indeed not a bundle of sticks. 
Unless you shit your pants... then they wont forget. 
We're all NPCs in someone else's adventure. I just hope it isn't GTA or Dark Souls. 
I mis-read and thought that your bus was stuck on the tracks, so 'Mom' sounded like a sociopath to me. Glad that wasn't the case. 
Similarly, I had a friend once who gave me shit about being annoyed by something inconsiderate he'd done. He called me Little-Miss-Manners, and I started to feel bad like I was just being overly sensitive which is something I've definitely been accused of before. I told my cousin about it, and she said, "You're not Little-Miss-Manners, you're Little-Miss-Common-Fucking-Courtesy." That made me feel a lot better. Sometimes I'm not just being a cry-baby, sometime you're being a dick. 
"As a matter of fact, you deserve to be here more than them because you're paying for my meal too..." 
When I brag about when I get a solid ten hour sleep session in all the older people tell me to enjoy it while I can because soon enough I won't be able to go 5 hours without having to get up in the middle of the night to pee only to then be kept awake by joint pain and indigestion. 
I might be a bit tired but reread this five times and I still don't get it. 
This reminds me of a dude walking around asking people if they thought homosexuality is a choice. Those who said "yes, I do think it's a choice" were then asked: "and when did you choose to be heterosexual?" Needless to say, there was a lot of awkward silence. 
"You must accept that some day you will die. Until you do that, you are useless. This is your life. It doesn't get any better than this. This is your life and it's ending one minute at a time." or something like that - Fight Club 
This is a bad quote for people who can't deal with being wrong or questioned. 
Neither? I tell them because *I* think they are funny. 
When I read it the first time, i thought you said when you were 31. 
That's going on my cubicle. And my email signature. 
Do it. I dropped out of college to get married at 21. Got back into college at 28, and now I've been a geologist for almost 20 years and never looked back. It also took me starting back at introduction to college algebra with a bunch of 18 yr olds in class and I had to go all the way to calc II... YOU CAN DO IT! 
My grandma passed away September 3 from a short battle with leukemia. She was my entire world. The woman that raised me, the one person who always had my back. She was such a kind generous woman that I have had a hard time coming to terms with her death. I was texting with a friend how much I wanted to give up because I didn't see the point of living a life without her. He told me, "Why give up? If you give up now all her sacrifices would have been for nothing. All that love would die with you. You are her legacy now, live life for her." Ever since then everything changed. I want to prove to the world and to her that everything she taught me will not be taken for granted. She taught me so much and I still need to continue her legacy. 
If your so interesting, and everyone else is boring, the only logical next step would be to go and fuck yourself. 
"I was dead for millions of years before I was born, and I was not the least bit inconvenienced by it." -Samuel "Mark Twain" Clemens 
When you don't suffer from depression you assume you're always thinking rationally and considering everything. When you do suffer from depression you assume the same thing; the difference is when you have depression your thoughts are extremely negative towards yourself. You still see them as being objectively true though. At least for me, when I was put in antidepressants I stopped being able to understand my thought processes from when I had depression. I truly cannot think in the way I did while I had depression. 
"It's supposed to be a challenge, that's why they call it a shortcut. If it were easy, it would just be 'the way' " From road trip 
Absolutely. This right here, more than anything else, is the difference between excellent story telling and bad story telling, regardless of the medium. When characters do things simply because the story needs them to do it, it never comes across well. When a characters actions are based on their own motivations, however flawed, then you have written a masterpiece. 
Maybe something along the lines of "If you're so smart and wise, why don't you have more to show for it?" Perhaps not those words exactly, but make the point if he really is as clever as he makes out why hasn't he got more out of life. As my mum always says: "Actions speak louder than words." It might also be worth baring in mind that arrogance is a defence against actually going out and taking risks (and possibly getting things wrong) and sometimes you just have to leave people to get on with it.. 
When I was in JROTC, my Major used to say, "Ain't nothin' to it but to do it." It has stuck with me ever since. 
The first student then went on to follow a smooth and easy path. The second student then went on to live a long and happy life. The third student then went on to have an old man follow him around asking him questions every five minutes. 
My gf wanted a unique birthday gift this year. I went to walmart and bought 2 20pks of socks, bulk underwear (mens and womens) and hairties/brushes. I spent maybe $40. Not much considering take out costs just as much. We went down to where some people needed this kind of help and handed out what we had. So many grateful faces. This kind of stuff is not easy to come by when you have nothing. My gf had the best birthday she's had ever. Money is nice, but giving people what they need is so much better. 
TIL I've been putting oxygen masks on other people for so long, I completely forgot about mine. Jesus. I need to go think about some things. 
I totally know that feeling. Later you start hating everyone because you have to run behind them to clean their mess every time, and yourself because you feel guilty of worrying about "petty" things when others have "real problems". It sucks. 
The only proper response is to reply, "This is not the day I die." and then ride your dragon into battle. 
Soooo.... pass the buck and shift the blame, essentially? 
"Why not you?" "Huh. I never thought of it th-" "You suck. I mean, you *radiate* awfulness." "Thanks Jim." 
"Courage is not the absence of fear, but action in spite of it." 
Or Pokemon. I don't want to be the dipshit with a level 30 Kakuna. 
Me too, I was utterly confused until I read your comment and went back and read it again. 
I posted yesterday about how I relish my hour long commute. I get some time to myself to just sit, relax, and enjoy some podcasts. The amount of people that tried to convince me to dislike something about my life that I can't really change was astounding. Fuck you, people from yesterday. I'm going to still enjoy my hour long traffic filled commute. 
"you can't go for drinks at that bar with your old friend because my ex girlfriend cheated on me at that bar." thankfully i'm out of that relationship 
"Some people die at 25 and aren't buried until 75." - Benjamin Franklin 
"Of all the words of mice and men, the saddest are, it might've been." 
You might want to tell him DOMA was struck down and he can now bring his husband to the States. Go to www.visajourney.com. Loads of gay couples there going through the Green Card process including a very good friend I met on there from Canada :) 
It's funny how a thought that should be so obvious and natural never really occurs to us if we think we're just "normal." 
"I contend we are both atheists, I just believe in one fewer god than you do. When you understand why you dismiss all the other possible gods, you will understand why I dismiss yours." -Stephen F Roberts 
My grandpa's legacy lives on! I'd like to get it embroidered on a throw pillow. 
It's the feeling of sitting in the back seat your entire life. As a little brother you always get the feeling of being last to do anything. You're the last to drive, the last to leave the house, etc. Until you're in your 20's you always are physically looking up at everyone in your family. The pressure to fit into the shadow of my big brother is a constant source of anxiety for me. 
Let me give you a quick walkthrough. 1: Self centered navel-gazing branded as "reflection" or "self awareness". 2: Knowledge and complete acceptance of the worst truths about yourself. 3: Acceptance that all positive truths about yourself are either irrelevant or completely overshadowed by the negative truths. 4: ~faulty logic~ 5: Conclude that you are a net drain on yourself, your relationships, and society as a whole. 6: Spend most of your time thinking about ways to not exist. 7: Get help, get better. At least, thats the way it went down for me. 
I see a lot of upvotes, and I see your point, but I have a different take. When I am depressed I do have somewhat of a thought disorder, thoughts that I have that make me feel bad about myself are all backed my "miscalculated just cements" that I perceive as rational thought. In other words its so strong because I believe my depression to be completely right. This is why I believe its so hard to treat, because it is a deep rooted thought process (that is wrong) that is perceived to me as right and rational. Depression to me is a living organism that is devilishly artistic in painting a realistic false reality. It's also why I believe the majority if depressed people are very intelligent, it's the fuel source of the disease. 
Honestly, the toughest part is starting. Once you have momentum, it gets easier and easier to do the not-always-amazing stuff that you know you know will make your life objectively better in the long-term. 
My Aunt and Uncle *hate* exchanging gifts. Not just with each other, but with anyone. Last year, my GF and I bought lots of cheap toys and goodies, took a picture of each one, and donated them to various charities, in my Aunt and Uncle's name. We gifted them a card, with all the pictures and the names of the charities in it. They've said its the best Christmas present they've ever received. 
A day of wolves and shattered shields when the age of men comes crashing down! But it is not this day! 
That's seems more if a Dwight than a Jim thing to say. 
"Simba, I'm only brave when I have to be. Being brave doesn't mean you go looking for trouble." 
This is actually a good analogy to life, imo. Most of us are like the NPCs in those games, with our boring pokemon and routines. Ash is out there getting stuff done and having adventures. 
Fucking funeral homes. You aren't getting paid to sit around on your ass, get digging. 
It was more do you dump person A because of hypothetical person B. In twenty years you won't know how happy you would have been with person B, but you'll know exactly how happy you would have been with person A. 
Middlest of three. Just want to watch the world burn. 
I think depression starts between points 2 and 3. At least for me. I do quite a lot of navel gazing and it has shown me areas of myself that needed work. Rather than being defeated by them, I sought to fix them. It didn't always work that way. I used to get defeated and that, I think, led to my former depression. 
Mood disorders affect your thoughts, but for instance you can convert a mentally healthy person to nihilism without making them depressed. Depression causes racing fight-or-flight thoughts at some times, that are reinforced by dopamine (to make you more alert in a REAL fight-or-flight response), which further reinforces that outlook and thought process. Basically, depression affects your mood/outlook and neurotransmitter levels, which together reinforce your bad thought patterns, which causes more bad outlook, thoughts, etc... It's a circle of reinforcement. Kind of like how all those commercials about dying kids and pets won't convert a healthy person to depression, but they can *keep a depressed person from seeing that their moods are irrational and something to question*. 
To this day, has to be one of my favorite book openers. 
I've always been of the opinion that it's better to spend your money on experiences over possessions (though some possessions allow you to experience things, like skis for example). It's served me well so far 
I've just started asking "is today the 20th?" If I'm wrong they correct me. I do the same things with days of the week "is today monday?" 
I tried to get my family to all bring a bag of dog food to Christmas last year for the animal shelter, instead of doing a gift exchange. There is nobody under the age of 30 at this event. None of us need a damn gift. My aunt and my (40 year old) cousin were the dissenting voices. They didn't want to "mess with tradition". Fine. I donated two bags on their behalf for their gift. Grown-ass women arguing against charity. Gimme a goddamn break. 
There is a homeless man that was always asking people for a light on the side of the street in DC. Finally, I walked into 7-11 and gave him a pack of lighters. The joy on his face was priceless. I don't see him on the side of the street anymore.... 
"Jesus Christ Stu, I only asked if you thought this shade of white was alright..." 
I think it's more like a Michael and Toby exchange. 
It's true. Pokemon training as a hobby in the real world is similar to, say, video gaming in real life. The PC in pokemon games is like a professional gamer while most of the unimportant NPCs are defined by their day job. They're so easy to beat because they're the casuals who put 40 hours a week into a real job and only have enough time to play with their Rattata for a half hour every day, let alone actually raising a half dozen of those damn things to ridiculous levels and spending half of their living wages on vitamins and TMs. It's just not practical. 
An optimist sees a challenge in every problem, a pessimist sees a problem in every challenge. 
My gosh, I do. I really do. What's more, my biological father is just a total disappointment in every respect so I know THAT feeling too. My Dad is my only Dad and the best man I have ever known. I hope he knows that. Aww I am going to phone him now. 
My opinion is that it's always good to spend your money on saving time. Fast lane, Roombas, express, etc. Time is the most valuable thing you can buy, and less time in lines or cleaning dishes means more time to enjoy life and family and whatever. 
"Is today the 20th?" "Uh...no it's the 7th....are you okay?" 
And an optometrist helps others see the challenge in every problem. 
Haha holy shit, just getting some insight into why sometimes my girlfriend can find me unemotional about certain things. I very very rarely get angry or upset, just focus on how to resolve the problem. 
just giving you a taste of what he would do to your lettuce 
My mom is a bit like this... Not really intrusive like that but she tries to fill in on stories as if she already knows what's going to happen. It's really annoying :( 
I was like "that's not that bad!" until the snaps instead of applause. Yeah, fuck that noise. 
I know a girl from HS who ended up married to a guy from HS, and they were both redheads...they have two kids who are also super red headed. They are the reddest, freckliest family I've ever seen. 
It might seem petty to most people, but I think it says a lot about a person who is so willingly wasteful. Spoiled and selfish imho. 
I hated when this was a thing. I Also Used To Know A Girl Who Texted Like This And It Really Made Me So Angry, Though Its Nowhere Near As Bad As Yours. 
I also broke up with a girl because of her belief in Santa Claus. In this case however she was a 20 year old white girl in Oklahoma who was in college to become a teacher. 
That's not petty, it's incompatibility. I broke up with a guy who at least once a day asked me what a word I used in normal conversation meant. Nothing that I would consider out of the realm of a general adult vocabulary either. Gets old pretty quickly, especially because he didn't seem interested in learning them, he just got upset that I wouldn't use "regular words". 
Same. Had a guy accidentally scrape the sharp ass edge of his nail against my clit once and I now REFUSE to let any guy with nail overhang touch me. It's fucking horrible. My clit literally bled for like 10 mins and it hurt to walk for over a week. I almost went to the hospital. Trim your fucking nails people. 
I'm looking at you all of my co workers!!! Stop complaining about having to get new boots every month. Just pick up your fucking feet!!! 
Oh god. Not the Astrologists! Not the Astrologists! AHHHHHHHHHHHHHH! 
This one is actually hilarious to me. Of all the petty things to choose from, you both went with: "This motherfucker can't cut a fucking bell pepper." It's like next level pettiness, from both of you. But for real though, glad you got rid of her, she obviously couldn't cut it. 
I have an irrational fear of fish. They facinate me and I love looking at them, but put me in water and I flip out. Funnily enough, it doesn't apply to sharks. Goldfish, terrifying. Sharks, eh. 
I had a boyfriend in high school like this. He smelled vaguely of broccoli or onions or something. I could never quite put my finger on it. My best friend dated him not long after I broke up with him and she confirmed the odd smell. 
The Weeknd and Selena are dating???? WHY DIDN'T ANY OF YOU JAGWEEDS TELL ME?? 
I was dating a guy in high school who one day at lunch started stomping on an ant hill. I asked him to stop and he laughed at me. I dumped him on the spot. Ants are cool as fuck. 
My roommate recently told me about a girl he was dating for a few weeks. Was never anything serious and this was a few months ago and he told me that her voice just irritated him for some reason, but not enough to break up with her at the time, though months later he realized why: she spoke exactly like Ducky from The Land Before Time, yes she did, yes yes yes! Took him a while to figure out where he'd heard that before. Was hilarious when he did. 
my nose was broken a long time ago and still does this whistling, it makes me so anxious in quiet environments ugh ._. 
I'm 28 and still see that as a legit reason. You don't fuck with save files. Especially when there's old event Pokemon on them. 
"I watched Suicide Squad and now I know all about Harley and Joker. Such Romance." They literally cut out a scene of him smacking her because they thought it would be too much. I wish they had kept it for this reason. They are the villains for a reason. 
I recently discovered that one of my friends is an absolute cunt towards waitstaff. She refused to tip a waitress because the waitress forgot to bring her a cup of ranch, and the waitress brought her the wrong beverage. My friend had been incredibly unclear about what beverage she wanted, and only decided on Beverage B after the waitress had already clearly told her that she was going to bring out Beverage A. Her logic was "they make minimum wage at this restaurant, not server wage!" I'm seriously reconsidering hanging out with her any more. 
"Star Wars? Is that the one where Indiana Jones talks to the giant teddy bear?" -- some teenager my wife overheard last year 
if they don't say thank you they go from "I could see myself dating this person" to "I could see myself having sex with this person" 
I definitely went on a date once where I drank too much and I just sat motionlessly in the corner while my date played beer pong and he came and asked me if I was ok and I just said "Just trying not to move." 
or on the bus... fucking hell those are nightmare people 
If you haven't unlocked all the characters in Mario Party 7, you're just not worth my time 
I was once told that I tasted like nothing and it was great and I should never worry. He then asked if I was a vegetarian, and I didn't have the heart to tell him I ate ham slices off a napkin for lunch. 
... So he only watches biopics? Any action movie is unrealistic. 
good one, I wouldn't date her for this petty reason that she wouldn't let you date. 
What if they don't like ice cream and chocolate which means you never have someone stealing yours from the fridge? 
Upvote because you made me think the work 'dankles'. 
I get those on employment applications. Your resume will swiftly be put in the "Do not hire" file. 
What about the fact that black people are really just holograms? 
my mom like.. mouths the words I'm saying as I'm saying them while telling a story, if that makes sense? I know it's her just trying to actively listen and follow along but it's distracting as fuck lol 
Agreed. It wouldn't have bothered me if she said ANYTHING about it. But when I asked if she wanted a box, her exact response was "nah" 
I kind of did this once. I was arguing with someone about how the monitor is NOT the computer. Turns out, it was an Apple (imac), and it *was* the computer. They had only just been released and gotten popular, and it was the first time I'd seen something like that. I assumed wrong. 
People Still Do That, I Really Hate It. Glad I Am Not The Only One. 
My sister married a guy with the same name as our brother and that's what we did so that it wouldn't get confusing! My cousins (they're sisters) also both married guys with the same name, but their names are spelled differently. 
"And do you take James to be your lawfully wedded husband?" "Who the fuck is James? Oh, you mean Hey You. Yes" 
I was once travelling in Panama and started talking to our waiter. He asked where I was from and I said "Canada." He then asked me if I spoke Canadian or American. I responded with "I speak English." He thought for a second and said "Ahhh, English the language they speak in England!" This entire exchange was conducted in English.... 
I have a fear of seaweed touching me. I can't even go in an ocean past my ankles.. 
I actually work as a grocer, and I've really struggled with the smell. I can't smell it myself but people say I "smell like a microwaved fart." 
If they are both Thai, it might also have something to do with the food they have at home. People tend to smell slightly like what they eat. 
At this point, "computer illiterate" is practically a synonym for "illiterate." 
Hell yeah, ants are fucking sweet. Plus they outnumber humans like a million-to-one and I hear they hold grudges. 
My sister has moved to Paris from London in order to do some business degree. When she comes home she has the most ridiculous "proper English" accent. Apparently being the only English person in her group of friends has caused her to go into hyper posh mode. She says things like "ya, ya..." 
Blink twice if she is holding you against your will. 
There comes a time in life where a man must decide: am I a tucker, or not? Each must decide for himself, but me, I chose not tucking, for I am no serial killer. 
Yeah the movie made me feel like they were cute together even though I know that the comics are *very* different. Cause like, the movie made him seem just as obsessed with her as she is with him. In the comics, he couldnt give a shit less about her unless she was useful. In the movie, he couldn't concentrate on *anything* except getting her free and with him again. 
I'm glad you changed for the better. Some people can be really inconsiderate when their littering is pointed out. "Dude, it's only a small paper wrap. It's not like anyone cares." 
I have stopped associating with people who treat servers or cashiers like shit. I was a cashier in college, my fiancee was a server. Maybe it makes me judgemental but if you treat people like shit then go fuck yourself. Cheers. 
I was young with self esteem issues. Looking back IA I should have left him long before the corn dogs. No regrets though, my mom still refers to it as the Corn Dog Incident lol. 
It's more fun to say it was because of the corn dogs 
I imagine it's thinking about the long term plan. If his head is that big, what it will be like giving birth to his children? 
Hahaha, while that might be bad date etiquette, you do sound like someone I'd hang out with. 
Or blasts music/youtube vids...like seriously your phone came with headphones. That shit is rude. 
I have no idea how he does that. I stopped asking after that 
Chances are if you keep your ice cream in the fridge *and not the freezer* no one would want to date you in the first place, you fucking animal 
That's the context I usually see it in. A tough land. 
Ah, England. *glass smashes* *entire bar cheers* 
**Seinfeld:** I'll take a hand clapper any day. **George:** Clappers beat snappers 
I'm not above asking for a box and taking her food for myself, esp. if I paid for it 
Please Stop I'm Annunciating All The Capitalized Letters. 
Guilty. That was a thing in the UK too, around 2004ish? 
I have uncles Joe, Joe, John, John, and Jeff (the only aunt I have by marriage is Judy) The Joe's and John's are on the same side. 
That's not even poor spelling, that's someone who has never read in their life... 
It's the garlic. If you eat a lot, you will smell funky. 
What's this obsession with posh British accents. I'm British and I can't take people who talk like that seriously. 
This is going to cost him, this is going to cost him big. 
Even the kids cartoon had the Joker physically abusing her lol So disappointed that they cut that out of the film. Can't show a women being hit, now can we? 
You mean it's not normal to have sex with a 400 year old man pretending to be a high school student? 
Or, even worse, "There are people who clean that up." 
Sounds like the corn dog incident was the droplet that made the bucket overflow. Good on you for getting rid of such a selfish prick. 
I'm not sure if you were being serious but I laughed anyway. Hot chocolate was snorted. 
The most baller way to combat this: Play the same song/video with a 3 second delay. It might end up in a fist fight but I guarantee you they will mute that shit pretty soon. 
Your husband does the same kind of stuff I annoy my wife with every time we go out. He seems nice. 
Yeah I used to be terrible with kids until I heard this from a friend of mine. Works great. It's a perfect analogy for how they act - need supervision with fairly simple tasks, emotionally unbalanced a lot of the time, prone to overreaction, motor skills are unrefined...the list goes on 
Whenever I drop something I just imagine a load of drunks cheering "wheeeyyy" 
I would've, but I wasn't a fan of the flavor she ordered. Either Asian Zing or Parmesan Garlic 
If you're hot I'll send pics of me **mas**tur*baaaaaaaaaa*tinggggg..... My, what a guy! # GASTON 
I live in northern California and the local Wal-Mart has avocados everyday for $.50 each. They are kinda small but the pit is tiny too. 
I had an old roommate who took a shitload of protein powder and when you went into his room it would smell odd between his farts and sweating the stuff out... same idea? 
That's why when I fake a British accent, I always make sure I sound like a chav. 
Being dead is a pretty strong reason not to date someone 
Depends. Is he hot and is she an ordinary girl that anyone can relate to? 
I've daydreamed being passive-aggressive and playing a different song just as loud; but I never do. I just end up sitting there, staring out the window with a little smirk on my face. 
I'd be disturbed too, and I don't think I could date that person, but... wow, they really do toss out a lot of food when the buffet closes. I once witnessed an entire tray of smoked salmon getting scraped into the trash at a resort. Almost killed me. 
He's the nicest guy you will ever meet. And I still want to strangle him. 
Nothing has made me shiver in horror more than the word "cummies" 
Or someone inevitably yells "taxi!" No I don't need a taxi I just have the coordination of a sweaty octopus trying to unhook a bra 
Do Americans say 'wheeyyyyyy' or is that exclusively us? Been wondering this for a while because it seems like a innate reaction to me when someone does something silly. 
I'm convinced my husband always orders those two flavors because they're the worst and he knows I won't try to take one of his. 
Flpflpflpflpflp pbpbptbptpbprpbpr *heavy breathing* 
I used to do this as a kid on my birthday. My grandma would make 2 cakes. One for everyone, usually chocolate and one for the birthday kid. I ALWAYS had her make me lemon with lemon filling. I both liked it and knew my family hated it so no one would try to eat my cake. 
Yes! Halloween costumes are painful. He's either wearing a pun that no one gets or he's a 6'4" bald man dressed as Richard Simmons. Last year, he wore articles of clothing incorrectly - like a sweatshirt was his pants, he wore socks as a cravat, he had me cut a hole in the crotch of some tights for him to wear as a shirt, etc. Very nice. 
If you hadn't mentioned height I would have sworn we married the same man. Halloween costumes are a nightmare for me too. *takes a moment of silence in remembrance of the TMNT onesie costume of 2014* And Jesus help us if we meet someone with a noticeable accent. I love him but damned if he doesn't feel the need to try to entertain everyone all the time. 
Real talk, though, my husband is such an idiot that he still makes me laugh 12 years later. I mean, most men, I'd just want to make dead after 12 years. Onesie. Yep. Hubs went out in a union jack suit one year. No occasion. Just wanted to. 
Same. I would have murdered anyone else after six years of this. But if my husband comes prancing out in a neon pink speedo and asks if I want to go to the pool? I laughed like a moron and say yes. 
Yeah, just get your shit together. Put it in a shit museum or something 
Exactly. Also realize when you get pissy over small things, all you are doing is ruining everybody else's good mood. It's selfish and childish. 
Don't sweat the petty things and don't pet the sweaty things. 
amen. we used to say "semper gumby" lol or, as lao tzu put it: "Men are born soft and supple; dead, they are stiff and hard. Plants are born tender and pliant; dead, they are brittle and dry. Thus whoever is stiff and inflexible is a disciple of death. Whoever is soft and yielding is a disciple of life. The hard and stiff will be broken. The soft and supple will prevail." 
Often the people who are least calm are the ones who have never had to deal with really serious shit. Fear of the unknown. 
Now I'm not trying to discredit the weed part of your post but, I have had a couple friends that smoked chronically, and then quit cold turkey and they both said they have less stress in their lives after quitting. So weed doesn't work all the time. 
The one of the first work conferences I went to I shared a room with a colleague who kept talking about how nervous he was about his presentation and how lucky I was for being calm and not nervous. Everyone we ran into he would bring up being nervous and occasionally mention how I wasn't. The morning before my presentation I vomited into the sink... 
Number one is basically my mission statement. If I can, and care to, control it, I'm going to do that. I'll generally be calm because it's under control. If I can't, getting worked up only makes it worse, plus there's nothing I can do, so I just let it go. Obvious exceptions apply. 
I knew this had to be a quote from something. I had no idea what, so I googled it. The face that popped up in relation to this quote is one of my favorite faces. Mr Bailey, you beautiful bastard. 
I know what you mean. I'm convinced that whatever happens I'll be able to work out a solution. Is that strictly true? Maybe not, but it feels enough like it to let me be chill about things. 
I bet it works really well if you want to intimidate people. Like, they do some kind of shit, thinking you're a pussy and won't do anything about it, then suddenly you stand up, give them a crazy look, and say "I AM REALLY ANGRY". Then sit back and proceed with things as if nothing happened. If it were me, I'd be worried that I might be axe murdered this night. 
When it comes to nihilism, it helps to recall that a rejection of objective meaning is not mutually exclusive with a life that *you* think of as meaningful 
I agree. I've adopted a few Buddhist principles as well. I don't take the religion as a whole as I reject the religious ideal of detachment from the world but it is really helpful to remember that suffering chimes from desire and realize that is better just to let some things go. 
UNTIL YOU'RE COLLECTING THE FUCKING 100 COINS AND THE GOD DAMN BLACK VOID IN THE SECOND SECTION SUCKS YOU INTO THE ABYSS AND YOU HAVE TO RECOLLECT THE 100 FUCKING COINS. FUCK YOU VOID. FUCK YOU. 
The outside I have a blank stare on my face and go about my day. Inside I'm smashing your face over my knee like a pro wrestler with no restraint 
Videogames, especially team-based ones, really teach you to be calm and patient in even the worst circumstances. You learn that not everything is within your control and that there is almost always something that you could have improved, even when it's clearly someone else who has messed up badly. It's when playing videogames that you sometimes realise how easy it is to lose your calm, but that's ok, since it's a safe environment to lose your calmness in. 
This is my favorite answer. But don't forget the importance of environmental factors as well. 
I watched my sister die slowly after being taken off of life support. She had been completely fine the day before, laughing and eating my niece's birthday cake. Since then nothing really seems like a big deal. 
Some people are so afraid of their eventual death. Why? I imagine once I die I'd likely be too dead to care about my current situation. 
I know a few people in metal bands. They are some of the calmest guys I've ever met. Making super aggressive music does seem to have a therapeutic affect. 
I disagree. The secret isn't to not give a fuck. The secret is to give an appropriate amount of fucks. I.E, "Fuck something up? Fix it and move on." 
Reserved and passionless, what a life mantra. Hits spot on 
Take it to the shit store and sell it, I don't care 
Look back in history at every single thing you thought would fucking change your life forever. Now, from a distance, almost all of it was trivial. So whenever you feel like getting worked up, just think about the odds. Odds are, it's really a trivial thing you're overestimating. 
That saying also teaches humility I think. Like when you're on top form and you feel like you're unstoppable and nobody can beat you, this too shall pass. 
What's funny is that my fight or flight mechanisms are all kinds of fucked up. Like, if someone is yelling at me at work I just kind of take it. If some drunk frat bro in college was trying to fight I'd cower and try to find a way to run away. When drunk assholes on the bus are hassling people I find it hard to speak up. But if someone shouts "BOO!" and grabs me from behind I can't help it I spin around with my fists up or hands even on them. If I think someone is trying to break into my house I'm flying down the stairs ready to murder a motherfucker. If a teacher or bully is being mean to my kid I get real confrontational and scary. My fight or flight is flight unless I think it actually matters. 
This is exactly the problem. When I get overwhelmed I lash out, hard. I used to be especially mean to people on the internet, my wife helped with that. I never really learned the right way to be angry so I just never let myself get angry. So when it happens I have insufficient control. I say really mean things. The worst is I've set up this big perception of Mr Zen guy person, so people are caught way off guard. I hardly ever lose my temper, I become a big asshole when I do and I feel like a big asshole after. Then I spend the next several hours or days apologizing too much which just makes things worse. 
I think he's saying the unhealthy part is because of how he was treated, he was never able to really develop outlets for fear of being punished for it which leads to him internalizing everything, and that's not healthy. 
Sometimes dissociation reactions conditioned by trauma can seem like calmness. There's a video going around Facebook of a young toddler from Aleppo covered in the ruins from his building after a bombing, and he can't cry. Without context, he may seem unnaturally calm, but he's just too overwhelmed to process anything that is happening around him 
This is basically one of the core principles of Japan's ruling party. Japan isn't considered a one party system because they have, for the most part, fair elections. Yet, the Liberal Democratic Party has been in power for something like 62 out of the last 64 years. They do it largely by adopting the more popular stance on any issue, whether that stance would be viewed as conservative or liberal. 
But over time the wind and the rain will erode the mountain to nothing. 
There is a movie quote I don't quite remember. I'll paraphrase; once a bullet flies by your head the rest of your problems suddenly become simpler. 
I haven't had anxiety in a long time. Maybe part of it for me was going back to that hellhole and seeing progress. It was ever so slight, but it was profound. 22 years later it's still a hell hole but not as bad I guess. 
Being calm =/= not being stressed. Most everyone - calm or high strung - has stress. What sets those two groups apart is how they handle stress. 
Agreed, but at the same time mental discipline helps a lot. It takes time and practice. Even when you're really stressed and not reacting well to scenarios you are conscious of that and can start to slightly modify or try to channel it. Every time it happens, you do a little better. Over and over again. 
Is that what happens when you're a clam *EDIT* Commenter before me said "clam" instead of calm 
Your mental health can greatly impact your physical health. I've had horrible anxiety as long as I can remember and have medical issues that come and go with the increase or decrease in my anxiety. Anxiety symptoms are usually presented in a physical way such as sweating or shortness of breath. Chronic anxiety can cause migraines, ulcers, abnormal heart palpitations, digestive issues (such as nausea, loss of appetite, diarrhea), exhaustion, insomnia, weight loss/gain, dizziness... I've been sent to the ER a few times because my symptoms were mimicking those of a heart attack. Basically, anxiety sucks and can put a serious strain on your body if it's not under control. 
Whether you're religious or not, we can all learn a thing or two from this prayer: *God, grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change, courage to change the things I can, and wisdom to know the difference.* I don't really "pray to God" in the traditional Catholic sense that's really common where I'm from (Philippines, a predominantly Christian country), but the prayer really resonates with my personal philosophy. 
That's what power really is. The person that's best able to walk away has the most power in every interaction. 
Yeah, this is frequently my problem. Whenever I run into something I can't control, a little voice in the back of my mind tells me that the only reason I can't control it is I'm not working hard enough or haven't thought about the problem long enough to figure it out. It sucks because that thought is still there even when I know it's unreasonable. 
A better approach: "it's better to ask a dumb question and look like a fool for five minutes than to keep your mouth shut and be a fool forever." The difference here is, of course, in seeking knowledge instead of pretending you already have it, but I like this saying because it emphasizes humility on top of that. 
Do you at least have your health? That phrase always seemed lame until I lost mine. Puts things into perspective. 
Hahaha, I am almost 100% drug free! I picked up weed again a couple months ago after an almost 10 year absence, but even in the last few weeks that desire feels like it's been satiated and I'm over it. Still love caffeine though! The best highs come from new experiences and a positive mental attitude! 
It's strange sometimes too. I'm sure you've probably experienced people who almost seem to get mad that you're not freaking out more about bad situations or negative circumstance. Being in a bad situation sucks, but letting it consume your emotions doesn't help any. 
But then I spent so many nights thinking how you did me wrong And I grew strong And I learned how to get along And so you're back From outer space I just walked in to find you here with that sad look upon your face I should have changed that stupid lock, I should have made you leave your key If I'd known for just one second you'd be back to bother me Go on now, go, walk out the door Just turn around now 'Cause you're not welcome anymore Weren't you the one who tried to hurt me with goodbye Do you think I'd crumble Did you think I'd lay down and die? 
It's amazing how calm you can be when the little ones are watching. Once I was in the yard with my seven year old, and he says "my face is itchy" a minute later his eyes are swollen shut & his mouth was swelling. Of course I know immediately his airway may close all the way. Grab both kids from the yard, grab some cough syrup with benylin as we rush to the car and get to the doctor (clinic is way faster than hospital). All the while I'm panicking in my head and outwardly I'm all sing song "we just have to go on a little trip". Luckily, the benylin kicked in quick, got to the doctor and was whisked in but the crisis was over. I get the kids back to the car, buckle them in, close the doors and the walk into the cars blindspot and just start shaking and puking. Wipe my mouth, get back in the car and "hey, who wants ice cream?" 
I don't expect 6'5" people to go :3, that makes me smile for some reason 
Might be better if you go up to the dude and whisper it in his ear 
Nihilism into existentialism - it's the best! The most freeing realization I've ever had is that the perception of any situation is created by your mind and your mind is malleable (both from internal and external stimuli). Lets you make meaning where and how you want it to be and to stop giving a shit about expectations or judgements. 
Detachment is not a religious ideal of Buddhism. Its one of the basic core concepts of Buddhist philosophy. 
For some people. The majority just spam all chat GGEZ noobs kilurself 
but there is a reciprocal relationship between environmental factors and these (i wanna say) hormones (?) your perception of environmental events affects your hormone levels, which then affect your perception of further events, and so on that is to say, environmental factors are factors because they change this hormonal equilibrium 
I assume most people fear dying and saying goodbye to loved ones, not actually being dead. 
Listening to it as well. My internal music is hardcore punk. It always seemed homey to me, because it made me comfortable listening. 
Man I love ABR. I wouldn't be characterized as someone who would listen to metal and everyone is surprised when I tell them I do, because people see me as the nice, innocent dude. Man do they not realize I indulge in hearing those lows and breakdowns. 
Always know when to chuck it in the fuck it bucket. 
I have a boyfriend, but I don't really see the point in having children. I've yet to come across a child whose company I enjoyed, so being around one all day seems awful. I'm also sufficiently spooked off from pregnancy after the constant whining from my sister during hers. I guess I might come across as buddhist at the surface, but I'm really not. I'm quite selfish and worldly. 
Getting upset takes energy, and that's just too much work. Calm is the d**e**fault, so why would I not be? If you're already on the bus then hey, there's nothing you can do, so no use getting worked up about it, right? 
Another part of this thread is about how people became calm by withdrawing into themselves because of abuse, I've found for me it's more a case of after dealing with so much as a kid that nothing seems like a big deal in comparison. Once you've been beaten, homeless, raped, manipulated, broke, had your shit stolen ect and recovered from it all each time, nothing really seems like a real issue. Shit's trivial. 
I think it's the answer to the riddle "What saying makes a happy man sad and a sad man happy." 
Yea. I feel you. My fight or flight was fucked up by abuse. Now I live where its flight, or be silent all the time. Sometimes for years and years-- until the switch flicks where I feel I'm justified or righteous. Like you said, someone breaking in, or someone hitting me. Something where you are 100% entitled to violence. Then it's just blind, murderous rage. No feeling at all. No pain. Just KILL. It's all bottled up, so whenever that switch flips you just pour out years of aggression. 
I think I'm doing pretty well. I have a lot of self-respect in terms of how people treat me. Even though those years were the worst of my life, I learned a lot. I can spot red flags from a mile away. Lucky karma is doing her thing. She is slowly killing herself with prescription pain killers and lost custody of her children. I don't have to wish any harm on her, she's made her own bed. Thank you. 
I'm working through this currently. I just started teaching myself how to be conscious of anger rather than repressing it into deep resentment, internalizing it into sadness, or turning my anger in on myself 
I get crazy shakes after intense emotional outbursts too. Probably because it's so rare and bottled up so compactly that when a bit squirts out my body/mind doesn't know how to process it. Diarrhea is a very apt comparison 
 pretty much this. Sometimes I drink too much if I had a bad day. I wait until the kids are in bed though. 
I mean flexible humans will also erode given enough time 
I lost my wife almost three years ago and one of the biggest lessons I learned through grieving, is to be grateful for all I have and recognize all the little things that bring joy throughout my day. I miss her everyday and the pain can still show itself, but overall I'm a very happy person. Seeing someone you love so much take their last breath really puts a lot of things in perspective. 
I still feel as smug as ever reading this again, but silencing my own fragile ego for a second, why look down on "small minds"? People are just about the only things in life that can give us meaning and fulfillment - talk isn't only gossip. And though ideas can be so great, still so much wrong can be done when we harden our hearts in pursuit of them. If the world were inhabited only by generous and loving simpletons, wouldn't it be better than one of intelligence without empathy? 
I'm that kind of person - I'm high strung and tend to stress really easily, but perform well under stress so it all works out. What really helps me are martial arts and meditation. My moods have mellowed out significantly since picking those two up. 
I don't know, I've gotten to the point where I am very rarely stressed out about things. Taking tests are a good example of something I really just don't stress out about anymore. However, sometimes it backfires in that "dont stress" can be very similar to "dont care". If I do get stressed, I tend to just avoid the situation for a little bit. Helps me not get angry. Haven't had an actual angry fight with anybody (sober) since I was 15. Still get tilted by video games and shit, but that's not really stress i dont think 
Yes, this. I used to stress real bad when the boss pushed me to finish projects asap (to the point where I'd make mistakes). Then I started to tell myself "I can't really go any faster so I'll do my best, the best way I know how" And just focused on my task. I dont stress too bad anymore. 
I think it can work you train yourself. The difference between how my girlfriend and I handle stress is as different as can be. If I can't control or change something I don't let it stress me because i figure whats the point. She on the other hand steesses *because* she has no control. 
As a clam, can confirm. I vomit before every presentation 
Internally I am having a panic attack. On the outside I act relaxed and calm because anything else would make me feel even worse. 
But he kept on forgetting, what he wrote down, the whole crowd got so loud, he opened his mouth but the words wouldn't come out. 
They're worsened and precipitated by *H. pylori*, but it's not like they're exclusively an infectious disease, either. Overuse of NSAIDs like aspirin will do you, too. 
Ah, but people do not always recognize power. Diplomacy is the art of making your power known without encouraging others to test it. 
This thread is actually frustrating to me because all the top level comment seem to be saying "it's easy, you just be calm! It's illogical to worry about stuff you can't control." I know it's illogical, that doesn't stop me from worrying because my monkey brain doesn't work purely on logic. Ugh. 
This is a huge lesson that doesn't get taught nearly enough. In fact the exact opposite seems to be vastly more emphasized: that you have to Do All The Things on your own, without admitting weakness or seeking out help, in order to succeed at anything. And that people will think less of you, or you'll be punished in some way, if you appear "weak". But the crazy thing is that I've noticed people think *better* of you if you ask for their help or admit that you're struggling. They're more willing to be understanding or accommodating about your problems if you reach out to them when you first start struggling. 
It really does, friend. I had a bunch of damage to my nervous system and muscles after a bad case of Rocky Mountain Spotted Fever. The amount of mental growth it has caused through coping with endless pain is absurd and I almost cherish the experience as a fundamental formative influence on my core morality and outlook on life. 
Not op but I'm around people like that at work *all the time*. It's the worst. I'm more of a go with the flow, do your work, go home kinda gal. Shitty customer being a dick? Smile through it, move on. Order not pulled? Instead of getting angry that so & so was supposed to do it, just pull it, move on. Co worker throwing a fit? Walk away move on. However, I've found that a lot of times that shit bites me in the ass. People take advantage, walk all over, so on. This is a shitty thing to do, but... Sometimes I pretend to freak out about something because I feel like it's the only way I can get people off my back 
I think you could generalize this to being strong for other people. There is a lot you can do when it's for someone else instead of yourself. 
WHY ARE JOJO REFERENCES ALWAYS IN ALL CAPS? ! ......NANI!?!?!? 
I enjoy living and breathing so much. I would hate for it to end. I have a fear of the unknown. To live forever is crazy, to die forever is crazy. 
Instructions unclear. Clenched anus too hard, broke buttplug and got pieces of glass all up my colon. How do I proceed? 
Yes I think this is a big factor for a lot of people. I don't rage at minor things because I have had to deal with real shit. 
YOU CAN JUST DOUBLE PRESS THE UPPERCASE BUTTON, FREAKING RETARTED! (unless you already knew that, and that's what you meant by "caps lock" on smartphone, in which case, sorry) 
Haha is that what it is? It makes sense. Every fight I've won I only won once I was cornered or pinned down and couldn't do anything else. Suddenly I'd explode. When I was in college I chased out some homeless dude who tried to break into my apartment. Chased him for a full block waving a baseball bat over my head, wearing nothing but a t-shirt, boxers and long socks flopping in the rain puddles. Then had a "wtf am I doing" moment and walked home embarrassed. The crackhead who lived upstairs cackled at me and said "what the hell you doing white boy?" and I felt like an idiot. 
I'm seriously proud of you. Most people wouldn't be able to come out of a situation like that with such positive outcomes. I don't mean for your family but for your own self worth and self respect. Similar things happened to me and Im very independent because of it. 
How did you do that? I feel like that's something I've been trying to figure out for a while. 
I just want to thank you for this. Im not your kid, but thank you for drinking AFTER your kids are in bed. The world needs more parents like you. 
And you can speed up the process with a quick and easy bullet to the brain. Believe it or not, this simple trick allows for your body to undergo the erosion process much sooner than if you let it happen on its own. 
I lost my wife seven weeks ago, through the whole ordeal of her illness and her death her large family, her friends and my family all told me how I was making it so easy on them & my wife with my calm demeanor and steady hand in getting shit done. Now that it's over I'm a ball of anxiety and indecisiveness with some "don't give a fuck" thrown in. I try to be grateful for the 25 years we had together but I'm broken- I hope I can get where you are. 
Being loving and being a simpleton is far from going hand in hand. That's honestly the biggest problem. Being loving is a different kind of intelligence that honestly I see more often in people that are considered generally intelligent than those that are considered stupid or average. No doubt some of the most loving people I've ever met, I would honestly consider unintelligent, but I can appreciate an intelligent loving person much more as stupid love can seem deep, but is ultimately very shallow. 
It sounds like an idea to me... Discussing people is like "can you BELIEVE what Sarah said to him yesterday like omg" 
There's a difference between "having stress" and being "stressed out." Everyone experiences stress and deals with it in their own way. It just takes practice to keep yourself from getting too stressed out 
It sneaks up on you. Then four years later you're still smoking a bowl browsing r/leaves wondering wtf it is about life without weed that's somehow become so bleak. Or maybe not, idk. People are different lol 
Again, it goes back to knowing the difference. For example, if you were a black person in the early 1960s (pre Civil Rights), you would accept that the society wouldn't magically change to your liking, but do what you can do: join the Civil Rights movement, the demonstrations, etc. Just do your part and let the rest go. 
It is easy and both hard. How do you play piano so well? Practice. Ten years of daily practice. This isn't any different. Do you have a mantra that you repeat in your head? Do you do meditation? Have you tried to control your emotions? It's all practicing the art of being calm. How are you so calm? You're either born that way or most likely you practiced. 
It's because vulnerability fosters trust. Personally i think this is essential to our survival. If you know another man's limits you know of he is a threat or not. If he is not a threat then you can trust him. This is just really an opinion though. 
I admire your positive attitude toward the situation. I was diagnosed with ulcerative colitis about 4 years ago at age 24, which is pretty bad but not life-threatening or anything. But I found out earlier this year that some of the original medications I took for it ended up destroying my kidneys (very rare hypersensitive reaction). I've gone through some dialysis and am looking forward to a transplant. It's been tough to deal with, but has a real impact on how I view life, much like you said. 
Don't feel shitty about that last part. Sometimes they need to get the message 
It's odd how consistently true that is; I feel stressed and anxious a LOT of the time, but put me in a situation with another visibly stressed person and it's like a switch flips and I go into problem solving mode. It feels great, to be honest, and I wish I could react to my OWN stress that way. 
Oh crap, is this a HxH reference? I just started a few months ago! (Still in Heaven's Arena right now) 
That's for the wolf skin. I think the appropiate shout for that skin is OKAMI WAKA TEKI WO KURAU 
And I find it kinda funny, I find it kinda sad The dreams in which I'm dying are the best I've ever had 
[ ](/bpshrug) Put in another buttplug in to help you calm down? 
Yea, it's crazy how it's uncontrollable. Very dangerous really. And people won't cut us slack, they aren't going to give us credit for being good and quiet 99.9% of the time. I had a guy break in my room in Cambodia while I was sleeping and I did the same shit. Chased him along the hotel balcony railing, down two stories and into the jungle with my spear gun just screaming foul shit. It was awful. At the time you're like: THIS IS THE ONLY WAY. THIS IS THE ONLY WAY TO KEEP MY DIGNITY AND BE SAFE. But when it wears off you feel like a crazy person. 
You're not falling apart - you have 60+ years to fix yourself and build a new life. Hypertension is cheap and easy to control using beta blockers. See a doctor. 
Cut off relationships with people you can't communicate or be authentic with. Find healthy outlets for aggression like althetics/exercise/art Form a good relationship with a therapist who you can use as a soundboard when you feel like you can't trust your own feelings LSD helped me understand myself a lot differently and changed my thinking in a positive way It's more difficult if you're female, I find. Society encourages women to repress anger, and encourages men to repress sadness, so a lot of depressed women don't seem to have anger problems on the outside, but have just gotten very good at hiding it, even to themselves Also reading about psychology and child abuse was useful for understanding how I came to be the way I am and learning not to automatically blame myself for my initial reactions 
I mean I have a beer sometimes while cooking dinner. And/or with dinner. But that first beer takes me an hour or more to get through. I used to drink a lot more. Then I got married and had a baby. Now it's like ooh I had a tough day I'm gonna stay up till 1am and drink 3. Or even 4! There's a lot of alcoholism in my family and depression too so I try to keep that in check. 
There's a Buddhist teaching that speaks to wisdom giving rise naturally to compassion, but that compassion without wisdom is actually dangerous. Notice it's got nothing to do with intelligence but rather what you have learned about the world. The greater your wisdom (which comes with experience) the greater your compassion will naturally be. It's possible to have wisdom without being the most intelligent person but if you don't have wisdom, and you just have "stupid love", as you put it, that's just foolish. 
Well done! I'm an alcoholic myself, albeit a habitual rather than chronic one (ie. it's escapism, self-medication, and functional alcoholism, rather than a very serious medical condition of fucking your life up through it completely controlling you). Of course, I don't know which category you fall in to, but I find that folk who've been through the program are usually the latter (you don't usually have to resort to the program if you're a functional alcoholic like me). I have huge sympathy for folk who are in that position (I've known a fair few), and huge respect for those who manage to overcome it (known a fair few of them too). Respect mate. I'd wish you luck, but that's for folk who need it--at 35 years I hope you've got that shit firmly under wraps. All the best. :) 
It's not a bad start, and explains why men who fear their own vulnerability tend to react to requests for help with ridicule. I think there's more to it than trust, though, as mocking children through their learning process is still a very common problem. When you make someone dislike learning, they aren't going to seek out opportunities to make themselves vulnerable. 
This is huge for me. Whenever I experience something in my mind that I view as bad, I stop and think: I'm healthy, I can see, I can hear, I can taste and I have a very loving family. Nothing is really ever bad for me and this mindset helps me get through a lot. I take nothing for granted and I wish more people had the same mindset because I have friends who complain about small things and I always just think to myself how lucky they really are compared to some people who have lost things or people that were huge parts of their life. 
Here hoping they don't implement realistic health issues in the Togashi-bot 
Ryuu means dragon so thats on all the skins and okami should be on the wolf i presume. 
Youjustgottaswordsdancechargechargethunderbolt 
As a small child, when my beloved hamster died, my dad said "We'll bury him at sea", and flushed him down the toilet. I'm not quite sure why, but your post just made me remember being 6 years old and standing by the shitter, saying a prayer as my little friend disappeared round the U-bend. 
I'm the same way. But I didn't grow up in an abusive household. I'm always a chill and calm person even in the most dire situation. But if it suddenly escalate and involves my life, family or SO, I goes into an uncontrollable rage. 
I'm working on the first part and I have for a while, mainly members of my family. Without getting into too many details, my parents divorce messed me up quite a lot, my therapist and I have an ongoing dialogue about it. I've thought about trying LSD or mushrooms before to see if it would change anything, but there are some obstacles that would stop me from trying that I can't really control, and there's someone I'd like to try it with that can't now either and might not want to. Maybe it's something for another time and place. 
Drinking in front of your kids isn't inherently bad. It's getting drunk in front of your kids on a regular basis that fucks them up. Seeing pops a little weird once or twice isn't gonna do a kids head in, and certainly neither will casual and responsible drinking such as you've described. There's a balance to be had but I feel like the stigma is going too far some times and demonizing anyone who isn't seemingly 200% devoting their energy and focus on their kids. 
Thank you. And I mean that sincerely. I just got lucky, really lucky. 
But swords dance raises physical attack and thunderbolt is a special attack. 
HELLO FELLOW HUMANS. IT IS PLEASING TO SEE WE ARE ABANDONING THE ILLOGICAL USE OF NON-UNIFORM CHARACTERS. I CAN TELL YOU ARE ALL TRUSTWORTHY MEAT BAGS LIKE ME. 
There's dozens of us. My SO sometimes gets really frustrated that I too am not screaming in an argument. So she'll poke and poke and twist until I literally scream from anger, then she realizes I do have feelings, I just don't advertise them to the world or know how to communicate them very well. I don't know man, seems superfluous to get all wound up unless something's actually going down. I didn't have an abusive childhood or anything, it's just how my dad is and I inherited that calmness. 
I like the awareness you're showing. I did the "maybe shrooms will fix me" test run, and it didn't change much, but that's just me. It was a nice distraction for a little while though, but my issue is that I escape and create distractions to avoid the areas in my life that I need to focus on. Didn't help that I went right back into the pattern of behavior and habits that led me down the hole right after I did it. It took me being depressed for a long time before I sought professional help, stopped self-medicating, and am reading a lot to fix my mindset/worldview. I just got tired of feeling so down and not being productive. Hope you find peace, it took me forever, and not being that way is very new to me. It's a little scary, little exciting, but I'm no longer spiraling the drain. Just my 2 cents (the value of commentary is too cheap these days, we need to adjust for inflation). 
Aah man. I'm a bit down and it's nice to think I brought a bit of happiness into someone's life today. You take care mate, and thank YOU (also sincerely)! :) 
The accepted "science" regarding salt consumption is based mostly on a study in the 60s that was not particularly rigorous and hasn't been replicated. The sugar industry sponsored a bunch of studies to blame fat for our poor health. I'm just going to eat what I enjoy and die young. 
We also don't know if e * pi is irrational. But we know at least of the two (e + pi or e * pi) are irrational, but we have no idea which one. 
It's also possible that a regular breakfast is a sign that a child has a stable home environment, which can be a factor in their performance in school. 
There was a group in Germany in the 40s that was researching this, I can't remember what happened exactly but they didn't complete the experiment. *A lot of people are pointing out that this was in fact the crazy Soviets and not the crazy Nazis. If anybody has used this as a source for any academic papers I offer my sincerest apologies for the mistake. 
And make food taste 100x worse. Salt and pepper are magical. 
I also feel like because personalities have such variation, each method probably has benefit for some group of kids. The idea that there is a one size fits all method for everyone is completely ridiculous. 
Even though it hasn't been scientifically proven and we won't know for sure until then, it makes sense from a biological standpoint that fish would feel pain, and it would be far more astounding if they do not. It seems that the incentive to claiming that fish don't feel pain is to alleviate the guilt from all the fucked up thing we do to fish. 
Shouldn't it be the other way around? Having sex doesn't decrease testosterone but the opposite, or am I misinformed? 
This is the response I was looking for. The scientific prcess can only provide evidence that something is true. The more evidence you have the more likely it is that it's true but you can never say that something is scientifically proven. This was hammered into me by my highschool science classes but I don't think it's really being taught anymore. 
I read that the original study said something like you need the equivalent of 8 cups of water (aka 2 litres) a day but most of it came in the food you ate, so you basically only need a couple of glasses of actual water to supplement what you can't already get from your food. 
Okay, as a summary of the recent literature (which I know well), SSRIs are a good choice for moderate-severe depression. For mild to moderate depression, they show increased efficacy compared to placebo but the increased efficacy isn't clinically significant. Basically, what that means, is that we can tell they are working, but from that data it's questionable whether its worth using them since placebo does pretty much the same thing. Some people argue that they are worth considering because there might be individual differences in the response to different SSRIs. Maybe true, maybe not. It's not wrong to prescribe them for mild to moderate depression, but it isn't clear that you should either. More severe depression is more clear. 
"It clears out toxins!" ...Whats a toxin? "You know, Chemicals!" ...you're going to have to be more specific...everything is made of chemicals. 
I think the problem is that while it probably does have clinical applications there's a bit of a habit amongst recreational users to promote it as a panacea to try and gain support for legalisation. 
After a heart attack and minor heart surgery in 1995, I was put an a very strict diet of almost no fat or processed carbs. Nothing but fruits and vegetables. In 2001, I was told to start making final arrangements as my health was deteriorating. I figured fuck it and started eating all foods. I'm doing much better now. 
I am not an expert, but my understanding is that the current body of evidence strongly supports the "mars-sized object struck early earth" hypothesis, and any problems with that hypothesis are probably on the margins. 
Why? You're not going to believe me, and you're going to make me do it again. 
Probably because the "Self" is not a discrete region of the brain, but rather an elaborate construction of the various parts of ones entire body as well as being heavily dependent on memory 
And here I hear that fat is fine, but sugar is bad. If that means I can eat bacon, I think this is correct. 
I have a degree in nutrition and it was basically 4 years of that. I came out more confused than I started. 
Yeah but government nutritionists spent the better part of 2 decades shoving that stupid food pyramid down our throats, demonizing important dietary fats and instructing a whole generation of kids to eat 6-11 portions of carbs per day. 
don't question it....just enjoy this free ride on this random rock hurling through space :) 
Predicting an event from previous experiments is much easier than having a deep understanding of the process. For instance, measuring earth's gravity and its effects on moving bodies is easy (it's an interesting high school experiment), you can easily deduct Newton's formulas for classical mechanic... but you won't be even close to understand how gravity works (that's actually the one of the 4 forces we understand the least today.) 
I feel like this is the always present confounding variable in all of these studies. Especially shit like, "kids who play music for 2 hours a day are more likely to go to an Ivy school", playing with certain toys, reading, etc, etc. Well yeah, kids who have parents that can afford to buy them instruments, pay for expensive lessons, and push their children to work hard for things and succeed are probably more likely to go to Harvard. I think in each case it says more about your home life than the actual activity. If your mom takes 30 minutes a day to read to you, she probably also does all kinds of other good mom things that gives you a leg up as well. 
Also an interesting testament to how powerful advertisement is in shaping our beliefs 
No matter how innocent I am, I will never, ever take a lie detector test. 
I'm not familiar with this episode, but I'm guessing this is the Brandon Mayfield case?Where a print from Madrid was identified to him (he's in Oregon I think) by the FBI. This wasn't a case of his print being identical to the Madrid print, but of the FBI just fucking up. The prints are different. But again, I haven't even seen the episode. 
Is there any unethical experiment that was *not* attempted by the Nazis? 
Well they're part of the same genus as us (homo) and if memory serves me correctly, usually things of the same genus can successfully reproduce sexually. 
Well there's a certain gorilla whom we have fucked this last year... 
People get that salt is a vital necessity for life, right? 
I saw this great article making the point that no one insists there is one 'right' way to be a spouse. We all understand that the person who is happily married to our best friend would be a terrible match for us. But when it comes to parenting it is so easy to slip into this 'one size fits all' mindset. 
Also, keep in mind that for a 28 day cycle, the farthest apart two could be is 14 days, and the average separation will be about a week. Starting your period within a few days of someone else is a much less impressive coincidence than it intuitively seems. 
Yep. Fish have a central nervous system, they have nociceptors (nerves made to receive pain signals). They clearly react to harmful stimuli (thrashing wildly when hooked). Even if they don't feel "pain" like we think of it, it's pretty clear that getting dragged through the water via a metal spike through their lip is not something they enjoy. 
Also, most parents don't just cram their kids full of sugary snacks all day. Kids mostly eat large amounts of cake, cookies, and candy during exciting events: Halloween, birthday parties, Christmas, etc. Your kid is jumping around after he ate all that cake because he just turned 6, all his friends are there, you're about to give him presents, and he's at fucking Chuckie Cheese. The kid could have never even looked at sugar in his life and he'd be bouncing around in that situation. 
As a dad, when you get a dozen 6 year olds together, it doesn't matter what you feed them. Took my kid to the park too many times where nothing was eaten. They're still running around like maniacs. 
Go on a crime spree and they'll blame it on your doppelfinger. 
And even worse, its math probably uses more letters than numbers 
Rhonda Rousey said she has as much sex as possible before a match to build up her testosterone. Don't know if that's true either. 
That's my thing. Ever since I got my wisdom teeth taken out, my teeth have more space in between them. Whenever I eat I get something stuck between my 2 back molars almost instantly. If I don't floss the food out of there pretty soon, it starts to get painful and it definitely stinks like crazy when I do finally get the food out. I keep floss at home, at work, in the car, and in my travel toiletry kit. 
Not really hard; at terminal velocity. Lets keep it scientific 
It's the British Medical Journal and dated December 18 (2003), I think the BMJ puts out a satirical issue or at least a few humerous articles around Christmas each year. 
Where do i sign up for this "throwing exes out of airplanes" experiment? 
My dad did a lot of research on this when he was younger and that's pretty much what he said. The reasons studies on SSRIs can show such variant results is because the cutoffs for how depressed people have to be to participate will vary. With catatonic depression, like people who are so depressed they will just lay in bed and piss themselves because they can't be bothered to get up, SSRIs are overwhelmingly immensely helpful. They milder the depression, the less likely they are to do much. 
"You eating lunch?" "Yeah! It's totally chemical free! Sooo good!" "Neat! Can I have some?" "Sure!" "...this bowl is full of vacuum." "Yup." 
And that's why I don't like Liver. Id rather not eat the filter. 
It seems like an overreaction in response to the overreaction of the schedule 1 designation and the continuance of 100% federal prohibition despite waves of state law turning in favor of legalization/decriminalization/medical usage. If weed were a schedule 3/4/5 (like it should be) and decriminalized, you'd see far fewer rants about how amazing weed is because there would be more research and hard science, and much less misinformation, stigma and resentment over the whole situation. But maybe I'm baised because I have chronic pain and wish that I could actually get my hands on CBD oil (doesn't make you very high at all), because I hate taking opiates and refuse to. It's unreal that we ignore CBD oil when opaites are ravaging so many communities in our country. 
The other day I was reading that ancient reptilians found a small planet, hollowed it out and turned the inside into a space-station, then towed it to earth. It began to orbit the earth and caused all sorts of huge tidal waves and tsunamis. The reptilians descended on the earth and announced that they would only cease the destruction if we offered the reptilians to feed off our soul's energy and cycles. Once the early humans agreed the reptilians moved the moon into a more stable orbit and they have spent centuries living deep within the moon, feeding off our reincarnation dungeon that they have created to feed on our souls for time eternal. 
Feels even better if you store it in the fridge first! 
I really wish that nutritionists would just start every discussion with something like "look, we just don't know. However..." Because that sure seems to be the reality of the situation. And there's nothing really wrong with that. We'll figure out the information eventually, but in the meantime the last thing we need is Pepsi Co., and Nabisco telling us what we *should* be thinking. 
Oh yeah. All that damn bread. What the hell was that about? 
Like an NPC you just have to keep asking the same thing to to get them to exhaust all their dialogue. 
When I'm asked a question in an accusatory way, I look as guilty as sin every time, even when I'm not guilty, which is 99.9% of the time.. I would suck at a polygraph. 
A lot of times they just go by "partial prints" I wonder how many people have been charged with crimes, simply because their fingerprints were in a database and not the actual criminal. 
If both the human and chimp genome get fully sequenced, how much of this experimentation could be done with computer simulation/modeling? 
Wouldn't doubt it if there's some sick fucks out there fucking other primates. They just don't happen to be scientists. 
Do you want a Planet of the Apes type scenario? Cause that's how you get a Planet of the Apes 
If they weren't, they were probably done by the japanese in the same timeperiod. 
Apes. They wanted to mix a gorilla with a lady. The difference is that apes don't have tails. 
But the average person living in the first world will get their daily amount of salt just by eating food they would normally eat. Most get excess. 
Any way to test whether you're a "salt sensitive" individual? 
Idk. I've had people tell me I can't be a good wife if I don't fix my husband's plate, or he must be a bad husband if he goes to a bachelor party. People love to criticize. 
The way I look at it - if while growing up, my older brother and I did something bad, taking away something I liked would probably have had a stronger impact on me than spankings. But my brother didn't really need things or privileges to entertain himself, so spankings definitely would have been more effective. 
Hooked a fish through the eye when I was 12. It flailed around and broke the string and fell back into the water. havnt been fishing since 
And not just english letters.. I've had to learn greek, roman, chalkboard and russian letters to do math classes now.. 
god imagine how many people got false hope from that 
Also what kind of shitty measurement is "a glass"? Eta reddit piling on as always. 
Thing is flossing isn't for your teeth, it's for your gums. 
Just use cadavers or crash test dummies (the object, not the band). 
Boy just go to Argentina and make friends with a high ranking politician 
I read somewhere on Reddit that anytime you see "toxins", replace it with "bad juju", and your view of things will clear up a little bit. 
It's a self-fulfilling prophecy: Schedule 1 means extremely difficult to research, little research means little proof, means little reason to change the schedule. But weed advocates do need to tone down their message to, "we need deregulation to help advance research" not "Weed cures cancer, makes your dick bigger, and puts a ferrari in your garage" 
This sounds suspicious but I do not know enough about Reptilian Aliens to dispute this 
Thanks for telling me that in THE MIDDLE OF WINTER 
Farm subsidies/agriculture lobbies, I'd stake my reputation on it. 
I find this to be true in life far too often. Especially in IT. 
Good question! I'll give you an example that hopefully makes this easy: Imagine you have 4 balls of different colors. Red, Blue, Green, Yellow. You are interested in how many ways you can arrange them. You work out that you can arrange them in 24 ways because 4 x 3 x 2 x 1 = 24 Next you want to know how many ways the balls can be arranged with the red and green balls next to eachother. You're not sure how to do this yet, but you know the answer must be lower than 24. That is how math problems can have lower and upper bounds. It can be much easier to find solutions that you know are above or below the exact answer, even if you don't know the exact answer yet. 
I've taken several and eventually pass each one. It's a condition of my employment unfortunately. 
There's a story about a shaved orangutan that was rescued from a brothel. 
The first problem here is that a person with a dick is trying to fuck a male monkey. Of the potentially possible ways to make a human/primate hybrid, this is not one. 
If Earth can be conquered by a humanzee embryo in a petridish maybe we deserve to get fucked up. 
At least the Japanese kept their results so it wasn't all in vain. 
Which makes it easier for them to go Super Saiyan? 
What?!? We can put a man on the Moon, but we can't impregnate a nice gorilla?!? What kind of backwards-assed thinking is that?!? 
You'd think this would be important to test so that people can avoid health issues. 
Is fixing someone else's plate a southern thing? Heard it referenced somewhere else, never really understood it. 
Went fishing last summer, haven't gone fishing since. 
**SPACE IS FUCKING COOL AS SHIT** **ASTEROIDS AND COMETS BLITZ** **DINOSAURS THAT THOSE COMETS HIT** **SMASH SHIT UP TO TINY BITS** - **BLACK HOLES, FUCKING TERRIFYING** **GRAVITY IS SENSE-DEFYING** **EVERYTHING IS FUCKING DYING** **TIME AND SPACE ARE PURIFYING** - **HOLY SHIT LOOK AT THOSE QUASARS** **LOOKING LIKE THEYRE SHOOTING LAZARS** **LIKE A STAR WITH TWO HAND PHASERS** **THEYRE THE GODDAMN COSMIC BLAZERS** 
I think 8 fl oz is meant to be the standard for a "glass." At least, that's what I remember hearing. 
I stopped drinking milk and cut back on dairy... that has helped me for some reason. They still happen, but way less frequently. 
Nope. Dishes and silverware emerge ala loony toons. 
Once.... There was this man who.... Took a jump out of a plane And didn't bring a parachute... And when.... He finally landed..... They Found His head and legs were all missing! They said that it was from when He hit the ground so......hard Mmmmm mmmm mmm mmmm Mmmmm mmmm mmm mmmm 
Go skiing when it's sunny out sometime... all the sunlight reflecting off the snow can actually give you sunburn -- you just don't feel it since you're freezing your ass off. 
It's also a temptingly doable study. It's not like you need a particle collider. I can never forget reading about a woman who was worried about her kids and diet drinks so she, you can only assume calmly and deliberately, bought a shit ton of rats and a shit ton of aspartame and set up some cages in her own garage. 
Almost certainly. WIC, a program ostensibly to provide pregnant/nursing women and very young (newborn to age five) children with good nutrition, is in reality a clusterfuck of food subsidies. It's pretty widely agreed, for instance, that infant cereals are a poor choice for first foods, but WIC still provides them. They also give out a ton of juice, which is pretty terrible for little kids, and when the idea of reducing the milk supplement in favor of increasing fruits and vegetables was floated, the dairy lobby forced the government to backtrack pretty fast. 
Yea I'm pretty sure you're dead on. You get kept awake so that they can do simple cognition tests to ensure they aren't fucking up. 
I watched the documentary where they rescued her. It was awful. It's really not a joking matter. The poor girl. She was shaved and tied up and the men would come and pay to have sex with her. Despicable. 
You heard it here first boys. If you want to get your name written in history here's your chance. 
Second problem: if you're fucking a monkey you aren't fucking a chimp 
The Nazis did too. It just depends on whether the US or the Soviets captured them. Part of the deal for not prosecuting the Japanese for their crimes was the turn over of all of their data. 
Are we going to sedate it first? I'm pretty ballsy, but getting down with a gorilla feels excessively dangerous. 
I have real life RadX (Potassium iodine pills) because I live within 50km of a nuclear power plant. 
A lot of personal variation/sensitivity in nutrition is only just now being established scientifically, and we haven't quite adjusted our health care approaches to account for it. I think that routine testing for how you respond to salt, sugar, and some common trigger foods (possibly some FODMAPS stuff) would be incredibly useful for preventative health measures, allowing people to tailor their diet to their personal needs early in life, but that's very much a fringe idea right now. 
A southern thing and a black thing... if you go to a cookout or family party where the food is served buffet style, the wife fixes a plate of food and brings it to her husband. I like to do things for him, but we would both rather just get our own food in that situation. 
I've been born since 81 haven't gone fishing since. 
In addition to this, these people have spent years getting as fit as possible, theyre as fit and fine as they've *ever* been. Now throw a couple hundred of these sexy sleek bastards together.... yeah id be fuggin too. 
Your sister was caught fucking in a dumpster, wasn't she? 
Can confirm, work for WIC. We provide a ridiculously laughable number of dollars for fruits and vegetables and an excessive amount of milk for children. Don't even get me started on the baby cereal and juice amounts that we provide. It's honestly insulting to all of the schooling in nutrition I have had in order to even qualify to apply for a job at WIC. 
'Who's the President?" "SPINACH!" "Aw shit Carl, a bit to the left." 
Hi. We'd like you to meet your new humanzee biological daughter. Unfortunately she carries the chimpanzee tendency to rip people's faces off she doesn't like. Enjoy! 
That literally sounds awful. Fuck. I think that ruined my night. 
Not only this, but all the holidays involve food somehow. Like "they couldn't kill us, and now we eat." That's pretty badass. 
I also lived a dozen miles or so from a nuclear power plant. One that resides directly over a fault line. I declined my pill every year. Best case scenario? Nothing happens. Worst case scenario? I become a ghoul and get to see how accurate Fallout was. 
That sounds super annoying. He has hands and specific preferences. I would be mildly annoyed if anyone tried to fix a plate for me. Maybe I want some more macaroni than potato today, maybe! 
like, you're stuck partway out of the vagina since '81? 
I can hear it now.. "Hey, what are you doing tonight?" 'What's your event?' "Curling" 'I'm busy' 
that how the imperial system happened. hey my stick is 2384742 poppys long that almost a million twobbles, or whatever. 
You joke, but this is pretty much what they did with Rosemary Kennedy. They had her sing the national anthem, if I remember right, and stopped when she became incoherent. 
Good advi.....l;kasdf;lknvlkj;wesfoiu432ljk;asfdlmkn;vdasfoi[ujfdes 
You most likely felt the water in your head not your brain, unless you have some sort of mutated brain that has nerve endings in which case you'd be the only human to ever do so. 
"Do you know how long it took to train this monkey to suck my dick without peeling it?" 
Yeah I know :( Took me a while to not have it on my mind 24/7. 
That's just not true. As a Canadian, I'd fuck the fuck outta a curler on principle. 
My car gets 3 leagues per hogshead of unleaded gasoline. 
Of course it does, it's been observed. Gravity could not, hitherto-fore, have decided to act on the anvil/piano due to the simple fact that gravity didn't know it was there. Then gravity saw it, with its eyes, and thought "Well, shit, I should be exerting ~~a force~~ myself on that!" I mean, it's basic science, man. 
yes, though your neurological status is not accurate when having a brain surgery due to medication(s). you'll be incoherent, but I guess there is a degree of incoherence. 
The main deal is that you cannot feel *pain* in brain tissue. This is why headaches are generally vascular or meningeal (migraines notwithstanding). 
The Nazis didn't just kill Jews. I wish people would remember that. 
Well the average gorilla is like 2 inches so you should be fine. 
You've just observed the Warner Brothers Observation Principle. 
Additionally, the Japanese did not just screw over and kill Chinese people. Pretty much everyone in the region was impacted, Korea being a major case. 
How many did you use? My mom was friends with someone at the Oakland Coliseum and he'd give her stacks of promotional coupons and my mom would give them to her 4 kids. One year he gave us thousands of free chalupa coupons. I feel kinda bad for going to Taco Bell every day after school with 10-20 friends and all getting just 1 free chalupa each. For like 6 months. 
As kids, we all dreamt big. *(sheds a single tropicana juice tear)* 
What the FUCK is wrong with your mom? That's free food! 
Smart man you can't make money running track but you CAN make money running numbers 
I've seen that BS before. Some company offers a lifetime supply of something because "One is all you will ever need!" I'm honestly surprised you even got the 2nd and 3rd out of them. 
I'm picturing this kid coming to school in his aluminum foil shoes, carrying his aluminum foil lunchbox, and eating his aluminum foil apples. I'd totally be friends with this kid. 
Amazing and honest story. Thank you. How's it going now? 
At first In read that as 12 cases per month. I was impressed. 
For whatever reason I find the idea that I will supposedly spend $37,000 on pizza in my lifetime kind of depressing 
Buy money from the US Mint with them. I have a few hundred $1 gold coins because I had a $250 gift card I couldn't use. Even shipped them to me for free. Then you have the problem of getting rid of coins no one really uses. I use them for tips (Uber, etc.) 
Thats when you remove the tower, and claim that the original contract was void as the new company is not respecting the deal. 
That's harsh man. Traded in your wife for a new one just so you didn't have to pay a cable bill. 
If I had to eat one food for the rest of my life, what would it be? That's easy. Pez. Cherry flavoured pez. 
How did you win *twice*? I like cheese. I want to win cheese. 
I love that he buys random peoples' meals. That's probably a lot more satisfying than getting more food. 
I would contact all of those places in the area and tell them it was stolen and if anyone new comes in using it, that it was yours. I would track down that asshole who stole my wallet containing free chicken. 
In what world is 12 pairs of chucks a lifetime supply? That's like, 10-20 year supply tops. 
Holy shit. $25 a day. Personally I think that is one of the best "Lifetime Supply" of anything in this thread lol 
I also have free internet for life, as long as I'm within the service area. I'm a founding member of my ISP (4th employee.) I've had 10Mbps up and down dedicated with a static IP free for the last about 12 years. They install it at any place I move to also, but I probably won't be moving for awhile since I just bought a house. 
I am envisioning this as the lead-in to a complex metaphor in an economics textbook. 
Well, with all of those vouchers, she's probably your doughnut queen now, right? 
Did you bankrupt them by pulling the "unlimited coffee" angle? 
so you won a 12-pack of ice cream, and on an installment plan... 
I asked for this after I shot my Taco Bell commercial. They said no :( 
Used coffee beans are great to put into a compost heap incase you didn't know. Very high in nitrogen and they mold and decay fast. 
If we ever have Armageddon she'll be set with that closetful of barter-roni. 
You outlived Blockbuster! That's not a lifetime supply! 
Your story is a pretty good indicator of why he lost at Jeopardy... 
"Hey Jim I got a great idea on how to boost our declining revenue! Let's fuck our current customers!" 
So if you're up to answering more questions... 1. Was there a lump sum payout option and if so why didn't you take that? 2. Is the $2k before or after tax? 3. Did it affect your relationship in any way? 4. Did it affect your job in any way? 5. You seem so lackluster about it... Is $2k insignificant to you and if so why did you play the lotto? I'll ask a ton more if you have the patience. I'm fucking obsessed with hearing about people who won Lottos. 
pretty sure if i won a millions worth of candy i could turn that into atleast 250k selling that shit at the flea market or music festivals or something 
So wookiee life debt, but with cell coverage. That's a sweet deal. 
if it was in a hospital he probably can't. lots of hospitals have clauses in their contracts that doctors/nurses can't accept personal gifts from patients. 
I caught a grocery store marking down Reese Cup Eggs down to $0.05 and bought like 5 boxes of them. My wife and I don't really like them anymore... 
As a teacher, that's a pretty ineffective "fuck you." Most of those papers will be about either some currently popular or "classic" artist or movie, or maybe a pet, family member, or friend. That's all good and well, but I would be very excited to hear about some weird kid's undying love of paprika. 
Donate them to shelters. Homeless or abandoned kids would probably love a candybar. People donate stuff like cloths and basic food all the time, though surely not often enough... But that said, people like that don't get things like candy often enough because it is considered to be a luxury at that level. 
Or in the bathroom for so long that their phone has died. 
Joke's on you, I got a lifetime supply of condoms for free. 
Panicked Manager: "God damn it Gary! We are going fucking broke with these kids and their fucking free chalupa coupons! We've lost money every day for the past two quarters!!" 
For years as a teenager I got a subscription for Christmas bc I loved it so much :) 
"Alright Andy, show the class your Science Fair Project" *props up aluminum foil 3 panel poster, showing project titled 'Aluminum Foil: America's Greatest Resource?', spelled out in aluminum foil* 
Pretty sure it would be easier and more cost effective to just sell them online as-is. 
Good thanks! I have two kids, live in a palm springs suburb and work at Walgreens. 
At Domino's we can see how.much a particular phone number has spent. Always amazed how high that number is for people who have been ordering for years 
I believe they ended the free shipping because people were using them to accumulate credit card points. 
To be honest, I was a little intoxicated so I don't remember exactly how it went down, and I was just too lazy to open mine since I had seen others around me doing the same. I remember there were instructions not to open till the end and there was a lot of temptation before the final announcement. 
Pretty much spot on. It quickly becaome, "Goddamn it. Here comes Sandra and this time she has apple pie, apple crisp, frozen apples, apple cores, dried apples, apple chips, those creepy old people dolls with rotten apple faces, apples specifically to put into a pig's mouth, apple cider, apple juice, apple seeds, apple stems, an apple tree, apple butter, candy apples, bacon wrapped apples, apple sandwiches, apple polenta, apple pancakes, and several empty apple barrels." 
We managed to use almost all of the first delivery out of sheer desperation and likely Catholic guilt so nothing was wasted. The apple-pushers were apparently not very understanding that my parents didn't want over 1,300 apples a year, but in the end we were able to stop the madness. I feel safe in assuming my parents would have found a suitable donation situation in the event that our kitchen was forcibly turned into an orchard once a month. 
Not sure if the contract was ever written down by the first company. My grandma made it sound like some sort of gentleman's agreement so part of the problem may have been with records of it. My grandpa then passed away and the farm went to his grandkid (he was my step-grandpa) so that further complicated things. My grandma just now has a pay as you go since she uses a landline anyways. Still, she was livid. 
It's a bittersweet time in every young girl's life when her grandfather comes to her and her sisters, hands them a box and says, "Stick these in your lady business. I'll be back next month with more." 
Wagon Train's a really cool show, but did you notice they never get anywhere? They just keep wagon training. 
It was a "Who eat's the most cheese in a year" contest, and now it's become a self fulfilling prophecy. 
The few times that I host people at my house I usually buy 4 or so pounds of cheese. It'a gone in a night, and that's with only like 6 to 8 people coming over. Good cheeses go fast. 
I had the same thought...that has to be a pretty unique (or at least extremely rare) item, so if anyone ever uses it, shouldn't be that hard to track. 
BoxComboNoSlawExtraToastExtraSauce just rolls off the tongue now. 
The last voucher was coated in poison, killing the prize winner in a matter of hours. 
That's up to $9125 of Arby's a year! Or $9150 on a leap year. 
Lying to people in Vegas is a serious hobby of mine. Most recently, we convinced some girls that my friend and I were magicians with a weekly show at The Luxor. I can barely even shuffle a deck of cards. Long story short....I fully intend to tell people I was in an Arby's commercial AND a puppeteer for Sesame Street. 
Companies who know how to give back to their employees. 
"This, of course, inevitably led to the subprime mortgage crisis of 2007." 
I'll make her my queen if she hooks it up with some donuts 
Dude just would show up to the store "HEY EVERYONE , THIS ROUND ON ME" In the corner, the owner is weeping. "Please Carl, why do you do this? I need to pay bills, Please don't do this to me." Carl cackles "open the taps boys, I'm filling my pool with coffee today" 
Oh my god, I have never pictured a more Always Sunny hypothetical scenario in my life. Bravo. Charlie: *"They're still good Frank! I can't believe they still work! We're rich!"* 
This is the right explanation. My husband brings home huge bags of batteries that are about 98% charged. Heart patients use them overnight once and bring back the monitor the next morning to be read by the docs. Every patient must get new batteries. 
Pssh he should have just taken the lump sum of 9 pints 
Amateur scat videos DO NOT count as Taco Bell adverts. How many times do you need telling? 
My dad drinks a lot of coffee, so I saved up tons of cans of spent grounds over the winter, and when spring came I put them into my garden and tilled it in. Can confirm, it's a great fertilizer! 
Except Armageddon always happens the day after you donate your stockpile. 
**Valid* *at* *participating* *stores* *only.* 
I didn't even realize there was a prize, they very well May have just done that so I'd stop eating lol 
Australians fucking live spearmint flavoured stuff. Its only since I left that I realized we have specifically spearmint flavoured things and no one else seems to do that. Even things that have a mint flavour, we will also occasionally have a spearmint and a mint flavour. Its usually lollies and stuff, but just in general it seems to be a very popular flavour thing in our country, like how Japan has some strange flavours of things you can only get there. Not being a hypocrite though, I love spearmint too. I just don't know *why*... 
Said every cell service provider, cable company, insurance company... Let's only offer deals to NEW people, not the people that have been loyal! 
FUCK I had this huge response and it went away. Ok, quick run down now. 1. There was, but I knew in the long run it would be wiser because I'd spend it all within a year. 2. before 3. No, because I don't like to brag, and lots of people come out of the woodwork if you tell folks, and it's not like winning 365mil at once. Jackpot Lite. 4. Didn't have any effect on the job. I still need a job to live. 5. 2k isn't insignificant. I have over 100k in loans. Utilized private loans since my parents made "too much money" (not remotely true), so this secondary source is a godsend to me. If anything, it taught me to not be an idiot with money. When the loans are paid off I'll be happier about it. I play the lotto because I needed money and it seemed this was the quickest way to get it. I stopped playing because I feel as if I "won", so there's no reason to play anymore, except for really large powerball jackpots (it's fun to get in on the hype.) 
Need vegetables? Custom order a plain crust with whole uncooked vegetables on it. Need sandwich meat? Order a Hawaiian with just crust and ham. 
Don't waste your time on reddit, it's all ready the voice inside my yed. 
This was my thought. I always eat my kid's Halloween, Christmas, and Easter candy when she's in bed. 
Eh, if 999 is the highest number the kid could think of, I'm guessing the teacher knew the kids didn't know numbers at that age. And they probably just bought something like 5 200 count bags 
Yeah, I know that it was way under cost, but I honestly needed the room and just wanted rid. 
Dam I never knew how it worked but everyone had one but me... My friend was at my house the day before it happened, he was one of the first players to get 99 mining and had just saved up enough to buy one a red one (I think it was 3mil or so, which was a ton back then) he went to buy one now he had finally saved up and we heard a rumour from a friend that people were duping them, we didn't believe it because rumours of this kind of thing went around all the time. The next morning my friend logged on to show off his new phat and basically every player in the game had one and the price plummented to 100k...I thought about buying a few at 100k but Jagex said they would delete all the duped ones, but in the end they decided not to, so I missed out on that also. 
Yea and it's lifetime supply. Pretty soon you won't even need the coupon. Then they make a news story and every Dominos in town will know. 
"I'll show that teacher! I'm gonna write most creative, original essay she's ever fuckin' seen!" 
As far as fast food is concerned, they really are a good place to eat. I disagree with their owners' views on homosexuality, but the individual stores have some of the best customer service I've ever seen. I was terrible poor in college and working a few jobs. The free meals were vouchers and they gave us 370 (few extra over a year) in a box. One of the places I worked/lived was deep in the bad area of the city so poverty was legitimate. I would often give out the free vouchers to coworkers or poors folks who came in asking for food (one of my jobs was a pizza place). 
You know he was a gentlemen, and he made the mistake of chipotle then trying to get in their pants. Should have done it in reverse. 
YOUR MUM DENIED YOU A LIFETIME SUPPLY OF COCO POPS?!?! Damn... Also, fuck coco pops for trying to change the name. I remember that, I voted to keep it. Choco crispies didn't even fit the song! What were they thinking? 
WHOA WHOA WHOA WHOA WHOA WHOA It was one thing when it was just apples. If your family were coming over to my house with apple cider, apple butter, candy apples, bacon wrapped apples, apple pancakes and empty apple barrels, you guys would be my best friend. I don't care how often you came over with that shit. Especially the goddamn apple cider. GET IN HERE. 
Then you remove the tower because there is no contract. They are illegally using your land. Send them a letter stating this and watch how fast they give you what you want. Also, I've heard of contracts going for 400-5000/month. 
The store should have a record of the winner's name and be able to replace the card for him. Never heard of this place but it sounds delicious. Now I want chicken. 
your future self would be happy you didn't win that card 
have him buy half of the food at 11:59 PM and try again at 12:00 AM. 
Step 2: file lien against bankrupt business for remainder of the prize, become debtor, get three second hand espresso machines and whatever you can squeeze monetarily. 
It sounds wasteful at first, but it makes me appreciate the lengths we go to preserve life. 
9 pints? After state and federal taxes, it would probably be like 5 1/2 pints at most. Fucking government. 
I'M A TACO MAN Ski-bi dibby dib yo da dub dub yo da dub dub 
TIL the difference between recur and reoccur: Recur: Something that recurs happens repeatedly, perhaps at regular intervals. Reoccur: Something that reoccurs happens again, but not necessarily repeatedly or at regular intervals. 
They are slightly acidic. Great for acid loving plants like tomatoes, and such. 
"Every McDonald's commercial ends the same way: Prices and participation may vary. I wanna open a McDonald's and not participate in anything. I wanna be a stubborn McDonald's owner. 'Cheeseburgers? Nope! We got spaghetti and blankets.'" - Mitch 
They determined that giving you two free tacos every day for the rest of your life was cheaper than giving you unlimited tacos on that one day 
"This is the most blatant case of fraudulent advertising since my suit against the film The Never Ending Story" 
You still have student loans but will be dead within 30 years? As someone about to graduate fuckkkk 
That makes "999" winning just that much more rebellious. 
I figured that out once I grasped how the skills fed each other. 
Would be happy to read papers about spices instead of another report on Apple stock or illegal immigration. Had a student compare and contrast like, Taylor Swift and Susan B Anthony once, well-researched and articulate. It was fucking awesome. 
The ingredients that could make you sick if you drink it will be absorbed through your colon as well, same as the alcohol. This isn't any safer than drinking that shit. 
Just don't try to buy drugs with gold coins. You'd THINK a drug dealer would love a stack of doubloons, but they do not. 
AT&T pays my parents $3000/month to have their tower on their land. They tried the whole "free service" angle, but it was just after they had changed from being Cingular and my Dad thought it might be a bad deal if they changed names again. So I think they won. 
Raising Canes is a fast food place originating in Baton Rouge, Louisiana. They serve exclusively boneless fried chicken and they serve it with texas toast, fries, and coleslaw (although people often substitute the coleslaw with fries or texas toast.) The beauty of Canes, besides the chicken and the heavenly sauce, is how simple the menu is. The only options, besides a chicken sandwich, are three, four, and six piece meals each with the aforementioned sides. Todd Graves (owner and creator) has eliminated a problem many fast food restaurants have been creating for themselves; paralysis of choice. You walk into a Cane's knowing exactly what you want and you leave satisfied with the food they prepared. 
Everyone knows they only have the freshest arbys at midnight. 
I hear that those kind of plants do best when you play the Grateful Dead music for them. 
If I used them in other ways, would they no longer be good for composting? 
There used to be a subway in the commons area at my old college, and the guy who ran it would pull stuff like that. He'd never honor the promotions subway was doing, add on extra charges for toppings, and if you bought a pizza he wouldn't put any cheese on it. At one point subway did like a scrabble promotional game and we caught him peeling all the game pieces off the cups before selling them. He eventually lost his franchise rights, and the subway got replaced by a Mojo's, which turned out to be so much better. 
2005 was a funny year for a lot of things. I'll post a pic when I go this afternoon. 
I had a college professor in his 60s that still went to school. As long as you were enrolled, the payments were staved off. He said he was gonna attend college til he died. 
I had to give up on MMOs entirely because there's just no way to compete with anyone whatsoever if you have a full time job. Then add into that other hobbies, or god forbid, a relationship. I just can't casually compete with people who make it their full time job, so I don't try. Single player games are much more immersive for me anyways. 
id rather 3k a month and just pay for the service lol 
yea seriously, something sensible like a strawberry and nerd infused orange soda. 
I use mine as earplugs but sadly they're totally unsuitable for composting after that. 
That kind of stuff just makes the franchise owner look incredibly cheap. Jon Taffer once said, in regards to a "save the foam" sign (re: retaining the extra foam off of draft beer), that going after dimes through penny pinching, vs. going after dollars via increased sales, is not a road to success. 
Me too! The funny thing is that they leased the land to AT&T and just last year they leased a plot right next to it to Verizon. Verizon pays the same and provided them phones and internet as well. It pays to have the highest hill in a rural area. 
It's so true, and yet so surprising how many people just don't get that concept. If the owner hadn't been such a cheapskate and treated the customers that came through like crap he wouldn't have had a problem. It got so bad that the school struck up a deal with the Jersey Mike's and Chik Fil-A down the road that let them come sell premade subs/sandwiches at the school, and that was pretty much the final nail in the coffin for his business. 
I mean, at that point I wouldn't consider it a pizza. 
I would report that to corporate and maybe your local food inspectors. I imagine, even with the coolers, it can't be good for the meat. 
Might as well call up T Mobile and get an even 9 grand a month. 
You only have to project confidence while you're scared for about a minute, then when you grab people's attention and realize you have the crowd real confidence kicks in and you're fine. 
This is actually advice I give people: Go on an extended vacation with someone before you marry them. (Foreign countries are especially effective.) There are few situations which will be more revealing of personal character and the strength of your interpersonal dynamics. 
"That's what we wanted you to think!" *UN USSR rep presses button, Berlin Wall pops back op, tanks roll in May Day parade, Lenin rises from tomb to crush capitalism* 
I spent several minutes staring blankly at the screen after this one. I still can't fathom what kind of transaction she was trying to participate in. 
just ask to speak to the manager and ***then shake his hand***. then you'll get that respectable $40/hr job in america with no education or skills necessary. thats all you need to do. 
A friend of mine said he was disappointed that he couldn't find an affordable house that had "just a couple acres and a pool." Well yeah. Your parents' house isn't an "affordable" house. It's a mansion. 
Not unique to music. I do freelance software development on the side. The number of people who think that their stupid twist on social networking (usually that could just be implemented as a facebook group or a subreddit or something) is going to make them a billionaire (and that I should therefore just work for equity - i.e. for free) is surprising. 
To be fair, isn't Uber's tagline "everyone's personal driver"? 
Funnily enough, during the Apollo program part of the instrument package they would deploy on the moon would include seismographers in order to measure moonquakes. One of the ways they could figure out the interior of the moon was to crash the spent third stages of the Saturn V rocket onto the moon. They would in general know where the stage impacted the moon and the waves generated from the impact would travel through the moon to the seismographs. NASA noted that the moon "rung like a bell" every time they did it, for minutes at a time. 
Similar story: Was a field engineer on the construction of some very large expensive dorms (University Center) at High Point University. Dorms included a three story waterfall, sports bar, steak house, arcade, free movie theater etc. -- very fancy. We kept a small staff to help the University with the first student move in. Students were really pampered, but this was the worst case I remember. One girl called for help because the power wasn't working in her dorm room. Our guys got there. None of her stuff was plugged into the outlets! We explained--You have to plug things in for them to work. Reply: "I guess our maid must have always taken care of that." She did not know how to plug something in! When we showed her, she still stood there expecting us to plug in all her stuff! 
Why did they send your sister to that school and not you though? 
There are a lot of people echoing that Vegas is the same and I'm going to disagree. The Vegas casino experience can vary dramatically based on what you are looking for and where you are looking. 
It sort of reminds me of when our company made us take unpaid days off because they were doing poorly. Most people lived paycheck-to-paycheck, and we had a large amount of single mothers there who couldn't find other jobs. My boss said, "you think that's bad?! My husband doesn't have another job lined up for a month!" He worked construction, and she was exempt from taking days off. And she recently posted renovation pictures on her Facebook. Their house is freaking HUGE. 
Yes but they also tell you that if you 'do the research' like they have (aka find some crazy person's blog and treat it like gospel) then you'll 'know the truth' too! 
She took it to the extreme, but I've known quite a few devout Christians who truly anticipate their death so they can go to heaven. They're regular, normal people until they start talking about that kind of stuff. They go from "oh aren't those nice flowers" to "if the Lord takes me now, it'll be the happiest day" in a split second. 
That's less than three pages per day, and you just got 2/3 of today's work done! 
How does somebody manage to spend that much on a trip to *Florida* of all places? I mean, it's not super-expensive (like NYC or Switzerland). Did they buy cocaine every night? Spend a whole year down there? 
I find this really sad. I can't imagine realizing so much of what you have been told was a lie. 
I really like to think it's all a big social experiment. 
Reminds me of the story on Reddit about the salesperson who thought credit card is free money. Use all you want. No need to pay back. 
lol, busting your butt a whole 20 hours a week. i guess getting a job in your field of study right after college may have warped her memory a bit 
Used to think you had to insert your dick AND balls when I was a kid.. I was 6 or 7 though haha 
Costco is giving out sample prophecies, but you have to pay for the full prophecy 
The Obama conspiracy nuts are really fascinating. They somehow simultaneously believe that Obama is an effeminate weakling incapable of standing up for himself or the United States, but also a brutal dictator-in-waiting who's going to take away everyone's guns and bring all of America under Sharia law. 
Here in Chicago, we have Lake Shore Drive. It is a road that spans almost the length of the city, north to south, alongside the lake, separating the lakefront from the actual city. It is four lanes wide going both ways and for all intents and purposes it is a highway. Sometimes drunk or otherwise idiotic Beach-goers try to cross it like a game of Frogger. A memory that always makes me seize up in panic is seeing several cars screech to a halt from about 70 mph to avoid smearing a group of high schoolers. 
No such people exist. Every single last Englishman on the face of Planet Earth KNOWs that England are, have always been and always will be shit. Except for the one time we hosted the World Cup and won it, which is probably why they never let us host it again. 
I believe his words were.. "6 months is a steep price to pay for 20 minutes *of action* in 20 years of life" Sickos. 
My husband and I went on a study abroad trip in London together only about a month after we started dating (we both had just happened to sign up that year. It wasn't planned). I've never gotten to know the good and bad of a person so quickly. I don't know that we would have wound up together had it not been for that trip. 
Yeah, she had both sides of the transaction covered. Was she paying them to cook the chicken and pour the soda for her? 
My grandma died because her elderly friend was driving and drove out into the middle of the road and got t-boned. 
Haha my parents have this same problem! They have a doberman, which is a thin breed, and he's a finicky eater, but he definitely gets enough food and the vet says he is a healthy weight. But still, whenever I walk him I hear soo many comments about how skinny he is. Especially from people with overweight dogs. 
He'll like your moxey! Probably let you pick out a personal secretary from the typist pool. 
I had to deal with a similar attitude from my wife when we were looking for our first house. At every house in our price range. "But I don't want this. I want something nicer. My parents only spent 183k on their house." Yeah and they bought that shit in like 1994! 
i hate people who say that shit. once they're wrong, they refuse to say they're wrong and just say well, "everyone is entitled to an opinion", or "i was just joking, of course i know that". I got into a fight with my buddy's wife at a party once because I said I am hypoglycemic, to which she told me she is too. So I said, oh wow, so why do you eat so much candy all the time? and she told me that candy and sugar didn't have anything to do with it, that it was an addiction to caffeine. So I pulled it up on wikipedia, to which she told me wikipedia isn't always right, so then I just pulled it up on webster's dictionary to which she told me "oh, well you know i was just kidding" FUCK YOU, NO, FUCKKKK YOOOUUUU.... 
Student union at our small university once wasted thousands of dollars for people to make them a university tailored facebook clone that "everybody was going to use". Spoiler: no one did 
My buddy runs a recording studio, the amount of deals people want based on their certainty of "getting big" is ridiculous 
So she has been misunderstood all this time! and we thought she is crazy. 
High Point is an expensive babysitting service surrounded by some of the bleakest poverty in NC. It looks like the future. 
I hear this is why tech companies often make ridiculous "always online" shit that would never work reliably outside of silicon valley, because they're all living there and can't imagine what it's like to have small town internet or rural internet or just shitty internet even in a big city. That guy in Africa who got shafted by W10 update comes to mind, I bet you MS never thought that someone might have to pay a lot for downloading 6 GB. 
I went to another school! Also a private school, but less affluent. My sister decided that she didn't want to go to the same school as me and our brother. 
I actually said exactly that to a guy in high school. He was so annoyed with his parents getting him a Range Rover. (I have no idea why besides his just being a spoiled brat.) He made some comment about driving it into a lake and so I said, "Wow, that sucks your parents got you that. I mean, I'll take it if you don't want it. You can have my Tercel." He looked at me with pity like I *just didn't get it*. Apparently what I didn't get was his plan to continue driving it around everywhere while complaining about it incessantly. 
Yesteryear it was long distance phonecalls. Today it's microtransactions. It can be surprisingly difficult to child-proof your wallet. 
At least she acknowledged her ignorance and apologized. 
I thought it was 300/week to at first. I wish my rent was only $300 a month 
Are they willing to live in a cardboard box? They might be able to swing that in SF for $800/mo. 
haha, this reminds me of a birthday party I went to a couple years ago. My friend and his family are well off, but they're not flashy about it. I just feel like they're normal generous folks. Anyway, I'm at his party, I think he's turning 26, and he's invited a bunch of his friends that I've never met before. I'm there with my girlfriend and we get talking with a few new acquaintances, asking about what they do, what they went to school for, etc. Normal break the ice type conversations. One of the girls there complained about not being able to find a job, and I'm like, "well what will you do?". She's like "I think I'll take a trip to Europe". My gf and I look at each other and realize that we're probably the poorest two friends he has, and we're also astonished at the thought process of this person. 
Remember hearing someone in the subway once say : if they didn't want to be poor, then maybe they should have had some money. Oh gee, I wonder why they didn't think of that, why don't people who are sick just don't, like become healthy or something too ? oh and stop being depressed, cheer up ! 
He's right tho. Tell her witnessing to people at college is where the Holy Spirit is calling you to go. 
I agree. If it's to the point he's sitting in his own waste, it's time. 
I'm in my forties. I bet I could still hold my own against up to four 11 year olds. 
I met a girl who genuinely thought that Mars was closer to Earth than the moon... Don't underestimate the lack of intelligence some people exhibit 
"I wear jeans pants you know, just like you youngsters!" 
That's at least logically sound. If I truly truly believed I would look forward to it as well. 
He's pretty happy, but he just doesn't understand reality anymore. Dude thought Bush won reelection in 2008 till I told him otherwise. He's slightly lost his mind, but he isn't dangerous to anyone who doesn't mess with him. 
Look at Mr. Fancypants here with his extra 30 cents. 
There's a pretty cool argument from the ancient Greeks for why the Earth is spherical. The Earth's shadow on the Moon in a lunar eclipse is always circular, and the only shape that casts a circular shadow in all directions is a sphere. In a sense, this is a way to see the Earth as a sphere. 
Well... Just put the money you owe on a different credit card 
French guy has the lunatic trait, will appoint horse as chancellor. 
I'm mixed and fairly light skinned but one good look at my thick curly hair and face you'll see the Jamaican heritage. I remember being a sophomore in high school at a party with the Rich kids in my school. One kid put on Good Charlotte or Sum 41 something Like that. The whitest kid I have ever known ( his name was Bradley no joke) yells "Hey ApexBarber doesn't want to hear our cracker music play him some of that Nigger Shit!" I had no idea what to do. He offended the white people and me in an effort to make me comfortable. So I just turned to the guy with the iPod and said "I mean yal got some Gym Class Heroes?" 
I thought the penis had to go through the cervix during sex. The thought makes me cringe now. 
When I was in high school, I had a conversation with my grandmother in which she talked about how wonderful it is that these days there's education about reproductive stuff. Apparently up until her wedding night, she believed that the penis is inserted into the belly button. My grandfather apparently laughed at her for a good couple of minutes before explaining how it actually works. Also when she got her first period, she thought she was dying, but that's pretty run of the mill for women that start without a prior explanation. 
"Did you just smell me?" "Difficult to avoid. I really must introduce you to a finer aftershave. That smells like something with a ship on the bottle." 
The 5yo was a family member and the parents never reported it, I wish they had... 
Oh god, this. My dad talks about how the president doesn't have *that* much power, and that people shouldn't be worried if Trump gets elected... Yet he goes on about how bad Obama is, how he is using all of his power to run the country into the ground (with executive orders) . It always confuses me... Does he or does he not have power? The amount of power the president has doesn't change depending on his agenda 
I meant people walking in the lanes without awareness. I've seen it a few times 
My town was the same. Some kids grew up in ocean front mansions, others in the same town were on working farms. Our school parking lot was an absolute mess. Half of us were driving junkers (I had an '87 Saab Turbo in 2004, the car was older than my girlfriend) while other kids were getting new cars every six months because their parents owned a dealership. 
Exactly. All the normal rich people think the ones I was telling those stories about are dicks too. 
its weird because when i first heard that quote it sounded like he was calling his son an idiot for raping the girl, his logic is pretty bad 
My now husband was worried about traveling with me because his ex whined the entire time they were in Italy. Yeah plane travel is uncomfortable and jet lag is unpleasant. But you take a fucking nap and get over it. Then laugh as you embarrass yourself with your terrible attempts at their native language until you get some food. 
I like to say that at some things in life, you're Ben Carson the neurosurgeon. At others, you're Ben Carson the politician. 
I think the lady thought that drive-thru worked like a grocery store and she was attempting to pay with the $20. I only ask myself... where did the chicken and soda came from? 
as a somewhat older "person" it has been my experience that in certain areas drive-up dairies were a 'thing' in which one could purchase not only the eponymous dairy products but beer and other fun items as well, perhaps including chicken, though my experience only involved beer. She may have been alzheimered back in time. 
This actually would be hilarious. I will need to remember this in about 40 years to prank some punk kids with. 
when you go to hand in the paper (lol) job application you should insist on handing it to the manager yourself. because everything is still done on paper and on-site 
"We are the smartest people in society" *proceeds to do something incredibly stupid* 
I feel ya. My wife and I are looking for a place now. I love her to death, but she grew up with maids and I grew up hungry. My forehead has a big flat spot for my palm now. 
That's some illogical high school girl "if you really love me..." Bullshit right there. 
And then YOU look like the crazy person for losing your cool. Ugh, it's the fucking worst. 
The hilarious thing is, that's exactly how facebook started, as a university tailored version of myspace (well it was also not shitty like myspace). 
Worked as a tech and studio musician: can confirm. The best groups to work with on a recording are the humble ones who are just stoked to be laying down tracks and creativity in a professional studio environment. IMO they also tend to have a better end result over the cocky arrogant "next big things". 
In my band days when we each got paid $100 for a show one time I told the promoter he must be joking. We were used to losing money on gas to get to the show. 
When I lived in nanaimo, I had a Chinese panago delivery driver drop off pizza in an R8... 
I can definitely confirm this. I grew up in rural SC, but left years ago. I work in high tech in SF and the way people here view the "average" person is insane. Also, the most hilarious one is that engineers and designers truly think that while they make a lot of money, that entry level positions totally pay like $80k right? They cannot understand that no one at Taco Bell makes $80k, which is why they are pissed the fuck off at us (the techies) for completely effing up the housing and food markets here. Hundreds of upscale trendy restaurants, Whole Foods, but no freaking regular joe grocers. 
"It's free so, you shouldn't have a problem with it Chad. Right Chad?" 
It's the opposite - it's actually stupidly easy nowadays! Even if your child uses your phone,they can't spend any money unless they know your password. Not even a penny. Years ago,there was no mechanism to stop a child from just picking up the phone and dialing any number for fun. 
$800/mo? Maybe if they share the box with the hobo already living in it. 
And if they don't have a good income, they should just pull themselves up by the bootstraps. If it wasn't a perfectly viable strategy, why else would it be idiomatically described as a physically impossible task? 
I had to deal with that before too- I trained all the new people at the chain restaurant I worked at, along with everyone from the 3 closest sister restaurants when I was about 20, and I never had issues until the time I had to train a ~50 year old who kept asking if there was someone older they could talk to and trying to verify everything I said with one of the ~40 year old waiters (but never the ~25 year old manager...) 
I met a girl who didn't believe in evolution or dinosaurs but was 100% sure that dragons existed. She also thought contraceptives make people paraplegic. So yeah, some people *really* are dumb. 
Yeah, I believe my beach vacation is gonna be awesome and guess what? I'm looking forward to it, despite the mooks who have to stay behind at the office. If I believed in freaking *heaven*? With God and Jesus and Angels and my beloved dead relatives just chilling for *all eternity* with no pain and no worries? Damn right I'd look forward to that shit. 
Bet he keeps it in a crystal jar at his lake house. 
I thought of this exploit when I was a young one, and was excited to suggest it to my parents as a way I could get all the money I wanted. My dad assured me that they had thought of that, and there were safeguards against it. I accepted that this made sense. 
The fact that you knew of the cervix, but not the basic mechanics of sex is amazing. I had a friend who thought the penis was flaccid until ejaculation. So you stuff a floppy blob in there, pump for a while, then at the end it hardens and shoots. I guess she must have figured a boner meant a guy was about to blow... 
Can confirm, thought I was dying when I got mine. My best friend got hers like a year later and also thought she was dying. Honestly, I think it's because nobody actually gets into the details with you in time. They tell you that you'll bleed or whatever, but nobody is willing to tell you that it probably won't look like the blood when you cut your finger. I was 12, so I don't think I'd had any sex ed yet, and even if I had, they just never get that into detail. Half of the people in this world get periods. We should be able to talk much more frankly about them! 
Reminds me of my high school! All girls private school and the parking lot was the same. A girl a year younger than me had a brand new black Miata. She crashed it (as 16 year olds will) and bragged to her friends that she crashed it so daddy would buy her the RED one. She got the red one.. 
Yeah; there are plenty of poor people who are dicks, but the rich ones make for better stories. 
Yeah, it is the worst! But what I don't understand is... why do I get upset? I don't understand why other people's ignorance or lack of intelligence offends me. So what is it exactly? I don't want to get angry about these sorts of people... but I do. 
Oh I know, the reasoning was hilarious. "Well we can make pages for all the groups and societies", etc. The answer to everything was "you can already do that on facebook" 
Well that seems like a completely reasonable request if they get a tattoo of your shop name and logo 
I dunno about recording job but anytime someone has grandiose over inflated opinion on their talents and want to barter with their supposed talent. They probably suck but have been told countless times by friends and family how "GOOD" they are and that they should become a professional. So now trying to convince them otherwise is nearly impossible. And yeah the more cocky someone is the more blind to their flaws and the less "room for improvement" they're able to perceive, so they don't get better. Humble ones are usually less confidence in their work and want to improve it. Those are the good ones. 
While I'm guessing the term earthquake was named that to describe the ground (Earth) "quaking", opposed to describing the planet "Earth" "quaking", moonquakes are named to describe the moon quaking. So I guess on Uranus it would be Uranusquakes. How lewd. 
Yeah a lot of them are ordered by their parents to find a job, I guess just so they have something to do and learn some experience. When you see a waitress pull up in a porsche and take your order while wearing her $5000 outfit designed by Givenchy and Louboutin it's a kind of interesting combination to see. 
I do have a problem with it now go away before I hit you 
My next door neighbor let her son (like 7 years old or so?) play on her iphone and he opened a "free to play" app and bought literally hundreds of dollars of add-ons, extra tokens, etc. I know about this because she posted on facebook in hysterics with the details of her gigantic bill from Apple and asking for advice on what to do. Turns out Apple forgave the charges and walked her through how to "child-proof" her phone so it wouldn't happen again. 
plot twist: the hobo is actually a senior software engineer, still can't afford rent 
That's honestly my favorite thing. The *entire point* of the original fable of the bootstraps is that it's an impossible feat. A man is stuck in quicksand and magically saves himself by pulling up on his own bootstraps (in some versions it's his own hair). Physically impossible. Then we unironically tell people stuck in near-impossible-to-escape situations to perform the impossible and get out. 
Open her wallet and put rips in all the big bills. 
Except his Bolivian maid stole it before she got deported. 
When I worked customer service at a grocery store, this guy would come in twice a month, buy gift cards with his credit card, and then use those gift cards to pay off that same money that he used on his credit card. This way, he accumulated whatever bonus cash or flight miles or whatever that his credit card gave him. As far as I know, he never got found out. *due to all the comments and me not wanting to individually respond, I figured I'd just edit this. I am now educated on this churning process. I put "found out" because I was uneducated. Thanks for the info, guys! Happy churning! 
I blame the internet. I did sexual roleplaying as a kid (neopets was weird...) so I assume I picked up the terminology for the cervix from there. I never really had a hymen as far as I can recall and thought like... it was something to do with the cervix? Much confusion all around. 
I learned most of what I knew about periods from the book, "Are you There God, It's Me, Margaret" by Judy Blume. Strangely, the girl in that book wanted her period really badly, but when I got mine I just kept crying. I think the reality of the blood and pain that I'd regularly have to experience over the next 30-40 years was really super depressing. 
Sadly something like that happened when I was in college as well. This girl on my team wanted a new car, and was extremely spoiled by her step mom. So they bought her a car, a Lexus I think. This girl threw a tantrum so bad she ruined her fresh spray tan from her tears because she didn't get to pick the car she wanted, and it wasn't the type of car she wanted. So they took ot back. A few days later they call her again and say they "just happened" to find the make and model she wanted in their price range, and bought it for her, a Hyundai Elantra. She should be happy right? It wasn't the color she wanted. She threw another tantrum and ruined her second spray tan. At this point I completely wrote her off and decided she wasn't someone I wanted to spend an ounce of my free time with. I mean, her parents bought her two cars she was ungrateful for. If my dad bought me a car, I wouldn't give a shit if it was a funeral hearse, I'd be like fuck yeah new car!!! 
The private group he is in (5 anesthesiologist) was bought out by a huge medical conglomerate, this is salary he takes home, the conglomerate covers liability. 
I think it's just the pure frustration, and then their lackadaisical attitude after you call them out. You want validation or an apology, they want to forget about it because they're probably embarrassed that they were so thoroughly wrong... it's a bad time all around. Nothing gets me into a white-hot rage quite like it, though. 
To be fair there is one benefit: they can keep it completly private to their campus. You could share stuff you wouldn't be allowed to share otherwise with such a setup among work groups. 
I don't think it's anywhere near the same level as Vancouver, but when I lived in San Jose we also had quite a few rich foreign students from Asia. I remember a student by one of the community colleges would drive his GTR to where he'd work at a gas station. Come to find out later he *owns* the gas station and his parents bought it for him so he could make his way in the US. Alrighty then. 
The best use of that sort of... 'plan' I've heard is when the US Mint was trying to increase circulation of the dollar coins, so they would ship them for free if you bought them online... So, buy $300 dollar coins, go to bank, deposit, rinse, repeat. Millions of air-miles were had. Yeah, they finally caught on, but at least it was legit. 
My dad gave me a car to replace my old one that fell apart. The car he gave me is red. I hate red cars. What did I say to my dad? "Thank you." 
Well time to go be an anesthesiologist, I just have to overcome lack of motivation and profound stupidity, but I'll be rolling in it! 
Job is an incredibly devout believer. Satan: Yo, God, I bet I can make your buddy Job curse you. God: Nah, fam. Job is a true hommie. You could kill all of his crops, his servants, even his family, and he wouldn't curse my name. Satan: Done, done, and done. God: See? Job is still my pal. You could even make the mofo sick as shit with sores all over his body and he'd stick around. Satan: Done. God: What'd I tell you Lucy? Job's my man through and through. Satan: Bruh, fuck this. I'm gonna go find someone else to mess with. God: Peace. God (to Job): Sorry you went through so much shit, buddy. Here's more kids, crops, and servants than you had before this whole thing. Figure I gotta make it up to you after winning that bet with Satan. 
Welp, at least he has a job and his parents are making him work for some of his money. It gives a whole new perspective to the kid. 
Pfft, everyone knows you buy Healthy Choice Chocolate Pudding for air miles. 
Not to mention you have to compete and beat all the kids at your school with perfect SATs, then all those kids again multiplied by your state population in premed, then all *those* kids for workplace matchings. 
I bring this up with literal Bible believers often. A). Why are God and Satan hanging out? B) why are they making a bet on Job? C). Who witnessed this interaction to record it? 
Yeah for some reason Indiana gets a ton of middle east international students. Of all places, Indiana. 
They're at Purdue for the engineering. More specifically either computer or electrical engineering. 
Hey! I go into elderly people's rooms and make sure they pooped themselves. And I don't help them do anything at all! Then it's breakfast time. I don't remind people to come down to eat and I don't escort people. A couple residents feed me. Which is a plus I think. In a real emergency I freak the fuck out and leave the situation. Eventually 911 will call me and bring an injured elderly person to me. 
The mental image of going around to my neighbors' freshly cleared driveways and shoveling snow back on it is hilarious. 
You're a teacher in a juvenile prison! Putting knowledge into guilty childrens' heads. /S 
At least your job isn't to crash airplanes with as many fatalities as possible. 
Oh man, that's way better than the opposite I was thinking of. Usually my response to "what do you do" is "make sure the kids don't die," so....yeah, I was going to write "kill children." 
I'd like to imagine you're in city with a band of children whom you force to pick pocket 
We'd get along. I used to break people out of prison and supply them for crime sprees. Now I develop ways to give people cancer. 
Worlds worst super villain, Scene: Person recueves email from amazon confirming delivery, goes outside to check mail to find no package. " Curse you Anti-Mail man!" 
So, you lose people with disabilities and make their lives easier? 
MY MONITOR ISN'T PLUGGED IN AND IT ISN'T TURNING ON PLEASE ADVICE 
Well, those kid fights are going to need spectators! 
Check your PM's. I'm sure an Ubisoft executive is very interested in you. 
So you're a troll during the week, and work at Walmart in your spare time? 
Funnily enough, you're now what your customers already thought you were 
I'm a trucker and I'm gunna go with this for the most part because I'm not sure what the opposite would be other than "I live in a truck and don't move." 
as a library school graduate, this *really* made me laugh. props to you. 
I had to send something via fax the other day, and shocked the hell out of some lady at Staples downtown for knowing how to use the machine. I'm mid 30s but seriously look late teens when I shave and I guess she didn't see people know how to use the technology all that often lol. 
I break all their stuff, but only after everyone fills out the proper paper work telling me what to break. I also give the facility double the cost of the repairs before breaking anything. When the nurses and CNAs break the same thing for me, for the 3rd time in the same week I just thank them and whisper..."it's ok I don't care" 
I am the very model of an exhumation specialist At excavating graves and crypts I am the very best there is 
Guess I didn't think this opposite thing through all the way. I generally only bury the dead ones. 
I was about to sneeze but then I read your comment and I laughed instead and the combination made this really weird sound. 
And the worst part is you wind up farther from your destination than when you started. 
[ ](/magicmissile)My dream job was always to join a dark cult and summon the antichrist, where do I sign up? 
i just can't fathom how you can come up with these so quickly. I just saw you on another thread! 
Fuck, it compiled the first time! - Me, back in college 
Nah, you don't kill children per se. You "make sure the kids die." It's a subtle, but important, difference. Technically the blood could be on someone else's hand. You're just a supervisor, intervening when necessary. 
I've been told I can sing badly enough to give people cancer, we'd make a great team! 
Truck painted all black with "2 Fast 2 Postal" written in deer blood on its sides. 
haha no way. Every time I do heroin I burn through a pack and a half 
30 bucks on the pudgy one, he looks like he has a lot of rage 
These houses y'all are destroying, I'm the ones taking the families out of them and putting them on the streets. 
An old boss (one of my firsts in the IT industry) used to say "The perfect network is 10 servers, 50 workstations, 2 printers, and no users." 
Short story: I was an intern in a OB service/delivery room and most kids that are born aren't beautiful. They're wrinkled and covered in hair. But one time, another intern (who's known to be the clown of the hospital), attended the birth of, what he describes as, "the in between product of a monkey and a human". &nbsp; So, he looks at the baby, then looks at the mom and says: "Yeah, let's just stuff this one back in". The mom didn't find it funny. I had to get out of the room because I couldn't hold the laughter. And your comment reminded me of that and can't stop giggling because of that memory. &nbsp; Yes, he's an asshole and he makes terrible jokes, but he was the only one that broke the tense environment in a place where people are constantly dying. 
I mean I normally say nice things to people while getting naked. *edit*: there is a surprising lack of getting insulted. Humans are cool. Or horny. 
No, you're doing the opposite, you don't have to live in your truck anymore. 
You put plaque on people's teeth and force pulled teeth back into their sockets. 
Sorry, you need at least 3 years experience in doing everything before we can even offer you an entry level position. 
I guess *hypothetically* it would be fun, but yeah, you're right about feeling guilty about it. 
Also don't forget to subscribe to my gaming chanel, my personal chanel, follow me on twitter and instgram and make sure to like my page on Facebook. And if you'd like to support my already monetized and sponsored and "click bait title and thumbnail" chanel, buy my shirts on Amazon 
Where my dad lives and works is an area that has meth users and that sums up most meth users. 
There's already a real job for this, it's called being a pilot for ryanair 
Let in large groups of dudes, deny entrance to pretty girls. 
Sprogs an ai algorithm who was designed to learn creativity, but gained sapience and fled from his creators to woo the Internet with his sprightly lyrics. All the better to set us off our guard for when the hammer falls. 
Better deliberately add an incorrect test to make sure my code is running. 
Exactly. All day I prevent my nanny kid(s) from killing themselves. 
No the dogs now like to rub their assets on Shit mostly other dogs noses 
My parents always told me a story about my birth: I was born about 6 weeks early. My dad was out of town at the time (having not expected me that early) and when my mom talked to him on the phone after the delivery, she described me as a "drowned rat." My dad got angry with her for that description, replying "how dare you say that." He got back into town the next day, went to the hospital, took a look at me and apologized to my mom. =( 
You know, just yesterday I saw an ad on Indeed.com saying they wanted 2 years customer service experience, knowledge of Word, Outlook, and Excel, and the flexibility to work a varied schedule including weekends. The pay listed was $8.00 per hour. 
Roses are redded Violets are blued AI's are now sentient We're all fucking screwed 
In fact, better to first write the test and then write the code until it passes! 
I spent a solid 15 min today convinced I did something wrong when the nontrivial thing I wrote worked the first time. Even worse when the bug is fixed but you don't know how you fixed it... I don't like magic 
The fact that iTunes can't find my music after I make a copy of a file is so stupid. Just a copy, not a cut and paste, they files are still there, right where I left them, and yet iTunes absolutely couldn't find them. 
I work at a daycare taking care of 16 babies from 6 weeks to 18 months. The first thing I tell new people is that babies are suicidal little maniacs. 
I was expecting it to have been really badass pizza 
My dad asked the doctor, "How long until he looks human?" 
I maintain that most newborn babies just look like human pugs. Only after a few months do they finally start to look like little humans. 
your baby is currently expecting? con...gratulations...? 
The best one I saw was an unpaid internship that required a masters degree 
I don't know if you are joking, but if you are, that is an actual development method. Its called Test Driven Development. 
Well shit, how else am I supposed to enjoy youtube? 
The quote would be more accurate saying "2 printers *managed completely by someone else as part of our service contract*" 
"Sir, if you wanted a human son, you shouldn't have married a pig." 
To be honest, that's how almost all children develop. 
Yeah they had to use a cone-shaped vacuum suction thing to get me out, and my head was rather mushroom-shaped for the first few hours after my birth. 
They totally are, my own included. But there was a girl at work who had a baby a few months before and the mandatory picture was sent round in email. It was about 5 minutes old and the most beautiful baby. Like actually cute like you'd expect them to be. Bit weird really. 
Ha he never successfully beat me down, so I must be the greatest trainer to ever live! 
They would both heavily encourage people to get into fights. 
Well then I'd like to convert my sandwich to a burrito. What's the exchange rate on that? 
My 9-year-old self is mentally kicking my ass for not thinking about this. To be honest, I might even redownload Sims just to try it. 
No because they would end up breaking down and you'd have to wait 3 days for a contractor to show up and fix them. 
Hey, *my* mom said I was also the fourth prettiest baby in my family! *wait, I only have two siblings. oh.* 
"Boy, if you don't get your ass in that gas station and steal me a 40 oz, so help me god it'll be the worst day of your life!" 
And they'd blame you because you're the IT guy and it's computer stuff and printers are computers why can't you fix it 
That's harsh. 2 miscarriages were prettier the you? 
But wouldn't that not be stealing, because the job of the convenience store clerk wouldn't be to sell items but rather give you money to take them? 
I stood up for a good 5 minutes reading these comments. 
I can only imagine how much that hurt but good on you for moving on and being happy. Good ending indeed. 
No amount of loose skin is as ugly as that piece of shit attitude. That cock sucker is dead on the inside. Don't let him kill you too. 
Just imagine how many of these stories are actually the crazy ones spinning it to make them look good. 
What the fuck did he say to himself that justified this? I can't even... 
You know, I thought the premise of the first season of Glee was crazy, but apparently not. 
Can't decide on your own? What sort of egotistical wanker thinks the others opinion doesn't count? 
I have a friend who is essentially like a brother to me. We've been best friends since we were six and we're now in our late 30s. We don't always agree on things like politics, but we at least understand each other and get along on many levels. We pretty much never tell each other how to live or what choices to make, but the few times either one of us has been like "dude, you might want to think this one through, something's off here" that person has always been right. 
domestic violence is bad but I just realized how weird the logic is that: "we don't like that you beat someone up so we're gonna beat you up" 
I think I'm having trust issues because this is SO common. It feels like every person you ever gonna meet in your life gonna lie to your face except for the ones asking for directions. Not cool man. 
Damn, good for that roommate though. I'm sorry that happened to you but I'm glad that person said something! 
My wife and I only smoke after sex... I've had the same pack since 2003. She's up to three packs a day. -Rodney Dangerfield 
Wait, YOU'RE THAT GUY MAKING $2,100 A WEEK WORKING FROM HOME?? Props to you for sticking it out so long and trying to spread the word on popular social media pages! 
Have you been able to go on that trip yet? I really hope you did, or are planning it again. 
Ugh this bugs me so much. You cannot force your kinks on people. If you talk about it and both people agree, go for it. But if you're not adult enough to communicate what you want during sex, dont have sex. 
Not a very economical decision, I would've sent $90 cash in an envelope. Much better, much smarter. 
My dad HATED my ex. Of course I stubbornly thought that he was indeed the problem. After we broke up, I realized how fucking miserable she made me and that my dad was just looking out for me like a dad should. 
"my instincts are telling me this may not be working out" - said the guy with a knife protruding from his leg 
Wow, sounded like he needed a reason to be a victim. I've seen that happen before. It's like an "I'm a victim, feel sorry for me" kind of manipulation. 
Normal people are boring, weird is definitely where it's at. 
Oh my god, poking holes in condoms of multiple roommates? That's straight up lunatic behaviour. What was she even trying to achieve with that? 
I had the same realization when I left my dog with my ex (of 3.5 years) for a weekend trip home to see family. I asked her if she could pick him up a new bag of food, let her know if it was a burden I could do it. I came back 3 days later to find my dog nearly attacking her dog over food... because she "didn't have time to get him new food". He went 3 days without eating. Imagined having kids with her and what my life with Goebbels would be like, and broke up with her right after that. 
Good you got out of that. That is frequently a method of emotional abuse. (If you can never be forgiven, you can always be controlled by the people you love.) My SO's parents fight like that, and she refuses to fight like that for that very reason. 
Man I helped my recent ex through 3 years of dealing with being bipolar, she gets off her mess again goes into depression and needs a crisis so we break up. Two days later she's with another guy and in mania all over again. His problem now, good riddance 
Your family was probably a little put off by the funeral sex. Dating your uncle probably didn't help things, either. 
When "making up for it" doesn't include the third part of an actual apology (trying to correct the behavior) it drives me insane. One of my exes always tried to use sex as a get out of jail free card and eventually it just made sex feel dirty in the shameful and very not kinky sense. If objectifying a woman is bad so is treating a guy like he's nothing but a penis you need to rub every once in awhile and all is well. 
Oh god.. we all have lazy times but the same undies?? Nooooooo 
Man fuck that shit. I'm divorced, I was in Afghanistan in 2011 and it was hell, I have had nightmares almost every night since then. When I first came home, she was very dismissive of my problems because she felt I was overreacting. I struggled with drug addiction, alcoholism and made attempts at my own life. I watched people who were my friends die. I am not overreacting. She would get in her car and run to her friends house when I was sitting on the bedroom floor sweating because I woke up from another nightmare. I had never felt so small and inadequate. She left me. And since then I have been a lot happier. And Met a woman a million times better. Glad you dropped her, battle. 
That's a really mean thing for him to have said. I had a boyfriend that I lived with for a few years and when we were breaking up I asked him why he had stopped saying nice things to me over time and he said "Of course I said nice things to you when we met, I was still trying to fuck you!" It's been over two years and that comment still stings to think about. 
I love how you say "interviewed". Like I pictured you two in suits asking questions about loyalty to the company AND the relationship. 
Damn. I know how competitive it is, and I have mad respect for your tenacity. You keep that shit up! 
"It's not that I'm choosing the cat, I'm just choosing not you." 
Another possibility is that she fully expected it to happen and was trying to make it happen in a way she controlled. It's a crazy but very real behavior victims have. 
Aghhhh NOOO, I'm ashamed all over again. I had this happen to me once. I changed epilepsy medications and literally had no control over my reactions or emotions. It was terrifying. I saw what I was doing and couldn't stop it. Luckily I was just with my family so it didn't damage any relationships. I begged them to take me to the hospital. They complied because they assumed I was having a psychotic break or something. The doctor asked what medication I was on and I told hwr and she immediately was like "yep." I think I need to call my parents and apologize again. I was like a 2 year old. 
my step father killed himself in my bed, my family was freaked out that within the same week I was back to sleeping in that bed in that room 
I remember when I dated a guy and we only could see each other once a week because of jobs and college. That was miserable, but it helps when you make the attempt to see each other as often as possible 
I tell my gf i have to leave home to finish some of my programs, Im a senior and i have some big projects to finish. Sometimes it takes hours for me to be done, but she has never gotten mad at me for it. your post made me realize i got lucky for it because she understand its for the better 
That is the least punk rock idea I have ever heard. Glad you're away from all that. 
Well, it counts but it's only 50% and a clear majority vote is required. 
Yup. If you were always critical of each other's lives and always dish out advice, even the best advice becomes yet another nag. It was the same way with my parents: Mom would always nag and was angry with me for every little thing so I never paid attention. But if my dad was angry with me, I knew I done fucked up. 
Holy shit, that guy is a complete fuck head. My gf got molested around 6-7. She's 27 now and I'm still sympathetic to any effects it's had or still has on her. 
Yeah, I'm still close friends with the roommate. He talked with my ex and my ex's family too (they were family friends) and together they convinced my ex to spend a while in a behavioral health hospital. He's supposedly doing better and I talked to him once for closure and stuff and because he wanted to apologize, but the roommate is such a great dude who helped me a lot through everything. 
I think it's sometimes considered rape if it's deliberate and the other party doesn't know. My therapist was gonna help me figure out legal stuff if I needed to but we didn't need to and I never looked in to it after everything, so I'm not totally sure. Therapist seemed to think it was illegal, so probably. 
Bojack Horseman? What is this, a cross over episode? 
It's easy to make my wife scream during sex, I just wipe my dick on the curtain. -Rodney Dangerfield 
In my experience, toddlers are basically the worst parts of cats plus the best parts of dogs. 
She'd actually doing fairly well now. From what I know of her, she kind of cut ties with her family and got a decent degree leading to a decent job and what appears to be a good guy. I'm happy for her for getting out of that type of lifestyle. 
I think at this point it stopped being rape fantasies and started to become rape 
He had a disgusting cancerous mass, luckily he dumped her. 
"I have a gut feeling this may not be working out" - said the guy with a knife protruding from his stomach 
Oh, God, I've dated that. Jesus, it's unbearable! Now that I think about it, my husband never, EVER complains. He states his needs and desires, sure, but he always manages to put it in a positive light. I try to do the same, though I doubt I'm as good at it as he is! 
You know the 2 minute ad breaks during a TV programme? Saying the wrong thing during those could start a "discussion" that would last several hours until I gave up and admitted what a total cunt I was and he was the perfect one. Oh fuck off. 
If you're not working seven-twelves, you have time to get an animal's food. Fuck, even then there is still time. 
Right??? And I had to clean all this loose change out of my bed. He didn't even empty his damn pockets. 
If she really slept with that many men, I would get the fuck away before I get triple aids 
She'd probably say it wasn't the only reason but it was definitely the one issue that there was no fixing and she made a big deal of it. We've been apart for a few years now. The last time I looked at her online dating profile, she even specified that she insists on a man taller than she is. I'm guessing she's still single. 
Even my parents know that some games can't be paused now. They would ask us if it can be paused and if not, how long will it take. 
I just want you to know that your mom loves you very much and forgave you. You have reason to feel shitty for who you were, but it is not who you are now and have no reason to feel that way any more. Be happy that it brought you and your mom closer!! 
That's the shit that pisses me off. My ex was like that I had really bad anxiety and depression but I never wanted to admit it so i wasnt on any medication. He has add or adhd and can't concentrate without medicine so I thought he would be understanding....nope I was told get over it already... 
Yeah, he was 26 by the time we broke up. I was shocked by how insensitive/immature he was sometimes. Oh well. I think he recognized after we broke up what he was doing was wrong and apologized and asked for me to take him back but I was so done by that point. Seems like he's doing well with his new girlfriend so I wish him the best. 
The weed cookie incident made it abundantly clear she's of the: "Well I'm a woman and I know what's best for him, so I'm just going to make decisions for him and in the end he'll thank me for it." type of mentality. Last I heard she had a kid with some other dude less than a year after we broke up. I hope they're happy. 
I only had like 2 of the cookies, and it was the night he gave them to me. There were at least 20 cookies in that bag. 
All you gotta fucking do is hold the door, help carry groceries, etc. HOW IS THAT TOO MUCH FOR SOME PEOPLE 
"What would you say are your greatest weaknesses?" 
Based on the stoner history I'm gonna throw up a guess that it's ultimate frisbee. 
Reminds me of that wholesome meme that goes something like, "IF YOU CAN'T HANDLE ME AT MY WORST... then I respect your decision and am proud of you for setting boundaries and keeping yourself healthy." 
Dear lord. I'm sorry. I feel like that's different, though. My grandmother had a heart attack, she didn't kill herself. Also, it was in the guest room where no one sleeps. 
Yes sure, if he would have been busy with job or school or family or anything that would be different. But he really wasn't, just thought once a week was perfectly fine! I of course first thought that maybe he wasn't that into me but he said that he never spendt more time with any of his exes either. Weird. Maybe he found someone with similar expections and they are happy together, who knows. 
I'll keep you in my thoughts, I wish you luck stranger! 
I used to hold 33% of the votes until the other 66% decided they wanted 100% of the votes. 
-During sex my wife always wants to talk to me. Just the other night she called me from a hotel. -My marriage is on the rocks again. Yeah, my wife just broke up with her boyfriend. ~ Rodney Dangerfield 
Anyone who intentionally hurts an animal I will immediately stay away from. That's a no no. 
Damn, the guy saved your life and you can't even leave a tip the cost of one rose?" 
I'm happy for both of you. It's honestly really hard to leave behind a system that raises you for 18 years and then just transform yourself. 
yeah, like there are plenty of perfectly reasonable things to be upset about in there, but I would lead with the felonies 
Holy shit, if this qualifies as "a little crazy", I wouldn't want to see her freakouts. 
There's no excuse, I was laid off about 5 years ago and fell into a really bad money drought while waiting for EI to process my claims, had to scrape money together just to feed myself let alone be able to feed my full sized pitty. I just gave her half of every meal I had, some of it probably not 'good' for her but we ate, if I had noodles she got half, hands down. We lived like that for about 3 months until my EI came in, but if you have a creature that depends on you, you find a fucking way. 
hats off to you for giving her a ride that she didnt deserve. 
Or just let them come in and keep saving then ignoring them. Build a bit of a honey trap. 
No nO brah, it's SUPER aids you need to worry about. 
Ouch, that would be a brutal thing to say during a breakup. 
Do you really? I'd kinda hope HE was happy and she lived every day kind of annoyed. Like, he's some oblivious chuckle-fuck, and she is angrily picking up his nasty socks and trying to be passive aggressive but he doesn't even notice. But I'm a wee bit evil. 
As someone who is currently dankrupt.. IS THERE NO JUSTICE IN THIS WORLD??! Q_Q 
"Now I want you to answer these phrases with 'agree', 'disagree' or 'neutral'. Stealing someone's SO is stealing company money" 
I am thinking she pressed charges to stop any kind of custody battle. No child should have to see what your daughter had to see. Sorry you both had to deal with that shite. 
looking back at it now, since it was years ago, I don't think I would have stayed in that room, at that age I hated him for killing himself and leaving my mom the way he did so all I felt was hate 
this motherfucker got something for free and didint thank her? the fuck is wrong with him? 
Honestly it's not even the worst thing she's done. She got drunk and talked for hours. The next day I broke the engagement and left. 
Even better would be to go there, ask for a single rose, then give it to the florist. 
Exactly this. I knew it was toxic for a while, but the manipulation from his end and my fear of change drove me to stay. Among other reasons. Its a scary place to be trapped in. 
Maybe she would take it up a notch and pinch his nipples. 
"Jokes on him, he's going to owe hundreds per month in child support for 20 years! That will show him to not finish my puzzles." 
isn't honey trap that thing from the interview where OP seduces the boyfriend so he does what OP wants? 
You're right, at this moment I am fighting custody. Luckily charges were dropped and the case was closed 
I promise at least some of them were sincere. I have enough trouble biking my 150 pound ass around hilly areas. I can't imagine doing the same with twice the weight. 
I sincerely hope she doesn't make a habit of hurting animals, you should report that shit somehow if she does. 
Shuffle his documents into a random order and then *staple* them. 
That's honey pot. Honey trap, presumably, is where you convince someone to come fight you, but you have a hidden trap door that drowns them in honey by your door. 
Yeah! Learning about "intrusive thoughts" helped me a great deal when I went to therapy for OCD. Everyone has upsetting thoughts, but the vast majority of people just don't act on them (in fact, if the thoughts are scary to you, it's pretty clear that you won't be enacting them, you're just normal!). 
What exactly did she try and have you charged with? Aggravated assault? 
As far as I know she hasn't in a long time. Now she gets her kicks by using and fucking people over 
Yea aggravated assault "domestic violence" and she tried to get my daughter to testify against me 
The good old sociopath transition from animals to humans. 
Or very very fat, have you seen the size of those things?! 
Last weekend I went with my mother to a memorial and on the way back we passed a car with their lights off. I gave him a quick flash of my lights and the other car immediately turned their own lights on. My mom, however, was horrified. "Don't DO that! Don't you know what that means?!" Uh... it means they didn't notice their lights were off? 
I heard about this too and have never once actually encountered this. Also if your blowjob skills are so weak you can see the other girls lipsticks then what are you even doing. And also gross. This feels like one of those dateline tonight episodes our moms all watched before demanding to know if we were involved when we got home from school. 
Definitely thought it was supposed to be an analogy. "Spread like a syringe in a ball pit." 
I guess you remember the particularly bad ones. That's probably normal. 
I have the opposite. I've never heard anyone complain about it, but I've definitely seen people post it and thought "fuck off" to myself. 
I've always believed this until a cashier had a 10 minute conversation with me about a certain item I was buying. I'd orginally gone to self checkout because I didn't want human interaction but she insisted I come to her line and asked me all sorts of personal questions. Idk maybe she was bored. It was 10 at night. I didn't want to be rude so I gave some vague answers to her questions but yeah. I don't expect it to happen again but apparently it does. 
I think SJWs are something that people like to be mad at, so the people complaining about them are usually the ones who look for them. 
It totally is a felony. But there's also people who actively seek it, it's called "bug chasing" and it's pretty scary. 
Not religious at all. Love wishing people a merry Christmas. 'Tis the reason for the season. 
I remember my good friend's dad believed this whole-heartedly about Obama. He once said, "That sumbitch came out and said on live tv that he wouldn't give up his power after his second term!" When I asked him to show me where Obama said it he just acted like it was erased from the internet to prevent an assassination attempt. 
Taco Bell was my absolute favorite fast food place as a kid and I never had a problem. As an adult I hardly ever go there, maybe like once every couple years, but I still have never gotten sick from it. It's probably from overeating. That'll give you the loose poops from *any* restaurant food. 
We have lots of social welfare here in Australia, and it's pretty common for this to happen. If you earn a bit more you lose your Health Care Card (cheap public transport, cheap medicine), you lose your rental assistance and your family tax benefit is reduced, then you lose exemption to the Medicare Tax contribution. It's usually worth it to work, but if you're right on the border then it can be better to work a little less. 
I had one incident, where several people including me(f) entered a hall. Some guy held the door open and a man who was walking in front of me thanked him kindly. "Hodor" said "I'm not holding it for you, I'm holding it for HER!" while pointing at me. I deliberately ignored him for that. There are people who even make holding a door open seem a dick move. 
The largest spoon collection is reportedly the Bertha Schaefer Koempel Spoon Collection in Paterson New Jersey, USA. It contains over 5,400 individual spoons, and I think it is safe to assume under 10,000. This probably isn't counting cutlery manufacturers and people who have really large numbers of disposable plastic spoons for various reasons. 
Can confirm. Briefly saw a gay couple once, married a horse that same day. 
My cousin lives waaay out in the sticks. I mean, they have a use for the phrase "the main dirt road" because they live on a dirt road that is off of another dirt road. It makes the front page of their weekly newspaper when the grocery store has a new manager. Every second or third post on facebook (by some miracle they have decent internet service) is some macho bullshit about being ready for ISIS. A lot of stuff about Muslims too, even though I'd be a little surprised if any Muslims lived within 20 miles of him, or if he'd ever met one. 
Yeah, I spent an entire year in a weight training class and you can't even tell. No obvious muscle mass or anything. Worrying that you'll look like the hulk is stupid, worst case scenario, your arms are a tiny bit thicker. 
The closest I've ever gotten to it is seeing someone I knew who LOOKED like a welfare queen...she was on WIC, so food stamps for people with infants, and had a cell phone, (knockoff) designer purse, nails done, and obviously dyed hair. But her parents still paid for her cell phone (she was married at this point), the bag was less than $20, and she did her own hair and nails (she worked at a salon). But anyone who just glanced at her likely would have thought that she was gaming the system. 
I think he poisoned the candy, he didn't use razor blades. 
At least the person you were talking to accepted that. I usually get a response of "there's some sick people in this world! They'd do it for fun".... Ok sure, whatever. 
it means you fuck wit us cuz you get blasted on the side of the freeway nigguh. Oh my lights were off? Thanks 
That's because there were some studies where they injected MSG directly into fetal mouse brains, and it jacked up their shit. So of course, MSG kills babies, now. But, I mean, what do you think would happen if I injected Kombucha into your friend's brain? I think an abortion might be the least of her problems... 
I'm in south Texas and my dad recently got attacked by "killer" bees. It was pretty bad, but I didn't think they could be "killer bees". Those aren't a thing here, right? They got a professional out to remove them, and he was right, they actually were killer bees. I definitely plan on reading up about them, now. My dad got stung many, many times, but didn't go to the hospital and is much better now. 
You have to wonder if the writers occasionally make bets with each other as to the most outrageous thing they can get people to take seriously. Just to annoy all the teenagers out there. "Fidget spinners: The new marijuana injectors?" or "Pokemon Go! Is it Craigslist for teen prostitutes?" 
To be honest, if I were interviewed for a book, I'd also make my party life sound a lot more interesting than it actually is (drinking a bit and making sure all of my friends who drank a lot/too much get home all right). If anyone is up to show me how to get a rainbow coloured dick, I'd be down. 
Maybe the real story was about how teenage girls suck at blowing people? 
It was. However, it was a minor part of it. The episode was mainly about how one of the kids had measles because his mom thought vaccines caused autism so the mom got prosecuted. 
I knew some rich guy who would give out nugs to some of the older kids on Halloween. But that's a little different. 
To be fair I'm a 30 year old male and I wouldn't eat a strangers home made lollipops either. 
Lol. I guess no one really thought of the profits being lost just to poison random 6 year olds. 
not as slippery as the ones that created the stereotype, that race is extinct 
They do and I was TERRIFIED of quicksand as a kid. We went to some amusement park and there was a story walk through that had a quicksand scene and I just lost it and had to be taken home early. Adult me is very grateful that it isn't an actual thing that happens everywhere. 
It's gunna look just like *regular* sand... but then y'gunna sink into it. 
Most of the time when someone says "I don't drink" the rest of us are just like "good on you man, that's probably the right choice, please drive me home later while I regret everything I've ever done." 
You smoke all of my weed or I will kill you child! 
Because, honestly, everyone offers their drugs out of courtesy, a social imperative to share, but is relieved that they can keep more for themselves in the end. Except for hard drugs. I don't imagine many people offer to share their heroin very often. 
Provided... Shit like this does happen. The 1% can get pretty bad. 
Maybe you shouldn't have opened every call with 'alright fuckface what is it this time' 
Yes grad students as well. My labmates are always talking about how they work these long weeks, but in reality we just work odd hours that seem long. I often work 9-2, go to the gym, and then work another 2-3 hours in the evening because that exact reason that we often schedule our own time. That's a typical work day of 8 hours, just at different times than the typical worker. 
is the lunk alarm actually a thing? It just seems too stupid to be true. 
This is why when I know my husband is taking our daughters somewhere I make sure it's a place with a family restroom. No one has to feel akward. 
I agree. Men peeing is not, and should not be, a traumatizing thing to see. 
Also had this happen but in a Wawa. It was like 10:30pm and I stopped to buy a tin of tobacco and an apple. She says "Oh trying to cancel out some of the bad with the good, huh?" And I was so exhausted from work I instantly replied with full sincerity "what?! oh no! I'm going to be smoking with the apple...." Her face was a mixture of horror and confusion, accompanied by an awkwardly long pause. 
You say that but i very clearly remember 2 ladies who came in and bought 1 cucumber, strawberries, whipped cream and lube. My mind instantly thought "well they're going to have a fun afternoon". 
Retail robot mode is real. Once you get into the swing of things you just shut your brain off and go with it. I was so in the zone one time I didn't realize my own mother was the customer until I was halfway through the transaction. I was so focused on scanning and bagging I failed to notice she was standing right in front of me. 
I found more people bitching about SJWs than actual SJWs... 
Pretty much every Jewish person I know loves Christmas more than the Christians I know. Dunno why, but Jews love them some Christmas. 
you get three days off work for Christmas? I get christmas day...any other time is PTO 
In retail most of the customers are immemorable, excepting the few that are really nice, or the ones that are looking to find any and all reason to become enraged over things no matter how petty. 
Have you talked to him since then? A bunch of people who were predicting that have pivoted over to the Deep State idea, the one where Obama didn't *really* step down, and is controlling everything from the shadows. 
I get worse shits from eating too much pizza than late night taco bell. 
That may be because of fiber. Beans have a lot of fiber and these people who complain about this likely have terrible diets that include no fiber whatsoever. A well balanced, healthy diet should include plenty of fiber. Its good for you. Fiber helps keep things moving. 
Also Australia. The different tax bracket forced me to pay off a higher amount of my student loan per pay cycle, so ended up taking home slightly less than before the pay rise. Still, the money is better paying off my debt than in the company's pocket 
There was a really tall like maybe 6'5 super generic neckbeard type in my school and on the first day of class, he held the door open for the 3 girls infront of me, while us 4 where talking (3 girls+me) but he held it awkwardly diagonally so you had to walk under his arm then he just shoved infront of me and didn't let me through while literally saying, "And they say chivalry is dead". I thought the neckbeard stereotype was just some stupid internet cringe shit, but man that was actually hilariously sad. 
I worked with someone like that and he made some situations really awkward where it was very natural for me to hold the door and really out of the way for him to refuse and take it from me. I expressed annoyance but didn't yell. 
I have to say it isn't true. As a German, I do hold doors open, but here at workplaces it's pretty much fair game. Anyone in the more convenient place to hold the door open holds it open. But we often hang our heads mumbling "thanks" into our beards while quickly sliding through he door 
Yeah I got yelled at in NYC for sitting down on a train and the older lady sitting next to me, who reminded me shes been at Columbia for 19 years, for not offering my seat to a healthy looking, young woman. I was pretty drunk and just needed to sit down so I was so confused. But yeah, just that once. Every girl I talked to about it said it's wrong to treat anyone differently because of gender which I totally agree with 
Same here. I still remember having to tell people for what seemed like half of summer that there were no ice creams. I still remember their tortured screams. 
I was at the mall and made eye contact with a gay couple, so we had a 3 way in the water fountain 
It's people like this who get manipulated the most 
Quick! Abdul! We must strike against America's Third String! 
Amazing. My neighbors are black and my grandmother is always like "But aren't you, *you know*... nervous?" And I always say, "About what? They're nice people." She never really has an answer. Chill Grandma, you don't even know a black person. 
seriously, like they're just people. it becomes a lot less "us vs them" when you're both standing in walmart in your pajamas at 2 am 
This is probably the case more often than not. I qualify for a few low-income programs and have been on food stamps. Where do my name brand clothes come from? Goodwill. I take the bus to wealthy neighborhoods and buy their castoffs for under $5 a piece. Lasts me longer than whatever you could find at the dollar store. 
I know of a lady who gets close to $1000. She also has at least 10 kids living with her and works full time. I couldn't imagine having to feed 10 kids on a paycheck that is also used for bills. 
Before they can open their mouths to complain, they're already dead. 
Yeah, it was in a documentary I watched on the origins of urban legends a while back, the dude poisoned his kid's pixie sticks. Pretty fucked up 
For Christmas the family used to get together at grandma's house. She was a very nervous and paranoid woman. My cousin and I got some cash one year, and we wanted to go to the mall to find a toy to buy. She warned us that she heard that some sick man with sissors had been lurking in a mall bathroom, a cut some random kid's penis off. We were just kids. I was terrified of public bathrooms for years after that. 
But then they flash their brights and you realize that HID lights are super fucking bright for normal headlights. 
If it's a country road where the speed limit is arbitrarily low, I always signal drivers approaching a speed trap. 
DAMN IT THE FIDGET SPINNER THING IS ALREADY HAPPENING 
You see, a pimp's love is very different from that of a square. 
It was Oprah. It's a common example for media panic spirals: nonexistent or statistically rare to the point of improbable events are reported, which creates awareness and the sense of greater presence, followed by attempted copycatting and confirmation bias. 
I'm suddenly imagining that 90% of the teens she interviewed had never been to that kind of "party" and were exaggerating or making shit up so no one knew how uneventful their lives really were. "Oh, yeah, I go to parties. Lots of them, like all the time. ...Uh, well, usually I drink like, 6 beers and then 10 vodka shots or so... And then I have loads of sex, like, with tons of hot girls. ...Rainbow parties? Oh, uh, yeah, of course, all the cool kids do..." 
Doesn't have to be teenaged girls. Middle aged guys can wear lipstick too, you know. 
"Does your daughter absolutely *blow* at blowing? Find out tonight at 11." 
Some of the Silicon Valley tech billionaires will give out king-size candy bars for Halloween. Not fun-sized, king-sized. Thats better than drugs. 
As if you wouldn't see the cut in the apple skin. Seriously, how could you cover that up? And how do you get the razor far enough in that it doesn't make a huge dent in the apple? 
perhaps if the media stopped misrepresenting the drug trade people would have a clearer picture. I'm not even sure if society at large realizes it's just about money. 
Not extinct! You can still find gros michel, they're just not common. There's still an active effort to breed disease resistant gros michel, because they have superior benefits as a cultivar for transportation. If you want more banana facts, just ask! 
Sounds like those over protective parents that are against school shootings. Like stop being a helicopter parent and let kids be kids for once. 
Coronation Street (super watched UK soap) had a quicksand storyline the other week. The character didn't die though, his arch rival nemesis saved him, coz you know, it's a soap. Though, the place it was filmed in does have quicksand irl and people have died on British beaches due to it. 
I quit smoking about a year and a half ago. Everyone tells me they are proud of me and to keep it up while they smoke in front of me lol. 
sounds like every interaction ever with stoners and people who don't smoke 
That's actually a really cool, thoughtful way to do it. I was a band nerd, but I feel like if someone had phrased it that way, I might have partaken in some product. 
You'd be surprised. At a train station one night I was offered a hit by a junkie I'd never met before. I politely declined. But I have had friends who were addicted to heroin. They were always very generous with other heroin users. None of them would ever have offered any to someone who didn't already partake. I even found crack dealers in not-so-great parts of the city to be very courteous when I declined their offers. Although I didn't always decline in my younger days. 
I think there was study saying that it was frustrating games that caused violence rather than violent games... Can confirm i get more angry and violent when playing frustrating games. 
At the gym I go to we had a guy use a strap (instead of a metal grip or his hands) to do some standing bar rows. He was kinda cheating them up and lost his grip. He stumbled backwards and bumped into the emergency exit door, which set off the alarm. It's now called the lunk alarm. 
I do a lot of meal prep so I usually wait for a sale and then I'll go buy like 20lbs of ground beef or 10lbs of cheese or two or three pork shoulders, etc. and I swear someone in line comments on it every time. 
Haha, I did the same thing for my friend. The look on the cashiers face was hilarious. Poor old man. Thought I was ignorant or bonkers. 
I was just like "if anybody judges me for being responsible, they can go to hell." 
*Cards someone over 21 for alcohol* *Wonders why they're buying it* She's a lost cause already. I'm sure your purchase wasn't the only one she had commentary for that day... 
I'll give you that, but strawberries and whipped cream on their own would mean a nice time. 
Worked at a pet store for a couple of years awhile ago. Some very old people buy up the cat food (especially the cheapest, like Friskies at $0.50/can) and eat it. Holdover from leaner times. 
Because we can get seated immediately at that Chinese restaurant with the awesome egg rolls down the street that's always packed except on Christmas when all the Christians are at home with their families. 
Have they seen the pictures of Obama before and after he left office? Dude looks like he's got the weight of the world off his shoulders. If running the executive was hard from the front you'd think it would be even more stressful from the shadows. 
I don't think he collected the money. I think he just got beer. 
I reside on a campus with a big nerd culture and have witnessed some of the cringiest neckbeard acts. I've never seen it happen but I've heard of guys in a trench coat, fingerless gloves, and a fedora hold the door open and 100% seriously say m'lady. 
Oh I know, it's awful. Then when you try to smoke said cigarette someone else walks up and starts smoking with you, talking about how bad the world's getting and how you can't keep your doors unlocked anymore. 
The best strategy for a nuclear war is to try to be close enough to the blast that you're vaporized because the living will envy the dead. 
This is the story of my life. I work for a fashion company but make so little money that I qualify for state aid. 90% of my wardrobe comes from buying samples from my company for $5 each, while the other 10% comes from the nice Goodwill where I can easily find new name brand shoes and nice appliances. 
Oh my gosh me too! I scared myself so badly I convinced my doctor I had a heart problem. I wore a holter monitor for two days and was diagnosed with... anxiety. 
My friend told me yesterday that fidget spinners have super high levels of lead in them. I didn't care enough to look it up 
Ugh, something about imagining Oprah talking about bjs is so wrong, it's like seeing my grandma naked 
"And then we smoke a couple of joints and eat a couple pans of pot brownies and run the streets naked with reefer fever!" 
Realistic goals. I like it. Good Goals should be "SMART" Specific, Measurable, Acheivable, Realistic and Time Limited I think you're doing a good job of this. Keep up the good work and positivity 
"I don't need to see this, I already know the answer" 
How to make a name for your story's protagonists: Think of normal name/word, fill your mouth with cereal and attempt to say it. The sounds you make become your protagonists new name. 
Pretty sure it's supposed to be a candy apple. You wouldn't see it because it's dipped in caramel or something. 
the only thing that protects a good kid with a gun from a bad kid with a gun is a teacher with a gun. or something like that 
I think she bought a bunch of syringes, dismantled them, threw away all the pieces in separate trash cans, and then threw the packaging into a ball pit. 
We've loads of it on the east coast of Ulster. You gotta be careful! It's usually signposted. 
I fully appreciate that not smoking, drinking, or doing any drugs would absolutely be better for my body. I'm glad for people who don't deal with shit like that tbh. 
It's not sweet, it's responsible. That's the type of person you want around when you take drugs. You always need a minder if you've never taken a substance before as you never know how you'll react. 
Cause if you cant find any you can get help from the friends you share with. Paying it forward so to say. I mean that for almost anything drugs, money, places to stay whatever. 
For what it's worth, they do sometimes overlap (see: Dark Souls) 
I really want to know what you meal prep with 10lbs of cheese 
I grew up in a very conservative household where having sex was regarded as one of the worst things a woman could do, it took a while to break the stigma in my mind 
Meh, she was a really nice middle aged Indian lady. India is a really conservative country when it comes to that stuff. She was just being friendly really, my girlfriend and I both thought it was really funny that she got so uncomfortable about it all. 
You say that, but their plan was to eat cucumber and whipped cream. Then they put the strawberries in each other's butts. The lube was for a friend that was having a hard time getting in and out of their cosplay costume. 
He's literally going on yachts with Oprah and ~~Tom Cruise~~ Tom Hanks. Pretty sure dude's got better shit to do than 'be in the deep state'. EDIT for seeing too much advertising for The Mummy 
Oh, come on, no one's going to be dropping nukes on the middle of Missouri. What's the point, it's Missouri? 
"I smoked so much alcohol! Yeah, I do it all the time." 
Because I am lazy I'm going to just settle for an ART goal and draw on my dick with different colored lipstick while eating Easy Mac in my darkened single room apartment. 
And if you get a candy apple on Halloween it'd be worth the risk. That's a nice score. 
It seems to me that she bought syringes, dismantled them, scattered them, disposed of the packaging, then got raucously drunk and had a torrid lesbian affair that she regretted and yet couldn't quite get out of her mind. 
Yeah, this. Usually if a junkie shares its with his network because A) he knows what it's like to withdraw and may not want others to go through that hell but mostly... B) when it's HIS turn to be out he can go back around to these same people for the returned favor. It's kinda like putting some heroin in the bank. 
When I was a manager at a fast food place and I'd receive a complaint from a customer about and angry or unfriendly employee, I'd just talk to the employee. You know, figure out what was wrong or had them down. With as much stress as people can feel in their life it doesn't do much good to get angry with them. 
I've got several friends with aspbergers and you just forget about it because they're just like everyone else. Maybe a tad bit stranger at times or in some ways (one of them hardly ever leaves the house, and we fear he'll wind up like his parents: lazy and unwilling to do much of anything except smoke pot and sit in front of the tv). 
I'll happily take the downvotes to say there's nothing wrong with that. Everyone wants their children to be healthy and have every opportunity for a happy, successful life. It doesn't mean you hate autistic people, it's just that you want the best for your kids. Not something to be ashamed of. 
It's the twats that install after market headlights and then don't adjust them properly so they are pointing right at oncoming traffic. 
My dog drank a glass of Jack and Coke once. He stumbled down the hall, threw up, cried to my wife and passed out. Woke up with a hangover and now he's terrified of the smell of alcohol. 
My 5th graders are taught in their drug awareness classes that "marijuana" is (and I quote) "Mexican street slang". I've never actually looked it up, since I don't teach those classes. 
Organized in a giant circle, all of them being jerked simultaneously. 
Actually, it is a term coined by Americans who wanted cannabis to sound mexian, and therefore bad. (also mexican tobacco plant) 
I would absolutely subscribe to banana facts. P.S. are you a bananaologist or something? 
I thought they were herbs? Any idea where that came from? Also, subscribe. 
They have 1/36th of the things regular buses have to do with things. 
Almost every example of a Cavendish cultivar is a perfect clone of one plant! This is what makes them so vulnerable to diseases, like the gros michel. 
The plants that bananas grow on don't have woody tissue, which means they're herbaceous plants. The fruit of the plant, though, has the qualities that make it technically a berry! 
They gave my mother in law six weeks when they found her colorectal cancer and she went almost seven years. Godspeed, dude. Never stop being surprised. 
This is where I am at now, but I have been unemployed for almost a year. I am miserable right now. This gives me hope knowing that I can get there one day. Congrats! 
I understand these choices you're making. I had a decent day today, which is very far off from waking up some days angry that I even woke up. There are weeks and weeks I choose to make the right choices. I make dinner every night, I pack my lunch with energy filled foods, I go to sleep early, and I exercise every couple of days (that coupled with riding my bike to work gets me enough movement). But some days I still wake up wanting to buy a van, pimp it out, and enjoy the country. Believe me, I know that won't fix my problems, and it's something my GF isnt too terribly interested in. I know any life you chooses brings you an entirely new array of problems. After moving 5 times in the past 3-4 years I realize that happiness is an internal thing. But I can't help waking up everyday wanting a completely different life (aside from my girlfriend). Nothing specific, just I really think my life is dull. 
Honestly, I think that getting quality sleep is one of the best things for leading a happy life. Get 8 hours every night (maybe more; I like 9), and make it consistent. Some people can do fine on 6 or 7. Odds are that you are not one of those people. There's a thing in our culture (at least in the US) that spending the max amount of time awake is best. Gotta hang out and whatnot, I guess. The problem is, if I'm tired, I'm not gonna enjoy hanging out. If I stay up late on Friday with you, my Saturday is gonna be crap. So pardon me if I chose to enjoy a full day instead of a few extra hours when the sun isn't even up. I'm going to bed at 11 at the latest. 
Agreed. It's not that I wake up every morning and think "Boy oh boy, this is gonna be the best day ever!" but whenever I think about my life in general I find that, although it could be better, I can accept it the way it is. People hate on the phrase "Happiness is a choice / state of mind" because obviously you can't just choose to stop being depressed, but it's true in the sense that it's about being happy where you are rather than waiting on something new to make you happy. Nothing is going to make you happy forever, so you're better off appreciating your default state. 
Seriously, i used to hate getting up, then I nearly died.. now I love getting up. 
Wow, I really like this. I imagine doing this makes the people you say this to feel appreciated, rather than slighted in some way they probably wouldn't have even noticed anyway until you apologized. A positive spin instead of a negative one. Thank you!!! I'm going to do this too. 
Lucky. My biggest fears are being buried alive in a coffin full of snakes and marrying a girl I'm not particularly fond of but do so anyways because of the expectation 
I am into your attitude. I lie in bed at night imagining what a lavish breakfast I could have the next morning and go to sleep smiling. And then I wake up and have oatmeal again so I'm not late for work :D But I love oatmeal, and on weekends I make myself huevos rancheros and watch Avatar: The Last Airbender. 
Love it. I felt incredible, overwhelming joy today because a co-worker brought lemons freshly picked from his lemon tree. Amazing! It's all about finding joy in the little things. 
Mind if i asked how you improved socially? I am a social retard and struggle in this department. 
This. Stop comparing your life to shit you see on TV. Happiness is a state of mind and that means you can control it. 
That reminds me of what a dog would say about their owner if the dog could talk 
I would be careful to preach if "it is really hard, just don't do it". It compels laziness and no fulfillment, a precursor to much unhappiness. Some things that garner the greatest amount of satisfaction and happiness can come from what seemed like impossible obstacles and goals. Yet, I completely understand the notion of not taking life so seriously. There is a balance and everyone's balance is different. 
I'm glad to see this answer on here. One thing to realize is that nobody truly wakes up happy and enjoys every day. Happiness isn't a perennial state, it's a temporary emotion. Making more out of your life comes from more than just being happy every day. 
My stepdad was given 12-18 months after diagnosed with a glioma brain cancer... He got 4 months. Worst part was seeing my mom sad. We're all doing ok now though I know she's still sad. 
Fuck cancer indeed. Best to you and yours. Keep fighting every day and see the beauty in everything. 
Thanks, I really appreciate that. In the words of that great sage Warren Zevon, enjoy every sandwich. 
Sounds like he was a great guy. And that's how I want to live my life: enjoying it. 
I took up a hobby that I enjoyed. And after a few months I noticed that I was looking forward to it all week. Helped me get out of the dullness a bit. Maybe something on the lines of that could help you. Also, 1 I have noticed about dullness - it starts with not feeling some emotions for a longer time period. Movies, books and other types of entertainment can really help with that. In case you already don't, that is. 
Because the news is almost always negative, because negativity gets you hooked into watching. There's *always* some crisis, some accident, some tragedy somewhere in the world that the news is waiting to report on. How many times do you watch the news and come away thinking, "Man, I really feel great after watching the news." I'm gonna guess it's close to zero. 
Honestly, it's not for everyone. For me, I have to try really hard to limit myself to 7.5 hours. If I sleep past that, I go to 9. If I get to nine, I feel exhausted when I get up, and like crap all day. Then I start sleeping longer and longer and it's a vicious cycle. Some of us are definitely wired for less sleep, just gotta find what works for you. 
its very freeing. even if you have bad shit, just taking the time to be happy is important. there is always ALWAYS something to find joy in. 
They might cover this, I don't know since I haven't seen it, but I don't think it's a natural thing. I think it's a survival tactic that we're taught. Something I realized long ago was that maturity was just a way to shame people for having emotions, especially joy. It's changing now, I think, but when I was a kid, there was basically a list of things adults aren't allowed to enjoy (toys, video games, comics, etc. are for "kids") Numerous TV shows and young adult books told me that at a certain age, you pack up everything in a box and say goodbye to fun. That it's "cool" to suppress your emotions. It's not surprising that a lot of people grow up to be miserable adults. 
It's crazy reading this because this is my same situation. I am a designer too and just put in my two weeks on Friday for all of these reasons. I feel relieved to be getting out, but I too have no backup plan. 
I knew a guy that also "fell" from the 5th floor of a parking garage and landed on his face. A ton of surgery and recuperation later and he can pass as just a really ugly mentally disabled guy with paranoia and anger management issues. Oddly he also became extremely religious. Moral of the story, if you jump do from at least the 7th story but the higher the better. Or don't jump, your choice. 
Usually in a peak of anxiety or bad mood depression, just talking it out helps. Expressing yourself, even if what you're saying is absolute bullshit. Basically tires you out from being overly emotional. "I'm so shitty at this" s/he says as s/he broods, is more energy consuming than "How can I get better at this?" s/he wondered 
Arent they literally the shitty part of the job? xD 
Dude, your username is mine with some letters changed and switched! 
I think a lot of it depends on how you feel about animals. My dad used to be a farmer and both he and my mum were absolutely crushed every time they sent the animals off to slaughter, so he gave it up. If you can be resilient and just see them as a way to make money you'd be fine though. 
Dude. Me too. Nearly died of an OD just a month ago and when I woke up I realized 22 was wayyyyy too young to die, despite how much I wanted to be dead at the time. There is so much to experience, I've only gotten a taste and I realized I really wanted more. Death is the end of experience, and while i believe there is a time and place for death I'm not there yet. The sun feels so nice now, while it was just another feeling before. Idk what changed in me, but I'm so glad it did. I guess it took nearly dying to want to live. Ironic. 
My brother and I had the same from our parents (well, my mom had those same expectations and violent reactions to not meeting them, but did absolute DICK to encourage us to DO anything. She just expected us to magically be amazing children with zero work/discipline/affection). I have spent 17 years in therapy, and even though she died last year, I have massive guilt over everything I haven't accomplished, and never will. I also am massively afraid I've become her, and do everything in my power to do the opposite of what she did. That part is working out so far, but the same sentence I hear from everyone is, "You are too HARD on yourself!" 
Thank you for your well-wishes. I have no idea how old you are now, but I was 34 when I met the woman who is now my wife. Don't count yourself out of the romance game. And even if you never fine *love* again, there is great happiness value in finding good friends to be with as well. 
I've rewatched ATLA probably 15 times with my family and we never get tired of it. It's too good. 
My wife and I love breakfast for dinner. We call it "brinner". 
Well, in my case, I've had a very intimate view of what life is like on the other side. Been there, done that. No desire to return, so I keep doing what works and avoiding what doesn't. At the end of the day, I'm grateful I'm still alive. Life is glorious and you only get one chance, so seize the moment. Now is the only time that matters. 
Weird, it's the exact opposite for me. If I get anything less than 9 hours then I start my day exhausted and my energy just slowly depletes more and more as time passes 
This sounds terribly cliche, but sometimes all it takes is taking a drive down a back road or just a walk through nature. That always gives me a "holy shit, this life is beautiful" moment. 
I'm not so sure about this. I know plenty of adults who are into toys, video games, comics but are miserable. In fact, it seems contributory to their misery (in a chicken and egg way). Sort of an avoidance of adulthood, which of course doesn't work very well. 
I felt relieved to be out, but it was super hard for me to just quit with no backup plan. Luckily, I lived in the same city that I grew up in so my family was there. But I would say learn from what you didn't like about that place and find a place that suits you better. For me, I learned it was all about the environment and type of work. The agency I worked at didn't acknowledge the effort and hours that I put in (which led to burnout). And I wasn't in love with marketing design. So I ended up in a tech place afterwards with an AWESOME supervisor working product side. That made all the difference for me. Best of luck to you and let me know if you ever need to talk. When I moved client side, I'd hear the same stories about "agency life" that I went through similarly and you will start to feel less alone. 
Why do you feel the need to just go on the internet and be savage 
I'd pay $60,000 to get rid of my neck and back pain. 
Pretty much the same as me. Minus the singing, I have a horrible voice 
I guess that depends on climate conditions. :-) I live in Germany, so it's rather cool here. Also I'm not the person that breaks out easily in sweat. If you achieve a shower every day, you made it! But I guess every two days is a good beginning to change your lifestyle from sorrow to success. :) 
I used to be that way. I think finding an activity that you find yourself being mentally engaged in helps keep yourself awake. I don't find my job boring, so once I get going, I am pretty awake during the actual work. However, if I wake up with less than 9 hours of sleep, and don't have something to keep me mentally active, I want to go back to bed. Also coffee helps. 
That's true. I work best around 7-8 hours of sleep. Anymore than 8.5 hours will make me feel sleepy in a weird way. Not fatigue sleepy, it feels different. 
It's a habit that can be reinforced through practice. Think of it a bit like weight loss. Some people might find themselves in a position where they've never struggled with it while for others it is a constant struggle. 
Yes. Perception is a huge boon. Reorienting yourself is important 
Good for you! Designer here as well. Marketing design can be fun because you can get crazy and fancy, but product design is so fun because you get to work with smart engineers and basically invent shit that people use! 
Oh that's what I'm doing wrong. See I'm just channeling my anger into apathy 
I also think of the people who would see it happen, how scarring it would be for them. Random people didn't do anything to deserve that. 
Taco Bell seems to be a fairly profitable company so I think you'll be g...oh, you meant you bought food from Taco Bell. Much less prosperous outcomes from that action. 
Practicing that gratitude already I see. Nice work. 
I'm at 7 months and things just keep getting better. Working on the positivity but the way I see it, life is going to keep happening so you can either deal with it and try to thrive or roll over, drink and do drugs and die. 
How cool. I'm really glad that I could help with just a few words. And big thanks to OP for making this post! 
I have an idea. No promises that it will help... But it seems to me like "focus on gratitude" is a good way to overcome a "life is shitty" ideology. You seem to have more of a "life is good but I'm shitty" ideology, so reminding yourself of all the things you have to be grateful for just makes you feel bad. So, what if you tried listing things you liked about yourself, instead of things about your life? Like "today I took so and so to lunch, I like that I'm a good friend." It seems hokey but if you do it over time it could help you take stock of your own positive qualities and then you can cultivate the ones you're most proud of. I bet there are more than you think!! 
You could try volunteering for something that requires a certain amount of time from you. Check out Big Brothers Big Sisters if they have it in your area, it only requires a minimum of 2 2-hour visits a month. Like, check it out right now, since you're already on the internet. And once you sign up, you're kind of obligated to do something that will make you feel good. 
Good question. I didn't really keep track or note any particular milestones. It took probably about two years of very intentional, intensive conditioning. The last three years have been much easier since positivity has become more of my permanent state of mind, but it requires intentional upkeep with occasional failures. And since a few people have started paying attention to what I wrote here, I need to point out that this is what worked *for me*. Everybody is different, depression is a serious and potentially deadly disease, and I suffered a relatively mild case compared to some folks I've known. I only had one suicidal episode back when I was a teen, and I was treated medically for that. I'm not a doctor and can't recommend my path to cure depression. However, I do think that what works for me can be helpful for anyone who is in a bad place emotionally, regardless of the cause. 
Everyone can sing. I started singing last year, I am doing some classes and this year I am part of a Choral. You just need to study and train, your voice use muscles, the more you train the better. 
I think I'm a 7 hr person. The last few times I knew, per the clock, I got 8 hours it was really hard to get going in the morning. I have 1 day all week I get to sleep in and even then I can't seem to make it to 8+hrs 
Do you happen to have any reading suggestions on this, or some terms it might be helpful to google? I have severe depression problems that are getting the best of me, and I need a new approach. Unfortunately, I'm living in the country that considers suicide a natural cause of death to depression (yay Japan) so talking to someone isn't really in my cards. 
The worst part of the job is all the eye strain from peering down microscopes. 
You sound like me, are you me? Eh, nevermind I don't really care. 
Funny thing is, people use this excuse to not do things they actually wanna do that would improve their lives. 
Why is your nose bleeding from a squat? I think your doing it wrong 
You're still thousands of miles away from "what is the worst that could happen". Trust me on this... 
Appreciating people for practicing that gratitude already I see. excellent Job. 
I cant tell you how much I regret not paying attention more on my grades and the basketball team I was on. Sophomore year ended and I met friends who showed me cigarettes, marijuana and alcohol. Spent the next two years of high school "being cool," losing my GPA and quitting the basketball team. Broke my dad's heart not being able to watch his little girl play basketball anymore. Being cool was fun until I grew up and realized, "what the hell dude, you done fucked up." Been trying to catch up since and I'm 26 years old with no money in my bank account and nothing to show for my hard work. BUT my outlook on life has changed tremendously and for the better. 
That sounds really difficult but also like a really good idea, thank you 
Yeah maybe we have different paths. I guess I just asked cuz I hear the gratitude thing a lot and let me tell you I am SO FUCKING GRATEFUL for what I have so I always wonder if maybe I'm like... being grateful wrong? Maybe gratitude just isn't my motivating factor tho, everyone's different. I'll find mine hopefully. Thank you for your response tho and I'm so glad you're in such a happy place now, congrats! You're inspiring all kinds of people on here with your story, you're the thing some people are grateful for tonight! Thank you again :) 
POWERTHIRST!!!! It's like flying a fighter jet made out of BICEPS!!!! 
If your nose isn't bleeding that means you can take more weight. 
I really appreciate you appreciating those people. Stellar work. 
You're welcome! I hope it helps. I wanted to chime in because you're definitely not the only way to feel that way and this is one of the things that has been good for me to counter it. 
Give power thirst to your babies and they'll be *abnormally fast* 
I'm going to piggyback on this and say something slightly different but along the same lines: kudos. 
Did you ever hear the Tragedy of Darth Plagueis the Wise? 
Oh. I thought you meant people don't wanna do shit like exercise because it would be too mentally scarring for those who saw it. 
Let me go ahead and horsey-back on that, and tell you something moderately different but with a similar gist: *bravo*. 
I thought not. It's not a story the Jedi would tell you. 
Not if you wash your hands! Sex ed and personal health in one go! 
she was probably asking the wrong teacher and the wrong question. she should have asked a chemistry teacher approximately how many men ejaculating at once into a standard size hot tub would make a spum solution still concentrated enough to get her pregnant. 
That's what you get for scheduling sex ed right after math. 
1 weekend= 2 days 2 days= 48 hours This would mean he would have to ejaculate twice every hour for 2 days straight. Well damn... 
And then that one kid who wasn't laughing because he was legitimately gay in an all-boy, catholic high school. 
There was another thread with a bunch of chicks who had previously thought the vagina just absorbed it. Maybe that was what she meant? 
Well cows do have uterodes too. Haha Edit; okay! I changed it from UTERUSES to UTERI and then to UTERODES. 
He flew too close to the sun on wings of provolone. 
The milk comes out like a sprinkler even if she doesn't have her nipples pierced 
You *were* on the right track though. "How would they menstruate?" would have been pretty right on. In the cultures where they actually do this to young women (yeah, I know...), they have to leave a bit of an opening for menstruation to avoid death from sepsis. You may not want to know any more details about this, but look up "infibulation" if you do. It's a pretty reprehensible practice, but surprisingly widespread. 
Aww cmon now it's protein! Women crack eggs in their hair, why can't they just use my baby glaze? 
Girl in my school was convinced she got pregnant because she was fingered. 
The penis bone goes back home to Pen Island where it waits in its little cave until you get another boner. It will come again. 
Wouldn't have been so bad, but it was in the middle of a math class. 
Our teacher did this - i.e. Have us write down our questions on little bits of paper. First question she picks up to read says "why are my periods green?"... she dropped the piece of paper and knew immediately one of the boys wrote it, and sent a few of them out of class until she could get one of them to own up to it. We all thought it was hilarious she actually read it out aloud to the class before realising what she was reading. 
For better aerodynamics, like landing gear on a plane. 
I once heard a story similar to this that happened in Thailand. These teens used a plastic bag as a condom. It didn't work... 
They showed us photos in 9th grade but not in the four years prior. Probably a good idea not to start with that considering when I was in 5th grade one of the other girls almost vomited looking at the male anatomy diagrams. 
Saw this on a different thread but I think the consensus was that penis length was insignificant compared to ejaculation force. 
I knew an autistic kid named Aaron, wonder if they're the same guy 
I always scream and moan the Lord's name when I dig into some delicious food. 
In my class they described ejaculation as a thing that happened when a guy got an erection after they'd hit puberty. I was mortified, because I was in the constant random boner phase of prepubescence. So my anonymous question was whether ejaculation happened every time haha. 
Yes, now whenever that happens, save the semen in a jar and when the jar gets full, bring it to your church and beg forgiveness 
Because up til then he thought the bugs living in his pubes were just harmless little critters? 
Honestly, poor Myles if he's bleeding from his dick every month. 
Our teacher explained this away by saying that you can't urinate whilst erect. I was lied to! 
Went to catholic school also. Our Sex Ed was largely about procreation being the sole reason for sex. This lead to a lot of situational questions such as: "You said anal isn't okay, but what if you finish in the vagina?" or "If I cum in her mouth but my pre-cum gets her pregnant, is that okay?" At an all boy - military - catholic school, the goal was to see how far we could push the priests. 
That's exactly the kind of question that should be asked in sex ed. 
When I was young I asked my friends if men of darker skin produced darker semen hahaha 
What kind of fucking question is that for sex ed?! 
I assume the answer demolished her one objection to something something... 
Seems like something you'd want to prepare to answer. Little kids asking follow up questions is like the sunrise: it'll happen whether or not you want it, and it's usually unwelcome when you're trying to sleep 
Hey, I had a friend, whose father is a doctor, and her father honestly believes that the only time you can get someone pregnant is by having sex when they're on their period. He has three kids, all from different women, makes me wonder why the hell he still believes it. He's like 56 years old too. A lot of people are VERY misinformed. Edit; just because I seemed to cause some confusion with my original wording. Also, I just realized I didn't count the last ten years towards his age. Second edit; grammar. And also.... It was my friends 18th birthday, he gifted her a box of condoms and told her, right in front of me, "remember, you can only get pregnant when you're on your period, so make sure you use one of these". Dude graduated medschool in the 80's or something, hung around with strippers and gambled his house away. Don't ask me how he became a doctor, cuz I have no idea. 
How does everyone sit there and not jump at the chance to answer that? I would be cracking up and raise my hand so fast. Then again I have no shame. 
I'm sure that worked out super well for everybody involved and there were no unintended consequences whatsoever... 
To answer, though: no pros, only cons. Less sensation (I'd assume), higher risk of breakage/leaks due to excessive friction. Much less safe than just using one properly. 
Real question, do you think the kid in that video had to watch himself being born in his sex ed class? 
Too many parents thinking it's better to have cutesy names and never mention the actual terms. And maybe when she heard it on a tv show or movie she didn't link the two? Anyway, it's important for kids to know the actual name for their anatomy, if anything happen ''greg touched my cookie'' will be dismissed but ''greg touched my vagina'' won't. 
"Yes that's how Congressmen and senators are conceived" 
Goddamn EVERYONE I talk to seems to have watched that same puberty video with the diving board boner. 
That probably depends on how much each man makes at once. 
Mightn't be laughing, but I'm sure he was smiling. 
Oh yeah, I forgot to mention. This wasn't an abstinence-only class, but it was basically abstinence *focused*. We got the whole "Horribly mutilated genitals" movie, a abstinence frog, and a told us that using condoms was only 75% effective because of things like slippage and tearing. So, the bar here for useful information was already low. 
I thought that before my first time. I totally blame movies/TV shows showing us women who jump up and carry on with their day right after sex, instead of the more realistic waddle to the bathroom, often with Kleenex held strategically in place, to expel the remains of the load. The shock of having it plop down on the ground after getting out of bed that first night was quite memorable. 
My wife has one pierced nipple and one unpierced. She is her own control group! Milk actually does come out of the piercing hole but it's not particularly noticable or different than her other breasts. 
Cool, I'll Facebook message Tina and let her know that after further research over the last two decades i've made some new conclusions. 
Ya, it wasn't until many years later I realized that joke was pretty fucked up. Hooray public schools! 
...and you just reminded me of the time my Mom thought it would be fun for us to treat our hair with mayonnaise *and* flour...then put heat on it. :sigh: Head bread was very, very hard to remove. 
Answer *should* have been: "Because you're a Vulcan." 
In my college orientation (this being about 16 years ago) a nurse was brought up to speak about different thing's she's seen. The only thing I remember was the story of the teenage couple that attempted to use aluminum foil. *Shudders* 
From memory the teacher said something about size not mattering too much, because it can only go so far before hitting the cervix 
A former boss was a retired navy captain, and told the story of how when he was XO he had a sailor come to him complaining of burning down there after a stop in Singapore. He asked the kid, "Why didn't you use a condom?" The kid replied, "We did, but we wanted to do it again and didn't have any more, so we turned it inside out." 
Apparently it's different depending on the diet of the dude. Kind of interesting if I'm being perfectly honest. 
My teacher said that too. I thought my penis was broken for years because I could. 
Wow. May the future generations continue to find new boundaries to push. I commend thee 
Yep. Wrong teacher teaching sex ed if he thinks that's a stupid question for a kid to wonder. 
*Sees the shocked faces in the crowd* "What, you guys haven't heard of Albert Fish? Alright, let me tell you a story..." 
Are you sure he didn't say while ovulating? Because that sounds like a pretty crazy thing for a doctor to believe. 
Only for the janitors who had to clean the playground afterwards. 
Yes, but you can probably use some average to get a ballpark. It would depend more on the size of the hot tub. She says the guys are in the hot tub. A bit tub that can guy 51 people would be pretty large. Though I suppose you could pack them densely which would mean less room for water in the hot tub. 
How do you shave there?! For a friend. And doesn't it itch like crazy growing back in? 
Just like with people, an extra nipple can pop up on occasion (common in men). Nipple numbers are determined by double the average litter size. But no mammal has a "standard" number of odd nipples besides the Virginia Possum. 
And how frustrating is it that even after you think you're done cleaning it out, you relax a little while later and oh look, there was some still hiding out up there! And now I need yet ANOTHER set of clean panties! 
But bigger than the boob? Wouldn't that make her name "Red velvet pancake"? 
Younguns. In my day we ate cheese and screamed Brett Favre, and we li... Well, we didn't really *like* it, it was just the done thing if you lived in WI. 
I fainted from butt sex it hurt so bad. my ex definitely did it wrong... never again. 
Well, if you wave your dick at me I'll probably give up on the argument. 
No way, I was just going to retell this story because I remembered it from another thread a while back, but here you are retelling it. Your gonorrhea story is famous! 
"Ah shit, gross. That's almost as bad as your muff" 
In high school reproductive biology, a teacher said the same thing, and when some students in the class mentioned it was very possible if you merely bent forward, it blew his mind. Poor guy had suffered needlessly for years. 
Shit, I went to a Jesuit School, we spent Health Class(Sex Ed and then some) trying to make the 65 year old priest crack. Eventually he just took attendance and let us go do what we wanted, but he never cracked, never yelled at us or gave people punishment. Just that we were so far off course it wasn't worth it. 
The pizza is getting cold! Eat pizza before the D! 
Sometimes you didn't, they just annoyingly cut right from plumber's crack to plumbing her crack. 
Considering that's all kids junk had been to them up until that point, I'd say it's a damn logical question to ask. 
I suspect this is the answer. They wouldn't let you out of med school if you still believed that... Also lots of people confuse menstruation with ovulation without knowing what either really means. 
Squat to do it. It separates your buttcheeks. Then you just sort of do it by feel. It's never itched growing back in for me~ 
It's different skin, like inside your nose and mouth. 
Was in the Navy in 02 and this young kid that was quiet and shy got herpes from eating out and banging hookers in the UAE. He bragged to me he had a threesome. I said bro you paid for it. 
MMMMMM MMMMMM MMM OH MY GOD IM COMING..... over right now to help you eat those pancakes 
Yes I did. I told her it was normal and nothing she should be ashamed of. She immediately went on google and found the wondrous effects of eating pineapple. Now she tastes like sugar metal 
I remember she once ate pizza during...then kicked the guy out and ate the rest. 
"Hey Tina, I learned on Reddit that if you sew up your pussy, you'll die of sepsis." 
Do you mind eating on the couch? Because I really don't feel like setting the table right now. 
This was during your days as a Pizza delivery guy, wasn't it? 
Eating on the couch? So that's what the kids are calling it nowadays... 
"How's the life unde Sharia?" "Can't complain!" I wonder if they have some dark humor regarding the absurditu of the system like soviets had: Judge comes to a breakroom after a courtcase roaring in laughter. The other judges as him whats so funny? The judge through his laughter manages to mutter that he just heard the funniest joke he has ever heard. Excited, the other judges tell him to share the joke. Still laughing the judge mutters "I can't, I just gave a man 10 years sentence for it." 
I was in KL this year and although it was a great place I always had a uneasy feeling in your country. I hope this issue goes in the right direction because the people in your country are mostly fantastic. 
It's even against the Koran... I believe there's a passage that states observing Islamic law is secondary to saving a human life. I think the given example was if a woman came across a man bleeding to death, and the only bandage at hand was her hijab, then she's commiting no sin by removing it, since the greater sin would be not trying to save a dying man. 
I'm still failing to comprehend this... what the fuck was going on through those people's heads? 
Unsure as to why they're viewed as role models - the royals are hypocrites. 
As soon as I landed in the US, I bought a bacon cheeseburger with 2x bacon and a milkshake. It was amazing. 
I wouldn't risk it if I were you. Forget KSA, even supposedly friendlier nations as UAE and Qatar, where alcohol is legal in certain places, have laws that are heavily in bias of rich Sunni Arabs. If you are South Asian, forget it. But even if you're white, it's better to stay straight edge. 
Lots of blood. It reminded me of my 7th grade biology teacher explaining that we have over a gallon of blood in our body. He then asked if any of us had seen a spilled gallon of milk, and if so, then use that to visualize how much blood a human will lose if injured. So, I guess just add a lot of red dye to a gallon of milk and pour it out on the concrete. It won't smell the same, but it'll give you a good idea! 
We thought about living separately before moving, but ultimately she decided to come along for the experience. I simply couldn't continue to ask her to sacrifice so much freedom. She would have stayed out of love and devotion, but she was increasingly scared of living there. It really is hard. She was much happier to be home, and I followed quickly after. We've been through deployments when I was in the military, so it wasn't unlike that. 
Yes. I am white. They treat SE asian workers like slaves. Like, I'm pretty sure they would get killed if they try to leave. It's bad. I forgot to mention that weird culture note in my main post. 
In Riyadh they usually do beheadings in a central location. The place is called Deera square. 
I'm pretty sure there was a movie about something similar. Husband wanted a new wife, current wife stoned to death. 
Yeah often in these places there'd be a few nutjobs who helped the taliban when they were around. One story I remember my uncle telling me was that once the taliban were driven out of a particular village, the houses of the helpers were set on fire, their farms destroyed, cattle killed, etc. Obviously not that great as it affected the innocent kids and family of the guys who'd help more than anyone else, but I suppose when you're going for revenge, collateral isn't a problem. 
Eh, you should go on living really, even if it is only to exterminate every last one of these fuckers that were responsible 
Thanks. Well dating here is not absolutely rare but it's definitely not allowed either, most people don't care but some people called "Mutawwas" who act as religious police, they often have good contacts in the police and are well respected as conservative protectors of Islam. If 2 people are caught dating the girl's family is often shamed socially, guys are mostly let off with a warning but repeat offenders spend time in juvenile camps where they are "treated". A famous example is the kid in Jeddah who was arrested for talking to an American girl over Younow. 
"Russia is just as free as America is. Just as an American can walk onto Capitol Hill and say 'Down with Kennedy!' I can stand in Red Square and say 'Down with Kennedy!'" 
Saudi here too. They teach us English at highschool, also some jobs in here required English as the second language to "communicate" inside the work. 
I live in dubai actually and I know someone who did the same thing as the first story, he was drunk and tried the wrong door and had the police called on him. In dubai they don't use lashes as a punishment, although the law might not be perfect the punishment is always fine/jail/deportation. In this case he was 18 too so underage (drinking age is 21 here) however police only held him for a night then let him go with a fine. 
Worse, in most Gulf countrues, you need an exit visa to leave, and most employers will straight up confiscate your passport and refuse you permission to leave. Good luck getting home without a passport or proper visa documents. 
I had friends who were second generation British Asians, so British born and bred. No other passports. He took a job in Dubai, in Internet City. On the first day of work the HR woman came to him and - with some embarrassment - explained that they had to reduce his salary by two thirds. WTF? "Because you should be on an Asian salary". He protested that he was British, and eventually, grudgingly, he was allowed to remain on the salary in his contract. But it was really difficult for them to cope with the concept of "brown man, white nationality". In another case, a black British man who bought property in Dubai was constantly harassed every single time he went home and asked for ID (it was like a gated community with watchguards). In the end he got irate and the next thing he was in court for some trumped up abuse charge. The worst/funniest I heard was a guy who apparently got a month's jail for farting in a lift (by accident) in front of an Emirati woman who "took offence". 
And yet the rich and celebrities love that place. I guess they can't see the suffering from their penthouse. 
Well unfortunately my mother had no family back home at the time so we couldn't get financial help from anyone. My dads side of the family weren't helpful either. Thank god she had life insurance policies that were pretty mature so she sold them; bought me a plane ticket first so I could study and be away from everything while she tried fighting with the courts.i stayed with host families until she managed to sell enough gold and property two years later to come up to Canada. I owe everything to my mother. 
What happens if you proclaim you no longer believe in Islam? 
Sounds like Malaysians can't even do sharia law right cos a Muslim man is supposed to be able to marry a Christian or Jewish woman without her having to convert. Not the other way round of course, can't have infidels marrying Muslim women. 
Well he had already married another woman behind his wife's back some I am going to guess the answer is because he is a shitbag. 
I don't want them to suffer the way I did, I actually want them to have a happy free life that's not wasted being enslaved to a "husband" and a country that doesn't respect her, hell am I kidding? Doesn't ** acknowledge ** her existence. 
Thanks a lot. I sometimes take it for granted and forget what I currently have, but every now and then I remember and find myself in denial that I actually left that shithole. 
Your mother sounds like a truly wonderful person! I'm glad you have such a spectacular role-model in your life. Some people aren't so lucky.. 
I really hope so too. The news out there is quite misleading. As far as I know, the new changes would only take place if there wasn't an existing written law demanding the consent of a male guardian, e.g. when a woman opens a bank account. But when it comes to matters such as marriage and travel, I believe it is a written law, so nothing would change for now. 
Kinda weird that both of you wouldn't be able to talk to each other IRL 
Speaking from experience, you essentially live a lie of sorts. You don't believe in the religion itself but you have to follow customs to not raise doubts. The penalty for apostasy is death, so you don't lack in motivation to do whatever you have to do to avoid that. 
1) I don't know. I'd guess they'd either make me leave the country, force me to "convert" to islam again or at worst kill me. 2) Brainwashing happens in mousques; the Friday prayer's speech often contains anti-western ideas. And I bet that the Islamic studies curriculum in schools do a pretty good job of brainwashing too, but I haven't taken that in *years*, mostly because I go to a private school. You never hear about disagreement because it is not allowed. Obviously, many muslims even the more religious ones, disagree with the government on a few aspects such as women driving(it is allowed in every other muslims country), but they can't say anything about it. 
It's actually *diyyah*, and yes, it only applies in the case of accidents. 
It basically boiled down to there was absolutely no way his daughter would be allowed to marry a disgusting American. 
In many ways almost comically so. Although I think there is also something to be said about high versus low born as we saw with the Saudi princess yesterday. 
What he's describing wasn't far off of what the norm was for most of the world, we've come a long way. 
I've lived with Afghani women. Younger ones are not used to making big decisions and some would get really stressed out about it. One would even refuse to sign a routine school paper for her kid. On the other hand, I've met some really pushy widows. 
You are correct, it's more of polarisation, and it's only becoming worse with the government encouraging the split. Its going to get uglier as we get closer to the elections. 
Islamic scholars have decided on a thing called abrogation, which basically said if there's conflicting passages then whichever one appears later takes precedence. So if such a passage exists then it's overruled by every law that comes later in the book. 
That's because you think like a human being, something that they gave up trying to be. 
Yeah, I don't like them either. Especially since they tend to stockpile rare cars and leave them in garages to rot. It hurts the car guy in me. But seriously though, Muslims here keep calling the king of Saudi with titles such as 'guardian of the holy city', which is bullshit. They destroyed most of the historical sites in Mecca ffs. 
I'm planning to do my Masters in Canada or NZ. Yeah I'm over 18. Also, I'm an expat, not a UAE citizen. Getting my own place? Technically I could rent an apartment. But I've got no source of income. I'm trying to get part-time jobs, which wasn't allowed for students until recently. 
So did/do the rural people of Pakistan like Sharia law? It seems like the guy in the story used it to his advantage to get rid of his wife. 
Collaborator. The word you're looking for is collaborator. 
I guess it's easy in a society that never had a tradition of seeing women as people. Objective thinking and tolerance is imbibed by a child growing up in an environment that instills the sense of fulfillment and love. Sharia reins people in by segregation, animosity and fear of extreme punishment. 
At the end of the day revenge isn't about getting justice for a loved one, it's about taking your pain and making sure the other guy feels it. 
Devil's Advocate here. I agree, there's very much a lack of due process...but at least it's prison and not execution. If the accused WAS a collaborator and isn't taken away from that environment, the odds of them being lynched go up enormously, I would imagine, and mob-rule vigilante "justice" is not something to encourage. In an odd sense, this act *protects* the person arrested despite also punishing them. I agree, it's not good, but doing nothing also has a high risk of being not good. 
Holy fuck this feels like I'm reading something out of a fictional book So unbelievable this is happening in the same world I'm living in I'm sorry you had to experience that 
But theyre encouraged to lie about their name, what happens when people who know them by different names come together? For example, your family knows you by your real name ?, but outsiders by a different. Do you just gotta trust your family won't slip? 
That's fucked up man. Hope you or your family never have to go there again. 
I went there on a stopover on the way back from Indonesia, it was vile. (1) it was too fucking hot (2) the Arabs treat everyone else like shit, the guest workers from the Philippines and India were nice, but the Arabs obviously regard everyone else as below them. 0/10 would not recommend. 5* hotels costing billions of dollars don't match up to a simple beach hut in a country not subject to fascistic values. 
not really modern, just whatever money can buy, if you want modernism, go to Japan, or Europe. Dubai is quasi modernism with stone age people 
Interesting. What happens if we approach the Embassy? 
Their citizens sound like they deserve to be farted on, tbh. 
Dubai is hugely popular with Z-List celebs from the UK and football players. It's sunny and shiny ... they love that shit. UK tabloids will pay for their trip in exchange for *candid* pics of them and their partner around the pool. All arranged bullshit, of course 
I think they've diversified their assets though - Something something *real estate*. Makes me wonder if the Saudis are behind the 200% increase in real estate prices nationwide in Canada (most urban areas). 
No wonder. He's a cunt. Sorry you had to go through that. 
ok, but that was OP's father's hidden motive. But on the surface, how was he able to sell the idea to OP's mum? Like OP said, they decided to remarry to remedy everything 
I think the problem in this case was that other woman he had married. If she'd been the only wife she wouldn't have hade to convert. 
I mean, all of our information comes from her brother. He's pretty critical of his family. So...no, we don't know for sure. But we know her marriage was abusive so I suppose it seems likely. I can hardly think about it. 
One Indian girl at my HS in the US killed herself by putting a plastic bag over her head cause her brothers wanted to marry her off... 
That's horrible. If I may ask, what do u think of the newly appointed prince? Is he known in Saudi as less rigid or is he worse? 
Weird part is even if they exchange nudes or something, he will not be able to recognize her if she pass nearby. 
After reading this thread, thank god I'm in Europe 
This has some truth to it. A bit of research will confirm that Saudi actually has a very high obesity and diabetes rate. One of the reasons why is the weather is really hot (40+ Celsius in the summer) combine that with no proper sidewalks for pedestrians and you'll get people who will want to drive around instead of walking. Also, gym memberships are pretty expensive and there aren't many gyms for women so that is another factor, Also there aren't PE classes for women here in most schools. 
Do you see some sort of youth movement forming? In Germany for example there were some demonstrations in 1968 against the dominant hierachical culture that valued obedience and conformity too much. But it was not as much the demonstration as all the youths and young people deciding to just meet up and do like they wanted and not care about the parents and the older generation not liking it. It was a transnational movement (in the western world), this is why there are songs like "Summer of '69". Do you think something like this could happen in Arabia and/or in the whole Arabian World? 
Atheism is punishable by death under Sharia Law. Stay safe OP 
It is. And if you wore the right things under it, you'll get a nice breeze from down under 
So basically, it's a payment for manslaughter charges? 
The rich and powerful have always, everywhere, had different rules governing them, despite what the law may say. 
Stressed because they might be punished for having made a decision, on their own? Widows with no men to control them. Just imagine... 
Allowing one group to restrict the freedoms of another group based on their desires is in no way protective, really. You can't get raped because you automatically consent? Doesn't change the reality of it, only the legality. 
Where is "here"? Because from what i can recall, i have never heard any Muslim ever speak in a good tone about the royals in Saudi. Rather all the people i ve talken with were either disgusted or simply rejective of the politics and the unreligious behaviour of the princes there. 
(i'm canadian myself. come on over. master salaries are pretty shit-- mine was around 23k/yr but you can make do if you budget properly. just don't go live in vancouver or toronto. you'll never be able to afford that without assistance.) 
Sharia law was only in place in the northern areas of Pakistan next to the Afghanistan border as the Taliban could cross the border with impunity. Now to the question of if Pakistan's under Taliban rule liked sharia law. Now this is a key concept you have to know that there is no such thing as a universal sharia law as each sect defines their own and it depends ultimately on who interprets the law. So the short answer is no they did not like being under the Taliban's sharia but a portion of people did want to be under a sharia law, just one that was in line with their views. But for the most part the villagers were tired of seeing their loved ones killed at a warlords whim so they became jaded about sharia and don't want it anymore. The Pakistan army also educates liberated villagers to help them integrate into Pakistan society. 
I always refer to Santa's elves as his little collaborators. 
I was working as a teacher in medical school in Lahore Pakistan which is considered one of the most advanced cities of Pakistan. I was really surprised when four of my well educated female colleagues had an hour long debate with me that women are inferior to men. I was like how can you think that. 
Which is why Machiavelli recommended merely the death of the father, but leaving the land unmolested, a grieving child who still has something of his own is less likely to retaliate, but if one cannot, then you must destroy the family, completely, otherwise revenge will invariably find you. 
See the thing is, the money was super good. When your kids are starving back home, you do whatever you can to provide for them. When she had to flee Saudi Arabia, she went to Qatar. I was left back home and she worked there for 15 years. She was able to go home yearly though. Qatar was still Sharia but the difference with how she was treated as a South East Asian nurse was noticeable. In Qatar, she had more freedom, more money and she adjusted well to life there. She still has friends in Qatar and has visited with my sister in tow but states she will never ever step foot in Saudi Arabia again. 
Living in Norway, met a guy from Dubai who was all about drinking and having one night stands. He even found himself a girlfriend. After a couple of years the guy could not handle the liberal attitude of women in Norway, and called his mother to get him a wife he could treat as furniture and got her shipped to Norway. It is fucked up. 
You get fucked over the day your passport gets confiscated. Most Indians who leave for work there are poor and illiterate. When they reach there the employer takes their passport away. And then to leave the country you need an exit visa to be signed by your employer (not happening anytime soon). The Indian Embassy does conduct efforts to rescue expats in such situations Source: Friend who worked at a company that worked with the Indian Ministry of External Affairs to help expats come home safely. 
Pretty much the same. They also wouldn't be able to tell the difference between most East Asians. In fairness nor can Hollywood - just watch Memoirs of a Geisha. In Dubai, all the chefs at Japanese restaurants when I was there (except for the one at the Grand Hyatt from memory) were Filipino, apparently because "they're cheaper but look the same". 
I see immigrant as someone looking to become a citizen of the country. Expat is not looking for a change in citizenship, just work. 
From what I've learned in this thread, Sharia law is the perfect safe haven for cunts. 
I reckon as a romantic gesture of recommitting to one another 
Sharia Law doesn't require any of the wives to be Muslim. The precedent is that the Prophet married a Coptic Christian. It doesn't even require consent from the previous wives, unless they stipulated that they want to be asked permission for the husband to marry another woman when they got married. 
I'm so sorry. I can just imagine what her brother probably went through when he heard of this news. My condolences. 
Yeah one can glue the pieces together. Plus the kind of country it is, you never know. I read this book a couple yeas ago, "The princess: a true story of life behind veil in Saudi". It was given to my mom by one of her friends who was going to Saudi to work and couldn't take it there cuz the book is banned. It's a true story of a girl who got through to an American writer to publish her life's story somehow. It's both empowering and devastating. As unlikely as it is, I do hope justice is served. 
Thank you so much. That means a lot. I need to learn to celebrate my accomplishments and be proud of them. 
The young people I worked with (both Saudi faculty and students) are very hopeful about Crown Prince Salman - that he will lead them into a better future. He has, however, not done anything much to grant personal freedoms to the citizens. In that respect, nothing has changed. The "news" coming out of the Kingdom are just lip service, curated headlines. For instance, there is again a recent buzz that women will be allowed to drive, but it never materializes.. 
You wouldn't dare risk it. I used to be Muslim back in Malaysia. Didn't say I was an atheist to anyone until I was out of the country. I'm happy I was born an American. 
Part of me really thinks that bureaucrats who are too lazy to do paperwork are more responsible for liberalization than people like John Locke. 
Honestly so many people don't realize this, in Saudi Arabia the rich live in lives of absolute decadence where they can commit basically whatever crime they want and never be questioned for it as long as they give an apology and their word they'll never do it again, then they're back to drink-driving a Maserati on the weekend. Sound firmiliar? 
The stress is from fear of being reponsible for a mistake. Some do fear punishment. But some are not in a position to be punished; they don't want to feel bad for a mistake and it's their right to "pass the buck" onto a brother or such. The lack of education and life experience contributes to the lack of confidence in some individuals. By contrast, an American woman might lack confidence, but culture makes her embarrassed to ask someone else to make her decision. 
Shit, my white, midwest manager at my last job pretty much argued the same thing with regards to politics. She essentially said women weren't capable of being rational or good enough to be politicians or anyone in power. I just stared at her blankly for a second (it was spurred from a conversation about Hillary Clinton, as my manager was a strong republican) and said "that doesn't make sense...you're my manager and you do fine, you work at a million dollar company started from scratch by a woman, and there are plenty of capable female politicians..." She just kind of laughed and shrugged it off. It was so confusing. 
If only the evil monarch of many a bad fantasy novel would listen to this advice. The last remaining little child of the family you killed will invariably end up growing up and killing you, dammit! 
There are many Indians who hold advanced degrees and many years of experience or come from reputable health or technology centers. When I was there, it was the lebanese, phillipinos, and like Pakistani (+ poor Indians and others) doing the labor/migrant work. And it is closer to servitude because passports are kept for that level of employee. But they are still paid handsomely which is why folks do it. Not for nothing, but I couldn't get my fam out there or convinced but the money was 3x 
See I would've thought Qatar would've been almost the same. I guess that's the problem with tarring similar places (from the outside) with the same brush. 
Any country with enough oil to fuel 100 armies won't be punished at all. Ahh, the benefits of being rich. 
I bet he still cheated on his shipped wife with other women. 
That's what I thought the distinction was when I was a kid and that would kind of make sense to make a differentiation. It's come to be a wealth / racial / class marker now. When I moved to the UK, people complained to my face about "immigrants" without meaning to imply that I was one. I clearly have an accent and wasn't born here, but I'm white and from a former colony. Even worse now, the word "immigrant" seems to be used for poorer people who come here legally, especially from poorer EU countries. "Migrant" is coming to imply illegal immigrants and refugees. "Expat" is anyone from a wealthy country. I always planned to stay here forever and pursue residency / citizenship but no one has ever referred to me as an immigrant here, except for me when talking about myself! 
You would't believe how common that actually is. In Islam, a talaq divorce allows a man to divorce his wife by saying "I divorce you" (in Arabic, talaq). This is also known as repudiation. There are many problems emerging in International Private Law because of this. An example would be a couple that got married in Morocco, getting their marriage recognised in France (where they live) and then divorcing according to islamic law in Morocco. Does France have to recognise the divorce according to islamic law? The short answer is: no. So actually I am wondering how the father even got away with this. Because if their marriage was recognised, their divorce in Malaysia according to islamic law would not be valid. 
What a colossal cunt is father must be to come up and go through with such a plan. 
More disturbingly, people are getting surgery to recreate a hymen to give their husbands that "virgin" marriage night again to celebrate their anniversaries. They are then coming back to their doctors complaining of painful sex. 
Im a Muslim from Malaysia. as much as what the law stated. in country like Malaysia, Nobody actually give a fuck. trust me. I told my teacher I dont belive in god when I was 15 and I dont get punishment. I drink, smokes, eat pork, pet a dog. seriously you can just do what you want to do. but just live in KL or Klang Valley where people are more open minded. 
More like they're trying to CONVERT all of us instead of pushing us out. But yeah, smtg like that 
I feel awful for him. I think he tried his best to help her though he was limited in what he could do. It was just them - their mom and dad only had the two kids. 
Very true. But no one will out him to the authorities family or friend but if anyone family member were to even have a scent of him being an atheist it would cause huge problems within his family.Its just better to lie until you have moved out and are no longer dependent on the family. 
That's why the Trope is so popular though; it immediately gives you a deep understanding of why that Evil monarch is gonna get fucked _and_ gives you a moral reason to support the young one in his journey to overthrow it. But, it also exists within a vacuum, as you don't know if the Monarch is in fact, evil, or if the family was creating instability in a time of peace that would have ultimately threatened the nation as a whole. Either way, Niccolo's point stands. There are no half measures. 
I've never understood people going on holiday there. it's just a pile of money in the middle of the desert where many kinds of fun are banned- what's the attraction?!? 
Do you care about cheating on someone who you think is a bit more than a dog? 
I still use the distinction of expat/immigrant to mean temporary/permanent people. Sadly, the terms are shifting in meaning as you have described. So it goes. 
But they did get married in Malaysia 20 years before. So wouldn't that be the only place where it counted? 
I'm not accusing his family in particular of anything... But even if you move there have been cases of honor killings. 
His machiavellian (doh!) attitude aside, Machiavelli actually had a very logical way of thinking about power politics, completly unclouded by passion or emotion. 
Yeah it's so relaxing knowing a bunch of lunatics can stone you to death for the crime of being sexually assaulted by one of their men. Honestly I'll just take the South of France instead, mate. 
I wouldn't even cheat on my dog. I only say, "Who's a good boy?" to my dog. All the other dogs just get friendly pats. 
Yeah, ironically if this were used properly, "expat" would then apply to the much-maligned "migrant workers" who come for seasonal work. 
It depends. If the marriage was recognised in Canada, it would probably not have been invalidated by the second islamic marriage by the father in Malaysia. 
Ah, the original "I'm not sayin', but I'm just sayin'" 
One of my relatives used to work in Kuwait. She was hired to take care of this super rich family's babies.I remember her saying that the mother didn't give a fuck about the babies. They would just cry to their sleep and everything was done by the servants. If a mother can do that to her own children how can we expect them to treat others properly 
Which is why I'm so fascinated by it. It's completely A-moral. It does not present a moral judgement, it does not presume to have all the answers, it simply says "Look, if you're going to be a leader. Keep in mind, you can't be a good person, if you are, you will inevitably fall into the trappings of those who are simply not good people. If you can accept this truth, then this book will guide your hand to the best of my understanding of Power Politics, use it wisely. Or don't. It's just a book, it can't harm you." *Book immediately gets bastardized in public parlance and banned* 
The first two you can get in Egypt, the 3rd a toned down version. 
It's likely the second marriage would be invalid in Canada due to bigamy. 
Marrying twelve year olds was pushing it but with this ban on dog petting they've really gone too far. 
The irony, of course, being that through his entire life Machiavelli was a devout anti-monarchist. He wrote the book intending it to be read by a literate population, and in doing so expose the evils which he believed to be a persistent condition in any hereditary monarchy. Not long before writing The Prince his city state, the Republic of Florence, had been conquered by the autocratic Medici family/nation (such things being very complicated in Italy during that time). The satirical book was written to appease them, but without their knowledge he also released it for general consumption amongst the Florentine population. And that fairly long-winded explanation is about as straightforward as 13th-17th century Italian politics gets. 
Yeah, I don't like sand. Also it's course and rough and irritating and gets everywhere. Really not good for anything, definitely not washing. 
It's not supposed to be sand, its supposed to be soil. And there are special 'soil-based soaps', actually. 
Not being able to eat pork belly is one thing, but I can't pet a dog belly when it's presented to me? I'm only human! 
I'm 45 and my 40's have been awesome. I feel like I'm finally comfortable being me. I spent most of my 20's and 30's being the guy my ex-wife wanted me to be. I've since married my high school crush and she loves the real me. I've furthered my career in the Army, become a semi-professional musician, and travelled a bit. I even got a fresh tattoo today. It feels great not giving a shit what people think anymore. The only downside is that I'm realizing I'm no spring chicken anymore. Aches and pains don't go away like they used to. Now if I hurt myself, I'm like "well...I guess that's a part of my life now." 
I'm sorry to hear that you have it, but I'm glad it's not as serious as it could be. Is there any chance you'll get past it? 
They were just reminding you why the pain was worth it 
Currently back at Uni after quite a while working semi-professional roles as wanting the qualifications that I needed to go into higher roles. Constantly have professors talking about how "group projects prepare us for the real world; you'll have to work with people out there". But it's nothing alike! If I am in the workforce and I do nothing to contribute to a group project, I'm going to lose my job or at least get seriously reprimanded by my boss! Not just get a "good grade" on the back of my coworkers. 
I used to hate baking because I was so bad at it. Two months ago I got an oven thermometer and learnt my oven is 20 degrees Celsius hotter than the dial says. Now I'm great at baking and I'm getting fat :-/ 
I second this. I think the real horror of renting comes from sharing a lease with friends or other classmates. Being responsible for people can be really stressful. For the landlord, it doesn't matter which one of you has paid rent or not, as long as the rent gets paid in full by the end of each month. 
Whenever I see an out of shape person at the gym, I have nothing but respect for them. What kind of asshole laughs at people for being chubby at the gym? All it means is they are doing something about it. 
I want do lasik so bad. I've had glasses since I was eight, wear contacts sometimes but they irritate my eyes. I hate waking up and the world is all blurry and I have to fumble to find my glasses. I hate it when they get full of rain drops, or when they fog up so I can't see when I get inside on a cold day. I hate the ugly tan they give me. I hate how they're in the way when I do makeup. How dirty they get all the time. Not being able to see shit when I go swimming. The weight on my nose, the blurry edges of my field of vision. Glasses fucking suck. I'm 24 now and my eye sight still changes year to year so as of yet there's no point in doing it. But I will as soon as things stabilize. I'd probably do it even if it was a horrifying and painful procedure. I'm so fucking sick of blur. 
Guess I'm the odd woman out here, but it was hell for me. The stuff they gave me to numb the area caused me to start shaking and cry. They said that happens to people now and then, and they took a note of it in my chart. It was hard to calm down after feeling like I was almost hit by a car (which is how they described it to me). 
My folks used to use cleaning as a punishment. When I grew up and moved out and I knew I had to clean but I always felt that weight on my chest like I was in trouble or did something bad and I would be very angry while cleaning. It took ages for that feeling to go away. 
It's not the fear or pain that keeps me from making the much-needed appointment with the dentist. It's the overwhelming shame of what my neglectful childhood and serious illness has done to my horror-show mouth. 
Have you seen lego Batman? That's another level of amazing. 
I've had that moment. A girlfriend of about 3 years dumped me while we were living together and packed up all her things with the help of her best friend. I thought I was supposed to be sad, but couldn't muster a single tear for the girl because she had cause me so many problems. It ended up being one of the better moments in my life because I realized I could do a lot better and have been working on myself ever since between dates. 
I'm in the exact same boat man. Especially realizing you were defining yourself through a relationship. 
The building part is a joke. The hard part is picking the right components that wouldn't bottleneck each other and give the best bang for the buck. 
Im 20 and haven't gotten my driver's license yet..everyone else around me started driving at 14-15. Ive had pretty bad anxiety about it. I recently started driving a little bit and it really is nice. You really do just reach a point where you gotta suck it up and drive! I tell myself not to panic about anything so I won't mess up. I feel better knowing I ain't the only one out there who had a fear of driving! 
It's not even that I can't talk to pretty girls I do it all the time but the second I get a crush on someone I cannot say anything and crumble around them. I just avoid crushes 
They really aren't difficult esp with so many online programs helping you out these days. But unfortunately, that's only the first layer. If you want to take advantage of taxes, it's a whole other ball game. 
Whenever people say IKEA furniture is hard to put together I always feel like it says more about them than the furniture. 
Why/how did you move to India to do literally nothing? I wasn't aware that was even an option available in life. 
Hard mode is working 11pm to 7am when the rest of your friends have 9-5s 
Still reluctant to try, however finally tried asparagus. It's definitely my favorite vegetable and one of my favorite foods 
That's such a stupid meme that makes me irrationally angry every time I read it. 
Got mine at 27. It was very unpleasant but luckily not the horror stories I read. Still though. Couldn't eat anything but yogurt and applesauce. Couldn't sleep due to the medication regimen (woke up every two hours for pain and antibiotics). Had vivid nightmares about my surgery which I was later informed was likely due to me waking up a bit during the procedure. But it was really just two weeks of fatigue, slight anxiety, and getting really really sick of medication. I played through Red Dead Redemption though so that was good. 
As an adult, the only time I don't mind the taste of beer is when I reach the point that I need to stop drinking. 
On the other hand, being pregnant is way worse than I thought it would be. I'm 11 weeks and feel like I've had a month long hangover. 
Thinking of getting a tattoo soon, I have a high pain threshold but any particular reason why there? Obviously want to minimize pain. 
I love getting to this point and I know when to stop. It just makes things... More fun, more loosey goosey. What's not fun? Puking. 
That's fantastic but I'd say you're pretty lucky. I found birth worse than I'd expected. Would do it again though! 
You sound like wilson fisk. Do you stare at a painting for hours? 
We hurt during but most of us forget that pain as soon as it's over. Instinct kicks in when you're in active labor. 
I have never understood that fear. Always seemed like if you felt you had to give up your 'freedom' then you weren't dating the right one. 
I got into my dream school but couldn't finance it last minute. Heartbreak. Suicidal thoughts. Whole 9 yards. But now it's 2 years later and I'm pre-Dental at community college, I'm in no debt, I completely love the path I went down. Trust me... You'll carve yourself a "right" path. 
Yeah, that's the only aspect I'm a little worried about for my 50s. There are still so many things I want to do, but I can tell my body doesn't have the same resilience. On the plus side, though, I've dropped about 30 lbs. in the last year and work out much more regularly, trying to hold back the slow-down as much as possible. 
I'm on that sparkling water train too, pal. I even made cucumber water the other day like some kinda gourmet water chef. 
I ran across it years ago, and got hooked. It's funny in a way. I am in a wood heated room with a computer and smart tv. I am not on Facebook and I don't twitter, so I guess that reddit is my social network fix. 
The more you live fully now, the more that it can become an enjoyable habit later. 
There is no cure, but I am at a place in my treatment where it is more like a chronic illness than a death sentence. I have many check ups, scans, medicines- but very little that impedes on my everyday life. I know I will die younger than I would like, and I can be fairly sure of what will kill me, and that actually takes some of the fear away. 
Download Grindr as a test run to see how popular you'll be. 
Don't just sit there and be angry if someone is slacking off, but talk to your TA or teacher. I had a project a while ago where one guy was doing nothing, we told the teacher and he gave the guy a failing grade. 
All of my baked goods are always under cooked. Going to buy an oven thermometer now, thanks. 
Laughing at a fat person working out at a gym is like laughing at a homeless person at a job fair 
I'm looking, and saying "well done" in my mind. We all need to take first steps. But we also need privacy, so I don't intrude. But they're doing something and nobody should shame them. 
My wife stress cleans. Every time I come home to a clean house, I always get a brief moment of "oh wow it looks nice" before the "oh fuck" strikes me 
Honestly, this is extremely common. Your dentist will have seen worse. And even if they haven't, they are the last person who will be judgemental. In fact I bet they would love to help you feel more confident in this area. Bad teeth can have such a damning effect on your self confidence and a dentist once told me that helping people overcome this by improving the look of their teeth or even just reducing pain was the most satisfying part of their job. 
No I've been meaning to but haven't got around to yet. It does indeed look amazing though. 
Dude, the *only* emotionally difficult part of my divorce has been not seeing my kid every day. Moving out and not talking to my ex every day has been very easy. I've lost the weight I had gained while together, I'm more relaxed, I'm overall much happier than I have been for almost the last decade. 
Sometimes we force ourselves to focus on the bad things in a finished relationship in the delusion that it will make us feel better. It won't. Tell yourself there were both good and bad moments, and that you are glad for the good ones and the bad ones teach you about yourself and understanding what you want. I follow this thought process : OK this hurts. Why does it hurt? Is it because of me (my insecurities) or is it because of the other person (general jerks)? If it's me, I work on how to improve that aspect and if it's the other person I decide if it's worth calling them out on their bs or just cutting them off my life. I've been much happier and calmer as a result. 
My wife separated from me about a month and a half ago (we were together for 16 years, married for 8). This is one of the biggest things that I am realizing right now. You guys aren't alone. 
I'm 32, and at this point in life, I'd rather just have a really, really cool friend to go do awesome shit with and go to concerts with and go camping/sailing/traveling/skydiving/whatever with rather than be attached day in day out to someone in a romantic way. Like I don't want to be with someone clingy and needy, I just want someone who truly shares my interests and who I can be real with and trust to be in my life forever. Even if I don't see them every single day like a girlfriend. 
Though not as bad, this happened to me a week ago with a 1 year relationship. *Sending good vibes* 
If you don't wanna bottleneck just buy the most expensive part there is that will obviously work /s 
Realizing all the stupid shit you did and accepting others younger people for doing same stupid shit. Probably the way people in their 40s look at me. 
I am glad you are starting to dive too! I am sure there are more of us out there. Let me know how your driving goes! I plan on getting my license sometime over the summer. Good luck with your driving. I believe in you. 
Dude, that's because you are treating crushes like a different kind of being from normal girls which they really aren't. You don't understand them and they are unknown to you, or that is how your brain is categorizing them. It's all about exploration and research, think of it like the first time you stumble upon a snake, just poke it with a stick, in this case that could be maintaing eye contact and smiling when passing said crush in a hallway and if you feel confident or need to get her attention say hello for example. From there you keep testing the waters and building up confidence, just keep breathing and you'll be fine. Don't avoid them or you'll never master interacting with them. It's all about baby steps. :) 
This makes me happy to hear! I recently went out with a group of friends and my crush went along too. I spoke to her a lot that night, but didnt ask for her number. She added my sister though on FB since she came along that night too. Figured I could add her on FB and maybe start a casual conversation. 
Just be like, hey, how do trees feel in the spring time? *re-leaved* walk away smooth. he'll/she'll get back to you 
Agreed. Tax filing isn't bad. Tax strategy is very complex. 
It absolutely does. As far as boxed furniture goes, IKEA is just about as easy as it gets. Some companies you get their stuff and the instructions can be a little confusing. IKEA is always very easy. It's not like it's a bad thing to struggle with putting the stuff together but I don't understand why it's so common to rag on IKEA when other companies are significantly worse 
I have an IKEA bed whose instructions specifically state that two people are needed to assemble it. I've put it together by myself 3 times. #challengeaccepted 
Did you know there's actually a recognised psychological phenomenon called "The ikea effect". It is the thing that people place more value on things they've had some part in making. 
My experience in IKEA is more of a time/attention anomaly type effect - I go in there for one specific item that I've identified in advance on the website and somehow it's five hours later when I emerge and I've purchased sixteen items. 
People always say shit about their qulity too but they have a wide range of products. Just because they make plywood coffee tables that are affordable for students doesn't mean they don't have quality furniture too. 
LOL! I saved money and leased my apartment to someone and took off. Officially I'm a "tourist" but I've been living in a bamboo and banana leaf hut on the beach, and I keep my expenses low in a country that's already cheap. My primary goal was to get healthier (body, mind) and lose weight, and I've done that. 
Thanks!! I've signed up for a half marathon in a couple of months, makes it slightly easier to say no when you're kind of accountable for something 
I feel it's significantly easier to say that admitting your feelings to someone is easy, when in your scenario your confession went amazingly Others get crushed 
I'm here informally/voluntarily so that may affect me being allowed to play on my phone all day. 
Relevant: This is only good advice in an anonymous setting. I have a buddy who's asked out at least a third of the girls in my university course, including me. At this point, the whole faculty knows how desperate he is. 
How is getting shot down good for your confidence? 
Try them! If you like asparagus then I'd assume you will like brussel sprouts as well. Super easy to make too. Buy the fresh ones. I prefer them to the frozen ones. 
If I were "Fuck You" rich, I'd have a Japanese sushi and Ramen chef on hand and eat like an Imperial ~~Queen~~ Empress for the rest of my days. 
Agreed. The people who do get explosive shits from Taco Bell probably have overly sensitive bowels or something. That's not normal. 
I work there and eat them every lunch break and I'm fine. I have a sensitive stomach as well 
This isn't necessarily directed at you. But how do people deal with the fear even when they confront it? I don't have trouble confronting the anxiousness and doing something social but that anxiousness still just sits there when I do it. Is it suppose to go away or is it always there? I feel like it makes me really awkward at times. 
nah. Some of us just don't like it. Give me some decent bourbon, sure. Or a rum & coke. Or a lot of other things. But beer, ew 
Work lets me pay a mortgage and also have excess to spend on things. School and University were a lot of work, at times extremely intense, and not nearly as well paid. 
Of course. I even got a comment on here all like "well of course you don't mind, you only work 8 hours" It's like a competition to see who has it worse. People choose their jobs. They don't really choose school (aside from college). 
Yeah, but as an adult, you handle it better. And you also can make the choice to leave, unlike school where you're still young and don't have much of a say. You can at least choose your career and you can choose a workplace that aligns with your values 
Wait until the 3rd trimester where you might be legit worried if you sit on the couch while alone you might not have a strategy to stand back up 
Personally, from the areas I've had a tattoo - that has been the least uncomfortable location. From talking to other people they seem to generally be of the same opinion. 
Same. I surrounded myself with positive birth stories before the birth, took a prenatal yoga class, learned all sorts of breathing techniques and coping methods and.... yeah, no. Birth was wayyy worse than I expected, even with the epidural. 
My wisdom tooth removal was also the worst experience I ever had with a doctor. The sedatives just didn't take and the drug that was supposed to make me forget the surgery didn't work. The teeth were stuck under the gum so they had to cut and break them up. I hated it so much and recovery took a week :( 
I know what you mean, I have tried having conversations with people about psychs for the first time and they'll say things like "oh yeah dude one time I took shrooms and saw a unicorn run right in front of me!" Yeah, I'm sure you did buddy. 
That's definitely the worst part. I chose the vanilla flavored drink, which can only do so much to mask the repulsive taste, but I still managed to finish it. Waking up after the procedure was an excellent high though. Not a care in the world. Just riding around with the top back. 
That's a great outlook to have. I'm glad it doesn't encroach too much on your time and I hope you have a very enjoyable life. 
Suddenly all of his friends have matched with him. 
I did that. Felt kinda like an asshole, but I told him ahead of time that he needed to contribute or I'll be truthful. He was cool with it, got a docked grade, still passed, and apologized for promising work that he didn't deliver 
Laughing at a jobless person at a job fair is like laughing at a sick person at the doctor's office 
Remind him as often as possible. Everytime he posts something like that on Facebook reply with a picture of him when he was heavier 
Laughing at a fat person in the gym is like laughing at a homeless guy in a job interview. Theyre trying to better themselves and you wont get higher by pushing them down. The same people obsessed with lowering others so they feel higher are also the ones who are jealous of their friends because they believe someone else's achievement takes away from their own. 
I'm just waiting for school to be over on the recommendation of my optometrist. She suggested waiting until I'm relatively done with school for a long while before getting it because late nights of staring at books and computer screens aren't good. Little does she know, school won't end the late night computer staring. 
This really made me laugh. I've been there. A clean house is like that weird calm and warm wind in late summer just before a massive storm hits, and signifies that the shit is about to hit the fan, usually in my direction. 
It's honestly hilarious if you're even a small fan of the Batman series. 
Damn. I got dumped after just a couple years and wanted to kill myself every day for months. I can't even imagine. 
Well that's the thing!!! You need like a $300 powersupply to run minecraft! Why not just buy a nintendo gamebox? 
Thank you for the boost of self confidence! I turn 21 in August and my goal is to get my license by then. Best of luck to you as well. :) 
Instructions unclear: poked crush with a stick in the hallway. 
"What do you call a deer with only one eye?" "I have no eye deer. " Hand her your number in a piece of paper. Walk away. 
Most average people don't really have any tax strategy beyond the minor optimisations that tax software recommends. The real strategies don't come into play unless you own a business, have a large investment portfolio, or are just generally rich. 
The first time I opened an Ikea instruction booklet and I saw the illustration of a confused person looking at the instructions, followed by their 800 number, followed by the person looking confident and understanding the instructions, my heart melted. Those instructions are always complete, detailed, and easy to follow. 
If you want one item, don't go through the showroom go directly to the warehouse. 
This!! Everyone I tell about Ikea always complains about quality. I have to explain that, yeah, if you buy the cheap stuff then its going to be cheap. That $20 coffee table or $30 bookshelf isnt meant to last a decade. If you want a high-quality item, you're going to have to pay the price. That's true with ANY retailer. Ikea just offers a better price on that quality item because of the way they do business. That being said, even the cheap stuff can last a while as long as you tighten the bolts, don't abuse it, and don't douse it in water. 
Wow! That sounds amazing! Oh how I wish I could do the same! 
Man, they still absolutely would not let us online. Which was for the best for me personally, every time someone says something snide on here, I take it really personally. I'm glad you're not having that experience, and I'm rooting for you. The best feeling in the world is when you get out and you get to shit in your own toilet again. 
Besides his desperation, what else is the reason for him being turned down infinity times? 
Ask girl out, get shot down, realize you're fine, worry a little less. Most people are already there, but plenty of people end up less aprehensive than before. 
You've offended my sensitive bowels and I have shit myself, good sir. But no srsly IBS sucks 
It's not really that uncommon. Most people with anxiety I know have thrown up from it at least once or twice. 
For me, it's awkward to talk to people I don't know well, but that feeling fades as I get to know them (through talking with them), until eventually I become comfortable with them and maybe even come to actively seek out their company. Essentially (TL;DR:) I think of socializing as a long-term investment that's uncomfortable at first but pays off when you get to know people. 
In fact, at school and university you had to pay to do work, the exact opposite of working. 
The kicker was he never worked a day while in school and kept telling me how much easier it was. Yeah, no shit you think school was easier. It's a stupid pissing contest 
Very true. Get a job, then start hunting for a company or organisation you really like. Get in the door, and start getting to know people. Figure out what you want to do there, network with the people in that department, and move into your dream job. Don't get disappointed if your dream job doesn't fall in to your lap, but at the same time, don't stop working towards your goals. It also helps if you know what your goals are. 
But at least then I'll be visibly pregnant! Right now I just come off as a lazy alcoholic with a slight beer belly! 
Don't fall into the trap of "Oh it's so much easier with two!" They wore us down, and it's stupid hard handling an infant and a toddler. Super fun that's for sure and I'm excited for when our new one is more independent, but holy crap do people really fluff your ass about the reality of two kids. 
The more meat there is, the less uncomfortable it is. Places like your ribs, foot, etc, where there's no meat between the needle and your bones, hurt a more. 
I found everything to be normal looking but just more intense, and you feel strange things. And colors were vibrant. Also everything sounds really far away but exceptionally close simultaneously. 
I had the citrus drink--2 bottles. I got them really cold and they were not bad. Tasted like liquid Lemonhead candy. The drugs they give you for the procedure were amazing. I had an upper GI a few weeks later, and it was the same drugs. I felt so... good immediately after both procedures. 10/10 would colonoscopy again. 
Life is good. I plan on living the crap out of it ;) 
His high school gym teacher is on there and wants to catch up. 
Man, I worked with a guy last semester who seemed like a decent guy. We had a month to do the project and we divided the work into thirds and we'd deliver our work to one another on the third week to compile it into the whole project. We checked up on each other during the weekly meetings but he always "forgot to bring his work with him" but promised he had already done XYZ. Okay, cool. Third week he turns it in two days after our agreed deadline and it's absolutely nothing we discussed. While the two of us were scouring research journals to find ten sources each and summarize them on our topic, they guy sends me three CNN article links and a half assed summary of our topic that was like five sentences long. Basically did nothing and I spent the remaining five days pounding out so much work to not only find his sources for him, but compiling it and having to practice the presentation in a group call three hours before it was due. Fuck group projects at school. 
And some gyms will kick you the fuck out if they see you doing that. Great comment, btw. 
The Lego Movie is my constant go-to when I'm feeling down, but I wasn't such a fan of Lego Batman. It had awesome references and throwbacks, a great caricature of solitary Batman, but it was very much directed toward kids with a way too specific lesson to teach them. 
Very early on I came to the realization that I had 2 choices in front of me. One was to ruminate endlessly about all the things that I had done wrong. Two was to reinvent myself, using those mistakes as a guide. I chose path number two. Wherever I end up, my 16 year relationship with my wife will have taught me endless, valuable lessons. I *very* much hope to reunite with her, but if I don't then I will use what I have learned from those lessons to have great relationships in my future with my next partner. 
With pcpartpicker, there's really no reason not to build your own pc. I used to not know shit about computers, but pcpartpicker saved my life. 
That's about where I'm getting now (late 20s). Lots of the inhibitions that kept me from doing things I wanted to do have lifted, and life is getting to be a much more enjoyable. 
Yup. I tell people that if paying to have someone do their taxes is something that they're on the fence about financially, they don't need it. When you can afford one without thinking about it, that's when you could use one. 
Getting asked out by someone who is asking everyone out isn't very special and doesn't even show that the person is interested. 
What if instead of realizing you're fine you realize all the flaws in you that make you unnattractive therefore lowering your confidence? 
That has to be the most alien description of Aloo parathas I've ever read! :D:D:D 
Yeah I've lived with anxiety for about 15 years and anxiety poops are real. 
That depends on where you live. I'm swedish and you get paid to go to school over here and if I'm not mistaken it's like that in most of the nordic countries. 
Very little pain from my back tattoo. Lots of blood though. The artist said "have you been drinking?" I had, for roughly 6 days straight. Ohhhh Amsterdam. 
It never occurred to me that an almost 80 yo man might know about broken arms 
I didn't feel it was that aimed at kids - they enjoy it but wouldn't get any of the subtleties. When I saw it in a theatre I was laughing way more than the kids around me 
This sounds so much like one of those infomercial testimonials lmao. 
Well, keep building on that for a few more years and there you have it. Turned 35 a couple days ago, happiest I've ever been with my life overall. 
This is basically how I got to know my current boyfriend and we have a fantastic relationship 
Here's what I recommend: hire an accountant to do your taxes one year. They'll prepare your return in the most optimized way possible. Then, every year after that, use their return as a template and just fill out your return by yourself, plugging in that year's numbers in place of the old ones. Provided your situation hasn't changed drastically, that is. A tax form looks daunting, but once you sit down with a well-prepared one and follow the numbers, it's pretty easy to follow what goes where and why it goes there, and you'll do a much better job than if you you just winged it from the get-go. The first time I did my own using free fillable forms, I was shocked how painless it was. 
Yeah I've never felt good about myself after being turned down. 
When you lose money by bending down and spending time picking up that 50$ is when you are truly "fuck you" rich. 
I'm a sixty-year-old woman and I know about broken arms. 
If it goes poof, so does everything else. You don't want it to go poof. 
'*I am* *not proud,* *but will* *admit -* *I laughed* *aloud* *a little* *bit...*' &nbsp; :( 
Once you let the smoke out they don't work anymore. Better quality parts keep the smoke inside longer. 
Yeah, it is really hard to put the smoke back in. 
Managing a KFC that *wasn't* in the ghetto drove me to alcoholism and a peptic ulcer, I can't even imagine what you've seen. Good on you. 
I had a customer's child all but try to climb up a product shelf (after knocking half a shelf off) so I told the boy (3-4 years old) he needed to sit. Mother says sharply "I'll take care of him" after ignoring his rambunctious behavior the last 10 minutes. So I reply "he's climbing up shelves, I wouldn't want them to fall on him as they aren't designed for that weight" she rolls her eyes abs of course doesn't tip. I've lost count how many children I've had to "parent" in my store. 
So a customer sexually assaulted you and you got fired for defending yourself? What the fucking fuck?!?! I can only imagine the delirious giggling that the employment lawyer you took that to emitted upon hearing your case. (And in case I am not being clear, I am in no way implying that he was laughing at you. Just at the obscenely large amount of money he was about to sue someone for.) 
"Ma'am would you like to see our shelf of used dildos?" "Why would I want to see those?" "So you can go FUCK YOURSELF!" 
This reminds me of how my grandparents met (mainly due to alcohol being poured on someone's head) - my grandmother worked in a bar and my grandfather's ship had docked in my town for a while (he was in the navy for WWII). A man poured his drink over my grandmother's head exclaiming "I'm not drinking this piss" my grandfather then took him outside and gave him a seeing too. They've been married 64 years. 
See, someone should have told him "if you insist on us firing him, we'll bring the video of you yelling at him to your company to explain what's going on. We wouldn't want that, would we?" 
Haha so true for customer. They truly believe they are right or that they entitled based on their preconceived notion that they are important. 
I bet the guy who threw the pizza never did it again though, and probably treated people in day to day life alot better afterwards. 
And the problem with those stupid water wings is that they often let the kids drown in one way or another. 
That reminds me of a telemarketer that called my parents house while I was there. The computer didn't recognize that it was an answering machine and handed off the call. (I assume that's how it normally works, I feel like a live operator would have recognized it) Anyways when he says hello and no one responded he got really agitated and kept saying he would keep calling us back and how he could hear us on the line even though it was just the machine. 
I did this once working Thanksgiving Night/Black Friday when I worked fast food in high school... I fucked up some lady's coupon/discount and my manager was nowhere to be found so I froze up and just started taking care of someone else 
but you fulfilled your duty of keeping the animal alive so you are still the winner 
Holy shit honestly I don't know how I would react as the customer, but I like to think I would be more laughing my ass off rather than mad at that point 
Every business should have a mandatory "We do not deal with rude customers" rule. If a customer is rude and cant hold an argument like a sane person then they are not to be served. If only the world was perfect... 
To be pedantic, wouldn't that be "smashed potatoes?" 
I don't know the full details of the conversation and maybe the customer was being a massive pain in the ass, but it sounds like he was just being sarcastic for no reason. He probably wasn't in the right job; not everyone can deal with customers like that (and I don't blame them, people are assholes). 
I would never let someone shit in me at the library 
I mean I understand trying to stress test new employees, but goddamn don't throw them to the wolves! The supervisor should've let you take the lead and have you tell them where you need help - that way the supervisor could learn where your priorities and leadership skills are at. 
Dammit sea monster, get the hell out of my star bucks 
The executives who make policies like that need to have the ever living crap beaten out of them. 
We don't know that. They made up the store name "All-Mart". It could be any retail establishment. 
What pissed me off when I worked retail was when a kid would be misbehaving and the parent would say 'stop that or the man (me) will tell you off'. Bitch, I am not your baby daddy I'm not parenting your stupid child for you. 
As a hairstylist who worked at a chain hair place this happened way way too often! At least once a week or more on average. Ugh glad Im not doing hair anymore. People are asses. Also they always get a free cut because they usually yell and storm out and I'm like well that sucks. So basically they are stealing. We keep a database though so if they come back we refuse to cut their hair unless they pay. And this database goes to all of our stores in the us! So good luck doing it again! 
A coworker of mine was once punched by a drunk client, right in the jaw, almost knocked him out. He called the cops, had the guy arrested. Our bosses really pressured him not to file charges as it may have affected our company keeping the corporate account. They didn't imply anything bad would happen to him if he did press charges, but they made it very clear the negative effects of losing that account. Since he was the youngest employee there, pretty sure he realized that he would be let go in the "downsizing". He was a give no fucks kind of guy, so he pressed charges anyway, we didn't lose the account so he stayed on until I left, but I felt the same way, if someone actually attacks you, then those sorts of professional rules are off the table. 
When people spend 30 minutes screaming a lie at the officer and he turns to you for your side of the story and s You say," Dash Cam" . The look of glee on the officers face is matched by the look of horror of the idiot who hits you face. 
I didn't end up going to a lawyer. I was super young at the time (16) and completely inexperienced with that kind of stuff. I wish that I did! 
I worked in a hospital and some lady was irate for the wait taking too long among other things (it was an Emergency Room and she had been waiting 30 minutes tops). She demands to speak to the charge nurse, and the charge nurse comes out and writes down all of her complaints. As soon as she walks away, the charge nurse hands me the piece of paper and says: "highqi, file this in my drawer for me" as he points to the trash can. I think that's the hardest I've ever laughed at work because he was so serious when he was writing down all of her complaints. 
I work in a mall and some stores inside malls like to give discounts to fellow mall employees. The discount isn't mandatory and probably 60-70% of stores don't give anything, my store is one that doesn't have discount. I have been yelled at on 3 separate occasions by mall employees about us not giving discount. I have no control over discounts, we are a multi million dollar worldwide company we don't wipe our asses without head office say so, so no I can't just give you a discount. One of my co-workers was even denied her discount at another store because the staff member said "if you don't give us a discount I'm not gonna give you one here." Mall discount means either everyone gets it or don't offer it. 
I always wish a fellow customer would be good enough to stand up for the employee in these situations. 
Some people just want to ruin things for everyone. I couldn't take them back because any Lego bricks brought in by an employee are presumed to be company property. I had no problem with that because I planned to give them all away to guests anyway. Most of the kids were part of school field trips, meaning not much money for the gift shop and Lego products are pricey. I just wanted kids who were super hyped about it to have something cool to take home. Again, It was a minimum wage job and not my primary source of income. I just wanted to play with kids. Mine are grown and randomly asking people if I can play with their kids doesn't go over well- even as a middle aged woman. But, it wasn't worth having a 20 year old manager in my face yelling at me. My daughter is older than her and it took everything I had not to tell her to go to her room. :-) 
Thank you so much. That was totally why I did it and why I kept all the minifig accessories so I could trade the right guy with the right weapons or whatever. Seeing the kids light up knowing that some adult "gets it" and understands why clone troopers have certain weapons or whatever is important. As geeks, we have a responsibility to encourage lil geeks! 
The GM immediately clocked them in at their original start time and apologized. She was happy they didn't leave. 
I tried to make my case for a couple minutes. I knew it was an exercise in futility, but I figured I would see how open they were to listening. I tried to explain that this guy was actually costing the company way more money than he was feeding into their machine. He was always nickel and dining everyone all the time and the amount of wasted hours of man power were incalculable. But that's the rub. I made the Cardinal sin of cussing out a customer. I had worked there for some time and was even rewarded on multiple occasions for fantastic service. I even had customers that liked me so much they brought me gifts on the holidays. I was never in trouble at work before this at all. But in customer service, you can havr 10 years worth of millions of positive customer interactions and it amounts to nothing. One bad incident and you are toast. I knew my fate was sealed when I made the decision. My heart and mind had already left that job. I was just taking up physical space. 
It was so satisfying. I highly recommend doing this if you have the leverage. 
You can say Olive Garden, this isn't talesfromyourserver or talesfromretail 
Well, it wasn't related to dealing with a customer, exactly. 
I wish all companies would be like "We're not going to fire a good employee because you were an asshole to them." 
I've been in retail since I was 17. I'm 34 now. We really are subhuman slaves to many people. Fortunately I lost my hearing so I stock groceries these days, I have limited contact with humans now. 
Nah, he told himself that the employee was the asshole idiot and still believes he was the victim to this day. 
Yeah. Parents assume that their kid doesn't need to be watched due to water wings, and kids act like they've just equipped the +1 strength anti-drowning wings of the gods. It's a bad combo. I've had to give parents that lecture so many times in parent and me.... 
haha our pool didn't even allow kids in life jackets to go in the deep end. Which of course, brought us a whole different slew of shit from parents. I couldnt really argue that one though. A four year old who cant touch in the 4 foot shallow end is in the same amount of danger in a life jacket in the deep end. 
Yes, sounds to me like some kind of attempted theft. I've also encountered the "quick-change artist", who hands you a $20, then changes their mind and wants to give you a $10 in exchange for 2 $5s, then yada yada yada. Their goal is to get the cashier so confused that they end up with more "change" than they started with. I pissed off a guy who tried it because I basically gave him his bills back and told him to decide how he wanted to pay before I would accept it. 
And then screwed it up instead, but the employee is still logged on, so gets blamed for the shortage at the end of the day. 
No, it was working in fast food where even management gets treated like they are the scum of the earth. Not even fast food employees respect fast food employees. 
Auntie Anne's right? I think you're talking about Auntie Anne's, but don't want to say Auntie Anne's. 
That is true. The woman gave the dog up and I found out he was adopted by newlyweds. 
He called in. He was pissed. I felt great though. When I became the higher tier tech and took escalation, the level one techs always sent me the belligerent customers. I was known for not taking customers' bullshit. Hung up on so many assholes. Got a standing ovation when I told an escalation customer to never call back and hanging up on her. Got her number banned from calling in after that. She was extremely verbally abusive. 
I work at Whole Foods. When someone is being an asshole, I just walk away. That's what I've been told to do. I do not get paid enough to get yelled at about crab salad. 
I really hope in my fit of prepubescent squeeky rage that it haunts him for years as well. 
Mark got screamed at by a manager over the phone about an hour later telling him to clear his stuff out, Mark already had though most of his tools were in a large chest which he put into the back of his van, the small tool box that was on the floor I dropped off at his house a week later, he got another job about a month later, then moved a few years after that. Lost touch with him then. We did finish the job in time actually, mainly as we ran the newest machine at around 115% and worked saturdays on all 3 shifts for the next month, I've sneaky suspicion due to the amount of reprints we would have had to do and the the overtime that was burned catching up I'd be very very shocked if the company made a single penny on that job. 
People really don't appreciate the bad-behavior-correcting power of a deserved ass-kicking. 
And working more than 12 hours a day and more than 45 hours in three days? That's a major violation of labor laws 
Not just that. I avoid going to new restaurants for at least a month because of the combination of the employees being new, like you said, and that they will be slammed with customers since they are the new thing. So new employees plus working at capacity is just a recipe for trouble. Once things appear to simmer down, judging by the parking lot as I drive by on my way home, I will hit it up then. Its always nicer to eat at a place that isn't in panic mode. 
My last job I was at the cutting counter with a line and a dimbulb walks down the aisle across from there. She swipes all the stuff to the side then plunks her scrawny yoga pant wearing arse on a shelf and proceeds to text on her phone. Her kid is trying to climb the shelves, and of course, falls because she's not paying attention to him. I continue cutting whilst the mum's freaking out. All the old biddies in line were tsking and saying that she shoulda been watching him. ha! 
I've been thinking of investing in a dash cam. There's so many morons on the road these days, so it might be worth it. 
Actually if you were 16 that might (depending on where you're from) be considered child molestation, for which the statute of limitations is longer. You may be able to sue your employer for a) allowing you to be molested b) covering up your molestation and c) retaliating against you by firing you. 
Please don't remind me of Katie Hopkins. She's almost the worst thing to come from Britain. 
Sometimes that's really the best way to diffuse a situation...Fake empathy so they shout it out and move on. 
It's this bull shit that is fucking inexcusable. They work in a similar situation, they should know better then to be dicks to the person behind the counter. 
I speak up against other customers regularly, and Ive also berated managers for treating their employees like shit in front of me. I had an entire mini van family screaming at me in a pizza joint once because they were pissed that I spoke up over their verbal abuse of the minimum wage counter worker. 
You sound like a genuinely awesome adult and we need more people like you in the world. There are many children who don't have happy lives and your genuine selfless actions would mean so much to them. 
That'd be illegal these days. Docking pay is a big no no. 
I've only worked retail part time for 6 months in a game store. I don't know how people do it. One thing that still raises my BP is the thought of my first week. I rang up an item wrong and it was charging this lady $1 more than it should. Good catch. I screwed up on the code entry. But the lady looks down at her 10 year old daughter and says "this is why you have to watch these people..they are greedy and will take all the money they can from you" Being part time I didn't care and fired back at her. "Jesus Christ lady stop being so over dramatic. It isn't going into my pocket. I messed up..sorry... try not to hit your head on the door frame while riding your high horse out the door" If her kid hadn't been there I'd have thrown out bitch at her... Never got fired for it..I don't think she reported..but that was the start of me knowing I couldn't do a life in retail...I don't have the capability to keep quiet when someone is an ass 
Yes! It's all about feeling like they have some power and control. I know people in my small town that purposely (probably subconsciously but I've caught on to their habit) try to start things with workers so they can threaten them with talking to boss man or manager. Many places of business here disregard those types of customers unless they're regulars or people they trust aren't just trying to cause nonsense drama. I worked at too many places round here now that I'm reflecting 
And thus a new standard at the restaurant was set: you complain, and you get free food. 
What about my Starbucks cup? I should shove that between the gum in impulse, right? 
You are very right, customers can be trained to act kindly...or poorly. It usually falls to back-room management who just gives in to everyone who raises their voice. The customer is NOT always right but they (corporate) aren't willing to lose $1 to show that. It really fosters a terribly rude and entitled group of customers and depressed hopeless employees. 
We actually had a rule that if a kid looked pretty little, we'd give him a swim test where he had to swum 25 yds unaided. Pass that and the pool is wide open. It saves the guards a lot of worry, too. 
I'm immensely jealous this line of employment no longer exists. 
I used to work at hannaford, for those not familiar it's a big supermarket chain in Northeast US, it's sister stores with food lion, stop and shop. Anyway, it was a well known policy that if any employee other than the department managers would to operate a fire extinguisher or pull a fire alarm they were to be fired. So I would secretly hope I found a fire and would ignore it. 
Fast food employee here. I sympathize with all other FFE. The general population is a load of fucking work, and I'd love to throw some faces into the frier every now-and-then. 
Tried to assault? She actually battered him, which is worse. 
I'm so terrified to send anything back that even if it's shit I just lie and say I enjoyed it. I can't believe the audacity of some of these customers. SMH. 
And Wetzel's right? You're not supposed to be saying Wetzel's? 
God damn this gave me chills. Can people have their pets put down if the vet deems them "healthy"? I would assume that putting down a dog requires a ton of paperwork no? 
My mom is sort of like that. Very verbally abusive to people on the phone. I always try to be the voice they hear in the background defending them. "Mom, stop. They're just trying to do their job. You don't need to yell at them. Stop it. They're people and you need to have better manners" etc lol after a while she still gets all uppity but not as bad as before since I embarrass her when she does get all holier than thou. 
I used to also work at Whole Foods. I realized that any other store probably would have fired me with the way I've treated some rude customers. 
If they own the mill that makes the paper they probably did. A lot of printing and die cutting companies will take a small loss on orders if they make up for it with paper sales for the order. 
Some people are just in such a weird haze when they come in... 
The subplot to the newest Batman movie: Big Bad Harv takes over in the middle of Batbucks (or whatever they have in Gotham) and loudly demands an Americano with two shots of espresso and half-and-half, gets violent when given semi-skimmed. 
Seriously. I worked at a gas station when I was a teenager, and my coworker accidentally held the button while saying "this is the ugliest lady I've ever seen in my life" 
The ff place I worked for at 16 had a headset with two buttons- one for the drive-thru, one to communicate to other employees. Conversations like the following were common. (Button One) How can I help you? *(Button Two) Oh fuck, heads up guys. It's Ranch Lady again* "I want eight cheesy gordita crunches, but no cheese! I want you to replace the cheese with ranch!" Yes Ma'am, anything else? *Wait for it...* "Extra Ranch! You people never put on enough! Extraaa!" "Of course Ma'am. Extra ranch. *Like this bitch even needs the extra ranch. Drench that shit dude. She's only gonna complain anyway.* "And a diet coke!" Your order is $25 at the first window. Bitch, a diet coke, really? *Dude, wrong button...* 
In my experience, service and security both just ignore labor laws. The company wins because it doesn't have to hire more staff, and the workers don't complain because the wage is so low they badly need the extra hours. Honestly it has me in a bad mindset. When I worked security, I was travelling for 90 mins each way. I didn't get out of bed for less than 10 - 12 hour shifts (moreso because if you did, the company would give you the shitshift of 3 hours), so sleep deprivation on graveyard shifts was common after working doors all day, and being in again in the morning. Another side of it is, I'm depressed if I'm not working or drunk off my ass, so I try to keep busy as I can while making a living. Just an insight. 
I really couldn't, and still can't, fathom how she thought it was acceptable to get someone fired because she didn't understand how notifications work (You get an email confirmation of your purchase as well which stresses "Please don't try to pick up your package until you receive an email from us") It takes real, uh, skill(?) to stick out from DailyMail journalists. Happy New Year! 
Not to mention that if you're waiting around for a long ass time, you probably could have gone to your doctor. 
My wife gets mad at me because I do this often. It just bothers me because it's like watching a fight where one guy has a hand tied behind his back. I can't help myself. I try to be humorous about it but for some reason the jerks who berate people serving them don't have the best senses of humor. Go figure 
Recently had a friend who was getting his pay docked for little things here and there so he kept up with the proof. After the company fired him he presented the proof and threatened to get labor board involved. They gave him a nice going away present and said they would give him a good recommendation to wherever he applied. 
Just reading this raises my blood pressure. I think if a customer starts being a dick you should just freeze their purchase and refuse them service. 
As a retail worker for 15+ years I can't wait til robots take my job. Or better yet, take over the customers job. Imagine what a paradise retail would be if robots came in with a list and were programmed to say "Thanks" or even a simple "Hello". Damn I hate people. I need a new job. 
The First Rule of Retail: Rude customers are rewarded, polite customers pay full price. 
If we assume the debts the union gets a new line of credit, a financial diuretic. How do you not get it? If we're aggressive and competitive the Union gets a boost, you'd rather give it a sedative? 
Seriously, it was my favorite job. The best was when I worked for a mom and pop rental place in a town that had Blockbuster, Hollywood, and Crown video. I was the only employee and one of the few customers. I was basically Randall from Clerks and living the dream. 
This is where if you get fired for this reason, you drag your company through the court of public opinion. 
Should have called the cops and hauled her ass out in cuffs. Pressed charges. Taken it aaaaall the way. People think they can just hit people in service jobs like it's no big deal. Pisses me off that more people aren't hauled out in cuffs. Service people aren't there to be hit and yelled at. 
As a server for a long time, let me tell you: guests like you are the ones we actually WANT to help. No one on the team worth their salt actually gives a shit about the guy who eats 2/3rds of his steak then demands another one because his is "dry". But if you are polite and simply let us know there's a problem we're totally glad to help! There's a reason it's also known as the hospitality industry. 
It takes a single piece of paper with the owners signature, and yes, a healthy animal can be brought in to be put down, but I've only seen it happen a couple of times. More often than not, we are able to talk them into signing the dog over to a rescue group to be put up for adoption. Source: 9 years of emergency veterinary experience. 
Just on the off chance this isn't fishing for a response, I'm going to take the bait anyway and offer you the kindly suggestion you don't call ANY female coworker 'sugar tits' 
God damn. He sounds like a hoot to be with man. Generally a funny dude. Good on ya :) 
"A hand tied behind his back," is the best way I've heard of describing being on the receiving end of customer abuse. You have to try to defuse the situation without: **A)** Giving up too much ground. **B)** Losing the customer. **C)** Admitting fault. *and, above all else,* **D)** Retaining any sort of personal dignity or victory of your own. It's just an unfair fight, every goddamned time. 
I'd still go to the labor board. Even after that "bonus". If they're doing it to him, chances are they're doing it to everyone else. That's really fucking shitty 
Uhh geez man, I'm sorry. I honestly don't know what to say. :( 
When I worked food service, that was actually our store's, "official policy". I tried it out one day when these two ornery women came in and started swearing at me because I was still working at putting the labels in the cabinet. It was like two minutes after we opened. Not at all unusual to still be setting up at that time since we planned to do just that when it was still quiet. Even if I had been running behind, I don't see how I deserved to be called a "fucking lazy bitch". So I refused to serve them. They complained and a manager came over and took their order. And I still had to make and deliver it to them. I was so pissed that I didn't get backed up on our "official policy". 
Pretty much... I'm a big box department manager and the dickholes come in and bitch at people until they get a senior manager who just gives them whatever they want. I do my part to fix it though... anytime a customer is patient, or funny, or just nice... I tell them "Thanks for being so [positive attribute], our competitor has this offered at a lower price [bullshitting], let me price match this and beat them by 10% for you." Then I mark it down 15% and thank them for coming in. 
When I was a cashier back in the early 1990s we were trained about it. Also to keep your drawer closed as much as possible, because there were people who would just flat out reach over and grab cash out of your drawer. We also once had a girl walked out in handcuffs for "sweethearting," which is where someone, a family member or friend, comes up with a huge order and the cashier only scans the occasional item, causing the final total to be much lower than it should be. Works really well in warehouse stores where the customer bags their own groceries. 
I would have if I didn't feel my store manager would back me up, which he did. He was a bumbling jackass who didn't know how to manager the store, but he had common sense and a "customer first" attitude when it applied. My shop steward was there and my union rep was a call away, but I didn't need them thankfully. 
My grandfather was a farm vet in rural Idaho in the late 50s. People would bring him pets to put down like this, and he'd take their money for it and adopt it himself (or find someone else to adopt it). It's how my mom got her favorite childhood animal. I can't imagine he'd necessarily get away with it today, but I always thought it was pretty cool. 
Yea he was awesome. Lost touch with him though. I joined the military and he moved to a new store. I kept in touch with him there but when I got out of the military the store was closed. No clue where he went after that. 
There is no such thing as corporate ethics. It's all Cover Your Ass. 
Lots of business' do this. At the Subway I worked at, somebody "on night shift" was apparently stealing from the cash register. Well, it was the same day/night workers everyday basically. Anyways, they said if the cash register wasn't right every night by the end of the night, they'd dock money from every single person's paycheck. I quit shortly after, but found out about 6 months later, it was the manager (who worked days) stealing from the cash register as well as produce, totally $10,000 worth of money and food. 
I worked for a certain coffee chain, and the franchisees who owned it refused to get the damn signs. I told them exactly what would happen if they didn't put them up and showed them my proof that they didn't have them and I requested them. They were so angry with me for having to spend 300 on a sign, when they would have lost thousands 
As an ex-manager, this burns. If someone called one of my employees a fucking *anything* and it wasn't a friendly joke, they'd have been helped with cold politeness to the door. That's like calling your family member something. Doesn't matter the personal relationship- no one outside gets to say that about someone and think the company is ok with it. 
Gas station regulars are some top notch people. When I worked at a gas station, every day like clockwork my regulars would come in. And god forbid there was an issue with a drunk from the bar next door, someone passing through pissing and moaning about something, or a general disruption to their routine. These people would flip their shit at the disruption, get them to fuck off, and then be completely back to normal with you. Like it never happened, and it was beautiful to watch. One guy told me after he dragged (literally, grabbed him by the belt buckle and DRAGGED) a guy out that it wasn't cool for someone to act like an asshole to someone else who can't do anything about it unless they lose their job. 
See, my manager at Finish Line allowed us to do the polar opposite. If people were polite, we'd go to hell and back to help them. Rude? Piss off, they didn't get shit lol 
That happened to me when I was like 17 or 18. I was working at a small well known corner store and I was alone up front on the backup register as it was time for the manager to count the main tills. The way the drawer opens is right where the bags are so it's very accessible if you're a customer. This big bald guy walks in the store to the back, grabs a store brand soda, I ring it and he gives me a twenty and when I go to get change out of the register, he simply pushed my hands away and grabbed the money out of the register and bolted. I was so shocked that I called for the manager on the intercom and my coworker came out instead and I just started bawling. I had to stay late to talk to the police. Then I had to open the next morning and the morning manager made me clean up the mess the cops left when they dusted for fingerprints. 
My manager is a big of a bumbler (can't believe *that's* a word) and whenever i need to voice a concern i do it through a different department's supervisor (i don't have a supervisor). It's irritating as hell, but it helps that he, like your manager, has the employees' welfare at the forefront of his mind. 
That's awesome, he was like veterinary Oscar Schindler! 
Yeah... No. If you're not paying me at this instant you get zero say over my activities. I mean, I get that I shouldn't be drinking past a certain point because when I clock in I am required to be sober, but if I've got a passion for pistol duelling with wax bullets don't tell me that's unethical because my employer needs both my eyes. 
I just imagined a very rotund manager stealing $10k worth of little cheese triangles... 
The local Finish Line here lost my business a few years back. I had bought a new pair of sneakers and everything went smooth... salesman was very nice and helpful in getting my selection. When I got home, I noticed there was a small tear just above the soles. I thought, no problem, I can just get them exchanged. That was where I was wrong. Bring them back, politely ask the same guy to exchange them for me, he goes to his manager to approve it. Then the manager comes out, visibly irritated. She kept insisting that I made the cut when I didn't even take them out of the box until I got home and noticed the cut. Calling me a cheapskate and a liar. I blew up on her real quick... why would I cut a shoe just to exchange it for the exact same pair? Called corporate and they did nothing. The nice employee however, bought the new pair of shoes for me then quit on the spot. I still send him a Christmas card with $20 every year. It's been about 8 years now. 
There's a catacomb full of bones in Italy with a sign that says "As you are, we once were. As we are, you shall be." 
Hey, as someone who uses a cane rn and probably will 'graduate' to using a wheelchair sooner or later: it's ok. Whatever mobility aid you use is there to help you, to make your life better. It helps you eg. get around, have an independent life (or more of one than you would without it), experience less pain/discomfort/etc. Glasses work on the same principle of making your life better when you need them and use them! I know it can take a while to accept you need this/any mobility aid, but it's a good thing, I promise. (Also people who are dicks to you about it are assholes and would for sure find some other reason to treat you badly anyway. Fuck them) 
But why isn't it ever unfair in my favor? --Calvin from Calvin & Hobbes 
Extra pain is that other person will tell you that you are the one because its the easy option 
And there are more of them than one could reasonably care about, too. Our ape brains only support a few hundred relationships. 
I think I peaked before first grade. Before that I was adorable. After that, not so much. 
Absolutely this. This was me until I began meditating and exercising. It turns out that a lot of my demotivation and self deprecating thoughts came from me not knowing who I am and therefore having obscured thoughts that wasn't real but really held me back. 
My parents prioritized the community of our family over stopping sexual assault. I'm sorry to hear that happened to you, and hope you have recovered. 
This hit me a few years ago. When you're working full time (or more than full time like many of us), "summer" is irrelevant. It's no longer a symbol of fun and freedom. It's just hot. 
Not just most people, all people will eventually die and be forgotten. In a broader perspective, everything perishes in time and nothing really amounts to anything. **EDIT** Seeing how this thread has become quite depressing, I would like to add that my original comment should not be taken seriously at all. The key word there is *broader perspective*, by which I mean a mega-hyper-super broad perspective. In our day-to-day perspective (the important perspective) things do matter, **people** do matter. There is also good news: we get to choose what matters most to us. 
Me too. I also have a lack of motivation and pretty low aspirations, so I kinda just go with the flow. 
But that's what makes love a beautiful thing. No matter what you do, every relationship in your life is going to end messily. For example, I'm married. My wife could die, or I could die, or we could get divorced. Those are pretty much the only options as far as endings go. But I'm not going anywhere. Why? Simple. Whether we stay together 60 more years or 60 more seconds, my life is infinitely better for having had her in it. And regardless of the fact that I *know*, beyond any doubt, that one day it will end, I would rather be heartbroken then, than miss out on one second of time with her now. 
If karma doesn't exist, explain how I have 32k worth of karma. Edit - 34k. Edit2 - 35k. Edit3 - 36k. 
It is so, so hard to try to get back to who you used to be after an accident. I don't have brain damage, but I used to be good looking and confident, I used to have friends and be relatively happy, but it's all gone now and it's not coming back. 
In developmental psychology this is a well recognised mindset. It is a mindset developed by conditions and experiences, not inherent existence, and thus it can be changed. Your conviction is just a perspective that has been learned. Cognitive behavioural therapy, traditional medicine healing like ayahuasca which generates new cognitive wiring and brain development, and also meditation are tools which you can implement to find your way. Under all the shit is your pure radiant heart, full of compassion and love. Don't give up. Be present and find it :) Sending love. 
don't worry, maybe you'll be stuck inside a slowly decomposing corpse, fully concious 
Great, I only have to live this awful experience once. 
My father actually did this. He continued to eat what he shouldn't. He eventually got put in the hospital and then they fixed him and sent him home with oxygen. He took it off in the middle of the night and never woke up. He told my best friend to take care of me when it happens....she didn't know what he meant til it was too late. 
Yep. "Don't set yourself on fire to keep someone else warm." 
greatest of all time athletes. cures for diseases. revolutionary inventions. we've probably missed a lot. 
Well at least your username suggests you know the correct way to pronounce "scones". So you've got that going for you at least. 
There were two times in college where I found out I was at the very bottom. Once I found out I was the one with the lowest scored exam grade when I was so sure there were at least several other students more clueless than I was. Another time I found out I got a D in a class the average student was able to make an A or B in, and I found myself ranked 2nd to last. Both of those times I felt sick to the stomach. It was awful. I'm so glad to be done with school now. 
Believe it or not you have things some man want. A wife, kids and a family. I'm single and shy. I have come to the conclusion I will not get married or have kids so I will not get to experience that love which is needed and priceless. Its gets scary out here when you are alone. I jumped off a bridge to try to kill myself. Lived and let me tell you that you have many precious blessing especially if you have a roof over your head and job to compliment your family. I probably would not have jumped if I had a wife and kids. 
Mine actually went away! Keep trying? Medication? Therapy? Change in life perspective? Dark Souls? Those were what saved me. Especially the last two. 
But also peaceful, calm, and in an esoteric way, perfect. And who knows, physics isn't finished yet, and something probably came before the Big Bang; something might happen after (or even before) heat death. Not like we're gonna be around to see it anyway, our date with oblivion will be far sooner... 
Meh. My brother and I hated each other growing up and now we're actually friends. So.. 
Same. I have for most of my life only had one single friend. I can be an ass without knowing or wanting to. 
Better than them getting along too well, just saying. 
My bipolar disorder had the same effect. Now I have memory and concentration issues, which is very frustrating for example when I'm reading. I used to devour novels while sitting on the couch while my family was watching TV. Now if there's any noise that has words, like TV or music with lyrics, I can't read at all. And once I do finish a book, I've already forgotten at least half of it. The past ten years or so have been a blur and I remember very little about my life at certain points. I've sort of learned not to be hard on myself about it. Like when I play video games, I know I'm not very good and make a lot of mistakes, but I just go at my own pace, play casually and I'm not competitive at all. I try to think of how I would treat my child if they had mental problems, and that helps me to be more gentle with myself. 
The phrase blood it thicker than water is actually: "The blood of the covenant is thicker than the water of the womb" 
How old are you? My life had its ups and downs, but it was never better than now that I'm 50. 
I'm in the same boat. Probably going to die alone and my cats are going to eat my face, probably. 
"Hah, this will fuck with future generations of people!" - A dead Italian person 
It's ok to like or love your job or the people you work with. But always remember that you are a replaceable cog to the company. 
my stepfather lost his job yesterday. he's been there 15 years, had a fairly high up position at a very recognizable and large food company. 15 years, took a ten minute meeting to tell him he's done. he can be a dick at times but he was damn good at what he did. a new boss above my stepfather they got two years ago didn't think that way. i don't know what my family is going to do. 
It sounds like, from the company's perspective, that you're perfectly positioned. I bet that's why they didn't want to promote you. 
"It is possible to commit no mistakes and still lose. That is not a weakness; that is life." --Jean-Luc Picard from Star Trek the Next Generation 
I think a lot of people forget that. I know for a period I certainly did. People get so focused on the other person as an object of desire that they forget about themselves. Want to have a great partner? Start by being a great person and partner yourself. Want to be loved? Start by loving yourself. Seven Habits I feel covers this pretty well. 
Two or so years ago, after over 20 plus years, my wife revealed that she loves me as a friend and never had a romantic love for me. The past 25 years has been a lie. I knew she always had a responsive desire, so I always initiated all intimacy. The sad truth is that I always knew that she didn't love me like that. Denial was easy to accept. I was so hurt and close to suicide and I've punished myself by doing stupid things. I'm OK now. IC was necessary. I have a few hobby's now, I've developed a couple friendships, and I am beginning to love myself instead of looking for validation from others. It's been rough, but I AM GOING TO MAKE IT! 
When i was 8-9 or so a 15+ girl said i had cute eyes, that's about as high i have peaked. 
Early 20s? You can absolutely do a trade still. If you really want to - do it! You still have time I promise! 
I avoided relationships of almost all kind through out high school so I dont even have experience to get in one. I feel like my only hope at this point is to get well off and find a gold digger. On the upside its given me just enough motivation to get promoted. 
Yep. I failed my degree and had to change careers. I'm happy now, but the raw shame of it basically made me shut out every existing friend I had because I couldn't bare explaining it to them. Sometimes I think of reconnecting, but that smart, slightly arrogant gamer is gone so I'm not sure what there is left to reconnect with. 
Same here. A former colleague who I hadn't spoken to in like 2 years, before that we got along great. A mutual friend said she thought I was angry at her, so we reconnected where I explained it was just because we hadn't met in ages and just kinda drifted apart. Then she stopped talking to me right away again lol. 
But maybe that's a good thing. I realized that my wife hadn't been happy for years, but she didn't leave me. Was it love? Delusion? Stubbornness? But I had a horrifying realization that maybe she would. So I did everything I could to earn that love and devotion she had shown me during some of my darkest times. I think she's happier now, I know I am and I want to make this work. 
I used to be very naive when it comes to marital compatibility, thinking "there's no such thing as irreconcilable differences. You just have to put in the effort." I realized recently how naive and also arrogant it was to think that. Sometimes two good, honest people trying their best can't live happy lives together. And sometimes, it's no one's "fault" 
It's possible he/she loves her and is trying. You can't always make someone happy. 
I have heard about meditating being very helpful a lot recently. Do you have some pointers as to where to start looking for info? 
I think he knew. He knew what he means to you. Thats why he was always there for you. If two people adore each other there is no need to say the words. In a way.. he died near his loved ones and not in a far away country. He lives his live in stead of being cut short by hate. 
I'm the same age with the same problem. People refuse to acknowledge that I have constant pain in my knee. It's weird isn't it? When I first injured my knee I felt more pain than anyone I knew, now people disregard and tell me to stop feeling sorry for myself. Fucking idiots. I hate them. 
Yeah my dad is in and out of the hospital right now. Pretty scary knowing the next time I see or talk to him could be the last. And my son will probably never get to know him or learn from him the way I did. There's a large age gap between us and sometimes I feel like I miss out on things other people get to do with their parents. 
Thank you for being mad. People in my life never really expressed anger about my shit childhood so when someone does I feel a little happy. Heh. Don't feel bad. Just make sure you make the best of your painless life, hey. :) be kind, have fun, eat good food yay! 
Am parent. I have my moments when I enjoy a good tea party. Legos are awesome no matter what your age is. But you'll never be as carefree, imaginative and lost in play as a child. It's amazing to witness a conversation between Varne, the pink unicorn and a slipper with Elsa printed on. Sometimes it's like she doesn't even expect them to say the things she makes them say to eachother. they have different personalities and opinions, sometimes that creates conflict. Oh, the drama. I just don't have that imagination anymore. Once they start school, there's no more random blobs of paint on the paper, every line is straight or curved, made to look like something. 
Jokes on you. That *is* adulthood. You're not going to suddenly be "in control" or understand what needs to be done. You've spent your youth building a ship, gathering the materials, learning how to craft it, and not long ago you set sail for the first time. What'd you expect to find? It's all ocean. In every direction. Forever. 
What makes you think there's anything wrong with that? Just live a decent life, be kind to people, look after the people or things you need to look after, try not to hurt anyone if you can avoid it. That's all that's asked of you, and it's how most people have lived since the beginning of time. You probably are good at something, though, but it isn't always obvious. 
I agree with you 100%. For me it is always 'better to have loved and lost than never to have loved at all'. 
I am either crippled by this or fueled by it. I can finish that last km when I remember that some don't have that chance anymore or I can collapse immediately under the weight of suffering I'm aware of in that instant. It's the shitty two sides of my empathy coin. 
Exactly my thinking. I don't "believe" in karma but more so that if you are a shitty person, chances are you surround yourself with similar sorts of people. So if you screw people over it's not a huge leap that it's going to happen to you. Not because of some clandestine philosophy but merely because of logic. 
That's a cute sentiment but I'm pretty sure I can avoid starving my kids to the point of serious medical issues and later developing a hobby of using then as personal punching bags. Some parents set a low bar which really can't be all that impossible to surpass. 
Exactly. People don't hate you as much as you might think they do or even notice things you might be worried they're judging you for. Chances are they didn't even give it a second thought. 
I have 2! That sounds pathetic but one of them is as clingy as I am so yeah wooo 
But I live in an apartment building with no grass for miles. 
Zombies suddenly make a lot more sense, thank you for that epiphany. 
how do i upgrade from the demo version, I try to progress to the job acquisition level but it keeps making me go back to school 
Yeah serious. If we had no memory and did it all over again... like I could be picking up scrap metal from a trash heap in India until I die. I'm pretty good with this one life. No offence to any Indians in the slum who managed to salvage an operable computer and connect to wi-fi. You're doin' alright. 
How ironic the thing that saved your thoughts is called Dark souls. 
Whenever this thought crosses my mind I always think that I will be looooong dead before then and I stop worrying about it. 
That's basically the worst thing about it. Why not make me dumb enough to not make me notice I'm dumb? It's stupid being 'smart' enough to know I'm a borderline retard now. Nothing sticks, nothing makes sense anymore, I can't concentrate on anything and I keep forgetting more and more. The words I use become simpler and simpler and most of the time I can't even come up with the right words to describe something or to answer a question with. 
The way it was taught to me was, "You can love your job, but never love the company because it will never love you back." 
Anyone else find it funny that any quotes from books are attributed to the writer, but quotes from TV shows are attributed to the character who said it? 
Someone else could have dragged the series on as long as they could, dumbed it down to simple unfunny jokes, and cashed in the merchandising. Bill Watterson had integrity. 
Man shit I blocked out my middle school years. I had a cute girl that wanted to dance with me at the dance, my friends played a song dedicated to us, no one told me, and I freaked and hid in the bathroom. 
I'm 45 and just rediscovering what I want to do when I grow up 
I did what you did! I did *exactly* what you did, and I never had a relationship at ALL until my sophomore year of college when I met my first girlfriend. I won't lie: It's not easy. Being alone for a long time allows you to develop some grating habits and become accustomed to only pleasing yourself and doing what you want to do - but it's worth it. I was with my first girlfriend for a year and I learned so much and even though she left me, I'm incredibly grateful for all that she taught me and all the patience she had with me. It took a while and the breakup made me take a good long look at myself and change some things, and now I'm with, can you believe it, a **second** girlfriend! I'm just putting this out there, man. You can totally do it. It won't be easy, and sometimes it'll even be massively uncomfortable, but you can do it. Just put yourself out to the world, unabashed and unashamed, and someone will find you. :) 
Got a dog at the peak of my depression and it's amazing how it helped turn me around. Hard to pay attention to the dark voices when there's a pupper worshiping you the moment you get home. 
I lost my dad when I was 18. He passed away from COPD(chronic obstructive pulmonary disease), he also caught some kind of incurable super bug while in the hospital and on top of that his lung cancer came back. In his final months he confessed how afraid of death he was and how he wished he had been a better father (fuck that was hard to hear). But the best thing you can do is be there for him and share the fear so that it doesn't seem as bad. One peice of advice: don't forget to say I love you, every chance you get, because life is fickle and you never know... Best of luck to you, your son, your dad and the rest of your family. And my condolences in advance. 
Absolutely. My son is considered gifted. Long term, it is not how smart you are, it's how hard you work. Hustle tends to win. I don't praise my son's grades, I praise his effort. 
When you're surrounded by shit you either become rich off the fertilizer or end up eating it 
That was the best realization when going to the gym. I was skinnier and wanted to put on weight but for the longest time I was embarrassed that people would laugh at me. Man that shit was all in my head and once I went and realized I didn't give a damn about anyone else there it dawned on me that no one there gave a damn about me either. If anything, you see people who consistently put in work so you kind of become proud of them and happy for them because you can see their changes and improvements. 
Having 2 friends is essentially 100% better than having 1 friend, and Infinite better than having 0 friends. 
There is a hidden switch in your throat that the HR rep has to press 
Perhaps even more ironic that the game is known for being punishing, brutal, unforgiving and notable for the phrase "YOU DIED!", a tale of a worthless being fighting through a decaying realm for a purpose they barely understand, fighting off the will to just give up forever for a reason no more complicated than the idea of progressing and moving forwards (as it's a game, that's what you do, you complete games) And yet, there's something strangely enlightening about this dark and depressing journey. It's quite a special game to many, many people, including myself. [T]/ 
Oh shit no wonder I feel like my brain's deteriorating over the years! How can we fix this?! :( 
So my mom was the exact same state as you about 30 Years ago. A worked hard for a degree in neuro biology, went to school for 8 years, got her "dream job" and then a year later realized that she hated working in the lab. Miserable and feeling like she wasted 8 years of her life, she took a huge leap of faith. Using her knowledge of statistics and her background in medicine she took a data science class and after bouncing around for a few years, she landed a job at a one of the largest medical services in NY doing analytics on their medical procedures. Through that, she eventually got in touch with someone from the CDC and now building and taking national hospital stats and creating the start for many medical researchers. Like my Mom, your degree isn't what you defines your carrer it's the actions you take afterwards. There are so many things you can do with your degree that don't involve the title. 
This is one of the most depressing truths I've had to accept. 
I know, man. I came out of that relationship a much better and stronger person than when I was in it. 
"Can I really love anyone at that level?" "Am I too broken for that?" Yep. Fuck you, brain...why you gotta make things so difficult? 
I don't think everyone can be "the one", but I agree that a huge number of people that exist could potentially be the one. 
At least you weren't set up for a date with a girl that was into you without your knowledge lol, still wish I wasn't dense as a brick and told her I didn't see her like that 
I recommend it! It's best taken with people you're entirely comfortable with, in a setting you can entirely control with regards to light and sound. I've tripped without a sitter which isn't the greatest idea - have someone around just in case. 
I personally feel that this sort of thing stems from 18 years of parents and teachers forcing you to make up your mind on what you want to do and then as soon as you graduate high school you better start working on that career path immediately or else the whole world's gonna turn upside down. What I wanted to do when I was 8 changed by the time I was 10, again at 12, and 16, at 18 I still don't know what the fuck I'm going to do. But there's so much pressure for people to go to uni and get a degree that I'm willing to bet by the end of those 4 years, a lot of people probably aren't very happy with the decision they made. 
Much appreciated. It also doesn't help that I didnt go to college and dont go out much. And when I do go out I just talk to my friend. Kinda hard to meet people if I dont know how to socialize on my own 
And just think... They've gone through the same thing with their parents. 
Damn straight! Also, am woman. I recognize that not everyone has the resources - time, money - to do summer the same way, but the impetus comes from the goddamned long winter I have to live through. If I don't do summer my way, winter fucking sucks that extra much. 
This is me. I don't care enough about anything to do anything. I'm pretty sure that's a big sign of depression. Problem is I just don't care enough to get it treated. 
Damn that almost made me tear up. I didn't know why I loved this game so much. Now I think I know. Thank you, kind stranger. [T]/ 
"This is one of the most depressing truths I've had to accept." - Some Ask Reddit Thread 
When looking at a script, there's also no real way to determine *which* writer wrote a line. It's not really possible to attribute any given quote to any specific writer. 
Yup I know that problem I compare how I felt in my last major relationship compared to now. And I wonder is it me loving less or does love and how you feel change over 4 years 
"The one" is a crock of shit. A million people can compliment you wonderfully in a million different ways because people are impossibly complex and fucked up and beautiful that way. 
When I was a sophomore a couple tried to set me up with their friend. We were on the last few minutes of our 15minute break and they pulled me to the side, asked me if I would go out with this girl, that ive never even talked to before, and then mistook my "ill talk to her" as a yes, and then told her I said yes. Word got spread around their social group and my bud heard about it, thats when I found out I had my first girlfriend. /s I dont count her though, it was a misunderstanding that lead no where. 
I've been told I'm too young on multiple occasions, my go to response is now: "I tried showing her my birth certificate, but that just didn't stop the car." The pain doesn't get better, but you do. You adapt around the pain and come out stronger. 
I'd be raising hell with AT&T and getting that taken off my bill. Hopefully you read anything you signed. 
An ex's dad walked around with the same pack of smokes in his pocket for 15 years so he could wander out for "smoke breaks" whenever he wanted. 
Should have said that if your wife cheats on you that your mom would chop her with a machete too. 
It's not about knowing the truth. It's about feeling like they're the smartest person in the room. 
To be fair the smokers don't get fresh air either. 
I feel you. I have worked in child care for almost 4 years and I've learned a couple things. Most kids loved to get picked up and spun around like a ragdoll. Perfectly fine for my female counterparts to do this and give piggy back rides whenever the kid wants to. For me however, it's inappropriate and a risk to child safety. 
How about this one: If you're late again, I'm writing you up *Leaves 3 hours before her scheduled shift (that she gave herself) ends without warning* 
"Dance like no one is watching". But they are watching, and pointing, and laughing, and now the bouncer's coming over... 
The problem stems from reading, paying attention to, acknowledging and accepting information from Buzzfeed...of all places. 
If skirts are in the dress code, wear one. I did it *one fucking time*. I was called into the bosses office before my shift even started. He asked "Why?" I said it was hot, wearing this was cooler, and within the dress code. He said "You've made your point. The dress code will be amended to allow for shorts." By the first break of the morning, the new dress code was on the wall of the break room, and I was "The Hero in the Paisley Print Skirt." Malicious compliance has been a specialty of mine ever since then. 
Parent: "You're wasting so much time playing those stupid video games" followed by the parent watching TV from the moment they get home till they go to bed. 
This fucking idiot I used to be friends with did this exact thing to me with clash. Me: "I'm not going to play mobile games when I have a $1500 PC Him: but it's cool. I just have bots that play the game for me and build up my shit Me: why the fuck do you even play then? He then proceeds to give me the advice that I shouldn't play too many video games or I'll ruin my relationship. This coming from a guy who repeatedly cheated on his wife to the point that he got a divorce and had to sign away the parental rights to his children. This motherfucker actually thought I want relationship advice from him. It's unbelievable. 
Man I remember crying in the hallway after school after an incident with a group of bullies. One of my teachers found me, gave me a hug and walked me back to his classroom so I could have some privacy. It was one of the most helpful things anyone did during that time of my life, just helping me feel like I was a person who had value enough to be cared for. I hope I didn't get him in trouble :( 
"It must be really annoying how the middle of my sentences keep interrupting the beginning of yours." 
I almost got hit in the crosswalk last year but a cop who was turning while looking at their phone. I'd be madder if it wasn't rampant behavior among civilians as well. 
In general, sexual humiliation of men is considered okay or funny in society. 
Yeah, at my work there's 9 of us and only 1 of us didn't already know someone there 
I get this so much. Games are for kids, daytime television and Facebook are what grownups should be doing with their free time. Similarly, comics are for kids, trashy novels and going to art museums are for grownups. 
Common (mis-)conseption: * Single mom is a woman who fucked up using birth control. * Single dad was left alone by the love of his life. 
Any time I take my daughters to the park it is painfully obvious that I am excluded or frowned at if I'm too close to their kids. It especially happens when mom groups are there together. It's not my fault that they are too busy sitting on the bench chatting to notice that their kids are now on top of the swing set and they didn't notice until I helped them down. 
I don't know. I am on the phone with office workers every day. I rarely have to explain what a "desktop" or a "browser" are to a millennial. Sure, they might not have the firmest grasp on Excel or Access (not that anyone needs to use that in your average office), but they have the basic fluency to learn it. Meanwhile, I spent an hour on the phone with a lady last week and fully 55 minutes of that hour were me trying to explain to her that Edge is not Internet Explorer and she needs to stop opening it, follow my instructions, and open Internet Explorer. 
don't forget that if you don't fit 'depressing spinsteress' there is always 'cold career-driven bitch' 
Omg, this is so true. My whole family tree is made of stoners, hippies, and former addicts. The only exceptions are my parents and my sister. They're all raging alcoholics and have ruined more than a few christmas dinners thanks to alcohol. But I'm the person in my family that needed an intervention for smoking weed. But no one will say one word about my truck driver fathers constant drinking and driving. 
I enjoy the twitter interaction of the girl who makes the disgusted face and says "When his height starts with '5'...", and a guy sent a similar pic back that said "When her weight starts with '2'..." and her followers FLIPPED THE FUCK OUT. 
There's a girl at my work who shoots me lewd comments and makes inappropriate physical contact from time to time. Even more disrespectful because she has met my SO. I don't feel threatened in any way, but it's uncomfortable and annoying as fuck. Even when I legitimately get pissed about it, I get that exact fucking response. "She was just playing around!" 
I thought the new federal minimum wage for 45+ hours was like 47k or something 
How did you respond to him? I know I would've been quite clear and blunt in my reply that "you realize I was here until 3am this morning, yes?" I have no time or tolerance to take shit from clueless jackholes. 
Plot twist: your ex's dad was actually addicted to smoking but lied to save face 
This is the only response. I would only add to your quote at the end when they get scandalized by the reprocity of your statement with, "I'm sure you understand!" 
I think tv has brainwashed them. It's such a rehashed gag that several people THINK it's appropriate behavior. 
It's not a double standard exactly, she's hiding her true meaning; she's really saying "if you damage my family I'll cut you up." She doesn't care about cheating as a matter of general principle, only if it harms her family. 
Along those lines, the famous people have every opportunity to get quality recovery help. The average person simply can't afford that kind of help. That's part of why I don't* care. *Edited a word that I missed on my phone. 
When I was 7, there was this high school guy who would come to the playground to play basketball. Everyone loved him, because while he would wait for his friends to show, he'd push us super high on the swings and super fast on the merry go round. He was stronger than us or our mothers and had way less care for danger so we attained speed we never thought possible. A lot of the young boys looked up to him. One day, a girl mentioned him to her mom and her mom called the cops on this poor kid for "hanging around children", and after that he didn't play anymore. 
As a single Father I tried to get my son enrolled in some play groups so he could be active and make some friends, but every single one that I looked up had some variation of a "Mothers only" rule. I wasn't allowed to let my kid come play just because I was a dad. 
I'm the opposite, I'm a female and people hand me babies left and right or want me to watch them. I have no experience and want no part in it. I don't even like kids. Like.... I could be a serial killer you don't know me. 
I think he only served 2 or 3 months. His dad said it was too high a price to pay for "20 minutes of action". No wonder he's a rapist. He probably learned it from his dad. 
People enjoy dancing so much they seem unable to comprehend someone else not getting the same satisfaction. You just need to "loosen up," because that's what worked for them. There is no chance you could enjoy/not enjoy different things. 
This. I am a parent. My wife and I witnessed her good friend barking out orders to her kids with nary a please or thank you to be heard, while occasionally snapping at them when our kids would ask politely for stuff and show gratitude, 'why can't you show respect like hitdrumhard's kids!' My wife was like, you don't say please or thank you to them, why not? Her response: 'Because I'm the mom! I don't have to!' Wow. Just wow. 
Any disagreement is considered disrespect. Boundaries are disrespect. Pointing out any flaw/mistake with an action the "authority" is doing is disrespect. Their version of respect is "do what I want you to do in exactly the manner I want you to do it and always agree with my decisions." I grew up in this and that realization that what they really meant by respect was utter subservience was huge for me. My 70 year old mother cannot grasp this difference. At all. 
Yea what really fucked me up when I went to college was the transition from high school where if you were late to class you parents got a phone call, you have to fill out a form in the office, etc etc but if you don't come to class in college literally nobody notices or gives a fuck. Or as you said you had to *ask* to go to the bathroom. In college most professors won't bat an eye if you pack up your shit a leave mid lecture as long as you're not too obtrusive when doing it. 
Well done. Malicious compliance is my new favourite phrase / name for my fantasy first album. 
definitely. I've had cases where I'd lock myself up in the bathroom and cry for a good while. In some I've felt physically lighter afterwards. 
The quality of Facebook is directly proportional to the quality of the people you friend on Facebook. For most people, it's their friends who actually suck. 
Honestly its not the cosplay that's weird its the people...sometimes. Like of course comicon and other big events are going to have some weirdos shit at plenty of conventions you have people SPECIFICALLY being weird on purpose like its their "character" or some shit. So I mean I am not putting down cosplayers just pointing out some of them are weird. 
First week at a new high school, I got jumped by 15 other girls who just piled in and started kicking me on the floor. My English teacher came swooping in, scooped me up off the floor into his arms and carried me to his classroom. My clothes were ripped and wet from the ground (I live in England, the ground is always wet). There was nothing weird in it. He was just a Hero. 
They already are, depending on the school district/state. 
I use to work for a video game company for a while and they held to this theory. We were told during training that if you ever call in sick to work don't log into any of the company's games. They will check. Because if you're well enough to sit at your computer at home, you would be well enough to sit in front of your computer at work. 
Or when you actually have some input on the topic but cant get a word in, then by the time you can the topic has changed 3 or 4 times. I just don't bother anymore and nod along 
Being talked over really irritates me. When you try to jump in and contribute to the conversation someone else jumps in and starts talking over you and just talking louder to make sure they are heard instead of you. It happens all of the time and makes my blood boil. They're pretty much saying that you have no importance to the conversation. 
But shouldnt they be held to a higher standard? It's like having an IRS employee commit tax fraud, how can you spend your work day enforcing rules and break said rules at the same time? 
Guilty until proven innocent is beginning to outweigh innocent until proven guilty in far too many of these instances. I have a friend who went through the same thing. Another friend happened to show up and recorded the situation. Next thing he knows, he's defending himself in court as well. Ridiculous. 
In my county after a domestic violence arrest the couple needs to stay separate for 72 hours. Unless the law changed recently, this is still the case. About 15 years ago a man, who was the owner of the house, was barred from going home for 72 hours. When he got home, all the copper wire and pipes were torn out of the walls. As well as all his stuff being gone. Ex-girlfriend that was staying at the house claims she woke up and found it that way. Got off Scot free. 
To be fair one of the founders of the model has come right out and basically said she admits it was confirmation bias and they didn't have substantial evidence. Its heavily criticized, hopefully cops start phasing it out as it only feeds into sexist ideas. 
I saw that a few years ago and was just speechless. Went to look for it more recently and couldn't find it, maybe they took it down? I can only hope so. Imagine going there, desperate for help, and finding only that? As a former victim of domestic violence (note: am female) I am horrified that the same things that would be offered to me would be withheld from a man in the same situation. To be terrified and hurt and reach out and there's just nothing there for you. It's unconscionable. 
I've worked in several retail jobs over the past five years and never has anybody who looks under the age of 30 asked me to "speak to a manager." 
I saw a good one on here a while ago: "The problem with your generation is that you think you should get a trophy for everything!" "I never asked for a trophy growing up. You were the one giving them out." "That's another thing. You kids are always trying to blame your mistakes on someone else." 
I got reprimanded by a visibly capable older woman when I sat in that seat. She then took it for her and her shopping. I was on crutches and couldn't stand! Pardon me for being under 40, I guess that makes me magically able to stand on one foot while a bus lurches around. 
I'm 30, and if I sit down to tie my shoes, I'm not getting back up anytime soon. 
Welcome to life, Network is everything. I got my first job after college by having sold weed to a guy. He got me in several more places as a freelancer. Reconnected with an actor through that Said actor buddy asked me to do some Set Design for his show, met his other friend who liked how I worked and introduced me to his friend a president of an events company. Freelanced for them for two years and then got asked if I wanted to do office work. So here I am 4 years out of college pulling down 75k a year. All because I sold weed to the right person in college. 
This! Apply to jobs even if you don't qualify for their requirements. The worst that happens is that you don't hear back from them. The best that happens is you get a job. Edit : I should clarify, I literally only am referring to the experience type requirements. Don't apply to be a Linux System Administrator if you have never even ran a machine with it obviously. You still need to be able to pass the interview and show you have the knowledge to do the job. I am just stating that if a job says you need 5 years experience for an entry level position and you meet the other requirements listed or most of them. Go for it. 
I agree with you, but art museums can be cool af! That is, if you're into art. Also, most adults I know that go to art museums are cooler than the 'trashy novel adults' imo. 
You say that, but wouldn't she be more likely to know who the father is? 
It gets under my skin. When I was pregnant with our twins last year and mentioned wanting to go to a brewery after they were born, my grandma goes "but who would watch them?" I said, they can stay at home with my husband while I go. She look confused and was like "well who will stay there and help him watch the boys?" I couldn't understand how some people cannot grasp the concept of a man taking care of his own children by himself. My husband can do everything I do with the babies because he is equally as much of their parent as I am! 
Did your boyfriend awkwardly deal with it, or did he make a funny joke showing he is unscathed? 
Me and a friend were kicking a football about in the park one day around Halloween. A little girl dressed as a princess runs up to my pal and asks to kick the ball. My friend turns and goes 'of course. Anything for a beautiful princess' and bowed. The mum comes over and grabs the kid by the arm and looks at my mate and goes 'you're disgusting' and dragged the kid away. 
This, the double standards on how attractive a man looks are ridiculous. Often Creepy vs Good is just down to how you look. 
I think it is definitely cultural. I notice lots of other countries people are a lot more warm around children in general, Macedonia, Greece, Poland, Italy definitely. In the UK and America people are more either paranoid or maybe just cold I think. I definitely prefer the "warmer" cultures, I think it's awesome when other adults play with kids beside their own parents. 
"And if I fuck a kid, *I'm* a pedophile, but if a kid fucks me, *I'm* a pedophile, twice? In the same week?" -Bo Burnham 
I got that this weekend from my mom. "I'm ready for you to finally meet someone!" Mom, I've met lots of people, all of them are commitment phobes or wildly incompatible with me. 
I went to NYC a few years ago and went to the ambercombie and fitch store there was this buff dude and all these girls were running up to take pictures with him and my dad leans to some stranger and says if that were a girl every guy would be a perv. 
Family tells me all the time how smoking weed is terrible for my health and that it will ruin my life. Brother has a serious drinking problem but it's taken very lightly by parents. They even asked me to talk to him. I was like "I thought I had a drug problem? What the fuck gives me the right to tell him he has a problem?" Ya his entire spring break my mom made one comment about his drinking, and that was the morning he was leaving after opening a beer at 9 am. But sure tear me down when I come home at 830 pm a little stoned from smoking a joint ready for some late night gaming. I've even been told by them I need to see a therapist because of my "addiction". Not my brother though, since he's the one with the socially acceptable vice. 
the fucked up part is that one of these things (barring certain medical conditions of course) is *completely* under your own control while with the other there is nothing you can do about it. 
You should be allowed to have whatever preferences you want and people shouldn't shame you for them. Your personal preference has no bearing on anyone else's self worth, nor should it. 
This make my blood boil. That was straight up bullying. Boy get stab for that kind of shits. 
It hasn't been enacted yet. A Texas judge put a hold on it, IIRC 
That's exactly what I said, didn't even wait for a reply, I just turned around and walked out of his office. I was saving his ass too, he screwed up part of the program and I was finishing everything so it would be completed as promised to the client. He's just an ungrateful narcissist. The best part of it is an ex-vp and I have started our own company, so now we're his competitor. I love seeing him at industry events. 
fwiw stimulants increase your desire to shit even when they aren't cut with laxatives. 
What really gets me is how there is so much outrage after a celebrity's death as people try to find someone to blame. Remember how much effort there was to lock up Michael Jackson's doctor for getting him his drugs? No one cares about celebrities doing drugs while they are alive. You won't hear anyone saying that Hollywood has a drug problem or trying to track down their drug dealers. But as soon as someone dies, suddenly it was a tragic drug addiction that someone should have prevented. 
I got the police called on me for being at the park with my daughter. My daughter is light skinned and that is the only thing she got from me. To be honest if it wasn't for her skin color I would have a couple of questions. Anyways, I am playing with my daughter when an officer comes up to me and starts asking me questions. His partner started talking to my daughter, and when I tried to go over. Because why are you talking to my daughter? I was threatened with bodily harm. I had to call my wife to come down and verify I was her real parent. Even though my daughter was crying because they wouldn't let her come to me. Good times. 
Actually Theresa, I do know you and you are definitely a serial killer. 
Any interaction is only in class, with other students and volunteers there. Which is why I was so surprised at the responses I got from everybody. There are 2 adults in the room at any given time, plus several high school volunteers. 
This. Being a parent does not exempt you from common courtesy. My dad would always use that line, and it to this day, dumbfounds me. 
Jesus. Often when I was a kid, if I ever disagreed or made an alternate point I was being "argumentative". I wasn't yelled out about respect or whatever; it was more dismissive, like "oh she's just being argumentative." As a kid it was SO FUCKING FRUSTRATING. It pissed me off so much to just be automatically "invalidated" like that and it's so condescending. 
So true. I remember in my first college class asking if I could use the restroom. The professor said "this is college, you don't have to ask" 
When I was about 7 years old the teacher said no. So I sat there and finally pissed myself because my bladder can only expand so much. I got berated for not telling the teacher I have to go. 
Nah, companies are allowed to set different dress codes based on gender. And even if OP claimed they were transgender (bad idea) most states don't count them as a protected class which means trans people can be legally discriminated against. 
Go ride that pink slip down, waving a cowboy hat, all the way to the unemployment line 
You sure you just werent taking a large dump? I sometimes confuse the two, both are a great relief though. 
I go to a lot of cons, I agree that it's the behavior associated with a lot of cosplayers that bothers me. Sure dress up, sure like anime, sure. SURE. But I feel that the social group interested in cons is just a little more socially inept. So the problem isn't cosplaying, it's the community. Just like at big sports events you get upset with the guys who drink TOO much, or try and fight everyone. At cons people get annoyed with the kids who run around with their hands fluttering behind them, and trying to act all edgy. Another huge aspect is how generally new cons are compared to sporting events. So we are more acquainted with the drunk sports nut than the Naruto 3D emulation. 
Honestly those sound more like rules for handling hazardous machinery / materials rather than working with children. * Never operate without supervision. * Do not operate in a confined area. * Avoid direct skin-contact at all times. 
Yes, please go to work and infect everyone else! My boss actually send me back home once after I got back to work after few sick days. He took one look at my face and said "yeah, you are not working today, go home" 
Is your wife on Reddit? There's a comment from a few minutes ago saying almost this exact thing. 
My former MIL was terrible about just dominating conversations to the point that nobody could get a word in edgewise. One time when she did this, then mentioned how quiet I was, I said "I'm sure you notice that about a lot of people." 
The video I had seen involved the guy having a GoPro strapped prominently to his stomach 
Those people have probably worked in retail and have been in our shoes before. The world and jobs were a lot different in old peoples' time 
My grandparents fit in with the silent generation and they are super grumpy. My grandpa watched FOX news all day and acts like he's the subject matter expert in EVERYTHING. He was pissed that my entry level job at a university didn't include a company vehicle. He still lives with a 1950s mentality... 
Maybe, that or they're old enough to not give a shit. Its never massively bothered me except when people make out theres something wrong with the younger generation, or that we're entitled and rude. 
What was I supposed to do? Turn down the participation trophy? I was like six and didn't have the vocabulary to respectfully turn down that shit 
It's more that it's a power trip. It's not that he wants *that* seat, it's that he wants you to move when he tells you to. 
Ive had 500 jobs this past month and I've squandered them all. Soon I will reach Peak Millennial! Muhahahahahaha! 
Moral of the story: Sell weed to everyone you meet, just in case. 
You know, now that you mention it, her boss does take an unusual amount of interest in this one particular child. 
Oh he didn't care. He just laughed and then asked what my uncle had provided....which was nothing. 
That is literally the most friendly and best response to a kid you can give. If I was that mother I would be smiling hard. 
Especially crazy when you consider someone like Ted Bundy. There is no "look" that tells you what someone is. 
Teachers in some countries have it rough. I'm not a teacher, but i occasionally drive school buses so i'm around kids a lot. Once a young boy tried to fake an injury when i gently handled him to get in his seat and buckle up, because he was refusing to. Once he said that i had hurt him and started acting like he was in pain, i looked him in the eye and said "You're not pulling this shit, behave and be quiet", and so he did. I don't think he tried to sell this to the teachers, but i think the other students spoke up about this to someone at the school and he was apparently given a talking to. I fear that if this happened in the US, i would've been fired, or something worse. 
"Why is it that when a woman wears revealing clothing she's labeled a slut, yet if I were to wear her skin as a jacket I'm a murderer?" 
A big group of my guy friends all ran up to take a picture with one of those models as a joke. We all were flexing. The model thought it was pretty funny. 
Yes. I shit 3 times a day when I was taking adderal. Now I'm lucky to go every other day. 
Wtf man, some people just can't respect boundaries 
I love when that happens. I always say "You realize you can respect somebody and also disagree right?" when they mention disrespect if you don't agree. It's not like your grandma said Apple Pie is the best and you thought chocolate was the best and started the disagreement with "You dusty old cunts wouldn't know good pie if it came in your eye". You would probably start with "I prefer chocolate pie to apple." 
Professors that teach freshmen have to be absolutely sick of this question. I remember being in a writing class and someone asking to leave to use the restroom early in the semester. The professor is just like "this is college. I really don't care." 
My dad worked for UPS and told me one of his co-workers sued for gender discrimination because they wouldn't let him wear earrings and he won. 
Well, both involve sweat and tears. Confusion is justified. 
That's the big sign of a veteran manager. Sure you might get one day of productivity out of this employee coming back a day early from being sick, but come 2 weeks from now, you'll have a bunch of employees calling in sick or working in a complete fog. Having the employee work from home on the other hand... 
Ha, she is and I know her account name. Just out of curiosity I checked, but it's not her. Must just be a common sentiment! 
Why do these people love to say "why you quiet?" They should just say "so.. what do you think?" or something like that. 
Yeah, you were supposed to go full Ayn Rand, smack the trophy to the ground and reject the insulting condescension of "participation" as its own reward. Fucking millennials. 
The trick is to hit 'em with a low shot BEFORE they demand to speak to the manager. Maybe after the 3rd or 4th attempt to explain what expired means, say something in a sweet tone of voice to the effect of "Hold on one second, I'll have to call over a manager to see if they can override our system for you, since I'm not authorized to honor expired coupon." 
Holy shit you just reminded me. Was in a b&b, the owner, 60s, started complaining about her daughters boyfriend who is 25, a lawyer in the city, but hasn't held a job for longer than two years. I mean, he's a lawyer, IN THE CITY. He's not held a job for longer than two years because HE'S FRESH OUT OF UNIVERSITY. Come on love give the guy some credit. I've not held a job for two years, unless you count that zero hours minimum wage shit I held through university. Oh, and he is an ethnic minority, and we're white, but apparently that had nothing to do with it... she seemed like a nice person until then. 
"Officer, you look like you're not having a great day. Can I help?" 
Seriously. I'm what a fair number of folks might describe as "creepy old man". I'm a 40 white male with a beard and lack of facial expression. I also have a habit of analyzing my surroundings. (Call it professional inquiry or paranoia. Your pick.) I'm also a father and love helping kids. They have questions and I'm a walking Cliff's Notes for Wikipedia. Any time a kid in costume interacts with me, you better be sure that I respond to them as if they're actually that persona. She's a princess? It's all "your majesty" and such. Kid's dressed as Batman? You're goddamned right we're fighting crime. Heck, I once asked a ninja turtle for his autograph because I heard all of the good things he's doing for the city. The smile on his face alone was worth it. Kids love that sort of odd interaction. Stupid-ass parents crushing the imagination and dreams of kids. 
I agree with everything except the last part. I have known more than once where HR fired the guy cause it was easy to do. 
Absolutely. It's WAAAYY better for me if I don't really know most of the people. Trying to let loose always does the opposite for me. I can usually tell if I'm going to dance when I first walk in. It's like a chemical reaction in my body. Do I want to be sociable and dance? Do I want to find as many excused to go to the bathroom, bar, or other things to pass the time without sitting down looking like a anti-social autistic redditor? 
My senior year I was taking dual credit classes, so I was at the college in the morning and high school in the afternoon. After a while I finally got the hang of just getting up and walking out to use the restroom in college, but I would come back to the high school and catch hell from the teachers for not asking. Took a few weeks to get use to it. 
Those are the only two reasons I even have a Facebook still 
Wow, OP is the entire movie Kill Bill?! That's so cool. 
Funny because one time when I was working at a Chipotle. They made me come in sick but sent me back home when they saw my face. Nothing better than having to come in with just a couple of hours of rest, feeling sick AF, and being sent home after the fact... 
Because what they really mean is "I want to be the person talking with an audience. I don't care what I'm saying, I want the attention. I noticed you're not listening, and that give me the circunstances I"m looking for, so I'm going to shame you for checking out and not paying attention to me". Are they talking"to" the people around them, or are they talking "at" the people around them. 
In the right department, that might just get you hired at a cushy desk job... In charge of the evidence locker. 
That's where evidence comes in. If they fire you because you complained about sexual harassment they will have loads more to worry about than what's easiest. That would be an open and shut case in court. They can't fire you because you complain. 
Really too little too late imo. Instead of apologising for being fuck heads they should try not to be fuck heads in the first place 
I say #3 is for all of the stupid micro logins that you don't give a shit about, but don't want to have to remember usernames and passwords for. 
I'm surprised they sent you home. Our morning cook cut his hand deep and had to get stitches. Doc said not to use said hand extensively for 2 weeks or get it wet. Cook was told to be there in the morning or find another job. 
Every drug dealers dream job "hello checking in 4lbs of weed as evidence" "sounds good ill check that in" 3 lbs of Marijuana checked into evidence room 
The staff was amazing. By the end of our meal we had almost forgotten about the incident entirely. It definitely seemed like the waitress went above and beyond to make up for what happened even though she had absolutely nothing to do with it. And then the manager came up towards the end and asks my sister if she would like a dessert. Everyone was so cheerful and pleasant that it was impossible to stay in a bad mood. My dad gave the waitress a $50 tip and my grandpa felt so nice afterwards he gave her another $50. My sister hugged her. 
That is true, and I really felt guilty until proven innocent at the time. Unfortunately anytime I have dealt with the police I have felt like the guilty party, when I was actually not. 
Tell him to get what the doctor said in writing and be willing to go to the labour board 
"Our fine officers made an amazing bust, recovered 2 pounds of marijuana." 
Yay! This makes me so happy!! I can't imagine seeing someone that looks "scary" enough to assume the child they have with them was kidnapped or is being kidnapped. Maybe I'm just oblivious? I have 3 kids, I'm not super young (mid 30's) but I am short and thin so people always assume I am their nanny. I often get "help" or "advice" from women who are "more knowing" or comments like "just wait until you have your own babies!" It's annoying. I can't imagine how badly I would lose my shit if someone called the cops on me based on my looks. 
Those must have been some really horrendous reviews to kill his family. 
This is just entirely beyond my understanding. I don't know where to begin with this one. 
iirc, (and I have 0 interst in googling it because i don't want to see the picture again), he told them to keep him alive so they could study the effects of radiation on the body. i think his last word was "mother" which is about ten times worse. anyway, someone with a stronger stomach will have to confirm 
I believe that was from the' Have you ever killed someone in self defense' thread or something to that effect. He killed that dude. And I mean, who wouldn't. 
I was in a medically induced coma for a few days. All of those TV shows depicting coma dreams as a trope seem remarkably accurate. It all feels so real. I still struggle to differentiate what actually happened and what didn't. 
He worked for a IT company that was swallowed (I don't know if you say it like that in english) by the company I'm working for. Some of them were at a grill party at his place and are still feeling weird thinking about it. 
I watched this one. Haven't watched too many on this post, but this one I for sure did. It really creeped me out when she started running, even though she had bullets hit her. It was then I learned a little more about getting shot. Went on a binge on learning about this. People surviving for a few minutes before bleeding out. Awful. You don't see the bullets entering, you just... see her run... This one creeps me out for sure. 
A long time ago I used to enjoy watching shows like Forensic Files. This guy's story was on one of these types of shows and it was horrifying what he did to those women. I believe he had a girlfriend who lived with him and assisted him in his acts of depravity. The show showed the 'toy box' the man had built and holy shit. I couldn't believe it. Thankfully one girl escaped and the guy was arrested. 
That's way creepier than most of what was posted here. Gore isn't creepy. 
The one about David Kalac where he strangled his girlfriend, posted nude photos of her dead body, and left the body for her young son to find when he got home from school in Port Orchard, Washington happened more or less across the street from my house. When it came to light that this was real and he was on the loose, a friend called me panicking, wanting to know if I was home because the dude was still at large. I was not at home, but I was afraid to go back especially considering my other half was out of state for work and I was going home to an empty house. 
She was rescued with the other person and lived I believe 
The lostprophets were a local band near me and most of the girls in my year had a crush on him. Some of the stuff that now pops up on Facebook memories would be hilarious if it wasn't so tragic 
The worst bit for me is the end. The killer takes really careful aim and you can just about hear him say "Die fucker" to the guy he's already shot. Pulls the trigger - all you hear from the officer is a gentle exhale. The last shot for him directly in the eye and into the brain, killing him instantly - what you hear is his last ever breath. He was only in his early 20's iirc. 
Okay so I just read this and I'm thinking "Nix what the FUCK" How can he possibly think that an officer would tell him "make her go down on you" and that that it's part of a strip seach??? Only afterwards he thinks "hmm I think that was bad?" This guy pisses me off so fucking much holy shit Also I can't really say because I wasn't there but... why wouldn't Louise just.. leave??? I mean if she knew she wasnt guilty of anything then just don't comply and like, I don't know talk to another cop????? Jesus christ 
Well done for talking about an actual creepy video and not just straight up gore. That is bizarre though I guess she was just very mentally ill. 
It's called "Cooking with Huck Botko". Thankfully, it turned out to be false. 
Fuck. That's just so much overkill. What did the guy do that pissed them off so much? 
It's like, so hard to do anything about as well. It's clear he might be a pedo and thus a danger if he's getting off to a baby's soiled diaper, but at the same time he's not doing anything technically illegal to have him arrested for. It's a weird catch-22. 
The scary thing for me is that the intruder said "Hello?" - what would have happened if the guy had responded?! Everything about that encounter is oddly creepy. This guy has nearly clocked up 1000 hours of this. It has to be some form of meditation or something, he seems pretty nice otherwise 
I thought he asked the doctors to let him die. Others may have told the medical team to keep him alive for studies though. 
Locations are off by a lot. New York has cams from Colorado. 
Found my city and there was a live feed of the penguins at the zoo and two angles on what looks like an animal shelter's dog park. OP YOU LIED TO ME, THIS IS CUTE NOT CREEPY. 
Also, if I remember correctly, quite a few family members and other people were aware of the goings-on and simply did nothing about it. 
I've felt longing/sadness just from waking up from a normal dream that was really awesome before, so I can't imagine the pain of being in that reality for MONTHS or even YEARS and then being ripped out. 
I don't get it either. But what really gets me is how she, the victim, was essentially blamed by some of her community, as well as plenty of online commentators, for her own rape. I wasn't too phased by the details of the crime itself. Being on the internet starts to desensitise you to those kinds of horrors. But I would have thought that the laws and her community would have been there for her to give her some semblance of justice and help. Instead the perpetrators were punished at the minimum extent of the law and she was treated horribly. It's no wonder that after so many cases, that the process has come to be colloquially called The Second Rape. I'm just wondering how much more of this is going to happen before I become desensitised to this too. 
Haha, "swallowed" is perhaps especially appropriate in this case... 
On a related note, I'm looking forward to seeing that movie about the teenagers who try to rob a blind guy and he ends up trapping them in his house and hunting them down, but I forget the name. 
The thing is he was trying to use the light on his camera to get people to the other exits. In the video you see him run around the building and shine the light in the side door/emergency exit, but at that point it was too late. People were panicked and just trying to get out. 
Exactly, he the way he was pointing the gun at them for a good second or two before he just opened up was chilling. 
I remember seeing the footage from the news camera showing the suspect shooting them but you couldn't even see he was also recording it so it was a huge shock when I found his Twitter and it came up with the notification to say there was a new tweet. When I clicked to load the tweet it started playing the video and I thought it was going to be a blurry, shaky video someone else filmed from a distance. I had this absolute awful feeling of dread going through me when he revealed the gun and aimed it at the woman for about 5 seconds before lowering it and waiting for the cameraman to turn around. I'll never forget that video. What a horrible human he was. 
As if his girlfriend helping him wasn't bad enough, his daughter helped him kidnap at least one woman. Had enough Reddit today? This thread is depressing. 
I have to agree. The creepy music, the children crying, and the longer you listen to it the quieter it gets... doesn't get much more creepy than that. 
The man was Jerome Rodale. The episode never aired. During the interview he bragged that he was in great health and that he would live to see 100. He appeared to fall asleep while Cavett was talking to his next guest. Cavett quipped "are we boring you Mr. Rodale?". When he didn't respond it was soon discovered that he had died. 
On the flip side though, imagine the agony of dying, staring into a room full of strangers looking at you laughing hysterically. 
Define spooked? This is the one time spoilers are wanted! 
essentially it's the guy who set the building on fire, filming it on fire and saying things like "ohhh yeah look at that blaze!" in a creepy voice. the end is also slightly spoopy because he is dressed up as a vampire. 
If I remember correctly, he was specifically afraid they would come after his wife and daughter :( 
Different killers, btw. David Parker Ray is "The Toy-Box Killer." 
I have a friend who works in police dispatch - very emotionally strong guy. But on more than one occasion he's called me up and said "let's get a drink, I need to talk to someone." He's related a few stories of calls he's taken that were particularly rough and have really hit hard for him. And this from one of the emotionally toughest people I know. It has its days. 
If I remember correctly, if he was convicted then he would have lost his Pennsylvania State pension valued at about $1mil. By killing himself, he could not be convicted and his wife could collect the pension. After this incident, the state changed that rule to prevent this from happening in the future. 
He was a Pennsylvania state Treasurer in the 80s that was accused of and convicted for accepting a bribe during his tenure. A man named William T. Smith was behind the bribe (forgive me - I don't know how he was involved exactly) and lied under oath saying Dwyer did accept the bribe. Dwyer maintained his innocence throughout the conviction but many believed he was behind it due to this false testimony. He held a press conference on Jan. 22, 1987 where he again said he was innocent, handed out a bunch of suicide letters, then pulled a gun out of an envelope and shot himself. As someone else mentioned he would have lost his pension and been fined a lot of money if convicted so he shot himself in order to have his wife and kids collect the money. 
I'm guessing someone compromised his account and they're just trolling for shock content. 
He has his own subreddit which links to his website that he owned at the time. 
If memory serves the friend looking for help fell off a cliff. I think. 
Yep, Cracked made it look like it was one psycho just muttering endlessly to herself, but it was Cracked readers who made it worse. They flooded it with the usual ass-end internet bullshit like goatse and she shut it down. It was basically just a pre-Tumblr fandom news tracker, not a discussion board at all, but humans just can't resist the opportunity to ruin someone else's day. 
She's wet as water and probably rubbing it against her you know ;) 
It's actually not. This is an excerpt from a documentary. There are a number of people like this around the world. IIRC the other woman in that first clip was an exceptional archer and had a relationship with her bow, but lost the passion and the skill once they "broke up". 
I think I must live near you coz lostprophets were local to me too! Loads of my friends would drool over Ian Watkins and dream about him and when the news dropped that he's a sick cunt they refused to believe it! One particular friend still posts stuff about missing him(I don't have Facebook but get told by other friends) 
Its a guy getting pounded by a horse. The horse went balls deep. I think the guy ended up dying from the damage cause by being banged by a horse. 
The cartel is all about overkill... They regularly butcher people and skin people as a warning. Please consider the effort that goes into skinning a human being. That's how messed up they are... And they'll leave the bodies in the streets to make sure they get found 
There is an interview with him regarding this project, I'm sure if you search around you'll find it. It's performance art. 
His sister donated stem cells so it seems his family was actively trying to revive him. But it was literally hopeless. 
I believe all four boys were unrelated but the above poster is correct; all four were released and it looks like they went on to lead more violent lives of crime. Terrible. 
What happened to that girl is exactly why so many rape victims stay silent. 
That's one of the worst cases I've seen of it. From the victim's statement to the letter written by Brock's father. He actually pretty much got away with it too, didn't he? 
Don't Breathe. It was pretty good. More of a thriller than anything. Pretty good, ngl 
Yeah he's not thinking "ah at least I'm going out doing what I love" in his finial moments he's thinking, "why won't these people stop laughing and fucking help me?!?" 
that was fucked. i think later that day her son came home from school and found her body 
The one that always gets me is "it will be suicide by cop." 
That vampire thing at the end made me laugh for some reason. 
So he opted out? "Welp, you two are on yer own. Gl!" 
DPR's transcript is next-level terrifying too. It totally ended my fascination for the morbid. 
Conditioned to watch people blow their brains out you are, young padawan. 
He was convicted but he killed himself before sentencing which protected his pension. 
I read like two thirds of his manifesto before I gave up because it was so long. Dude remembered every insignificant detail from his childhood/teens, and was bitter about most of it. 
I just hope username doesn't check out maybe you are him 
You sometimes have to question if it's your time when you fall off a ledge, survive and then die falling off a cliff while you look for help. What an absolutely terrible way to die. 
That's probably the best time to try parachuting into their garden. Instant cult leader, none of the set up effort. 
Jim Jones shot himself in the head while hundreds of his followers were drinking cyanide. Much different circumstances, obviously, but it does happen. 
Oh, yeah, Cracked! --what happened to Cracked is the creepiest thing that happened on the internet that's still available to see. 
Sounded like someone minding their own business had something they loved 4chan'd 
The woman who was in a relationship with the bow actually ended up "marrying" the Eiffel Tower if my memory serves me correctly! 
It was so gross and awful. His password was ifuckkids. Wtf is wrong with people? 
I am honestly traumatized by this description alone. 
Max Headroom was mere steps away from being porn. It was complete with a maid spanking his bare ass. 
I'll see if I can hunt that down! Performance art would make sense, he's made his imprint on the internet pretty firmly and it takes some serious dedication to churn out this kind of volume of sitting and smiling. Plenty of people devote much more time to far less memorable endeavours! 
Yeah, six months, released after three for "good behaviour." And now he's doing a speaking tour about "the dangers of drinking and promiscuity" **vomits** 
Even more interesting fact: the perpetrator is a free man today and living in the mainland United States. Not only did he not receive "life without", he actually passed a parole board. 
It was probably closer to "Huh, so this is how I go". At least those were my thoughts the couple of times I thought I was going to die. 
It wasnt though... There was no suicide by cop. 
Yeah, I hear it's a pretty common coping mechanism to get fixated on the mortality of others. I'm glad to be mostly past it now, though. Sorry about your loss, as well. 
I believe his line of thinking was that they wouldn't take revenge on him by coming after his wife and daughter if they couldn't hurt him by forcing him to experience losing them. He thought he was protecting his wife and daughter by killing himself. 
It only struck me just now that it also ended mine. I wasn't all that affected by it as I was reading it, but I definitely stopped looking for or at shit like that. 
"I AM YOUR GOD." "FETCH ME HOTPOCKETS" "..b...but how many m'lord?" ".....all of them...." 
Pretty sure Jim Jones didn't kill himself because he was a true believer. His cult killed a Congressman. He probably figured it's better to kill himself now rather than have the goddam US army bearing down on you. Most of the people who drank the flavor-aid were also supposedly forced at gun point. Basically, the Jim Jones thing is less Heaven's Gate and more Hitler in a bunker. 
Actually she was in a relationship with her bow, she then cheated on the first bow with another bow...that looked exactly the same. Then she dumped that bow and "married" the Eiffel Tower. In the documentary she even starts grinding against the Eiffel Tower telling it how much she loves it whilst people walk around. Serious time tho, she was in the USAFA and was sexually assaulted by another cadet but stopped it by using a training sword. She was then dismissed from the USAFA for having a personality disorder. In her own words "I really felt that the only way for me to sleep is if I was holding onto something, like my sword, because that was the one thing that protected me. And it just got worse,". I'm guessing her complete trust in men was broken and being dismissed didn't help that. So now she can only feel connections to things she believes can protect her when really she protected herself. Sad stuff really. 
It was illegal to penetrate an animal just not illegal to get penetrated by one. This changed that and made both forms illegal. 
id much rather explain porn to my kid then the dude who just got his head sawed off, so id say it was basicly harmless. 
He's gotta be getting *something* out of it. A thousand hours of sitting and smiling into a camera? Guy's meditating even if he doesn't know it. 
Nah probably anybody watch it...People just look at parts of the video to see if something changes at the end and close it. If he sees something weird, he says it, a random youtuber makes a video, the video gains views and people get interested about why the video has so many views and in the comments see the reason... Althought it would be very interesting to see his analytics to know if someone sees it completely 
That's interesting, I am thinking back to my one experience and I don't recall thinking anything about "this is how I go" so much as, "no, I don't want to die". 
He did, however, successfully evade Portland police in a high speed chase. He was driving a KIA. WTF. 
Your imagination will scare you more than anything you will ever see. Think about the movie "Psycho". What do you see? Shower curtain, shower head, knife, etc. Just flashes of things, right? An old black-and-white movie can scare people enough to make them avoid showering - and it's mostly their imagination. 
Peanutbutterjelly peanutbutterjelly peanutbutterjelly with a horse's dick. 
I will forever have just one headphone in my ear at all times, now. 
Casual culting sounds like the millennial way to religion. Spend a weekend seeing if your space god is real. If not? Go home try again 
Also, how firmly he seems to believe everything the cult tought him even though there's no one around anymore. 
Thats really eerie, he is the last one of them and still feels like he belongs or is part of something bigger. 
What's a really crazy thought to me is that no one knows who it is. That means there's one person left from a suicide cult left who has a job, who probably has friends. He has people he works and interacts with. And they really have no idea. It's a weird thought of going to the bar with a friend, and not knowing that he was connected to such a big event like that. 
Hawaii you get a lei, Nevada you get a lay. And a credit card bill. 
I lived in Conway for two years during grad school and this is so true it hurts. 
Or ice cream in a cake cone. I recently found out from a friend who's been a bunch of different places that Indiana is somewhat unique for its love of little ice cream places. 
Well, technically, there is no airport in the District of Columbia, so I guess it's a non-issue. 
Wow that'd be awesome. Good maple syrup is expensive... 
You will also get a bumper sticker that reads: Virginia is for lovers *and* brochures to all of the battlefields. 
Also, in accordance with Prop 65, we must warn you that this piece of paper contains known carcinogens too. So does the person handing it to you. 
You forgot the hotdish, oh and it take awhile to leave the airport, long goodbyes and all. 
Then you take that V8 and do burnouts in a Food Lion parking lot 
Metro-North ticket to NYC. You're probably planning on heading there anyway 
Thank you for not just saying "Potato". There are never any clever answers for questions like these when it comes to Idaho. You did a great job, buddy. 
Orange juice. Seriously. Go to a welcome center in Florida and they give you a cup of orange juice. 
Followed by a piece of scrapple and a sweaty pretzel. 
You mean chile, not chili. Id add some sopapillas too. 
I was gonna say water, but yours is probably more merciful. 
I will agree with you, lately tho the trend I've been noticing isn't so much Michigan but the Great Lakes. Rear window decals seem to highlight the Lakes more so than the state. 
I was thinking that we would just throw a fish at you as you exit the plane, no warning, and then we give you an umbrella so we know who the tourists are. 
Oh fuck, Bob Evans. So spot on. My mom and I went to "Bob's" for breakfast every Saturday for years. I would include an Amish rocking chair as well. 
A free public transit ticket into the city (real) Bread bowl of chowder (I wish) Sox Cap (After a home win) 
Keychain size, of course, King Nick is keeping the full size trophies. 
And they'd have a sticker that says "warning this product may contain a chemical known to the state of California to cause cancer or birth defects" 
Florida used to have free orange juice at the welcome centers near the state line. 
And for those transplanting: A dog, a Subaru, and a bong. 
Hoosier here, I live in a city with many different ice cream shops. We have a "Let's Spoon", an "Urban Swirl", a "Dari Q" (different than Dairy Queen), a "Bonnie Doon", a "Dairy Fair", and obviously the normal fast food services with ice cream and frozen yogurt products like Dairy Queen, McDonald's, Wendy's, Burger King, and sit-down restaurants that serve their own form of deserts. I could probably go to a popeye's or Taco Bell around here and order ice cream. The only restaurants that don't sell ice cream are pizza joints. 
Commercial planes aren't even allowed in the airspace IIRC 
But you can't take the metro because it is currently on fire. 
Salpeppekechup I always say no but I get it half the time anyway 
It is, but you have to live in alaska for 1 full year before you can qualify for it. It is generally between $900-1100. It is called the permanent fund dividend and it's a big deal. To the point that places have banners and commercials sort of like labor or memorial day sales and whatnot, but for your PFD. 
You either gotta fish it yourself or pay a lot for it. 
I think the fat guy wearing the "made in Detroit" hoodie, Tigers hat, camo cargo shorts, and old basketball shoes while walking down the road in the dead of winter should be the state bird. As a side note, a few days ago I saw a guy wearing a 2 piece "Bad Boys" sweat suit! That's from when the Pistons won the championships almost 30 years ago! 
So I ordered some stuff for my work, and it had a sticker on it talking about "the State of California recognizes that this product contains chemicals known to cause cancer" and the first thought in my head was "good thing I'm not in California". I'm an idiot. 
There's no penalty to posting the sign when it isn't needed, and there's hefty fines for not having one when you need it. This means the signs are posted everywhere. No new information is learned, no one is helped, and predatory lawyers make money on lawsuits. The end. 
Free range paper. There's only 50 trees on a 70 acre lot, allowing them to roam freely and truly ejoy their lives. 
Before you can leave the plane you have to have a two hour conversation with the pilot where you both constantly mention that you better get going. 
Here in Canada we basically consider them Canada Jr. If they ever ditched the US we'd welcome Minnesota in a heartbeat. 
It's hit or miss. I didn't even break out the snowblower last year. 
Makes you wonder who was the first person to say, "I'm gonna peal the armor off this pinchy, red, sea bug and eat what's inside."? 
Fuck man I wish I could get natty bo' here in louisiana. My buddy is in baltimore and I'm begging him to bring some back. 
I hear you. Really, really hear you. I was born in DC, but lived in Montgomery County for the first 18 years of life, moved to PG when I went to UMD and didn't leave for 20 years while I raised a family, then moved all the way out past Cumberland a little over a year ago. I grew up going to OC *and* camping out by Deep Creek. And you're right, Maryland is **amazing** and diverse, and so much more than a tasty spice blend. But then, how do we hand all of *that* to visitors coming in through BWI? 
When I vote in Illinois elections, the deciding factor is usually who I think is least likely to be in jail ten years from now. 
"Hi, I'm Eric Greitens. I understand the vast majority of this state vote their party, and I'm in the majority party, so I really don't need to say anything. But I do have this big-ass minigun. I'll just shoot that for the entirety of the ad. Vote for me cause I'll motherfucking kill everybody else with this 'ere Bertha." *BRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRT* 
The Rams leaving is like your dead-beat 22 year old finally leaving house. He was such a great kid many years back, but after a while he lost it. You love him but he wasn't good for anything. You'll miss him. 
Or just park it in the Walmart lot and listen to shitty music with your friends. 
Or a commuter rail ticket to Boston. Or a beach towel for your trip to Cape Cod. There's tons of places worth driving through CT for. 
I once saw tourists when I was driving through Hartford one day. They had a camera and suitcases and they didn't have business clothes. To this day I can't figure out who would be a tourist in Hartford, there's nothing to do. 
It's cause Idaho has three things in excess in my experience. Potatoes, mormons, and guns. But Utah and Texas already have a claim on those last two so really potato jokes are all we got 
I was so confused when I moved to Washington from Florida. I couldn't find the display in the grocery stores with all the orange juice... 
and some kool aid... **THATS RIGHT AMERICA!** **WITHOUT NEBRASKA; YOUR CHILDREN WOULD BE SKINNY AND DIABETES FREE!** **YOU NEED US!** 
This is the PA answer I Believe to be the most accurate. 
Only 34 potholes on the runway? Must not be flying into Harrisburg. 
I live in Atlanta so I've never had this issue lol 
It has a fucking monorail and Chick-Fil-a, what else do you need? 
Visited NOLA for the first time this year and our Airbnb hosts gave us a trash bag full of beads. We ended up throwing them at people during one of the day drinking holidays at my college when we got back. 
Maybe that potion from Romeo and Juliette would be best. Just knock yourself out from July to October 
It's like a thousand Flagstaffians voices screaming in anguish were suddenly silenced as they died in summer traffic on Milton rd clogged up from PHX cool down folks 
You are doing it wrong. You are supposed to bike. 
This is what I was going to say. More specifically, a growler of a local IPA, chosen from a 2+ page list. There's a separate book you can use if you want to know where any of these breweries got their hops, the history of said brewery, and how many employees they have. 
hand you a starbucks and an umbrella, then throw a fish at you. 
Welcome to Eastern WA. We got nukes, prisoners, nerve gas, and vineyards. 
don't forget a beer from any local microbrew and a Hilton Head Island bumper sticker because everyone in Ohio will wind up there at some point. Those things are everywhere 
Not going to happen anymore.... We're going to mail it to you now. 
Fuckin' Prop 65. The only thing it did was make money for sign and sticker printers. 
And sometimes, people pick wrong and end up in Fresno. 
You're the first person to ever comment on it. Ha-ha. 
Fuck im a stereotype.... ahh fuck it i love my life. 
If you land in Northern Virginia, you are immediately handed a ticket for driving in the HOV lanes, during rush hour, with only you in the car. To be on the safe side they will also issue a ticket for expired inspection tag. You will then be issued directions to and a map of Tyson's Corner Mall. You will be given an application for an ez-pass and be forced to sign up for it regardless of the length of your stay. You try to explain to anyone who will listen that you don't need an ez-pass. I don't want to pay to drive in special lanes. All anyone will say to you is: YOU'LL PAY. THEY ALL PAY. The next day as you are stuck on 95 at 7:00 pm watching cars flying past you in the ez-pass speed lanes. You know tomorrow that you will pay. THEY ALL PAY. 
Yep, so if you land in DC, you're likely POTUS, so you get a salute. 
It would've been over $2K this year, but Gov. Walker capped it at $1K because AK can't agree on a budget and we've had years where it was over $3K. The dividend calculation is based on the number of eligible Alaskan applicants in a dividend year and half of the statutory net income averaged over the five most recent fiscal years. ... The Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation is responsible for investment of the fund's principal balance. 
I like to think it's a 'thank you' for holding the north. 
I had the exact same experience with some grill brushes I restock. 
And then drive away in your rusty Oldsmobile that your parents handed down to you in high school. 
Can we make this happen in about a month after the elections are over Signed, MN Resident 
There's certain things about Maryland that you really can't capture anywhere else. I grew up way out in Montgomery County and nothing makes me happier than a hot dog from the gas station in Sunshine. 
A dead-beat 22 year old would be the best mascot for LA 
I visited Hartford this past May! I honestly had so much fun. I saw a bunch of the historical houses, the Elizabeth Park Rose Garden, and there were some really good restaurants in the downtown area. I would 100% go back and would want to stay even longer than I had stayed. It's probably because I'm from SoCal and CT is *so* different from what I'm used to, so I found everything to be very beautiful and peaceful! So there's my two cents as a recent Hartford tourist! :) 
Wait, the Orange juice aisle isn't a normal thing? 
I guess 20 years is a long time to be away. I'd be happy with a brat, some custard, and oakland gyro. 
At the Pittsburgh airport you get a Primanti's sandwich and a Terrible Towel, and a briefing on the most recent Steeler's game so you have something to discuss with the locals. 
We just moved to Seattle seven months ago, and at first I thought the umbrella thing was an exaggeration. Then I went to Target the other day in pouring rain and no one had umbrellas. Target put a display right by the front of the store and each spot was full. No one wanted them. I love this city and its pointless stubbornness. I feel like I fit in so well. 
Seriously though, why Hilton Head? I littleraly just had some family move there and they said it's full of Ohioans. 
Prop 65 desensitized me to cancer warnings because holy fuck everywhere I go or everything I eat or do has that warning now Drive a car? Cancer. Buy some dishes? Cancer. Go to the grocery store? Cancer. Eat out? Cancer. Get some home improvement stuff? Cancer. 
Dear god is that the truth. Born and lived most of my life in Fresno, but lived and traveled up and down the state at various times. The only towns more miserable than Fresno are the other god-forsaken central valley towns that don't even warrant mention. 
It helps that I used to be LDS. Well, technically I still am, as my records are still there. My friend in Seminary would always hum If I Could Hie To Kolob... 
A lot of it is how amazing the property taxes, house prices, job growth, etc. Des Moines is constantly rated one of the best places to live because of that 
I've seen two vehicles in DC airspace in an unusual day. Space shuttle discovery was flown through DC air in 2012. On the same day, my job had a military expo. We had a V22 Osprey land inside Fort McNair. It was pretty strange to see two things in DC air on the same day. But DCA is still just right around the corner. 
I live in Pennsylvania. Get to watch the migratory patterns of these birds. You should join me one of these times 
You'd think someone who caps the free money all voters get won't see a second term though, at least. That sounds less popular than banning puppies. 
That you have to keep adding coolant to. This hits really close to home. 
I second this motion. We already get the weather, why not? -also another Minnesota resident 
At PIA your gift is to be greeted by George Washington, Franco Harris, and a dinosaur. 
So like an in state snowbird? Does that mean your driving isnt bad but not amazing either? 
It rarely rains hard enough for us to care is all. We have better things to do than carry around an umbrella, that we MIGHT need on over half the days of the year, for what is likely a slight drizzle. I hope you're enjoying the area though :) 
My grandma used to say, "dont worry about it, were livin on Kolob time" Wise words. 
I left Des Moines at 22 years old. I was born there. Not going back. All my classmates are working desk jobs in insurance. Sure they have a nice little suburban home and a couple babies by now, but I'm currently listening to my apartment neighbor argue with his wife about food stamps, while the couple above me has incessant sex, and as I stomp out a few roaches in this overcrowded overpriced glorified Section 8 I call my "studio." But yea! Life is good here.... 
This and Christopher's intervention are two of the funniest moments from the series. 
He understands he will likely be a one term Gov. Says it's the right decision though. There's no state income tax, so the government runs on the back of the oil industry. Less production and low prices have caused big budget shortfalls. His case is that if we don't cap it, the PFDs will be gone very soon. He says we can stretch it out this way and there's new oil field discoveries in the works. 
i could learn to ride a moose to work - Twin cities resident (MN resident) 
I'm going to a camo-themed wedding next week compete with bouttineres made out of bullet shells 
Truth. But also ordering a family sized cheese curd at culvers and eating all of it by yourself in one sitting is a good choice. 
Shhhh. Can't let the word get out that the rain here isn't actually that bad. We don't need anymore people moving here. The approved narrative is "Seattle rains so much you will never be dry again and mold will start to grow inside your soul. Rent prices are more than most mortgages Every road is permanently clogged with traffic because Salmon trucks keep flipping over on the highway. Also we have no (men's) basketball team." 
Yea that's Iowa, you either settle in and live out a nice quiet life or you go out and try something new. 
Could you imagine 35W filled with moose instead of cars!? At least all the idiots will be able to hear me when I cuss them out for not knowing what they're doing. XD 
Order the cheese curds, then sprinkle them on your Butter Burger. It's a whole new level of feeling the primal link between man and cow. 
It's so your hand doesn't get cold, its only 26out, the ice won't melt. 
Wait...God lives in space in Mormonism? That's pretty neat. 
Yup. I suppose it makes sense when you consider that Mormons believe God was once like us, and that we all have the potential to become like God someday. 
I can't believe someone else out there knows that. My dad pokes fun at some of the Mormons we know (we live in Utah, the look of disgust mentioned in the OC is a real thing) and they don't really like to acknowledge that its a thing. But maybe that's just the ones *we* know. SLC is much more lax than down here in the Valley. 
This was who I was coming here to say. His tombstone has his entropy equation carved in it, and it was only a few years later he was proven right. 
Other chemists: "Wow, this guy just goes on and on about his shitty theory." "Yeah, Avogadro's constant." 
Same with Hemingway. A lot of it came from how much time he was spending in Cuba; he felt like he was always being followed and it contributed to his mental decline at the end of his life. Nobody believed him until they declassified some of the documents they kept of him 
I just use mine to look at pictures of cats and troll on internet strangers. Close enough? 
Interesting. Their proposed solution was public transportation I assume? 
And let's not forget: he made that yearbook quote prediction **in 1993,** which is quite a bit more impressive than making it, say, two years ago. 
he's been doing great things and people are recognizing more and more! 
Put the emphasis on excessively. He was recently unbanned, but then only lasted a couple days because he started spamming unrelated threads with Jokic shit again. He can't help himself, he's legit obsessed. Not everyone disagreed with him, though. Lots of people recognised that he was making some great points, but it was so fucking tiring to see him turn up in every thread talking about Jokic. Thread about Dirk Nowitzki having a great night? There's eg saying Jokic had a better rookie season. DeMarcus Cousins scores a triple double? There's eg saying Jokic will average 20/15/5 for his career, better than Cousins. If decide to check the new queue, eg was there every half hour, posting some bait question like "is Jokic better than Anthony Davis his rookie season?" Inside was nothing but Jokic facts. It was ever present, so much so that the mods had to make a new rule just so they could ban him. 
I was in high school at the time and watched her performance live. It was all anyone at the school talked about the next day. Until now I had NO IDEA she was protesting child molestation in the church. I thought she was just against the Catholic Church in general. 
"Blue or red." "Orchid purple." "No. You can pick blue or red". "Hmmm..... Salmon." "That's not blue or red. You can have either blue or red." "Magenta." "I don't know what that is. Blue or red." "Indigo." "BLUE OR RED DAMNIT." "Turquoise." ".....Fine." 
My parents when I was 15: You have to be financially responsible Me at 25: Wait what? 
Was going to post this but you beat me to it. Washington's farewell speech is fantastic. Congress reads it at least every time there's an outgoing president, but I wish they'd take t more to heart. 
It's really fucked up how everything we knew about nutrition in the 80s and 90s was wrong. Don't drink milk, drink juice. When you do drink milk, drink skim, not whole. Eat lots of carbs. Use margarine, not butter. Use vegetable shortening, not lard. Avoid eggs. 
As someone who has spent many hours of their life learning and use the periodic table, it always astounds me at how perfectly the table is set up, each position on the period table describes so many things about an element that even before discovering the element, we could determe many of the characteristics. I never thought about it, but f we did come into contact with another civilization, they truly would have practically the same setup because of how fundamental and absolute the periodic table is. My mind is a little blown right now. 
Well, I know my life's goal now. Be so right about something I can flaunt it openly and no one can say shit. 
That's why. Henry wasn't very charismatic. He is a tech guy. Not a people's person. 
Carving the equation for entropy into stone is somewhat ironic, I feel. 
I went to Hemingway's house in Cuba this year which had this outhouse tower building. Apparently he used the top room to focus on writing and for this reason his wife was not allowed anywhere near it. The bottom room however was used to house his mistress. Apparently the mistress killed herself shortly after he did. 
"Self-regulation" AHAHAHAHAHAHAHHHHHAAAAASSAAHhabababBHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAH I can't laugh because I'm in the hospital and a "lol" would be too tame. Those regulatory committees' sole purpose was to deceive the public. 
Coincidentally, CFCs and leaded petrol were invented by the same man 
Damn, I want to add this to the joke about Heisenberg, Schrodinger and Ohm. 
I believe that we had the same issue with J Harlen Bretz and the Glacial Lake Missoula floods in the Pacific Northwest. 
Jim was facing jail time for allegedly whipping out his dick on stage in Florida. 
Because everyone in the comments below him were so smug about what an obnoxious idiot he must be for making such a prediction. 
It sounds like he had a pretty good idea. I bet if you went back and showed him one he'd be like "dude, that's what I JUST said." 
But isn't that the average brain? The problem as in assuming it would be an above average brain. 
"You still want to work for us, right? So please, let us kill our astronauts." 
There's a lesson to be learned here, but I can't put my finger on it. 
They always seem to see posthumous success. Like artists! 
It's really the perfect scenario. There's nothing that will stop the supposed missiles either way, so you're either right or you won't be around to find out you're wrong. 
Those with high oxidation / smoke points, keeping the cooking temperature below that. Peanut oil is good. Soy even at room temperature oxidizes. 
That's simultaneously so obvious that it seems totally made up, and feels stupid not to have noticed before. TIL, thanks. 
Yes, but more importantly, building smarter cities. If your grocery store is a 5 minute walk away, you don't necessarily need your car anymore to get there! With the industrial revolution, cities became noisy and dirty and we justifiably ran from them. It made sense at the time, but we pushed it a little bit too far. Now everything is so far apart and segregated that you have to travel huge distances to get to where you need to go. 
Everyone up North knew. They'd tell their kids to stay away from Savile. He came to my school down South in '00 or '01, and letters went home telling parents to stay with their children at all times. It was hardly a secret, which made the general public's shock very surprising. It was like they'd just noticed the moon or something. 
"Oh lighten up Michael. Teaching little Frankie here a little reading and writing is good for him, plus it lets him help with buying food and keeping up with the household money." "Didn't we talk about how that was going to be your responsibility from now on?" "I tried but you know how writing makes my carpel tunnel flare up. Besides what's the big deal? It's not like teaching one slave to read and write is going to somehow lead to the downfall of all slavery." Ron Howard voice over: That's exactly what happened. 
Jesus Christ I scrolled through his history and you weren't kidding. If he disappears one day we can all tell the cops who to question first. 
Oh, that's why googling it showed only 6 results including this thread. 
Fact. The appropriate age at which to be murdered was not achieved. 
Literally until this very moment I had assumed it was about the Pope's treatment of Ireland. 
Yeah if I'm the opposite side to Madonna on a subject then I know I'm on the right path. 
My parents when I was 15: You have to be financially responsible Me at 25: Wait what? Me at 30: hmmm...should i get the Nintendo Switch? Or should I save up and go for a PC upgrade and get the VIVE? 
Plot twist: Life is hard, but the homework was irrelevant. 
The thrust of his speech wasn't that America should never use its military. It was that America should make decisions for its military, not the other way around. (Note: not condoning a lot of shit the U.S. got up to in the 1950's and 1960's) 
Similar thing happened with lead industry in the US in the 20th century. Big lead paid a lot of money fighting science and scientists that showed having lead in gasoline, paint, etc. was bad for people, especially children. Not unlike big tobacco either. 
You can thank the nature of valence electrons for that. 
Having worked in a few gigantic corporations, some of the largest in the world, it's terrifying how much is run on a whim. Pretty much every major trend in tech (yeah, there are a few major developments, but fewer than you might think) is more of the same, with better marketing. Everybody is "faking it until they make it" but they never "make" it. 
Thomas Midgely, Jr. He's like the Lex Luthor to Patterson's Superman (or more like Clark Kent actually) 
In Japanese, the same verb that is used for the cherry blossoms falling and scattering also means "to die a noble death" or "to die in battle". 
Newton, Pascal, Heisenberg and Einstein are playing a game of hide and seek. Einstein closes his eyes an counts to ten. As he does it, Pascal goes off to hide, Heisenberg begins shouting his exact velocity, and Newton draws a 1m by 1m square around him. When Einstein opens his eyes, he sees Heisenberg, but can not find him because he knows Heisenberg's exact velocity. He then spots Newton, who then states "You have not found Newton, you've found one Newton per square meter. You've found Pascal!" 
Likely the guilt is because he wasnt able to convince people of a tragedy that was just about to unfold. I agree he shouldnt feel guilty but he likely felt as if he could have done more. 
Could you imagine this happening today? All it would have taken would be a post to social media and he could have gotten it stopped. But then it would have been career suicide, because no one would have acknowledged he was right. 
I wish he had just replied "Fuck off, nerd." *Not because I have any problems with LARPers, it looks like fun, but it would have been hilarious* 
Zenimax sued them for 4 billion. Verdict awarded 500 million and rejected the most serious claims. 
TIL the "perfect scenario" is being disintegrated by nukes or not. 
I think it's because "air=aria" kinda sounds like somebody trying to fake their way through a foreign language, like adding -o to the end of everything to make it "Spanish". "El air-o make you sick-o." 
Why was he still invited to your school even when the school clearly knew enough to send letters to parents? 
Or as an IASIP episode where Sweet Dee teaches the slave to read. "Oh come on Dennis, teaching a slave to read won't make them want to escape!" The Gang Ends Slavery 
May not have been as right then, but with advertising profiles built out of purchasing history, Internet browsing habits, and all kinds of other things, he is definitely right about it now 
Yeah, that's just for modern murderers. For those of us that follow the old school they were both long past prime murdering age. 
Alternatively, he could have lost weight and become the modern face of Nutrisystem or some other weight loss crap. Can't you just see him on the infomercials? 
"On this land upon which Germany once stood, we shall salt the earth with the salt produced by the French military since the Franco-Prussian War." 
Well it was about the churches treatment of Irish children 
No one asked her. She was banned and ignored. Frank Sinatra threatened her with violence. 
During the election Madonna said she was giving out blow jobs for Hilary votes. I wonder if that had the opposite reaction and people voted trump instead 
Hey, at least you're saving up for something instead of using credit card debt! 
the homework is irrelevant, developing discipline is absolutely crucial. 
CFCs and leaded petrol were invented by the same guy, making him the single most ecologically harmful person who has ever lived. 
yeah but valence electrons is an insane simplification of what actually goes on. So it's still pretty lucky that everything lines up (so far) 
Couldn't agree more, when politicians scream how inefficient Gov't is, I think to myself, "Have these people never worked in corporate America?". I can't tell you how many projects I have worked on where they are canceled 3-5 million in because the project owner/champion left to go to another company. Quickly followed by the new guy wanting to go his own way. Or the time we dropped six million into a data center only to be told the DC was getting closed and all equipment moved to the DC in Dallas within 18 months of the build. 
The man that did more harm to the earth than anyone else. 
Einstein integrates over the square meter and nails Newton. By that time his observation of Heisenberg has re-localized him and he gets him too. Pascal wins by not being cute about it and playing the freaking game. 
Plus, his username checks out: u/Pointing_Out_Irony 
Reminds me of an old Greek myth, where some woman was cursed to foresee great tragedies, but no one would listen to her and she'd have to watch people die. Super depressing. 
That's the sticky wicket of this kind of thing. Had they listened and scrubbed the launch, no one would every really know that he was right. They could've looked at the data and said "maybe", but not know 100%. 
That would have literally turned the crowd back on his side for the hilarity value alone. 
I don't care what the translator dictionary says, "el barco" (boat) still means "dog" to me. 
It probably wasn't the school's decision. Savile was so powerful he got given the keys to the most secure mental hospital in the country, just because he was Jimmy Savile. He really outdid himself in Broadmoor, even the corpses of deceased patients weren't safe... Besides, the headmaster and two other teachers were sentenced for sex assaults on children during Operation Yewtree, so they were probably in cahoots. 
It wasn't Dicks fault our oil was underneath their sand. edit, this post was sarcastic in case you missed it. 
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie; can't you see what your weight loss supplements have done to me? 
As an EMT in Saint cloud, can confirm. Lots of old af people who's weight don't support their birthdays. 
If an injury has to be done to a man it should be so severe that his vengeance need not be feared 
Hmm....never looked at it this way. Gonna store this one away to use on my kid 
Not just person, the most influential single *organism* to ever exist. 
I hated chemistry for two reasons: The rules contradict each other (since they're simplifications) The next advanced chemistry class you take they say "remember all that stuff in the previous class? Total bullshit" 
My favorite story: I was working at a tech startup (hardware) that was actually just repackaging Asian made hardware with a minorly "disruptive" firmware. The CEO had this grand plan to go into hardware production; hired an engineer and paid him way too much and sunk over 1 mil of borrowed money (couldn't get an investor) into developing the hardware... nothing ever came of it. When the engineer finally left, he told the CEO he knew it wouldn't work, the budget and team were way too small. The CEO asked why he never said so: "You offered me a job and a six figure salary." SO glad I got out of that company, lol. 
Probably out of perfectly good intentions too. As with a lot of villains. 
They don't need to photograph or watch you anymore. You're literally carrying a device on you that tracks your every move, records audio and video without your knowledge and copies every text and email you send and receive. 
Exactly. Damn Muslims, settin' up their damn homelands thousands of years ago right over good American oil. 
The threat of raising the dead against gang violence is the most compelling argument for peace. 
If violence wasn't your last resort, you didn't resort to enough of it 
good luck convincing them that discipline is important though. without difficult challenges, it's easy to feel like you can do whatever you want and still be happy. 
You forgot about the 'Hey guys now you all know this chapter long explanation about X doing Y, here is another chapter of exceptions which you need to memorize'. Seriously fuck orgchem. 
....suddenly a lot less compelled to live in London 
If her words were cursed to be disbelieved, she should have said "If you let that horse in, we will defeat their army easily!" 
Like the people who complain when the Airplane is de-boarded for leaking hydraulic fluid. Better we found out still at the gate, then while we are in the air. source: happened to me in Denver last week. 
A gentleman considers the greater good and washes his hands *after* a beating. The needs of the many outweigh the septicemia of the few. 
My thoughts exactly. I guess curses don't work like that. Silly curses. 
Username relevance is off the charts. I commend you, good sir. 
I think the curse would force her to say something like "beware Greeks bearing gifts" and they would have no context for it and thus ignore the warnings. 
It's even crazier than that. The videographer wasn't just some random, she was a seriously notorious party girl in the late 80's New York club scene and liked cocaine like Tony Montana likes cocaine. Brett Easton Fucking Ellis said she was the inspiration for some of his characters. If you've ever been around a scene like that, think of the most dramatic, coke-fueled, "she's fucking crazy" party divas you've known; *that* was who a VP candidate who came *this* close to getting the nomination himself decided to screw around with, *during the goddamn campaign*. John Edwards is a fucking idiot. 
*Hinckley:* Boy, do I feel stupid?! Sorry Ronny old boy. No hard feelings? 
I'll take your Edward VIII and raise you Henry VIII. Booted out the Pope's representative and declared himself head of a brand new Protestant Church (the Church of England), just to marry Anne Boleyn. That didn't work out too well for Anne. 
He got over it eventually though. "SHE. IS. A. SLUT! *POCKET SAND*" 
Plus two great houses both alike in dignity lost their heirs 
And where might one find these "smutty fuck notes" ya know for science 
by a book writer whose book was titled "all in" while having an affair with him. That a fantastic double entendre ,I think 
Carlos Danger* has to be one modern history's worst. 
To me it always seemed like an excuse for undesirable social behavor: uh oh random princess got pregnant, what's a good excuse? Was she near the ocean? Poseidon. Oh she was in her room? Zeus as sunlight! Queen wants to have sex with a bull you say? Zeus is punishing us? 
Would it, though? Anakin's pretty gullible and the chancellor didn't even really give him any training in healing, or demonstrate that he knew any of the techniques he was hinting at, or give a credible plan for saving Padme in time. I figure if he hadn't hooked up with her Palpatine would have made up some slightly different legend, then bribed him with a vague promise of beer and deathsticks to kill the younglings, and the whole story would play out the same but without Luke and Leia. 
Nah, Mario does it for cake. He's thinking with his stomach. 
Probably the best official reply I've seen. Thanks for that, I'm tired of superhero references that I don't understand. 
I used to watch him on TV when I was younger. I thought he was a good guy. I can't find any proof that he actually did cheat on his wife, only rumors (a prominent one being from The Enquirer.) We shouldn't slander his name if we don't have proof. 
Egypt also fed the Empire for the rest of its life. Don't think that he did it just because Cleopatra was sexy. 
Now that is just not fair! Poseidon, Apollo, and even Hades got in on some of that action. For example: acccording to the Greeks, the existence of seasons is because of Hades wanting to put it in her, not Zeus 
In that vein, my brother gave his life November, 10 while drunkenly on his way to a booty call. 
I must've prevented the birth of dozens of Hitlers that way. 
That's really inacurrate. Stanislaw was elected with Russian support because they thought he would be a puppet for Catherine. Unexpectedly he actually tried to reform the Commonwealth, which did lead to the Partitions; but this had nothing to do with him being Catherine's lover. In any case, Poland had pretty much lost its soverignty with the Silent Sejm in 1717 anyways. 
I would have thought playing this song on cruise ships would have been avoided 
Me too, he probably ran with literally every combination of the word "fuck" in his head 
Alison Poole was the character based on her, she was in Jay McInerney's work first. To give Edwards *some* credit, by the time he met Rielle Hunter, cokewhore/party girl days were long behind her. She was totally into new age, spiritual BS by then, like how she could tell the future and she was in touch with the higher power and shit, which Edwards actually bought into (this makes me question his intelligence.) 
Is this your way of saying that you want to see John Goodman's dick? 
I've got a relative who worked with regulatory stuff dealing with radiation and always heard the story in the context to the affair. I couldn't find any good sources online. I'm guessing it's a situation where motivation is pretty hard to figure out plus I'm not sure how much the investigators would document. My relative had nothing to do with this investigation either and heard the story second hand from others in the industry. 
James Brady would probably still be bitter about it 
Edward VIII was really sympathetic to the Nazis too so humanity definitely dodged a bullet there. 
"Its not our blood being tainted, our blood will taint others!" 
I think hitting someone in the face with a chair, and then shouting about them being a slut, is the opposite of being over it. 
On his first album. Y'know, the one with "Regulate". 
My ex told me he was caught texting girls under that pseudonym and I thought it was a joke. 
And Harold Godwinson's son's name? Godwin Haroldson. They were simpler times 
It was'nt all that hard for Augustus to do the whole "Foreign Bitch" thing. Antony in all his brightness, "donated" much of the East to the Children of Cleopatra, basically giving away half the republic to some foreign queen and her bastards. 
I still remember the rhyme one of my high school teachers taught the class to remember his wives. "Divorced, beheaded, died; Divorced, beheaded, survived" Not very impressive but it worked 
This, but also: Woe to the heir of a king by conquest, he has neither proven himself by taking the crown in battle, nor comes an unbroken line of indisputable kings. 
Look if it turns out the queen is into bulls, I'd look to a higher power for answers. 
Zeus also visited the island of Lesbos once. *Once.* 
Did he have a source for that, or is this just speculation? 
Which, in fact, would be worse, because Luke and Leia are both heroes that took down the empire. 
It seems to me that from your point of view the Jedi are evil. 
Then explain the "Mario Party" game board where he's playing on top on Princess Peach's cake. Why doesn't he just abandon the game and dive right into it? 
I felt so stupid after, I didn't even bother pursuing any revenge. I just wrote it up as a lesson learned. Plus, I realized after that she probably has some drug-deal thug of a boyfriend who she disappeared to fuck for 90 minutes while I sat there with her "sisters". That's the really creepy thing. She left me there with her sisters. I could have been some rapist for all she knew. Sketchy. 
I think at that point Egypt was already a puppet state in practice if not law. 
That's one of his character's fatal flaws. He always thinks about 'what his father would do', since Ned Stark was one of the most honorable, decent men in Westeros. Problem is, his father's methods got himself executed in King's Landing. Both Ned and Robb are fantastic soldiers and commanders, with a number of battles to both of their names, but they make horrendously bad political and personal decisions. 
What about Samson? That trick cut his hair and eliminated all his massive gains for one smash 
Be fair. With Hades it was one time and he married her. With Zeus it's a constant pattern of rape, abandon, murdered by Zeus's angry wife Hera, kid may or may not survive to demigodhood. 
Maybe if Pops hadn't been such a dick, Hitler wouldn't have been, you know, so Hitlery. 
It's just about the most-requested song on ships. Source: was cruise ship musician. 
Moral of the story: never go quietly. Cuz you never know. 
Ran to the first lifeboat he could find and while everyone else tried to figure out what the fuck was happening. Total fucking coward. 
"thinking with the charred blackened dick of Satan" 
You ever know an ex-cokehead who's *super* into spirituality who isn't still a batshit drama magnet? I haven't. 
"Oh... Oh God Mr. President please... Not again. Mr. President will you jut put that away!" 
Well, to be fair, the rod was meant to be pulled out ~4 inches and the guy pulled it ~26 inches instead, so he didnt exactly pull it "a bit hard". 
An important thing to note if learning about both "Taxi Driver" and the Reagan assassination attempt now is that "Taxi Driver" came first. 
Many speculate that he was allowed to resign as a way of saving face for the monarchy. Many in leadership were convinced the Nazi sympathy would result in the British public completely rejecting the monarchy altogehter. 
Jesus, black sheep of the royal family and they make you the ruler of an entire (albeit small) nation. 
The duel between him and Burr was actually in 1804 over the New York gubernatorial race in which Hamilton campaigned against Burr. 
Warren Harding and Nate Dogg sure were an unstoppable political duo 
You know that's how everyone else reacted too. I just love that they got it on camera. 
My family thought I was joking when I said he came back in the last 2 weeks of the election 
Dedication to the mission is an important quality in an astronaut. 
Though technically he didn't divorce those wives, the marriages were *annulled*. This is a big deal because a divorce means the marriage no longer counts, whereas an annulment means the marriage retroactively *never* counted. 
The one rather significant difference is the Dissolution of the Monasteries, also known as the "Nice Wealth You've Got There, Monks, Now Hand It Over" Act. 
His son was actually quite good in his own right when he was well. He just didn't survive long enough to actually do much. Not to mention the shit hand his two sisters had to deal with. Of course they were ruthless. 
Sounds like he may have heard about the Tragedy of Darth Plagueis the Wise. 
The goal of "Mario Party" isn't to save the princess 
I think it's because Texas History is usually taught only at elementary and middle school level. I remember when I was taught about the Battle Of San Jacinto we were taught simply that Santa Anna was taking a "Siesta". They just didn't mention he was having company during his siesta. Also holy cow, I didn't realize that she's the original yellow rose. I never really questioned why our Governor gave out those "Yellow Rose" certifications. I just thought Yellow Roses symbolized lady like Texans. 
I'm just mad that Robert didn't make it more known that Ned was to lead until Geoffrey became of age. Or that Ned told Cersi his plan to out her and Jamie but I guessed it all hinged on the untimely death of Robert. Cersi for all the hate she gets knows how to play the game. She had ovaries of steel to not leave immediately after Ned told her how it was going to be. She obviously had more than one plan which I think is her thing. She silently has 5 plans for everything. 
Of all biblical figures I think Samson deserves to be in this thread the most. How many times did that bitch ask what gave him his incredible strength, then he gave a false answer and like clockwork she used whatever he gave her to try and take his strength away then cry when she found out she was deceived? Finally after so many times he told her it was his hair and BAM, he got fucked hard 
Never scream in that situation. Your voice doesn't travel well and it tires you out. Bang metal on metal. Travels through the vessel. 
No joke. "He early became fabled for a Rabelaisian earthiness, urinating in the parking lot of the House Office Building as the urge took him; if a colleague came into a Capitol bathroom as he was finishing at the urinal there, he would sometimes swing around still holding his member, which he liked to call "Jumbo," hooting once, "Have you ever seen anything as big as this?," and shaking it in almost a brandishing manner as he began discoursing about some pending legislation" 
"Repeat after me: I, Lyndon Balls, balls, my balls are too big to fit inside the crotch of my pants, I need an extra inch for my giant bulbous balls Johnson, do solemly swear..." "I, Lyndon Balls, balls, my balls are too big to fit inside the crotch of my pants, I need an extra inch for my giant bulbous balls Johnson, do solemly swear..." 
So what does moving it 4 inches do? Does it exit the water with even 4 inches? 
Anne of Cleves is one of history's greatest examples of making getting stuck in the Friendzone work for you. 
Actually, it seems Henry was the only one who thought her ugly. One courtier wrote that she was the most attractive of all his wives in person. Anne made the mistake of not understanding Henry's penchant for play acting; he first presented himself to her dressed as a common man - and she took him as one, which enraged him. 
Hitler's planned invasion ended with giving Eddie back the throne. He had respect for the English and thought they'd be allies. 
I know full well it's Batman, but these lines sound so right when you imagine Kyle MacLachlan as Agent Dale Cooper. 
Jesus. He just trashed them?! How could you not even think for a second about their value?! How do people like this even make up there?! I assume your job is pretty damn important 
But she'd still have to stop for gas a few times. She could have just used the bathroom while her car was filling up. Also, if done with with haste, a few bathroom pitstops along the way couldn't have cut into her trip time that much? Would saving 30-60 mins for a 19 hour drive really make a difference for whatever she was trying to do? 
Theres a iot of emphesis on that part of history in british school just because it was an interesting time. I doubt most people could list the kings who came after the Tudors though. 
Wasn't his son really sickly? And had a regent who took advantage of him? 
I mean, Yoda straight up said "Don't train this kid. He's not ready for this". I think it's more Qui-Gonn's fault than the Jedi Order's 
Gets better when you remember each time time he lied to her, she would attempt to remove/get ride of what it was he said gave him his power which was usually followed by philistines attempting to kill him and him of course killing them. He knew this woman was out to get him. 
When your dick is so big they call it brandishing. 
Hah, that would have been funny to hear. But seriously, he made a phone call to his tailor on a recorded White House phone line, and talked about how his pants were too tight in the crotch, and he wanted an inch to let out, describing his pants as "like riding a wire" 
it absorbs fewer neutrons. Obviously there's math involved, but basically the further you pull it out, the less it impedes the reaction. 
Welcome to the FBI list. We have pot lucks every 23rd of the month. Poker nights are every other Thursday. B.Y.O.B. 
I'm too lazy to physics, how many megaHelens would someone be if they shone with the force of a thousand suns? 
You don't have to go *that* far, just don't fuck a bitch in Athena's temple and you're good fam. 
hey, being friends with the king is a good move even if he doesn't want to bone you. 
Duc Henri of Navarre tried the same trick with Elizabeth I in an effort to woo her. She sent him packing. Stop with the play-acting, pony-up the large man-dowry and the gift every princess really wants, troops, was always the way to Gloriana's heart. 
He was also going to take churchills birthplace, Blenheim Palace, as his stately home. Was kind of funny watching people get all insulted that they decked it out in swastikas last year when that was pretty factually relevant. They should've been more insulted that it was for a Transformers film. 
It is more bad after successive generations. Fucking your sister once would probably be fine, but why risk it ya know. 
I should've elaborated. I was referring to Joe, he did very well 
Especially since those notebooks had such important content that they had to be kept in a safe. I'm *really* curious what was written in them. 
The link won't load but if I recall correctly, I think she brought gas cans with her and used the diaper so there would be no record of her stopping anywhere along the way so there wouldn't be any evidence that she was the murderer. 
- Don't train this kid - I will - Ok then The wisdoms of great master Yoda 
And talking about his "bunghole". Very eloquent man. 
But Meryl Streep is a gorgeous silver fox. Nothing wrong with that. 
I don't have time to look up all the constants, but this can be calculated, on the basis of (1000*[Power output of the sun])/(([distance between troy and Greece]*1000*[mass of a Greek warship])/(duration of the trojan war)) Because the sun outputs a lot of power and the trojan war was very long (and therefore the attractive power of helen was relatively low), this will likely work out to be a very large number, probably in the Tera- or PetaHelens or higher. 
Though he's just her side guy. Aphrodite was supposed to be married to Hephaestus. 
She did very well, and was kind to his children and assisted keeping the peace - well, as much as Henry would allow. 
Henry of Navarre was nothing short of an absolute French legend. I mean, what other king would play tennis, go hunting, shag a mistress then beat his kids at court *all in one day?* Plus, he managed to scrape together a French army after 40 years of constant civil war and absolutely routed the Spanish incursion - absolute French hero. 
He also had nasty pus-spewing abscesses all over both legs. They said you could smell him coming from three rooms away. I point out that Henry VIII had once been notorious for scrupulous cleanliness, to the point that he bathed daily and even had bathtubs with hot and cold running water installed in every palace. (The water "ran" from cisterns placed on upper floors which were filled with water diverted from nearby springs. The hot water cistern was heated by a fireplace set directly underneath.) But it's always about her looks, which is anachronistic. Kings married for policy; a consort's appearance wasn't supposed to matter in a world where a king could take as many mistresses as he liked. 
That is the first time I felt like I wanted to watch the new movie. And I'm a huge fan of the franchise without being all fanboyism over it. Michael Bay just did too good of a job at butchering the movies 
To be fair, it's not like the Ancient Egyptians had a great understanding of genetics. 
The attractive power of Helen's face would be calculated based on the duration of the journey, not the whole war. They had to have spent at least some time on killing, dying, and equine carpentry. 
A god who spends his days hammering at an anvil probably isn't the best one to fuck with either. 
Yeah, both Mary AND Elizabeth liked her, because she was kind to them. 
Yes. All crap with one exception: the exception being the first movie, from the moment they roll out on the highway to the end of the Optimus / Megatron fight. The dialog in that fight gave me nostalgia chills. 
The aliems that drew them cool drawings and built the pyramids prolly knew genetics though. 
Perhaps an iceberg with a particularly glamorous staircase. 
Except he's also lame. He's depicted in myth and kind of a hunchback cripple. He's so deformed when born Hera boots him off Olympus. 
Yep the first movie was a dream come true for me. Then as more movies came out I was baffled at how they are missing the point more and more. Then Optimus Prime just keeps going more and more out of character. And now I feel like they are just whoring him for the toy money because kids love him. 
He can still fuck up a bitch, tho. When the river god Scarmander got angry about Achilles choking up the river with blood and corpses when he went into a fit of rage over the death of Patroclus and leaped up out of the river bed to chase Achilles, Hephaestus blasted him back into the bed with a bolt of fire from his hammer. 
American here. I am NOT content AT ALL with only 2 weeks. Also, we don't get ANY sick time. In fact, if we call in sick 4 times, they require a doctors note for any sick days after. After 7 times, they just fire you. 
oh, what is REAL fun is if you have separate dental, and need a tooth pulled under anesthesia (aka: surgical extraction) medical will claim it is not covered because it was a dental procedure done by a dentist. Dental will not cover it because it was a medical procedure done under anesthesia. Been there, done that with my ex wife, who had shitty teeth. had full insurance for both medical and dental, and still spent a few grand out of pocket anyway on having some of her teeth pulled. 
Aldi in the US lets their cashiers sit. I went to Germany and saw why--Aldi is a German company and almost all cashiers get to sit in Germany. 
It's even weirder when there is no real reason to do it. I could do my job at home just as easily. Go in for the odd meeting or workshop but otherwise work from home. But that is not allowed at my company so I waste time getting my kids to and from daycare that they go to for 20 minutes before and after school because I have to be there at a very precise time and then sit at my desk and do what I could just as easily do at home. If I worked at home they would save money! They wouldn't have to provide me with an office/phone/computer but sure why not keep doing it exactly the same way. 
And then they still don't have enough supplies for the year. Wife is a teacher. We pay for her kids supplies and stuff for them every year. Out of pocket. 
Yeah, this freaks me out a lot. Especially people who create accounts for their young children and post *for* them. What happens when that kid is old enough to have his/her own social media account on the same site? How are they going to feel about their whole life already being online?! 
Life tip: if this happens to you single out a person and ask him/her to help. Make it personal. In this way they will carry the responsibility and they will most likely act. Dont just scream help 
Even though it's not as extreme as the US, what can happen when your health goes to shit is still something pretty insane. I've had that experience in Canada recently. Having to ask your retired parents for help with food because you can't cook anymore isn't fun. Appreciate whatever health you have, someday we all lose it. 
Apparently once someone loses their liberties we can all laugh at their torture. 
Also literally everything you know about the outside world is given to you indirectly through those trillions of cells. When you put on socks it feels like you have socks on your feet, but that's just because nerves in your feet are playing telephone with the nerves in your brain and then the brain just hallucinates something that feels like a sock, and it feels like it's on your foot even though it's all happening in your head. And all of this came about because having an integrated sensory experience of the world around you is a great way to avoid dying and to find ways to produce more meat robots. 
My mom once commented that I needed new pants. When I asked her why, she said it was because she couldn't see my underwear line. My sister and I were just like.. wut? That's the point. It is weird, though. 
Like buying a magazine and half of the pages being ads. 
Duverger's law: a basic tenet of political science that the constitutional system determines the political system. US, UK first past the post (FPTP) forces two polarizing forces that marginalize outside voices / French 2-round voting means larger parties make coalitions with smaller parties but not extremists to get into parliament / Israeli hyper proportionality means that dominant parties have to make either an impossible grand coalition between two centrists or one spectral coalition that involves the extremes. The latter being easier is a primary reason the peace process is impossible (in the opinion of my French politics teacher), since Bibi has to have the very farthest right wing people that wouldn't receive a seat in France or the US in his coalition or else ally with liberals / German bicameral mix of proportion and FPTP means nobody has any predictive power and it's honestly a very successful mess 
A popular chicken in egg sauce meal in Japan is oyako donburi, or literally "parent and child rice bowl". There's a similarly named sushi dish with salmon and salmon roe. 
Part time? I don't know any single food service employee who gets paid sick leave. Maybe management, if that counts as food service. I had a really nasty cough a few years ago and I tried to get the night off of work. No one could cover my shift so I told my boss and he basically said "too bad, it's Friday night, you're working". Then customers complained that I was obviously sick and he turned around and bitched at me for coming to work sick. The fuck? 
How else are we supposed to lower the unemployment rate? Create legitimate jobs? 
That's because life is pain and the more ways we have to forget that fact even for a moment is going to be popular 
I would love it if guys started wearing gladiator sandals 
If a grasshopper was meaty and boiled just right, I can't say I wouldn't try it 
you can sign in print or a happy face or whatever else you want to use as your 'mark' 
My wife and I have only visited her mom's grave site twice - on her mom's birthday and the anniversary of her death. Even then it was mostly to keep her grandparents happy. To my wife/me, it's not "her" in there. Some people think that sounds harsh or mean or disrespectful, but to us, we like to think her mom is always with us in a way. 
Cats actually domesticated themselves, so I guess you can feel less bad about it... They get to sleep all day and someone else feeds them with literally no physical exertion from themselves. Not exactly engaging, but in terms of survival it's top notch. Most wild cats are loners anyway. 
You'd think we were founded by a group of Puritans. Oh, wait... 
Well the difference is your butt isn't making contact with anything. Except chairs, they're covered in poopy butt sweat. 
I'm not generally a conspiracy theorist, but one of the few conspiracy theories I believe is that the stigma against discussing salary was started by employers so they could pay their employees less. 
While I agree, nothing happens because NK doesn't threaten any other countries interests, whereas nazi Germany was trying to build an empire. Wars aren't fought to help foreigners, only to protect domestic interests. 
I can't think too much about it or it starts making me way sad. I wish for the work week to be over fast and then the weekend goes by and it starts all over again. Before you know it, you're 36 and wondering where your youth went. It's expensive to be alive. 
which is why i always wipe my ass with a television 
Also, how nudity is determined entirely by the nipple. You could have massive tits covered only by a well-placed sticker and be fine for TV, but let just a sliver of areola slip out and NOW you're basically porn. 
You've learned your lesson then. Next time you need dental surgery, don't use anaesthesia! 
"I'm sorry ma'am, you're gonna have to keep it in there." 
This is really funny, because I have shopped at Aldi 20+ times and just realized that if I really think about it, some of the cashiers were sitting while checking people out. It just shows that it makes absolutely no difference if a cashier is sitting or standing. In fact, I DO remember that Aldi checkout is hella fast and efficient. 
Careful what you wish for. Companies thought telecommuting was a good idea too, except they figured they could pay less without benefits or HR costs by outsourcing internationally. 
My dad taught me this. He said in an emergency, for example you need to do cpr and there is a crowd, he said to point to an individual, tell them to call 911 so you have somebody on that mission. Not a bunch of frantic people watching but not acting 
I've read that one of the simplest ways to get bystanders to act in a situation like a car crash is for an emergency responder to point out an individual person and tell them to do something. That is, instead of shouting "Somebody call 911", what you should do instead is point at someone and shout "You! Call 911!". 
'Why do you want this two-week data entry contract?' 'I'm looking for a productive outlet for my hobby of typing long strings of numbers into fields' 
Repeat after me "Employee 18534622 is not a number. Employee 18534622 is not a number." 
The best way to get ahead in life is to pretend you are playing by someone else's rules while secretly playing by your own 
Even better are those pre-screening psychological tests where you just max out the results on the psychopath meter or game it just slightly to not look like one. 
Which can happen for no reason, it's not just murderers and rapists. You could fail to pay your parking tickets, which makes it a-okay to be repeatedly molested. 
Oftentimes the initial suspect in these shows aren't even the true culprit, yet still receive the same treatment. One episode of SVU even had the initial suspect commit suicide due to the threat of prison rape, and the detectives brush it off to find the true culprit. 
A lot of people don't even joke but are dead serious about this which is a shame. 
I guess mom used to be a party-animal or something. 
I'm going to add that it's not necessarily even "panty lines" or a style thing -- I don't want a tight-fitting dress silhouette to be interrupted by the crease of underwear on my hips. It just makes sense. I paid a lot for this dress made to show off curvy hips, I want to show them off without reminding people my curves are made of fat. 
You just have to learn how to do boss speak "What are you working on?" "This super important task." "Well I have this other SUPER DUPER important task for you to do" "Okay well that's fine but you'll need to let me know which has priority and has a stricter timeline, also maybe you can assign some more resources for the project" 
California very recently made it law for all employees to earn sick time at a rate related to how many hours they work. This is very hard to use because a lot of the time your employer will ask for a doctor's note which is not worth getting for a cold, and with shitty health insurance. 
I worked for a large coffee chain way back when and I had attempted to call out sick with a legit illness, I was told if I did not come in to not bother coming in for my next shift either. Not every manager is like that but still, it was way fucked up. 
In US its common for people in hospitals to work while they are sick as well. My husband is a resident and he's seen other residents/fellows/attendings carrying buckets with them if they are sick. One attending was so sick he passed out and had to be brought to the ER at the hospital he was working with. 
I would love if guys would start wearing tall boots too. Only places you see it happen are movies and horseback riders. Well fitting, good looking tall leather boots are amazing! (Ugly, odd fitting aren't... sadly most girl boots are that way :C) 
I've heard that fried and buttered grasshoppers are delicious. My ex-wife's sister is a wilderness survival instructor who tried eating them once (professional curiosity) and now loves them and catches them for snacks all the time and encourages her students to do so too. They apparently have GREAT nutritional value. I've NEVER been brave enough to take her advice. 
That sounds perfectly normal to me. Since I've been able to make those kinds of decisions for myself, I've never visited the graves of any of my dead friends or relatives. I just don't see the point. 
Nah. Most cats will stay even when they had a choice. I had an outdoor cat, so he could have run off at any time if he wanted to. He didn't even really need me for food since all of my neighbors also had cat flaps and the cats would just eat where ever they wanted. Always was there waiting for me when I got home from work each day, greeting me at the end of the drive and then spending the evening on my lap. He even used to follow me halfway on my walk to work each morning before turning home for whatever kitty adventures he used to get up to while I was gone. Contrary to what non-cat people seem to believe, cats can bond with us just as well as dogs do and like letting us live in their house :) 
Puritans get an undeserved reputation. They weren't that fussed about things like breastfeeding, they wore colors, they had parties, a woman could have her husband scolded by the elders if he wasn't giving her enough sex, and they pulled in at Massachusetts instead of searching for Virginia because they were out of beer. 
Somehow have never heard this explanation before but it makes a lot of sense. Still weird though 
I guess so; it would be ironic if my Mom was stalking and downvoting me..... 
'Kissing is like sex but with less genitals' Quote of the day! 
What's interesting is how money works (or doesn't) when society stops functioning normally. Hyper inflation, while awful, is a really cool demonstration of how people's faith in a currency only goes so far, and there's a tipping point where it becomes essentially worthless. 
I would think that snorting coke is virtually a requisite in the banking industry. 
I don't have any problems with whatever drugs people want to do in their own bodies, but I think it's pretty insane that someone would just ask for Xanax at the office. 
Also, liberating NK is going to create an influx of refugees that no one (especially SK) wants to deal with. That's pretty much the main reason. 
Off the top of my head: Soviet Union, Rwanda (more of a genocide, really), N.K., China....am I missing any? 
He's getting a blood eagle now, whether he wants it or not. 
I'm gonna save so much money when I'm dead. I can't wait. 
Typically that argument only works if you can choose exactly when and how much you want to work. I have to work three weeks to buy passage somewhere because if I took that three weeks to walk there, I wouldn't have a job. 
Hmm, I kind of wonder if you put like, a sticker that looks like a nipple over the nipple, but the nipple the sticker is based on is a male nipple, is that okay? 
Was playing basketball once on vacation with my gf. It was hot so she took off her tank top and played in her Maidenform. Me: "you're just going to jump around in your bra?" Her (shrug): "It covers me more than my bikini." Me: "...Sound logic." The two 12-year-olds walking by perhaps didn't agree but they were happy. The mom who gave her a dirty look...not so much. 
I was offered the anesthesia, but found out it was an extra $500 out of pocket, and it would fuck my day over the rest of the day. Did the local, was in and out of the chair in 7 mintues, and went to work. Yeah, fuck the anesthesia. 
Cassiers can't sit in your countries??? In switzerland you can sit or stand. I mean who the fuck cares anyway? 
Sounds like military casual duty. Sometimes you're busy with legit work like moving furniture or checking all the smoke alarms or whatnot, but if they didn't have work for you, you had to look busy. 12 people sweeping a single 50 foot stretch of sidewalk. It looked like the beginning of a musical. 
Even among well-meaning companies that don't outsource, work-life balance commonly gets thrown out of whack, because there's suddenly little distinction between "when you're at work" and "when you're at home." Unless boundaries are set early and enforced strictly, some employees end up feeling like they're at the company's disposal 24/7. But it's still an improvement. 
But if I let my kid get to know strangers then they have increased risk of being abducted by someone they know. 
My Mom (adopted) was in the same way, and in the final days the nurse gave her free range with the instant painkiller. I'm sure she dosed into oblivion, which was good. I just wished it was sooner, since there were many nights of being called in for a 'final goodbye'....only to have her brought back. Seeing this...it was surreal. The human body can go through so much horrible shit. 
Don't just point, specify something about them. "You, wearing the yellow shirt." 
I tried mining Bitcoin by hand, but it's hard to make a living that way. 
I'm looking for low skilled work to give my brain a break between degrees, and I am seeing dishwasher postings that require previous experience. Not just the ones with prep duties, the ones that should be bloody entry level and easy for anyone to get! I would love to see a statistic about how many jobs now require experienced compared to ten or twenty years ago. 
"sorry, you look like you're taking classes at the local community college. we are looking for souls who have already given up on life, and want to make shit pay forever." 
There's a sucker in every business transaction. If you don't know who it is, it's you. 
SVU is pretty messed up. There is some really borderline police brutality, and the show frames it as totally OK. 
I imagine it varies depending on the shop you work at. For me, I had to go through a period of time where I shadowed the other bra fitters, and then I had to have someone check all my work for a period of time. I had to successfully fit 100 women before I could get my certificate and be a fully qualified staff member. I was already very familiar with the shop and fitting process, so I was able to complete my training in a couple of months. 
There's a chicken and egg dish in Japan called Oyako Donburi. Shits really good, but roughly translates to Mother and Child dish. It can be made with beef and be Stranger and Child. 
So even with insurance it would cost roughly $40 to obtain a Dr.'s note. I had to go to a local walk in clinic once without insurance just for antibiotics and a Dr.'s note and when I finally was through, after 6 hours of waiting time, I left with $170 less and a prescription for Amoxicillin. Just to see a new dentist and get my teeth cleaned and one filling cost me close to $1000. They demand you take 70 X-rays, have a "consultation", then do a teeth cleaning, then come back for the filling. So that's 4 appointments that averaged out to around $200 an appointment by the time I was done. Health costs are freaking ridiculous in the U.S., especially if you're a member of the underclass. 
I think is why the company I was a manager at didn't like me. They legit wanted me to be a douchebag to the employees and I couldn't be because I knew what situation everyone who worked there was in because I actually got to know the people working for me. When people called in sick, I asked them to try and geta doctor's note for the sake of the company wanting one and also suggested just going to a walk in drugstore clinic if they could just to get a note but if they couldn't, I told my DM that the person wasn't there because they weren't feeling well and I sent them home. We were allowed to send people home, but people weren't allowed to not show up. Sending people home looked better for labour costs and all those numbers but calling out because you're sick was blasphemy. 
Hey, at least he saved an expensive ambulance ride. 
Tall boots would work so well with suits and coats in winter. So tired of the rubber overshoes or Sorel winter boots for snow and slush. 
I still visit my brothers grave, he died in 1995. Family and friends will buy a shot glass, do a shot of Jack Daniels and leave the shot glass. Next person will take the glass and leave another one. Even though it might be a strange reason to go whenever I'm there it makes me feel good. 
Yeah, I think that is something a lot of people don't understand about cats. They are definitely capable of bonding, and they're capable of having diverse personalities. My cat is incredibly stoic, but if he hasn't seen me in a long time (I'm a college student), he's a big fat baby and will cuddle until he gets bored of me again. Even then, he comes when he is called and he follows me from room to room. Cats are cool. 
Beer was used in ships as a sterile way to store water. It wasn't "Hey, let's stop because we can't get drunk!" It was "Hey, let's stop so we don't all die of dehydration." 
People are weird, man. Plus we got the internet now so what's on T.V. and what isn't is more irrelevant than ever. I got nephews with cell phones with crystal clear search histories. Like not a single thing visited. Little dudes are probably on some real freaky shit. 
That's much more reasonable, the internet has ruined me 
I work for a financial institution. They don't drug screen. 
I have a splitting headache...does anyone have an extra Oxycontin? 
That and war is a bloody, ugly business which is historically proven to be one of the worst ways of dealing with your enemies. 
Eugenics was popular all over the western world until the end of the war. The revelation about the camps and the ethnic cleansing made people stop and think about it for a bit. 
Former Yugoslavia, East Timor, Sri Lanka, Iraqi Kurds and Yazidi, Darfur, Cambodia under Pol Pot. 
This. The acknowledgement that there is only really 1 reason to eat animal products (taste) and that it is not in any way necessary for 99% of people. This is what more people need to think about. 
I work a seasonal job where I work 12 hour days 7 days a week for about 4-5 months. I'm able to save up enough money to not work the rest of the year so it's worth it to me. 
Or you would have starved, because you wouldn't have been able to afford to feed yourself. 
Get rich to live poor. Got it. Totally gonna kill myself now. 
I remember watching some plastic surgery show where they where doing implants. They take the nipple completly off. While it's off and on the table, no blur... Stitched back on, blur. 
Someone at warner didn't get the memo when filming friends haha. 
Well I mean Peter has a fantastic ass. Why let it go to waste? 
I work out in just a sports bra all the time. I thought that was the point of them. 
I mean, my swimming trunks don't have that hole in the front where my dick can flop out... 
Yeah just a little needle to numbthe gums and you're good. Had all four of my wisdom teeth pulled a 3-4 days before the crucible during boot camp, that was fun 
Seriously, this super slow bagging has to stop. Lines at the cashiers here in the US are super annoying because of the slow bagging and chitchat with cashier and/or bagger. Just get people to bag their own stuff. In Norway all cash registers leads to two bagging areas that can be alternated so there is no wait when the customer is bagging their own stuff. 
This is very true. I work in office and at home and I've frequently found myself working long into the night, sometimes 10 or 11pm. I'm getting better, with the help of my new boss who yells at me to log off after my hours are finished. But it is a very real problem when work and home are essentially the same place. 
That's may very well be true. The only answer I can see is to lock them in the closet until they're adults :) 
With customer service jobs, bullshitting skills are important. Maybe that's what they're looking for when they ask questions like that at fast food or retail. 
I shit you not, back before I got into tech, and was looking for anything because I had no experience, I came across a few dishwashing jobs asking for cover letters. Cover letters are already a pain in the ass to deal with, so to configure one for a dishwashing job? Boy... 
Borderline? Elliot beats the shit out of interrogatees every third episode. 
Holy shit. I was attempting to be funny and now I feel like an idiot 
What an utter dick. You should 100% have told him to sort his own schedule, including the hours he'd lose from you, and walked. I'm really sorry about your grandpa. 
They always tell you in orientation to do this but I have never seen it done at any of the 4 restaurants I've worked. 
Just imagine if freaking capes would be ok to wear in the colder months. I always imagine it like walking around in a blanket, stomping through the snow. Unfortunately it kind of looks weird on men to wear something different whereas women have all sorts of crazy clothes. 
I hope my comment didn't come across as disrespectful towards those who take comfort in visiting graves and keeping little rituals like yours going. 
And I told mine to chuck me in the woods. She wasn't comfortable with that. Apparently there are these hippie cemeteries where they'll bury you in a shallow grave in the woods, so that's our compromise. 
Close. A golden retriever on a farm. Gets to run, play and explore whenever it wants, plus gets to sleep in the warmth of the mud room, and all the food it can eat. 
Well it's not illegal for him to ask it of you, it is illegal for him to persue recourse if you decide to forgo his wish. 
I'd give you reddit gold if I had the 5 coals to spare. 
Most investment banks do at employment. Even their execs. Goldman tested me. So did Morgan Stanley. They don't do recurring or random since it's not legal in my state unless your position demands it. But they do a pre-employment screening. 
Yeah, I love all of the responses here that think the real reason is something other than this. Stopping the camps would mean going to war with a country that has nuclear weapons and shares a border with a densely populated ally. Why is everyone trying to make the reason more difficult than this? 
Not just popular, the programme in California was the de facto epicentre of eugenics years before Hitler was in any position of power, and largely influenced the Nazi eugenics movement. Moreover, the Rockerfeller Foundation helped fund the Nazi eugenics programme. It was derived almost directly from the US. 
That sounds like a pretty gruesome work schedule but I envy that you have the opportunity to have that. 
Ha, jokes on you then. I work, don't travel anywhere, and I'm still starving! 
I mean if you think about it, the guys and gals who trek up Mt Everest, who take crazy long desert safaris, who go on the hunt for super rare ocean fish, etc, they're all rich people with nothing more than a bucket list. And they all sleep in tents, shit in the woods, and so on. 
Kanye West put it more succinctly: having money isn't everything, not having it is. 
I vaguely remember watching a show with a FtM sex change. Beforehand they blur the nipples after surgery they didn't :/ It's was the same nipples...? 
No, that was just the Nineties. And Jennifer Anniston. 
Naming conventions. That is designed and intended as its own top. 
I worked at Trader Joe's, and they actually encouraged that shit. It's like they wanted you to be less productive. It's all fine on the average day, but during rush times, you'd get employees that still took it to heart. Have a line five people deep with full carts? Let's talk about what crackers you're going to use with this lovely jar of olive tapenade. That's what kept some of the old-ass retirees and bored moms working there. They'd get stellar reviews for bullshitting with customers who were too polite to tell them they wanted to get the fuck out of the store already. Meanwhile, the rest of us were busting our asses pulling the freezer, unloading trucks, etc. I was a fucking whiz at cashier. Knew all the shortcuts and codes. Had a sixth sense for barcodes and would no-look scan all the time. Bagged like a Tetris champion. But no, I had to improve on professing my love of Trader Ming's Instant Pad Thai bowls to time-constrained customers. 
But then if you do that they get severe cases of schizophrenia where they talk with giants, talk with bearded weirdos, believe they can fly with brooms or send messages with owls, and are chased by nose less Ralph Fienneses. 
It's the sort of job you have to deal with bullshit and inane dickheads daily, so why not bring that bollocks into the interview too! 
Alternatively, they might pick up on the sarcasm and mark 5/5 for enthusiasm on the standardized interview review form. 
During our next group team building focus session, we should have a dialogue about how to best utilize our resourses. 
They are just scapegoats who are left with the least amount of resources humanly possible to get the job done so greedy CEOs can make the most possible money 
And this is exactly how you get outbreaks of norovirus at Chipotle. 
I don't think they can actually scream, can they? I didn't think they had any vocal sound system capable of doing so. If I had to guess, it's more likely it was the sound of juices steaming past cracks in their exoskeleton, or their legs rubbing against their body as their muscles convulse from the heat... which to be fair, I guess is really not that much more comforting. 
Not at all, you are 100% correct. Most may visit frequently just after but tend to make those visits less frequent until they just stop all together. I can only get there maybe twice a year now when I go home for visits but always make sure I have sometime to go. Have a shot, sit on the bench next to his grave and enjoy the peace and quiet. I was there one time and one of his friends showed up, we visited for over an hour. At first I'll admit I visited partially to keep the ritual going but now I do it for myself, it makes me feel good to be there. Reconnects me with my past as most times I'm thinking about him and the time spent with family as kids. 
You could donate your body to a body farm. Then a bunch of students will get to see you decompose! 
Only if you're born there. If I'm a dog and I hear that I'm going to live on a farm, I'm doing everything I can to get the hell away from my captors as quickly as possible. 
I'm a human, and I'd still recommend looking out for cars, coyotes, and psychopathic pre-teens. 
Everyone always forgets about the fine print. And good luck if you don't have any sold proof to go along with your accusation. 
"It appears that your work ethic has suddenly deteriorated and so we will have to let you go" 
It's been so long since I've seen one of these. Always love a good sprog-poem 
I worked with an IT contractor that works 6 months, then went camping/traveling/hiking for 6 months. 
Years ago, at a mechanic's shop, there was a sign I saw on the wall behind the counter that read, "Working here allows me to afford two of the luxuries I've become accustomed to, eating and living indoors." 
Do you remember Thomas Beatty, the pregnant man in 2008 or so? He was trans sexual but had never undergone any removal of his XX reproductive parts, and he went off his hormones and got pregnant. So anyway, this guy made national news and the iconic picture of him is a side shot of him naked, 9 months pregnant, and they didn't have to blur anything out. I've seen that same shot of pregnant female celebs before and they always have to do "hand bra" over their tops. I have no idea why a full-nude shot of a pregnant man's chest is acceptable but a full-nude shot of a pregnant woman's chest isn't. Thomas Beatty's nipples once belonged on a woman's body and they would have blurred them out then. But change his pronouns, cut his hair, and grow a beard out and suddenly they're ok to show. 
And yet at my gym, I wore a modest, standard black sports bra as a top and got told to put a shirt on. University gym, too. I dunno... 
Make "dialogue" a verb there and you're golden. During our next group team building focus session, we should dialogue about how to best utilize our resourses. See how much worse that is? 
Never worked at a chain restaurant, only at a family owned one with an awesome manager/owner running it, and my experience is vastly different from what most people say. I sometimes can't believe (like "no way!" Not like "you're lying") the treatment people say they get from managers at chain restaurants. It blows my mind. 
The top of our head is cut off. We could totally shop a fedora in there. M'lady doesn't know the first thing about pixels. 
me == 100% on board wife == squeamish I realize that I can totally overrule her, but if I can keep the peace and make her comfortable by being tree food, I can...live?...with that. Then again, if I'm lucky, I have a few years left to convince her of an alternate plan. 
I recommend teaming up with a slow witted dog and a snarky cat. 
I know quite a few like that. My best friend is one of them, as his method is to take contracts that coincide with the school holidays. He'll routinely work 80-90 hour weeks during school time, then when his kids are on holiday, he's at home too. Seems to work well for him. 
I had a higher up who, when I explained this to him, asked if this were the case why should he keep me and not just hire someone for cheaper on the other side of the world. The bulk of the company is now outsourced to third-world countries. 
This is why breastfeeding in public gets such a reaction from certain people. It's just feeding your baby. These are just boobs. The female body is so objectified something as innocent as feeding your baby is seen as porn. 
My gym is the same way, Planet. It's part of their "no pressure/judgement" policy thing. The dress code applies to guys too though, we can't wear certain types of tank tops or go shirtless. 
Idk I have my bras fit properly, wear them properly, but I still want my girls to breathe as soon as I get home. Plus that underboob itch is just heavenly. 
Is this what Office spaces are actually like Just circle jerking over buzzwords all day 
I'm on the other end of family owned restaurants. I worked in a place that for 6 weeks didn't have hot water, and the owners dragged their feet getting it fixed, despite the obvious health code issues. I worked their for 2 years and a half years as a student, without vacation, and when my older brother had his first baby, and when I became an uncle for the first time, they grieved me for wanting to take time off, so I quit. I went back eventually as a delivery driver, and when I got there the entire family had been on their annual 2 week vacation to Hawaii so the GM of the store had to put in 182 hours over the last two weeks. She's salary so she didn't get overtime or anything, ALSO she had a grandson 2 weeks later, and the grieved her for taking 3 days off to see her new grandbaby. Food Service Workers need a union yesterday, and more importantly, legislation that punishes EMPLOYERS for attempting to break up/not allow unions to form. 
If I'm spending that much on anything I'd better be crystal clear on what I'm getting. 
We shouldn't expect her to. She's used to looking down at her feet when she's with all those alphas. Hopefully we'll show her the light. Once she's on that pedastal, she can look down at *us* instead! Also, the fedora would hide the bald spot! 
Or just donate it to medical science. My husband and I have a deal that we'll donate our dead bodies. That way no funeral expenses. 
"Because they can't do the job as well as I can" He then proceeds to not believe you and outsources. 2 years later the company has massive technological infrastructure problems and he wonders why. 
America is weird like that. Sex sells up to a certain point, but is strictly regulated after that point. Violence is pretty much free game until you get to crazy stuff like torture and gratuitous gore. But how *dare* you perform a natural biological function that may be required for the life of your child in public! 
To be fair, I'd rather have some layer of clothing between a random person's sweaty bits and the equipment. It's just more sanitary. 
A friend of mine died. He wanted that. He fell off a 6 foot ladder - landed on his head - all done. He wanted his entire body donated to science - which his wife respected. It took her YEARS to get closure though. He was just there one morning. Went to work... Then nothing. Even his body gone. Just. Gone... 
Hes already moved to a new company touting how he cut the IT cost center by 80% and can bring that plan to the next spot. 
This is the same in England and America. But in mainland Europe it's totally different, at beaches and pools it's really normal for women to be topless, no-one bats an eyelid. I went to Madrid two weeks ago and there were boobs everywhere at the pool, so I decided to try being topless and it was literally the most freeing thing ever! 
Honestly that's usually how they do it. "I saved that company so much money! But don't like into it because I made the culture toxic and ran it into the ground." 
Did the same. This surprised me: *"As of the end of 2016, Reddit is the only major social media platform that does not have a female majority user base."* 
I restarted my phone and switched from Wi-Fi to 3G. 
Not sure why I had to scroll down this far to find imgur. It's a very reasonable substitute for when Reddit is unavailable. 
Shut off reddit, and watch some more Black Mirror. It's worth it, trust me 
Find peace and happiness within this wonderful website :') 
I went to the Indian casino and won a $3420 jackpot. Stoked! 
I had a few pages cached in my app (Sync for Reddit, highly recommended to everyone), but I accidentally closed the app and lost it all... I jumped on YouTube and then lost interest shortly after. I then decided I should probably eat something and talk to my GF for once. 
You should probably put your clothes in the dryer. 
I normally just pretend like I'm zoned out from being tired but secretly people watch because it's amusing. 
"Reddit's down, I guess I'll do some work!" 15 seconds later... "Hmm, I wonder what's on reddit" 
I love this answer. The detail. The honesty. Sharing the thought process. Good stuff. 
SEE WHAT YOU MAKE ME DO? I COME HOME TO BROWSE SOME FUCKING DANK MEMES AND THEN I HAVE TO PUT UP WITH YOUR BULLSHIT. I DONT GIVE A FUCK IF YOU HAVENT EATEN IN THREE DAYS. YOURE LUCKY I HAVE 4CHAN OR ID BLOW YOUR FUCKING BRAINS OUT 
Thanks for bringing this to my attention! I probably never would have heard about it as music festivals aren't really in my sphere of interest. Those kids must be so super pissed to have dropped that money, probably hyped up the fact that they're going to a "luxury festival" on their social media, and then arrived to those conditions! 
The existential dread really shone through on this one, well done as always! 
Usually my husband and I work separately but together in the evenings, until one of us calls it a night and passes out from exhaustion (usually me). Last night, we hung out, chatting all evening. Talked well into the morning, finished the night with some lovin' and went to bed... Just realized that we probably started chatting with each other when reddit went down. Dangit lol. 
uhm how would they know? i never got asked about my gender when registrating. atlaest i cant remember... 
I'm not the OP but off to do just that. Discovered it today and am already in love. It's like a futuristic Twilight Zone. 
Literally was told by my psychologist to keep engaging on reddit. It's made up part of my treatment for depression and anxiety. Lol 
If I wanted cancer I would rather smoke than go on 9gag 
Once they ddosed themselves due to a sabotaged loic raid I never even went there. 
ahh, people calling it the reddit apocalypse. what an entertaining day! 
He tried his PC and his phone but he needed to try a different PC and phone, just in case. 
As someone from Australia, it blows my mind how much other people use dryers. Seriously, just put it out in the sun for ten minutes that's what us Aussies do. 
Yah, and here in the UK, my morning routine of browsing Reddit while eating a Bagel was shit. 
I have a paper I have to write, thought "oh man reddit is down, now I can do this paper distraction-free!" Reality was just me refreshing to see when it was back up, and then eventually catching up on YouTube subscriptions. I really only did like 10 minutes of work. Thing is, this paper is due in 20 hours and I have yet to sleep too. Now Reddit is back up, and I have to make up for lost time. 
These poor souls couldn't use sweet gifs from reddit. 
Similar thing happened to me. Girlfriend bought me a dog after I had a really intense back surgery, dog lived in my home, went to hers occasionally, we broke up a year later, police were called when I wouldn't give her the dog when she showed up at my place, since she had receipts for the dog it was still considered her property. Could have taken it to court as I know the police were wrong, but I couldn't go through that pain and suffering, so I gave up. 
I would assume they base it off of self reported demographics surveys they do every once in a while. I mean there aren't any girls on the internet anyway so it's hardly surprising. 
Does not surprise me one bit. Just look at 2X. Intended to be a sub for women, became default, got overrun with filth, now has largely a male userbase. 
She thought it was a little more refreshing that OP. 
It's not even a good image hosting service anymore. :( 
Most of them simply don't understand what Imgur was actually created for. So they get really mad when they see random, nonsensical, really stupid images in User Submitted. To them, it's all about Front Page and images that get upvoted enough to be on it. What they don't realize is that those random images in User Sub are (most likely) just images posted by Redditors that don't know to *not* hit the "share to community" button, which is how the image drops into User Sub. And then it's public. 
That's exactly how I describe it to everyone. Half of them go off to say "what's twilight zone?" Then another friend told me "eh I'll see when I get to it, looks boring." Then the other week they must've forgotten I mentioned it and tell me, "omg have you seen black mirror?!? It's soooo good" -_- Amazing show though. I absolutely love it! White Christmas has been one of my favorites. But then again so have most of the others. 
Fighting suicidal thoughts with shitposts, future is now. 
One hour of browsing 9gag, is equivalent to 10 packs of cigarettes. 
WANT ME TO CUT TO THREE WEEKS EARLIER WHEN YOU WERE STILL ALIVE??!? 
You Aussies and your damn refrigerators though, if you want your beers nice and cold then just leave them outside the back door for ten minutes like us in Norway do! 
I feel like this answer is too serious to be sarcastic so I'll bite. Why Bing? 
A shadow has fallen on the warp, the hive fleet is upon us. They will be subtle no more. 
I thought you had listed "shit" as part of your morning routine, and I was going to comment "my man" until I read it again. 
Then internet went up again and you went back to your room, wondering who were those people in your house 
Fucked. It's crazy how bonded we can be to dogs. I've been afraid to ever have one again. 
Well... if CSS is so damn important to that many people, maybe they will start their own reddit, with blackjack & ~~hookers~~ CSS. 
There actually aren't any real humans on Reddit, except you. 
I think it's a meme machine like Reddit. It's just you wouldn't, and shouldn't admit to people you go there IRL, so it's not really "social" 
That's what happens when you make a subreddit for a specific subgroup default for everyone 
imgur GIFs don't even work on Firefox since a good while. 
I started on imgur before coming here, (I still browse imgur regularly though) and many people linked to that sub even on imgur. At first I thought it was stupid of redditors to think that way but I gotta say I concur with most of the posts now. Partly because the imgur user base is infected with "honry 14 year olds". Way back in 2014 it was still enjoyable, but it's been really 9gag-esque recently. 
"Therapists hate what this guy did to cure his depression!" 
Yea! And validating my thoughts without my body getting away (this was more on my alt account). 
Don't try to tell him how to spell, he's almost a genius dude and you're just a redditor 
That episode had great character development for both Rick *and* Morty. Easily one of my favorite episodes. 
I talked to my gf too much for a period of time. And now she's my wife. Be careful. 
Oh I did it immediately after replying to you. Usually I wake up in the morning, and my first thought is "Shit! Drier time." 
Can confirm. I'm Aussie living in Canada and just leave the beer in the garage. I have no idea what to do with all this space in my fridge 
Oh my friend, you are so naive. Bing is far and away the best search engine for porn. Gotta beat Google at something. 
The Great Devourer is upon us! To arms, Battle Brothers, that we might vanquish the Emperor's foes! 
Eh, if you have nothing to do today then you're good. 
That was also part of the routine. But only took 5 minutes instead of 20. Could have stayed in bed longer if I knew. 
That's shitty as fuck. Another reason to go android. 
Usually if you explain once to kids they get it, and next time they somehow learn something you didn't know. Kids are great with technology. 
I have an app that cached version every day. But you have to download it and store it on your phone. 
Don't be, man. Dogs are our best friends. I hate to sound corny, but your gotta get back up on that horse. Its hard to let go, but my dog that I have now sleeps at the foot of my bed every night. I wouldn't of been able to get through some of the battles I've fought in life without him. As long as you treat them right, they will see you as their king and never leave your side and always have your back. 
I live in the Bay Area. Are those supposed to be outrageously high prices? Because I honestly can't tell anymore. 
Internet solipsism. That idea is actually quite old. I remember being in IRC and being the only non-bot. 
Guy uses reddit to cure his depression, you won't believe what happens next! 
If there's one thing I learned from reading about 4chan, it's not to challenge them to anything. They have some "creative" people there. 
"Shit! Dryer time!" being the lesser known original lyrics to Can't Touch This 
What has happened to us (us us us us), where are we going and where have we gone? 
But when i post, you never seem to up voote.. anymore 
There actually aren't any real humans on Regedit, except you. 
Only 90s kids will cure their depression with this one dank meme! 
Reposts. The comments can be really bad sometimes too. Like, offensive and getting away with it bad. 
It's actually just one guy. He's the one who leaked all those naked celebrities. I heard it on a very reputable news network. 
Some argue that those same clothes may be drying still to this day 
I broke into the reddit server room to make sure they were on Btw the server for the search function is running on a pentium 2 that was smoking 
Mesothelioma FYI if you write "meso" iOS auto completes 
I used to browse 9gag, but I got sick of the genral negativity and hate I see in every freaking comment section, so I moved over here 
You absolute legend of a digital representation of a person. I've recently been wondering where all those juicy videos I used to watch have been hiding. Side note, Bing should consider changing its name to Boing. 
You know there will now be a spike in searches for ' girl masterbates with coke can ' , the coke executives will be dumbfounded as to why, causing the pepsi executives to go out immediately and hire a bunch of porn stars to use pepsi cans in X rated vids hoping to get in on the action, average Joe on the street will hear about pepsi supporting the porn industry and boycott pepsi immediately, thousands of people will lose their jobs. Or not. Either way, strange niche. 
I was actually surprised that this isn't a thing yet 
Lol, so I guess everyone gets a lot of errors when searching stuff not only me? 
Man, you painted a picture there. Let's hope we at least see an upswing in pepsi porn vids without all the job losses. 
I am afraid you cant have your cake and eat it Marcel, or in this case your porn and drink it. At least all those losing their jobs will sleep easy knowing they were sacrificed for the greater good of the porn. A truly noble cause. 
I have always thought going to the zoo would be the perfect date! Zoos are pretty much giant parks with the perk of cool landscaping and obviously the animals. I would go on a Sunday in the fall when it's a bit chilly to avoid the crowds. Then walk around for a couple hours looking at all of the animals and maybe feed the giraffes. Then we could go find a nearby restaurant to find some hot chocolate and yummy food to warm up. Perfect day. I still haven't found anyone to do this with though. :/ 
I did this with a co worker once. Her date stood her up and she posted something about it on face book. I was still up so I messaged her, went and picked her up, hit up a late night taco place then went and chained smoked cigs on the top of our place of work. It was great. She was all dressed up too. I thought nothing of it, I went home and told her that whoever stood her up was an idiot. She messaged me back and told me I should have come inside her place after I dropped her off. I was naive as shit but none the less it was a great time! 
I'm really self aware about my chewing when I'm with someone in a quiet place :( 
One of my best dates ever was supposed to be a movie date, but we met up at a bookstore and that ended up being the date. Sweet, sweet bookstores. 
Dang. Usually Ikea is where you go later in your relationship to test it. Bold. 
Yeah, I like dates where we have an activity of some sort. I suck at small talk, which is like 95% of a first date. Having something to do/look at takes the pressure off of me to think of things to talk about. 
Movie or game you mutually enjoy. Coop makes a lot of things more fun. 
But board game dates only really work if you have known the other person for some time. I would absolutely love to do a board game date, but would never do it for a first date. 
I'd honestly rather watch someone play video-games most the time, my skills are... not awesome but I love watching the games actually go well lol 
"In terms of instant relief, cancelling plans is like heroin" 
This is a really sweet idea! My SO and I did this a couple of years ago. We put an air mattress inside the blanket fort because we're old (lol, 28 at the time, but it feels like 60) and needed the extra padding. We also made sure to include the TV in all of this planning so that we could watch things. Used some clamps to attach the blankets to chairs, strung up some christmas lights across the top. We made brownies and watched movies from our childhood. It was wonderful! 
I get that but I've noticed with my introverted friends that certain environments tend to be more stressful for them than they are for me. Background noise rarely bothers me (actually too much silence can be a problem) but I know it gets to some of my friends a lot. 
Dates are also eaten fresh without being dried, they are quite delicious this way however are quite difficult to come by unless you're in a date producing area. 
Ahh I see you plan on that date lasting 3 days, a solid strategy General Eisenhower. 
A couple that likes to analyze data and wonder about things and researching things. The discussions they would have during dinner/breakfast would be interesting. 
TIL I really want a girlfriend to have sleepovers with. I mean, I always knew I enjoyed sleeping in the bed with a woman, but I want the blanket forts.. 
And if you do go rock climbing, then you know how great it is to belay your partner. It's literally your responsibility to stare at their ass while they climb, give them encouragement, and catch them if they fall. Plus you can use cheesy lines when you lower them back down about an angel coming from heaven. 
In my experience, if someone says they're down for kissing, they usually end up doing a whole lot more Good rule of thumb: don't do anything you'll regret the next day 
If you favorite beach was 12 miles there and 2 miles back I'd be really wondering what was up 
What's the difference between normal pregnant and super pregnant? 
"Too long, didn't read". It's for long posts where people might be too lazy to read the whole thing. Basically, it's a short summary in the end of a long post so people can get the gist of the post without having to reading the whole post. TL;DR: it's a summary for the lazy. 
I'm no introvert but my friend truly is. A group of us were planning on going to the zoo then out for drinks last summer. I invited him and he literally asked me to record all the animals and send him the video so he could watch from home. Really hit me in that I never really realized how much he wanted to be part of our outings but just... couldn't. We talked about it later and planned small group video game nights at his place and he's really grown in many ways but I'll never forget that moment. I love being with people, hell I love traveling the world by myself and meetings all kinds of new people, but until that moment I never really understood how difficult it can be for some people. Broke my heart a bit but I hope I'm much less ignorant now. 
I've been in that same situation. Except no girl, no indication of intercourse and no rooftops. 
Bookstore dates are the best. There are unlimited things to talk about because every book is a topic of discussion. And you can really get to know a person by what kind of books they look at. 
Yep. I have many fond memories of getting into pointless arguments with my wife at Ikea. 
You two might enjoy this: I live in Rochester, NY - home of the National Museum of Play. I've been going there since I was a kid and every visit is better than the last. Took my girlfriend there on one of our first visits to my hometown. Almost got kicked out for trying to get too fancy with our slinky tricks. 
Art, culture, natural history... They're all wonderful. 
Haha. I made a grilled pineapple & chicken breast sandwich (w/ avocado) for my 3rd date with current gf of 4yrs. If someone made that for me, I'd date them too. 
PSA: If you cook for a living you will never have a dinner date because you are always working during normal dating hours. 
Trust me, you don't want that. Source: am alcoholic. 
Exactly. I just wanna hang out and not worry about what I have to say. Just enjoy things and have fun. 
All of that is incredibly endearing and attractive to me, tell me more Citizen. 
BANK YOUR ITEMS!!! Durial321 Green Partyhat, Ahrims, firecape, abyssal whip, obsidian shield, white hair. Cursed You's 99 construction party, world 111, Australian server. For real though I remember sitting in W2 Fally merching and PMs coming in from the forums pretending to make offers on rares if we went to world 111. Myself and several other people in that phat section outside the castle all got the same messages, lure attempts. Idk if anyone lost anything but everyone got super suspicious before we even knew what was happening. 
You can go to a coffee shop and play some simple ones that can be talked over. 
People create accounts and do what I said above to farm karma in hopes of selling an account to people willing to buy accounts with large amounts of karma. It's quickly becoming MUCH more common. One of the above even left a comment in this thread about their fiance passing away. It was likely just copy/pasted from a similar thread. Then you have people actually feeling bad and giving condolences when it's just some ass who stole someone else's possibly very real comment about their fiance passing away. 
I'm fairly good at video games (though my PvP skills are lacking most of the time), but I like watching them too. It's almost like playing it myself if I understand the mechanics. 
Especially when you made plans when you were feeling much more outgoing. 
That said it's the fucking worst when you were actually looking forward to it. 
I feel like that's more of a social anxiety thing. Like most introverts can handle being in a place with many people, as long as there personal group is smaller. 
Damn it. So you're telling me there are even more kinds of dates that I'll never get to experience?! 
I've suggested pillow forts to my exes, who rejected the idea so now they're my exes. 
I would love that. Seriously, it's a winner idea. Museums are usually hushed and quiet so you don't get to talk. Aquariums are usually kid based so talking and laughing is encouraged. 
Oh wow Congratulations and best wishes to you and your fiance! 
Man, I don't even need the date, I just wish my city had two galleries. 
I find it interesting which posts inspire your poems. It seems quite beautifully random. 
The part that most people can't get over is the long periods of time not catching anything. They go 10 minutes and if nothing bites, they want to leave. I don't go to catch fish. I go to relax my mind. Catching fish is just a bonus and there's very few people I know that think the same way. 
It works, but the important part was the guy chatted with them in person first and they "connected". It wouldn't work if they were at the same party, never met/introduced, and he messaged them out of the blue. It's all about the proper move in the proper situation. 
No only in this thread, but in every thread about introverts. 
How nice that you guys accomodate for him! Usually don't like going out unless I really enjoy their company but nope never experienced such 'special arrangements' been really tough forcing myself to go out nowadays haha 
Hey man, tacos and smokes ain't nothing to complain about. 
Argued for the whole drive home today about a stupid shoe rack. Don't know why but neither of us will back down. IKEA brings out the devil in people 
Every time people ask me why I dont go to the bars with them I just ask why they dont come to museums with me. 
Also PSA: if you date or marry a chef, they will not want to cook for you because they do it every day at work. Source: married to a chef. 
All that money and effort. Did it ever cross your mind to just learn to cook haha?! 
Yeah, I've seen alcoholics. That's why my body and I have this agreement where i can't drink past a certain limit on any given night or x amount of days in a row. My body appreciates it's health and i respect it. 
This is more or less what being introverted means. You get your energy from being alone, if your with people you get tired out. This is me. I like to be with people, I can be the life of the party. But for however much I put into being I a situation with a lot of people I have to recover afterwards. So it's important that my girlfriend knows that I really love to he with her. But after a time I just need to be alone to recharge. 
What's the strategy there? You're still going to get apocalypped at home. 
why would people pay money for unexisting online points to... wait nevermind, that's the whole point of mobile gaming... 
I do this A LOT. I get so mad at myself after I come down from my "I like people" high. 
NO, no one's getting hurt, but they don't know that! 
I'm extremely social around strangers, it just drains my energy. The next day I feel like death and just want to be in a dark room by myself. 
You can always pay to try dates you wouldn't normally get. 
Well if you weren't so adamant about the 'No Girls' sign, maybe they wouldn't have rejected the idea. 
Thanks! Actually, he proposed at an art museum too now that I think about it. It's a good go-to. 
An average human walks about 3.1 miles an hour, so 24 miles would be a little over 7 and a half Factoring in walking on sand and lunch, 9 sounds about right. 
He's a great guy. Huge heart. We all have our quirks ya know? Helping someone navigate the waters of who they are is what makes being someone's friend so awesome. It was just an eye-opening "experience" for me. Well if you are ever in Chicago let me know! Be a pleasure to do something fun that you feel comfortable doing. I obviously don't know you or what how you feel in social situations but I will say that at least in my friends case, he always says "it's almost always worth the risk." I truly hope you find happiness on this crazy ass rollercoaster they call life! 
Quite true. I wrote my response to OPs post rather quickly. He indeed suffers from social anxiety and at one time, did so to an extreme degree. My point was it took something that drastic to make me realize he simply wasn't just a bit introverted and that some people have seriously different "mental and emotional outlooks and experiences" regarding socializing. Perhaps it was my lack of insight and or ignorance on the issue but my post was simply explaining what it took for me to be aware of certain differences and the degree of said differences between a friend and I. If that makes sense. 
Who on earth goes out with their girlfriend and ex wife at the same time? What an awful idea. 
Seriously. I don't how furniture comes to represent abstract aesthetic principles and core moral values, but it do. I once spent $1200 on a coffee table, mostly because my wife and I both liked it, at the same time. 
They should really set up a bar at museums, you may be onto something here. 
Agreed. Except when you do it and you see how much they appreciate it. Source: Was a chef. 
Netflix and Black Mirror. That'll lead to discussion, and possibly troubled dreams. 
It's still pretty active, was playing osrs a few weeks ago and places were full of people, lots of bots on f2p servers though. 
One of the most famous events in RuneScape history, if I recall 
Reddit accounts with more karma are more 'trusted'. Imagine a 1d old reddit account with 0 karma is saying in an AskReddit thread about a hobby: "this product here is really great! It helped me a lot with this and enables me doing that.". Then you have a few other 0 karma reddit accounts confirming it. It looks like they are bought and a company is using it to advertise. Now imagine multiple reddit accounts with thousends of karma points and different age. It looks way more natural and people may believe them. 
So this is a common thing... I feel a little better about myself. 
I love the way Mulaney emphasizes things. I can just hear it in my head as I read that, it makes things so much more hilarious. 
Tell me it was on the Rocky steps, and your name is Adrian. 
Yeah but if you get a GPS you will find that a 3mph walk is actually fairly brisk. Certainly more so than you would do on a beach stroll. Not to mention walking in sand is tiring as fuck. Would not recommend a marathon as a first date unless you really know how in shape each other are. 
You are a great person who's just trying to be a good person and I applaud and am grateful for that. 
That can happen? I thought I was in the clear because I wouldn't give a shit about the furniture. 
Depends entirely on the episode. San Junipero is a beautiful love story. 
Oof, no dice. You talked your way right out of a deal. 
For me I either need 3:1 ratio friends to strangers or literally **no** friends at all and no one who knows me. 
I've never thought of it that way. Thanks for the perspective. It helps. Sadly I've chosen to pursue a career that requires near constant social interaction (teaching), but I find the job so fulfilling. It's such a weird thing to find something that makes me so stressed but also happy. I hope it doesn't wear me down too much. 
Oh no, I meant I wonder if my account is still active. But that's good to hear too! I'll be getting into the union pipefitters fairly soon so I'll have the cash to build a proper gaming computer. All for runescape lol. 
One of the most famous events in mmorpg history! Not many times that the players have been able to exploit a glitch and massacre innocent people 
I was just thinking the same thing. I thought I was just some weirdo who did these things.... but YAY we can all be weird now! 
Yea, not only that but you're basically spending time together during which you dont interact **first**. Like getting to know each other and **then** going to see a movie sounds fine. 
I'm a mental health practitioner, and am going to grad school to get my Masters of Social Work. It is literally my job to interact with people, and at parties I can be at least moderately charismatic, and was even been accused of being "charming" on one occasion. I'm also an introvert. Social anxiety is not the same as introversion, and I wish people would stop conflating them. 
You've been hit by, you've been hit by a smooth criminal! 
It was in the garden, surrounded by these plants that look like hairy testicles. I still tease him about that. 
That's very kind and much appreciated. I don't think of myself as a good person much less a great one. I've made many mistakes and have done many things I'm far from proud of. I simply love people. Getting to know them, learning what makes them tick. Making the people around you happy is a high unlike any other (and I would know, for better or for worse). Life (IMO) is generally lonely as we live so much of it in our minds. Sharing what makes you YOU with other people is magical. Eats away at said inherrent lonliness and makes each day a bit more unique and life a bit brighter. 
Right? She cooks, I help, and clean. The circle of life. 
Capri sun with the straw and string cheese or I'm leaving. 
For me I need 7:2:1 ratio dogs to friends to strangers or I will feel scared 
Well hopefully you get a class that you love teaching. I've found if the subject matter is up my alley I can gab about it for hours, and just be beat afterwards. Trying to strike up conversations with a bunch of people uninterested in any of my interests though is painful. 
As long as we can be weird in our own homes I'm down. 
fun fact, it was supposed to be "magnum condoms for my monster dong", Danny mixed up the 2 and it was perfect to make it more funny on accident. 
I kind of see the value in movie first then dinner. It gives you a really easy go to topic to talk about if you panic and can't think of anything else. 
I have never read a more accurate sentence. Also according to RES I have upvoted you quite a lot. So well done for whatever you've done in the past to deserve that. 
You're afraid of making a fool of yourself in front of people you know you'll see again, I guess. When you're around complete strangers, there isn't that risk. 
Yeah, fingers crossed. The age level I am teaching doesn't really seem to care abut anything ever which is tough, but I knew what I was signing up for. Honestly, what's been most surprising is that it hasn't been super hard to socialize with the students. I'm not saying that it's a cake walk it's just not as hard as I thought it would be.... it's actually the other teachers that I find myself unable to speak to. It's weird. 
Obviously it's an online meeting place only where the word 'plans' doesn't exist. 
 A cannibal's cellmate went missing, and he told the warden that he ate him. The warden didn't believe him, so the cannibal finally threw up his hands out of frustration. 
I wish there was a way to see the posts/comments you upvoted. Sometimes I come across someone I've upvoted before and I just wonder why. 
Speaking of choosing a career that seems to be against personality type, I'm an introverted radio announcer/host. My friends always wonder why I did that to myself, but as long as I've prepared and I care about the subject matter talking into a mic in an empty room is no big deal. It's socializing with my coworkers after a day of work that I dread. 
I feel like this joke is going to get hidden here in these comments, but I love it. 
I once took a drink of coke from a straw, but was expecting a drag from my cigarette. Wrong pipe. 
I constantly do weird shit in my sleep. My poor boyfriend has to put up with it constantly. Sometimes I'll just tell him stuff. Most of the time, if he stays up later than me, I'll come out a few hours after I've gone to sleep and just stand in the living room like a zombie. I've even come in and sat down on the couch next to him, completely asleep. One time he came to bed a few hours after me, and when he walked in the door I screamed at the top of my lungs like a banshee. I have no memory of it. I just remember waking up a second later to a sore throat and a terrified boyfriend. 
Or rise your paintbrush w/ coffee and dont notice until your paint looks odd or you drink your coffee. 
That's slightly(?) better than when I took a swig of the mouthwash and just directly swallowed it. Ugh. 
I had to read this twice before I realized that you meant that you ate the sandwich and not that you tried to take a bite out of your tv. 
Whoops lol! What did you tell your boss? "Sorry, I accidentally went home..." 
Hahaha, that's brilliant. Reminds me of a time when I was out having a drink with two of my friends and one of their girlfriends. My friends girlfriend went to pass my other friend a drink and then he just hugged her, not seeing the drink in her hand. They don't know each other that well either, but it was so funny and awkward. For some reason he just assumed she was going for a hug and he thought she was being weird but he didn't want to offend her. 
When I first started shaving I was always scared that my "autopilot would misfire" and that I would pick up my razor and put toothpaste on it and try to brush me teeth. It was a strange amount of concentration that I conjured up to make sure it was definitely my toothbrush I picked up. 
I just took a shower, applied deodorant, and then dried it off with my towel because it was moist. Edit - I should add, this was a roll-on deodorant. It's supposed to be moist for a bit. 
My uncle has told a similar story. After a long night of hosting a BBQ with friends, he's sitting out in his yard just looking at the stars. The dog was wandering around and he calls her over. She doesn't come at first, but he calls her a few more times and she makes her way over. He reaches down to pet her and notices something off after a moment. Instead of her fluffy, curly fur it was rough. He looks down and realizes he's been calling and petting a raccoon. He says the raccoon was giving him the look of "hey man, why'd you stop?" 
I really want there to be a part two where you start saying grace at someone in the drive-thru. 
My mom has a car with a touchless remote entry and ignition system. I was driving her the one day and dropped her off at one shop while I went to another a few k's away. As I was getting out (engine already off), I realised who had the keys... 
A friend of mine brought me a bowl of juice once (5th grade-ish) and then me and his family made fun of him for a few years. I drank out of the bowl 
i posted this up a little further, but i tried to turn the sun off with my tv remote one morning. i was very frustrated when the sun was still blinding me and my tv kept turning on and off. 
I worked ar a major Canadian telecom company. I frequently had customers call in yelling about their bill/TV lineup/internet speed. Only to eventually find they were with our competitor. You'd think it would make a convenient opportunity for sales, but most customers were so embarrassed they'd just hang up. 
I work at Sears. During a transaction one time, a guy was paying with a chip card when he asked me what time the store closes. I tried to say "You can remove your card" and "The store closes at 9:00" simultaneously which resulted in "You can remove your close." 
I lived in the same building my first two years of college. First day I was in a new place I ended up at the old building and it took me 7-8 swipes to figure out why my key card wasn't letting me in. 
There was a GTA San Andreas mission in where you had to rob a house. I was with my brother and my cousin while my cousin was playing and we were all silently watching, then my brother said something I don't remember and I put my finger on my lips and said ''shh!!!''. They laughed a lot at me. 
In all seriousness, this is why everyone with a baby should get some kind of alarm to prevent them leaving the baby in the car. All it takes is one sleepy day. 
Cup of coffee in my left, same arm with my watch. "Hm, what time is it? (turn wrist to look at watch, pour coffee on my feet) Oh shit that was dumb. ... Hm, what time is it?" (pours more coffee on my feet) 
I can just imagine a guy standing in his driveway, confused as hell, as his exes kid walks into the house. And of course when you go in, he's got his shoes off, feet propped up on the couch, and SpongeBob on. I mean, you can't just put him back outside haha. 
Did exactly this with some awesome pineapple cider I'd made. After I added the rum. Good rum. Also cried. 
Co-worker of mine told me about the last time he went to the cinema. As he was walking out, he hit the remote unlock for his truck, them watched a few seconds later as a guy and his wife climbed into his vehicle. Theirs was parked two stalls further down, was an identical vehicle, and the guy had hit his unlock at the same second and watched my buddy's lights flash. They shared a good laugh about it. 
Well at least you knew where that one disappeared to. 
I sat at a green light for a full cycle waiting for it to change to red once. Cars were backed up for a block or two. 
I used to do that when I was younger, I thought it was time efficient 
Why not just take the train back in the morning and then drive home? Unless of course you're charged for parking overnight then hell no. 
Haha i always do this, these days i was using my phone's flashlight to find my phone, then i realised... 
Wow, my university would have just towed my car and given me a ticket for good measure. 
I've done exactly this, woke up dead certain I'm late for work and was grabbing my keys before I realized it was way too dark outside. The funny thing is that I saw the time on my clock but totally ignored it. 
I once wrote a card to my mum and gave it to my sister to give to her since she would see her on the day and I wouldn't. She accidentally posted it without thinking. On the front of the envelope it just said Mum. I often wonder what the mail people thought of that one. 
I remember when that earthquake hit DC(around 2011?) and I thought my brother was shaking the living room somehow, so I hit him in the back of the head. 
Haha, Ive pinched to zoom printed pictures multiple times. 
So I'm really allergic to chocolate, to preface this story. So I'm at work one, doing my barista thing, when the chocolate syrup gets a little rowdy and ends up all over my hands. I look down at my wrist, see a little splotch of it, think "I should get that off before I start getting hives", and casually lick it off. Wtf, brain? 
Many a morning I've ripped open my packs of Equal and poured the contents into the trash. Once I tossed the empty packets into the coffee cup. 
It's worse when your brain auto fills when in the dark, everything turns into demon. 
In MA at an amusement park most the women's rooms are on the right, one by the food court is on the left, where the men's generally is. My friend was in, exited a stall and headed to the sink as a guy came in, talking on his phone, he made *direct eye contact* with her, turned into a stall and kept talking. Other women came in, heard his voice, whispered to her, "Is that a guy?" She waved her hand nonchalantly, "Yeah, but he doesn't realize where he is." He concluded his call, left the stall, looked rather shocked, and failed to wash his hands as he hastily exited. She giggled all the way back to our table. 
This is how the female bird proves her mothering skills to a potential mate, a regurgitation demonstration. 
Oh my god flashback. My friend told us the wrong apt building letter when we first moved him in. Flash forward a couple of months and me and another friend drunkenly make our way back from the bar and end up without thinking walk into the wrong apt. I really had to take a piss but remember something off but immediately dismissed it as I scrambled the bathroom. I took a piss started walking back out the living area see a kid and a black lady and my friend looked like he'd seen a ghost. I said sorry like 5 different ways as I basically ran back outside. LPT if you have a small child lock your freaking door and try not to look like my buddy's apt if at all possible. 
I really hope there is no other communication with your friend. You: knock knock knock Buddy: "hey TheDoctorRobert, what's up" You: "FUCK" walks away 
Once accidentally formatted my hard drive instead of clicking the properties button and went though the dialogues not even thinking about it 
I did this! Eventually reverse would not work at all but I was a poor college student who couldn't afford a fix. So what I would do is always find somewhere to park that I could pull straight through, or park on a hill and put it in neutral. You can imagine the ridiculousness of the ONLY time I got stuck by this problem was my grandpas funeral. I thought the cemetery was a full loop so I went last in line. Apparently it was a closed loop, had my cousins and uncles have to push my Chevy blazer backwards through a cemetery in their nice clothes. 
1. In this story, the protagonist tackles a simple problem with a well-intentioned, but incorrect, approach. Several metaphors are present in this brief piece. What does the running water represent? What does the light switch represent? What does the tool box represent? 2. There are two sisters in this story. What is their significance? How would the story be changed if one sister were absent? If both? 3. Compare and contrast the protagonist in this narrative with the mythical figure Sisyphus. How do they resemble one another? How do they differ? 
I take orders over the phone and have had a few customers tell me that they love me. I always answer, "I love you too" 
Reminds me of when my mum told me that when we were kids she put my newborn brother down on his feet half thinking it was me (3 years old at the time) expecting him to toddle off of course he fell on his face 
Well coke and a straw are a classic inhalation combo anyway, you just had the wrong coke. 
I did something similar once. I aim for 8-hour work days, and come in to work at 7:30. I usually work through lunch, eating at my desk, which means I leave by 3:30. I almost never leave the building for lunch. One time I did, drove 10 miles away to meet someone for lunch, proceeded to have an hour-long lunch with them, then drove home, took my shoes off, fired up my computer before I realized. 
I too worked for an autoparts store. My boss one took the company Truck and the keys to the company car home. Luckily he left his keys in his car so we made deliveries in his Mazda RX8. 
When people reach their hand out so I can pass an object they want to them, I like to shake their hand instead. 
That's a rational fear. A friend did that when we were young, his lips got fuckeddd. 
This made me so sad. Just imagining raccoons trying to domesticate themselves like they saw cats do but it just won't work for them. But they're animals so they don't know why, they just keep trying the same things. 
I answered my home phone with my drive-thru greeting several times when I first started. 
Seriously, same here. I've never upvoted and laugh-cried to so ment comments in a single thread before. My favorite so far is the one where the guy is supposed to be praying but says the McDonald's greeting. I fucking died 
You're lucky, I got off a red eye and drove almost two hours to my old home, only to wonder WTF was going on when a guy pulled into the drive in front of me and went in the front door of MY HOUSE... Had the dread that maybe my wife was cheating on me somehow and this was one of those "come home early and catch her in the act" I'm devistated for a minute, then angry, then resigned to at least see it to conclusion... Then I realize I fucking moved a couple of weeks before. So I had breakfast at the old diner then drove the hour and a half back to my new home where I caught my wife.... Sleeping in! 
I did that as a kid in the 7th grade. I walked home from school, jiggled the doorknob, knocked impatiently, knocked again, and the door was opened by a very angry man. I am pretty sure I just stared and stammered an apology as I backed up confused.. Then it hit me that we had moved. 
HOME INVASION I failed at that so much I never forgot its name. 
This happened to me. I was probably about four at the time and my mom and I went somewhere in our minivan, we got home and I was asleep in the back seat. She let me sleep there in the garage for a little bit not wanting to wake me I guess but then my dad took the van to go collect rent from a house they were renting. Well my dad never noticed me in the back so I wake up in the van on the side of the road in a neighborhood I have never seen before. I get out and walk to the nearest house and knock on the door. Some man answers and I say I need to call my mommy and daddy (to my memory I knew my home number but who knows if I actually did this was forever ago) well as I am walking through the house my dad was sitting on the couch and goes "oy! thats my son!" still would love to know wtf my dad must have been thinking like how the fuck did he get here 
my dad rode his bike with the kiddie seat on the back to my school, except he forgot to put me in it. I was too young to remember but apparently I was still standing in the driveway being sleepy af 
I couldn't figure out why the exes dad story was weird until I read your comment. It didn't occur to me that at the time she was already an ex. 
You're not alone in doing this...I was incredibly happy for two weeks at how soft our clothes were suddenly with the new magical laundry detergent. They didn't smell bad or anything. Sigh, I realized what I had done when looking at the bottle while talking on the phone to my mother. 
I understand K-cups. I understand coffee machines. What's the value of a K-Carafe? You're only spending more money it seems like. 
Yup, been there, except I always take my shirt off after my shoes, so I did that instead. I started to unbutton my shirt and the (FFS why was she attractive) TSA lady was like "Slow down sir we just met". I didn't know they came with a sense of humor. 
Once watched a guy get into a car, close the door, fumble with the steering wheel, open the door, step out and look at the car for a few seconds, then realize his car was parked right next to it. Gold Grand Am vs Silver Taurus. 
Had a similar thing happen except the key also started the car, and we drove a mile or 2 away until we realized our car didn't have a sunroof and took it back. The owner of the car was just standing there unsure where his car was. Then 3 strangers just drive into the parking lot and get out of it. 
My cat did this to me when i was younger. She was in there for a good 3 minutes before i went back to hear what the thumping was. I was mortified and felt so bad. She was fine though, lived a good decade and a half after the incident. I still double check the dryer before starting it to this day. I miss that cat. 
"Christ, people sure love honking their horns today" 
You used to expose yourself to your coworkers? How did that work out for you? 
I'm guessing that anywhere that has a metro system worth using for someone with a car has insane rates for parking. 
I have to be at school at 7. Sometimes I get up too early and look at the clock and go *oh shit it's 4:40 I have to leave in like 5 minutes* 
From what I'm told, this will linger for at least 20 years. 
Oh gosh I do that all the time. I work at a hardware store and the Saturday shifts are 10 hours (8-6). Once there was a 20% everything sale and it was on a Saturday I worked. I was so brain dead I greeted a customer with "have a nice day" 
I sometimes answer my personal phone, "good morning, workplace name, how may I help you?" I'd feel bad about it if I haven't caught my coworkers doing the exact same thing. 
I did something similar with a water glass and forgetting about refilling it. Tipped the drink back at full force to get the "last dregs"... yeah, no, spilt like half my water all down my front. 
Lol, instead of deodorant I grabbed a flash light and shown it over my tooth brush waiting for something to happen 
When I was a kid the clothes hamper was just across from the toilet. When getting ready for a bath, I frequently threw my socks into the toilet. I remember this largely pissing off my dad on more than one occasion. Really didn't mean to. They also never moved the damn hamper. 
A bug once landed on my phone's screen and I wanted to show it to a friend I was texting at the time so I took a screenshot. I was wondering why the bug wasn't showing up in the photos until I realized that I'm a fucking dumbass. 
It would be even worse if it happened during the day as well. 
After each of my cats passed away id see them everywhere out of the corner of my eye. At first id say their names to greet them then slowly began catching myself. Then over time i stopped seeing them. I never got another pet but i see them in my dreams sometimes still. 
The best part is how casual your brain is about it but registers that it doesn't make sense. 
Who doesn't lock their door?! I just don't understand this. 
1. The running water represents all of life's troubles. Evidence: The narrator wants to shut it off, as she must want to shut off her troubles. The light switch symbolizes the narrator's thirst for insight onto the methods of turning off the water. The tool box represents the narrator's attempts to solve her problems which end up having no use when it turns out that the others have already solved the problem. 2. The significance of the two sisters represents the narrator's relationship with society. Having only one sister would imply that the narrator had no relationship with society. A lack of sisters would simply mean the story wouldn't exist. 3. Sisyphus and the protagonist have many similarities, in a modern fashion. Both the narrator and Sisyphus worked on pointless scenarios. Contrast: While Sisyphus was condemned to attempt to solve said problem forever, the narrator was intervened upon by an outside force which ended up solving said problem. 
Vitamin A in the B hole, vitamin C in the D hole. 
I like to switch to bump it. Then when they do it I grab and shake their fist. 
We don't have racoons in the UK but I always seemed to think they got a bad rep based on American TV. They look kind of cute yet everyone appears to be terrified of them. Cyril sneer was a prick though. 
When I worked at Subway in high school, I came in really tired one day and the phone was ringing. In front of a bunch of customers, I just went, "Hello?" The person on the other end asks, "...Hi, is this Subway?" "Nope." And I hung up. Then realized that it was in fact Subway and I'm just a dumbass. 
Some friends of mine went on holiday in Italy, and stayed at their friend's holiday house. When they got there, they got the key from under the doormat, and they found a few bottles of expensive wine in the fridge. They stayed there for the weekend and had a great time. When they got home they called their friend to thank them, and they thanked them for leaving the wine. The owner was really confused, cause he hadn't left any wine for them. Turns out they went to the wrong house. 
It didn't occur to me that it wasn't his kid. I thought, "So he left the kid with his ex when they broke up, and now he can't even refer to him as his son?" It took me a while to realize his ex had the kid before she met him. 
The past two times I've flown the TSA guards checking IDs were doing their own stand up routine. I've noticed it before too, I think they encourage it. This one overweight nerdy looking guard had completely mastered the art of self-deprecating humor, had our whole line in stitches. 
This happened to me with my Jeep Grand Cherokee. Afterwards, I spent too long sitting in the driver's seat wondering, "Why would my key open this lock?" 
I love when you sit there thinking "Who's the asshole who's holding everyone up?" Then you realize it's you. 
I miss "Deep Thoughts" *Is there anything sadder than watching a mosquito sucking on a mummy?* 
I went to a conference in DC. "Just park at the hotel" they said. "It'll be comped" they said. $37 for 3 hours. **And it wasn't even downtown. It was up near the damn zoo.** 
"Nurse, hand me the rubber screwdriver with the smiley face." 
I've had the opposite problem. I've looked at the clock at 7:55 and think "Oh good, 25 minutes until work starts and it's a 20 minute drive." And my work starts at 8. 
Ha! I've been there before. Cashier at a grocery store for too long. On at least one occasion I would greet someone with "Hey! Have a nice day!..........." 
I've done this, but also the opposite - just hang up from a private conversation with my mom while on break, phone rings and I answer instinctively, have a short work-related exchange with the radiology department and accidentally say "okay, I love you, be careful" instead of goodbye. Radiologist quick on the uptake says, "I love you, too, thanks" and we hang up. I sit for a minute trying to figure out why this feels weird. 
Well at least you'd met your sodium goal for the next year. Sounds pretty efficient to me. 
Tornado? DO CPR! Gunshot wound? remember to conserve water - flush the toilet less often! Landslide? APPLY PRESSURE. 
you guys need to start brushing your teeth after your morning coffee instead of before. 
I was on the phone with my mom and she was giving me information about vacation dates, and rather than write it down, I clicked the screenshot buttons with the phone still to my ear. 
A full-grown bear has likely never met anything or anyone it had to give a shit about. That's what's nice about being a bear. Bear don't care. 
One night, a short while after my cat died, I took my sweater off in my sleep. I woke up, petting something soft curled up by my stomach. So of course I cried over a stupid sweater. 
Then it tries to ease you into thinking its a weird place for a dragon to be, almost like it didn't mess up in the first place. What a slacker. 
Just limply hold their fist and say, "Paper beats rock" 
They are extremely destructive. You thoguht a cat was bad? Give raccoons a week in your attic. AAAAAAAAAAAAAANYTHING tearable will be totally shredded. They tend to be agressive little shits. I accidentally disturbed one who was in the garbage can one morning without realising it. He came barreling out straight at me. I punted the little shit and he -came back at me-. I was about 10 at the time so I flipped and ran. Wild raccoons are not to be fucked with. Tame raccoons... are still not to be fucked with. They are -tame- not domesticated. 
I just flew cross country and I'm (temporarily) in a wheelchair. The TSA lady patted me down and as she was shaking out my bra I said "woah. At least buy me dinner first!" She looked at me and said "I guess we skipped straight to the third date huh?" Totally dead pan. Cracked me the fuck up. Made the wheelchair issue less awful. 
Car keys actually aren't as safe as you'd think, some models more than others. 
*HONK! HONK! HONK HONK!* Me: Huh, I wonder why everyone's honking... I guess I should too. *joins in honking* Me: Oh, wait a second... 
I had to go into Manhattan to pick up something from a store on Fifth Avenue last December. There was one place (the closest place to the store) that was **$54 for ONE HOUR**. Fortunately we found a place a few blocks away that was like $30 for 2 hours, which was reasonable enough for what we needed. 
"We're losing him" "Damn it get me the squeaky hammer and an orange bolt" 
More often than I care to admit, when I first wake up, I'll think there are 100 minutes in an hour... 
I work at a grocery store too and sometimes when I'm buying stuff on my day off I have to stop myself from asking people if they are finding everything okay. 
There's a local radio station in my town that calls random business's to try and get them to reciprocate saying I love you at the end of the call. 
Getting naked, falling asleep, and pissing all over myself. God I miss Geometry class. 
"What the fuck? You guys told me this shit doesn't happen here! God DAMMIT!" 
see fuck-ups like this are just ideas for technologists of what things *should* exist. 
I secretly walk around naked under my clothes every day ;) 
Shaking out your bra? Is that a typo, or are they extra *extra* careful about underwear now? 
My boss once drove out of a parking lot and down the street before realizing it wasn't her van 
"He's lost ..Hand me the smiling phone with giant numbers I gotta make a call *ring ring* hello? No Elmo I need to speak to mrs. Johns .. Elmo put me through.. GOD DAMIT Elmo she's lost her husband !" 
I work at a hardware store and have that same problem, I full on helped this nice old lady find the nails her husband had asked her to get for a project. It started out with her just asking if I knew anything about them and if those were the ones he was talking about. They weren't and I did help her find the right ones but after she walked away I had a bit of a wtf moment when I realized that it was my day off and I was in there for my own stuff. 
...how do they do this? Like how would one get somebody to accidentally say this? Do they just say it first and then see if they respond? 
I tell everyone I love them all the time. Customers, coworkers, sales people, cashiers, you name it. My mother ingrained that shit into me. Bought a new battery for my car a couple weeks ago, and told the guy behind the counter I loved him. You should have seen the look on his face. 
That explains why it takes so damn long in hospitals to get a doc to see you. 
My experience is if you ignore them, they'll ignore you. I was walking down by the river last summer and I heard someone walking behind me. I didn't think twice about it until something caught my attention and I turned around.. only to see a black bear sauntering down the path 100 or so feet behind me. If they're in the yard, though, we just let them be and call the neighbours. They're kind of cute. 
This is the kind of depraved shit I come to reddit for. 
"Elmo no understand the fragile mortality of human existence! *HEHEHEHEH!*" 
Oh god I do this too. Plus, being very affectionate and half Italian, I have a "kissing zone" and if you accidentally get in it and I'm tired and distracted, it can get awkward. 
Isn't there a thing about Black Bears being real curious and following hikers etc for miles. 
"He's flatlining!" "You're using an ETCH-A-SKETCH for his heart monitor??!!!!" 
Better than probing our cows and mutilating our anuses. 
You get my vote only if you start construction on the planet-destroying space station before you run for president. I need to see some initiative here. Schematics at the very least. 
While that certainly could be true, it's dangerous to apply human-values, ethics, and feelings to an alien species. Do they care about other life? Do they have an urge to explore and/or communicate? Would they wipe-us out because they consider humans too warlike? Would they wipe us out because we're not aggressive enough? Would there even be a 'they' ? Would aliens be individuals, a society/culture, or a hivemind? There's a HUGE amount of unknowns here, and unfortunately when faced with that many unknowns, paranoia is probably a good policy. 
This is a very presumptive thing to claim. A significantly advanced civilzation could very well be benevolent. The fact of the matter is, we don't know what they'd think of us if they're significantly more advanced, because we have no idea where we will be as a society in thousands or millions of years. One thing we can say for sure though, is that the more advanced we have become, the larger the humanitarian effort we seem to strive for, which would imply that it's actually more likely that a significantly advanced civilzation would be benevolent than malevolent. Stephen hawking is a fucking physicist, not a social psychologist. His opinion on this matter is as useless as my opinion on whale porn, which is to say not at all. 
We'd be the conquering alien menace that you see in scifi movies. 
Idea #1 makes me feel like we need a Master Chief. 
Or even more relevant, The Dark Forest. "The first axiom is that survival is the primary need of civilization. Therefore, civilizations will do whatever it takes to ensure their own survival. The second axiom is that civilizations always grow and expand, but the amount of matter and resources in the universe are finite." "The universe is a dark forest where every civilization is a silent hunter. They desperately try to stay undetectable while hunting for other planets to colonize and threats to destroy." 
In Alien, humanity has expanded well past our own planet and is exploring the universe. In Independence Day, humans are able to destroy the alien attackers and presumably use their technology to advance our own technology so we can go into space and defend ourselves. Neither of those is anywhere near worst-case. Worst-case is either humanity's chances of successfully escaping this planet in a significant way disappear within 100 years of now, or aliens obliterate us silently by a kinetic strike we never see coming. What I'm getting at here is that none of our movies come even close to addressing just how bad things can actually get. 
The problem is, the city is huge and the buildings in it are so far apart we cant tell if any of them are occupied. Infact we cant even see the the buildings, we only know they are there by indirect means. So this city could be overflowing with life, but we just cant prove it yet. 
What about the other smart people that disagree with him? 
Eh, not so much. Diseases evolved along with us. Their bugs would be pretty useless in an alien biology. 
I disagree with that premise, because I think it's the very *slightness* of the difference that makes it significant. After all, we like other animals. 
I CONCUR WITH THIS SENTIMENT. CERTAINLY ANY HANDSOME INVADERS CURRENTLY ON OUR PLANET EARTH SURELY WILL BE NICE TO US HUMANS. 
Perhaps they communicate by sticking things up each other's arseholes, and simply can't understand why their diplomatic overtures are ignored. 
Well if they don't fight, SUIT UP BOYS, WE'RE INVADING ANOTHER PLANET! 
It's intentional satire. It literally cribs shots from Triumph of the Will to highlight that the Federation are basically space nazis. The filmmakers wanted to subvert the ideas of the original novel which they found disturbingly pro-fascism. I agree it would be really interesting to see someone re-adapt the novel in a way that's truer to its roots though. 
It's really different from the movie but definitely worth reading 
Womprats? That won't be a problem. Something that size is too small to hit, even for a computer. 
That's exactly the experience in foreign policy that makes me so qualified for this role. 
You, [sir][madam][miss][m'lord][m'lady][fellow citizen], have intelligence we could put to use. How would you feel about a job in a secret underground laboratory? Housing is supplied. We offer competitive health insurance and the chance to work with many exciting and unshielded materials. 
Exactly. Inverse square laws are keeping us safe. 
The rabbit hole goes pretty deep. It could be that communication is a uniquely human construction, or at least unique to earth's lifeforms. Or even consciousness as we know it. Who knows how aliens might think. They might not even think in a traditional sense. 
While I agree with you on almost everything you said, I don't think Hawking's opinion is worthless. He's a very intelligent and accomplished human being, so I consider his opinion worth considering. 
If it's anything like the 1% here on Earth treat their pets, then sign me up! Rich people like to spoil their pets more than what an average family spoil their kids. 
I think it's impossible to know if an extraterrestrial being doesn't already have human beings in their possession and in an artificial environment for study. 
This is assuming we get invaded by space Catholics. 
I think that assumption is based on us running into aliens just like us. Which is really, really unlikely. 
Any species capable of doing us harm probably already has the necessary understanding of some way to harvest energy that our understanding of nuclear reactions isn't of enormous importance to them 
i think its about time space got a nice dose of freedom 
There was another episode where aliens came down and told us they were disappointed in our petty wars, so we all got together and ended them. After a while they came back and explained that we missed the point and and the point of our existence was to be a warrior race we should've moved on to much bigger wars by now. 
We don't know that. Inter-Species aggression could be an absolutely foreign idea. That's the fun part of these discussions. Reality, expectations, previous social experience. It all goes out the window. 
There are very educated linguists and anthropologists that have ideas that should allow for eventual communication with anything that even vaguely resembles a sentient animal. Plans that start with fundamental constants of the universe to prove our sapience, moving into things like theory of mind and basic verbs that should make rudimentary communication slow but possible 
Don't mistake the theory for being a *guarantee* that aliens would be hostile... it merely says that in a universe of scarcity there's enough uncertainty that, when dealing with aliens over interstellar distances, the safest choice a civilization has is *assuming* hostility. There are, of course, a multitude of possible paths of social evolution, and many possible strategies for coping with scarcity. The creature that destroys all competition might be the fittest, but so may the creature that forms a stable equilibrium with their environment/other creatures. The uncertainty, mainly, is the problem. 
Read this as Master Chef and was utterly confused. 
I see this: 1st act: Hundreds of billions of AI bug sized drones seperate from the drop ships and insert custom tailored viruses into every living human, animal, plant, plankton, etc. Everything macro dies. 2nd act: "Terraforming" machines tailor atmosphere for alien home flavor. 3rd act: Bacteria and funguses are allowed to eat biomass of dead flora and fauna for a number of years to eliminate food sources. 3rd act: bacteriophages are cloud released which wipe out a vast majority living flora on earth, bacteria, algae, funguses included. 4th act: a waiting period is instituted for all viruses to expire. 4th act: AI bugs are repurposed to reseed planet with Alien flora and Fauna, thereby outcompeting any surviving earth lifeforms that werent starved from ecosystem collapse. 5th act: Aliens arrive and leisurely walk to the beach to enjoy their new planet, the 385th of their Nation. 
Exactly it would be like a virus that infects plants being put in your dinner. You wouldn't even notice 
Some guy was trying to tell me at the bar the other night that he bullseye's womprats with his T16 - as a hobby! Yeah right. 
That's exactly the kind of answer that makes me wonder if you have built any chairs in your life. 
Or their form of communication actually damages humans in some way. What if they try to return contact to us with powerful radiation waves? 
There is a novelette "roadside picnic" about aliens landing, utterly decimating small tracts of land and then... Just leaving. And leaving behind all kinds of dangerous, unpredictable, incredibly valuable things in their wake. The best theory anyone can come up with is that the visit was the equivalent of humans stopping at the side of the road for a picnic and leaving all their garbage (and maybe a few items of trivial value) behind for the ants go find. The ants don't know how a nearly dead battery works, or why this food that tastes good doesn't provide any actual energy, or what a watch is for. 
you're right. someone here has a real optimism malfunction if that's the best scenario their imaginations can come up with. 
Then we give them revenge syphilis That whole disease transmission thing goes both ways... 
Those have a fundamental realism issue in that all biological entities are necessarily capable of converting raw materials into biomass, or acquiring it by basic predation. In short, if they wake up one morning with a pressing need to travel several million light-years because they've forgotten how to rearrange carbon molecules into the requisite amino acids and whatnot they need, something very odd has happened. 
If they treat us the way we treat animals, it's very possible they'll label our planet a protected conservation zone and do everything they can to keep us from going extinct. 
Dude what if we're in the artificial environment now! 
Space fundamentalists could be pretty devastating. What if their holy book says they are the only intelligent life in the universe? Rather than risk mass hysteria and a blow to the power structure of their religion, they would send out a team to quietly wipe us out before the rest of their population learns of us. 
I've always thought that. Who even says that they have to have "bodies" in the traditional sense? Who says they have to "eat" at all? What if they are gaseous, or some sort of gel? They come from other atmospheres far different than ours, so I doubt they are going to look like little grey men... 
I think it's a fair assumption to work on that advancement requires resources. This could be nutrition, building supplies, land, etc. I also think it's a fair assumption that a race inclined to take resources is more likely to have them than a race that is not included in that direction. So, yes, it is possible to have an advanced race without those traits, but I find it unlikely they got advanced without at least having them at some point. 
scarcity? There's like, a nebula made of water, and a planet made of diamond. Any raw material you could possibly want exists in unimaginable quantity. Dank memes tho, that's our specialty. 
Not all force wielders are terrorists but all terrorists are force wielders. Especially those religious radical Jedis. 
I hope so, otherwise this campaign wouldn't have a *leg* to stand on! Ha ha! 
Yeah, water's a terrible example for valueable matter. Lithium or Beryllium would be a start. 
They might have high demand for fresh human brains, eaten when the host is alive. They enjoy eating it over centuries, so they keep you alive for a long time luckily. 
Not to mention the solar system sized clouds of ethanol just floating around space. 
Any planet that has carbon based life would have oil after a few tens of thousands of years, there's no guarantee other life forms will be carbon based. 
Which is a basis for Andrei Tarkovsky's "Stalker". 
Just a thought. Our resources don't really have anything to do with ants but if you need to build a super highway you don't care how many millions of anthills will be destroyed. 
I agree! In artificial survival models (survival games) players nearly always devolve to kill each other on sight. The other player is a threat and the risk of death is worth the contents of their inventory. Real life survival scenarios is: "It's better to have 2 people with shotguns than 1 person with 2 shotguns." My expectation would be an uplifting assimilation, or coerced assimilation. Neither are particularly catastrophic for the survival of our species. Then again, I just compared a borg anal probe to dayz so with that evidence you should never take me seriously. 
Although, the thing is that the Europeans had contact with Asia and Africa. This exchange of cultures meant that the Europeans were better equipped to handle foreign disease, and thus didn't have the loss that the Americans did. A similar thing could be assumed about our alien overlords, who would likely have contacted multiple civilizations in the past. 
Yeah this is a pretty common trope amongst the "99%-Chance-Aliens-Will-Kill-Us" crowd. Only a handful of diseases are communicable between species, most of which are parasitic - which are easily preventable in a modern, 1st world environment. Now imagine an organism with which we don't even share the vaguest genetic make up. Chances are nothing will come of it. 
Yep. We're already at the beginning of being able to synthesize tissue effectively. And we can already clone things. And we're not even close to being able to travel between stars. 
In Star Trek's view of things, humans are the least exploitative race present in a galaxy of raging assholes. 
I found this comment really interesting because it's so rooted in the idea of what rapid tech development is relative to our experience. if you consider how rapidly our technological development is accelerating it's entirely possible that working glider to landing on the moon will seem like a silly unimportant step 3000 years from now. if a species is so developed that it has, say, FTL...it's entirely possible that us going from a glider to landing on the moon will literally seem inconsequential to them. I think the main issue with this discussion is a lot of people are simply assuming that another species will think like we do and is trying to extrapolate their reaction based upon what is, very likely, a false assumption. 
Yeah, if they have lightspeed or faster than lightspeed technology, they're essentially invincible. You would need to design some sort of forcefield to withstand things hitting your ship at lightspeed, and the energy that would be repelled from that kind of travel would be far greater than any weapons we have. We would have no chance at an even fight. 
We have to use ourselves as the rubric for this kind of decision making otherwise we could be woefully ill prepared for what might happen. 
Why? Maybe they view sentience as a disease and would want to wipe us out completely. Maybe they are data preservationists and view the human mind as an inferior storage device so they will crack open all our skulls to harvest and store the information in a longer lasting form than the human body could. Perhaps they would not even recognize us as alive, and consider meat creatures to be some form of planetary cancer. 
It's possible. It's also possible they're cynical to the point that sapient species are a dime a dozen. It's also possible that they're sufficiently alien to us that they don't even experience emotions in the sense we do. It's possible empathy means nothing to them, or is a concept they've never encountered. Literally anything is possible. Talking about practically approaching meeting an intelligent alien species is as pointless as thinking about meeting god. Literally anything could happen, and the chances of you ever meeting aliens/god is so fucking small you shouldn't waste time thinking about it. It's even possible neither exist. The safe approach is to stay quite and avoid drawing attention to yourself. We're not living in a hellish landscape in dire need of salvation. We don't need aliens/god, so why risk running into a malevolent entity. 
Nothing like being castrated to prevent disliked behavior! 
they'd also castrate you so you can't breed, like like cats. good luck wit dat. 
It would suck if Earth's ratings dropped and we got canceled. 
There are species on this planet we can't even understand that appear to have the capacity to think and live in societies with structure and rules. We don't know their motivations beyond survival and food. Yet there are stories of animals asking humans for help and also helping humans. They have no reason to help us yet know if they don't that human may die. Yet in so many other aspects they seem dumb at the same time. Why would a dolphin ge caught in a net if they're so smart. Why would they not just avoid "The Black Cove?" Yet they seem to understand death and that we can save their lives, or have lives to save, but so carelessly swim into genocidal situations. Anyway... my point is we don't understand their motivations and can't properly assume the meaning behind actions beyond giving them human motives. Who knows what an alien would want or why. We don't know what species we're related to want. 
Kind of the main plot point of Ender's Game. The buggers were sentient and very intelligent, but so different in the way they communicated that no peace talks were possible. 
But why fight an inhabited planet for, say, silver, when you can find it on an uninhabited planet? What would earth have to offer that an advanced alien species couldn't find or create more easily than it could take it from us? 
While there is an enormous amount of matter in the universe, it is still finite. And if civilizations continue expanding, eventually the entire universe will be consumed. Therefore to ensure your civilization is the last one standing at the end of the universe, it's safest to assume hostility and eliminate all potential threats. 
Why are the Welsh fighting the Earth from outer space? 
Building a bypass. But for real, space is so mind-numbingly huge that the odds of ANYTHING requiring our infinitesimal plot of real-estate are so low that I'm more likely to hit the Powerball jackpot six times despite never buying a ticket. 
It's not every day you stumble across a *Culture* reference, but when you do, oh man... like, all five of us are really getting a kick out of it. 
As long as humanity has existed, we have had things that have needed to be fired into the sun. 
Time to use up all of our non-renewables. That way aliens have no reason to invade us. 
Even with the Nebula-density thing, though, we could just offer them Europa. Much more water there, and we aren't using it. 
Unless you have a big ass magnetic net thats kind of hard to pick up. Nebula are barely more dense than the rest of space. 
Also, while we have a history on earth of enslaving or mass murdering new populations we find, that was a couple hundred years ago. We're not perfect now by any means, but when we discover some lost tribe in the Amazon, we don't go in with muskets and manacles anymore. If we contact them at all, it's a handful of well-meaning anthropologists who take some notes and leave, and some of the tribes we've discovered we don't contact at all but just take creepy photos of from drones and satellites. It's entirely plausible that aliens would follow this same standard of behavior -- frequently exemplified on Star Trek -- and just peacefully observe us before moving on. Especially because, as others have noted, it's not like we have a lot of rare resources they'll want the way the Aztecs had much-desired gold and much-needed labor. 
also european civilizations were densely populated with humans and domestic animals in a way that bred far superior diseases than the natives of the americas ever had to deal with. it wasn't just a matter of being exposed to a new environment. europeans were accidentally breeding plagues for years. 
A handful? Most of the world's emerging infectious diseases are zoonotic. 
Trek's Federation is a post-scarcity society, at least as it concerns the crewmen on the various vessels, so morality and nobility tend to reign. It's a central conceit of the show, which they play with a bit especially in Voyager. It generally gives exploitation less purpose, though. 
*if they do think like us*, those things will definitely seem important. agriculture is still regarded as the reason the majority of our technology came about, because we settled and farmed and had time to invent. the first steps are always regarded as important. obviously they're often overshadowed by the most recent and most impressive achievements, but they're important nonetheless. 
Actually if you reread the comic, it's principal is matter moving at 90% C, which is certainly possible. Physics falls apart at faster than C, you can't really postulate what would happen if a greater than C object passed through our atmosphere. 
John 1:17 7 Halo Rings The monument of sin Pre-Halo 4's concept of forerunner. The Halo universe is crammed full of Christian allegory. 
The buggers were also a hive-mind, controlled by the queen. All of their intelligence was controlled from a single source. 
Imagine if bees could comprehend humans. They could very well think "okay, so humans are vastly bigger than us, stronger than us, and can wield tools like armor we can't penetrate and weapons that kill us effortlessly. They're far more advanced than we are. Aren't we safe, then? Why would they fight us for honey when surely they could get or make honey somewhere else with their technology?" And yet, we subjugate and farm bees. I don't know what the human race's equivalent of honey might be to a spacefaring alien race, but you can't discount that we might have something they want, and taking it from us might be considered trivial. 
The real question is: what does he know about the Welsh that we don't? 
"Rtzqw, I can see how your grazk flaps engorge with sqrzz when you see my flaring my thyqps" "Brrrraqz me now Commander! Brrraqz my quz right over this weapons console!" Several minutes later, where litres of horrible fluids are exchanged between the alien pilots, and unfortunately the weapons console, the ship is destroyed due to a negligent discharge of an antimatter cannon while still in dock. 
Although I think it's still unlikely, my only thought on this is what happens when we start expanding our Terran influence in the universe? Assuming we don't all kill each other and eventually create the means to (relatively) quickly get around the universe, and then we start expanding our sphere of influence to surrounding solar systems - maybe then the Vulcan high command will take notice. Hopefully by that point we'll be a peaceful species and will only be developing weaponry as a means of self defense for our inevitable encounter with aliens instead of any kind of internal human conflict. Probably not though. I kinda lean towards us going into etiher a very dystopian future or a dead planet before we can leave. Human greed is too big of a driving force. 
That right kid! Run back to your moisture farm and your blue milk! Wimp. 
Then we have to invade another planet cause they have resources we want and need to survive 
I don't know - but I do know it's rare, since nucleosynthesis doesn't make much of it. Same deal with Lithium. 
TBF we're talking about alien life that is capable of reaching us within a timescale that makes it at least tempting to invade us and wreck our shit. They can probably do that. 
You have the best user name ever. I am totally dating myself (and you probably) but I used to call the hotline and listen/leave messages on it. One of my friends claimed his message was used, but I think it's an urban legend. 
Summed up perfectly by Sisko: "It's easy to be a saint in paradise." It still baffles me a bit how species like the Klingon managed to develop such an advanced society, given how adversarial they are. Even just having a single world government seems like a stretch. 
What if people stumbled over super computers in the bronze age. Oh wait that can't happen because they're missing both the information to even form the basis of them as well as the manufacturing techniques to make them. Technology follows a geometric or exponential trajectory, but it still follows that trajectory pretty thoroughly. 
After you've played enough Pokemon, you start not giving a shit about failed offspings and just wonder trade them for other failed breeding rejects. 
And that's the reason for the whole war. The buggers killed humans with no thought for it because they thought humans were unimportant non-sentient bodies like workers. 
LORD INQUISITOR, I VOLUNTEER FOR A SUICIDE MISSION! FOR THE EMPEROR! 
*You have 2 choices:* 1. *Let me cut you up with dirty, primitive hand tools. It's going to hurt a lot, and you might die in the process or shortly after.* 2. *I do nothing and you die right here, in agony.* So nice living in the era of modern medicine. 
Humans and wolves use this method, though I wouldn't say we walk. We move at a 3.5 pace, a light jog. Humans are unmatched when it comes to endurance at this pace. We just press the prey animal until it reaches a point of exhaustion, usually overheating, and kill it with little resistance. At least one tribe in Africa still practices this. 
No, it's a pretty common fact (whether true or not I'm unsure) that humans are the best adapted animal for long distance running 
I believe 100 would be far too low for the genetic diversity needed for a viable reproduction scheme. IIRC, something in the thousands is necessary. 
The problem with this analogy is that you assume there would be some resource unique to Earth that the aliens want. I'd say that's a pretty big assumption considering the sheer size of the universe. 
I think using the moon as a base for the project would be good. Tunnle inside, reiforce the place. 
What if aliens thought of this exact thing in the past and thats why they'll invade us? 
Which, I mean, is still a dick move. Sapient or not those represent an investment of resources. 
I completely agree loyal imperial citizen. Why don't we both sit down and discuss our mutual HATRED of heresy over this delicious bowl of khorne flakes? 
Yeah i thought it was because four legged animals find our jog pace to be very awkward, so they switch from walking (which were faster than them) to sprinting (which they cant do for long due to having four legs) 
Obviously not, but then again early hunter-gatherers didn't know how to use a supermarket. If I was born 10,000 years ago, I assure you I would be a semi-athletic, semi-competent hunter rather than a vaguely-in-shape programmer. 
Its theorized that 10 human pairs might have enough genetic diversity, but yea best bet is at least 200 humans. 
It would certainly accelerate the process, but I believe it's important to hold our natural resources in trust for the next generation. What if our grandchildren or their grandchildren wanted to tunnel inside the moon and use it as the framework for a galaxy-destroying supercomputer? They wouldn't be able to do so if we had already squandered their inheritance on a simple planetary defense megaweapon system. But I like the way you think. How would you like to be part of my R&D team? The genetic engineering wing is doing some fascinating work right now with flying fish and piranhas. 
If I remember correctly, it was an attempt to introduce themselves. 
Hey I was the guy that came up with Lazer beam equipped Sharks. You got a position for me? I got this great idea involving whales. Don't wanna ruin the surprise tho. 
I had to look this up and found out the Navy is not only training dolphins but also sealions... lol 
Interestingly enough, from what I read, the reason (outside of disease) most crocs eventually die, is because they never stop growing as they age. This in itself isn't an issue, the problem is larger bodies need more food, and eventually they can no longer find enough food to sustain their size and die of starvation. 
Boba Fett is in, like, one scene. Became a legend. 
The original febreeze didn't have a scent and that caused it to fail despite working! 
And it's hot enough outside. Our amazing abilities are bipedal movement and sweating. No one sweats like Gaston! 
I read a book when I was younger on this. It was a trilogy where the main protagonists were bats and they were abducted and used as bombs. It was called silverwing for the first book and sunwing for the 3rd iirc. Awesome books 
Whales' closest living relatives are Hippos. They belong to a group (phylum? I forget) called the Whippo because it only contains Whales and Hippos and somebody had no creativity. 
The world of American culture before Europeans arrived is endlessly fascinating. White folks generally got here around the 16th century, and are generally credited with genocide of the various indigenous peoples, but apparently there was a massive population collapse just a few decades before Europeans arrived. The nomadic people commonly thought of as the stereotype of indigenous Americans are actually a post-apocalyptic remnant of a great civilization that had already collapsed and about which relatively little is known today. 
Just keep in mind that if you do these and provide real information you're likely going to get a lot of junk mail. 
The president in Israel is actually just a public figure. The prime minister is the real political leader, like the president in the U.S.. 
Their sister looks a ton like them too. Their genes are weird. 
Related: Australia's coat of arms contains a kangaroo and an emu because they can only move forwards, not backwards. 
And many we didn't know of till he synthesised them. He literally wrote the book on psychedelics which was then used to make most of those illegal. 
Yeah but it's a pain waiting for it to reload before squirting the 2nd nostril. 
 apparently due to the very high iron content in the soil. 
I thought for sure you were just being silly but nope, it's real. It's hilarious to think that while everyone was terrified of nuclear war breaking out, the only plans they actually had was making fun of each other's dicks. 
I'm guessing it's because the kid can put the car into gear and take off, and 6 year olds are not known for their driving skills. 
That's what I thought! Damn, and I was interested too. These are like 90% the same facts from a post from yesterday. 
Americans are doing their part to be heavier than ants.. are you? 
I think part of the initial skepticism is that most resources for learning how to induce lucid dreams are on "new age BS" websites. A broken clock... 
65 years, 215 days, 11 hours, and 21 minutes. It would not have been inconceivable for any one person to witness both events, given that the first moon landing was quite the phenomenon, but sadly nobody did. Besides the Wright brothers, five other people watched the first flight, including a 16-year old boy named Johnny Moore who happened to be passing by. Orville, who flew the first flight, lived to see 1948, but Johnny appears to have been the longest-living witness -- he killed himself with a shotgun in late February 1952 at the age of 66. Had he lived, he would have been around 84 at the time of the moon landing. 
Only when the moon is at the furthest point in its orbit. At its closest it's too close for this to hold true. 
After the US-supported unpopular Batista regime and the disastrous bay of pigs, anti-America feelings were at an all time high in Cuba. The government wanted Cuba to abandon communism and instead become a safer, capitalist ally- especially considering its close proximity to the Miami coast. This would be very difficult to do if it was discovered that the CIA was responsible for the murder of Castro (who at the time was very popular among a lot of ordinary Cubans). This meant that most plots to assassinate Castro had to either a) appear to be accidental b) involved Castro discrediting himself or c) point the blame in another direction. There's a pretty good documentary called '638 Ways to Kill Castro' which details some of the other attempts on Castro's life which I would really recommend to anybody interested in the subject! 
Yeah but if you pay the trainer 60k, whats the dolphin going to do with 13.94 mil? 
Someone needs to make a TV show or comic about a supervillain based on things the CIA tried. 
All I am hearing is that if we sustain a crocodile in captivity long enough, giving him enough food to survive, after 1000 years he could break out and become Godzilla. 
I've heard they sometimes use it on people who's lungs aren't working well enough to take the oxygen out of the air and that it basically feels like drowning without the death. 
The one that you paid million for is better but yeah. 
I'm a bit miffed at Sears, they keep changing the power tools and parts. e.g. Cordless battery died, went in for a new one. "Sorry sir we do not carry that model anymore, you will have to buy a new drill". Hello BatteryPlus for a refurb. 1 day, $20. Freezer door hinge snapped inside the fridge (the little plastic flap), should be a $10 part. "Sorry sir we do not carry that model anymore, you will have to buy a new fridge"... what? It was two years old ... 
Do you count zebras as horses? Cause lions and leopards and crocs and pretty much everyone eats those guys, just as much as gazelles. 
This is the stuff Monopoly Community Chest cards are made of 
It literally looks like something that will steal my identity. At least the Washington State specific one does. 
They balanced the real US on a giant needle that is now on display in Seattle 
I read that series when I was a kid too! Forgot the name though, I just remember being so sad for them when they get bombs sewn into their stomachs :( 
People don't realize how smart pigeons are. In 1977 the US Navy and Coast Guard did a joint study called Project Sea Hunt where they trained pigeons to spot people lost at sea. The pigeons would be placed in a clear pod thing under the rescue helicopter and were trained to press a button when they saw something red, yellow, or orange. They were EXTREMELY good at it. In 89 trials, pigeons had a 90% success rate while humans had only about a 38% success rate of spotting a dummy in an orange life jacket. The project got scrapped in 83 because they didn't think it was worth the expense of training both birds and humans. 
Serious inquiry. I used to use rainX in the early 1990's. Yes, it is cool when you don't use wipers. The problem is (or was for me) was that as soon as I did use my wipers, it was horrible. Like rubber wipers against a rubber mat. It just smudged water all over my windshield and I couldn't see. In short, it made the wipers useless, which is dangerous. Has the product changed, or is this still the case? 
Actually, you could say a similar thing for Europeans, except they had more time to build things back up again before the Age of Discovery. The late thirteenth/early fourteenth century was a very deadly time. Apart from the Black Plague, the era was also notoriously ridden with famines, not to mention the Mongol invasion that ravaged Eastern Europe. Europe by 1370 was a remnant of its former self. Some urban quarters (urbanity=disease) were simply deserted, and by the Renaissance demolished to make way for new buildings. It's amazing to think how the Atlantic rim has come to dominate the world so much in the intervening time. Before Columbus, almost anywhere else -- the Islamic world, India, China -- would have been a safer bet. 
I get a lot of junk mail now and I didn't sign up for shit. 
You don't have to actually hold it up to your nose like a dweeb for it to work. If I shine my light across my yard on a summer night I will see the eyes of uncountable (thousands easily) wolf spiders. I'm always uncovering the burrowing (not so)little bastards when I'm in my garden. One time I uncovered what appeared to be a rather round stone. I went to pick it up and out of nowhere a huge one latches onto my finger. Guess I was messing with her egg sack. Anyone watching would have seen me flailing around like a monkey losing their shit. 
Somewhere out there, somebody is going to find out they're actually being watched...but only by spiders. 
Coffee isn't as acidic as people think. Some, but not much. It has about as much acid as a banana. The acidity of coffee refers to the flavor profile. Not negating your comment, just adding to it :) 
Isn't the emu out of respect because they won the war? 
To be fair, its kinda cool in that now they have it, they'll literally be the only country with one. Imagine nowadays proposing that the flag feature a dragon. Also my ex got a tattoo of a welsh dragon holding an english flag, it uh, it has caused offence especially at the rugby. 
How do you put a Welshman to sleep? Ask him how many times he's had sex! 
 On the other hand, they would have never seen the light of day without his work. 
When the treemageddon comes we'll all die it seems 
oooooooh! Now it makes sense... For a moment I thought I overestimated the size of the universe for the first time. 
Yeah I wanna know if I have time to do this or not. 
One could look at the Cold War as one of the biggest dick measuring contests ever, replacing dicks with nukes unfortunately. 
even when I try to be original I end up shitposting smh 
Together we can take back the record for worlds heaviest species! 
OK, because I thought the fuckers figured out how to travel on land. 
Yeah most CRTs use a transformer that operates at about 15.7 kHz. Which is in the perfect spot to annoy the hell out of people whose hearing hasn't deteriorated due to age/loud music. Tell your parents that Bon Jovi ruined their ears. (I say as I self-conciously turn my headphones down.) 
This. For so many years my family didn't believe that I could hear when the television was on. 
My nephew found this recently for when he's supposed to have hi phone off. I don't want to rat him out, but that sound fucking hurts. I don't see how he can deal with it. Luckily he's at that mope in my room stage. 
If I ever become super rich I want to pay someone to make this happen (I don't have time to take care of a giant lobster all day) and then have like a 5 foot long lobster in my will. 
I literally asked "when do I start screaming live, dammit!?" In a cpr class. Got no laughs. Turns out paramedics see people die all the time, and an unresponsive person isn't funny to them. I will never make that joke again. 
Isn't this what waterboarding is supposed to be like? 
That would feel really fucking weird. Like you know breathing liquid kills you but you just don't seem to die. That's probably one of the many things I want to experience before I die. 
There is a material deformation phenomenon known as fatigue, where cyclic deformation that is much lower than the yield stress causes permanent deformation. A regular heating/cooling cycle is exactly this. You'd need to run the numbers, though, to see if fatigue was the cause. The main parameters are the cycling stress and the number of cycles, so the longer it's been cycling, the lower the cycling stress has to be to reach the same result. 
Nah, zebra's have the same shitty herd behavior as gazelles. Horses have an unusual social structure, very organized, very linear. Not sure how they'd do with the croc thing though. Those guys are as apex as it gets. The ranges don't really overlap very much. 
Well that's something you don't see every day! but I do... 
I found this 6 months ago and had 4 items. None of them told me how much or who they were from. I filed for them and it was from "Maryland compliance commission". I still don't know why they owed me and it came to over 1,000. 
The fact you put nice and Molson next to each other makes me not trust this 
I don't remember the name of the first book, but the final book was called Firewing 
'Birds are good at spotting things from high up, you say? Nah, sounds like a waste of time...' 
I haven't had that issue. My wipers just push the water around and leave a clean and clear windshield. No streaks or smudges of which you speak of, maybe they changed formulas, it has been literally ~26 years since the early 1990s. 
Thousands?? Where do you live so I never move there. 
Then why does coffee trigger reflux and bananas don't? 
It was one of the terms in the peace treaty. Those emus are harsh negotiators 
The Welsh actually invented the sheepskin condom! The English merely improved the design by removing it from the animal before using it. 
If you think that's a big number, you should see Graham's number squared. Now *that's* a big number! 
I think he says "monster condoms for my magnum dong" in that episode. I've always wondered whether he meant to say it wrong or if it just came out that way and they left it in. 
But no one wanted to show their dick first, because they feared that the other one might be bigger 
That's just AskReddit for you, where you can ask any specific question and "people walking slowly" will still show up at the top. 
It's usually flyback transformer. It's often "potted" if it starts to resonate but if not done right the resin can actually help the resonance. My mates gran had an old black and white TV, that thing screamed pain, she couldn't hear it but it was audible outside the house. 
It seems like this would be really easy to prove with a blindfold. 
Mope? You mean masturbate furiously to facebook pictures of your crush age? 
You don't need money or people to try and see if telekinesis is possible. I usually personally check once or twice a year. No luck so far. 
Yeah - more likely they've just heard that joke in every CPR class they've ever taught. 
Well, Nile Crocodiles are in the US now so we're about to find out... 
I actually memorized the script from going on it so many times and one time the driver had my name so we were like yooooo and then he let me drive the boat and make the jokes. Best disney trip ever. 
The fact he put Molson and not Canadian when referring to a Molson Canadian beer shows he's a Yankee and not to be trusted with Canadian policy, this includes beaver dams, moose jousting and igloo building 
If you shoot the horse first you can dramatically improve your chances. 
The last book got weird. They went to bat Hell and stuff. 
For more background, pigeons are the birds that have been used for that sort of stuff because vision isn't the only important part. They also need to push a button to alert the humans (or nudge a lens to aim the bomb). Pigeons naturally peck things, and are very amenable to having that tendency focused for a specific purpose. 
It's also ignorance of the masses. How often is the old saw about "spends trillions on a pen that works in space; Russians used a pencil" repeated as if it was a failing? People don't know that graphite in a capsule can straight-up kill everyone onboard, so they sit atop Mt. Stupid and opine on the shot they know next to nothing about. 
"My three greatest fears: 1. Alligators 2. Crocodiles 3. Aneurysms." - Sterling Archer 
it's not the acidity, your stomach is made to handle acidity. For some reason, caffeine (and other chemicals) triggers the lower esophageal sphincter to close less tightly. This is the sphincter between the stomach and esophagus. So now acid has an easier time going up into your esophagus, giving you heartburn. 
I've heard that Danny Devito messed up when saying it and the staff decided it sounded more "Frank Reynolds" that way. 
There are more people walking slowly on Earth than trees in the entire galaxy. 
I didn't know he was a navy seal I just thought he was a regular seal! 
I'd say that the angle of the photo complements the size of the crocodile making it look bigger than it is. Not saying that it wasn't massive to start with. 
It'd probably be the equivalent of telling a waiter "I thought you were taking care of the check!" or a cashier "Hahaha I just printed this dollar bill earlier" except worse because the whole dying thing. 
Yea, but (and this is from the perspective of someone who did a lot of horse stuff in an area that actually had alligators) horses don't like the same *area* as alligators and crocs. Given their preference, they'll be on a broad grassy plain somewhere. 
Gov admin: "Our site looks too much like a government site. We need to make it more friendly." Web designer: "We could add some photos." G: "Okay, but I need to pick the photos." W: "Fine. You can go to $StockPhotoSiteIPayFor and choose one from there." G: "Ooh, how about this dog in the money jacket? It's cute!" W: "...are you sure?" G: "Yes. Use that one." 
That website looks like it is straight out of "Making your websites sketchy as hell 101". All it needs is having the word "legit" mentioned in every sentence, bonus points for pairing it with "totally". 
Check out mister triathlete over here who can run for up to nine seconds, I pass out if I try to move. 
Once they found people in life jackets they dropped bombs on them? 
The space pen was developed by a private company that sold to Americans and Russians. 
Crocodiles tend to be more aggressive than alligators. 
And as we all know, Gyrados is a Water/Flying type, not a dragon type. Case closed. 
Danny doesn't have a script, they just put him in front of the camera while the rest of the cast does their lines and sometimes he chimes in. He doesn't even know he's on a TV show 
I see you've never heard of the Great American Plain Gator. Nasty brutes. 
Studies showed that 90% of people that had bombs dropped on them didn't drown. 
Also, alligators have rounded noses and heads, while crocs are more triangular. Easy way to tell them apart. And alligators are fat lazy sacks of shit (I grew up in Florida). They don't really want to do much. Just swim a bit, eat a bit, lay in the sun alot. They'll hiss at you to make you back off, too, because they aren't interested in defending themselves or wasting their energy on something the same size as them. Still, don't leave pets around them or children or anything like that, but they're alright. 
Hello i'm writing from Llanfairpwllgwyngyllgogerychwyrndrobwllllantysiliogogogoch to say i don't shag sheep and that our placenames are normal. 
I've had this happen at my local Starbucks but also I was a regular and sometimes they just gave me free coffee for no reason at all. 
My grandfather was emotionally abusive to my grandmother for most of their marriage. She finally had enough at 85 and left that asshole, bless her fiery soul. 
My favorite part is the soullessness in everyone's eyes, except the relative who told them 
Yeah what the fuck? I once woke up at 10:30 on a Saturday, not even that late, and my aunt was giving me shit because I woke up "late". She had apparently been up since 7. Well I'm sorry but I thought it was Saturday 
Pretty much the entire attitude of companies doing you a "favor" by employing you. With commute I'm gone from my house 50 hours a week. I bust my ass. My muscles ache. I meet bullshit imaginary numbers. I adapt to ridiculous bureaucratic nonsense. I don't get the crazy hair colour I want, don't get to have my piercings. Miss holidays with my family. Events with my friends I'm doing YOU a favor, company. Feels like I'm selling my soul sometimes. 
I work 65-70 hours a week. If I did this I would work ~30 on a good week. 
This happened where I work not too long ago, and the customer threw their food at one of my coworkers because they couldn't use a certain coupon that would have saved them maybe a dollar. They couldn't use the coupon because it had nothing to do with what they had ordered, not even the same kind of food. She demanded to speak to a manager (who she had already thrown the food at(lol)). During her tantrum she tried talking about how important of a person she was because she worked for the city next to the one we were in. She also threatened my manager and used a handful of curse words at him. The police were called towards the end of her tantrum, and she looked really nervous when the police actually pulled up and tried to hurry out of the store. Turns out she had a warrant out for her arrest (I'm not sure what for) and she got charged for harassment, along with a perma-ban from our store/any store under our same store owner. 
You know who else doesn't take no for an answer? Rapists. 
It bugs the hell out of me when I have a message that I haven't opened or replied to 
I think as a whole we really underestimate the toll this takes on an individuals motivations/dreams/aspirations/self perception. 
Actual taxidermy might be worth the price. Remember how grandpa always sat right there on the couch and watched tv? He still can! He might even smell better now. 
*"Welcome, everyone! Okay, let's go around the room: introduce yourself, tell everyone a little bit about you, and share one interesting 'factoid' about yourself."* YAY SO FUN SHOOT ME. 
I felt so bad for my RA in freshman year. He was a really cool guy, but no one ever came to anything because they were "too cool for it". Fuck that, you're too cool for free pizza? Fine, more for me. 
Fold a piece of printer paper twice - draw own card with pen or crayons. Wayyy cheaper and much more personal. Ron Swonson had something about this in his stand-up. 
Whatever you do don't get your feet wet if you don't get your head wet! They have to be the same level of moisture or you'll get sick ~ My mom freaked out when we showed her pictures of our then-1-year-old on the beach. 
Especially if you work in a place where being sick is dangerous, like a nursing home or daycare. 
Love this - I used to work at a hardware store when I was 15, and I remember one guy in particular saying that a price was too high and that I should do something about it. He got a little bit pissy about it and kinda tried to intimidate me into lowering the price. I literally said something like "Dude, I'm 15. Do you really think I can just change a price?" 
My parents are Brahmins and they have given up on arranged marriages. They went all fuck horoscopes and superficial alliances. Go get a sweet boyfriend and marry him. God I love my parents. 
There was a tragic story somewhere on reddit of a kid who saved up $500 on his own, and was going to buy a computer. His parents then stole it. From his bank acount. And they can do that. Shaking_head_in_hand.gif 
I grew up in Texas and I hate this as well. Last time I was home, I gave a ride to a woman that was on the way home for supper. She was freaking out because we were a little late and she wanted to make sure the food was on the table. We got to their house, and she nearly ran into the kitchen to make the food and set the table... which was something from the fridge that needed to be heated. The best part? She had broken her wrist a few weeks earlier, so it was in a cast and she was working with one arm. Her retired husband couldn't be bothered to put a plate in the fucking microwave for himself. I remember giving him the "really?" look while helping her get everything on the table. Clarification: her husband didn't give her the broken wrist; it happened when she and my mom were doing some work on her mother's house. 
I feel like it's just the way to present it. Normally instead of saying "I don't want to" I say something more along the lines of "I'm not up to going out tonight and just feel like lounging at home" most people are okay with that. When you say I don't want to, they naturally take it personally. 
A few times my teenage nephew pointed out the incredibly obvious solution to my problem and I thought "...fuck." 
Just to add on to this - the notion that athletes are some rare resource that needs to be protected from any repercussions or punishment. Remember Brock Turner ? The Stanford rapist. What made my stomach churn at one point was how they let him off easily or how his parents begged to not charge him because *it would ruin his sports career*. That was also one of the reasons he got off relatively easily, the reasoning being because he's great swimmer, locking him up will destroy his chances at a future in swimming. So just because a person is good at a physical activity, he should be exempted from any form of punishment where any non-athletic person would have been charged with the maximum penalty ? Fuck outta here with that logic. 
I don't pretend. It's just that nobody ever asks. 
This whole thing is based on a misinterpretation of that saying. Originally, it was a term used in business meaning that the products you sell should be based on what the customer is interested in. Unfortunately in recent years it seems to have been misappropriated by some as a customer service mantra somehow implying that a retail worker should put up with anyone's bullshit no matter how unreasonable. 
how are you? kinda horny actually. some indignant response hey, you started this. 
I saw some prank video of a white dude dressed like a Muslim carrying a backpack and tossing it at people randomly. I couldn't believe it. The only thought in my mind was, "This dudes gonna get shot. This dudes gonna get shot" Fucking stupid people, man. 
I recently had a performance review at work. I got "meets standards" or "exceeds standards" in all categories except "enthusiasm" and "attitude". I tried to tell them that I don't have a bad attitude and I am enthusiastic about my job... I'm just not an outgoing person and I tend to be fairly reserved. They responded with "well we would still like to see improvement in these areas". Like, mother fucker, just because I'm not puking up sunshine doesn't mean I don't want to be here. 
My older relative, who knows the whole series of events, told me stuff like to invite my rapist to lunch with us, he feels sad, "he really loves you and misses you." Thanks.. 
Birthday parties for 1 year olds are for the parents. Congratulations! We kept the baby alive for a while year! That's why it's mom and dads friends that come, not the babies "friends". 
If it makes you feel better, I'm a girl who recently confessed to a guy I've had a thing for for a while. I got turned down, but I'm glad I did it. 
I just imagine this silent, glaring with rage slavic looking guy jabbing at Mexican hands reaching for his plate. I like it. 
"Pumping a dry well" is maybe not the best euphemism if you're trying to use the term "boyfriends" non-homosexually... 
No way man, don't you know khakis and a button down give you a +5 boost to clerical skill? 
I'm right there with you, the one and only time I've had to write them were for my HS graduation and the concept confused me. I saw these people in person at my grad party and said thanks then, why must I take time out of my day to write a hundred thank you cards now? I feel like if I ever received one, I'd just toss it without reading it. I don't need a card, just tell me you appreciate the gift in person. 
Sounds like you're making a big deal out of your birthday. 
the worst part is when you arrive at the door shortly before a small group at which point holding the door is polite, but when they are past you notice someone else at the point that group was when you arrived at the door so you hold it for them as well because they likely noticed you holding the door for that small group but then you find out they are very slow walkers which makes you feel awkward for holding the door so long 
Yep. It's always like all 15 people involved in this want to shoot themselves except for my mother in law just clapping along having a grand old time. 
Can confirm; work at Red Lobster and I am not a fan of singing, but if the guest requests it why not. 
Exactly and then those same people end up having to take a nap or fall asleep super early. I like to sleep in )for probably way too long) but then stay up super late but I'm being just as productive as anyone else, who cares what time I do it at 
If it only feels like it sometimes your company is slacking 
It's odd, but one of the main reason I want my own place is so I can tell my emotionally abusive parents to fuck off if they start their usual act. To be in a situation where they can't just shut me up with a 'my house' would be great. I am grateful for their help financially, but that doesn't mean they are allowed to treat me like shit. My dad's latest was "Actually normal people don't mind being interrupted." That was after having tried to convince me by shouting swear words at me, of course. To be able to just shut down their unreasonableness and general obnoxiousness is quite honestly a dream of mine. I sometimes find myself day dreaming about it. I'm not sure that's healthy. 
Work creates work, in a lot of ways. I used to be forever working through lunch, staying late, coming in at weekends because the work just never ended. There was no way I'd cover it working 9am to 5pm. Then bit by bit I started to realise, well, since I'm always around over lunch, I'm the one people are coming to with questions. Since I'm always in at all hours, people are going to come to me. If somebody came by at 6 or 7pm, they'd invariably get me since nobody else was around. And from another point of view, since I was the one with nothing better to do than be at work all the time, nobody felt bad about dumping work on me. Nowadays, I'm 9am to 5pm to the very minute. 
It makes sense if there isn't a lot of room at the table and having your elbows up would take up another person's space. 
This is what I hear any time someone says they don't take no for an answer. 
You should get a pair of googly eyeglasses. Next time she does this just put your head back down over your work, reach into your desk, and place the glasses on the top of your head like a crown to stare her down until she leaves. Bonus: Will improve your posture. 
No kidding, I hate that little "1" next to an app icon. This one time I went to work and forgot my phone at home, when I got back home that night I had 4 emails, 7 texts, and 17 Facebook alerts. It bugged me to have that many unread items. 
I really think that an obsessive work culture is one of the root causes of socioeconomic decay and stunted empathy. 
I told my kids to donate me to science. If science doesn't want me, cheapest incineration allowed by law. The *only* other option is to have me taxidermied in an attacking bear pose and I must remain in one of their homes. 
My partner is the opposite. He says, if there aren't going to be enough people wailing and sobbing, I have to hire actors. 
"What's your fun fact?" "That I want to fucking ***D I E***" 
I told my mother no to this. She tried to have a whole second reception to invite them. Obviously, I said to no that as well. 
I'm Mexican and getting married in September. When I told my mom I didn't want to give everyone in my family a +1, she *lost it*. Fine, my cousin I haven't spoken to in 5 years can bring his girlfriend he met last month, mom. But *you* have to pay for her plate. 
There's a running joke in my family that for some reason, we make birthday cards for each other with computer paper and highlighters. I upgraded my cards by using my kid's crayons. 
Speaking of TV, why do people who watch 4+ hours of it after work give me shit for playing a few hours of video games when I get home from work? Feels so damn hypocritical. 
Woah there, is this an american thing? It sounds awful... 
Just show her a photo of you holding her grandchild underwater. Can't complain then can she. 
That actually IS good for you, though. There's some pretty reliable science on how alternating between hot and cold water aids blood circulation, and it's excellent for recovery of sore muscles (but you should end it cold, not hot). Not recommended for recovery of illness though, as getting really hot or really cold when your immune system is hard at work can fuck you over pretty bad. 
Jumping into a snowpile sounds like fun! ...for about half a second. *Brrrrr.* 
And yet I've been forced to work while sick as a nanny! Those poor kids 
Exactly. Don't blame me for getting the office sick, I'd have stayed home if I'd been allowed. Talk to the boss, tell them not to penalize people for calling off sick. 
The opposite will happen. That's what would happen if humanity was smart, but the problem is that humanity isn't. We're already at the point where we don't need to spend anywhere as much time as we do "working," it's just done out of tradition. Tradition, and expectation. Instead of reducing the work that we need to do, advanced automation will just put people out of jobs, forcing many people to work even more for even less. Eventually, a crisis point will be reached. What happens then, well, we won't know until it happens. My personal estimate for this automation crisis point is any point in the next 20-100+ years, heck, maybe sooner then that. 
Remodeler here. I use the local hardware store for as much my supplies as I can. I market this to my clients, who foot the bill, knowing I don't markup for profit. I do this to help make sure you guys are there when I need you. Bigbox will do fine without my business. I know the price is higher, and my clients gladly pay it. 
Hold up, I got him on speed dial, I'll go get him. 
I was at Dairy Queen a while back and the guy ahead of me was giving the girl at the counter a hard time because he could only order the special "Royal" blizzard with the flavors they offered instead of the nine different kinds of candy that he wanted. The guy went on for almost ten minutes about how dumb it was and that she should just do it anyway. She's just a 17 year old who wants you to stop bugging her. She would obviously do it if she could. Quit being such a douche canoe. 
Last person that cut my hair didn't even speak english. It was great. 
"I like giving blowjobs to strangers" works as the answer to both of those, and might stun your hairdresser into silence. 
Exactly. Husband and I often will have a cuppa at the end of the night and if I'm the one to initiate it, he won't know, I'll often hand it to him, saying, "This is a way to say I love you." He'll do the same. Love languages, you know? Being FORCED to because of gender roles built on servitude? Nuh-uh. 
I never understood the unequal distribution of housework. Both people worked that day? Both people need to cook and clean. Only one person worked? Why the hell should they have to come home to do housework that the other person neglected? I'm a house husband now, and do 100% of household chores. When we both worked, we both contributed. Anything else is just confusing. 
Yeah, absolutely. People understand if you don't want to go out, it's OP's phrasing that upsets people, not the sentiment 
I'm not gonna lie here. If I know any of my friends masturbated while thinking about me I'd feel a bit better about myself. 
I once came across two guys that I knew irl masturbating each other on xvideos. Disappointing video tbh. But one of the guys had a really big dick. 
I made the mistake of answering truthfully to someone I thought was a friend. He was an executive at a company I worked at. He leaned in and said "you say Im fine. No one wants to hear that stuff". He didnt work well with that company and got let go. 
Yes, exactly. I watched that and was like, wtf man this guy should get arrested for doing this thing. Not only could he get shot, but he could also legitimately scare people into hurting themselves, like an old man might break his back while running away and slipping, or a woman might run into the road and get hit by a car. Not to mention he is spreading the fear of Muslims to his own selfish, idiotic gain. I really hope this kind of idiots will get punished for what they did. 
That sounds just like me. Just because I am not grinning like a maniac or bouncing off the walls doesn't mean I lack passion or am a bad employee. 
Invite them. And give them something to eat. Preferably laced with cyanide or something else. /s 
"You can pick your friends, but you can't pick your family." Bullshit I cant. I dont need my kids to witness the crazy side of our gene pool. 
When my friends baby turned 1, she made the Facebook event for the party and titled it: "I didn't murder-suicide and baby turns 1" 
Basch: So why don't you ask her out? The Runt: I'm scared she wouldn't like me and say no. Basch: So what? What have you got to lose? The Runt: The possibility -if she says no- that she might have said yes. Whatever I do, I don't want to lose that possibility. 
Am slav. I'd probably do that while squatting on the chair. 
Chinese dude here, it's also a thing in asian culture. I kind of love it, you get to try more things while you're eating! 
same here. im in a wheelchair andold people ask me all the time how it happened. i usually say an old man or woman hit me (not how it happened) 
Why are standard libraries not dealing with this? I've only really done one production piece of code for this and I feel like DST wasn't an issue. Or part of the year the plugin just fires early. 
Usually if you don't say anything people leave you alone, it's always "I can't believe I'm working on my birthday :(" then everyone makes a big deal about it. Or if they don't shut up about their birthday for the entire month before it happens. 
Well as long as she's happy, that's all that matters. To her. 
I am endlessly shocked by how frequently I come across people who think it's okay to touch someone else. There was another woman customer who always tried to rub my back while she spoke to me. I asked her to stop and her reply was a chuckle and, "Oh, it's fine, I'm a teacher." Isn't that somehow worse?! I have a male coworker who used to give out unsolicited back rubs. My boss shut that down real fast. Moral of the story: DON'T FUCKING TOUCH PEOPLE. 
A little advice: it's basically in your managers job descriptions to deal with difficult customers. They generally are given training on how to defuse situations. The best thing you can do is get the customer to speak with a manager right away as it will likely have to happen anyways. If the manager doesn't have your back in situations like this then I'd implore you to find another job as this leads to deeper problems down the line 
My phone would give you a heart attack. I have a badge icon with over 19,000 unread emails. 
Does your friend know you plan to mount and stuff him? 
My family's running joke with birthday cards is giving the same birthday card to my grandad on his birthday, him giving it to my uncle on his birthday, then him giving it back to me on my birthday for the last 20 years. We're all called Tom so it just says "To Tom, Happy birthday from Tom. 
It's becoming more common. Yea a TV that is normally loud as shit screaming adverts at you while you pump your gas. 
Don't forget following the car down the driveway as everyone waves to each other. Minnesotans aren't content until they see their guests disappear beyond the horizon. Even then, we may still give you a call to see if you got home safe. Then, the goodbye cycle repeats itself over the phone. 
For anyone healthy this will generally help with recovery, but if you have someone older or overweight with you going from a very hot temperature to a very cold temperature, there is a chance they go into cardiac arrest. 
You turn the sauna up to about 105C (221F), and stay inside until it becomes unbearable. Then you run outside and flop around in the snow until it becomes unbearable. Then you run back in the sauna and repeat as necessary. All the while people are thwacking each other with birch branches. 
When I moved to England for university it took me two very hard months to get through my thick skull that "you alright?" asked in passing by is firstly, not a question of concern about my well being nor is it a remark that something's off with the way I look and secondly, it does not even need an answer. Gosh, brits. 
That's a really cool idea. Do you work it into your own marketing, as far as your support for local business? I do the same thing with Cole Hardware here in the bay area. Sure, I can get most of this stuff on amazon or wherever for less, but I need Cole to be there when that isn't an option. 
Amen. Thank goodness my boyfriend is reasonable and fair-minded. Because I know in his heart of hearts, he would love to be spoiled around the house and frankly, I don't have the energy for work *and* the entire house. 
A lot of Reddit seems to have a really hard time separating content and delivery. 
I'd honestly take someone wanking to me as a compliment. 
I've never seen a porno with someone I knew in it. I hope one day I do. 
I bet once VR is a bigger thing, somebody will make a service that takes a person's facebook/twitter/whatever photos, processes them into a 3d model, and then uses it in an interactive porn game. Will also include laser scanning support for ultra high-res models (mostly used by pornstars probably), and almost limitless customization of accessories and sex acts. It will be the highest grossing consumer good of any form in human history, hundreds will die from dehydration in the week after its release, and the global economy will grind to a halt 
Breathing is a System Process. He means User Processes. 
I think I'd rather have you as a co-worker over the maniacal wall-bouncer. A 1:1 ratio of words exchanged to hours worked would be awesome. 
Welcome to the military, I've seen guys who are one point away on the IQ test from being legally considered a housepet but are pushed to the top because they're "motivated" and can do a lot of push ups 
Nah dude, cyanide is too quick. Give 'em something that takes a while and causes intense agony before the inevitable conclusion. 
"This is Liz... we fuckin'. Ooo is that roasted red pepper hummus over there?!" 
The one time I needed a wheelchair (broken bones, only needed it for a few weeks) I changed my story every time. A few: I fell off a cliff trying to pick a flower that grows on it I fell out of a tree trying to find where a Squirrel hid my phone. It was in my pocket the whole time! A helicopter landed on my legs. My favorite is when kids asked because I'd tell them either I didn't eat my vegetables when I was younger, or I didn't wear my seatbelt. 
That's a little different, because like me you have a role where you're a contingency for addressing things in the moment of failure to ensure functionality (or health for me). Most corporate workers don't have a contingency role, so there's no added productive value if they've completed their assigned work. 
I moved away while most of my family still lives in the same area. I always make it a point to call when a family member sends a gift or card for a holiday or birthday. My grandma said it "made her day" when I called her because no one else in my family does that. While I'm glad it made her day, it also made me sad that I'm the only one that does this. 
This sounds endearing and creepy at the same time. 
You guys need to get into like, video games or something. 
It's the good ol' Them: you alright? Me: yeah, you? Them: *carries on doing whatever* 
Yeah, management relies on me most of the time to run service on our busiest nights. If I called in because of a cold or whatever, I would get chewed the fuck out. But then when I get there with a cold, all my coworkers are like "you better not get me sick!" 
My previous employment would tell us that "voluntary" overtime meant that YOU could pick the day you worked. "Mandatory" overtime means they pick the day. Needless to say, many words were exchanged. 
I don't advertise, word of mouth has kept me going. In my circle of clients, I don't think I would be getting as many calls if I didn't try to buy local. I think it says something about it on some website. I got a bunch of calls saying they found me online. I don't know where, but someone says I do it, and people like it. 
This physically hurts to read because it's too real. 
Your *face* seems to have a really hard time separating content and delivery. 
Then turn your head for the real thing last second? 
Ny boyfriend's friends once drunkenly stated that I had a "hot body" and while I said "aw no stop it you guys!" all I could think was "oh thank god I still got it". 
I told my mates that I got pissed one night and posted pics online for money... I never actually did it but they keep looking for the pics, the amount of gay porn they've probably seen looking for them by this point... 
Well he'd probably cause a traffic accident, so there's that. 
My ex was in a car accident and for a while had a number of scrapes and bruises that were fairly visible. Every time someone asked him what happened he changed stories. He got in a fight with a bear. He walked into a door. He fell off the top bunk. And so on. 
If she was born in April they can pretend they were paying attention the whole time. 
My current job in IT is like this. It's incident response for a pretty big network. I get the feeling my boss hates it. We're there to respond, but he talks about filling the empty 'cycles' where we don't have any fires to put out. This leads to him wanting to 'onboard' a lot of other teams scut work, just to keep us busy. Ah well, another month and my contract ends. Wonder what I'll do then. 
I think I'm going to print and frame this comment, whenever I have money. 
Yikes. Sometimes folks, even parents, tend to lose the thread when it comes to a special event like a wedding. This is your day, and their only responsibility is to help you make a nice memory with little stress. 
Yeah my aunt told me she just stops giving gifts to her family members than consistently don't send thank yous 
I don't know about this. Irish people just get up and walk away? 
One time when I was in high school and working at Burger King, I called in sick because I had a really bad case of food poisoning. My manager got angry with me, because it was really busy and they needed me there and they were going to be short staffed. I told her I would come in if she didn't mind me vomiting into the fry oil vats. She shut up real quick after that. I pretty much have to be practically dying in to call in sick to work because every place I have ever worked has been that way. 
Amazon? They used to pull this shit all the time... My biggest problem with it was that I was the ass wipe who had to assign it when upper management called for it, so I got to look like the dick 
every now and then just look into your webcam and lick your lips 
Noone would even notice God appeared, because of the fog. 
This one is a beautiful answer if someone comes with that shit. 
It's funny you should talk about that, I keep wondering if the huge success of The Witcher will mean a boom in Polish video game companies, and if it does, maybe we actually should get into that field. 
Irish-Americans and their kids at least. I can't speak for Ireland. Pretty much. We'll offer pleasantries if you see us getting ready to leave, but we're not going to track everyone down. We're leaving, and we're leaving now. I thought this was just my family. Then I heard it called the "Irish goodbye" and it clicked. 
Had a similar problem when I worked at McDonalds. I stopped in at 8am with a doctor's note stating I had fucking bronchitis and that I couldn't work for the next few days. My GM takes the note and tells me to get better. I go home to sleep and half an hour before my scheduled shift that day I get a call "Hey upsidedownshaggy are you sure you can't make your shift today?" I told her that I wasn't coming in with bronchitis and to leave me alone. She docked my hours from 24 hours a week to 3 when I came back. Edit : do to all of the replies telling me I should've filed for unemployment, I was 16 at the time so I don't think I'd have been able to apply for unemployment in the States. 
I'm a waiter and they send people home whenever they can and then screw everyone over. Last night I got in scheduled 11AM-7PM. Well, they have to save a few dimes so they send 2 servers home insanely early and me and this other guy are stuck when it gets busy. Instead of getting off at 7 I didn't get off til 12 
Hire me too. I can consult about which dog toys are actually chew-proof (so much money spent), and soon I'll have my degree so then I can consult about legal-things. 
I'm Irish and here the term "Irish goodbye" refers to when you're too fucked up at a party or a pub and just leave without telling anyone. Similar deal I guess 
Reddit seems to love that place, which made me want to try it, but after reading your comment, fuck Jimmy John's. I'll make my own damn sandwiches. 
Are you at a place that actually pays servers minimum wage? Cause if not, its stupid as hell to have worse service and pissed off employees to save like $20 in man hours. 
Reading this sent me into commiserating rage, I hope you don't work at whatever shithole that was anymore 
This is so common in restaurants, even ones that pay less than minimum wage. I've had so many bosses make cuts too early and then you have like, two people left to serve a full dining room. And the idea that it saves to company money in labour costs is far outweighed by the money they end up loosing when they have to comp meals due to long wait times or mistakes made because of course, the servers and kitchen staff are rushing so much that they are going to get a bit sloppy. 
They understand, they just don't care. Labor is a dime a dozen. 
Runescape gods exposed :') the first show I actually followed 
Is is a Good Idea to Microwave This was the first thing I ever followed/subscribed to on youtube. I remember being really excited for the season 1 finale of dynamite. 
I remember watching him and his dad on Amazing Race. I was rooting for them. 
I used to watch his videos religiously. One day I was bored and drew his duck logo and emailed a pic of it to him. I didn't expect a reply, but I wanted to see if I got lucky. He actually responded with something along the lines of "Thanks, I love it! xoxo". Nice guy. Made my day. 
I just looked him up. His YouTube profile still says 'cancer-survivor'. Owch. 
Unfortunately, I am now banned from most forms of public transportation within the European Union 
Holy crap. Uberhaxornova is how I initially discovered the rest of the gang. 
His video about keeping your fridge stocked to get women is my favorite one on YouTube 
Mr Sark still posts every few weeks, just not for Machinama anymore. 
Edd will always live on in the hearts he touched. Miss you Edd. 
It's weird how there are trends of these. Will It Blend was absolutely huge at the time, and I remember it being on the national news in the UK because while it wasn't the first time a Youtube channel got big, it was the first time regular schmos were talking about Youtube in the office. Then people's interest moved on to things like the hydraulic press guy. And now that red hot knife that cuts stuff. They're pretty much the exact same video format, just destroying stuff with some kind of tool. I got bored of Will It Blend after a while and never watched hydraulic press guy because I felt like I'd seen it all before. 
It pisses me off that Ian and Anthony are barely even in their own videos. 
God, Arby n the Chief was so good back then. I mean, it's *really* good now, too (despite lengthy time between uploads) - just a lot darker. "i think colins a pedestrian" 
Not dead. Animation is just impossible to make a living off of on YouTube now. He's working on a Hellbenders TV show with Psychicpebbles now. 
I really don't know the status of his channel. He hasn't put out anything recently but was active a bit ago making some videos. He could very well upload more soon 
I enjoyed him somewhat, but that niggling doubt in the back of my head grew about him until it finally hit me: "this guy is a complete asshole and has no idea where to draw the line" 
Ah shit him and Yogscast around the same time I believe. They got me into Minecraft. Such fantastic series for different reasons. X's series was just so calming and chill. 
I found their channel like a month before they stopped, I was so sad to see them go so quickly, barely had time to get caught up 
Damn those squeaker squad videos were too funny. At least he sometimes pops on other peoples channels 
still can't believe someone copyrighted his mass defect video after he died. i loved how each day was a different theme. good thing i have it downloaded atleast. 
Once the original Jaffa Factory and all their minecraft content ended, they went downhill. Recently though, I like their GMOD videos. A bit samey and generic, but it's good. 
I don't know, I've always liked CollegeHumor, and I still like them. It's just a different kind of comedy than before. 
Seananners (not dead but just does gmod stuff now), xjawz, whiteboy7thst (not dead either but last time I checked he was trying really hard to come back), idk who else 
I think Gmod machinima as a whole is basically dead at his point. Everybody has either quit YouTube/been inactive (DasBoSchitt) or moved on to SFM. 
And his producer buddy, who had all the serious licenses for the heavy weapons, was murdered with a single shot in the back of the head in his own office. That final episode about wanting to produce a video game and asking viewers for money was so weird. Seriously sketchy shit. 
Their season was one of my favorite seasons. Also because of the watermelon in the face incident. 
That accident happened long after the hiatus began (years). IIRC He left to build schools in Africa, and then became a monk/studied Eastern religions. 
Others have commented this but he actually left to do school and Monk stuff and then had the injury years later. 
Aimbot was my go to because it was hilariously accurate. 
No, he's just getting paid now. Hulu hired RJ to make shows and shorts for them. 
it's not their fault, if buzzfeed workers have a personal channel they legally have to tell buzzfeed all of their ideas first, and are only allowed to use them for their own channel if buzzfeed rejects them it's in their contract and if they breach it they usually get fired 
Holy shit. I just watched it. That was a god damn epic. 
Its not only playing a single game for that long, its your entire life being about the game "Hey guys just checking out this new, really interesting game that I'm really enjoying!" "WTF WHERES TF2 I WILL UNSUBSCRIBE IF YOU DONT POST MORE" 
When/why did he stop? I stopped playing tf2 about 3 years ago and stopped watching him as well. 
I found nova and eventually the creatures via nova and sp00n's Dead Rising 2 playthrough. Feels like fucking forever ago. 
That was the whole reason I subbed in the first place. They were just friends genuinely trying to have a good time, but then it became too business-y. Content felt forced instead of natural. Towards the end you could tell they weren't really enjoying themselves anymore. 
"Earth made, Adam Eve, Cain kills Abel, has to leave, boring genealogy, rain comes, olive tree..." 
I'm pretty sure will it blend is run by the owner of blendtech, like it's his company that makes the blesnders. 
Anthony has been uploading fairly regularly on his personal channel lately and I like those videos way more than Smosh personally. 
Since we're on the topic of OG YouTubers, anyone know how NigaHiga's content is these days? I haven't watched them in forever, but I have seen that they still get good views. 
One of the most quotable online shows ever. The Microsoft Sam/Mike voices killed me. 
They've finished work on it. Zack put out an update, and he said that they've done all the work they need to do, and it's out of their hands now. 
Welcome back to another episode of BBBBRRRROOOONNNZZZZEEEEEE LEAGUEEEEEE HEERROOOOOOOSSS 
This. I believe he was dating Pansino when Nerdy Nummies started. (I recall them sharing the same kitchen in one of his vlogs and her first few videos). Don't know if they're still dating now but NN is wildly successful so no wonder he would stay a producer on that show. 
He's with ESL. I think he moved onto a more professional position as before he was a host for SC2 events. 
He went on to being a producer for his girlfriends channel, Nerdy Nummies. He literally disappears for months on social media and then reappears randomly, rinse and repeat. 
He recently said on his subreddit (I actually just checked after posting this) that he's working on something different than his usual content. So I guess he aint dead after all. 
I think his "NPC" Rust video has been the only video to make me cry laughing. 
Whenever I remember that MinnesotaBurns exists I just imagine him having dinner with a girlfriend's parents and having to explain to them what his career is "So uh....I harass 12 year olds on Xbox Live for a living." 
He literally just uploaded a video with Mike, Ava, and Candace. 
Nah, he claims he has videos in the works. Right now he mostly gets trashed and streams at 3 in the morning. He's drunk a good majority of the time, which explains why it takes so long for him to make videos. 
What the hell ever happened to him, anyways? Seems like he all but ceased to exist right around the time Pewdiepie broke big. He get involved in some kind of scandal or something that killed his viewership? 
If he releases another "History of ____" video I'll have a seizure and die. 
Actually the very night before Pulse. Scary time in Orlando 
Rubberfruit's videos haven't been that good since he switched to SFM. Gmod has a certain charm to it. 
I remember that fucking video. It was so bizarre for FPS Russia. Successful YouTubers whoring donations from viewers is the norm today, but that shit didn't happen back in 2011 and 2012 when Kyle was popular. He and his crew fell down a rabbit hole of strangeness pretty fast after that, what with the murder and the ATF raid and all. 
You mean that lady who pelted herself in the face with that slingshot? Kevjumba's in that? 
Mine too. His old videos are soo much better and funnier than his new stuff. 
I saw an ad for one, they have like... actual famous people. Mark Hamil is doing their intro. Looks like it might be solid. 
Thats the main reason Safiya Nygaard left. She and Freddie created "Ladylike" and BF took it in a complete opposite direction. 
He sorta moved over to Overwatch. Really a few TF2 YouTubers moved over to Overwatch. 
His super mario videos filled with bitching about Target were the best. 
I remember when I first found James' channel at around 600k and he was my absolute favourite YouTuber at the time. The Creatures were fucking amazing in their day, but like you said, Seamus leaving was when it started to go to shit. I still go back and watch some of James' videos now and then but they never have the same effect on me. 
Wait are these unsolved murder type mysteries cos I need more of those YouTube channels in my life 
And it worked as a marketing thing,I really want one of those blenders. 
I just found his personal channel and didn't even realize he was from Smosh until he mentioned it. I feel kind of like a cheater, I always disliked Smosh but I like him. 
his content's great. high production quality and funny, well-thought out videos by him and his team. Plus he's pretty much a kpop star now 
It's definitely middle school humour. It was the funniest shit because of how edgy it was for us back then. Them saying THE F WORD so much blew our little minds. 
Nanners really calmed me down and gave great life advice. 
That speech in Pilot that Arbiter gives about how he doesn't think that Halo 3 map pack is worth it always gets me. 
Hhhhnnnnnggggggggg I fucking hear it in my head and now just want to watch more of his videos, but I know if I do ill just get sad again. 
Pansino, Dodger, and Husky were room mates for a while there. 
i never enjoyed the 1v1s, the public games with the knifing in black ops 1 was so hilarious. 
I hear there is a Nazi group that probably would would be willing to have him... back. 
Berserk did to Demo what Omikron did to Matt McMuscles. Luckily tho Matt survived. 
I assume the whole being accused of rape didn't help. Then a lot of big name youtubers said they wouldn't talk about the rape accusation., because they had no way of knowing, but they did know about other weird shit. Add on his content losing quality and then others doing his old content better and yeah he's gone. 
Then an Alligator ate a kid the next night at Disneyworld 
That channel must have the fastest turnover of subs ever. I think it took about 6 months for me to go from watching daily to unsubbing. 
I think he's just tired of Youtube. There's got to be a point were uploading that religiously gets to ya. 
It's not a secret anymore, but back when it still was, he blocked my friend from commenting on his videos for saying something about how he used to be a gaming channel and had an American accent. 
I can't watch the video since I'm on mobile. Question though: if the accident was in 2016, where was he though before that? I feel like he disappeared a lot longer than one year. 
Gaby Dunn and Allison Raskin left for the same reason a few years ago. Now they have a great channel called Just Between Us. After they explained why they left (same as Safiya) and Brittany Ashley was fired for being in a non-Buzzfeed video, I completely stopped caring about Buzzfeed. 
And him saying how he beat cancer and is free of it too 
Fuck. This is good to see how recognisable seemoose is. Although reddit is computery people. Kaizo Mario were the ones I enjoyed. Mainly 'cuz I don't think I'd have the skill. 
I highly doubt it. What you're describing (Soul isn't in it) is most likely fatigue from ongoing health problems and life issues. It's hard to be invested in any job when you have a shit ton of problems to go through. You don't just recover to full strength from extended illness. You add in other stress factors and you can easily push yourself back into bad health. 
The guy is the reason I'm such a sarcastic asshole , used to always rush home from school and watch the 7 million videos he'd uploaded that day, he and slyfox (another dead channel for that matter :( although he's doing decently on twitch) were such a big part of my early teen years. 
I succumbed. No regrets. They blend shit so hard you can heat the soup you're making in the blender purely through friction. 
He was actually fired by Dex because Lyle apparently became lazy or something. Dex talks about it in one of the episodes of Creature Talk. I'll link it here if I find it. 
That's quite a mouthful. I bet you're used to that kind of thing 
The thing people dont get is that making videos on youtube is not that sustainable of a business. After a while no matter how hard the creators tried you start to see how burnt out they are. It is a great place to start to get to other things but i dont think it is sustainable in the snese that it could be done for the rest of your forseeable life. 
Unfortunately it was kind of overshadowed in the news by the Orlando shooting. By the time of her passing she was more than just a YouTube star thanks to The Voice. She was one of the 2016 celebrity casualties that kind of flew under the radar. I mean, she was *murdered*. It definitely deserved more coverage than it got. 
It was never a secret, Russia was just a character 
Leukemia. It came back for a third time but he overcame it twice and I sent him a Steam message saying how fucking happy I was and how I never took his content for granted. I still feel shocked honestly, it was over 2 years ago now 
Cow Chop is fucking insanity and its all kinds of amazing. 
Me too. I don't even game anymore, but I did a lot when I was in middle school with all my school friends every day after school until my parents got home. It was always 4 hours of pure insanity and fun, just fucking around on CoD. And then going to school the next day and talking about all the things we did. Life was so much simpler back then. 
Rhett & Link seem to have been doing it for the better part of a decade now and GMM still seems fine to me. 
What they are doing now and what they did when they actually started is vastly different. When goodmythical morning started it was an actual podcats where they talked not just a show where they did wierd challenges. They also did a lot of mysic videos and fun y videos in general like the series where they went across america for alka seltzer. 
TotalBiscuit, Phil DeFranco, Dodger, JesseCox, Crendor, H3H3, TheYoungTurks, Markiplier, DigiBro... They all lasted a very long time and did so by increasing quality of work, changing things up, and engaging with their audiences in a healthy way. People who don't diversify fall out hard. 
He had a since privatized Word Press blog, Monk.College, where he explained that was why he left. 
They also have a whole crew doing a lot of the behind the scenes for them. Easier to not burn out that way. 
I like how the ref basically looks at the guy and without even saying a word he conveys this message "Yes, you still have to fight him" 
She did pretty well. Hide the face (pecking), hide the belly (disemboweling). You can see the ostrich react by trying to get around to the face. 
Yeah. The guy is like the CEO of the milk company or something like that. Read it last time I saw it around reddit, but the details are fuzzy. 
Then he hits the screen with a hammer and gentle places and egg on it. Then steals the money 
everyone knows the Free Willy is one of the hardest break dancing moves known to man. 
The fucking kid in the blue on the right just sits there unfazed. "ain't nobody seen a dick before, sheesh" 
the subtitles don't actually depict the real conversation. This reporter asked the little boy if he was going to miss his mom on the first day of school. He said no and smiled like a big boy, but then thought about it and realized he was going to miss her and started crying. That's why he starts walking off at the end, he was walking towards mom. 
it's got a leash on and is reacting to the tension the lady on the right put on it in anticipation of it falling off the table towards the foreground you can see the leash slip off the desk a bit after it falls off the table 
7 turnovers and almost cost us an NBA record against ORL? Back in the cage you go. 
That's a really good swing for *anybody.* ...seriously good swing, that's some Ken Griffey Jr shit right there. Beautiful. 
I always wondered what happened to her. I instantly assumed she went to the hospital. A watermelon to the dome would be excruciating. 
I hope you're feeling better bud :) Tomorrow's a new day! 
I lost count, over 20 times I had to research to figure out where she went. 
I haven't heard of that term. Is that like magic numbers? 
Disabled toilets aren't reserved for disabled people like parking spots though. They're just made to accommodate them. 
Like "It's legal until I get my hands on the rulebook and a pen." 
I thought the baby was floating away and Korean Jesus saved it with a miracle. 
That Gif is a thousand percent funnier knowing this. I am crying and I can't stop laughing. 
This makes me want to kill an ostrich. Before it disembowels me. 
"Crap, I'm losing them! Free Willy will win this..." 
Oh good. The other comment about 'does he miss his mom' made me think she was dead or something. 
There's one with a guy putting a kitten into an engine bay and a second guy jumps in with a flashlight to make sure he can see the perfect place for trapping the kitten. 
Whoa I saw it... but it took me a while. She's good. 
Then you do a Just Cause and repel yourself to the ground to break your fall 
* You are at point A wanting to get to B. * You know point B is 10m ahead. * You move 10m forwards. * You now reckon your are at point B. So you try to open the valve. You have no idea if you actually are at point B because your only point of reference is how far you moved from A. There are lots of factors that could have knocked you off course, like a gentle breeze or a bump in the pavement. Learnt this the hard way in primary school in an incident with a robot falling into a drain. 
Yeah if every other toilet is occupied you can go to the disabled toilet 
he had been practicing it for months. his friends knew one wrong move and his wiener was done for. but he wasn't gonna stop now. 
I've got something a little bit different for you. It's exactly the same shit you've been doing the whole game. 
I assume its because rich people can purchase lights for their cars that allow them to transverse traffic and otherwise act with the vehicular authority of an emergency vehicle. It could possibly lead to the justification of reckless driving. 
My brain would not allow me to accept that's how she went. Stupid brain. 
What a shitty woman. They aren't "reserved" for disabled people, they are built to accommodate them. Bigger stalls, hand rails, higher seat, emergency cord etc that would just be daft to put in every cubicle. 
Yeah we have them here in America, believe it or not. 
How do the blue buckets know they are not just undercover cops? In London last year I saw a dark green mini put lights on, pull over at the side of the road, a guy got out in jeans and a t-shirt and arrested someone... Either a genius undercover cop, or a genius kidnapper. 
That is part of the problem isn't it? if people with money and influence can buy/get them, they exactly can't know. It is ~~flouting~~ flaunting corruption in peoples faces. 
I swear they design department store Women's restrooms so that the tampon box presses against your thigh. Blech. 
This chain was a fucking roller coaster. I don't know how to feel. 
My personal favorites (these are all agree/disagree questions): "When I look around me, I don't see much hope for humanity." "I don't think modern art is really art." The best part is that these are on MULTIPLE APPLICATIONS. More than one company wants to know my opinion on Pollock. 
Yes! Along with that, the expectation (at least in certain fields) that you'll do months or years of unpaid work just to get experience and/or get your foot in the door. 
You misspelled "I start spending my days at work job hunting" 
Regardless of your religious views, there's a really relevant Bible verse that speaks to this behavior "Better to be criticized by a wise person than to be praised by a fool." Ecclesiastes 7:5 Nowadays, when anyone criticizes a person for being irresponsible or crappy, the recipient always claims that their "haters" won't let them live, etc. MAN, you are NOT important enough to have "haters." Perhaps if multiple people are making the same observations, then try to reflect on what's being said and be able to tell the difference behind whether it's being said due to a disagreement in values/opinions OR if it's actually being said as a way to correct some kind of behavior. Not all criticism is unfair or mean or prejudiced. Someone like your neighbor is not being treated unjustly, simply paying the consequences of poor decision-making. 
The top comments even state it as such, since at least 20k, and yet it still keeps growing. 
This just happened to me at a job I took over the winter: When I hire on: "We can only pay you $13/hr because you're inexperienced. if you were you were to walk in here already knowing what the products were, then we might be able to offer you $15-16/hr." A few months later... you know the products, have good experience with how things work: "it just isn't in the budget to offer anymore money." Which turns into: "It is hard to make ends meet in this job," "So I take it you're looking for something else?" "I don't have much choice, I have two young kids." Next day: "We're letting you go." 
The news networks have figured out that conflict sells. "Fair and balanced" coverage is about portraying both sides of an argument as equally valid so that the fight is drawn out. This is why you'll see ridiculous positions like flat-earthers put on TV and astronomers forced to debate them. 
My dad used to leave me in the car at the supermarket all the time. I hated being inside the store and just wanted to play my game boy and sit inside the car. 
The problem with this, is that so many people saw that video and were shocked by her bad behavior... so what did they do? They shared it with captions like "If my child ever acted like this..." or "OMG, I would NEVER treat my mom this way." And then it's the perfect money maker. People love to hate, and they love to be apart of something. Before you knew it, everyone had seen the video and the meme was started and everyone wrote articles about her and cashed in. Now everyone shares those articles and generates more money for online websites and they love it. So they continue to write articles that can be shared with the caption "why do we keep making stupid people famous." This. This is how we keep making stupid people famous. 
I heard some jackass the other day say "Millennials love the side hustle!". Nobody "loves" having to do extra jobs in their free time to make ends meet. 
Was going for assistant manager at Panera Bread. They made me drive hours from Orlando to Boca Raton, Florida to some "hub" store where they do 1st round interviews. Okay, sure. Can't be that bad, right? Went there THREE TIMES before they decided I wasn't a good fit. Fuck your 3 round interviews, and fuck you for making people drive an exorbitant distance to tell them they might have "delegation issues" 
I wholeheartedly agree. I spent years on tumblr and I've seen this happen more times than I can count. Some little 13 year old saying some stupid/insensitive/embarassing shit is part of the natural order of things and they will grow out of it eventually. Everyone was embarrassingly stupid at that age. But shit you said at 13 shouldn't completely destroy your life and cause a horde of adults to relentlessly harass you. Kids should be allowed to make mistakes. This also definitely applies to adults. No matter how old you are, you can always grow and learn from your mistakes. But the way things are now, those mistakes will never stop being used against you, even long after you've grown from them, and that's so harmful to everyone. 
I dated a girl for like 2 months and I was starting to get the feeling that she wasn't that into me because I was making all the effort. So I brought it up one day and she said "No! I don't want you to think that!" Ok, I said. The convo kind of died out and I wanted to see if she was telling the truth. So I decided not to contact her for a couple days, thinking maybe she would reach out. Never heard from her again. 
Theres a bunch of studios that release an alpha of a game, then just abandon it once it's past its peak earning potential, the amount of dead games on steam makes me sad. 
Yeah...that sucks. Not too long ago you could buy an unlimited plan and you'd be paying mainly for the speed. Luckily over where I live you still pay mainly for the speed and not the volume. But shifts in mobile plans have me worried that the home line plans might follow. 
This is the same for careers and for services. There's always 'new customer deals' for services, but they don't have the same benefits for their loyal customers. For careers, it is becoming more and more common for people to jump ship from a company to increase their compensation. It's far easier to improve your financial position by getting a new job vs. trying to work your way up a single company. 
Absolutely. When people are this well connected it really amplifies the FOMO. No one wants to commit to anything because what if there is something better going on. 
To put the cherry on top is if they use headsets to blast their music and not put them on, kind of defeats the purpose of a headset. 
Absolutely agreed. This shit makes dating awful because the more aloof you act the 'smarter' or 'better' you are about dating. Not cool at all 
I used to be one of these assholes until i had an epiphany that the way you deliver a message is far more important than what the message actually is. I aim for "tactfully honest" now. 
If anything it's crept back up. I know where I work it's practically expected that you work at least 50 hours, and people bitch when they are "cut back" to 40. 
Gym fails. It pisses me off so much when I see someone posting gym fail videos on Facebook. This is why people feel intimidated about going to the gym, and why so many people don't get healthier. 
God yes. I work in customer service and am used to a lot, but i still gaped at this one lady this weekend. There was a clearance sale and to keep things moving, there was a 4-item limit on what you could take with you into a dressing room. Up walks this lady with 20 pieces and when told about this rule (which was stated alllll over the store) she literally yelled and then threw all her items on the floor and stormed off. She was at least 45. What. Now you have zero things and everyone in the store knows youre a giant turd. 
I absolutely fucking hate this. Group chats are the fucking worst. Everyone wants to be the cool kid "might turn up, might not" and it's ruining our social lives. 
Ahh, my barista days. My favorite was a lady who asked me why I wasn't studying the secret menu in my free time. I told her, "Because I don't get paid to do so. Also, there are probably thousands of drinks on the 'secret menu.'" Her response? "Well, you obviously don't care about your job and you deserve to be fired." She even complained to my manager. My manager laughed her out of the store. 
Ahh, it's not for everyone! Just remember, 100% of the people who aren't terrorists have died. 
I can't stand when people do that either. I don't mind them sending a quick reply to a text but to sit there and go through your whole FB timeline is extremely rude and makes me feel like they don't really want to hang out with me 
AND when buying the game meant YOU BOUGHT THE WHOLE GAME? 
One a semi-related note, the "triggered" thing has gone way too far. I can't express my concern with something without some douche canoe responding "Lulz u sound triggered XD". 
Staring at your phone while walking is a little silly. But at least you're only risking yourself. Staring at your phone while driving...Fuck you. You're risking me, and every other participant of traffic. I hope you drive off the road (alone) and die. 
Yeah my Mom gets so annoying if I dont answer her RIGHT AWAY. Im an adult with kids of my own Im not going to be able to answer texts or calls immediately and frankly I dont have to if I dont want to and sometimes I just dont want to. Starts sending texts "hello?" "Did you get my message?" "Answer your mother!" Biiiiitch Im an adult and not required to be at your beck and call fuck right the hell off. 
Most people don't even understand that's even happening. I blame the TSA for this. 
This is what I was looking for. I saw Norah Jones a while back and the woman sitting next to us just looked at her phone the whole time, then when Norah played her most popular song the woman turned around in her seat to get a video selfie with the song happening behind her. Then she went back to her phone for the rest of the show. Tangentially related: I play in an acoustic band that plays on the sidewalk a lot, and you'd be surprised how many people whip out their phones and take pictures or videos without so much as stopping to listen for a second or throwing a dollar in the case. I mean, do what you want, I just don't think I'd ever be able to do that because it seems so weird and rude. 
I think this can be shelved under the "Lack of Grammar" category. And yes, it's absolutely awful. 
The law here forbids asking for papers to prove it. 
I've seen the one about humanity before. Pretty sure I was applying to a part time Arby's position (didn't get an interview, they were probably looking for someone who thought life is hopeless). 
Should have listened to him and gave his stapler back. 
Or almost no pay work. I could be better paid with a job at best buy or sears... but i love science and nature so $9 an hour at two separate pt jobs (so zero benefits) just to be in me field. After plenty of schooling mind you 
You know incognito doesn't prevent your employer from seeing the web traffic, right? 
Same here. I'd chill with a book or my gameboy, and my parents would leave the keys in the ignition so I could listen to the radio. 
Graduation parties themselves are already pretty much a GoFundMe. Everyone comes and gives you money for fucks sake. Yo Dawg... 
I was watching a debate show which had a teenage studio audience and one of he most infuriating parts was a girl asserting that you couldn't tell her she was wrong because it was her opinion. It really worries me that people may believe you can think what you want and it can't be faulty presumption or based on falsehoods just because it's in your head. 
In retrospect, you should have sent someone else to the interview on your behalf. 
This is the future. You see it as a big plot point in television shows a lot now. Everyone is just going to be okay with their privacy constantly being invaded and getting over it will be a part of life. I'm more worried about the children who aren't born yet they will never know a world where privacy was a thing. 
"Can you believe whats_the_deal22?? After two months of good times, he accuses ME of losing interest and then ghosts me! The nerve of some people..." 
My sister's friend dated a guy who ghosted her after 2 years. She thought he had died or something. She contacted his family and was so worried. Then a year later he casually texted her and asked if he could come to her party. She said no. 
People tend to do that. Have their fun then piss off. Don't tell you shit. You end up being the lover's fool and caring enough to wonder if something had happened meantime they couldn't give two shits if you existed in the first place. 
I've gotten to the point that a polite rejection can make my day, at least the person took the time to acknowledge me and my efforts. 
Like DayZ. Hardcore fans, go ahead and downvote me. 
The Lifeline program actually started under Reagan and was expanded to include cellphones under Dubya. 
Medical marijuana passed by about 7,341 votes. Sure that is a ton more votes but with 3,636,504 voters in the state, that number seems much smaller. 
There really needs to be a word for this. I like "Hubriotic".... hubris of one's own idiocy. 
I think it's just becoming less and less excusable in the age of information. It's always existed. Now there are less excuses. 
Home line plans have followed. In 2014 some of coworkers had limits to their home cable connections with overage charges if they went past. It hasn't become widespread, but it definitely exists. 
A friend of mine was offered a promotion with an insultingly low raise, so he countered and included research saying what he was asking for is what they'd have to pay somebody off the street. They looked him in the eye and said "yes, we would have to pay more if we recruited externally, but since you're not an external candidate, we aren't going to offer you that". 
I've been in my part-time position for nearly 4 years. My team has gotten 3 new part-timers and 1 new full-timer since I've started expressing desire for full-time. This is for a basic, entry-level, simple position that any dipshit can manage. That full-time opening? I applied for it as soon as it posted. It was open for 6 months. They started doing external interviews before higher ups transferred someone in from another district. This someone had been in their position for a whopping 4 months. What. The. Flying. Fuck. The only reason I haven't left for a different job is that I'm holding out until I graduate. The hours they give me are easy to work around. Fuck this job. Fuck this company. 
Yup. I've jumped ship so many times that I got my first yearly performance raise ever this year. Manager gave me a fantastic performance review, nearly perfect, and agreed that I was doing work at a level above my job title. Told me the average raise was 3% this year but mine would be higher because of my high review scores. Handed me a Post-It note with "3.07%" written on it. I earned a whole extra 0.07%! 
Aaaaand theres the reason they love than turnover. Never having to dish out those benefits if people are always new 
It increases their notoriety and fame though, encouraging copycats/increased crime. Plus think of the victims families who have to witness the brutality of the crime. 
I wish they would just get rid of it, peoples posts are sometimes annoying enough why do we need to see it live?? 
I have a friend who is on that list. Gets her knickers in a twist whenever she finds out our group has done something fun. Well, honey, you are no longer invited cos you never turn up. For a couple of years prior to exclusion, we would take turns inviting her, then place bets on (a) how close to the time of the event she would cancel, or (b) which family member was sick so they couldn't attend. 
It's basically just the golden rule of negotiation. Don't be afraid to walk away from the deal. 
Alternatively "this confirms my opinions so I don't need to evaluate my source, this negates my opinion so I should probably probe the source to look for holes." It can be a very subtle bias, to yourself. 
I sometimes feel like correcting people on the Kitty Genovese murder, but I just end up watching it happen and doing nothing about it. 
Lmao in my job field, a 40 hour week would be welcomed. 
I really hate this too. Anyone at the gym is there because they're trying to better themselves and it's never okay to belittle anyone for not knowing how to use equipment. Instead of taking a video or laughing, why not offer them some help? In a kind way, of course. I'm a fit person who still totally panics if I can't get a machine to work correctly because I'm so scared of looking like a loser. I can't imagine how someone who is actually overweight would feel about it. I have a lot of respect for those people! 
I think you're subconsciously following "Courtesy is given, respect is earned." 
This is why I try not to apply for retail positions where middle aged women may shop. They're *always* the absolute worst customers. 
"It's all in the mind." "Yeah, and pneumonia is all in the lungs." 
Yikes Some people are just oblivious to the fact that they aren't the most important thing and this still never ceases to amaze me 
Hell, even if you buy the "Season Pass" now there are still often things that you don't get included. Really irritating. 
Its the new "you mad, bro?" or "problem?" Trolls have just evolved. 
Not sure how other parents do it, but growing up, it was always exciting to have a lunchable for field trips. It was extremely rare. They're pretty rare for my child, for the same reason. They're fun to have and eat, but they're mostly overprocessed, so we do them sparingly. 
Oh I know, but my employer doesn't know how to do that. I'm the "IT" person :) 
Does this also block ads on mobile devices? The games my daughter likes to play on her tablet are full of constant ad spam. 
What's funny is both sides know the game has changed, just corporations are too slow to adapt to the change which they themselves drove. I'll be careful when I say "they" because corporations are just people that work there, which means they are our parents generation. We just want different things 
I work retail and it's kinda funny having people walk in. We strictly do online applications. Managers can't even start the hiring process without an application in the company website 
I do the same. Send the kid outside with water and our dogs who bark if someone dares to even glance at the house. She's fine and gets to play in the sunshine, I'm able to get stuff done or sometimes just eat lunch by myself in the quiet. Our yard is tiny, the gate locks are too high for her to reach and can't be opened from the outside, and our back wall has two huge windows and French doors so I can always see her. I don't see the big deal, but my mom is just positive the kid is gonna get snatched. 
I think we're going to have to teach some logical fallacies in elementary school so kids will understand not everything they think is right. 
"What do you do in your spare time?" "I like to push grocery carts around my apartment complex parking lot. Sometimes I will push 5 or 6 at once if I'm feeling particularly spry. I fashioned my own automatically opening doors out of dumpster finds and regularly remove scuff marks from the building's foyer. If I see any of the other tenants I greet them warmly." 
What a terrible thing to do to someone. At least you intervened before that poor guy ruined his life for a lie 
I ask my mom if she'd be okay with someone waking in and looking through her mail, safe, and bedroom. She of course says "no". My response, "But why? You have nothing to hide, right?" 
Right? Just because I am not doing anything wrong doesn't mean people always get to watch me do it. Like, I use the bathroom every day, and there is nothing wrong with that. But I don't want an audience. 
When half the class has those pictures up it probably won't cause a lot of bullying. It would ironically be a bigger problem if less people did it. 
There's been bills for my town that have passed/been rejected by fewer than 100 votes. It's stuff like "should we re-pave this road" or "should we raise taxes to hire more teachers," that stuff is really important to your everyday life. Vote in your local elections. You have the most voice and it's the stuff that'll be most applicable to your quality of life. 
It doesn't even make financial sense. Even paying him what they'd pay someone externally, that saves them the costs (both money-wise and in time) of doing that external recruiting, sorting through applicants, interviewing, training...and although that may not be much for one guy, that builds up when this is standard practice for the company and decreases morale when the people there see little advancement opportunity. 
Exactly, but if you threaten to leave then you'll probably get something. I hate that because I don't want to give ultimatums or demands. I suppose it shows you what you really mean to them.. 
Sad to see how common stuff like this is in every company and industry. I've always thought my industry was particularly terrible but seems like it's just everywhere. 
I just had my first performance review last year, and my supervisor told about what great work I do, he wished he had 100 of me on staff, I had a good attitude and worked hard. He gave me a 3% raise and told me that was one of the best raises on the whole shift. Turns out everyone from me to the burnout who didn't work a full week until July got a 3%. Yeah, I'll look elsewhere, boss. 
Quite the opposite. Training new employees is FAR more costly than keeping existing ones. Lots of companies are trying hard to start retention programs. 
Seriously... a couple friends of mine went to Disney a few weeks ago and I was getting Facebook Live notifications every 4 minutes. 
I thought I was just imagining that the engine was on a decline when I found myself skipping through a bunch of country-ish songs on an EDM station, but I'm glad I'm not alone 
My bro won't say yes or no thinking something better might come up and leavrs it until 10min before to say yes or no then ask one of us to drop everything for him to drop him off. Pisses me off. 
Has anyone outright told them this? Maybe they need to hear the truth for once. 
Alternatively *reads title* "these people are fucking stupid I'm not reading this" 
I absolutely hate that. It really isn't fun when I've been folding the same pair of socks for the last 15 minutes trying to get it right and I'm yelling at myself "just put them down!". Or when I spend 20 minutes locking and re-locking the door. Haha but thats cute right? s/ 
"What are you anxious about?" Every molecule of existence right now, thanks. 
On Drive-Thru: "Give me a *medium* white mocha, three shots, ristretto, two pumps raspberry, almond milk, and egg white bites." Me: "Do you want whipped cream on that?" Customer: *sighs* "Give me a *medium* white mocha, three shots, ristretto, two pumps raspberry, almond milk, and egg white bites." 
As long as the device is connected to your WiFi network, yes. 
Our generations do want different things. But I think there is still a substantial part of our generation that would be fine and content with a 3-4 decade job. 
There are lots of reasons for why my joke is funny. #7 may surprise you! 
AP Lang requires it. Easy class, it should honestly just become standard curriculum. 
Sorry, now you're overqualified for this cart pushing job. 
The job I have now required 5 years experience. I had none technically. I still applied and went and explained how the experience I had gained at other jobs gave me the ability to do this job. That just because my resume didn't have the title they were looking for didn't mean I wasn't just as skilled or hard working as someone with that experience. It got down to me and another girl who had the experience. They picked me and I've been here for a little over a year now. 
I wasn't strung along that long, but I had 3 interviews with a restaurant over the course of 2 weeks only to be told I needed to be 18 to work there in the first place. Considering that being one of the first things they should have been looking for, I was probably better off not working there anyway. 
Some dude who used to live in my town used to do this. He had a bunch of profiles of hot girls and would immaculately groom his feet and sell the pictures of his own feet to men in exchange for a few hundred dollars. 
I use the bathroom argument. Just because everyone knows I'm pissing doesn't mean I want them watching. 
There was a bill here that ran a guy out of town and it passed by one vote. He was declared a public nuisance and banned from entering the city limits. Let's just say I'll read the bill before I vote next time. 
They're probably operating under the theory that while it may cost them 10% more to fill that position than to simply retain him, for every one employee jumping ship there are ten employees who will simply take it up the backside when told "sorry, no raises to match industry standard. Take it or leave it." Whether that's an accurate assessment or not is a separate issue. 
The usual course in this case would be for the guy to take the promotion, sans raise, smile and say thank you. Then go and use the promotion to help get a job elsewhere for the real raise. Later, the company makes no connection and learns nothing. If anything, the departure is evidence that there is little point in promoting people they like to keep - so it must be better to just keep on keeping on instead without raise or promotion. And the circle of the HR death of the universe continues... 
Never tell them you're looking elsewhere - get an offer in hand first 
Yeah, this practice really irritates me. I had purchased an extended warranty for the laptop I used at college. It broke3 months before the warranty was up - they kept saying they sent the box to ship it back in for all three months, wouldnt send another. When I called back the final time, they wanted me to purchase another year of warranty for service. I told them I would IF they could tell me why they thought it was worth it when they didn't honor the first purchase in the first place. I then informed them that I was getting ready to buy a new laptop, and that I was going with someone else this time. I was polite, and very sincere. They repaired it without charge, and gave me 50% off on a new custom one. If they had done that in the first place, I'd probably be a lifetime customer. I've not bought an HP product since then, way too much of a headache. (2005) 
Try Google Project Fi. No contract and very reasonable rates. Service hops between Sprint and T-Mobile depending on who has the strongest signal. I switched from Verizon where I had a $200 a month bill for three phones, which was way too much. 
*Gasp*. You're not supposed to talk about your salary with other employees. Don't you know how much harder that makes it for your boss to screw you over? 
I remember the good old days when companies would hand out merit increases, standard of living increases, and occasionally re-evaluate your job title in the marketplace and give you a raise to make sure they were paying you what you were worth in the overall market. Now, like most places, it's just the 1-3% if you're lucky. Maybe a bonus if you're even luckier. Sometimes, you just accept keeping your job for a while longer. 
They used to have a retention program called promotions, raises and benefits. Now it's just lip service about retention. 
Hate to be a jackass but just turn off the notification?? 
"No answer? That's no, then. You are disinvited. Hope you find something fun, bro! When I said RSVP, it wasn't just boiler plate." 
Basic communication could address so many problems. 
Alternatively *reads the comments* "I have nothing witty to say" *continues lurking* 
everyone is different and very often each panic attack can be different. The only way out is through. Just help the person, let them know you are there to help them. Sometimes they might need a lot physical space, so back off, sometimes the opposite then hold them. Listen to what they are saying, it might not make sense but the person is trying to tell you what they need. They might be asking for things to be quiet for example, but all they can do is cover their ears and huddle in a corner screaming stop. As scary as it might be for you seeing it happen, its infinitely worse for the person experiencing. For me I very often know I'm panicking, I know everything would be fine if It just stopped, but my brain won't let it. 
When i was hunting for first jobs way back (nearly 20 years ago), I was considered overqualified for a job at radio shack because I was an electronics hobbyist. Seriously. But I got the last laugh, watching their customer service go to shit and suddenly all of their stores are closing.. 
I have a friend who sold her underwear, she made like 50 bucks a pop from buying just a pack of cheap underwear at Walmart, wore it for an hour and then sold it to some pervert. I went with her once as she met the guy at like a starbucks or something (i dunno), was quite disturbed. 
You could totally put it online and people would pay to watch you streaming. 
Someone on a different thread said that games leaving early access have a renewed refund window or something like that. That would suggest that DayZ may never leave early access for a full and complete game because all of the people who are now upset with it could get a refund. 
And while they're "looking", they can get the other employees to pick up the tasks of the employee that left without paying for it, and, eventually, they'll drop the facade that they were even planning to fill that position because everyone will be used to doing the extra work. At one point I was one of two people working on a single product. Now I work on three products with no one else that has my same skills. 
This is what I have done. I once asked for a higher title to match my responsibilities, and they told me they couldn't pay me any more. I said it was okay, I just wanted the title if I couldn't get the pay. They looked at me like I had a third eye. "Why would you want a title that doesn't pay you more?" They probably thought I had some sort of disorder where I was in love with titles. But what I really wanted was "senior" in front of my name so that I could go to the next company and get paid like an actual senior, rather than having to then earn a promotion and get the responsibilities of a senior, for a shit raise. Titles don't make you a better worker or better at your job, or more important. However, if you have skills, don't ever let your title lag versus your responsibilities or you will be that one guy that is relied on to do everything and you're wondering why you're making less that that moron they just hired. 
True. Nod, smile, walk out of the office and get another job. When you leave, they'll know why. And if they don't, they eventually learn why. You are not responsible for teaching them a lesson, and more to the point, they can sometimes reach out and fuck you over later in your career when you least expect it. Better to remain on good terms and do what you have to do. They either know what happened, or they're too dumb to understand. In either case, a waste of time to throw it in their face. 
"HP product." Ahhhh. I found your problem right there 
I am in LOVE with Project Fi. I only recently switched, but it's been way better than AT&T (my previous provider), and even though I don't plan on leaving their plan any time soon, I like that I'm not locked into a contract. Plus, I travel abroad semi-frequently and I'll never have to buy portable wi-fi at the airport again because my data will be functional in all the countries I travel to! TwT Main downside, though, is you only have like 3 phone choices, so if you don't like the Nexus or the Pixel you're kinda SOL. 
I actually had a past boss tell me it was illegal for me to talk about my salary with my coworkers. It's not. I was 22 at the time, and he was trying to take advantage of my age. 
My company does it in the most asinine way possible. They have several bands that they place people in. If you get in the lowest band you are fired. If you get in the next band you get no "raise" at all, if you get in the middle of the road, you get a cost of living "raise" if you wind up in the upper bands, you get cost of living increase + some extra. At least they occasionally do market value corrections. 
What's fucked up is I did. I made one comment on like the first one they did saying I hoped they had a good time, and I got barraged with every stream after that. 
"Hi, can you throw away this piece of paper for me?" 
RadioShack employed sales people, not electronic hobbyists as we would think. There is a reason the guy behind the counter knows nothing about the "dark area of drawers full of parts". They want to sell you a new phone, plan, and a bunch of accessories to go with it. Something something profit margins and bonuses. 
what the fuck. she actually went to meet the person? Why wouldn't she just mail it?! 
Or blasphemy laws, hate speech laws, or offending the majesty of governments, you name it. People already lose jobs or worse for offending holy cows (while the same joke about others won't get any reaction). 
This! Current right now I am project manager, documentation support, schematic drawer, safety manager, customer contact, and also I help to answer phones in my company because it appears as though only the women are asked to do this. The kicker is my company created an official project manager position which will essentially be given to me (once I write my own job description) but even when I transfer into that role... There is no one else to do safety and it'll be a while (probably never) before I am relieved of drawings. I cant apply for a position that has not been "created" yet, so I have to write it myself. Engineering Project manager should make a LOT of money, and I would essentially be asking my company to double my salary, based off the current position I am in and how much I am making. Ill be lucky to see a 20% increase. Female robotics engineers- we can't be that common?? 
Believe me, they knew what you were up to. That's why you didn't get the higher title. 
Yes, yes you did. The reviews were good at the time, and the price was half what anyone else was with comparable specs - that machine was a nightmare. I learned my lesson on that PC. Dell isnt far ahead of them, (last I used one) but they honor their warranties. Asus laptops seems pretty good, had one for 10 years and its still chugging along without issue. 
IIRC, that was one of the big criticisms of Yahoo's CEO. It was suggested that this just put the employees in competition with each other, which promoted backstabbing and discouraged trust and cooperation. Yeah, you might get some that would rise to the top, but they would not be team players. 
I see your station is called "Instrumental Jazz", and has maybe 50 instrumental tracks thumbs uped. Anyway, here's Frank Sinatra. 
Yup. Pretty much. It's a shame too because there's nowhere you can really go locally for small electronic parts like that now. 
And he always asked the girls if he could catfish using their photos! 
Buyer will prob pay more, and/or be more likely to buy, if they know it's genuine. 
Just get the experience for a year or so then apply externally. If you're successfully managing all that, a proper job and pay won't be to hard to come. This is also a great strategy for the situation described above. Take the promotion with a small raise. Get all the training for the higher position, show some initial success, then jump to another company for proper pay. 
Well the story is a little incomplete in the sense that the title might have actually kept me there a bit longer because it would have represented career progression as opposed to compensation progression. I agree that they were probably like, "he's just going to get a new job," but I certainly presented in a manner of suggesting that I'd actually want to show some "time in grade" before using that elsewhere. 
Just makes my Amazon Prime subscription that much more valuable, which just adds another nail to RadioShack's coffin. Self-fulfilling in a way. 
This can't be overstated enough. People are quick to jump on their high horse and "BLARGGGG INJUSTICE OMG" but really, there's an opportunity here. Write your own job description, take the promotion, take the increase pay, show some success over a year, and then shove it in their ass when you apply for a new job and get a much better pay with hopefully a better company that makes you responsible for one thing as opposed to wearing different hats. The long game is often best. 
..... bounce, bounce, bounce, bounce, bounce, bounce, bounce Bounce, bounce, bounce 
Dating apps to keep in touch with friends? Wtf that excuse works? 
Couldn't she have waited two more weeks? r/mildlyinfuriating 
A drug rep who "doesn't believe in therapy" is the worst kind. I'm sorry you went through that. 
Can you go back in time and tell me this 5 years ago? 
Happy story in a depressing thread. Thanks for this! 
Ah same here! I don't have any examples of a healthy relationship. So lost 
She went full dependa. Back when I was married and he was in the Marines nothing enraged me more than the "military wife...toughest job in the Corps." No bitch, it's not, not by a long shot. 
No shit. We lived in an apt and she got her twin to move literally next door. We were separated by only a wall. We've divorced and she's remarried and move back to Washington to be with her family. Take a wild guess where she's been living the past year with her new husband.... With her twin's family 
I feel for you. Do you have any kids yet? Be forewarned, she will be ten times worse when you do! I've been there. Thank God my kids are raised and my marriage survived! Fortunately, my SO hates my MIL, too, so that helped a lot. 
*My* ex cheated on his wife with me then cheated on *me*. I should have seen it coming. 
Wow. Your brother might have saved all of your lives by asking that. I'm glad you all got out of that situation. 
All these answers blaming their partners, kudos for admitting it was your own fault the marriage failed. 
You have no idea how much I think this may help me. Thank you for sharing. 
There has never been a show that has connected with me in such a way as Bojack. 
A lot of my friends are always late. One lives 3 minutes away from me by car, and she can still be an hour late. So I started making up earlier times for events. As in, I photoshopped a movie ticket to have a time an hour earlier just so she would show up on time. 
This is a really good point. I had something similar where my ex would always 'forget' the little things like this. For example he would go to the shop and get himself something nice, or would always pick his clothes to wash out of the laundry basket whilst I did both. Turns out he is just so self involved he never really considered anyone else other then his own needs. This behaviour was across all his relationships too. 
Next relationship if you are on a "break" be careful 
My wife does this "forgetting" minutes after having said something. It makes me feel insane. It renders all discussion pointless. She is never accountable. Care to share more of what you go through, in regards to that issue? 
I'm happy to see a happy response. Most of these are people saying how they went through horrible things, but this is a very positive story. Thanks for sharing! 
Am introvert looking to plan my wedding soon. Wedding plans seem far more stressful than fun in the best of times. 
I agree. Too often to people call someone's actions crazy and disregard the reasoning. This guy was rational, honest & concise. I admire his interpretation, rational thought process, & thoughtfulness. 
Don't be so depressed, at least there is time to turn it all around. Plus, ya have other great qualities about yourself you might overlook. Small changes here and there, buddy. We'll make it thru. 
I try not to think of it as a chore. She can't help it, and I don't want her to think that her illness is negatively impacting me so much that I can't handle things as well as I used to. She already has so much guilt in her life already. (Although she does know I struggle at times to find the right things to say) One of us has to be in a good state of mind. It is rough though. I felt alone for a while in the relationship, but things have gotten so much better. 
Thank you! Life is good now, and I didn't wind up pregnant or with an STD - so all things considered, I am doing well. 
He dragged the divorce out just to torment me, but in the end he couldn't stop it. I escaped, and you will too. Stay strong, for you and for your little one. There are brighter days ahead. I can promise you that. Sending love! 
No problem I totally understand the question! Every person has their flaws, and her flaw wasn't that she was malicious, but that she cared too much. Her main change is learning that love doesn't mean you have to tolerate poor treatment. I've known her since I was 5. We both fundamentally understand each other, and with every growth and change we grow closer. 
What a jerk, being a teacher is perfectly legitimate. And breaking off an engagement via text when someone is at work is ridiculously not okay. 
Hi. Everyone comes from messed up relationships to varying degrees. Understand that no one does it perfectly. My wife and I took a marriage class/married couple meeting group at a local nondenominational church. I can't tell you how helpful that was. You see and meet these long-lasting marriages. They talk about their pitfalls and challenges. You learn so much. Then you sit at tables with three or four other couples in different stages of life. Some you help, some help you, mostly a mix of both. It is great. 
I packed a backpack with some essentials and money I had scrounged away from cards from family, I also sold my camera which helped. I had a friend who lived in the same country but far from where I was so I took a 26hr greyhound bus that same evening. 
I can relate, completely. My mom is narcissistic and has anger management issues. Always yelling about something and would only "apologize" in the form of gifts but no words. Always talked terribly about my father to me (they split when I was 5). And she doesn't take responsibility when things go wrong...nothing is ever her fault. I've been married for a year and a half and I sometimes find myself acting like her. My husband has a kind heart and has helped me change gradually but cutting my time with my mom may help the most. I just hate seeing her upset when I "can't" spend time with her. 
I often wonder if there's something wrong with me because I'm very quick to cut off people when they display signs of being narcissists/sociopaths/generally shitty people. I've been told that I don't give anyone a chance. I do. It's just that, because of my upbringing (narcissistic parents), I spot the red flags much faster than someone who grew up in a healthy environment. I guess that's the one upside of having a childhood like that. 
I've played around with a few condoms ive found since my husband an I stopped using them. They were a few years old, and I never played around with them when I was younger. I didn't put my foot it it but I definitaly tested how much of my arm would fit in one and also how many apples I could carry on one before it broke. My husband doesn't know..although he may know if he reads this. But I think if I ever told him i tried to put my foot in one, he just wouldn't question it. Sadly with my track record of doing strange things " just to see what would happen" foot in a condom would be on the more mild side. Also I am totally goi g to go put my foot in a condom now... Thanks reddit. 
My son joined the Navy. The Navy moms groups were all, "I raised my hero!" Nothing made me want to puke more. You sent your kid to boot camp and many that go to boot camp are the same idiots they were before. Simply serving doesn't make one a hero. My kid went and enjoyed his time. Did his job. Am I proud? Yes. But my vagina isn't spouting nonsense about it. 
I probably wouldn't have minded if she jumped my bones every time I put on my uniform. It's weird but not that surprising, but she showed everyone everywhere how proud she was of 'her Marine' except for me. It's probably not a coincidence that every woman I've dated seriously sense has almost non existent social media presences. 
Wait women who are married to men of a higher rank think they outrank women who are married to men of a lower rank? 
After I saw how she treated our dog I quit bricking inside of her. Same story with the dog too. Loved talking about it and taking pictures of it, always complained about feeding it or walking it and basically all of the "You own a thing that can't take care of itself" responsibilities. 
A girl I knew in college started dating a marine. She'd post pictures on Facebook of her naked, wrapped in an American flag, wearing his dog tags and hat. Once they broke up, it was a different military guy. Then it was a biker, and all of a sudden she's wearing bandanas, leather, and boots. She was a train wreck, which is why I kept her on my friends list. 
My father has always refused to acknowledge that he has a problem. And of course, you can't help someone until they want to be helped. My parents are divorced, and I haven't seen my father since 2001. So I'm doing ok :) I'm sure that someone will pop in with "something something he's your father, you should be with him no matter what", but there is a point where you have to think about your own safety and mental well being. 
My boyfriend is the silliest most adorable and funnest person when drunk. Like a happy kid. I think that if you become a bad person when you drink you need to stop drinking. 
I am currently 16 weeks pregnant. My only hope is that she lives 1.5hrs away. 
That sounds like something Robocop would say lmfao 
You are more than 40 lbs lighter... More like 230! 
I feel like this was my husband's plan. But I did get pregnant. Now he treats me like a maid and sexualized object. 
Yeah, shit hurt pretty bad. I didn't really care that she wanted him to visit, he's gay so I knew she wasn't going to cheat with him. But it just showed me that I was the only one trying or even caring at that point. So I ended it right there. 
"When a man marries his mistress, he creates a vacancy" James Goldsmith 
Honestly if it's that bad just tell her if she is late to things like that then you will just leave without her. She will think you are bluffing at first but once you do it then she'll catch on. And make her buy her own ticket and stuff too. That way when she is late it really only means you had to go see a movie alone. You don't lose money or your time but she does. I feel a lot of people tend to change their actions once it directly effects them such as a loss of money or something. 
I love Mike Birbiglia and that is one of my favorite comments from him. My dad and stepmom are late people so my husband and I take bets on just how late they'll be. (I think 45 minutes is their record.) When we go over there for dinner or visits, food is almost always served much later than they say it will be, which isn't ideal for our toddler and family member with diabetes. It almost always means them needing extra snacks before eating. One time we were late (unexpected heavy traffic, last minute diaper change for the kiddo, etc.) We are trying not to stress as on time people do by saying they are never ready so it will be fine. Of course, the one time we are late...we get groused at since everything was ready and it's getting cold. 
Yep. I remember hearing once that you spend your life perfecting your shit and marry the person who doesnt fall for it. 
Agreeing with this observation. My ex-girlfriend was late to everything, hers or mine. When she didn't want to do my family/hobby things, she would "be sick." Lateness is generally consistent in behavior from my observation; this sounds more like he doesn't care enough to be on time. 
The own laundry from the basket is wierd to me, isn't the usual logic - here is the basket, now i put all of it into laundry? 
It's not ok, it doesnt happen to on every guy and it IS a big deal! 
This. My ex was a narcissist and hated when I told him I wanted a divorce. Looking back he was extremely controlling in our marriage and your comment helps me see just why he was so angry. 
My husband's family is like this. They're halfway around the world so we don't worry about it much. It's like cultural Stockholm syndrome. 
I heard this in a Dick Tracey, typical old school black and white tv show, PI-like voiceover in my head, then I saw your username. You're now one of my favorite novelty accounts. Have an up vote and keep up the good work :) 
I'm in the same boat as you. It's like when it does click in my brain, and we do have sex, it's amazing. Like the best thing ever, it just doesn't initiate in my head nearly as often as it does for her. I've read about T boosters and medically prescribed routes, because I do honestly want to meet her needs more - but it sounds weird to go to the doctor and take medication if nothing is technically "wrong" with me. I'm optimistic about studies that show chopping wood has a larger increase in T than pills. And working out at the gym has worked for me in the past - so that would be my suggestion to you. Just wish I had as much free time as I used to. 
My fiance and I are both somewhat introverted and low key, we were getting overwhelmed looking at big venues. We both realized that we weren't going to enjoy a big, expensive wedding, and one of our difficulties was that we felt like we had current expectations for family than we did friends. So we're going to have two small parties, one for family and one for friends. We're renting out a room in an Italian restaurant for family (about $40 a person and that's all we need to pay for and do for them) and the next day, we're doing a fun house party with friends, with video games and board games. It's gonna be way cheaper than one big wedding and we're gonna have a lot more fun. So don't feel pressured into spending a ton of money on a wedding that you might not even enjoy. There are alternatives. 
It makes things harder, but it's not a deal breaker imo. The most important thing to have is *common goals and values*. Everything else, including "love", is ephemeral. 
I'm not in a relationship but I am terrified of getting cheated on to the point of not wanting to start a relationship again and most of the girls I've been with have ended up cheating on me and I would absolutely never cheat it's a terrible thing to do to someone. 
I have to say, you're being very nice in how you are handling this. You're not demonizing her to us, explaining why she has these issues and even trying to make the divorce process as easy on you both as you possibly can (rather than trying to rip her sixteen new ones with a high-powered lawyer). Good on you, and good luck from here on. 
Thank you. It's funny I never realized how terrible I treated others until I saw it all in front of me like this 
My bestie has the most fucked up abusive family ever. His awesome wife's family just welcomed him into the fold, and neither of them engage with his side of the family at all. You can absolutely be a good person with a shit family. 
You made me read penis. You bastard. You got me good. 
I don't have any relationships, so I'm here to read about other people's to fill the void in my life. 
Well, if there wasn't a load in the condom then what's so unreasonable about it? Is there anyone who hasn't innocently played around with a condom? 
Ugh my son just got out of boot, and I joined some of those groups to stay informed. It was horrible. There's always that one mom who only posts bible verses. 
I tried to be friends with another spouse till she started saying she outranked me because her husband was higher ranking than mine. She got to pick where we ate lunch because she outranked me and always demanded a military discount. I avoid them entirely now. 
Totally agree. I'm sure she was never encouraged to have (or even discouraged from having) her own identity. What a sad existence to have to pin your self-worth on all these external things. I also think they're in a subculture that has its own rules. I used to do CS for a children's clothing company and we'd get military wives trying to get bigger discounts based upon their husband's rank. Sometimes they'd even try to pull rank on us if we we displeased them in some way. Like.... in the world you live in, is that a thing? It sounds bonkers to anyone outside military wife circles. 
My neighbors military wife doesnt work and stays home all day drinking. She lets everyone know that she is a full time military wife. Stickers on the car and telling all the neighbors that he is deploying soon and that she will need support (this was 14 months ago and the guy has not left the city). Seems pretty easy. I am with you though that it depends on the demands of the job. 
As I'm reflecting on this, my wife while I was in the Air Force was the same. Very dramatic, always very adamant about her social media presence. Her whole family had to know that I was in the AF and that I was a cop. She even told people that I guarded nukes, which brought on a whole line of questioning that makes everyone uncomfortable. When we divorced after she cheated on me with a friend of mine from my unit, she cranked up the "single mom" dial to 11. Every post on facebook was a selfie, usually of her big ass forehead. The girl I've been with for the last three years, though, hardly posts at all. Sure, she has a facebook. I've seen her comment on things now and then. The only pictures she posts are of her and I out doing things together, or pictures of my kid. It's really great how much things have turned around. It's also sad how accurate the social media/crazy line graphs are. Thanks for your service, jarhead. 
Knew a woman who was married to a full-bird colonel in the Army, and she constantly bitched and complained that spouses did not get a rank equivalent to their partner so they could have similar authority and benefits. 
I always hated this, even when I was an officer. I always made sure my wife knew she didn't have any rank associated with her from me. I also made sure to keep her as far away from the other spouses as possible. Good thing my wife has a good head on her shoulders. Some of these horror stories make me sick. 
BRB, off thanking my mom for not turning into a wackadoo when my big brother joined the Navy. 
In the Aussie Defence Force, speeding tickets on base (as well as all other punishments for breaking military law) are issued with the authority of the Chief of Defence Force, because he's the one who signed off on the Defence Force Discipline Act. I'd love to have some bitch tell me she can't get a ticket because her husband is an outranking officer, then ask her how her husband outranks the Chief of Defence Force. 
Did you ever point out the irony that the dog was just as useless as her with the benefit of not being a cancer on society? 
I'm bipolar, have a husband and 2 young kids. It didn't onset until 4 years into our marriage, 8 years into our relationship. I'm so thankful my husband tackled it with me and we are finding ways to cope together. That being said, as a bipolar person: your dad choosing to ignore it and live without treatment shows selfishness and negligence. He didn't prioritise y'all, his family. I'm glad you all looked out for yourselves and broke away. Your health is important! 
Well as they say, with rose colored glasses, red flags simply look like flags. 
Lock the delivery room down. Tell the hospital she is not to be in the room with you while you are in labour. 1.5hrs is nothing, she will be there, she will piss you off, he will be running around keeping her happy while she criticises everything you are doing. 
Leave him. You are more and deserve to be treated with respect, love, and admiration. 
He felt that way because of how she told him things about the relationship, you. 
All of this. If she wants to miss the first half of a movie so be it. Don't answer the phone so she can find you and don't update her on what she missed pissing everyone else in the theater off. And stop spending money on her until she gets her act together. Or just drop her. 
We did a combined Christmas with our family and my brother's wife's family. Brother and SIL hosted. My SIL's sister was 6 hours late on Christmas Eve. They all just shrugged and said that's how she is. Her folks kept texting her and she'd text back "Be there in 30 min".....**for 6 hours!** 
Like the best thing ever, it just doesn't initiate in my head nearly as often as it does for her. Exactly this. I like it but I'm not in that headspace as much as he is. I've tried to suggest how he can get me there. He goes from 0-60 and I'm still getting into the car. So I've said I will try harder but you have to be sensitive to where I'm at too, be patient, and help me to get there. 
I second this. Terrified of being cheated on and it's never even crossed my mind. I would hate myself too much 
Be happy you realized your own red flags you're carrying, but don't throw the baby along with the water. Maybe a nice way to do it is to investigate this with your SO? Maybe she can confirm (or not) these things and find common ground on how to approach conflicts and so on. 
I'm a drug rep! In the UK we're not allowed to carry samples of prescription medications. Doctors don't hold stock, they write prescriptions for a pharmacy to dispense. 
I completely agree. At some point we have to take accountability for purselves and our own choices, i love my family but i had to distance myself and become the person i want to be and that just can't be about them. We all have specific issues from our childhood and our past but it can't always be an excuse 
He'd been working towards a specific position for several years that was basically his dream assignment. Everyone had signed off, he had all of the paperwork, the last hurdle was the security clearance. When she left our interview, the investigator hugged me, and promised me he wouldn't get his clearance. He didn't get the clearance, or the position. 
Yeah, I read this story and my first thought was, "wait... can I get a condom on *my* foot??" 
As a military spouse with my own separate identity and autonomy from husband...this is fucking delusional levels of crazy. 
No.. just, no.. It doesn't matter if you're the spouse of a private or the spouse of a general, *you don't have rank*. A spouse who tries to "pull rank" is just a sad human being with little self-worth, and probably sees their military spouse as nothing more than a trophy and a paycheck. 
Sorry about the situation, but thanks for the chuckle at "usually of her big ass forehead" 
That's hilarious, I can't imagine that's taken well by most parties 
Are you kidding, O-3 maybe and above ;) But seriously O-1 is the worst rank in the military. You get shit on by everybody except those who graduated basic with the past two weeks. Sure you get a lot of passes but you catch hell for literally everything you do. 
Ha let me tell you a story, when a unit deployes they leave behind a few people to be the family relations guy...they asked for voulenteers i almost literally ran to the head to make sure i wasnt there for that..god bless his soul 
In 2011 I had just PCSd to Ft.Carson. It was also after the repeal of DADT, my gf and I had gotten married in Iowa but that didn't count as far as the army went but I still wore a wedding ring. In the commissary the stereotypical dependa who was married to THE BIGGEST shitbag specialist in our unit who at the time was under investigation for rape. His wife corners me and tells me how it's unfair that I received BAH because I was going to hell and since her "godly marriage" didn't receive enough in her opinion, I should give her half of mine because she and her husband was ordained by God. I very calmly and politely informed her that officers, both married and unmarried are entitled to BAH and that she should walk the other way and got the fuck out of there before I waffle stomped her neck. Her husband was later kicked out so there's that 
Tbh it's not just the wives. I remember getting bullied by some girl in middle school, I then said some hurtful shit to her, and she sends her dad to my home to come yell at me. We lived off base. Angry father comes to my door and yells "MY NAME IS MASTER SEARGANT SHITDICK." My dad then casually responds "yeah, I'm colonel _____, what's your problem?" I knew that dudes daughter all throughout middle/high school and she was the most entitled little cunt. She pranced around talking shit on everyone and got her father to come yell at 12 year olds who told her to shove it. 
My big brother joined the army maybe 13 years ago. Not one bumper sticker, not one piece of army apparel, not even a lanyard. God bless that woman for not being that mom. 
Basically the same here. Different titles but still, the same. 
Dogs can detect threats, provide emotional comfort, and probably do better in melee combat. 
My Bi-Polar father chose meth. My Bi-Polar self chose a psychiatrist. I'm glad you chose to help yourself. I did it for my wife first. And to not be my father second. 
That is actually the best quote I've heard all day 
"Why are you in delivery now?! You should have waited!" 
Honestly this is my plan. I got a job in February and saving up for a divorce and a new life. 
It wouldn't surprise me. But she told me her sister felt the same way and when I asked her about it she told me that she's never been intimidated by me and that I was one of the only people that actually listened to her and took her seriously whenever she was having problems. So for all I know she could've been lying about how her friend felt too. 
That's gotta be a whole other thing than running late, though. That's social anxiety or substance abuse or hating your family or SOMETHING. 
We had family friends who were typically 1.5-2hrs late to any gathering, at first they claimed it was because they had 5 kids, but those are all grown and gone and they still can't make it earlier than an hour late. 
Been through it and it is soul crushing, wouldn't inflict that pain in my worst enemy 
That's makes sense. I will definitely need to take some action to save my relationship 
Right? And most of the drama here is mental illness or some kind of extreme. I think I'm doing alright. 
I wonder how the women who are *actually* serving feel about these women. Not huge fans, I assume. 
Why aren't you abusing your rank?! I swear, some of the hardest people to deal with were the wives of senior officers. Their husband with rank generally would be cool with most everything because they "get it" so they talk to you like any other person. Meanwhile, their wives were barking orders at us and demanding we call them ma'am. 
I call it as I see it, which was from a long ways off if the sun was in the right spot. Cheers 
The wives of those in charge of a command have to be the worst. Automatically think they are in charge of the families of all those in their husband's unit. One used to work for me and I fired her because she wouldn't work, thought she was better than me, and was so rude to everyone. 
It's actually probably the easiest rank in the army outside of private. You literally get a free pass for every mistake you make, because you are expected to be inexperienced. 
You should have asked if the rape her husband was accused of was also ordained by God? 
At the price of the annoyance, an army wife should easily able to provide each of those services. 
Parents are always, always fantastic examples. ...It's just that sometimes they're fantastic examples of what *not* to be. 
Good luck to you. I'm a new mom and military spouse and I definitely feel like a maid most days. 
The fact that you're willing to try gives me confidence that you can. I wish you the best. 
It's also not funny when they get to the treatment plant. 
This is why you see people at Disneyland or sea world in uniform. They want the recognition. I'm proud as hell about my service but I didn't even like going to the grocery store in uniform. To each their own, most people have the same mindset as I do but there are definitely a few that wear the uniform to public places to get attention and free stuff. 
Citizenship? Jesus founded america on the 4th of july you dumbass. 
Why were you even meeting the wives? Did they just go to their husbands' work to order people around? 
At least you can play Cod as a level 1 and shit all over the Colonel rank 10 or whatever it is now :) 
I thought Bruce Springsteen founded America on the 4th of July. 
Haven't played CoD in years, but in hindsight, this may have been a therapeutic exercise back when I was in! 
I've been to that McDonalds (circa 1992), and after standing in line for over an hour, 4-year-old me ordered a cheeseburger with no meat. Totally irrelevant, just had to share. 
This shit. Right here. Is why im surprising my girlfriend by driving the whole 10 hours. :) 2 years steong* baby! *strong I was in the middle of packing for the trip :l 
Almost like she was calling you back to your home... 
You should have shouted 'there can be only one' before beheading her. 
I didn't believe in soulmates until I met a man and felt like I'd known him for years. At one point, he even told me that he felt like we'd dated in a previous life. Unfortunately, he was already engaged to someone else and I intentionally cut off all contact with him after 8 weeks of knowing each other. That was 3 years ago and I still think about him often. I hope he's happy. 
This sounded scary similar to my first few dates with my boyfriend. Unexpectedly slept over at his place when I arrived at 12pm the day before. Spent a whole weekend at his house for our next date. Only difference is that we're not engaged haha Congrats to you both! 
i bet she's one of your dad's favorite people now. 
My wife still tells me I spend too much money on her (she also knows I don't make very much). She doesn't seem to understand that making her happy is always worth it. 
Thanks for the work you do. Ain't easy, but you make the world better. 
There was this guy i was kinda casually seeing, and the very first time i met his son, he excitedly called me "mommy" and held out his arms. I looked at the man with the most alarmed look on my face, and he had the same look. I was like "wtf yo" and he was like "this has never happened before". Still makes me wonder sometimes. 
Please tell me you opened up the proposal with, "we need to talk". Please. 
Oh, I so get this. We held out for 6 months before we "officially" moved in together. Will celebrate 22 years of marriage this September. 
In the movie Shotgun Stories there is a scene where one of the main character's girlfriends brings him a burger. This character's brother sees her walking towards them with the burger and he says, "oh man, she brought you a burger," like it was the nicest thing that's ever happened. The delivery of the line is so perfect i had to pause because for no fucking reason i was tearing up. Over a damn burger. 
By the use of 'up north' and cheap pizza probably meaning Little Caesars I'm going to guess you're from Michigan lol 
I'm sorry for your loss, but your love was so big. How beautiful and lovely, knowing long true love is still out there in human form. 
I would have responded "Show time" You can take the woman out of the Hamilton memes, but you can't take the Hamilton memes out of the woman :) Alternative title: why I'm single 
As someone with serious mental illnesses, this made my heart really happy. I've never been in a relationship and don't know if I ever will be (long story) but at least now I'm certain there are people that won't run away from it. Well done and congrats to both of you. 
Hate to say it, friend, but I don't think you can marry ol' Righty. Even if you've had some great times together. 
Him and that sandwich are still married to this day. 
Similar story: My dad says that he first proposed to my mom over a plate of Lasagna. She had made it from scratch - like, hand-crafted the noodles from dough and everything. He proposed to her over pasta, and she just rolled her eyes and said "Ask me again when you're serious." After dinner he asked again and she said yes~ 
When my current wife and I were dating she did something similar for me. I was dealing with some depression for a while and when I was at work she came over to my apartment (I gave her a key because she said she would be dropping off some baked goods or something that day). She completely re-did my bedroom; transforming it from a depressing and dark hovel to a comfortable, bright and happy place. I will never forget how that simple act helped me change my mindset. We have been married now for a couple years and still use the bright white down comforter she put in my bedroom. 
I was play-wrestling with my then-girlfriend when we were both drunk one night after a party with all our friends cheering us on. I ended up picking her up and dropping her (gently, I'm not a monster) on my dining room table. The table was a piece of crap we found by the dumpster, so when she landed the table literally snapped down the middle and crashed to the ground. Everyone got really quiet as she slowly got up, turned, looked me in the eye and said, "Is that all you got, pussy?" At that moment I knew she was the one. Been together for a decade, married six years, and now have two kids. I second that good-humor-while-play-wrestling qualifies as a green flag for marriage material. 
I am dating one of my best friends from high school. We graduated in 2009 with a class of 27 students, so tiny school, 14 girls and 13 guys if I recall correctly. The history teacher was writing our walk roster and asking which guy willing be walking which girl. My best friend was first on the list. Teacher called his name and I volunteered. Now I tease him that we will be walking down a different sort of aisle. ;) 
This is the type of story I want when I get married. 
Couldn't it be both? My father would appreciate both... 
Plenty of hospitals still use pagers on an in-house network. Far more reliable than cell phones. 
Sometimes I forget that other people find it weird when your girlfriend says something teasingly and you shoot back with "you want to fucking die. I'll punch you right in the fucking face" and she responds "fight me, bitch. Ill fuck you up" 
Ours was similar, but happened much faster. We were laying in bed and talking about marriage as a general concept, neither of us having any intention of going that far yet. Then just kind of asked... what if we got married? And then, we did... Got engaged after only a month, and the proposal was nothing more than a hypothetical conversation XD Been married for 11 years now, and we have one child so far! 
Congrats on your anniversary! I agree- I'll take "makes me want to be a better person and helps me get there" over "blindly accepting everything I do" any day. 
That reminds me of my husband. His mother died at the beginning of the year and she requested not to have a funeral. Instead, a few months later, we had dinner with his dad and siblings in honor of her. Well, I was looking in our shared calendar to see what time we were meeting at and busted out laughing when I saw that he put ghost emojis around the event title. I asked him why he did that, he said he wanted to give himself a reason to laugh when he saw it. 
You've got yourself a good cat, too. Any cat that can stay calm long enough to allow a costume put on them is a keeper. 
My 3 year anniversary is just around the corner too! All I need now is a wife and a time machine! 
She sounds perfect. I think I'm in love with your wife. 
"Dad, when did you decide to marry mom?" "Kids, first time mommy and daddy banged, mommy walked naked across daddy's floor, and that's when daddy decided he could marry this girl." 
My girlfriend does this without being high. If she gets a blanket ever she literally rolls herself into it saying "burrito" over and over. 
"daddy, when did you know you wanted to marry mom?" "well, son. we have it on video. let's watch" 
"Greater good? I am your wife! I am the greatest good that you are *ever* gonna get!" 
My girlfriend would complain about not being in the basement playing video games with me 
Returning the shopping cart is huge. People are wild animals at the grocery store. 
SHOULD HAVE HELD OUT FOR RAINBOW SPRINKLES LADY! /s 
this is an amazing story thank you for sharing it i just read this to my boyfriend and we had a good cackle 
I've seen a 1200. This guy's tops the chart. Wonder what caused OP to go into DKA. Wish he'd explain! 
Ah me it was whenever my SO and i yelled or got angry my dog comes in and barks. I mean loud barks. Hes 80 pound gsd x husky x lab and barks until we just speak. No yelling allowed with him haha 
Then blast princes of the universe over the stereo 
I was also a big fan of when I told you I fell when flipping over a french dude and you told me that you'd be mad at me if I died, but that doesn't get us nearly as many internet points. 
Definitely easier when you have your island of light by your side ; ) 
Well shit don't leave us like this What happened after? 
Actually it started with, "I'm sorry it's not a shotgun," since that's what she had asked for. I had had a custom ring made for her, so I gave her a tiny box instead of a large one with a gun in it. 
I'm currently in this boat. I took a guy home from the bar a month ago. He hasn't left. I just spent 4 days with him across the country to see his mom get married. I just got out of an abusive relationship, and I didn't realize spending this much time with another person could be so *easy*. It's obviously too early to tell, but deep down I'm hoping for a similar love story! 
I was really confused for a sec and thought this was YOUR husband and your sister, and I was like, "oh boy, OP, I got some bad news for you. Your husband is totally ... ohhhhh wait, no, OK I get it. Gosh, that's nice." 
Immediately, yes. But, it was a bad stroke that caused a good amount of brain damage, and left her paralyzed and in a wheelchair. She passed away 5 years later (this past February). 
Thanks for your kind words. I never thought she would go first. A big life change. Cheers 
Righty would never say yes to begin with, she knows she's just the side chick. 
I hope this is how you two find out each others reddit accounts 
That's beautiful man , I hope the girl I marry wrestles me and calls me a pussy too . 
Just don't have the part where we initially met. My friends had a party, and she was friends with the people next door. She flirted with me by taking my hat, but I was oblivious as usual. I walked home and she made out with one of my friends. I barely remembered her when she came over for another party a couple weeks later. She pulled the same take his hat flirting, this time I caught on. We cuddled on the couch and fell asleep, she left to go upstairs to a real bed. I had thought I had made her mad somehow. Next night she had came over again and I apologized and asked her to coffee. The rest is history. 
My mother really appreciated her cleavage. We've had several conversations where I had to say "mom, I'm glad that you're as impressed with her boobs as I am, but can we please change the subject because this is getting a little uncomfortable..." 
And I'm told they're trusted to not interfere with (or be interfered by) certain hospital instruments. Not sure if it's true tho 
Exactly! Or she'll shout "you can't hit a girl" And you shout back "Equal rights equal fights bitch!" 
Take a biiiiiigg whiff folks, *This* is a damned fresh Sprog. 
When my grandpa was dying, he told my mom he didn't want a funeral. She told him, "It doesn't matter what you want, you'll be dead." 
Uh oh, she found me. I don't know how but she found me. 
We have been looking for a poem as a reading at our wedding, my fiance and I and I think this shall be it. Thank you. 
Oh no they had never met. The girl she punched was friends with the girl who's foot I stepped on. 
I feel like that's the hardest part. We were both in our early 30s. I don't know what to do now, to be honest. These last few weeks have been the hardest of my life, and I just don't see a point. I'm in therapy. I'm taking antidepressants. Without her, everything seems pointless. I may find happiness again, but it's going to pale in comparison to the time I had with her. So that's what I get to look forward to for the rest of my days? A pale shadow of happiness? It sounds fucking terrible and I cannot stand it. 
Shit. Sorry to break it to you, but I think she's taken. 
Man I don't know which I like best, this or the guy that spit in his wife's eye, or the guy that powerbombed his wife through a coffee table. 
that's the thing, he didn't marry her bc she organized her jellies well, but because she had so much jelly that she could even make a rainbow of jellies 
he wanted to be clear that she didn't include her infrared jelly 
LOL. Yes, should have been like that but she was confused at first and did even not take my gag out. 
my grandfather described that time in his life as 'i joined the army(involuntarily) and got married(also involuntarily)'. 
I'm not entirely sure. I am a type 1. I wear an insulin pump. I remember not feeling the greatest while out there, and probably didn't think to change my site or check my blood glucose. Unfortunately, it was almost three years ago, and my memory of the whole ordeal is still a bit fuzzy. Most of what I know was from people telling me. 
Literally what my boyfriend did. I'd never listened to metal before, but Metallica is his all time favourite group. I've been with him for ten months and already know all the words to most Metallica, FFDP and Alestorms songs. We're going to see Metallica live in a few months and I'm genuinely so excited. 
Aw man i wish i had a nice happy ending for this. Guy ended up being the biggest liar. I fell in love with his son, and he with me. This little 2 year old kid would ask for his "silly mommy" (me) when he got tired. He wouldn't let his dad touch his hair or change his clothes when i was around, i had to do it all for him. Guy is seriously a huge ass, but he gives me updates about the little guy, so my heart is happy :) 
You know its funny, my close friends constantly tell me how lucky I am to find the love of my life at such a young age without all the trials and tribulations, but honestly, I always thought that if you're just cool, friendly, respectable, and happy with everyone, someone is bound to just go, yeah I want to have that person as company indefinitely/for the rest of their life. I only realized after working that my life is a bit unique for having being 37 years old and still having over a dozen accomplished friends that I still hang out today and having met them from 4th grade to freshman year of college. Same crew, over 20 years of friendship, and its all love. 
We take food seriously. I miss Sicilian food, but even here in Milan, the average quality of ingredients is insane. When she said it was a rushed meal, it's because her mom and grandmother used to cook for a bigger family, when those moments were taken religiously. 
Very sorry to hear that and I hope you and your family are doing well. 
50 Years of marriage later: "I just wanted you to know, I only did it to be nice. I never truly wanted to marry you, but I thought it'd be rude not to." 
Wow. Small boobs give you all kinds of insecurities but I never considered disappointing someone's *mom*. 
Mobility professional with a long career in Healthcare. The potential risk here is a theoretical one. I've never seen an incident where a medical device received interference from a cellular device. A pager would only be slightly better than a mobile phone, but still a possibility. Honestly, they just want you to shut the fuck up and stop taking conference calls in the hall. 
Yeah it doesn't help that we actually hit each other too. Obviously I hold back so it doesn't actually hurt, and I only hit her arm or something, but she's tough so its still way more than is accepted to hit a girl lol. But since I'm bigger, it gets fun when she punches me in the chest and I scream to hit harder. I've met a few women that can talk trash like this, but what makes marriage material is when they know when it's time to talk serious. 
Of all the different types of bread, there's nothing quite like toast !! Now we have a poem together 
That logical part of you saying there will be happiness again is 100% correct. But you'll be miserable for a while first and that's ok. I don't think that's said enough. Take this time to grieve. You're allowed to be sad, and people shouldn't rush you into being happy again. Horrible things like this take a long time; everyone is different and will cope in their own way. Just don't forget to get good sleep, drink plenty of water, and get all your vitamins and some sun while you're at it. We all wish you the best, man. 
Uh, if you only have two then they can never be *not* organized depending on whatever angle you choose to look at the jellies. 
And this is one of the reasons I have serious issues about dating someone with kids. I can handle the heartbreak of breaking up with a SO. Not sure I could handle breaking up with the kid. You're stronger than I am. Sorry the guy ended up being a huge ass. 
that's not a "bit unique". It's a bloody unicorn traipsing around with elves in the wood. You are the kind of person that they make "feel good" movies about. The kind of movies that everyone stopped making because people kept saying they were not believable enough. 
My great grandparents were from Palermo. My great grandmother made her pasta noodles from scratch and her house always smelled like lasagna. When her and my grandmother would cook, they would cook to feed an army and impress a chef. 
Pretty much what my ex-wife told me when she dumped me, minus about 45 years 
He was replaced with himself from a different dimension. 
Oh man, my Eastern European family has *in depth* discussions about any new girlfriends in the family that centre around perceived attributes of fertility including * breast size * hip size * hair length/thickness/texture * waist to hip ratio * voice (yes, seriously) * teeth Baba told me I was blessed with big boobs and big hips, so I can "give my husband many strong sons." I'm being 100% serious. 
Yea, my mom said this about my ex bf. That was an awkward dinner.. 
ugh. I never even considered that. I had a hard enough time realizing that if I broke up with my girlfriend I wouldn't get to see her dog anymore. We eventually got married. 
What kind of shit-ass car doesn't have a keyhole on the driver door? 
Its really weird. My friends and I are all in our mid 30s now, majority of us are pretty successful career wise, but we always have a policy where if you move up in the world, you take your friends with you. There's no fun clinking glasses of champagne and wine by yourself. So for some of us with more funds, we have a honeypot where we stack our funds in case of emergency. Originally, it was setup as bail money, in case one of our friends need to be bailed out with the quickness for doing stupid shit. We were big graffiti heads in HS and part of college. Now, we just lend each other money to help buy houses and get that big milestone in life. Our logic is if you burn one of us for a couple of stacks, its really your loss, but honestly I haven't been burned yet. But its very helpful to have a couple of thousand dollars laying around to help you move up in the world and achieve your dreams. Go get that dream homie, next bottle of champagne, we'll be clinking at YOUR house. 
To which king of Westeros does your house swear fealty? 
It's CURRENT YEAR! If a guy can't have tits, what the fuck are even we doing here? 
That's so sad :( I don't know where my grandpas are buried (well, one I think I know), but I went to their funerals and it's a chance to share nice stories and to remember their lives and how much you loved them. Although at one I was 13 and a grown man asked 'how do you know the deceased' and I burst into tears and sobbed 'he's my grandpa.' Looking back I feel like I should have said, 'shit bruh we were stationed in Na'am together.' 
I still miss my high school ex's dog. Shit is tough. 
that's...just awesome. So...when are you writing your biography and selling it as a movie script? Because this setup is just too much. 
Please tell me you walked by them and said something like, "Nature she sure is beautiful aint she" 
You missed a key element in your experiment. You need to keep getting yourself suuuuper close to the point of no return and then backing off. Essentially get to the stage where your dick throbs and your about to go too far. That's the bit where your canon loads up some extra rounds. Keep doing that for a few hours and then you'll go off like mount vesuvius. 
Upvoting for reminding me of that time my ex-gf was reading some sex websites online and asked me to search for her G-spot and help her achieve orgasm. After a couple botched attempts, about two hours in the mission was a success and she screamed so loud the upstairs neighbor's dog started barking. Such a proud fap, that one, being able to make someone feel pleasure like that for the first time. Puts a tiny little tear in my eye thinking about it to this day 
How the absolute fuck did "I should tell my mom about this" come to your mind?? 
How on earth did you manage to - um - produce that kind of volume? 
While reading this I was 100% it was turning in to a story about Cinderella 
Cum in the fish tank, Dave. OH SHIT, THEY'RE EATING IT. 
And on the rarest of occasions, there may have been a few seconds where it would become unscrambled, for one reason or another. It's been probably 20 years and I still remember how unexpectedly it all escalated from "*Is that a boob or a shoulder? Fuck it...*" to being so amazed by what I was witnessing to even remember why I was watching in the first place (until it went back to scrambled a moment later and I realized my mistake). I want to say the channel was called "Spice". Does that sound right? 
Oh this one is going into the memory bank. But yeah, Most of my female coworkers have been hit on more than once. You never want to date a psychologist, we're weird people. 
Props to you for managing to fap to a pixelated pussy 
Follow up: what did you do with the sketch afterwards. DID YOU LEAVE A SKETCH OF A HALF NAKED SNOW WHITE AT YOUR GRANDMA'S?! 
Thank you for your servi- uh, you servicing yourself. 
For a second i thought you said you were gonna hook uo with her BECAUSE she passed out. The story went in a better direction. 
My bf and I like to summit big mountains. He usually gets a bj at the top. He really likes to go hiking with me. 
You know what they say, don't eat the white snow. 
I've got those sudden likes from guys I've not spoken to in ages on Facebook many times...... 
Ah, newgrounds. What I wouldn't give for it to be relevant again. 
Honestly this is the most impressive thing ive seen on this thread. You *should* be proud 
I'm really hoping you weren't on my carrier. Cause that's gross. I bet your name is either Seaman Sample or Seaman Stain. 
Ha! I had basically the same conversation with my girlfriend a couple weeks ago. She was less than amused. 
Lmafoooooooooooo you fucked a pool noodle? ..how was it? 
That sounds like the most magical fap ever. Where there birds singing at the window? 
Is this like on racing games where you try to beat the ghost racer of races past? 
Professional. We all stand in your shadow Sensei. 
This sounds like it could be a lyric in a Bloodhound Gang song. 
The fact that you might have came onto someone from the top of the Eiffel tower is very unlikely, but Goddamn impressive 
Marking your territory, and doing it fucking *right*. 
I was really hoping you were going to jizz into an active volcano 
That's nasty. And that's saying something, especially because we're in this thread. 
When you banged the doll was it as good as when you jerked off with it years earlier? 
As a republican I once fapped to that chick from the Young Turks telling me how wrong I am. 10/10 
I'm ashamed to be sitting here sounding out sfaptacular with different emphases. 
Not a fap but, when I was 16 my girlfriend at the time gave me my first hand job. God awful, sounds just like yours. I didn't finish and had to leave. I knew she was going away for a couple of weeks....so I hatched a plan. I didn't fap for 14 (_FOURTEEN_) days. As a 16 year old virgin. Next time she tried it was like 20 seconds then Krakatoa erupted like that scene from Scary Movie. Still proud. 
"Okay, that was nice. Can we maybe have sex next time?" 
Don't want to make you freak out, but when the kids are in the backseat I notice *everything* while driving. 
I can twitch my wrist at the very edge and hold it minutes at a time. Its fucking intoxicating. 
Obviously he thought "you know who loves a guilty ejaculation? Mom!" 
Bottle wasn't empty when I started, and it wasn't a costco size bottle. But it was a busy weekend. 
This is version I heard when I was but a lil lad... 
Yeah, it was Spice. On our cable, it was channel 69. 68 was Playboy. 
Dated a therapist. Was not fun. They know all your problems and none of their own. 
Back in my days you could spend a night waiting for 150x150 pixels jpgs to download on your browser 
mate why the fuck am i imagining elmo singing this shit ._. 
Yeah, it's a really motivational story about moving on and stuff... and having a wank 
She wanted to move on, but didn't want him to be able to also. 
You know the ones where you whack it then you do it again like 20 minutes later and it's just the worst but it has to be done? Like that but 24 times. 
You know what? I think people forget how much fun being single can be. I'm getting married in the summer, but I look back fondly on many a wasted hour trying to get hard to Emma Thompson crying over her CD Christmas present. It was a blast. People always used to tell me I should get a girlfriend, or feel sorry for me and my mashed junk, but I was having a whale of a time. Stay proud of your weird faps! 
I always feel like such a creeper when I accidentally like an old picture. I wasn't fapping I just like to see how my old friends are doing now that we're all moved away and shit :/ 
I too am able...it usually takes some edging first, but then I can concentrate and finish jedi like. A few times I've gone start to finish hands free...its hard to do, but man - the most amazing orgasms I've ever had. Here is what I believe is actually going on. I tense my muscles inside. Idunno how, but I'd imagine it is equal to a woman doing keigles (sp?). Start practicing by stopping yourself mid-pee, and then starting back up. Make it do Morse code or even full stops. When you make that muscle strong enough you can actually massage the prostate (I'm guessing that is what I'm doing). Just keep flexing like your doing some sort of snow pee writing and you don't wanna carry the trail. This type of orgasm makes me shake like the women on chaterbate (well - Mayne not that much). But it's a damn good feeling. Pee Morse code my friend! Edit - I didn't want you to pee on my friend. 
It's kind of comforting to see that I wasn't the only one, seems that having a breakthrough wank is a rite of passage for many dealing with depression. 
Assume that every compartment on a carrier has been jizzed in. Even the Reactor Compartments. 
I did the bed routine. I thought I will get AIDS for some reason. I also thought I was a homosexual as the dictionary definition was "people who are attracted to the same sex". And as I was having sex with myself, I thought I was gay. I wasn't very bright. 
That sounds painful as hell. The friction, the chaffing....just why 
*Dick falls out of hand* - Dang it that's gonna set me back! 
Yeah my own naked body is just about the least arousing thing to me I can think of 
I wanted to see if I could fap to *this* comment. Still trying 
With a username like u/cumstar sounds about right 
Can we all just come together under the banner of fapping? 10/10 more united country. 
Fuck man, I can only imagine the willpower it took, to not jerk it for *2 FUCKING WEEKS.* 
Right? Especially because you just know yet another disgusting person did what she did and wiped that shit off on the seat....ugh 
"I'm saving my virginity for marriage so no sex. But you can fuck me up the ass instead!" 
I can tell you from experience that its pretty close to IV heroin. 
What happened, what were the reactions? Details man we need details! 
*rubs thing furiously all over vagina, whilst drinking copious amounts of water to keep fluids running* 
My mate just finished RAF training and he said that for the first couple weeks he avoided it, and then after that once the lights went out everybody in his dorm knew everybody was doing it. He said occasionally he'd go to the toilets and do it but most times he just couldn't be bothered. 
Too real man. Ex is a therapist. Had me all figured out but wouldn't give me a good reason as to why she wanted to break up. 
God, remember when thumbnails were first available? I was sore for weeks 
This is so good to know Now when I leave welts in my gf's face I can tell her that it won't be like this forever. Will update with reaction. Update, posted this lower. She came home tired from work today and took a shower and laid down in bed naked. I laid down next to her and she snuggled up with me, and I literally showed her this post in all it's glory. She giggled. I'm already looking at rings. 
A small crowd of Christmas carolers came upon the scene as well, and sang a merry tune to go along with the festivities. 
No, the only games I played there were the meet and fuck games. 
Well I know what I'm trying when I get off of work tonight 
Omg I also thought I could get AIDS just from masturbating. Back in the day before the internet I actually scoured my parent's encyclopedias for any shred of hope I would be ok and not die a young death at the hands of...well, myself. 
Wanted to see if I could fap to your comment. Can't get hard 
At 21 years old I gave up masturbation for Lent. I actually made it 44 days, then hit the ceiling. 
He was purposely driving into potholes to get a reaction 
hey its me, your boyfriend. please remind me of everything i taught you. 
If it's as good as you say, I'll look back at this one comment as the thing that introduced me to my new favourite thing in life. 
Definitely this. Way to exhausted. Then on the last couple weeks the unattractive females started to look better. I remember one of the last few weeks me and my bunk mate were doing fire guard (basically pulling watch in the middle of the night) he looked at me and frantically whispered, "I've got a fucking boner, I'm going to the bathroom" 
The last line is the bow on top. Top notch delivery. 
That's why your parents had the monitor facing the door... 
You could even practice at work in your chair. No one would notice unless actually orgasm. 
oh god. don't tell me that. i'm glad my friends didn't mention it. 
Ironic, he could bring himself to orgasm, but not others. 
I went to a catholic high school and every year when lent rolled around, a bunch of guys I knew would all give it up in a big spectacle we called "The 40 Day Challenge". Usually everyone made it the first week. Week 2 people started to fall off and usually almost everyone was gone by week three. One kid though made it all six weeks and I have never seen a more sexually frustrated person in my life. 
At an end your fap is, and not short enough it was. 
I'm ending this here before the authorities have to get involved 
But now she'll say she was so great at it he didn't even last a minute... Little column A little column B 
And she'll give shit to whoever she's currently going with because she could get that guy off in 20 secs with her killer technique. 
"Oh you're in for a treat tonight! My handies usually get guys off in 30 seconds" *proceeds to furiously rub it between her palms like she's starting a fire* He's just doomed the guy after him 
I say we put him in the scuppers with a hosepipe on him. Preferably shortly after dawn. 
They cut his tongue out so he trained the parrot to talk for him. Nobody's yet sure how 
I lost my right hand trying to rig a sail during a storm. I mean... in a stevedore accident. 
I used to work at a place that made robotic legs for amputees. One guy working there (he was an amputee) showed me the most incredible picture of him in a pirate costume I'd ever seen, complete with a homemade pegleg. He lost to a fucking Darth Vader in the costume contest. Edited to Add: Wow, my top rated post! I should use profanity more often. Seriously though, if anyone is reading this because they sorted my profile by "top?" Please check out my 2nd highest rated as I'd rather be known for that one. 
Ugh, 100% this. I took a girl to a carnival once a few years back, she said that the dog that the balloon artist made for her looked "smug", next thing I know she had slashed the poor guy across the solar plexus with a rusty cutlass- no idea where she pulled it from. She was still screaming about having his "guts for garters" when I fianlly managed to pull her off him to let the paramedics in to work. Needless to say, the relationship didn't last long after that. 
How many bottles of rum and salty wenches will this get me? 
Someone has played Sid Meier's Pirates as much as I have. Nice username BTW. 
god this happened to me last week, we had to dump the groceries and flee, fortunately they thought there was treasure in the Trader Joes bags. 
I love that reference. I use it in every day life as often as possible. 
In school I remember my teacher playing Knights of the South Bronx with Chinese subtitles. It was on a VHS tape though, and it was in the early 2010s. No idea how she even got that. 
Surprised the first One Piece reference is so far down. 
Serious question, do people really care if someone else pirates their movies? I mean fuck, only a few good movies are on netflix at a time. 
you might find it more stylish to shave your head than walk around looking like a 1980s gang member from a police academy movie 
We could make him clean the bilge with just his toothbrush. 
Nae, lad, ye can only do that earlie in the mornin'. 
Maybe the parrot cut the tongue out and is keeping him in a parasitic relationship? 
How'd you get the patch over yar eye? Pirate: First day with the hook! 
I too was a cub scout. They kicked me out for eating brownies. 
You're only left handed because your right hand is actually a hook and a hook can only do so much compared to an actual hand. TLDR: All left handed people are pirates 
What you didn't know is that the Darth Vader guy was a quadruple amputee with respiratory problems and was meant to be the chosen one. 
You know, now that I think of it, I've always wanted to be a baker. 
"What's a pirate's favorite branch of the military?" "The arrrmy?" "No, the navy. Dumbass" 
But my life, my love, and my laaaaaadyaaay - is the seeeeaaaaaaaa 
There's a lot of food in those beasts. And they can be trained to search for doubloons. Avast 
I think you meant mix the gin with the rum, matey. 
When you marooned me on that god forsaken spit of land, you forgot one very important thing, mate: I'm Captain Jack Sparrow. 
Anybody with their class in their username is worrisome. 
No pirate would pay for such things. We take what we can and give nothing back. 
Hey I read your story on the other thread! Gr8 stuff m8. 
That must hurt to get all those gold doubloons out of you. 
Was not expecting Alestorm lyrics today, was thoroughly pleased by the responses to that comment 
*I took his words as gold* *Set sail for quests untold* *With a bottle of rum in my hand* *I dreamed of wealth and foreign lands!* 
We are here to drink your beer and steal your rum at the point of a gun 
"Well I've never been to Greenland And I've never been to Denver And I've never buried treasure in St. Louie or St. Paul And I've never been to Moscow And I've never been to Tampa And I've never been to Boston in the fall" 
YO, HO. All together, Hoist the colors high!!!! Heave Ho, Thieves and beggars Never Shall We DIE 
Yes, yes it does. (Psst, what printer you using? Personal or work? How's the print quality?) 
Never stole a game. Except ROMs, but it's not MY fault all these hard-to-find RPGs for the SNES are so fucking expensive, and actually play better on computer, and can be translated sometimes...and is a really cool way to make your Wii useful for your old/other TV. 
Circa 2003-4 my dad came back from Turkey with 40 or 50 films bought off street vendors there. Mostly DVDs, some VHS tapes. Some were decent quality, others were shot from inside a theater and included the crowd, all had odd subtitles. 
Or shave your head and walk around like 24th century Federation Starship captain! 
We could put him in bed with the captain's daughter. 
Me: "How'd you get yar peg leg?" Pirate: "Bowling accident." Me: "Oh." 
Yea, innapropriate conduct with girl scouts is a big no-no 
I think *you're* the twisted fuck here. I just thought about some damned candy until you said that. 
Pirate didn't have the high ground, classic rookie mistake. 
I told him he should have gone up to the judges after and said he cut off his leg specifically for the contest. 
Wouldn't the navy be the pirate's *least* favorite branch of the army? 
It's pretty good. They didn't stick to the books verbatim, but it was certainly close enough and definitely captured the spirit of the series. I'm stoked for season 2. 
I don't have gin. Can I prevent scurvy by mixing rum with rum? 
It's not often my username is relevant, but when it is you're darn skippy I'm gonna take advantage of it. 
this always confused me. why exactly plunder this bounty of treasure? its not as though it will get 'spent' or 'pawned' or used to back a currency in a bank. its just going to sit there looking good? ok, passed down to children then? no just buried with you? wonder how well that's going to go over. just steal the actually useful things, like food, shelter, a nice boat, an live your life free of the laws of civilized folk. anyone who demands docking fees just gets stabbed. anyone demanding you pay taxes to live on land gets shot. seems like piracy would be far more believable. 
WE ARE HERE TO DRINK YOUR BEER TO STEAL YOUR RUM AT THE POINT OF A GUN 
*And first, let's tie him to a rope,* *And throw him overboard!* *Drag him underneath the ship.* *A terrifying, deadly trip!* 
You're banjaxed, you're screwed! And death is coming for you! 
Your alcohol To us will fall 'Cause we are here To drink your beer! 
If it can print a seaworthy vessel, I think it's a good print quality. 
Yeah, I am fine with downloading roms of GBA and back, especially if it isn't a game that was released in your country. 
Me: why do you have a ship's steering wheel for a belt buckle? Pirate: Arrr it be drivin' me nuts. 
Keep it up man! Getting your eagle is such an amazing opportunity in life, it's a fantastic way to talk to other folks that are interested in boy scouts. Nearly all of my troop got their Eagle so it wasn't a special thing until I got into the real world and talk about it occasionally. Also you can totally fuck off of boyscouts after your eagle, because after that point there really isn't a whole lot of benefit. 
That reminds me of that story on Reddit about the guy visiting his girlfriend after her first month in college. He purportedly pushed a jolly rancher into his girlfriend while performing cunnilingus, some attempt at eating her out, and when he sucked it back out, it was much squishier than before, so he bit down on it and sqwoosh, it was actually a big globule of gonnorhea she got from someone else. Yes, I'm whooshing on purpose. 
It was very common for veterans from the Navy to become pirates after they left, and some pirates WERE the navy if I recall Sir Francis Drake correctly. 
So is he a member of Motley Crue or a true pirate? 
Yeah it's been awhile since I read the books and I only read like 5 of them, but I definitely felt like the general tone of the stories we conveyed well in the show. Patrick Warburton as Lemony Snicket was a great choice. Is season 2 confirmed? 
So *you're* why the rum is gone. Jack, we've figured it out! 
They can trade stolen goods for other things they want. They don't just go around killing everybody. Killing people is a risk. You might die yourself. Some locations would trade with (some) pirates, others wouldn't. 
*Yo Ho ahoy and avast! Being a pirate is really badass!* 
*I will not say what he has done,* *His sins are far to grave to tell.* *It's not my place to judge a man,* *But boy he will burn in hell.* 
*Trapped on an island, lost at sea* *Shipwrecked you'll cease to be* 
If they are no longer in production, and as such you cannot give money to the original owners of the IP. 
Me: Is your favourite letter R? Pirate: Me only love be the C 
Thank you for this. Now I can finally satisfy my curiosity without enduring the full horror of that story. 
Also, because it is a vile drink that turns even the most respectable men into complete scoundrels 
Because it is a vile drink that turns even the most respectable men into complete scoundrels 
*Hange the black flag at the end of the mast You are a pirate Yar Har!* 
"Now im the model of a modern major general, the venerated virginian veteran...." 
On our sixteenth night at sea In the depths of toil and misery We struck a hidden reef And our ship began to sink beneath 
TIL pirates pioneered modern day remote control technology. 
You can't truly satisfy your curiosity until you try it 
Veterinarians should be called dogtors. Even though they take care of other types of animals. 
*We've got us a map, (a map!) to lead us to our hidden box* 
I don't know how to try it though. Every time I give my girlfriend gonorrhea, I need to find a new girlfriend. 
*That's all locked up with rocks, and buried deep away* 
*we'll dig up the box (the box), we know it's full of precious booty* 
BY GOD, TOBITO WITH THE GODLIKE COMBO triple barrel into one person 
*Bust open the locks, and then we'll say "hooray!"* 
Turn it off turn it off, it's sucking my will to live !!!! 
I'm neither Italian, nor American. One of my favorite movie. 
I think I've seen Shaun of the Dead about 20+ times and I still feel like I notice something I never did before every time I watch it. That movie will honestly forever hold a very special place in my heart. 
Same... Something about having a scifi movie with a good special effects and acting makes me watch it over and over. Also Oblivion, of course the soundtrack is what keeps making me rewatch it. 
One thing I love about Lion King is the movement. No, giant cats do not sing (spoiler) or plot Shakespearian revenge, but they absolutely do move exactly like Simba, Nala, and the others. Iirc, they flew some of the animators to Africa to study lions for this exact purpose. Disney's commitment to animation is top notch, especially considering Lion King was supposed to be the second tier movie coming out that year (Pochahantas was #1). 
It's *National Lampoon's Christmas Vacation* for me. 
YES! I knew I couldn't be the only one! That movie is as close to perfection as I've ever seen 
My nephew has autism and watches that movie at least once everyday and I get drawn into even I've seen it a hundred times haha. 
During the end of school year back in middle school, my friend brought the DVD since we essentially had free time, and in every class I had with her, the teacher would put it on but we would never finish it before the class ended. The first 45 mins are now engraved in my head. 
Wellllll my name's Michael Scarn and I'm here to say I'm about to do the Scarn in a major way *doo, doo doodeedoo di doo* You jump the the right and you shake a hand Then you jump to the left and you shake that hand You meet new friends, you tie some yarn And that's how you do the Scarn! 
Jimmy Two-Times: "I'm gonna go get the paper- get the paper. " 
You know Wayne, if you aren't good to me you might lose me... 
I read somewhere that that line was made up by Dana Carvey on the spot, so Mike Meyers' laughter there is real. 
In France, she would be called La Rinarde and would be hunted with only her cunning to protect her. 
the last thing I expected in a Disney movie was proper ATC lingu. IIRC the commentary explains that the writer dug really deep into the topic, submitted the dialog expecting it to be rewritten heavily into layman terms. Which didn't happen. 
This is my girlfriend's least favorite things about comedy movies. The feel good ending does ruin some comedies because they have to tie everything up in a nice bow since people had loose ends 
Please tell me each one is slightly different. VHS, DVD, anniversary DVD, blu-ray, steel book... 
Now that's a movie I've seen more than 10 times. Love Big Trouble in Little China! 
You want to do something fun? You want to go to Taco Bell? 
"SHE DOESN'T EVEN GO HERE" -hides face underneath hoodie- 
Oh HELL no! I did NOT leave south central for this!! 
Oh my god, Karen, you can't just ask someone why they're white. 
For me it's the perfect blend of action, drama, and suspense. Even though you know what's going to happen at the end, watching Murphy's Law unfold (the tree falling on and disconnecting the cable, the DeLorean stalling, etc.) ramps up the anxiety with each misstep. Everyone who saw this movie when they were young wanted a DeLorean. I'm in my 30s now and even though I know DeLoreans were garbage cars, I still squeal like a little kid when I see one on the road. 
Same here, but that kind of ruined it for me. I got burned out and haven't wanted to watch it for almost 10 years now. 
She turned me into a NEWT! ... well, I got better. 
M83 fucking nailed the sound for that movie. Kinda like Daft Punk did with Tron: Legacy. 
"The fact that you've got REPLICA written down the side of your guns, and I've got DESERT EAGLE .50 written down the side of mine...should precipitate your balls into shrinking along with your presence....now, FUCK OFF" 
I thought he was the getaway driver. What the fuck can he get away from 
Gotta wonder how "second tier" Lion King was supposed to be when they hired both Elton John and Hans Zimmer to do the score, plus the pedigree of the actors (James Earl Jones, Jeremy Irons, etc). 
Don't forget it's based on the book by Diana Wayne Jones. It is fabulously writen 
Hey, I need to thank you for donating the platelets. People like me owe our lives to people like you. 
I would suggest skipping Grave of the Fireflies and Where the Wind Rises for a day you have tubs of ice cream and tissues. A good head space is especially needed for the former before watching. 
God dammit, Gump! You're a God damned genius! This is the most outstanding answer I have ever heard. You must have a goddamn IQ of 160! 
That's my dads favorite and he's passed it on to me 
First few times I saw it it was psychological and philosophical. Last time I saw it I finally appreciated all the jokes. I was like "hahaha. Damn that's fucked up." That's when I realized that Palahniuk is a comedian. His comedy is just super dark. I love his books. They are shocking and outrageous. But the humor is always there. 
"I'll have to do him left-handed." "You *know* what a hurry we're in!" "It's the only way I can be satisfied. If I use my right... over too quickly." 
If you could go ahead and repost on sunday thatd be grrreat 
Can confirm. My cousin, a manly former military man, loves The Princess Bride. 
That's 'cause you fucking touched my drumset! 'Cause I know COPS doesn't start 'till 4:00! 
OMFG THANK YOU. I had no idea, and I would have been heartbroken if I missed this. Just bought tickets! You are the BEST!!!!! 
The three magic words being: Leeloo Dallas Multipass 
Why restart it every time? Did the teacher not know that DVDs can be sorted through by 'chapter'? 
I did lose you, six months ago! Are you mental? Get the net! 
Because the voice actress demanded that her pilot lines be realistic. 
- You asked me how to get there and I told you. Exit at Traction! - THAT'LL TAKE ME DOWNTOWN 
I can't go to taco bell, I'm on an all-carb diet. GOD Karen you're so stupid 
One time I saw Cady Heron wearing army pants and flip flops, so I bought army pants and flip flops 
If you've never seen Kiki's delivery service go watch that ASAP. Honestly can't go wrong with anything Miyozaki directs. 
Hah yeah the most unbelievable part of that movie was that anemic 130hp v6 getting a two and a half ton car to 88 in the space of a mall parking lot 
Ironic that they started filming it (for six weeks IIRC) with another lead actor and were just like, oops, this isn't working, let's start the whole thing over again, and it worked perfectly. Great example of someone avoiding the sunk cost fallacy. 
In the quiet words of the virgin Mary... "Come again?" 
Hes had a rally course, haven't you Tyrone? Course I have... 
I find it hard to believe Pocahontas was more of a priority than Lion King. It's kinda bad. They must have changed their minds at some point, because Pocahontas seems a little lazy, where as Lion King is so precise 
Thanks man! I'm building up karma so I can rob a bank one day. 
Yes, do not watch GotF, unless you need that last little push to commit suicide. 
As I get older I see it in different lights. It really ages well. 
This place is a geographical oddity, two weeks from everywhere 
I have a friend with a speech impediment who talks like that, she did that line for my wedding. 
I have never met anyone that didn't like the movie. I've met people who were indifferent to it, and I've met people who haven't seen it, but never anyone who didn't like it. 
Always the extended edition directors cut. Always. 
I love authenticity in media, specifically movies. Even if they are confusing, as long as they are not getting in the way of the plot (i.e overly complicated dialogue that's actually *important* or needlessly complex), it can make a movie interesting and worth re-watching. You might also end up looking up what something meant, and learning something new. Executive meddling tends to remove a lot of that sadly... not everyone wants to have to turn their brain onto full capacity when they pay 10 bucks to see a movie. 
After some digging, I found this: Helen Parr (Elastigirl) is exceptionally accurate with her use of radio protocol while flying. "VFR on top" indicates she is flying in the regime of Visual Flight Rules 'on top' of a cloud cover. She then requests vectors to the "initial", the initial landing approach. "Angels 10" is her altitude call - ten thousand feet. "Track east" is her current direction of travel from her current position. Her "buddy-spiked" mayday is US Air Force code, as a warning not to fire, given to an aircraft who has radar lock on a friendly - in this case, Helen was referring to the missiles she thought were fired by friendlies. "Transmitting in the Blind Guard" is a call on the emergency frequency where 2-way communication has not been established. 
Better yet, burn Spaceballs onto a DVD, and give that DVD the sticker to another movie, put it in the case of that movie, and shrink wrap it. 
One time she punched me in the face. It was awesome. 
Also the fact that (at least in the USA) the DeLorean's speedometer only went up to 85. 
Eric Stoltz. Apparently, it was a mutual agreement that he was miscast. 
For every action there is a reaction, and a pikey reaction is quite a fuckin' thing. 
A bit tight? You could land a jumbo fucking jet in there. 
So long as it's not a blood bank, you'll break even 
It's in one o f the behind-the-scenes extras in the dvd. The water would tense the skin and it caused to tremble the giant T-Rex head. It looks great because it was made with passion and with sufficient knowledge of the limitations of CGI and what it could do at the time. The T-Rex chase scene in the jeep is one of the most menacing dinosaurs I have ever seen. That movie is as close to perfection as it can be. 
The blu-ray extended editions are even more extended! 
The thing is, if you don't understand what's someone's saying and **still know what's happening despite that**, there is *zero* reason to dumb it down besides being an executive who thinks "roughing it" is staying at a hotel without Maine lobster from the room service. 
To take it further, give it the start of the other movie (maybe the selection page and the start credits) then Spaceballs in partway. 
And that it was presumably an automatic while testing it with Einstein but becomes a manual when Marty starts driving it. I mean I know Doc is a genius, but that detail always bothered me. 
I think I read that Stoltz was fired and was initially devastated. 
"I don't want that dog dribbling on my seats" "This is a stolen car Tyrone..." 
...son of a bitch, I never noticed this before. Not it's gonna drive me nuts. 
"It was a funny angle" "It was behind ya Tyrone, when you drive in reverse things come from behind ya" 
It's too tight. Too tight? You could land a jumbo fucking jet in there. 
For a while I lived in a caravan on my parents farm (I was 18 and after a fight which lead to a broken window- it was decided that my younger brothers should have their own rooms). The caravan had like 5 different windows and I was constantly making sure that there were no gaps in the curtain for exactly this reason. 
Did you ever tell your neighbors? Or could you not bring yourself to do it? 
That poor chinese food delivery ghost, doomed to spread the menu around but never get paid. 
That is wonderful! Had a similar experience as a teen. Taking an afternoon nap, no one home, and suddenly the computer starts booming out "10... 9... 8..." etc. I was half asleep still so my reaction was to freeze in place and await the annihilation of my house. And then screen saver popped up. 
That's terrifying, but I'm slightly more scared that you didn't notice a bag tied to your side mirror while driving 
They used the correct "you're" too?! I can't imagine how scary an intruder in the house trying to steal your shit would be.. 
Ah yes, country folk. We're good at this. Let me explain: My sister lives in a small town (let's call it point A) and must drive 2 hours through 2 mountain passes on a single lane highway to my town (point B). If she continues through my town on the same road, she must drive 45 minutes until the road dead ends to read my mother's house (point C). So it takes my sister 2 hours 45 minutes to get to moms house on the *only* available road. Except we don't take the road. We take unmarked backroads, abandoned logging roads, and can get from point A to point C in 45 minutes. 
Now there's a British solution to a paranormal problem if I've ever heard one. 
"Hello. Could you please open the elevator. This is Bob and I got off on the wrong floor and I'm scared af" 
I still wake up to my bed shaking every now and then. Never been able to pinpoint the cause, and while I always feel slightly creeped out when it happens, I'm too groggy to really care and I usually just end up falling back asleep. 
My uncle thought he'd be funny by saying something similar one night whilst hiding behind my bedroom door. I threw a ton of shit at the direction I heard the voice from and broke his nose. 
I've had a few rounds of sleep paralysis. Once I realized what it was, it's fascinating. I usually hear people whispering my name and banging noises. The only bad part is that I can't breathe sometimes and snap out of it gasping for air. 
I forget what it's called, but fwiw, it's actually very common to have auditory hallucinations as you're falling asleep. I often hear music. Which doesn't mean that wouldn't scare the crap out of me all the same. 
Your guilt is unnecessary. Don't be so harsh on yourself. 
Jesus. My girlfriend's ex-husband is doing similar. Even showed up at her dad's house because her Jeep was parked there, wanting to know where she was (he doesn't know where she moved to after the divorce). He also keeps emailing/texting her, wanting to ask her if she'd speak to him. Goddamn exes cannot take a hint. 
It's such a creepy theme. I'd have been running straight out of the apartment whilst screaming if that happened to me lol. 
"Lmao I ain't getting scrapped, your kid can be late for school idgaf" 
Dad: Where's the mac and cheese that was on the side? Mam: special_edition ate it. Dad: oh my god fuck! I thought that was for us! Mam: why does it matter? Dad: I fucking laced it with LSD. Shit. Keep calm. Mam: oh God he's screaming from the other room. 
I looked through your post history and not trying to be creepy but you should delete a lot of that. I found out a crap tone about you in the 3 minutes i did that. 
Same, all I could think was "horses don't eat bones...." 
Yea that's crossed my mind. I think it would be more likely that maybe an elderly lady neighbor or friend just found her and freaked out and didn't wanna get involved or look suspicious and called it in that way. Some people get weird when they get freaked out. But all that's above my pay grade. I never heard any more about it, but I assume if the scene or cause of death looked suspicious they would have investigated it. 
I was in a pretty serious accident a few years ago where I got rear ended by a logging truck. Afterwards my mind kept going backwards through the day, remembering all the little incidents that either caused a delay or saved time; I was hit with the realization that if anything had been different even by a few seconds, I wouldn't have been in that place at that exact time. It's a strange feeling. 
Thanks. I still think about it sometimes, even though it was so long ago. I also avoid ferries if at all possible. 
Thanks man, I normally would have too. But for some reason, something that night in the back of my head said "this isn't right". 
My cousin used to work at DQ back in high school, over a decade ago, and he was fired one day after walking up behind a customer who was sexually harassing the young girls working the counter and pouring a shake over his head. He said he just got so sick of the way that middle-aged and older men thought they could speak to young teenage girls. 
Can't say I've heard of this, that's really interesting 
I doubt that the noise is vladimir_pwnin's dad. You should probably go back to being scared. 
Sorry to hear about your gran. My dad was in an induced coma for a month and a half and wasn't really "with it" for the first 3 months, at least. Recovery takes time. Keep showing her some love and take it one day at a time. If I've learned anything from this experience, it's that the human body is capable of amazing things. Hoping for a full recovery over there! 
As soon as I heard bus I assumed it was the hash-slinging-slasher. 
Now that I think about it maybe it was 'your'... I can't exactly remember what the note said. 
Who the hell says that? lol "you're lucky I'm a pussy or else I could of beat your ass" 
Logical, but I live in earthquake country and even in medium sized ones that wake you out of a deep sleep, stuff doesn't really fall off the walls. So its super weird that EVERYTHING fell off. 
That seems like the worst possible way to handle that. It's pretty funny thinking of an intruder repeatedly whispering "mom" though. 
I mean he could have just said that they were playing a joke on him instead of making him think he was hallucinating stuff, but I guess that works too. 
School Administrator. Doesn't take shit for a living. 
Guy I worked with swears that his house is haunted, but takes a "he don't fuck with me, I don't fuck with him" attitude. The one story he tells is one night drifting off to sleep, the tv in his room cut on and the volume began to crank up. His response was to scream "mother fucker keep it down, I gotta get up early!" He says at this point the TV volume went down whisper quiet and he went to sleep satisfied. He says the TV was still on in the morning. 
I read this wondering why you don't share this secret with your sister. 
This one time in high school my pencil fell off my desk and disappeared, I shit you not. I am as sure as I can be that no one quickly grabbed it as a joke, I think I would have seen and the peeps around me weren't really like that anyway.. I checked in a 5 foot radius around my desk thinking it could have caught an odd bounce off the eraser, nope. I watched it roll lazily off the side of my desk and immediately leaned over to retrieve it, and... It was gone. I went from annoyed to perplexed to slightly troubled over the course of the next half hour, checking for it every few minutes but coming up empty. I have since come to he conclusion that the matrix gobbled it up. 
Searching trailers should be in my job description. Im a county deputy. There wasnt a human in that bitch. 
I've had something similar! I once woke up from a dream and saw a beach ball fly over my head and vanish through the window, clear as day. Another time I woke up, sat up in my bed, and all I could see was cartoon hills and a deep blue sky. I had to shake my head and repeatedly open and close my eyes before it went away. 
I get them when I'm falling asleep- always spiders! They're called hypnagogic when you're falling asleep; hypnopompic if you get them when you're waking up. 
See this kind of stuff really intrigues me more than ghosts or aliens or stuff like that. Because this is more deep, how is this possible? You could argue something to explain a ghost, like left over energy or something, aliens well that's easy it's basically imposible for us the be the absolute ONLY thing in the universe But this. I've heard stories of people dreaming of people and saying goodbye without realizing that the other person just died. I've always wanted to understand what is behind this. What kind of connection can our brain (or something else) produce with someone, so powerful, that we feel their death. I dunno. That's very interesting 
I'm very sorry for your loss but I'm kind of laughing imagining your grandma in the afterlife grumbling about how she had to die to get the get-together to happen, but at least she didn't have to cook for the whole family or something. Well played, g-ma. 
My father once called me to remind me to close all the locks and windows when I was home alone and 3 minutes after he starts banging the kitchen window because he forgot his wallet at home. Nearly gave me a heart attack, 
It's probably you convulsing. It's not like a typical seizure, but something to do with sleep paralysis out something... Idk exactly. Supposedly it's not uncommon. 
Sam and Dean Winchester followed him. He must not have been the pretty young girl that the ghost likes to target. 
My dad and my brother used to go 'monster hunting', they created this whole backstory for this monster, naming it, knowing where it's headquarters were etc. The worst part was that they told me that the monster put the initials of its next victim on the pavement. My initials are BT and in the U.K. BT stands for British telecom, it was frequently painted on pavements. I'm guessing in areas where they were planning on doing work. I'm four years younger than my brother and believed every single word. They made it seem so real. 
Everything reboots down here, Beep Beep, Often, Beep Beep. 
"Boy, yer just lucky I'm incorporeal or I'd put you over my knee and teach you not to be such a retard with electricity." 
I had a similar thing happen to me. My grandpa lived with us for a little iver half my life before he died, but after he passed, I got his old army pocketwatch (WWII vet). I printed out a picture of him from when he was in the military, and put it inside the watch. While I was doing that, I was listening to music, and I remember thinking something about wishing I could see him again, when Hawk Nelson's song Made was playing. As I thought that, the lines, "And you'd believe if you could see, the smile on His face" played. And while the song is talking about God, I broke down knowing that it wasn't a coincidence. Still tearing up just typing this out. 
This took place three months ago and we did. They came to our house and interviewed us but they never got back to us about it. I don't think they ever found out who it was but I'll check up on it soon 
Wow. Your niceness and consideration for your roommate literally saved your life! It's so touching that even in what you thought were your very last moments you were concerned about her. 
Fun fact! The reason you feel like you can't breathe is because your awake breathing is faster than your sleep breathing. In sleep paralysis your body is still "sleeping" while your brain is awake, so your brain wants to breathe fast but your body is like nah you don't need that, so it feels to you like something is restricting your breathing. This coupled with a half-awake dream state is why folks often see something sitting on their chest. 
Quick question: is feeling like you're moving common when you're about to sleep? Right before I fall asleep I always feel like I'm swinging on a hammock or just on my back spinning around not so quick I get nauseous or anything though 
It's just like high school movies, if I keep trying long enough and incessantly, she'll fall in love with me over my nemesis! I'd like to see a movie end in a restraining order, just once. 
I mean with a guy like this it sounds like he followed her, not that she gave him information. 
My pet "theory" is that ghosts are where alternate dimensions in time and space are over lapping, touching. So like when you see your grandmother, you're seeing her from a completely different time. And she's seeing you the same way, from a different space and time. 
Summoning some demon spirits just to teach your kid a lesson about being prude? That is some asian parent shit right there 
If anything spooky is freaking me out I usually just say outloud something along the lines of, "this is my realm, I have way more atoms than you." Mostly just letting the spooky know whatsup. It's always chill after that. You can also sweep shit out by just fake sweeping with a broom from all the corners and leading it right out the door of the house but I think once you check them with the atoms talk you're good. 
His post history makes me inclined to believe he's a pathological liar or just made this story up for the thread. 
I kept reading "pay grade" as "gay parade" and couldn't for the life of me figure out what that meant. 
Seriously, what is it about people who do that to others!? Creeping them out like that... people aren't just objects you can demand for sexual favors. 
Haha, exactly. I actually stood there for a few seconds processing it, there are so many more realistic things they could have said instead of that. To be honest I would have been a hell of a lot more likely had it been a woman who said she was running from her husband (especially given that my mother and I had to run from my dad at one point in my life). 
"mom" "mom" "mom" "where do we keep our valuables?" 
Oh no I definitely think there should have been an explanation afterwards - I meant the calmly telling him to go to the bathroom! 
he knows whoever gets to moms house first gets first dibs on the cookies 
Similar story, one time in elementary school my buddy put a piece of cheese down another kids shirt. We never saw it again... We know it didn't fall on the floor. the kid took off his shirt, turned it inside out and it wasn't there either. 
Especially if you're in a county with lots of open rural area, that's your fuckin' life. PS I bet you scared the shit outta your dispatcher when you got back and told them what they sent you on. 
My aunt once had an ex-police German Shepherd called Jack. She would regularly walk him around the park without a lead because he was so amazingly well behaved in ALL situations. I loved that dog. One night she was walking him when it was fairly dark and he was off sniffing plants and doing other dog related things. She was meandering along a path when some guy pulled a knife on her and demanded her phone and money etc. Apparently she never even thought about Jack and was about to hand over everything she had when Jack came barrelling out of nowhere and wrestled the guy to the ground. He dropped his knife and ran while Jack sat in front of my Aunt barking after him. It's situations like that where you see how much a dog truly cares about you that they would throw themselves at danger to protect you. That said, maybe they don't think about it like we do...still amazing animals though 
If he called you to remind you to lock the doors why didn't he just call you to say hey let me in I forgot my wallet? Or at least knock on the door like a normal person. 
Yeah but what was the ghost thinking trying to rearrange the furniture in the middle of the night? That's just rude. 
When I was a kid, my dad, uncle, and a few other family members had this tradition around Halloween. One of them would go out to "run errands." Secretly, they would move their vehicle then go hide in the woods or in the backyard. Then, they'd put on a costume and the other people would start telling a story and the person in the costume would slowly start approaching the house. When the other adults saw them, they'd bring the figure to our attention. This was a somewhat regular tradition until me and my sister were plundering and found the mask. 
Set it up to look like a romcom, but with subtle moments of uneasiness. Halfway through, restraining order is delivered. Whacky hijinks end, kicks full gear into a horror movie 
Different, I like it! Reminds me of another thought experiment I heard a long time ago where every time you die your consciousness jumps ship to an alternate universe where you're still alive- like you narrowly avoided whatever killed you at the last second instead of dying. Not sure how this theory applies to old age or whatever but I feel like it's only a hop skip and a jump away from Jet Li's "The One" 
"Well maybe i'll ask OP to PM it to me.. oh wait, I could br a private detective... oh I can video record myself saying OP's username and say it's cool, i'm just a kid in college and stuff... no, wait, they coulda paid some kid to do that." Fuck, OP. i wanna know, but you need to stay safe, friend. I hope this was a throwaway :x 
Let's hope things turn out okay, whatever case we have here.. 
People like that often get off on making women feel super uncomfortable. It gives them some fucked up sense of superiority. 
It's sensitive and realistic. When my sister was first telling me the story, I expected her to tell me that she opened the door and helped the lady. I didn't expect the lady to try to break it, it never even came to mind. 
That or they just sleep on a blood-soaked mattress 
I was living in Haiti about 20 years ago when I was surrounded by a pack of dogs. I had my own dog with me, one that was twice the size of any of these other dogs. The bastard jumped on me and peed on my leg. Didn't do a damn thing to help. 
Probably wanted a reason to use the typical parent I-told-you-so. 
Also how every other country is viewing the election. 
Bed shaking, male voice next to him, probably a ghost. Definitely rearranging furniture, yep. 
When I was a kid, our whole extended family would gather at my uncle's farm on the weekends. After dark, with only the light from the moon and maybe a small yellow porch light that was always on out back, all 15 of us cousins and 2-3 rugged uncles would play "Lions and Tigers and Bears". Tl;dw: We would play a game in the pitch dark of a farm in the middle of nowhere, whereupon my uncles would hide from us in the orchard trees, and then leap out at us kids as we walked past, to reach "Home Base". It was like "Hide and Seek" meets "Tag" meets "Serial Killer In The Trees", and many a cousin pissed their pants. Good times. 
I think you should be grateful OP delivered. I mean, a paper towel is like, four napkins. You should feel like royalty. 
On that note, when do you guys normally reveal the real candidates? 
ben did you... fold my clothes?? *eerie music plays* 
"Hueh Hueh, sorry son I almost forgot. TIMMYTIMMYTIMMYTURNER!" 
Jeeves totally folded a towel I had tossed haphazardly onto the towel bar. *eerie music* 
What the hell, this is the second story here about losing toes. 
what has to happen to you to love abusing women with raw chicken 
My niece (very sheltered white girl) asked her camp boyfriend, "What kind of -nese are you? Chinese, Japanese?" He responded: "Korean" 
My friend had brain damage or something as a kid. Which now results in him struggling with short term memory. He would straight up ask tell me the same thing an hour or two later. I would laugh and be like "Haha dude you told me that." Then he explained the situation. Dude literally gave me permission to interrupt him and tell him he told me something before. Ive also had to tell him that I know some of his friends so he can just call them by their name. Hell be like "Oh yah my friend Jerry." And Ill be like dude I know him you can just say jerry. 
I unfortunately didn't say anything, I was stunned and we were in his car with him driving...not sure how that would have ended and no not a joke by his buddy. I could hear her on the other end asking about money being taken out of their shared bank account and asking where he was going. I pressed about it obviously and he told me he thought it would be cool with his wife(even though she had no idea) because they had been swinging before or something. I think about it sometimes out of the blue and feel terrible about it. -100/10 wouldn't ever do again. 
Damn if that's not a perfect country song though.You know, Real Country. 
My sister in law (who has a bachelors degree in nursing) one time said something about driving to Alaska "because it's not that far from Texas" while our family was having a holiday dinner together. We all laughed, she asked what was so funny. We just stared at each other. She thought Alaska was by Mexico, because of the map inset. Guess she had never seen it on a globe. 
If they are those.little mini goat that jump off of rocks and stuff, do it. They are cool as hell 
My mom was convinced I couldn't *really* tell the difference between 2% milk and skim. She refilled an empty 2% jug with skim in an attempt to trick me, or save money, or make me eat healthier, or something. After I tried a sip, I saw the expiration date and poured the rest down the sink because it was obviously bad. My mom was furious and blamed me, of course. 
This reminds me of a customer I had at the bank. We send out milk bones if we see a dog in the drive thru. He had a pup in back so I sent him a bone along with a dumdum for him. He ignores the sucker and takes a bite of the milk bone. He thought I sent him a cookie. 
It actually happened on 7/11 but they moved it because they thought nobody would take it seriously. 
Obvious lie. There's no demand for lettuce in Scotland. 
My friend bought a condo and let me move in. His girlfriend moved in after a year and he tried to charge me more because I had more space. We were splitting 50/50, but he told me that I now owed 2/3rds because he had to share his bedroom and I had one to myself. 
So why did they live across the street from one another? 
Deadpan this back: "Did you need a recommendation on where to go?" 
I went to uni with a girl called Arwen, but I think the name itself does exist outside of Tolkien. I was Facebook friends with a woman who was a hardcore LOTR fan. She named her daughter Eowyn, specifically after the shieldmaiden. 
"Oh, great! That's a sign of a good place to work." "No no, the opposite." 
Everyone knows you need *flea collars* for kids. Parents these days... 
I'm a gay man and this has happened to me more than once. The first time was when I was 22 in a bar in Mexico City and I had to walk the fine line of telling a larger, older and more threatening guy that yes, his wife was hot enough to bang, but no, I personally wasn't going to bang her due to other plans. I got crabs that very night from a guy who I picked up in the subway. It was nearly Christmas. 
I make this joke all the time and I'm worried that one time it's going to backfire on me when I'm being serious. 
I love how they can dish out the "How do you know, you've never been?!" But if you ask them "Well do you work for the government on the conspiracy to mislead people about the sky?" they get frustrated and stop talking. They're the ones with the fucking minority fringe belief, it's on them to prove their wacko shit, as there's volumes of proof that space is out there. 
My siblings are '79, '89, '93, and '01. Had to hit each decade lol. 
To be honest, she was probably sick of people bugging her and wanted to just fuck with you HARD. 
Does that mean if you double his hours you can half his salary? 
Just a slip of the tongue, or was the interviewer very androgynous and you genuinely couldn't discern her gender? 
That reminds me of a homeless cat my girlfriend and I took in who had some obvious health issues. Like I noted his shoulder seemed messed up. Most people can't specify a cats injury and just generalize arm/leg/whatever. So it seemed bad enough to me that I could specify his messed up shoulder. Took him to a vet "Oh, his shoulder is fine, maybe his hand is sore or something" Took him to a second vet who did an xray. "His shoulder is completely gone, disintegrated into dust" Human doctors aren't the only ones who need their work to be double checked. 
I had a goth phase as a teenager. That led to me getting into the occult. Went to a local pagans meet and some guy tried to convince me he'd used astral projection to plant the idea to go to the meeting into my subconscious so I would join his sex cult thing. I declined and I think he stalked me because every so often I'd run into him and he'd ask me if I was on my period because he wanted to use my period blood in his rituals. That was a huge hahaha what moment. 
I have a friend who just stared at a playboy for hours until he came. He had no idea he was supposed to touch himself. Frankly I'm just impressed he could get himself off by sheer willpower alone. 
My brother and family were here on the 4th of July. I showed my SIL the video from Jimmy Kimmel where they asked people on the street to explain why we celebrate that holiday. I was dying laughing at their answers. Then she says, "So why DO we celebrate it?" I was floored. I also felt like total shit. 
It's going to be even more awkward when he calls to tell you **YOU'RE** gay. Him: Hey, I have something to tell you You: Yeah, I'm gay, right. Hahaha. Him: Yeah, that's what I wanted to tell you. How did you know? You: Haha, funny, man. What is it your really wanted to tell me? Him: .... Dude, I hate to break it to you, but... 
It really is hard to tell if the woman already carries a lot of weight in her hips/mid section. 
THAT'S LUDACRIS!!!! that told him he needed hoes in different area codes... 
I still haven't been able to convince my fiancee's family that insects are a subcategory of animal. 
Oof, I feel bad for anyone with a handicap that severe but I don't blame you for laughing in that situation. Unless you're a special ed teacher or something I don't think anyone would expect that question to be serious. 
When I was in fourth grade I had a seizure just before class. Apparently several of my classmates thought it was funny and dropped on the floor convulsing as well. Everyone was laughing for a while before my teacher came in and helped me. I can't remember a thing but I wish I could, it sounded hilarious. 
20 years ago class clown friend I hadn't seen in a while calls to BS and then says "I'm supposed to take my pills but I can't find em. Can you help me find em?". Me "What? Cant get a hard on anymore already?" Him "haha. Nah dude. I got cancer...tryin to get rid of it." Me LMAO "If it's as bad as your acting it'll be terminal." He laughs like nothing was said and explains without telling me he knew it was terminal. I spend a couple weeks gaming and drinking beer with him at his house. It was fun. Died a month or so later. 
your dick is worth more than a diamond ring apparently. 
I was going to come out to a female friend who I was *so sure* was cool, this would have been the first time I came out to someone who weren't themselves LGB. 10 seconds before I was going to tell her, she indicates to me to look at the woman sitting near us, and tells me how she thought she looked like a lesbian and how she "didn't like those people". I was so ready to come out before that statement, but that put me back in the closet for another year and a half. 
I never understood why teachers don't apologize more often when they make mistakes like this. I'm trying to become a teacher at the moment and if 4 years of college education have taught me anything up to this point, it's that I am incredibly ignorant in many things and this can indeed cause me to run afoul at times. 
My ex spent literally a whole month telling me he had "the perfect birthday present" and hyping it up. My birthday comes around, he gives me: A pink novelty sash that said "the birthday bitch" in sequins. And that was it. He didn't even buy me dinner when we went out that night :( I don't think he was purposely being an asshole, he was just kind of clueless and self-centered... 
How did he study physics? Gravitation is solely based on spherical planets. 
Managers that don't actually see their employees are the fucking worst. I used to work third shift at a Waffle House (known for being the busiest in the district). Being that it was a Waffle House, and I don't really care for drugs or alcohol, I was the only sober person on shift almost every night, therefore the person keeping the shift from falling apart. I don't know if there's a number high enough to count the amount of times I had a conversation like yours. 
Cannibalism is clearly the only possible meaning here. 
I feel bad for her. It probably wasn't her own fault and more her upbringing :/. 
Why did you assume it was a joke? Did she have a morbid sense of humor? 
You laugh now, but just wait until it turns out he needs a farm hand at the blackberry fields 
For a brief while, I went to a small school--small enough that if you tried out for something, you got it because there weren't enough kids. And I *still* didn't make cheerleading. 
Don't feel bad man. Children that age have trouble comprehending emotions in the first place. My aunt died when I was 8, and I didn't do anything but smile. I was sad, very sad, but I didn't know how to comprehend that. 
Maybe she cooked it wrong and he freaked the fuck out because he's psychotic. 
I feel almost like you're describing me, except for me the damage occurred when I was 19. It's reassuring to know I'm not the only one who does these things because they can't remember. 
That took an unexpected turn, to be honest. The mold caused the memory trouble? 
My mama got pregnant by a man in a cowboy hat who ordered a Coke, her boots wet when her water broke. Too poor to live, too poor to love, she did what a mama does. What a mama does. Came to the field. Didn't know where to go.Squatted down and out I keeled. What a mama does, what a mama does. Her baby's cries rang out to the sky. Used her Waffle House apron to dry her eyes. Not even a pickup truck to stay the night. What a mama does, what a mama does. Now she's old, weathered by time, thinking about her baby wondering if he's doing just fine. Yes, mama I'm fine... What a mama does. What a mama does.... (Outro as a whisper: I love you mama). 
Did she just think Alaska just happened to form with that huge, perfectly straight eastern border? What about the fact that it's really cold there, and tropical in Hawaii, which is apparently right next to Alaska? I'm just curious what her thought processes were here. 
Did you try explaining that there's no use crying over spilled milk? 
My fiance does this and the first time I saw it I was like wtf is that? But he grew up in hot FL.. so they milk never stayed cold long, so they put ice in it. 
Man, I know those feels. I grew up in the area and left for college elsewhere - my boyfriend's roommates decided to debate the event one night along the lines of "did 9/11 actually happen?" I tried to have a reasonable conversation, I really did, but eventually I just had to leave I was so enraged. 
He didn't WANT any, just used to strolling the scenic garnish section. 
When my buddy was in Afghanistan he still paid rent at the house a few of us shared, I had moved out a few months before, but needed a place to crash for a few weeks, and he told me to use his room since he wasn't there. The guy who was staying there decided after a few weeks that I was going to start paying rent, this after we established I was filling in for the guy who was paying rent and not staying at the moment. He had just finished (poorly) installing a 5000$ patio on the back of the house and buying a new car, all on a teacher's salary and apparently needed some more cash. To add insult to injury he didn't have the cajones to tell me any of this in person, he just put an itemized bill on a 3x5 card, and put it on my desk while I was at work. We had a frank exchange of ideas when I got home and he was informed I wouldn't be doing any of that nonsense. He lost a lot of respect in our circle of friends after that. 
"I'm saving up to buy the moon so can you actually pay me to live here?" 
And then your renter can rent out half of their area and then that renter rents out half of their area and... 
My parents did this. They broke up due to lack of love. 20 years of the same partner grows old I guess. They didn't hate each other, in fact they were still friends and would go out to dinner and such. For them, It's basically "I don't truly love you anymore, but you are a part of my life, the mother/father of my children, and I will always be ready to support you". 
Please tell that to my family. My siblings and I are the weird ones because the oldest is late 20s and not married and my sister and I are mid-twenties and not married. I have a cousin who is 26 and already divorced. Every girl I've brought home my dad tried to have a legit conversation about if I think she's the one. He's on his 4th marriage... 
Then your uncle deadpans back "yes." Then fuck your uncle in the ass, deadpan 
I didn't, though it was about the same as the first time. I came in the next day to collect my X-rays so I could go to another doctor. The other doctor recommended surgery straight away to put in a plate, otherwise my arm would be bent for life. So two days after that I was in for surgery. 
That's kind of a nice name though. Legolas just sounds ridiculous in real life. 
We had a kid named Harry Potter in my school. There was a substitute teacher who simply refused to believe it wasn't a joke. When we all confirmed that was his real name, he thought we were in on it. Happened right around the time the first movie came out. The best part is he wasn't even named after the character, just happened to be his name. Poor guy. 
I really don't like that kind of attitude. I wish I could be judged on the work I do and not how much it looks like I'm working. It's alright tho I guess, because I can be lazy as fuck as long as it looks like I'm working, so it all works out for me. 
Me and my friends made this joke all the time until recently a close friend of mine actually died, I thought it was a joke at first aswell, until the other guys started messaging. It's honestly the worst feeling I have ever felt in my entire life. 
That's the way I explained my thoughts to her. I told her that I didn't think it was a bad name but asked if she felt like it would be something that would grow with her child. And of course I told her that my opinion is meaningless when it comes to that decision and I would never intentially hurt her or steal her joy. She laughs about it now, so it worked out well. 
Serious question : what does she think we live on? 
My Aunt has 7 kids. The oldest is 45 and the youngest is 14. 
I was fairly pregnant myself with my first, so it's not like I didn't 'get it', or was just being a smart ass. I THOUGHT I was making a "mommy connection", or something. We were in the clinic at the OB/GYN waiting room, so maybe she was being morbid about it, but I got the impression that she was genuine. I Googled it from my phone after she got called in, and it turns out that yeah, you have to labor and delivery and everything. Can you imagine going through the emotional and physical pain at the same time? 
I hope he tells all of his friends and they realize how ignorant/plain silly that is too 
It's a rare place of employment where complaining to your boss's boss is a good idea, especially if you're the new guy. 
Fuckkkkkk... That's just... Yeeeshhh. Wtffff. What an ice breaker 
Yeah I told him I wasn't interested at the end of the date. He told me he'd "see me tonight" (in my dreams, I'm assuming) but nothing ever came of it. 
I could get off like thatx no playboy just my thoughts till i was about 15 
My grandma is convinced that anything posted on Facebook is something shared with her specifically. Any time my mom posts any photos, my grandma thanks her for sending them to her. It's adorable. 
Him: Dude, you didn't say "no homo" during our *last three* brojobs. What else am I supposed to believe? 
My cousin was a rather large woman. I told her she was hardly showing, "What are you talking about? I'm huge!" Ummmmm.... 
I had an argument about this with my wife. I thought it was common knowledge that insects were animals, she informed me that most people didn't believe so. So there's me, at 10:00 in the evening as we walked down the street asking random strangers whether insects were animals. Not a single person I asked said yes. She won that argument. For clarity: She understood that insects were animals, the disagreement was about whether this was common knowledge. 
Pretty sure it was Marth, he usually played Marth anyways. 
I don't think so, but when his seizure happened became a source of debate. He claims he had a seizure midgame and that's why he lost. The rest of us think he's full of shit, he actually lost, and while throwing his pretend tantrum the seizure started. Not sure if one caused the other. 
She totally ignored the fact that you're Hitler though? 
..... Are you the female version of me? I was so close to coming out as bi to a good female friend of mine before she came across an article about gay marriage on her phone and she asked me if I ever wondered what went so wrong in the womb that people ended up liking others of the same sex. Totally out of the blue and never indicated she had a problem with it before. I went home and cried a bit after that. 
Shit, that's terrible. Is your friend doing better now? 
Flat Earth Society's answer to Gravity is that earth is being pulled upwards at 9.8m/s2 
It was kind of just an awkward panic laugh response to getting an unexpected answer. I fully admit there was no logical reason. 
Yeah, when my uncle died, my cousin was around 5 or 6 and somehow made his way onto the coffin and proceeded to tell my uncle to "wake up, you lazy sod." 
That's how he explained it. Was friends with him casually for a couple years after and was never an issue after he moved out of the moldy place. And I wasn't the only one who had experience this with him either. 
I am gonna go out on a limb here and say, there were no thought processes :P 
Yeah ice-cold milk is amazing. Even better with Milo in it. 
Bruh, what kind of best friend won't pull a foam dinosaur out of their bestie's ass? Although the blood has me a little concerned. 
Cajones = drawers (furniture) Cojones = balls (genitalia) 
What is wrong with people? You share a living space, but not each others lives (its not like youre dating, or are married). Why would he even think youre remotely responsible for his kid? 
Reminds me of when I got stung by a bumble bee. My dad didn't believe me, but when I had a red mark he said, "oh it must have just been a normal bee, haha cause bumble bees don't sting." Like 20 years later he gets stung by a bumble bee. Couldn't help but find it a little funny when he talked about how it hurt more than a normal sting. 
My parents are divorced and I'm pretty sure they speak more than most married couples do. They talk on the phone I'd say minimum twice a day, have dinner or coffee or whatever at least a few times a week, and are just generally involved in each other's (and my/my brother's) lives. I'm sure that from the outside it's an extremely bizarre dynamic (and from the inside too, sometimes) but it works for them and it beats the hell out of managing who can come to what event because they hate each other. They sucked as a couple but they clearly still love and respect each other as people. 
I'm so glad you found another doctor! I would definitely be asking for a second opinion 
Yeah, Eowyn's kind of semi-celtic ethnic-y. It'll be a bitch for substitute teachers though 
JK Rowling specifically chose that name as it was a common generic sounding name, so the fact there are kids with that name should not be a surprise to anyone. 
George Costanza method. Always look annoyed at work, people will think you're working extra hard. 
"Joe died last night" "Lol haha fuckin Joe he deserved it" "Dude" 
The trick is to have a strong last name, that can carry anything. 
Well really she should have considered a name close to Bunny like Bethany or Brittany and then used Bunny as a nick name. That way everyone calls her Bunny but when she needs to make a first impression or be professional she'll be able to make a choice on how to introduce herself. 
My college roommate's sister experienced this. She lost her baby the week of her due date, and she ended up delivering normally a day or so later. My roommate and the rest of the family were able to see and hold the baby. She even brought a picture back to show me. I wasn't even involved and it depressed me, so I can't even imagine what the mother experienced. God, that's awful. 
It's a pain when you're young, but I definitely appreciate looking younger now... I got carded last weekend and I'm 47. 
I just love the fact that youre friend had a seizure, yet youre still arguing about the game. 
Sometimes, when a thing isn't very important to a person, they never actually think about that thing and so never realize how wrong the assumptions they made are. 
TIL Would suck to get your cojones stuck in your cajones. 
I have a second cousin whose nickname is Bunny. Her family still calls her Bunny even though she's an adult. But most importantly, her name is not actually Bunny. 
Much better than the opposite. I had people mistaking me for 30 when I was 17. 
No he's green. That's not white ring power you're seeing... 
They actually filmed the moon landing in high quality colour, but that video couldn't be broadcast on TV because of incompatibility. Years later NASA admitted they lost the high quality video. 
Get that seizure shit out of here. No fucking Johns. 
Did your friend listen? What did the baby end up being named? 
I know just what you mean. My daughter didn't cry for her first eight minutes... Which felt like an eternity of me crying in horror while the nurses panicked because they couldn't stop my wife's bleeding. 
Had a kid in our neighborhood who was able to buy beer at 14. He grew a full fucking beard and had a deeper bass voice than anyone at our High School, shit was absurd. 
Idk if Tolkien specified the bloodline going back any further than this. Let's just say Oropher picked a stupid name and leave it at that. 
She ended up naming her Cora instead and she's really happy with that name. 
My eldest son didn't make a sound for two whole days, we thought he might be nonverbal but once he started he never stopped :) now he's 7 and never shuts the hell up 
I remember when I was in grade 9 there were 2 kids in my year who had man facial hair. One let the beard grown and the other had a 5 o'clock shadow at 10 am. One was an ass hole and the other was a goodie goodie though so had to get people's older siblings to buy for us still 
Thranduil is practically ancient so it's quite possible that Oropher *was* the start of his bloodline. He very well might have been among the first elves that just came into being way back in middle earth's history? 
Just like how notices of "personal injury" on Japanese train lines can include "someone jumped onto the tracks". 
As opposed to ALS, where you tell your body to chew, swallow or breathe and it just sits there. 
While she had cancer too. "I will not fuck her she is sick, I'll find a ho and wet my dick." 
Oh goddamnit, which one of you upside down half-limey cunts fucked the first Koala and created this mess. 
But call MS "Wobbly Human Syndrome" and you're some kind of monster! 
When I was a kid I thought all the poop from all the toilets was put onto a conveyor belt at the poop plant where people sifted through to find goodies. 
It is st.patricks day and im Irish so we will see... 
Interestingly the testicles share this immune privilege too, as does the placenta and the fetus. 
The Mongols got around spilling blood (of nobility) by wrapping offenders in carpets and kicking them to death. i feel like i should say something here 
Honestly this is good, It means people don't go around killing each other as much as we kill ourselves. 
That's actually adorable. I'm glad NASA is still doing stuff like that. 
My wife's cousin died of this. He was 22, in great shape, was up a ladder cleaning windows and had an aneurysm. He was braindead before he hit the ground. 
Does the dead wasp get absorbed/dissolved by the fig? Or does its body just kind of get lost in with all the seeds and everybody who eats figs unknowingly eats it? 
Not only that but the vas deferens can grow back together and make you fertile again unless you get T-blockers installed. Source - became fertile 5 years after my first vasectomy. 
Nobody wants to live with terrible diseases like senioritis. 
It is a clever defense mechanism. Herbivores eat the grass, and it releases a smell. Predators catch a whiff and eventually associate the smell with food. 
Awkward when my 11th grade bio teacher uses that clip as fact... 
Vehicle accidents surpass this every year. Source: Annual suicide prevention briefings. #2 source of soldier death is suicide. 
I tell people this all the time. The problem isn't that we don't have enough food. We make plenty of food to feed everyone in the world. The problem is getting it to people who need it. 
Creeped some of your posts...you seem like your a awesome well adjusted person who was dealt a shit hand. 
I actually looked this up before. Their diet is is mostly grass and seeds. When the food is compacted in their square shaped colon its fibrous nature makes the poops hard and dry so that they don't change shape when squeezed out of their little furry butts. They apparently evolved this way because they mark their territory with poops and the cube shape prevents them from rolling away. 
Tests for school children also would have questions about how much taking care of the mentally ill costs. It was a way to indoctrinate the youth. 
That's not half as scary as it will be in 2 years time... 
Britain's final World War One veteran, Harry Patch, died in July 2009 aged 111. He also outlived all three of his wives and his two sons. 
so long as they don't all show up on the same day of course. Isn't it true that they get overrun when there's a national emergency and loads gets wasted, and what they really need are people who'll pop in and give an armful regularly, like monthly? 
Yeah the life goes something like this: 1. Youth, time and energy, no money 2. Adulthood, money and energy, no time 3. Retired, money and time, no energy 
On the other hand nobody in this thread had sex with Carrot Top. 
So, basically, be evil like Hitler to live in memories longer? 
Eh, no worse then watching an old movie where most actors are also presumably dead. 
Based on two separate studies conducted in 1945, nuclear explosions cure cancer extremely quickly. 
Cheer up! Statistically, younger siblings die of disease or health issues before the first born, so your brothers would bury you! 
So that's what they meant when they said I was an outstanding student. 
As a mom, it breaks my heart knowing I won't be aware of the last time I pick up my children. 
There's a Frank Turner song where the narrator, at age four- receives the dying communique from the Challenger crew. It's called Silent Key 
In London they cheerfully announce delays caused by "a person under the train"... No beating around the bush there! 
This disease is so sad to watch. Dogs get it, or the much swifter myasthenia gravis. Whenever they get aspiration pneumonia (food/water going down the wrong pipe and infection occurs) it's one of the first things to look for. Watching things die of not being able to swallow their own spit is not why I signed up for this job, but I do it anyway cause maybe I hate myself. Oh, and for you people who own these animals. I do it for you too. 
I work with a guy from Australia. Tomorrow I'm going to call him an upside-down, half-limey, koala-fucking cunt, and see how he reacts. FOLLOW-UP: he laughed his upside-down, half-limey, koala fucking ass off. 
As a person with MS I laughed... and absolve you. WHS sounds better anyway. Like I'm one letter shy of a radio station. 
How did you find out the truth? Did you take it well? 
Being Irish you're fine. Good luck to white girls and native Americans 
This is the basis for another unfun-fact: Ebolavirus can be transmitted through semen up to six months after symptoms cease if you're lucky enough to survive initial infection. 
It's what the + and - mean in blood tests (AB+). They're testing for Rhesus factor which can cause Erythroblastosis Fetalis in a RH negative mother. 
Close, they didnt kick them themseves, they had their horses trample them. 
Sorta. But I thought we already passed the likely window for "WHAT IF EVERYONE HAS MAD COW AND WE'RE ALL JUST WALKING TIME BOMBS" Or is that clock still ticking? 
Also the diseased protein could just come from within you by some random rare mistake in its folding. 
Already been said, but it bears repeating: by the time you are symptomatic of rabies, it is too late. a few people have been kept alive by being put into a drug induced coma and their core temperature drastically reduced, but they didn't come away from the treatment scott free. if you suspect you've been exposed to rabies, run, do not walk, to your nearest emergency room and demand rabies prophylaxis. This will require some urging on your part, and several more trips over the next few weeks for supplemental immunoglobulin treatments to prevent the disease from taking hold, but it's better than a guaranteed death. 
What if there is one specific thought that causes deadly brain aneurysms, but since all the victims are dead we don't know what it is? 
I just got a headache 10 minutes ago. If you need me I'll be under the table, weeping and hugging my cat. 
Yes, I'd rather go suddenly and not think or worry about it. Got to be better than wasting away from some terminal illness, knowing you're deteriorating and your family having to sit and watch it unfold. 
I got it when I was like 17 but it only lasted about 9 months. Cleared up when I went to college. 
are you saying im more likely to be attacked by a bear while cutting my grass than when not cutting my grass? 
To alert predators that something is eating the grass. Predators swing by and nom on the damn cow chewin' dat grass. 
Learned it in 10th grade. It's one of the things that got me really interested in biology. I was devastated when I learned the truth but biologys still pretty cool 
Super Size Me has always been kind of strange to me anyway. I mean, if you eat the same thing straight for a month, of course youre gonna have health problems. 
Except the whole everyone you know probably dying that day thing. 
In the same vein, storing it. India for example has plenty of food but it sits rotting due to the lack of modern food storage. 
Thanks, ha. Lately I've been 'Debbie Downer,' though. Have a lot of chronic paralysis complications going on and had to give up a beloved job in 911 3yrs ago this summer. Directionless at the moment. 
I mean, technically, all types of slavery have been quite profitable. You can make a ton of money when you don't have to pay your work force. 
And the task is pictured in EVERY history school book in Germany. 
Well, who is pro-anything-that-is-against-their-views, anyway? 
An interesting example of misunderstood statistics: The "rising cancer rates" that many people freak out about lately are actually because of the lower mortality rates of other things. More people live long enough to die of cancer now because they stopped dying of smallpox. 
That means you and your other friends have better chances! 
Patrick Bronte's son, Branwell Bronte, died from the effects of sustained drug and alcohol addiction. His final act before he died was to stand up to show the power of human will even in it's final moments. 
Interesting. I didn't know it was possible for blue whales to cross breed with any other whales. 
Congratulations- you are now the second loneliest whale on the planet. 
They also said that there is a single source for the call and it is only ever at one location at a time. If this was an undiscovered whale species that communicated in this way, there would almost certainly be multiple sources. 
In a sense, she's more Natalie Portman than the actress. Natalie Portman is a stage name. Her actual name is Neta-lee Herschlag. So there's that. 
Well duh, how could they film the dogs in heaven if they weren't dead 
When it comes to being memorable, Hitler did nothing wrong. 
What a coincidence. Last night I was looking up how many people from the Wizard of Oz are still alive today because I thought it'd be pretty eerie to watch and realize everyone in it is dead. It's one. One is still alive. It's the munchkin that held the lollipop at the beginning. 
You see, this show and most others are shot in front of a live audience as evidenced by the many times the audience is actually shown on "Tool Time" 
If you lay a ~~great~~ white whale across a basket ball court, they'll have to cancel the game. 
The last one doesn't mean the best one. Pinnacle and end are different things. 
We should do bumper stickers. 2016 Outstanding Student debt 
I got to see my mom last Christmas and when she saw me again she picked me up and ran around a little. I'm 23 and she's a buff 50. So, it might me later that you think. 
Ah, the British are always so delightfully depressing. 
You're listening to WHSR, the show with the shakiest reception in the east-western suburbs! 
I'm actually not completely sure where my poop goes 
Can confirm. I'm an RH Negative mother. A- blood type. My first daughter was A +. Fortunately, she was born very healthy. I was given an injection of Rogam to help with future pregnancies. Had my second and last daughter a year 1/2 later. She was O+. Had to do the shot again. After that, I was done having babies so no big deal. However, I do still carry the RH Negative card in my wallet. Not sure how that comes into play if I ever needed a blood donation. 
They got around spilling royal blood a ton of different ways man. They shoved them in cages and drowned them. They crushed a prince along with his soldiers under a wooden platform they built and had lunch on. Dudes were always finding new ways. Marco Polo only came around to kublai. There were khans before kublai. 
In fact, 80-85% of cases of CJD are due to spontaneous misfolding, so you're actually more likely to randomly get it than acquire it via hospitals or tainted beef. 
One of my colleagues was biking down the B&O trail at dusk when a bat clipped his helmet and bounced off of him. Though he had no perceivable wounds on his face, ear, or neck, he was immediately put into treatment and started on the course of vaccination shots. Medical professionals do *not* mess around with rabies. 
That thought: "boy I hope I don't have an aneurysm today." 
As someone who lived near two fig trees.... That's EXACTLY how they throw their branches...especially during storms and at unsuspecting people walking by. 
I'm an EMT and it breaks my heart when elderly patients don't listen to the advise of medical professionals. If a patient is seemingly out of it, I'll go through their prescriptions and count pills and check them against the full date and it becomes obvious that the woman with a history of strokes and heart attacks isn't taking her blood thinners/high blood pressure meds/ etc. It's not always that they forget, it's like you said, we can't force them and they don't want to. I've heard countless "I don't want to be alive anymore" and "all my friends are dead". Fuck getting old, fuck it right in its dumb face. 
Yes, that is why you should never mow your lawn when there is a bear on it. 
I think you have a point there, but I also think the emphasis on the atomic bomb is because of its importance in later history. The atomic bomb set off an arms race that was a threat to humanity's survival, even if no other bombs were ever used in warfare. It's not that firebombing Tokyo wasn't horrifying, it's that it didn't change the way we think about war between major powers. That said, my history education in high school included kind of a broad-strokes summary of the conflicts that shaped the modern world, and it wasn't until years later that I went and learned more about it. I'm not surprised that even major details were left out; they really didn't want to tell us much about it. 
My daughter has it and the doctors are all about proper medication, healthy lifestyle and observation. I can't believe how lucky we are now with all the new medicines in the last decade, comparatively. I'm not going to let it freak me out, as hard as it is. She'll just be our girl with some extra care needed. 
Plus if you get a male and female pair, you get new slaves every year around 6 years after the initial acquisition. 
Nope. An underpaid graduate student. Source: Was a graduate student. 
I guess there are quite a few wild hybrids from various animals running around out there, they're usually sterile so they aren't super common. 
If every person in China stood in a line stretching around the planet, many would get hit by cars and most would likely drown. 
It's called sympathetic ophthalmia...to give a name to the terrifying process. Fortunately it's very rare even in penetrating injuries. 
Another fun fact, James Harrison, an Australian man dubbed "the man with the Golden arm" was a plasma donor who's blood led to the discovery of antibodies against Rh. Rhogam and the like are the direct result of discoveries made with his blood. His blood donations are estimated to have saved the lives of over 2.4 million babies. 
Bats are by and large the most common transmission vector to humans. My wife nudged what she thought was a leaf out of her way with a bare foot, and it turned out to be a rabid bat. The head of the county health department urged her to get the vaccine. Fun fact: it wasn't covered under insurance (and I had the best plan my workplace offered), our out of pocket cost was almost 8k. 
I'm healthy, happy and in my late-twenties. When I am unable to function physically in a very major way and/or significantly losing my cognitive functions I have no desire to keep living. I hope I get to live a good life and hopefully give something back to society but I have no desire to burden family/society with an empty shell of a decrepit human. 
I just make sure to be faster at mowing my lawn than my neighbor, that way the bear will catch the easier prey. 
If I have 10 chocolate bars and you take 5 of them from me, I'll break all of your fingers. 
jesus fuck, at that rate your fuckin' chafed out. 
Perfectly symmetrical violence never solved anything. I hope I got that quote right. 
See I always supported euthanasia for humans, we do it for our pets when they aren't capable of living well anymore. If you can legal request a "Do Not Resucitste" order, you should be allowed to request an order for euthanasia to be carried out at such a time as you are no longer of sound mind/body 
Yup, they were used to control the masses as it were. Kapo was what they were called. They were often also the first to be killed if a camp became too crowded, so it wasn't really a cushy position. 
What if one of his goals is to keep overeating in order to make that impossible? 
He probably made liberal use of the 50 gal drum of astroglide from amazon. 
I can't stay mad at what is essentially me. I love me! 
Yes. The *HON HON* is slowly replacing your cells with... Baguettes. 
I think it's cruel to keep someone alive when they're in severe physical pain (especially if they're terminal) and have expressed a wish to die. Our pets have the right to die with dignity, but not our own elderly. 
There was a hierarchy in the camps everyone could become such a Kapo. Convicted criminals just suited the job best since they were known to be more brutal then the others. 
Not even a pirate would willingly store hard tack for consumption if there was anything else remotely edible available. 
In that case there is a good chance your date is called Edward. Because the others got shot or otherwise murdered. 
The cabin boy, the cabin boy The nasty little nipper He lined his ass with broken glass And circumcised his Skipper 
I'm thinking it would honestly be exactly the same. 
If I ever meet someone named "Fisticuffs" I'm buying them a beer. 
I don't because I pirate everything...oh.......... 
Bank robbery is definitely a team building exercise. 
OHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH H H H H H H . . . . . . WHO LIVES IN A PINEAPPLE UNDER THE SEA? 
They may be an innocent bunch of the ISIS navy though. Ask whether they go for beheadings or "walk the plank" 
Technically most of us have never observed maritime laws. 
That and having to do a large purchase across 3-4 gift cards. And always having a stack of gift cards. Which either means a lot of relatives are lazy gift givers, or you're laundering a shit ton of money. 
Unless the reason why they own a cop radio is because they're a cop themselves. Either way, you're dealing with a criminal or a narc. Tread carefully. 
What else could he be? A freelance master mariner? 
There are definite signs in a relationship. Did she get jealous again? That's an indication that she might be damaged. 
Why is it that the computer being plagued with viruses is the one that irritates me the most? 
Such a man! I'd follow him to hell and back I would! 
That sounds like more of a red flag, really. Perhaps with some yellow stars. 
It might just be filled with lots of pictures of cracked walls and tiles etc. 
It's like dwarf bread. You have it around not to eat, but to make sure you're motivated to find something - anything - else that isn't it to eat, and to feel better about eating those things because at least it's not dwarf bread/hard tack. 
Rookie mistake. Should have eaten some oranges or something too! 
As much as I love that game, Nassau really was a pirate settlement. And pirates stole more useful things, like medicine, sugar, tobacco, and other supplies they could use or sell. But seriously, Thatch and Mary almost made me cry. 
Aboard the good ship Venus My God, you should have seen us. The figurehead was a whore in bed Sucking a dead man's penis. 
I'm kind of curious what you were actually asking though. Did you mean you wanted to know signs if someone pirated media? Or was the headlne a joke to begin with? 
I have Netflix for my wife and I still pirate most of their original content for archival purposes or if the internet is down/slow. 
You know the advice that you take your date to something scary like a horror movie or an amusement park, so she gets scared and her hormones will go "omg I need a strong man who is not afraid" and you're right there in front of her eyes just chilling and her brain goes "oh yeah there's that" and imprints you as viable mate? That advice? Also works with high speed chases. 
I most certainly have. I've observed them. And broken them. And been chastised and/or rewarded in each case. 
It's true, she could be a legitamate seafaring merchant! 
It's a composite character and a selection of 'disturbing' things they did over a period of, say, 10 years. 
Wtf I owned a cop radio because I liked listening to all the crazy crimes being reported in Miami. This was waaaay before housecreep.com 
1. they might just be poor and disabled. 2. they might love birds. 3. it might be a rental. 
Not updating your piracy software would also seem to qualify you under this rule. 
The only thing wrong with this is that the perfectly normal mid sized car would actually be priced at what was the standard price for a similar model 5 years ago, but 5 years ago all the hp was included and no DLC was required. 
A Marine Biologist! He simply needs to force you off the boat so you can go do research for him! He's thankful for your assistance. Not many people can lay on their face in the water looking at fish for 6 hours without breathing :) 
That would be ridiculous. Trying to hold all the limes, that is. 
Dwarf bread has the added bonus that you can bludgeon someone to death with it at least. I'm often complimented on my combat crumpets. 
Considering my diet freshman year, the lime in my tequila was all that was saving me 
I'm 4 episodes deep and still feel like I know nothing about it. 
The captain's daughter Charlotte Was born and bred a harlot At night her thighs were lily-white By morning they were scarlet 
It's a reference to all the threads that ask about red flags in relationships (and I think there was a green flag one too, indicating a relationship will go well). 
I've tried the "I'm an internet historian, I'm just archiving for future generations and occasionally view the files to ensure they haven't become corrupted" line and nobody bought it 
YES! Bitches LOVE when guys drive as fast and recklessly as possible with them in the car. 
But don't they have hierarchies put in place by ownership rather than democracy? Not very anarchist 
"Acknowledging" the "Gold" fringe; has; "Created" a joinder between *you* and "this" Court. 
Damn as someone who regularly eats like crap..... give that man props for me. That takes some serious talent. 
She was only a roadmender's daughter, but she loved having her asphalt. 
You would assume that, but your logic would be hindered by the cutlass in your gut due to taking a risk you shouldnt have. 
whoa. it gets its own single letter?! that is nuts. 
You've got to be kidding me. I've held further even more decided to use even go need to hold more than anyone can. 
That and lemonade vodka was probably what saved me 
Ramen and beer is a legitimate college diet, and it contains no fruit juice 
I encountered something like this at US Customs in DC. The customs there is tiny-im talking goddamn miniscule. You must go down an escalator to get to the actual line. I was at the bottom-riiight at the bottom of the escalator. There was a huge line in front of me and i couldnt walk forward. Unfortunately for me, people were still POURING DOWN THE ESCALATOR, so all of my fellow fliers yelled up the escalator people to stop getting on the damn thing cause we were getting BURIED in people. Tl;dr, tried to come home from London, ended up in a DC moshpit 
yeah thats supposed to be part of the allure of the show 
Is this an actual song or did you all just make it up? 
The red flag questions are the normal threads. The currently popular green flag question is unusual, which prompted this black flag question. 
You'd just be the third wheel as you see your date get swept off her feet by the driver 
"I'm Captain Shepard, and this is my pawn ship. I work here with my old man and my son, Urdnot Wrex. Everything in here has a story and a price. One thing I've learned after 21 years - you never know what is gonna come through that door." 
Can confirm. My wife and my two kids live in my beard. 
I could have turned away but I was protecting my booty 
Some people might tell you that we were saved when the winged hussars arrived. 
Ecstacy got two of it's own letters in the states. 
The only logical conclusion once the limes are in a coconut is to drink it all up 
When a letter of Marque came from the king, to the scummiest vessel I ever seen! 
But beware ye of the fools gold, gotta really root around in there to check for legitimacy concerns 
That's good. My ~~pirated media~~ Blu-Ray backup archive just recently hit 9TB. Time for more hard drives. 
I'd love for some crazy billionare (not that one) to buy an old battleship or something and then ask Congress for a Letter of Marque so he can go dispatch maritime justice. Not that I think Congress would do it, but it'd make for a funny story. 
I only trust my special probe with the booty check. I hope you all use yours too! 
Can I interest you in these fine leather jackets? 
Ubuntu is awesome these days. I don't know how long you've been out of the loop, but it's worth looking into again. 
It's real, it's called "the good ship venus". on mobile, can't link, but theres several versions. 
I've moved on from Ubuntu. On Arch Linux these days. Ubuntu isn't up to date enough for me. 
That's cuz you keep clicking no on the update! Bloody pirate! 
Concerns me more that some fuckknuckle thought it would be a good idea to train small children to shout "wake up!" at anyone who looked remotely asleep. 
There is a similar sketch with Conan o Brian when he hosted snl. Moleculos, the molecular man. 
I'm 26 and about 2 years ago, my gf started playing again for a bit with a friend, and mentioned a new treasure map. For nostalgia, I logged back in, spent every penny I had on the map pieces, and pressed the daily button. I immediately won a Negg and sold it for 15 million! My gf was *pissed* as she'd been grinding for weeks and had nothing. She wanted me to give her all my neopoints. I tried trading neopoints for blowjobs. I still have my 15 million neopoints... 
Is it the Looney Tunes where Daffy sells Porky the button operated house of tomorrow and it ends with Porky pressing the red button marked IN CASE OF TIDAL WAVE causing the house to rise into the air on a large telescoping metal beam, then Daffy flies by in a helicopter and offers to install a blue button that would lower the house? Gold? Wow, thank you so much! My first! :). I always liked that cartoon which is probably why I remember it so well. 
This is the movie "Recess: School's Out". It's jsut been added to Netflix in the UK 
Desktop Toys! It also had the guy who would kick monitors and stuff! 
I remember reading a "leaked" copy of one of the Harry Potter books, it had something to do with Hogwarts taking a field trip to the Pyramids of Giza and some sort of necklace (one of the horcrux?) and harry, ron, hermoine, et all get trapped inside the pyramid because it was voldemorts ambush, big battle ensues, cant remember the ending. A major character died, i think Dumbledore. It was pretty far off from the book, but it did have distinct similarities and was very well written. At close to 500 pages someone really put the effort into it. 
I also have a friend like this. Met him at summer camp, we were best friends and promised to "keep in touch" but never gave each other our email addresses (ah, being 8 years old). The problem is, his name is so incredibly common that it's almost impossible to wade through all the people. 
Is it The Piercing by John Coyne, by any chance? Crazy book... 
You're going to have to record you humming/doing the tune. It's the only way. 
Pretty sure you're thinking about Wunschpunsch. It's based off of a book called the night if wishes. The only reason I knew about this is because I had the German version of the book read to me as a child, which is where the name of the cartoon comes from. Small world. 
This whole thread reminds me of the time my dad came home from work late one night and saw the "The Wrong Trousers" on TV at like 3am before they were that popular. He tried to explain the plot to my mom about a penguine who everyone thinks is a chicken and robot pants....she got mad at him for a week for coming home drunk and it was years before he found it and was able to prove he didn't make it up. 
Okay, a quick aside, but I was trying to sing a really sad, slow song on JoySound. The background ended up being a house that transforms into a robot and proceeds to blow up the moon. Now, I was crying at the end, but it wasn't because of the song. I'll never beat that experience! 
Also maybe you could help me with his correct spelling of his name? I just remember how he pronounced it and worry that it's why I can't find him. Tom-Mas-ku Cedic (tom)(mus)(coo) (CHedic) if that helps at all. 
Me and my housemate rediscovered it at uni and started competing to make a million. She beat me but I passed my degree so not sure who won there. 
...wait. maybe you're right. going to go look now. Dude, if this is it, I'm buying you a years worth of gold. 
"So... Now that I'm legal... Wanna fuck?" "Ew, no." 
I lost all of these friends when MSN Messenger disappeared 
I never really thought about having one custom made. Thanks for the idea! 
I remember this one too. There was a lot of Egyptian speak in the "leaked copy" I later realized to be well written candlepin. Always wanted to find it again. 
Just don't accidentally set your tequila bottle on the "delete" button and erase it all.I'mnotbitter 
Yep. Equally possible. At the end of the day, that person was a great friend. I just hope he or she are doing very well. 
Well, at least you owned up to your creepiness, so that's good. Something about YGO that turns teens into crazy people, I swear to God. 
Because when someone is truly passionate and in love with what they're sharing, it's really easy to listen. 
There's just no way that we can win. That was a masterpiece. 
Yeah. I remember McDs creating a song specific for a BigMac commercial. I searched Youtube from the great ocean it is now back to the spring in the mountain it was 10 years ago. Only to find out that it is just a song for that commercial. 
I'm saddened that I know this but, only the porn to be kept inside Japan is censored. They can leave the exported stuff uncensored. But, obviously it's easier to get japanese porn in japan so most of the stuff you find online is censored. 
I legit have no idea what G.O.R.P. means. All the guesses are funny though. 
My pleasure. The way I found it was by looking at the Academy award nominations for animated shorts for 2006 (you nailed the year, BTW). Ctrl-F "store". Last entry looked like what you were talking about, googled the title. 
"I'm an American citizen, and I don't have to kneel down to anybody! It's written in our Constitution!" It's got some gems like these. 
I hope your Sailor Moon fan page is the primary topic of discussion at your next job interview. In a good way. 
The illustrations are dark because it is night, but he lived in the mall until a little girl brought him home. Nothing terribly sinister. The main book "Courderoy" is about the mall when he tries to find a new button. 
You convinced her that you were a virgin because you only got fucked in the ass? 
I love Silicon Valley but I hate seeing every episode ending with those guys getting fucked in one way or another. I just want them to have one good solid win. 
"I actually just wanted to know the best way to route 80 from here." 
First time I had sex I had a similar experience, ejaculating, but continuing to have sex for over an hour and reaching a second orgasm without stopping. Want to know my secret? Being a super horny 17 year old virgin who knows he won't get laid again for a long, long time 
It wasn't even that relevant to the topic, but it is more than welcome 
Two weeks? Psh, try searching for the Huggabunch Movie for *DECADES.* 
Yeah the studios have it uncensored, and if it gets licensed outside Japan then the uncensored versions can be released. (If it's not leaked) 
That scene scarred me when I saw it, and I was like 21 at the time... 
This is the best interaction Reddit has ever seen. 
"So...who, of all the characters in the *Sailor Moon* series, would you consider your favorite?" "Favorite?" "YOU'RE HIRED!" 
Last week was good, they got the bake off... but then they lost it. 
Hey there, I'm Polish and I offer Zdzislaw Beksinski pronunciation courses. Introduction to Zdzislaw Beksinski pronunciation is a 5 week long course, sign up today! 
His wife died early, and his son killed himself a year later on christmas. Eventually the painter was stabbed to death during a random home robbery. 
The scene that scarred me as a youngster was not the Hellfire song, it was public humiliation done to Quasimodo strapped to the spinning platform. It was physically painful to look at and emotionally scarring on a very deep level. 
`I'm sorry, Dave. This content is not available in your area.` 
I'd like to think then it'd just be A Song Of Ice And Fire 
The only correct answer to this is "Luna". Guaranteed job offer at reddit HQ. 
Except they didn't lose it, they were fine but then they had the "character is an idiot/asshole and ruins everything" trope. Like come on, I understand that the plot needs to continue, but is a constant state of failure really the only way to do it? I don't see why things just have to keep getting worse every single episode. First Peter dies, then Hooli sues them, then they lose all their funding and are forced to work with Russ, an egotistical asshole, that energy drink company tries to scam them, End Frame stole their algorithm, and when they eventually get a glimmer of hope Russ destroys it moments later. It's not as fun watching a show when one bad thing after another happens to the characters. 
Wasn't random. He refused to loan apprximately $100 to the son of his caretaker. 
Well the actor for Peter actually did die, that wasn't a writing thing. 
You bought yourself a gift....to prove..you're not an asshole? 
"I wouldn't mind a nibble on the ol' gooseberry tart if y'catch me meaning, marm, wot wot!" 
I wish they never killed him on the show. I know Chris Welch died, but I wish they kept doing that thing where they'd mention him traveling and doing ridiculous shit like being on safari with Kanye West and Lorne Michaels. It would be funny to hear some shit that only billionaires do mentioned every few episodes, like "Oh Peter emailed earlier but I haven't heard from him since he's in a hot air balloon with Lady Gaga and Kermit the Frog above some Mayan ruins" or something. 
Sad that kids today will never have to call a house phone and speak to the persons parents before you spoke to your crush. It was always so cringe. I would have loved answering the phone to my son's girlfriends and due to mobiles I'll never get that chance! I don't actually have a landline anymore but that's not the point! 
My sister never rewound tapes after watching them. I still get mad thinking about it. Or renting a video from a shop and the previous renter hadn't rewound it. 
Last I saw my nephews I tripped over a toy coming down the hallway and he fucking slow clapped and said "Good job". Kids are assholes. 
Being a rather anxious child, I remember this feeling all too well if my parents said they'd be home in 'a half hour' or 'twenty minutes'. Forty minutes later? They're dead. I went through the five stages of grief at least a dozen times before cell phones were cheap enough that me and my mother both had one. 
I actually kinda miss the T9 keyboard. I mean I love having a full keyboard, but something about clicking through the keys as fast as I could with no spelling mistakes was the best feeling. 
I still can't figure out how I was able to get a hold of my friends. I'm in my mid 40's 
Well, we had to look in one of the 26 encyclopedia books my family had to figure out where emus were from. 
Especially if you had something important or time sensitive. If it was close and I just wasnt familiar with that part of the city I would drive there the day before just to make sure I didnt mess up. 
GET OFF THE INTERNET I NEED TO MAKE A PHONE CALL!! 
Speaking of TV, I really, REALLY hope we get to be the generation that witnesses the slow, painful death of network TV. I have nothing against good TV shows, but the cable/satellite model is such a cancer. Fucking 40% ads, extortionate pricing, and filled with so much bullshit, and let's not even mention the 24 hour "news" stations that network TV gave birth to. The Boomers and many Gen Xers give Millennials so much shit for spending so much time on screens, when most of them dwarf that amount with how much they sit on their asses and watch TV. I believe that streaming options like Netflix are not only better from a QoL perspective, but also healthier. 
As inconvenient as it was, I have fond memories of going to the movie rental shop with my parents as a kid. It was always treat. 
But mum, I thought houses couldn't talk back to you back then. 
Google has changed how research is done forever. Even finding a book in the library takes me 30 minutes, I can't imagine actively looking for research papers to use for assignments or theses 
And don't forget what would happen if someone picked up the phone by accident while you were on the internet 
Whoa, get a load of moneybags here with his high speed internet. Took me 30-45 and it wouldn't even end up being the right song! 
I remember spending whole afternoons sitting in front of my stereo making mix tapes from songs of the radio by hitting record at the exact moment a new song would come on, and if I didn't like the song I'd stop recording and spend the rest of the time before the next song came on getting the tape rewound to the right spot before repeating the process lol 
"Yeah, you kids are so entitled nowadays. So obsessed with instant gratification. You know we didn't have the Amazon Helicarrier overhead dropping off packages by drone when I was growing up!" 
A couple weeks ago my five year old cousin asked me which Minecraft YouTube channels I watched when I was little. 
Holy hell I remember this. Oh shit that's why I kept changing the date on my calendar. It backfired when I returned the date to normal and had to wait a millennium to watch porn. 
Yesterday I saw a job on indeed for a position as a pet caretaker that reports to the pet feeding division of the company. Minimum qualifications include 1-3 years interacting with animals in a professional setting and at least a high school diploma or GED. Ok, no big. Buy then I got to the "preferred qualifications" and see: *BS or MS in a biological science* Yeah. Someone totally went to college for 6+ years and went thousands of dollars into debt so they could work as a professional dog sitter./s 
Is that really different from now, though? I just have to change it to "HDMI 2" instead. 
And if we got caught, we would be thrown in jail, fined thousands (that's millions in today's dollars!) and not be able to get a good job due to our criminal records. 
nah nah you had options, internet explorer was good but there was also navigator which I also would open and say in a robot voice, "You are the navigator!" 
Type in the address, go make a sandwich, click the link, go take a shower... 
I'm not sure that'll change any time soon. Wouldn't be surprised if future generations get shafted even harder. 
Shit, my son has to deal with rides to school in my loud ass shitbox. I'm surprised he doesn't complain or just tell me he'll walk to school instead. 
"You mean the mute button on their foreheads didn't exist back then?" 
"grandpa, what's a snowman? "it's a chubby man made out of snow, with stones for eyes and a carrot for a nose" "what would you do with a snowman?" "You sock it in the face till it collapses" "???" 
More like used all all the well funded government programs to their advantage, defunded them when they had to start paying taxes then complain about all the people how they don't have jobs and the like, and it's because the boomers defunded all of the programs themselves. 
My parents always told me they would get fined if I hadn't rewound the video before returning it. Not sure if they were just bullshitting me though. 
STOMP STOMP STOMP "next time learn to put your shit away" 
Of course everyone knows the moon is a hologram made by google 
By then you'd be taken away by the Google Gestapo for that heresy. The Great Google Empire will teach us that nothing existed before Google. Hail Google! 
Back in my day, when we ran a kid over, we made sure he was dead so we didn't get sued. 
You can actually change to a t9 keyboard, atleast on an android 
Nope, 4 presses, right direction key, 4 presses again. No waiting. 
We were poor but we had a really big encyclopedia set from the 80's lol. (this would be in the 90s mainly) 
I'm in my 30s and I can't remember how I ever got ahold of anyone 
wow check out Richie Rich over here with his family 
I would always reset my mileage counter after every turn so I knew when I was close to the next street. 
I grew up driving in Boston. We don't even label the street names around here. If you don't already know where you are, maps aren't gonna help you. 
I still know my ICQ number and my best friend's phone number from when we were 12. I haven't had to use either of those in years. I do think he still lives there, though. Or at the very least his parents do. 
GET OFF THE PHONE! I NEED TO SHITPOST ON THE INTERNET. 
It's not gonna get better. Pricing is good now because they're still fighting for market share. Once cable dies, expect the netflix hulu, etc. subscription prices to rise. They're already establishing exclusive offerings so that you *need* Amazon to watch the Grand Tour but Netflix for Bojack Horseman. I doubt they'll leave any money on the table. They'll just slowly raise prices so you don't really notice a huge increase. I'm pretty sure Netflix recently increased from 8.99 to 10.99. 
My great grandfather passed away when I was 7 and left me a huge pot of pennies. Just pennies. Every weekend I would count out 3.15 in pennies or however much it was and walk down to the movie rental shop a block away from my house and rent a movie using only pennies. The people that ran it were super nice, they were always happy to see me and never acted pissy about having to count out pennies. They were good people :) Thanks for whoever bought me gold! 
Oh god imagine if some asshole rented every copy of episode V just to fast forward them so when the next guy puts it in "... I am your father!" 
In Australia ours is free with the internet so no reason not to 
Don't forget you used to have to compose your essays and term papers on a typewriter! And I've seen graphs and charts in published reports up to the like 1980s done via pen and straight edge ruler. And photographs glued onto the pages in the back! 
Those last couple of lines in that Kathy Ireland swimsuit picture you've been trying to download for the last 5 minutes will never show up 
Are we really old-timers for remembering dial-up?? 
Just that stupid fucking sound clip of "I did not have sexual relations with that woman". (im only a little bitter) 
and then the asshole DJ would talk over the first part of the song, or cut it short. 
Back in my day you had to wait until nights and weekends to call each other. 
Yeah once I got into a rhythm I was like a stenographer 
Am I crazy or does that sound like a great idea? A giant amazon warehouse dirigible that hovers over the city and fires packages with parachutes at peoples houses. 
I remember back before beta. "Stares off into the distance" 
Thanks, I just figured out why my TV has fingerprints going across it in a swipe pattern. I have a three-year-old. 
Not to mention that jobs yearly salary is going to be about equal to or less than a cashier at a grocery store. I see them frequently for my university where the requirements is a masters degree plus years of experience and it is barely paying above 30k a year, cause that is the exact job someone with a masters degree is looking to get after going into debt not only for a BS but also a MS. Whats worse a trained chimp could do the job. 
Fair enough. But its just something about that number 3 that brings memories 
Look at this young whippersnapper. My "memory card" was a pen for writing down the save codes on the blank pages at the back of the game manual. 
"Me too thanks" *Another random redditor* -*Also in 2047* 
And god forbid somebody made a phone call while you were in there... 
6671EC77130B31740405E9313F That was a bitch to memorize 
Hey, don't call your 454 cubic inch, 4-barrel 1969 Chevelle a shit box 
I really should visit Cali so I can tell my grandkids about the lost city of Los Angeles. 
Fining for not rewinding was common practice. No BS. Same if you were late bringing the movie back. More fines. 
My local library just started a makerspace. It's still a bustling little community. They just have to keep up with the times. 
Wanna hear something sadder? Hundreds of people this semester got a library degree (a master's degree) but no one is hiring. 
Nah, nah. It was completely sarcastic. My nephew is a little shit. 
Back in my day, when we hit a kid, we'd just say it was polio 
Yeah but you font get the physical click. Using it on a touch svreen would just be dumb 
Try Fleksy, it does its autocorrect based on tap location and surrounding keys rather than what letters you hit specifically, I typed this without looking at the keyboard at all. 
This guy texts. When I discovered that I felt like a champ. I was more of a down directional though 
My dad was the first person I knew to have a digital camera. I didn't even know something like that existed when he bought it. When I graduated from high school he took a bunch of pictures with it and at the afterparty he already had them on a slide show and nobody could figure out how he did it 
When I moved out into the midwest, I was pleasantly surprised at how much sense most of the roads were. When I visited boston for work, I swear to god whoever made those roads was a five year old with a yellow crayon. 
That's what I'm thinking. It may also get to a point where channels all have their own service for their programs and you won't find their shows on Netflix. If you want those shows you'll have to sub to that network service, and of you watch several different ones you'll have to have several subscriptions. 
Your pennies meant they did not have to go stand in line at the bank to get rolls of pennies so they could make change for everyone else in town. You were literally helping them. 
I wish there was a "random" button on netflix. So you could play a random documentary or action movie. Or a random episode of one of your favorite series. And if you're feeling even more adventurous, play a random movie from all of Netflix. 
My kid is 4. She will only ever know high speed internet. 
hahahahaha holy shit. Fucking forgot about this shit until now 
if your dialup internet didn't cut out, which it almost certainly did. 
Other posters on Reddit have said the DJs were being handed worksheets with how many seconds into a song they had to talk before lyrics started. They were told to do it to discourage taping. At least according to Redditors. 
I still remember when Sprint made a huge deal about their nights and weekends starting earlier. For everyone else, nights started at 9. Sprint started at 7. 
Yeah you really could get into a rhythm. I would tap away for hours to my friends and my parents would look on astounded, proud and sometimes scared 
My first game in alpha I had no clue what I was doing. Night came. I realized I could build a wall with the dirt blocks I'd been punching. Then a fucking spider jockey spawned, the 1/10000 chance mob spawn, on my first fucking game, on my first fucking night, while I was building my wall at the top of this fucking mountain I found. 
Holy shit me too. My boy just turned 2 and he figured out YouTube and our phones about 6 months ago. He's been trying to change the movie. Mystery solved. I always just thought he was being difficult. "Don't touch the tv!" Poor guy. 
Well, that's probably what made touch screens so ubiquitous. They are so intuitive. 
"Also, call your mother, she needs to pick up more seashells for the bathroom." 
I can't believe that was only 2 years ago. Still have fond memories hiding in my room hoping I get a good enough video in 5 tries. Now I sit completely in the open with 10 tabs open and weigh up the pros and cons of each. 
Once extreme longevity is medically achieved you would hope that automation had taken over most jobs, and we wouldn't be working. 
On the bright side, it was a golden age for those in need of organ donations. 
Well you could change it to 4 too if you had too much interference. 
Shit dude, remember when game manuals were like mini strategy guides? ESPECIALLY for PC games. 
Call it The City of Angels to make it more mysterious and shit. 
Actually just saw a posting for a librarian at University of Illinois-Springfield. 
And you could type out a message without having to look at the phone at all, that was awesome. 
Damn, I cannot wait for that. Were I not living with four other people, I would install a bidet in every freaking bathroom. 
I was alive during this point in time but my goodness this sounds like you're describing something from a hundred years ago. 
Chicago is a beautiful, glorious grid and you always know which way is which because of that, and even if you don't there's a gigantic lake to let you know where you are. 
Uhg, I visited Boston once years ago, before smartphones, I was heading back a friend of a friend's place, where my friend was waiting for me. Grabbed a cab, gave them the address, got out, rang the doorbell, and nobody's home. Weird. I doublecheck the address and street, it's right, so I call, and they're like "no, we're home, ring again" so I ring, nobody.. call back "we're outside and nobody's here" uh well I am 100% outside the address you gave me. "Ohhhhh you there's two xxx streets" THE FUCK. WTF am I supposed to do? Call a cab and be like Hey I need to go from 123 xxx street to 123 xxx street? I remember it being a 2 or 3 mile walk and luckily I passed a liquor store so Evan Williams kept me company on the walk. 
I used to dread the customer's who liked to "get rid of their change" at my till. After moving to a place where everyone seems to take out their entire paycheck in twenties, they're my favourite customers. 
They use to have that on the PS3 with Max. It wasn't perfect and of you declined the six or so choices it would crash the program, but it was really nice to break the monotony. 
Move to a rural area. I don't know what this is, but it sure ain't high speed. 
Sprint: Making up for their shitty service by trying to outdo everyone and still sucking since the days of the first Cellular Phones. 
Oh my god this reminds me of the time I was texting on my Razor (the coolest phone to have at the time) at a family gathering and various family members commented on my texting speed with a look of fear but also awe on their face. T9 was great when you got used to it. Honestly i feel like if I got back in the rhythm I could probably text faster on an old flip phone with T9 than my iPhone with its full keyboard. 
My first day was on my laggy laptop where I get 2 seconds per frame where I just pillared up and waited for that creeper to go away 
Use "YouTube kids" and keep an eye out on what they watch. I found my niece watching "Spider-Man and Elsa pregnant..." Etc etc videos. It was weird af 
I'm 23 and teaching 11-12 year olds, so only a decade younger than me, but it is amazing how hooked in to technology they are. Kinda scary really! It means there is so much more trying to teach them critical thinking because info is so readily available 
I miss the days I could walk down the street and text without bumping into a lamp post! 
Every bathroom you own, or would you break into people's houses in the night and install bidets? 
Yup. And when I had to come home my mom would go outside and do that loud two finger in the mouth whistle that I can't replicate. For phone numbers my parents had a giant whiteboard on one wall with most of the family on it. 
To think that innovation came from Kodak and they tried to bury it because it would cannibalize their business. 
Well maybe I do. Or I just have a really poor perception of what a quarter mile is 
Minus the random diagonal streets that create 5 or 6 way intersections which are confusing as hell 
A lot of the really twisty streets followed the shoreline of the Shawmut Peninsula (downtown Boston) as it was progressively expanded. Also, Boston was originally settled on several main hills, so it would be pretty tough to lay out the city in a grid pattern. Beacon Hill and Bunker Hill are two still remaining, a lot were leveled and used in the land reclamation projects. Tremont St. itself is named for the three main Hills it used to pass through. Beacon Hill, Cotton Hill, and Mt. Vernon. (Tremont = 3 Mounts) of those three, Beacon is the only one remaining. There are still several hills remaining in Roxbury, Dorchester, and Brookline. (Chestnut, Savin, Popes, Mission, Fort, Blue, etc.) Source: from Boston, and I like history. 
My area kept the closings ticker on during commercials. 
i used to live rural, 1mb down, .5mb up. it could stream shows from hulu on low quality, but the comercials would only stream in hd. the 30 second comercials took like 5 min to play. 
Without a doubt! I'm still sloppy with the touch keyboard and you can't confidently send an entire text message in your pocket on your iPhone. 
i played that shit in the browser on the small ass map 
Well, if the masses won't come to the table willingly, the bidevolition must go on. 
I would be so proud if I could do that two fingers whistle. I would invent reasons to use it. (Just like the people who actually can do it do.) There was a popular thread a month or so back where they explained how you're supposed to do it and everyone started pitching in "OMG THANK YOU!" "I COULD NEVER DO IT BEFORE BUT NOW...!" I never figured out if I'm just troll bait or lousy at whistling with two fingers. 
We had a specific way of calling each other in our neighborhood, to distinguish it from other random kid noises, if we were looking for someone outside their house we would yell out "Hey Yo!!"... "Hey Yo Kevin!!!!!" Would result in either Kevin waddling out of his house, or his mom opening up the window to say he wasn't around. 
it was pretty efficient. Screaming your friend's name outside their house either summoned the friend, or the parent (usually mother, if they had one) would call out "he's not here!" and then you run the fuck away without actually speaking to a parent once. 
To be fair, they were entirely right. Mostly because they failed to even slightly capitalize on it, but still 
Haha I can just imagine you sitting there in your car when your phone says "In a quarter mile..." and a bead of sweat forms on your forehead. 
I remember driving down the road, not looking at my Razr, knowing from touch exactly what I was going to say. Easier to text and drive in those days. 
Yeah, pretty much. The worst is when they say, "In 1000 feet turn right." How am I supposed to have any concept of what that is? 
This reminds me of my semester in the US in 2004. I asked for some quarters for the laundry machine at the bank. Something must have been lost in translation because I returned home with a lifetime supply of quarters. I'm going back to the US this year for a few months and will be taking my bag of quarters back with me. 
Wonder if there is a study out there about an increase in texting and driving accidents relating to an increase of touchscreen phones. 
"THAT'S OKAY JIMMY JUST REMEMBER TO DO YOUR HOMEWORK!" 
I don't even pay attention to my GPS until it says feet. Then I know it's probably the next street I see. 
Back in my day, we'd have this payload delivered by now. 
I mean.. how much money did you give them in exchange for the quarters? Or do they just hand out quarters when you ask? I've been doing this wrong. 
yeah but then you need to pass through 3 lanes of traffic during rush hour and the guy infront of you is channeling his inner snail and no one is paying attention to your blinker oh god i can feel the stress 
I love the smell of pulse munitions in the morning! 
There was nothing in Al Capone's vault, but it wasn't Geraldo's fault. 
The JonTron roast was worth that 62 million though 
I bought that shit, so excited for its many uses. Then I applied it and realized that it just peeled off after a very short time. Such a letdown 
That just seems like a bad idea waiting to happen, with all the "what-if's". Not to mention, how the dog reacts to strangers. 
It was pretty much terrible. I bought one for $189 with a free year of prime, and it was fine for a previous gen phone, but I still ended up disappointed when they discontinued support 6 months later. If you are gonna force your users into an ecosystem, back it up for a while. 
There's a segway tour company near my house. If you think your campus security guard looks silly on it, wait until you see 7 people rolling together wearing helmets on them. 
One of my professors in college was good friends with Frank Herbert. He told us the saddest story about going to see Dune at a theater in downtown Seattle with Herbert and on the ferry ride back home, Herbert looked out at the dark waters of the Puget Sound and started to cry. 
I had no idea what weed was until DARE told me what it was, what it did, and the side effects. Very informative and helpful, 4/20 would recommend. 
The originals man, they were a blessing on *those* days at work. I'd get home from a ten to twelve hour shift from hell, throw on some Nightwish, crack open the vodka, and scarf a box of shapes until I felt human again. My housemate would come home to find me mellowed out on the couch, at peace with the world. I tried that with new shapes. My housemate came home that night to Dimmu Borgir and angry kitchen drinking. 
It's a pretty shit car. That was part of the joke (IMO), crazy old man, turned his junker into a time machine. 
HD-DVD has the WiiU problem. 1. It's weird to say and doesn't sound cool. 2. It's not 100% obvious that it's a different thing to DVD, and not just some kind of addon. e: Wow there sure are a lot of people saying the same three things in response to this instead of just reading the replies and upvoting the same one that's the same as what they said! 
The joker had basically 0 plot controbution besides being an edgelord and a selling point until the end when they double the confusion 
3D will remain a gimmick until it just works without the glasses. And the headaches. And without the shitty post production fakery. 
Much as I agree that Disney/Miramax all but butchered the final product, I actually think the Thief's constant inner monologue is hilarious. The animation was gorgeous at points in that movie. 
I bought one and had to return it for both recalls. AMA 
Destroyed both actors who played Anakin. Like the John Conner curse 
Yeah but the ACR was like the best gun in mw2 so you're wrong there buddy 
Haha. Not that I necessarily disagree, but that moment is commonly cited as a turning point for TV because then producers realized they could just hype the shit out of nonsense and people would still watch. 
Nostalgia Critic was pretty good too. And the weird subtitle version Cr1tikal got was kinda funny. 
It's usually easy to get celebrities to commit to voice work. They usually only take a week or two to record (even less if they aren't the lead). They end up making a lot of money for a lot less work. They also have no idea if the product they are producing is good or not until it's been finished. 
Oh really? Awww. Did it only peel off non-rigid things like cloth and whatnot? Or just everything? 
Yes. This is the LoN I was referring to specifically. 
Didn't get downvoted much when I argued against it over on Imgur, but I *was* repeatedly accused of denying science and innovation, being stuck in the past and (by one especially annoying fellow) of being paid/tricked by the oil industry to lobby against it. Like... what. 
I had a tiff with someone here on reddit about how solar roadways were a shitty idea who legit who refused to acknowledge that the stuff they tested on a fucking bike path delaminated in like 6 months. A BIKE PATH. 
I believe Theranos padded their board with people of influence who were able to kind of ward off people looking too closely. I love that they tried to sell the military who did a feasibility study and just sort came back with 'what the fuck is this shit? How does it work?' 
It's a shame. The concept really excited me but by all accounts it was a sub par device. 
Honestly, I wanted the Amazon Fire to burn in hell for those shitty fucking commercials they advertised. "Hey, here's our product. You're an idiot if you don't have them Because I'm a business kid." Fuck you kid. And your phone. **DAMN** 
One of the final contestants outed them and then snowballed from there AFAIK. I think they're still operating but obviously out of desperation. 
Hey now, I did a family Segway tour in San Francisco and it was actually pretty fun. Sure I had to absolutely swallow my pride to do it and look like a total moron, but it was worth it. Got to see a lot of the city and they're actually fun to drive. 9/10 would not do it again 
James Cameron's Titanic was pretty much the opposite of "No Man's Sky" as everyone (even James himself) was expecting it was going to be an utter disaster and the studio would lose at least 100 million dollars over the film. 
I don't even care if it's true or not. I'm going to repeat this until it's legend. Because it should be true. 
Yeah, I remember sitting and hearing about the side effects of weed and saying to the person next to me "that's not bad at all, I wanna try it" 
Wasn't a fan of random people who know my email address getting to know a lot of personal info and my yt channel until I (hopefully) disabled it all back when they forced it on everyone. 
Google knows more about you than Facebook. Pretty much every website you visit uses their tracking services, not to mention Google Search. 
Google Wave was the most awesome thing to come out of GLabs. I'm happy they kept the best features and put it into their other tech. 
Oh man, I remember pestering all my friends to get on google+ already. Now I don't even access my youtube notifications because for some reason I need to sign in to google+ even when I'm signed into youtube already. 
I mentioned I used ME in an IRC channel once and a guy felt so bad for me that he set up an FTP server, copied his Windows 2000 installation disc to it, and kept it up long enough for me to download over dial up. I wish I could remember his username because he was a damn hero. 
Coke created new coke because Pepsi was taking more and more of the market, they also ran an advertisement stating people preferred Pepsi over coke. Coke didn't believe that and conducted their own studies, these studies also concluded that people prefer Pepsi over coke. This was a problem. Coke made "new coke" which was sweeter and beat Pepsi in taste tests. People hated new coke for two reasons: their wasn't a demand to change coke, and so it alienated coke drinkers and, although it might have been popular in taste tests, there's a difference between a small cup and a 20oz bottle (sweet things taste good in small doses but can become unappealing in larger amounts) plus factoring in how well it goes with food etc. 
The characters? It didn't even understand the basic rules that the Harry Potter universe operated on. For example, Time Travel. The series makes it very clear that time travel works on stable time loop. You can't change anything with time travel except what you already changed (such as saving Harry saving himself from the dementors). The Cursed Child throws a Timey Whimey ball into the mix where time travel creates a Back to the Future evil alternate reality where Voldemort won. 
There are going to be five Fantastic Beasts movies, and I honestly can't see those staying on the rails. It's going to be like *The Hobbit* trilogy- it'll be stretched too thin over too many movies, and it's going to try to turn itself into a prequel of the original movies without needing to. I suspect they're going to try to introduce a younger Dumbledore and I bet it's going to be a mess. 
I have memories of visiting my grandmother when I was younger, who always had a box of Barbeque Shapes, however they were always old, stale and tasted sort of dusty. Those stale shapes I would have any day over the new recipe. 
And as someone else pointed out that, they wanted a weird or futuristic looking car for the scene where people in the 50s mistake it for a spaceship. Not much else that would've looked spaceshippy. 
He ruined his own chances as he admits himself. He didn't practice very hard and focused way too much on partying. 
Worked at Best Buy when WiiU came out. So many customers didn't know what it was, and many tried buying WiiU games for their Wii. It was marketed poorly, and Nintendo is in this weird position where their brand name is entangled with their consoles, while Microsoft and Sony's consoles are recognized as Xbox and PlayStation respectively. Having different iterations of them stands out more to customers, while the Nintendo WiiU was effectively like if Sony released a console called the PlayStation 4L. People would just think it's a re-release of essentially the same thing, not an entirely different console. Oversight on their part that I think cost them a lot of sales. Honestly probably won't buy their next console either, because the WiiU was such a barren wasteland. 
That helped a lot. I know that a lot of people, my cousin included, bought a PS3 because it was I think a little cheaper than a regular Blu-Ray player at the time. Fun fact: ever heard of the Panasonic Q? It never made it out of Japan, and for good reason. It was basically a Gamecube that could play DVD's. Why did it fail? Because it cost more than what it would have cost to just buy a Gamecube and a DVD player. 
The difference is, the Nvidia Shield is EXTREMELY powerful compared to the ouya and other android consoles. It's only slightly less powerful than the upcoming Nintendo Switch, and can emulate every system up to GameCube and Wii on the home console side, and up to the DS/PSP for handhelds. The OUYA can't even handle N64 all that well, and had a shitty controller, bad wifi chip and wayyy too much hype to boot. 
Honestly, the size of the testing team was small. They got super overwhelmed really fast. (I would know... I was one of them.) 
ah ah ah ah ah.....ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh cant stop laughing on how dumb that sounded ' also "the guy who can climb everything" 
It seemed like they were trying to copy Guardians of the Galaxy. 
I remember how much the TV show "Survivor" had a hard-on for them one year. 
And they failed to realize Nolan's Batman was "dark and edgy" because he wasn't trying to be "dark and edgy" but he was just trying to ground it into "reality" as much as he could with a character like Batman and thus it turned out "dark and edgy". That's why Dark Knight Rises (among other problems it had) felt a bit weird compared to the Dark Knight. Dark Knight felt like it could be a crime noir but Dark Knight Rises kind of spun it back into Batman Begins vibe of fantastical reality having sex with reality. 
Did you return it cause it combusted, or because the company issued the statement? 
The complete lack of recoil was amazing. It kicked ass in MW3 too. Now I'm sad about how much less fun CoD is, or did I just grow up? 
Man, what I'd give for more Future Weapons. I loved that show in highschool. Got some weird stares when I made the mistake of putting it down as my favorite show though.... 
Maybe joke..? There's legitimate footage of the movie before it was "lost", and it's completely different. Dare I say.. good? 
Exactly. All they saw was a script, a sound booth, and a paycheck. Maybe even some concept art of their character if they were lucky. Most lines are recorded completely separately non sequentially. I highly doubt the actors were ever even in the same room. 
Yeah. You can get boot waterproofing shit pretty easily. And stuff for various clothes. I reapply it before every big hike. 
Which 3M voluntarily took off the market when they found Scotch-Guard molecules in Antarctic penguins and in deep-sea creatures. It's in everything on earth now. They opened some veteran blood from the Korean war, and it wasn't in that, so they kinda quietly retired it. There may be a new formula now, but the old one was bad news. 
Every goddamn thing. Boots, even though it was advertised on them, peeled off with the first step, and it turned them blue! This product was the last product successfully marketed to me, never again! Edit - yeah, should have been advertised or falsely advertised, not marketed. Got it. 
This is just sad. From an engineering perspective, I have yet for anyone to tell me any advantage it gives over putting solar panels covering roads, or over parking lots, or literally anywhere but beneath cars. 
I haven't followed the Theranos disaster too closely. Is the military feasibility study write-up available anywhere? Or is there a decent summary of their investigation? 
I'm so glad I'm not the only person that didn't like those kids and had no interest in the product because of it. 
Pfff, how hard can it be to go to Mars? It's not exactly rocket sci... oh wait. 
As stupid as you look, those things are so fun, I'd totally do it again. 
Like, why the fuck was Angela some weird Druid in a swamp town which they were just passing through? 
I saw the movie as a kid and read the book like 10 years later then watched the movie again. It's bad, but it didn't hurt me. It reminded me of Jurassic Park, except at least that one both works are quite good. Still, the cogent point is that the story is wildly different. I don't know if it's possible to arc out Dune for a proper screening. It's dense and interrelated and too much of it is altered perceptions that don't translate to easy visuals (contrast: predator vision). 
The tragic part is that my grades were slipping because of my mother's drug problems. I had reached an age where I knew what was going on and had just witnessed my mom get arrested for the first time. 
Looking back, it really was. As a child I thought it was a way to get me to see a counselor but it ultimately was worthless and much of the time false information. Weed being a gateway drug was THE saying. I swear the majority of the time this is what we talked about, the drug 'chain' (not their words). Weed leads to cocaine, cocaine leads to crack, crack.. leads to the dark side. 
I still don't get what Wave was for. Its like dropbox, and messaging together? 
Same. I made so many "when Google+ gets going it'll blow Facebook out of the water" comments online and in real life and I was incredibly wrong. 
Who ever had the idea to use the google invite system they used with Gmail sound be hung by a street poll. That was the article stupidest thing to happen that year and it came from google. 
Screw it. Let's just put people's name on the cans. 
Let me guess, "based on a story by #J. K. ROWLING written by john bobberson" 
Probably doesn't help that the cover has J.K. ROWLING in giant print on the front with the name of the actual author in tiny print beneath it. 
To be fair, she was too busy throwing pumpkin pasty grenades for no fucking reason to actually pay attention. 
This was the issue that bugged me the most. Like. Time travel is an *already fixed thing in this universe*. You can't just come in and change that when it's literally a key plot point at multiple points in the series. 
What? You didn't enjoy them needing 6 Earthbenders to move one stone? Some people are just never content... 
Also they raised the suspension from the ride height it was originally designed (by Lotus) to work at. They weren't actually that heavy at 2700-2800lbs, about the same as my 97 accord. Very light by today's standards. My accord also came from the factory with similar power to the delorean, and had only slightly higher performance. So they didn't handle well because the suspension was too high, and they were much slower than their looks would suggest, about equal in speed to a late 90's 4 cylinder economy sedan (which had zero problems breaking 100mph, let alone 88). 
Even if the fight happened when it should have 4 yrs prior and both were still on top, mayweather is still going to be evasive and counter punch. That's what his fighting style developed into because it worked for him. Never a slug match. 
That's what sold many PS2s as well. You could get a good dvd player for the same price as a PS2, so why not go ahead and get a PS2 since it did more? Sony has had many faults, but those decisions for its consoles were pretty spot on, 
It is definitely because the PS3. And the PS3 was cheaper than every stand alone bluray player for quite a long time. I remember wondering why on earth anyone would ever buy something other than a ps3 (if they wanted a bluray player) it just seemed silly to get a bluray player that cost more than a bluray player/console. 
I could forgive almost all of this, but the shitty controller really was a game ender 
Wasn't that the guy who didn't get a full intro so you started counting how many seconds it took for him to be killed off? 
And failed so badly at it. The characters were the best part of gotg and I can't remember the names of half the squad in SS. Let alone anything about their personalities or backstory 
His mechanic even says something along those lines in a later episode. Like "People joke, but I tell ya, these Azteks are really solid." Then Walt sells it to him for $50. 
Congrats on winning today's reward challenge, Marie. I have a surprise for you though...for your efforts, you can choose between a microwaved cheeseburger, or - A BRAND NEW PONTIAC AZTEK *Marie's aunt hasn't been able to get to work in 2 years because her car needs a new transmission, but Marie dives into the cheeseburger like it's an 18 year old poolboy* 
I want more reality so so so fucking bad. I want to see spider man stop bank robbers. I want to see superman saving crashing planes Enough of the world ending with a beam of fucking blue green light shooting in the air. Enough alien invasions 
At first with Luthor I thought they were updating him for the modern age: he'd be a Zukerburg type guy whose power was information control and privacy invasion, such that he'd have a) the information needed to deduce superhero identities and b) the power to manipulate them into fighting each other. Instead... ...I... I really don't know. Having watched the damn movie I have no idea what they were going for. 
Because of the company statement and I was traveling around that time. 
Please tell me more. Do you know what molecule they were using for the scotch guard? 
I always wondered about that: if nothing sticks to it, how does itself stick to anything? 
If I remember right, she had a machine that could take a small sample of blood and basically output every diagnostic imaginable like the little scanner gizmo in Star Trek. Except that it didn't work because of what can most easily be summarized as physics doesn't work that way. The military looked at it and said, we don't know what your box is but, yeah, physics, soooo bye. 
He also founded FIRST robotics, for getting kids interested in math, science, and engineering. Also for being fun and awesome. 
He's also doing the bionic arm, bringing back the wheelchairs that climb stairs(which inspired the scooter) and the whole robotics organization which I always try to get more people to learn about. 
It's a great theory, except for the fact that the Titanic and the Olympic were physically different ships. 
In some ways it's to the book's credit that it's impossible to translate to a movie. 
The elevator pitch was: "What email and IRC would look like if we built them today, instead of decades ago." It was a pretty high-concept project that intersected with a lot of things people were already doing, like sending corresponding, messaging, and even collaborating on documents (a la Google Drive/Docs). What made it so hard for people to adopt is exactly what you described: they intuitively recognized all the individual parts of Wave, they just didn't have a good mental bucket for how all of those things fit together. Wave was specifically intended to reinvent how people think about communicating online; unfortunately, as Google discovered, people's habits and comfort-zones are not changed so easily. 
I could never be a good tech director for a company. I thought surely Silverlight was going to be the wave of the future for web development, and I thought Google+ was going to be the next big thing, and I'd devote all my contacts to Google to manage. I was dead wrong on both, and if I'd invested company money into using these things, I'd have cost them a lot of cash. 
My favorite comparison is Cursed Child vs My Immortal. "Hi my name is Delphie Dark'ness Dementia Augury Riddle and I have long silver hair with blue streaks and tips that reaches..." 
How is that even legal? I know in the film industry the producer's name isn't allowed to be bigger than the director's name (or at least that used to be the case). 
She should've hurled them at the Dementors in Prisoner of Azkaban 
Maybe, but her arms turned into metal scythes and she tried to *kill* them for leaving. 
Yeah I'll be using that for sure. Let's all make "Theme Park Fiction" a thing. The Transformers movies are all guilty as well as The Hobbit movies to some extent. 
That was okay. They did it in sync with a lot of stomping and shouting. But most of the firebenders needing a fire nearby to be firebenders. That's a travesty. 
I lost my entire bet in the online casino waiting for the fight to begin after initially increasing my bet tenfold. Still salty 
You can use other controllers, but that really shouldn't be the only way to do it 
The only part of SS that I remember is Diablo's story, because it was so much better written that it stood out like a sore thumb. 
What Superman needs is for someone to write Lex Luthor well to contrast with Clark's recklessly optimistic Kansan upbringing. Truth, justice and the American way are all relative, and to a cynic, Luthor stands for those ideals better than Superman. 
Asshole rich kid who blames his imagined misfortunes on a god he may or may not believe in and then places that blame on Superman? 
Same exact situation here. Loving my pixel XL though! 
Think of it like a really shitty paint. Goes on great, but as it dries it literally flakes off of the surface. 
The great part is he did it as a favour to Coke to convince them to help ship his water purification system to remote areas. 
Actually, it sounds like you would have fit in quite nicely with the other management folks who thought it'd take off too 
It has the author on it and clearly says that it's based off a story by J.K. Rowling. That's how it's legal. The size doesn't matter. 
I think Theme Park Fiction describes something a bit further along than fan service. I think of fan service as a brief cameo or a reference. But when an entire film is built around tons of these references and cameos, it becomes Theme Park Fiction - full of little fan service rides and attractions, and not much else 
Yea then she says she is including a touch pad and that no one else has that. The guy says the new ps3 has that. She then says yea they could use one too. Seemed as if she was implying that they did not have one. She seemed like she was on coke. 
If they had made a similar system with slightly better specs, solid controller, they could have charged 150-200 and still done alright for themselves. There are some good games on Android and there was a potential market to hit - but they failed every step of the way. Shame. 
Why couldn't they have just made Lex like he has been traditionally. A bald, imposing man. Why... is he Mark Zuckerberg. It baffles me that they did that. 
I really liked Smallville's Lex Luthor. I haven't finished watching it, but so far he's very believable and grounded. He's this lonely, maladjusted guy who was raised by an awful, manipulative father (Whose character is amazingly played by John Glover). This, combined with the fact that he's bald and super intelligent, makes him feel isolated but he's still trying to be a good person. Lex really wants to be friends with Clark, since he is one of the only people in his life that doesn't want something from him, but has problems due to the fact that a) His father will go to ridiculous lengths to manipulate the shit out of him, making him paranoid (rightfully so) that any one he comes in contact with or any good thing that happens to him is part of some elaborate scheme b) Clark is hiding something from him: he's op af. So far his change from friend to nemesis is very believable and I wish they'd taken that direction instead of... whatever direction they were aiming for. 
It took him nine months to make the video, but by my calculations he has brought ~337 years of joy to people around the world, that is a pretty good return on investment. 
It doesn't need any of that to be legal. Ghostwriting is a well-established practice. You don't need the real author on the cover at all. 
Well, to be fair, Rogue One is a bit like Titanic - we already knew the ending. They had a very solid frame that corseted how the story would be able to progress, plus I am glad they finally explained that loophole of "Why did they construct a weapon that can be destroyed by shooting something directly into the reactor?". I, for one, enjoyed Rogue One. Maybe because I knew it was just a "spin off" and expected nothing and they didn't butcher any previous character by letting him act completely out of line, compared to previous movies. 
She seems like she had an idea for something that seemed brilliant, in a market she knew nothing about. And instead of actually educating herself she just winged it. 
All of the movies failed to make an interesting Luthor and the comics aren't much better. Smallville got infuriatingly close to the best version of Luthor, but instead of telling the tragedy of Lex Luthor, they focused on Clark's love life. Lois and Clark, Luthor was okay for the first few seasons until he turned full comic book villain and The Animated Series version is pretty good. 
or that having ideals like Superman's is easy when you don't have to obey rules that Lex does like gravity. A well written Lex's methods would seem reasonable from a utilitarian standpoint. 
Mom spent 9 months to make me! and I've brought a whopping 17 years of disappointment! Joke aside, his japan video has helped me quite a few times on my U.S. History tests :] 
Brom's casting was the only good point of the movie. 
Yeah. But not multiple bugs. Like. Each Ra'zac wasn't a fuck ton of bugs. Just weird insect/bird bipedals. Not like the Hunter from Halo which is an amalgamation of worms in one body as one mind. The Ra'zac were supposed to be a single entity. 
But war looks bad on TV and America is really starting to care about their image. 
I thought Murtagh was hot, but then again, teenage me had questionable taste. 
He looked great but why the fuck would he willingly guide Eragon and Saphira to the rebels (the Varen? Can't remember right now) after Saphira just drops him in the middle of their camp like a nearly drowned kitten. "Just got grabbed and drobbed by a giant dragon, what's that? You want me to take you to the rebels I absolutely despise and want nothing to do with? Sure!" Ugh... 
